








私は、このＣＤプレイヤーをただで得ました。I got this CD player for free.


このＴシャツはバーゲンで買ったんだ。I bought this T-shirt on sale.



何をしなければならないかは明白です。It is clear what must be done.
あからさまに言えば彼は嫌いだ。Frankly, I don't like him.

王女があくどい化粧をしていた。The princess was wearing too much makeup.あくどい事をするな。Don't do wicked things.
彼はいろいろ他人の欠点をあげつらうのにうんざりしてしまった。そこで彼らの言うことは何でも、たとえどんなにくだらなくてもそのまま認めることにしている。He got tired of being the devil's advocate and now agrees with every idea they suggest, no matter how dumb.
彼はいいかげんにあしらえない人である。He is not a man to trifle with.

あそこから人影が見えた。A form appeared from over there.先生、アソコがかゆいんです。Doctor, I've got an itch in my crotch.
彼はあっさり罪を白状した。He confessed his crime frankly.
休暇はあっという間に終わった。The holiday ended all too soon.
３日連続で徹夜してるから、もうアップアップだよ。After three straight late nights at work, I feel like I'm drowning in work.
彼らはみなあどけない子供たちです。They are all artless children.
あのおいしいワインをなぜ飲まないんだい。Why not try that delicious wine?
あの〜郵便局はどちらでしょうか。Uh..., where's the post office?
冗談じゃないよ。あの人は私同様医者なんかじゃないよ。You can't be serious! He's no more a doctor than I am.
あの方たちに大変うれしいです。I am very pleased to meet them.
今日は仕事にあぶれた。I found no job today.
あなたはシャツをあべこべに着ている。You are wearing your shirt inside out.


赤ん坊を膝の上であやした。I dandled the baby on my knee.
あやふやな手つきで一枚の紙を動かした。She fumbled with a piece of paper.
あら、アンジェラと呼んでください。Oh, please call me Angela.

あれがこの町の大通りだ。That is the main street of this city.あれなら絶対大丈夫！Yeah, she must be the sure thing!そう言えば、あれから３０年以上も経つのね。Now that you mention it, it's been more than 30 years since then.
あんな男見ても胸くそが悪い。I can't bear the sight of him.


私はいやいやその仕事をした。I did the work against my will.
あの宗教団体はかなりいかがわしい教義にとりつかれている。That religious cult has got some pretty off the wall ideas.学生たるものはいかがわしい場所にちかづかない方がよい。Students are expected to stay away from dubious places.
だってきみってすごくイカしてるんだもの。Because you're a sweet and lovely girl.

こんな格好をしているといかにもスポーツしてそうに見えるけど、全然やってないんだよ。I look for all the world like an athlete in this outfit, but the truth is I don't do any sports at all.
この市にはいくつもの映画館がある。There are many movie theaters in this city.
このフロッピーをフォーマットしてはいけません。You mustn't format this floppy disk.彼本人は好人物なんだが、その取り巻きがどうもいけないね。I really like him, but not his circle of friends.「風邪気味です」「それはいけませんね」"I've a touch of a cold." "That's too bad."

あなたから離れようと思っているのにいざそうしようとしてもうまくいかない。I want to split up, but I know I couldn't even if I tried.
たとえばあなたの家庭のいざこざを考えてごらんなさい。Take, for instance, your family problems.
もうホントにこいつは優柔不断で、イジイジした奴だ。This guy is really wishy-washy. He couldn't make a decision to save his life.



帽子を弄り回すのはやめなさい。Please stop playing with your hat.
智子はイソイソと出掛けていった。Tomoko bounced happily out the door.
街中でイチャイチャするカップル見たら腹立ちませんか？Doesn't it irritate you to see couples making out around town?
彼は出会うどの女性ともいちゃつく。He flirts with every woman he meets.
わたしはいつもより遅く床に就いた。I went to bed later than usual.
彼はこれまでいとも簡単にたくさんの挑戦者をリングに沈めてきた。He's mowed down a parade of challengers before.
そう言えば、鯔背な男だった記憶が有るがどうしてるんだろな？Now that you mention it, I remember he was a dashing man. I wonder how he's doing?


私をいびらないで。Don't pick on me, please.

いるだけ持っていらっしゃい。Please take with you as much as you need.「いらっしゃ〜い」「よぉ」「なんだ、啓太か・・・」"Welcome!" "Yo." "Oh, what, it's only Keita?"
いらっしゃいませ、何名様ですか。Good evening. How many are in your party?
お母さんはいらっしゃいますか。Is your mother at home?あなたはご両親のどちらに似ていらっしゃいますか。Which of your parents do you take after?
おまえもいい加減ウジウジしてないで、決断しなさい！Quit sitting on the fence and make a decision!
アイドルのコンサート会場に、追っかけのファンがウジャウジャ集まっていた。At the pop star's concert the fans were swarming around the foot of the stage.
彼はそれを試してみたくてうずうずしていた。He was panting to have a go at it.


うっかりそれを忘れるところだったわ。I almost forgot all about that.
彼は一日中うとうとしていた。He slumbered out the whole day.
さっきからやたらウネウネした道を進んでいる。I'm getting tired of driving on this winding road.
濃霧に加えてうねりも高かった。In addition to a thick fog, there was a heavy swell.
今日一日当ても無くうろうろした。I wandered about aimlessly all day.
気を楽にして、何よりもうろたえないことだ。Relax, and above all, don't panic.
「コーヒーのお替わりいる？」「うん、ぼくのは少なめ、弟のには多めについでね」"Do you want another cup of coffee?" "Sure, make mine on the small side but be generous with my brother's."「軽くならいいけど」「うむ、では金的と目潰しは有効にするか？」"If it's a light workout, OK." "Right, so will we allow crotch-kicking and eyeball crushing?"う〜む、相貌から判断するに上海からか。Hrmmm, to judge from their looks they might be from Shanghai.
生き物なんだからウンコするに決まってんだろ。It's a living being, so of course it shits.
あの子にはうんざりする。The kid is a pain in the neck.


ええ、ほとんど私と同じくらいの背丈になっていますよ。Yes, he's almost as tall as I am.「マナカの絵、見して」「えーー、恥ずかしいですよー」"Lemme see your painting, Manaka." "Must you? It's embarrassing!"君、ええ仕事をしてるな。You're doing good work there.
ええと、私はジョギングはよいと思う。Well, I think jogging is good.
あの映画はえげつない。That movie's downright dirty.

あなたがおいでになることを公にするのは賢明ではないかもしれない。It may be unwise of you to advertise your presence.この雨の中をおいでにならないでください。Don't bother coming in this rain.いつ旅行においでになりますか。When will you go on a journey?

・・・・おいおいおい、奢りとわかったらリミッター解除ですか二人とも。... Hey-hey you two, is it no holds barred as soon as you know it's my treat?




便座におしっこしちゃったら、ちゃんと拭くのよ！If you piss on the toilet seat, wipe it off!


オタオタしてないで、はやくその問題を解決しなさい！There's no reason to panic. Just handle it quickly.



おい、おっさん！何やってんだよ！Hey, pops! What are you doing!

おっぱいはまだそんなに出ません。Her breasts don't give much milk yet.

その来たばかりの子はおどおどして口ごもった。The new boy had a nervous stammer.



ひとことで言えば、彼はおべっか使いだ。In a word, he is a flatterer.

おまけに雨まで降っていた。On top of that, it was raining.
おまじないって言うのはね、女の子が好きな人と結ばれるように願をかけたりすることだよ。What you call a 'charm', you know, is what girls wish upon that they may get together with the person they love and such like.


彼女は彼が精一杯のおめかしをしてきたのを見て、ウフッと笑った。When she saw the lengths he'd gone to to get all dressed up, she couldn't help letting a brief chuckle escape.

おや、今朝は早いですね。Oh, you are early this morning.
おやおや困ったものだ、いつも同じ間違いばかりして。Well really, you are always repeating the same mistake.
あんなにおろおろしちゃって恥ずかしいったらありゃしない。馬鹿みたいだったわよ。Shame on you for getting so flustered. You looked ridiculous.

サンドイッチとおにぎりじゃ、どっちが重いかしら。Which are heavier, sandwiches or onigiris?
私が今日あるのは両親のおかげである。I owe what I am to my parents.


私の家におばけが出たのは本当だ。It's true that a ghost appeared at my house.
お化け屋敷に行くの。夜寝られなくなっちゃうよ。The haunted house? I won't be able to sleep at night.

お菓子で赤ちゃんが窒息するところだった。The baby almost choked on a piece of candy.
フライトの再確認をお願いします。Flight reconfirmation, please.
お願いいたします、最後までお聞きください。I do beseech you, hear me through.
「ただいまー」「お帰りなさい」"I'm back." "Welcome home."
ひどいけがをしておいでで、お気の毒です。I'm sorry that you've been badly injured.
３１８号室のお客さんに持って行ってあげなさい。Take it to the men in Room 318.
お客様のサイズは切らしてしまっているようですが。I think we're out of your size.
彼は両親に「おやすみなさい」と言った。He said good night to his parents.
以前この辺りに小さなお宮があった。There used to be a small shrine around here.
お宮参りで訪れた大西幸治さん(40)、由希恵さん(34)夫妻は「子どもが健やかに育つことを祈りました」と話していた。The couple who came on a shrine visit, Kouji Oonishi (40) and his wife Yukie (34) said, "We prayed that our child would grow up healthily."
彼女は私のお供をするように言われた。She was told to accompany me.お伴したいものです。I would like to go with you.
どうやってそのお金を手に入れたんですか。How did you come by the money?
彼のお兄さんは有名なサッカーの選手です。His brother is a famous soccer player.
「百八といえば煩悩の数だ」「お兄ちゃんはどんな煩悩があるの？」「言ってもいいが、検閲削除になるぞ」"Talking about 108, that's the number of worldly passions." "What worldly passions have you got then?" "I could say, but it'll get censored out."ママー、今あのおにいちゃんすごいころんだよー。Mummy, that man just fell flat on his face!

お留守中に男の方がお見えになりました。A gentleman called in your absence, sir.
彼女のお見舞いに行こうよ。Why don't we go and see her in the hospital?


私の事はお構いなく。Please don't go out of your way on my account.
おしぼりが欲しいのです。Do you have hot towels?
このお札を硬貨に変えて下さい。Please change this bill into coins.


元旦には近所の神社にお参りする人が多い。On New Year's Day, many people visit neighborhood shrines.
ケイちゃんはとても運がいいのよ。お産の時から、そうだったわ。Kei's very lucky! He has been since his birth.
今日はこれでおしまいにしてはどうでしょう。What do you say to calling it a day?
あの子はよくお使いをする。The boy often runs errands.
あなたのお姉さんは審美感があるね。Your sister has a sense of beauty.ねえ蓮、お姉さんが手をつないであげようか？キミは毎年すぐにはぐれちゃうもんね。By the way, Ren. Should I take your hand? Every year you wander off.
お子さんは何人おありですか。How many children do you have?
いいお子様たちだと愛想を言う。Say nice things about a person's children.

どの子も先生にお辞儀した。Every child bowed to the teacher.


安全のために御守りを持って行きなさい。Take an amulet for safety's sake.

火災で全てのコンピューターディスクが駄目になってしまった時、会社はもうお手上げの状況だった。The company faced a major interruption in business when a fire destroyed their archive of computer hard drives and optical discs.

お手洗いはどこですか。Where's the restroom?
お手伝いさんたちは主人の命令を実行しようと努めた。The servants tried to carry out their master's order.
おまわりさんに車を片側に寄せるように合図された。The patrolman motioned me to pull over.

お召しもののサイズは？What size do you wear?
おすすめの靴屋を教えてくれませんか。Can you recommend your favorite shoe store?
すこし落ち着け吉祥、おのぼりさん丸出しだぞ。Calm down a little, Kissho, your bumpkin nature is standing out!
お嬢さんは試験に合格なさったそうですね。Your daughter passed the examination, I hear.彼女はいささかとりすました良家のお嬢さんだった。She was a rather prim and proper young lady.

赤ん坊のお尻みたいにすべすべだ。It's as smooth as a baby's bottom.
小さい頃よくおねしょをしたものだったが、７歳までには治った。I used to wet the bed when I was small, but I grew out of it by the time I was seven.



彼は警察のお尋ね者だ。He's wanted by the police.
私達は彼女の料理にお世辞を言った。We flattered her on her cooking.
お世話になりました。I really appreciate your kindness.

お先にどうぞ。After you.どうぞ、お先に！Go ahead!
お前を娘の夫にしよう。You shall be my daughter's husband.


おじいさんは少し耳が遠いんだ。My grandfather is a bit hard of hearing.おじいさんはその木の人形をピノキオと名づけました。The old man named the wooden doll Pinocchio.
ジョンのおばあさんは長い間病に伏せていたが、亡くなった。John's grandmother passed away after a long illness.お祖母さんが座布団の上にちんまりとすわっていました。The old woman was snugly sitting on a cushion.
皆さん、おはようございます。Good morning, everyone.


お袋の前ではそのことに触れるな。Don't talk about it in my mother's presence.
くれぐれもお体をお大事に。Please take good care of yourself.
お宅の暖房はどのようにしていますか。How do you heat the house?

状況をお知らせください。Please let me know the status.
ご都合のよいときにお茶を飲みにお寄りになりませんか。Why don't you drop in for tea at your convenience?３時はお茶にしよう。Let's have tea at 3:00.

彼らは天気についておしゃべりした。They chatted about the weather.
いいお天気ですね。It's a beautiful day, isn't it?それに比べ最近彼女のお天気は良好。In comparison to which she's been in a really good mood recently.
私の娘はおてんば娘だ。My daughter is a tomboy.

これは北海道からのお土産です。This is a souvenir from Hokkaido.波風を鎮めるにはチーズケーキのお土産が良いらしいですよ。A gift of cheesecake is apparently good to soothe discord.
お湯を全部使わないで。Don't use all the hot water.
買い替えた方がお得ですよ。You will be better off buying a new one than trying to fix it.
前髪が、おでこにかからないように髪を上げることをおすすめします。I recommend putting up your hair so your fringe doesn't get on your forehead.

「おさきにしつれいします」「おつかれさまでした」"I'm finished for the day." "Much appreciated."

お父さんは煙草の煙でたくさん輪を作れる。Dad can blow many smoke rings.
お風呂に入っているとき、電話がなった。When I was taking a bath, the telephone rang.
いいえ、結構です。お腹が一杯ですから。No, thank you. I've had enough.
お別れを言いにちょっと立ち寄ってみました。I just dropped in to say goodbye.
お返しに微積分のノートを貸してあげるわ。I'll pay you back with my calculus notes.いつか私を軽蔑したことに対して、彼にお返しをしてやろう。Someday I will repay him for looking down on me.
お母さんに口答えしてはいけませんよ。Don't answer your mother back.
お母様にくれぐれもよろしく。Please give my kindest regards to your mother.


お盆が近づいてきた。The Bon Festival is near at hand.



お話し中、ごめんなさい。Excuse me for interrupting you.

彼女はオシャレだ。She's fashionable.
かしこまりました。サラダバーはあちらです。All right, sir. The salad bar is over there.
これは誰の車かしら。I wonder whose car this is.
私の手は寒さでかじかんでいる。My hand are benumbed with cold.


洗面器の水がかちかちに凍った。The water in the basin has frozen solid.彼はコチコチの会社人間だから。He's just a diehard company man.
部屋の明かりのスイッチをカチッとつけた。He flipped the switch and threw the room into brightness.
彼の言うことって、いちいちカチンとくるんだよね。I find his every word truly offensive.
彼は怒ってかっかとしていた。He was ablaze with anger.
まぁ、そんなに格好つけるのはやめとけよ。Oh, come off it.


外に出ると強い日差しにカッと照らされた。I stepped outside and was bathed in the harsh, direct sunlight.彼はカッとして兄をなぐった。He hit his brother in a rage.
ウチだって閑古鳥が鳴くようなカツカツの状態だから、バイトを雇う余裕なんてない。We're in a slump, barely scraping by, so we certainly don't have the margin to take on a part-time worker.
肘が痛むんだよ。病院に行こうかな。My elbow really hurts. I guess I should go to a hospital.えーと、パン粉は有ったかな？Hmm, did we have some breadcrumbs?ラジオをとめてくれないかなぁ。I wish they would turn off the radio.
料理ということになれば、誰もメアリーにはかなわない。When it comes to cooking, no one can equal Mary.料理では私は彼女にかなわない。I am no match for her in cooking.私は退屈でかなわない。The boredom is unbearable.
うちのかみさんは元プロレスラーで、だからもし私が浮気をしているところを見つかりでもしようものなら、それこそコテンパンにやられてしまうよ。My wife used to be a pro-wrestler, so if she ever catches me two-timing her, I'd be beaten to a pulp.あの詐欺師と金髪のコールガールは下宿のおかみさんを怒らせるには申分のない取り合わせだ。The confidence man and his blonde call girl make a perfect match in enraging his landlady.
あなたの言うことは正しいかもしれない。You could be right, I suppose.
旅行でこのガイドブックが役に立つかもしれませんよ。This guidebook might be of use to you on your trip.
彼は九時から五時半まで働く。He works from nine to five-thirty.日本では学校は４月から始まる。In Japan, school starts in April.警官は殺人犯から拳銃をもぎ取った。The policeman wrested a gun from the murderer.
『しんのすけ』という名前はからかいの対象ですか？Is the name 'Shinosuke' a target for teasing?
太陽が地面をからからにかわかした。The sun has dried up the ground.


他人が悪い事をしているからといって自分もそうしてよいということにはならない。Two wrongs don't make a right.

彼女の子どもはか弱かった。Her child was in delicate health.
机を動かそうとしたら、足が床に引っ掛かっていたらしくガーッという音がした。When I tried to move the desk, one of its legs made a jarring sound as it scraped across the floor.
少し走っただけで膝がガクガクしてるよ。All I did was run a little and now my knees are wobbly.
長年の風雨でこのアパートの壁はガサガサになっている。After being out in the wind and rain for years and years the walls of this apartment building are weather-beaten and brittle.
嵐が雨戸をがたがたとならした。The storm rattled the shutters.
寒くて歯がガチガチ鳴った。My teeth chattered with cold.
皿はガチャガチャと床に落ちた。The dishes crashed to the floor.

ガチャンと言う音で私達はびっくりした。The cracking sound startled us.

その知らせにはがっかりだ。I am disappointed at the news.
わが国のサッカー代表チームが歴史的大敗を喫しガックリした。I was extremely disappointed to see our national soccer team suffer a historic loss.彼はがっくりひざをついた。His knees gave way.
そのスポーツ選手はがっしりした体格をしていた。The athlete had a strong build.
彼は背が高く骨組みのがっちりした人だ。He is a tall and strongly built man.


そんなにがつがつ食べるんじゃないよ。Don't eat like a pig.
そんなにがぶがぶ飲み続けると、アル中になるのがオチですよ。If you go on drinking so much, you may well end up an alcoholic.
彼の妻は彼に一日中がみがみ言っている。His wife nags him constantly.

壁は大きな音をたててガラガラと倒れた。The fence fell with a great crash.今日、がらがらだね。この時間帯って空いているのかね。It's not crowded at all today. This is the least crowded time of all.赤ん坊はガラガラを振っていた。The baby was shaking the rattle.




私が我慢できないことは、黒板でキーキーとチョークが音を立てることだ。What I can't bear is the sound of chalk squeaking on a chalkboard.

リハの回数増えたから仕事キチキチだよ。With the extra rehearsals, work is really tight.

私の時計はきちんと動いている。My watch is running all right.自分の部屋は出来るだけきちんとしておきたい。I want to keep my room as neat as possible.
ケイトは５時きっかりに来た。Kate came at five sharp.
私はきっちり３時間待った。I have waited a full three hours.彼女は入ってからきっちりドアを閉めた。She closed the door tightly behind her.
でもよー、オラのおとうさんは良い気しねーよ、きっと。But I don't think Dad would like me to.
彼は私を中に入れるのをきっぱりと断った。He flatly refused to let me in.
フーッ、この坂道はきついよ。でも帰りは楽だよね。Whew! This is a tough hill. But coming back sure will be a breeze.トムは頭にきつい一発を受けた。Tom received a heavy blow on the head.ちょっとウエストがきついね。The waist is a little small.
彼の娘は動作がきびきびしている。His daughter is quick in her movements.


彼は不安そうにあたりをきょときょと見回した。He looked around uneasily.
星が空にきらきら輝いている。The stars are twinkling in the sky.


彼は動作がぎこちない。He is awkward in his movements.
ぎざぎざのかどが彼のズボンに引っかかって穴を空けた。The jagged edge ripped a hole in his trousers.

ぎっくり腰なんです。I have a strained back.
エレベーターにぎっしりいっぱいに乗った。We jammed into the elevator.
どの電車も通勤者でぎゅうぎゅう詰めだった。The trains were jammed with commuters.


その光景を見てぎょっとした。I was frightened at the sight.

彼の目は怒りでぎらぎらしていた。His eyes were blazing with anger.
ギリギリのところで間に合った。I just made it under the wire.
クサクサすることばっかりだけど、気を取り直して頑張っていきましょう！We've been moping around too much. It's time to pull ourselves together and keep trying.
顔が涙でくしゃくしゃになった。His face went to pieces with tears.
咳、くしゃみ、あくびをする時は口を手で隠しなさい。Cover your mouth when you cough, sneeze, or yawn.
くすくす笑わずにいられなかった。I couldn't keep from snickering.


もう朝から晩まで働いてクタクタだよ。I'm beat. I've been working from dawn to dusk.彼はくたくたの背広を着ていた。He was wearing a threadbare suit.くたくたに煮る。Reduce to pulp by boiling.

あいつは簡単にはくたばらない。He has more lives than a cat.

私は仕事でひどくくたびれている。I'm very tired from work.ジャックは５０マイル歩いてくたびれた。Jack was tired from having walked fifty miles.

その木は空にくっきりと浮かび上がっていた。The tree was clearly defined against the sky.
ぬれた衣装が彼女の体にくっついていた。Wet clothes clung to her body.
彼はその破片をくっつけ合わした。He stuck the broken pieces together.このＣＤプレイヤーを棚の前の端にぴったりとくっつけてください。Set the CD player square with the front edge of the shelf, please.

くどくど言わないようにしよう。Let's not go into details.
道はくねくねと畑の中を走っていた。The road wound through the fields.

彼は戸を白のペンキでくまなく塗った。He painted the door over white.
彼は過去の失敗の事をくよくよ思っている。He dwells on his past failures.
頭がくらくらしているので、深く考えずにいい加減なことを書いてみる。My head is swimming, so I'll try writing any old stuff without any deep thought.

木の葉が庭でくるくる舞っていた。The leaves whirled in the yard.



彼の力強い演説は聴衆をぐいぐいひっぱっていった。His powerful speech carried the audience with him.

何をぐずぐずしてるの？What's taking you so long?あいつはいつもぐずぐず文句ばかり言っている。He is complaining about something or other all the time.
デスクトップがグチャグチャになってきた。My desktop has gotten cluttered.
昨夜はぐっすり眠れなかった。I couldn't sleep well last night.
私たちは５時間の旅でぐったりしてしまった。We felt dead from the five-hour trip.
明け方近くは、ぐっと冷え込む。It gets extremely cold toward dawn.トムは自分の感情をぐっと抑えた。Tom got a grip on his emotions.


テーブルの脚がぐらぐらする。The legs of the table are shaky.頭がぐらぐらします。My head is swimming.
このテーブルはぐらつく。This table isn't steady.
彼は不良仲間とぐるになっていた。He fell into bad company.
犬はぐるぐる駆け回った。The dog ran around and around.





欠点があるけどやはり彼が好きです。I love him despite his faults.



げっぷがよく出ます。I burp a lot.

このげろを取り除きなさい！Get rid of this vomit yourself!


違いはこうだ。つまり、彼のほうが君よりよく働くのだ。The difference is this: he works harder than you.
こういうチェックポイントを注意すると、いいですね。You'd better check these points.



こせこせする必要はない。It is not necessary to be meticulous.
辛抱こそ大事なんだ。It's patience that counts.こだわりはお客に伝わってこそ意味をなす。Care over the particulars only has meaning once it gets across to customers.彼は年こそ若いが十分その仕事をやっていける。Young as he is, he is equal to the task.
影でこそこそせず面と向かって彼にそれを言いたまえ。Say it to his face, not behind his back.
そのこそ泥は窓をこじ開けている現場を捕まった。The burglar was caught in the act of prying open the window.



こだわりはお客に伝わってこそ意味をなす。Care over the particulars only has meaning once it gets across to customers.
殿方が細かいことにこだわるものではありません。It doesn't become a gentleman to fuss over trifles.その男の子はあくまでも髪の毛を伸ばすことにこだわった。The boy persisted in wearing his hair long.日本人はあまり宗教にはこだわらない。Japanese are not so particular about religion.
こちらへやってくる少年とその犬をごらんなさい。Look at the boy and his dog that are coming this way.塩をこちらへ取ってもらえますか。Could you pass me the salt, please?こちらの方があちらより値段が高い。This costs more than that.

「はじめまして、ジェイムズさん」「こちらこそ、あなたにお会いできて、こんなに嬉しいことはありません」"Pleased to meet you, Mr. James." "The pleasure is all mine. It's an honor to make your acquaintance."
彼はそのことを私にこっそり話してくれた。He told me about it in private.
彼はこつこつ事実を調べていた。He was patiently digging for facts.だれかがドアをこつこつとたたいている。Someone is tapping at the door.
私は彼に会ったことがある。I have met him before.細菌が病気を引き起こすことがある。Germs can cause sickness.
緑色植物は自分自身の食物を作ることができる。Green plants can make their own food.

トムはこれまで手をつけた仕事はことごとく成功した。Tom has always done well in every job he has had.

１週間の休暇を取っても良い事になった。I was allowed to take a week off.苦労と心配で彼の健康はそこなわれることになった。Toil and worry caused his health to break down.あなたが言っていることからすれば、彼はそこにいなかったことになる。It follows from what you say that he was not there.
私は本を読むことによって知識を得る。I get knowledge by reading books.
こないだ、カメラをなくしてしまった。I lost my camera the other day.




この間の台風で、時速２００キロの風が吹きました。In the last typhoon, the wind blew at over 200 kilometers per hour!

このごろ少しも見ないです。I have seen nothing of him lately.
この場合は君が悪い。You're wrong in this case.
このたびはお見のがしくださったらと望んでおります。I hope it will be overlooked this time.
この辺に詳しいですか。Are you familiar with this area?

こ、こら！ナニやっとるかぁぁ！！H-Hey! What're you up to!!
これからは決してうそをつきません。I will never tell a lie from now on.
これでこの一画は少なくとも２０匹ニジマスがいるわけだ。So now there are at least 20 rainbow trout in this area.

これまでのところすべて順調だ。So far everything has been going well.
これらのクッキーは星の形をしている。These cookies are star-shaped.
そんなにコロコロ、言う事を変えないでくれよ。Don't change your mind so often.毎週火曜日には、先生のころころした小さな指がピアノの鍵盤をあちこちと鳥のように飛びはねていました。Every Tuesday her fat little fingers flew like birds up and down the keys of song too.


こんな風に、彼は私を扱った。This is the way he treated me.
どうして帰りがこんなに遅くなったの。Why did you come home so late?
隣の部屋では、夜遅くまで起きてごそごそしている音がする。The people in the next room stay up until all hours doing God knows what.
彼の発言がゴタゴタを起こした。His remark gave rise to trouble.
しばらく車を運転していないと、アクセルとブレーキがごっちゃになることない？Have you ever got in your car after a long absence and got the brake mixed up with the accelerator?ゴチャゴチャ文句を言いなさんな。Don't make a fuss.
忍者ごっこをしよう。Let's make believe we're ninjas.

その町はいつも観光客でごった返している。The town is always crawling with tourists.

手品師はごまかしを使う。Magicians use deception.

そのごみ箱は悪臭を放っていた。The garbage-can gave off a bad smell.
胃がごろごろ音をたてます。My stomach is rumbling.家でごろごろするのをやめて、何かすることを見つけなさい。Stop being lazy and find something to do.目がゴロゴロします。My eyes feel gritty.
ご苦労様でした。Thank you for your trouble.
アリさん、今日もご苦労さんだよ。はい、角砂糖あげるよ。Hi Mr Ant, keeping up the good work today as well. Here's a sugar cube.
御兄弟を説得して、私の案をやっと受け入れてもらった。I finally managed to persuade her siblings to accept my plan.
私のことでしたらご心配なく。Don't have any worries on my account.

騙りメールにご注意ください。Please beware of fraudulent emails.
丹精をこめてつくったこの美しい織物をごらんください。Take a look at this beautiful embroidery made with great effort.
さあ東京駅に着きました。Here we were at Tokyo Station.
彼女は私の家にさえ来なかった。She did not come even as far as my house.雨がやみさえすればいいのになあ。If only it would stop raining!


「びっくりさせないでよ」と彼女は彼が背後に近づいた時言った。"Don't scare me!" she screamed as he came up behind her.あなたの運転免許証をちょっと拝見させて下さい。Let me take a look at your driver's license.

いいからさっき盗ったモノを、カバンの中から出しなさい。Never mind that, just take out what you've just nicked from your bag.
さっさと宿題をしなさい。Do your homework without delay.
彼は教室をさっと抜け出した。He slipped out of the classroom.すばらしい景色がさっと目の前に現れた。A glorious sight burst on our view.
ほんの一寝入りしたら、さっぱりした。Just a spot of shut-eye has already refreshed my mind.彼女はさっぱりした服装をしている。She is neatly dressed.あなたのおばあさんは気性のさっぱりしたいい方ですね。Your grandmother is a charming lady.
冗談はさておいて、事態はどうなっていますか。Joking aside, how are things going?
さてさて、みなさんは舞姫というアニメを知っているでしょうか？Well then, does everybody know the anime called Mai Hime?
ごたごたが片付いてさばさばした。I felt relieved when all the troubles were taken care of.
彼女はさめざめと泣いた。She cried her heart out.

松井、起死回生の逆転満塁サヨナラホームラン！Matsui pulled the Giants back from the brink with a grand slam that gave them a come-from-behind victory.
彼はすぐに無知をさらけ出した。He soon betrayed his ignorance.
木の葉のサラサラという音が聞こえた。I heard the leaves rustling.小川がさらさらと流れる音が聞こえる。We can hear a brook murmuring.
彼女は時計をさりげなく見た。She took a casual glance at her watch.
おつりはいらないよ、運転士さん。Keep the change, driver.美和子さん、こちらケニーさんです。Miwako, I want you to meet Kenny.
ざくざくと雪を踏んで進む。I crunch through the snow.1/4カットの白菜を太めの千切りにザクザク切る。Cut the quartered pak-choi into, slightly wide, strips.
ざっくばらんにすべきです。そうすれば彼らは君を仲間として扱うだろう。You should be frank, and they will treat you as a friend.
私はパンフレットにざっと目をとおした。I glanced through the brochure.

猫の舌はざらざらしている。The tongue of a cat feels rough.

彼はしおしおと家にかえった。He went home with a heavy heart.
試験まで、たった一週間しか残っていない。There is only a week left before the examination.コアラはオーストラリアにしか見られない。Koalas can only be seen in Australia.
彼女は私の手にしっかりとしがみ付いた。She held on to my hand tightly.
トムはしきりに新車を買いたがっている。Tom is eager to buy a new car.
一人の小さな女の子がしくしく泣いているのをみつけた。I found that there was a little girl sobbing.
今回はしくじれないぞ。You cannot fail this time.

この方がしっくりする。Now this is more like it.
ここにしつこい痛みがあります。I have a persistent pain here.

私はしばしば絶望感に襲われた。I was often seized by despair.
彼は結構しぶといね。転んでもただでは起きぬ、いい根性しているよ。He's a tenacious guy who always manages to come out on top. He's the kind of guy who can turn any situation to his advantage.
しまった、ガットが切れた。Oh, no. I broke a string in my racket.
その悲しい話は彼女にしみじみと感じられた。The sad story came home to her.

少し離れて見ると、その岩は人がしゃがんだ姿に見える。Seen at a distance, the rock looks like a squatting human figure.

しゃっくりがよく出ます。I hiccup a lot.
マックで軽く昼食をとって、スタバでコーヒーを飲んで、しゃぶしゃぶをしながら飲み会という流れだ。A light lunch at MacD's, coffee at Starbucks, then a few drinks with shabu-shabu - that's the way it went.
あんなやつを信用したら骨までしゃぶられちゃうぞ。If you trust such a fellow, you'll lose everything you have.
その男は一時間喋りつづけた。The man kept talking for an hour.

その先生はいつも相談しやすい人だった。The teacher has always been easy to consult with.
そのような事はしょっちゅう起こる。Such a thing occurs frequently.


彼はしょんぼりして、哀れに見えた。He looked piteous, like a drowned mouse.



アメリカの尻馬に乗るなというセリフに正面から反論するのが、どれほどしんどいことだったことか。Just how tiresome was it to argue straight against the phrase "Don't blindly follow America's lead!"





じっくり彼に耳を貸す者はいない。No one stops to listen to him.
こうした熊独特の特徴が、熊が動かずに狩猟すること（アザラシの呼吸孔の脇でじっと動かず、アザラシが海面に上がってくるのを待つ）を好む説明になっている。These special characteristics explain its preference for still-hunting (lying motionless beside a seal's breathing hole, waiting for one to surface).人をじっと見つめるのは無礼である。It's impolite to stare at people.さあ言ってよ、じっと聞いているから。Tell me. I'm all ears.
私は彼が通りを横切るのをじっと見ていた。I watched him cross the street.
じめじめした寒い日は健康に悪い。A damp, cold day affects a person's health.
「安いですね。じゃあ10ヤードください」小娘が答えた。"That's cheap. I'll take ten yards," the girl answered.

それじゃまた明日。See you tomorrow.
今はジャガイモの世話をしている。I take care of the potatoes now.

男の子はたらいの中でジャブジャブ水をはねかしていた。The boy splashed about in the tub.

「じゃんけんね」「ぐー」「ちょ・・パー」「後出しかよ！」"Rock-paper-scissors, OK?" "Rock." "Sciss... paper." "You cheated!"

じらさないで、そのニュースを私に聞かせてくださいよ。Stop playing cat and mouse with me and tell me the news.
彼女はジリジリするような日差しの中で、傘をさした。She put up an umbrella against a scorching sun.
君のやることはじれったいね。I am losing my patience with you.
他人の顔をじろじろ見るんじゃない。Don't stare others in the face.

スープを飲むときスースーいう音をたててはいけない。When you drink soup, don't make any slurping sound.
ヤンマがすいすいと水の上を進んでいた。The dragonfly was skimming across the water.

迷子の女の子はすすり泣きしながら名前を言っていた。The stray girl sobbed her name.

うるさいなっ！少しの頭痛くらい我慢しろ。余は魔力がすっからかんだ。それもこれも姫のせいだぞ。Shurrup! Don't make such a fuss over a little headache. I'm flat out of magical power - this is all your fault!今週末は温泉に行く余裕はないね。すっからかんだ。I can't afford to go to the onsen this weekend. I'm broke.
私はすっかり息が切れた。I am completely out of breath.
一杯のコーヒーを飲んだら頭がすっきりした。A cup of coffee cleared my head.コートを探してます。背が低いので、丈は短めで、なるべくすっきりしたデザインのものを。I'm looking for a coat. I'm short so the length should be on the short side, and as refined a design as possible.うっとうしい梅雨期に、すっきりしない話で恐縮ですが、少しの間お付き合いください。I'm ashamed to tell such a muddled story in this dreary, rainy season, but please bear with me for a while.
言いたかった事を全部言ったら胸がすかっとした。I felt quite relieved after I had said all I wanted to say.
彼はそのそばでシャツをすうっと着た。He slipped the gaudy shirt on.カタツムリがすっと角を出した。The snail shot out its horns.

上司との約束をすっぽかした。I skipped out on my appointment with my boss.
でも、ジェンの家のベランダにいたヴィンスは上半身裸。いやー、もしかしたらすっぽんぽんだったかもッ！However, Vince, on Jen's house's veranda, was naked from the waist up. He might even have been starkers!
リスはすばしこく木を登る。Squirrels are nimble in climbing trees.
私は、何をすべきかわからない。I don't know what to do.


彼はなんて英語をすらすら話すだろう。How fluently he speaks English!
彼はすらりとした姿をしている。He has a slender figure.その少女はすらりとたれさがった髪をしていた。The girl had flowing hair.


スージーは真夜中までおきていた。すると奇妙な物音が聞こえた。Susie sat up until midnight, when she heard a strange noise.


自動車は角をすれすれに通った。The car just shaved the corner.
スーザンは賢いから試験にすんなり通ると思うよ。Susan is intelligent, and I expect her to pass the exam easily.

だるいし頭がずきずきする。I feel listless and have a throbbing headache.
彼はずけずけものをいうからね。He doesn't mince words.

６時からずっと待っているのだが、僕の番がまだ来ない。I've been waiting since six o'clock and still my turn hasn't come.この時計はあれよりもずっと高価だ。This clock is far more expensive than that.この慣習は、ずっと前から廃止されている。This practice has long since been done away with.
彼は何でもずばずば言う人だ。He is the type of a person who calls a spade a spade.
その問題についての彼の意見はずばり的を射ている。His remarks on the subject are much to the point.
彼女は全身ずぶぬれだった。She was soaked from head to foot.
ちょっと椅子をずらしてくれない？Could you move the chair a bit?ローマのホテルの予約を、３日ずらさなければならなくなった。I had to put back the hotel reservations for Rome by three days.

私はぬかるんだ斜面をずるずると滑り下りた。I slithered down the muddy slope.ほそぼそとしたアクセスや、たまにくるメールなどに励まされ、ズルズルここまできてしまいました。Encouraged by the continuing trickle of hits and the rarely arriving email I've somehow kept going till now.

ピントがズレている。That's a little out of focus.

君はもう少しせかせかするのをやめなければいけない。You must be less impatient.
その子は母親にキャンデーをせがんだ。The child begged his mother for candy.

人は運命を甘受せざるを得ない。One can't quarrel with destiny.


その事故で両親を亡くした少女に同情せずにはいられなかった。I couldn't but sympathize with the girl who had lost her parents in the accident.
せっかちな運転者が赤信号を無視して交差点を通りぬけた。An impatient driver forced his way through the crossing against the red light.
僕に金をせびろうとしても無駄だ。It's no use asking me for money.
せめて日常会話ができるくらいになりたい。At the very least, I'd like to be able to have everyday conversations.
そいつをつかまえて！Get him!そいつはぼくの神経にさわる。It gets on my nerves.
まもなく雨が降りそうだ。It is going to rain soon.

そうするといやが上にも美しく見える。That makes you even more attractive.
都合の悪いこと、そうそう隠しとおせるもんじゃないよ。悪事千里を行く、っていうだろう。You can't hide the fact that you're having a hard time. Bad news travels fast you know.そうそうその調子。That a boy!
「彼女は音楽が好きではない」「そうだね」"She likes music, doesn't she?" "So she does."新聞によれば、その町に大火があったそうだ。According to the papers, there was a big fire in the town.

１時間以内にそこに着くでしょう。We'll arrive there within an hour.
今日、野球の試合を見に行くと、売り子がお湯の入ったタンクを持って、そこいらを歩き回っている。If you go to a baseball game today, sellers are walking around with hot-water tanks.
まだ、完了と言うところまで行っていないが、そこそこ成果が出始めてきた。It's not yet what you'd call finished but we're starting to get pretty good results.駅から叔父の家までは５分そこそこでした。It took about five minutes to get to my uncle's house from the station.
主体・客体さえ訳せればあとはそこまで難しくないです。If you can translate the subject and object then after that it isn't so difficult.
彼女はそこらにいますか。Is she anywhere about?
私は京都と、そして奈良にも訪れる計画を立てている。I am planning to visit Kyoto, and Nara as well.
バスに傘を忘れるとは彼女はそそっかしい。It was careless of her to leave her umbrella in the bus.
彼女の話は子供たちの好奇心をそそった。Her story excited curiosity in the children.


そちらはセントラル自動車学校ではないんですか。Isn't this Central Driving School?そっちの生活はどうだい？How are things for you up there?これとそちらとの違いは何だい。What is the difference between this and that?
計画はそっくり承認された。The plan was approved in its entirety.あなたはお母さんにそっくりね。You look just like your mother.
彼女は子供をそっと寝かせた。She laid the child down gently.
毎日、放課後に私はその本屋で彼女を待った。Every day I waited for her at the bookstore after school.

そのため、派遣労働者は劣悪な労働条件の下で働いている。For that reason, temporary workers are working under inferior conditions.
その後の話はご存じでしょう。You know the rest of the story.

この本はおもしろい、その上、非常にためになる。This book is interesting and, what is more, very instructive.その上さらに５ドル払った。I paid five dollars in addition.

何本か花がある。一本は赤、もう一本は白で、その他は黄だ。There are several flowers. One is red, another is white, and the others are yellow.私はその他の計画を思い付かない。I can't think of any other plan.
何かあったらそのつど知らせてください。Please keep me informed.
そのうち一緒に仕事ができるといいなと思っています。Hope we can work together soon.
それは値段は安いが、その反面品質がよくない。It is cheap, but on the other hand it is not good.
そもそもなぜ鳥は移動するのだろうか。Why do birds migrate in the first place?そもそも事故の大半は熱帯雨林ではなく、身近な場所でおこるのである。Most accidents, after all, happen around the corner, not in the rainforest.
そよ風で池の面にさざ波が立った。A gentle wind made ripples on the surface of the pond.
万一それが起これば、君はどうしますか。Should that happen, what will you do?それが高1の時だから17年が経ちました。That was when I was in the first year at high school, so 17 years have passed since then.
それから長い沈黙が続いた。There followed a long silence.
上へ昇れば昇るほど、それだけ墜落の程度は大きくなる。The higher you climb, the greater the fall.
雨がひどく降ってきた、それで私たちは屋内で遊んだ。It was raining hard, so we played indoors.
あなたはリンゴが好きですか、それともオレンジが好きですか。Do you like apples or oranges?
「あなたは仕事が気に入っていると思います」「いやそれどころか、嫌いです」"I think you like your job." "On the contrary, I hate it."

それに、みんなに仲間もできるしね。And, we get each other's company to boot.

いや、それほど混んでなかったよ。No, the traffic wasn't too bad.
それらの大きさはほとんど同じです。Their sizes are much the same.
それ以上の侮辱には我慢できなかった。I couldn't bear any more insults.
それ以来彼のうわさは聞いていない。He has never been heard of since.
学寮長のベイカーさんは、それゆえに自分の所有する小さい車のために、駐車場に特別なスペースを設けた。The head of the college, Miss Baker, had a special place in the car park for her small car.
今日は父さんはそわそわしている。Dad's in an impatient mood today.
そんなことを言う人は嫌いだ。I don't like those who say so.
きみもゾクゾクきてるかい？Is this getting you going too?
その光景を見て私はぞっとした。The sight made my flesh creep.
女性の乞食が５〜６人の子どもをぞろぞろつれて物乞いをしていました。A female beggar was begging with five or six children following along.
その警官は私に対してかなりぞんざいだった。The policeman was rather abrupt with me.
彼はたかが政治屋だ。He is not any better than a politician.



何があっても彼女の信念はたじろがない。Nothing can ever stagger her belief.
ここから歩いてたった１０分の距離です。It is no more than ten minutes' walk from here.
教授の話はユーモアたっぷりだった。The professor's speech was full of humor.まだ時間はたっぷりある。We still have plenty of time left.観客はたっぷりと５分間拍手した。The audience applauded for a full five minutes.
老人がたどたどしい足取りで歩いてきた。An old man came tottering along.

そこに行くたびに彼女に会う。Every time I go there, I meet her.
彼女は時間がないといつも不平たらたらだ。She keeps moaning that she has no time.


１日中テニスをしていたのだから。He was playing tennis all day.

だからといって異議があるわけではない。Not that I have any objection.
来たのはメアリーだけだった。No one came except Mary.この車には楽にその山をのぼるだけの力がある。This car has enough power to go up the mountain easily.
さすがに偉大な学者だけあって、彼はその問いに容易に答えた。Like the great scholar that he was, he answered the question easily.
スポーツだけでなく、音楽も好きだ。I love music as well as sports.
で、電話してみたらしいんだけど、その電話先の相手ってのが問題だったのよ。And so it seems she tried phoning but it's who was on the other end of that phone that was the problem.
敵対勢力間の和平交渉再開だけに、関係は危うい。Relations are tenuous as peace talks resume between warring factions.彼女は私だけにつらく当たる。She is only hard on me.
彼の服装いつもださい。His clothes are always out of style.
だったら、私のお願いを聞いて欲しいの。それでチャラ。If so then I want you to do something for me. That will make us even.
だぶだぶの上着が最新の流行なのだ。Loose jackets are the latest fad.

一生かかって蓄えた貯金をだまし取られてしまったのだった。I'd been cheated out of my life savings!
彼女のブーツは私のものよりずっと早くだめになる。Her boots wear out much more quickly than mine.
この本は間違いだらけだ。This book is full of mistakes.その部屋は紙くずだらけだった。The room was littered with scraps of paper.
蒸し暑いと心も体もだらける。Hot and humid weather makes us lazy.
それ以来彼はだらしない生活をしてきた。He has led a loose life since then.
汗がダラダラです。I'm dripping with sweat.手を付けずダラダラしているくせに、「うへー、今度こそ間に合わないかも！？」と心はビクビクしている。Despite having lazed around without having touched my work I'm frightened at heart that "Ooh-er, this time I might really not get done in time!?"話は三時までだらだらと続いた。The talk dragged on till three o'clock.
だるいし頭がずきずきする。I feel listless and have a throbbing headache.

この靴下はちぐはぐだ。These socks do not match.

最近エリザベスにちっともあってない。I have not seen anything of Elizabeth lately.
彼は山の中のちっぽけな町からやってきた。He came from a tiny mountain town.
たまにはビール以外のお酒をちびちび舐めるのも良いでしょう。It's nice to sip and savour drinks other than beer as well from time to time.

彼はちゃっかりしている。He is shrewd and calculating.
この歌手はあまりにもチヤホヤされすぎる。This singer is made too much of.
謝ったんだから、さっきのはチャラにしてよ。I've apologised, so lay off, OK?
こんなデカイのがチャリの荷台に乗るわけないだろ。There's no way one that big is going to go on a bike's luggage rest.

あら、あなたのところの娘のはるちゃんはとても陽気ですね。Oh, your daughter Haru is very cheerful.




この道具はちゃんと使えばとても役に立つ。If it is used properly, this tool will be a great help.



その赤ん坊はちょいちょい母親を困らせる。The baby often annoys the mother.
だってお隣さんだし。ちょくちょくお邪魔するから。Well, we're neighbours. I'll be popping over all the time.
ねずみが一匹、穴からちょこちょこ出てきた。A mouse scurried out of the hole.

そんなの忘れてちょっくら晩飯でも食いにこいや。Forget your troubles for a while and come and have dinner with us.

制服だって、いつも着ているのより糊がきき過ぎていて、ちょっぴり違和感すら覚えてしまいます。Even my uniform is feeling a little uncomfortable, being starched more than the one I usually wear.






ちょっと屈めば、信号旗がチラチラと見え隠れします。If you just crouch a little, the signal flag can just be seen flicking in and out of sight.
私は彼女の顔をちらっと見かけた。I caught a glimpse of her face.
普通の看護師は、ちんこに溲瓶も添えるし手術の時は剃毛もするぞ。A typical nurse will do such things as helping with a urinal bottle, and shaving in preparation for surgery!
動き出すとき、ベルが「ちんちん」と鳴る。だから、ちんちん電車。When it sets off the bell rings, "ding-ding". Thus 'ding-ding-train'.犬はちんちんをやめて四つ足に戻った。The dog stopped begging and went back on all fours.
薬缶がストーブの上でチンチン鳴っています。The kettle is whistling on the stove.

その若者が女の子をちんぴらの連中から救った。The young man saved the girl from a bunch of hoodlums.


一日中立ちっぱなしだったのでくたくただ。I'm worn out, because I've been standing all day.
私が彼を訪ねたのは、つい昨日のことだ。It was only yesterday that I called on him.彼の会社は私の会社のつい目と鼻の先にある。His office is very close to mine.アッシュさんはついタバコを吸わずにいられないみたいですね。I think Mr Ashe has just got to have a cigarette.
ついでに私のも買ってきてくれますか。Can you buy one for me as well?
一人の男がつかつかと近づいてきて、マッチを貸して下さいと言った。A man came up to me and asked for a match.


彼は、自分の不幸をつくづく考えた。He brooded over his misfortunes.
そうやって俺のことを気にしつつ、しかし素直になりきれない、そのツンデレさが今若い男の間で大ブーム！That way you keep thinking about me but are unable to admit to your feelings, that hot and cold feel is a real boom among young men!
公園のつつじの世話をする庭師が若干名いる。Several gardeners look after the azaleas in the park.


つばさはとても速い電車だ。The Tsubasa is a very fast train.
つべこべ言わずに、出されたものを食べなさい。Eat what you are served, no buts about it.
あの新しい映画は、つまらんかった。That new movie was a bummer.あの男はよくつまらぬことで誰にでも因縁をつける。He often uses the slightest thing as a pretext for a fight with anybody.
私の父はビリヤードの玉のように頭がつるつるだ。My father is as bald as a billiard ball.
もしかしてツンツンしているのは、生理痛なだけとか？いや、まさかね。Could it be that her prickly attitude is just because she has period pains? No, couldn't be.

彼のズボンのしりはてかてか光っている。The seat of his pants is shiny.
この暑さに１０マイルもてくてく歩くのはたまらない。I can't bear to tramp ten miles in this heat.
私はその仕事にてこずった。I had some trouble with the work.

てっきりあなたが我々といっしょに来られるものと思っていました。I took it for granted that you would come with us.

てんで見当がつきません。I don't have the slightest idea.

あなたの言うことは、ある意味では本当である。What you say is true in a sense.
両親はさておき、誰もその容疑者を弁護しないであろう。Apart from his parents, nobody would defend the suspect.

こんなデカイのがチャリの荷台に乗るわけないだろ。There's no way one that big is going to go on a bike's luggage rest.



これは本物のダイヤでしょう。This is probably a real diamond.「確かにそこまで美人だと逆に引いちゃいますね」「でしょう」"Certainly if someone is _that_ beautiful you'd draw back from approaching her." "Thought you'd agree."
いいえ、結構です。お腹が一杯ですから。No, thank you. I've had enough.
では今晩またね、さようなら。See you tonight, then. Cheers!選挙では、保守派と革新派がせめぎ合った。In the election, conservatives and progressives were fighting each other.
「そうしたわよ」彼女は文句を言った。「でも水なんかなかったわよ」"I did that," she complained, "but there was no water in it!"あの男がもう１つでも間違いを犯したらクビにする。If that man makes one more mistake, I'll fire him.あなたはまるで幽霊でも見たような顔つきをしている。You look as if you had seen a ghost.


冬に暖かい服装をしていないと、ひどいかぜをひくことになりかねない。If you don't wear warm clothes in winter, it wouldn't be surprising if you caught a bad cold.長時間歩くと踵にたこができる。If you walk a lot, you will develop calluses on your heel.注意しないと、問題に巻き込まれますよ。If you don't look out, you will get into trouble.
うぬぼれた人というのは自分たちは他人よりも優れているのは当然だと思っている。Conceited people take it for granted that they are superior to others.その本を机の上に戻しておいた方がいいですよ。というのは所有者がそこへ戻ってくるでしょうから。You had better put the book back on the desk, for the owner will come back there.
これがいわゆる「天ぷら」というものです。This is what we call "tempura".
包丁とか鍋とか、台所用品を持参すること。Don't forget to bring kitchen utensils such as knives and cooking pots.マルコーニさんとかいう人がご面会です。A Mr. Marconi wants to see you.


ところが実はどうすることもできないのです。As it is, I can do nothing.

政治家として、彼は、演技のうまさを目一杯活用している。As a politician, he makes utmost use of his acting ability.私たちの中で１人としてあなたを助けたいと思わない者はありません。There is not one of us who does not want to help you.彼女は宝石を盗もうとして捕まった。She was captured trying to steal jewelry.
他の誰かが彼女を幸せにしたとしても彼女が幸せなら、それで良い。Even if it was somebody else who made her happy, as long as she is happy, that's fine.学生服は普段着としても式服としても着られるので便利だ。The school uniform is convenient because it can be worn for both informal and formal occasions.
「とすると石造り？」「一般的なＲＣ造よ」"So it's built from stone?" "It's ordinary reinforced concrete."
その地震はとてつもなく大きな津波を引き起こした。The earthquake created a tremendous sea wave.
「これはとてもおもしろそうだね」とひろしが言います。"This looks pretty interesting," Hiroshi says.この雨の中を外出することはとてもできないことです。Going out in this rain is out of the question.




老人がとぼとぼ歩いていた。The old man was plodding along.

細かいことでとやかく言うのはよそう。Let's not quibble over trivial matters.



証人喚問はとんだ騒ぎになってしまいました。The confirmation hearings turned into a free-for-all.
ジャックが音楽が苦手なんてとんでもない、それどころか、ピアノを弾くのがうまい。It isn't true that Jack is no good at music; on the contrary, he plays the piano well.「君はそれを終えたか」「とんでもない、始めたばかりだ」"Have you finished it?" "On the contrary, I've just begun."
彼女は指でテーブルをとんとんたたいた。She drummed her fingers on the table.


私たちは時流とともに進まなければならない。We must keep up with the times.
新婚なのに子供？そう・・・息子は父親の連れ子。彼はバツイチというわけだ。Newlyweds but with a child? Yes, that's right - the son is from the father's former marriage. He's been divorced once.というわけで、人材を啓発するためのセンターが日本に作られるべきであろう。Therefore, a center for the development of human resources should be built in Japan.あたしも賛成だから、三対一ね。というわけで、ハルカの反対意見は却下されました。I'm also in favour so it's three to one. And thus your objection is overruled.
田中さんといえば、最近彼に会ったか。Talking of Mr Tanaka, have you seen him lately?父は料理が得意だ。母はといえば、食べるのが得意だ。Father is good at cooking. As for Mother, she is good at eating.
その仕事はまだほとんど終わったと言える状態ではない。The job isn't anywhere near done.
その家には幽霊が出るといわれる。The house is said to be haunted.

ジョーンは姉さんと同じように魅力がある。Joan is as charming as her sister.

あなたはあの車をどう処理したのですか？What did you do with that car?
これとあれはどういう関係があるの。How is this connected to that?
「どうしたの」「少しほうっておいて。あなたには関係ないことなの」"What's wrong with you?" "Leave me alone for a while. It's none of your business."僕のメガネをどうしたの。たった今ここにあったのに。What did you do with my glasses? They were here a minute ago.
次はどうしたら良いか教えて下さい。Please show me what to do next.もし雨が降ったらどうしたらいいのでしょうか。Suppose it rains, what shall we do?
どうせやるなら上手にやれ。If you do it at all, do it well.どうせ結婚式をやるのだったら、悔いの残らない最高の結婚式にしたい！If I'm going to have a wedding ceremony, I want it to be the best ever so I have no regrets!
ご家族の皆さんにどうぞよろしく。Give my best regards to all your family.


私はどうにか家族を養っている。I manage to support my family.
お土産を頂いてご親切にどうも。It is so nice of you to give me a present.お手数かけてどうもすいません。I'm sorry to bother you.「あの人たちは、またストをやるんだろうか」「どうもそうらしいね」"Will they go on strike again?" "I'm afraid so."
どうやってそのお金を手に入れたんですか。How did you come by the money?
どうやら食べ過ぎたみたいだ。I'm afraid I've eaten too much.
「手伝ってくれてありがとう」「どういたしまして」"Thank you for your help." "It's my pleasure."
その知らせで彼はどきんとした。His heart beat fast at the news.
彼は心臓がどきどき打っているのを感じた。He felt his heart beating fast.


私の犬は、どこでも私の行くところへついてくる。My dog follows me wherever I go.
どしどし仕事に取りかかる。Roll up your sleeves and get to work.
彼のドジ話を聞いて、皆、抱腹絶倒した。He had everyone howling with his stories of all his past bloopers.

少年たちは２階でどたばた暴れていた。The boys were banging about upstairs.

これらはどちらも“意志未来”と呼ばれるもので、主語の意図が含まれています。These are both called "future volitional" and include the intent of the subject.私はそのふたごのどちらも知らない。I don't know either twin.
どちら様ですか。Who is this, please?
どうせ駄作だろうと思っていたのだけど、どっこいなかなかいい本だった。I was expecting it to be a bad book, but damn me if it wasn't quite good after all.

学童たちはどっと笑った。The pupils burst out laughing.

彼女はどのような人ですか。What is she like?
この雨はどのくらい続くのでしょうか。How long will this rain go on?

新聞社の人たちがどやどやとやってきました。The press are arriving in force.
歓呼の声はどよめきにまで高まった。The cheers swelled to a roar.
あなたはそれらのうちのどれを選んでもよい。You may choose any of them.あなたの鞄はどれですか。Which is your bag?「じつは自由研究で相談したいことがあって・・・」「どれ・・・。ふーん、被子植物について調べてるのね」"Well, there's something I'd like your advice on about my research project ..." "Let's see... Hmm, you're investigating flowering plants then."
どれでも好きな花を取りなさい。Take whichever flower you like.
水を加え、練り粉がどろどろしない程度に混ぜなさい。Add water and mix to a firm dough.
だれかがドアをどんどんたたいている。Someone is battering at the door.ある種の動物はどんどん数が減ってきている。Certain animals are fast disappearing.
どんな所がお好きですか。What kind of places do you like?私はどんな戦争にも反対だ。I'm opposed to any type of war.どんな事が起こっても私は心を変えません。Come what may, I won't change my mind.
私がどんなにうれしいか言葉では伝えられない。Words cannot convey how glad I am.君は私がどんなに心配しているかを知らない。You don't know how worried I am.どんなに骨を折ってやっても、結果は同じでしょう。No matter how hard you try, the result will be the same.
彼女は絶望のどん底にあった。She was in an abyss of despair.



彼らは自分たちの義務をなおざりにはしなかった。They didn't neglect their own duty.
なけなしの金を取っていった。He took away what little money I had.
聞いて驚くなよ！今日から俺はピアノを始めるんだ。なぜなら私は音楽の先生になりたいからだ！Brace yourselves! From today I'm learning the piano. Why? Because I want to become a music teacher!
その会合は延期されました。なぜならばジョンが病気だったからです。The meeting was put off because John was sick.




感情によって理性が曇らされているままにしておくならば、我々は、常に見当違いのことをしてしまうだろう。If we let our reasoning power be overshadowed by our emotions, we would be barking up the wrong tree all the time.医者なら６桁の収入は珍しくない。A six-figure income is not uncommon for physicians.

この仕事は決してやさしくなんかないんだよ。This work is anything but easy.



古代において塩は希少で貴重な商品であった。Salt was a rare and costly commodity in ancient times.英語は商業において役に立つ。English is useful in commerce.この服は品質においてあの服よりもずっと優れていると思う。I think this suit is much superior to that one in quality.
１９９５年、安藤氏は建築におけるもっとも権威ある賞を受賞した。In 1995, Andou received architecture's most prestigious award.
「怒ってない。ほら見て、このにこやかな笑顔」「それは作り笑いっていうんですよ」"I'm not angry. Look, see this smiling face?" "That's what they call a forced smile!"

この証拠は彼にとって不利だった。This evidence was against him.
どんな男にもそれ相当の嫁のきてがあるもの。Every Jack must have his Jill.
なにニヤニヤしてるんだよ。何かいいことあったのか。What are you smirking at? Did something good happen?

人の生活様式の大半はお金によって決まる。One's lifestyle is largely determined by money.
テーブルマナーは国によって異なる。Table manners vary from one country to another.
ある研究によれば、ガンによる女性の死亡数の中では肺がんが１７％を占めている。A study shows lung cancer accounts for 17% of women's cancer deaths.
ある調査によると、今日では５人中３人が外交問題には無関心のようだ。According to a survey, three in five people today are indifferent to foreign affairs.
彼のいうところによれば、彼女は正直な女だ。According to him, she is honest.妹から便りがあった。手紙によれば目下元気だそうだ。I heard from my sister. The letter says she is well now.
彼は我々の求めに応じて歌った。He sang at our request.
パソコンに加え、携帯電話での利用が可能です。In addition to PCs, it can be used with cell phones.
有名な物理学者であることに加えて、彼は偉大な小説家でもある。In addition to being a famous physicist, he is a great novelist.
彼女は事実を述べていたに過ぎない。She was merely stating a fact.
サムは仕事に関してまじめです。Sam is serious about his work.
その世論調査は無作為に選ばれた成人に基づいてなされた。The opinion poll was based on a random sample of adults.

そのことについては私に責任があります。I'm to be blamed for that matter.これは、ある猫についての物語です。This is a story about a cat.

私のおいは卵に対してアレルギー体質だ。My nephew is allergic to eggs.
これが私の手紙に対する彼の返事だ。This is his answer to my letter.
研究部長はその部門が新製品のテストをするにあたって、徹底的な仕事をさせた。The research director had the department do a thorough job in testing the new product.
彼は、自分の意志に反して契約書に署名させられた。He was made to sign the contract against his will.
それに比べ最近彼女のお天気は良好。In comparison to which she's been in a really good mood recently.
その品物を１ダースにつき３ドルで買う。I buy the goods at $3 a dozen.


そのねじまわしを私は、友人から借りた。I borrowed the screwdriver from a friend of mine.
コメディアンは無惨な死や大事故といった悲劇的状況を冗談のネタにしている。Comedians base their jokes on tragic situations like violent death or serious accidents.お寿司で一番好きなネタは何ですか？What's your favourite type of sushi?





とても暗いので私は本が読めない。It is too dark for me to read.
小さいおうちはみすぼらしく見えるようになってしまいました・・・まだまだもとの通りしっかりとしているのに。The small house had come to look shabby, though it was just as good as ever underneath.若かったらよかったのに。If only I was younger.
ただ結果を待つのみだ。We can but wait for the results.
時は虚偽のみならず真実も明らかにする。Time reveals truth as well as falsehood.
推理小説にのめり込んでいる。I have been absorbed in reading a mystery.

彼女が突然死んだという知らせが青天のへきれきのように訪れた。The news of her sudden death came like a bolt from the blue.
タクシーはカタツムリと同じくらいのろのろ進んでいるように思えた。The taxi seemed to go as slowly as a snail.
退職したのでしばらくのんびり暮らすつもりです。I've retired and I'm going to take it easy for a while.日曜日はのんびりしています。We always take it easy on Sundays.
「もしもし、ブラウンさんですか」「はい、そうです」"Hello, is this Mrs. Brown?" "Yes, this is Mrs. Brown."はいどうぞ、君が飛行機の中で読む雑誌です。Here's a magazine for you to read in the plane.
はきはきと意見を言ってください。Please state your opinion crisply and clearly.






そして書かれていることはすべて完全にはっきりと書かれている。And then everything that was written was completely clear.

彼には本当にはっとさせられた。He gave me quite a start.
はにかみ屋なのだ。君に会いたいと言っている。He's very shy. He says he wants to see you.

大都会には罪悪がはびこっている。There is much crime in the big cities.


５０００円ばかりもっている。I have about 5,000 yen.あなたの妹はいつも自分の夫のことで文句ばかり言っている。That sister of yours is always complaining of her husband.「君はそれを終えたか」「とんでもない、始めたばかりだ」"Have you finished it?" "On the contrary, I've just begun."
最後の詰めを怠ったばかりに、画竜点睛を欠くはめになってしまったね。You kept putting off working on the fine details on this project so it ended up lacking the finishing touches.

彼女にばっちりキスされちゃったよ。She kissed me full on the lips.
あなた私がばついちだって知っててプロポーズしてるの？Are you proposing, knowing that this won't be my first marriage?
彼はすっかりばてていたが、働き続けなければならなかった。Although he was exhausted, he had to keep working.

詩人が言葉に対していだく愛情にも似た感情を、科学者は事実（たとえばらばらの事実であれ）に対していだく。The scientist has a love of facts, even isolated facts, similar to the poet's love of words.


その秘密はついにばれた。The secret came to light at last.




母はぱちっとハンドバッグを閉めた。Mother closed her purse with a snap.
犬はその肉にパクリと噛みついた。The dog snapped up the meat.

レース中にその車はぱっと燃え上がった。The car burned up in the race.







両親が昨晩ひそひそと話をしているのを聞いた。I heard my parents whispering last night.
彼はひたすら成功を望んで懸命に働く。He works hard because he is anxious to succeed.
彼が直向きに生きるその姿は実に健気です。The single-minded way he gets on with his life is truly admirable.
その将軍は退役後ひっそり余生を送った。The general lived the rest of his life peacefully after his retirement.

その茶碗にはひびがある。The cup has a crack.
鳥は首をひょいと水に浸した。The bird dipped its head into the water.

あなたにここでひょっこり出会えてうれしい。I am glad to run into you here.

ひょっとすると明日は雨かもしれない。Perhaps it will rain tomorrow.


風が吹くたびに、桜の花びらが、ひらひらと舞い降りてました。The cherry blossoms flutter down whenever the wind blows.
ディップが辛くて、舌がヒリヒリした。The dip burned my tongue.
ひんやりした空気のせいで、トムは意識を回復した。The cold air revived Tom.

彼は力いっぱい引っ張ったが、岩はびくともしなかった。He pulled with all his strength, but the rock would not move.
彼はびくびくしている。He is afraid of his own shadow.

川下りでびしょびしょになった。I got soaked boating downriver.
彼女の顔は汗でびっしょりだった。Her face was drenched with sweat.
ボイラは湯あかがびっしりついた。The boiler was heavily scaled.

彼はクラスでびりだった。He was at the bottom of the class.
彼女は彼の手紙をびりびりに引き裂いた。She tore his letter to pieces.ジェット機が建物の上を飛ぶと窓ガラスがびりびりした。When the jet flew over the building the windowpanes rattled.
往復びんたを食らった。I got slapped on both cheeks.
その車はワックスがかけられてピカピカしている。The car is waxed and shining.ピカピカの新製品です。It's brand new.




彼の無礼な返事に彼女はかっとなって彼の顔をぴしゃりとたたいた。His rude reply provoked her to slap him on the face.

彼らは息がぴたりと合っている。They are a perfect match for each other.彼女は夫のそばにぴったり寄り添っていた。She stood close to her husband.



コーラを飲んだら舌がぴりぴりした。The cola made my tongue tingle.
あの魚屋ではぴんぴん生きている魚を売っている。They sell live fish at the fish store.

私はパイプを吹かしながら座っていた。I sat smoking a pipe.彼は車をバックでガレージに入れようとして、間違ってエンジンを吹かしてしまい壁にぶつけてしまった。When he tried to back into the garage, he mistakenly gunned the engine and backed into the wall.
あの赤い布は「袱紗」茶道具を清めるために使う必需品なの。That red cloth is a "fukusa"; it is a vital tool used to cleanse the tea equipment.

彼のふしだらな行為は気付かれずにはすまなかった。His immoral actions did not go unnoticed.


帽子がぬれてふにゃふにゃになった。The hat got wet and went limp.

ワインの飲みすぎでふらふらになった。He was groggy from too much wine.





ブーブー文句ばかり言ってないで、サッサと仕事を片付けろよ。Stop your grumbling and get the work out of the way.その歌手が舞台に現れると聴衆は彼にブーブーという野次を飛ばした。なぜなら彼は自分の妻を捨てて他の女性に乗り換えたからだ。When the singer appeared on stage, the audience gave him the Bronx cheer, because he dumped his wife for another woman.

毎日大食していると、ブクブク太り過ぎること間違いなし。If you pig out every day, you're sure to gain too much weight.

ビルのぶっきらぼうな態度は誤解を生む原因になっている。Bill's abrupt manner causes him to be misunderstood.
販売係の職員は全部一週間昼夜ぶっ通しで働いた。The entire sales staff has worked around the clock for a week.
トラックが我々の車にぶつかった。The truck bumped into our car.
彼は過って親指を金槌で打ち付けた。He accidentally hit his thumb with the hammer.雨が窓に打ち付けている。The rain is beating against the window.
祖父はいつも何やかやぶつぶつ不平を言っていた。My grandfather was always grumbling about something or other.顔にぶつぶつができてる。最近、寝不足だからなぁ。I'm getting little pimples on my face. I wonder if I've been getting enough sleep lately.
なんかそれ、ブヨブヨしていて気持ち悪いね。Oooh, gross! What is that stuff? It's all spongy.
まあその辺でもぶらついてきましょう。Let's just waste some time around here.
ちょっとその辺をブラブラしました。I wandered around for a while.
テーブルの上にはランプがぶら下がっていた。There was a lamp hanging above the table.

しゃべり出した時彼の両手はぶるぶる震えた。His hands quivered when he began to speak.


成功するまでへこたれるな。Stick with it and you'll succeed.


その仕事でへとへとだ。That job took a lot out of me.

机と椅子にへばりついています。I am tied to my desk and chair.




こんなへまをして、穴があったら入りたいよ。I've botched things up so bad I wish I could find a hole to climb into.
いつまでヘラヘラ笑ってるんだよ。When are you going to stop laughing like an idiot?
あなたにはまず最初に尋ねるべきだったでしょうか。Should I have asked you first?
彼は壁一面にポスターをべたべた張った。He plastered the wall with posters.お前が近くにいるのをいいことにベタベタしやがって！！What the fuck are you up to taking advantage of his proximity to cling to him like a wet T-shirt?!




シャツについている、べとべとしたものは何ですか。What is that greasy stuff on your shirt?
彼女がべらべらしゃべりまくるのには参ってしまう。Her continuous chatter vexes me.

顔をべろべろ舐めるな。わはは。止めろよ。Don't slobber over my face! A-ha-ha-ha. Stop it!
お腹がぺこぺこです。I'm starved.上役にやたらにぺこぺこするな。Don't be subservient to your boss.
昔はペチャパイだったのに、いつの間にかこんなに大きくなりやがって。She used to be flat-chested - just when did she get so large?
何でそんな安っぽいペテンにひっかかるんだ。Why do people get fooled by such cheap schemes?
私はうそつきやペテン師を軽蔑する。I look down on liars and cheats.
トムは日本語がぺらぺらだ。Tom is a fluent speaker of Japanese.






とにかく、試験が終わってほっとしたよ。Anyhow, I'm relieved the test is over.老婆はほっと息をついてにっこり笑った。The old woman smiled with a sigh of relief.

酒を飲むのはほどほどにするように。Try to be moderate in drinking.

彼は大学を出たてのほやほやだ。He is fresh from college.
ほら、あなたの乗る電車が来たわ。Look, here comes your train.


クリスマスはほんの２週間先です。Christmas is only two weeks off.
んじゃ、ほんのり・・・実力を出しましょうかね。Well then, let's show a little of our real strength shall we?
彼女は薬のためぼうっとしていた。She looked dazed with the drug.
あんな二股かける女なんか忘れたわ、ボケ。Idiot, I've forgotten that two-timing bitch.

休憩はこれくらいにして、ボチボチ仕事を始めますか。Pretty soon we'd better wrap up this break and get back to work.

まー！このＴシャツ、3000円？！ぼったくりだわ。What! This T-shirt is 3,000 yen? This is a rip-off!


テレビの画像はぼやけて見えた。The TV picture was blurred.



祖母は服をボロボロになるまで着る。My grandmother wears a dress to rags.その鉄の棒はさびてぼろぼろになった。Rust ate away the iron bar.


ぽかぽかと暖かい。It's balmy today.
その子は口をぽかんと開けて私を見つめた。That child stared at me, his mouth agape.

パイプから水がぽたぽた落ちているのが聞こえるでしょ。You can hear the water dripping from the pipe.額から汗がぼたぼた落ちていた。The sweat was dripping off my brow.

トムが浅瀬をぽちゃぽちゃと歩いて行った。Tom went splashing through the shallows.





まあ、ちょっとは私の身にもなってくださいよ。Just put yourself in my shoes.

「研究はどうですか」「まあまあです」"How's your research coming along?" "Not so bad."まあまあ、そう怒らないでくださいな。Now, please don't get so angry.まあまあなんて細い腰なの！お顔も小さくて、本当にお人形さんみたい！My what a narrow waist! Her face is small, she really looks just like a doll!

私を見て、彼女はまごついた。Seeing me, she was embarrassed.

その光景がまざまざとあたしの記憶に残っているのは不思議なほどである。It's strange how vividly I remember the scene.



昭和天皇が靖国神社で７５年までに戦後計８回参拝した。In the post-War period, up until 1975, Emperor Showa prayed at the Yasukuni Shrine a total of 8 times.


あの翻訳は原文に忠実だそうだ。That translation is said to be true to the original.



彼はまんまとわなにかかった。He was fairly caught in the trap.




この写真を見るとむかつく。I always view this photo with disgust.
彼のふるまいを見たらむかむかした。I felt disgust at his behavior.
何でもかんでもむきになってあくせくするのをやめれば、きっと人々は今の２倍も長生きするだろう。I'm sure people would live twice as long if they stopped getting themselves worked up over everything.


鼻がむずむずします。My nose is itchy.
無駄にした時間を取り返さなければならない。You must make up for lost time.
彼女はむっつりとした表情を浮かべていた。She had a sullen look on her face.

その部屋は参加者の熱気でムンムンしていた。The air in that room was thick with the enthusiasm of the participants.
タケシはめきめき数学の力をつけている。Takeshi is making great progress with math.

いつまでメソメソしてるんだ。過ぎてしまったこと今更どうにもならないだろう。How long are you going to keep whimpering about that? You can't change the past.
めっきり寒くなった。It has become noticeably colder.
彼はもう帰宅しました。He has already gone home.君はもう子供ではない。You are not a child any more.もうそろそろ帰る時間だ。It is about time we were leaving.
その動物は檻から出ようともがいた。The animal struggled to get out of the cage.
彼を批判する人は、もしあってもごくわずかさ。Few, if any, will criticize him.
この空模様だと、もしかしたら午後にはひと雨降るかもしれません。From the look of the sky, it may rain in the afternoon.
ああ、もしかして名前を呼ばれるのが恥ずかしいって？Ah, could it be you're embarrassed to be called by your first name?
もしかすると彼は明日来るかもしれない。He might come tomorrow.

もしもし、後藤さんのお宅ですか。Hello. Is this the Gotos' residence?もしもし、何かお役に立ちましょうか。Excuse me, but do you need any help?

彼は不安げにいすの上でもじもじした。He shifted about uneasily in his chair.

も〜う、モタモタしないの。遅刻になっちゃうでしょ。ほら、紐、結んであげる。Oooh, get a move on. We'll end up late! Come on, I'll tie your shoelaces for you.

あなたはもっと理性的であるべきだ。You should be more reasonable.
クック船長はその原住民達の手厚いもてなしに感謝した。Captain Cook thanked the natives for their hospitality.

時間は貴重なものであるから、できるだけ活用すべきである。Time is a precious thing, so we should make the best use of it.
どんなに勉強したって、１年や２年で外国語をものにすることはできない。However hard one may work, one cannot master a foreign language in a year or two.

「あっぱれ！」天使はそういうと、稲妻が走るもやもやの煙の中へ消えていった。"Done!" says the angel, and disappears in a cloud of smoke and a bolt of lightning.

彼はもろに壁にぶつかった。He ran sheer into the wall.

私たちはやがてまたあなたにお目にかかるでしょう。We will be seeing you again before long.やがて彼はその事件のことを忘れた。By and by he forgot that affair.
あいつ、上司に胡麻を擂ってやがる。He is buttering up to his boss.
彼は母に会いたくてやきもきしていた。He was in a hurry to see his mother.
恐いもの知らずのその男は憎しみと軽蔑の目でやくざをちらりと見た。The bold man glanced at the gangster with hatred and contempt.そのヤクザ達は対立するヤクザの親分を暗殺する計画の仲間に彼を入れた。The gangsters let him in on their plan to knock off a rival gang leader.
もうやめなさい。今日はやけにふざけているんだから。Stop it. You're being ridiculous.

１０分もすれば彼がやってきます。He'll be along in ten minutes.
やっと期末試験が終わった。At last, the end-of-term exams are over.論争にやっとけりが付いた。The dispute was finally settled.娘はやっと１５歳です。My daughter is barely fifteen.
やっぱり、あなたは私の思ったとおりの人だった。You're just the kind of person I imagined you'd be.やっぱり何とかやってのけたね。You managed it after all.北海道に行ったら、やっぱり海の幸を食べないと行った意味がないでしょう。A trip to Hokkaido is not a trip to Hokkaido unless you try the seafood.

ぼくはやばい橋は渡りたくない。I don't want to do anything risky.そういえば。やばい、秀樹に毒されてるわ。Now that you mention it. Yeek, Hideki's habits are rubbing off on me!

あの５人の関係は、ややこしい。The relationships among those five people are complicated.



彼は収入の範囲でやりくりしようとした。He tried to make both ends meet.
目の前で繰り広げられるやり取りは、俺が入り込む隙なんて一ミリもない。The exchange unfolding in front of my eyes had not a single millimetre of a gap in which for me to slip.

これが僕のやり方だ。This is how I go about it.
ああ、君がやったんだね。Aha, you did it, didn't you?彼はその少年を使いにやった。He has sent the boy on an errand.俺のマイナスドライバーどこにやった！！Where've you stuck my flat-head screwdriver?!

やれやれ、女を選んで結婚することになるのか・・・。Maybe I will settle down with a woman.
彼は少年時代はとてもやんちゃだった。He was very naughty in his boyhood.
大統領はそのデリケートな質問に答える事をやんわりと拒否した。The president politely declined to answer the delicate question.
鎌倉は源氏ゆかりの地です。Kamakura is a place noted in connection with the Genji family.

ゆっくりでも着実にやってゆけば勝負には勝つ。Slow and steady wins the race.ゆっくりしてお茶でも飲んでいきませんか。Won't you stay for tea?
私には新車を買うゆとりは無い。I can't afford a new car.


サイバースペースへようこそ。Welcome to Cyberspace!
トムは気が狂ったように働いた。Tom worked like a madman.みんなに聞こえるようにもっと大きな声で話しなさい。Speak louder so everyone can hear you.早く病気がよくなりますように。I hope you'll get well soon.
ありがとう。また、次の日にくるようにします。Thanks. Maybe we'll come back.
うちの赤ん坊は口をきくようになってきました。Our baby is learning to speak.すぐ泳げるようになりますよ。You'll soon be able to swim.
洗濯物を持っていくために誰かよこしてくださいますか。Could you send someone up to pick up some laundry?誰か助けをよこしてください。Is there someone who could help me?彼はりんごをぽいとなげてよこした。He chucked me the apple.

よだれの出そうなものがよりどり見どりでいっぱいありますよ。It offers a mouth-watering selection of delights.


柔道では力より技のほうが大切である。In judo, technique is more important than strength.私は金よりむしろ名誉を選ぶ。I would choose honor before money.７月１０日より札幌支店を開設いたします。On July 10, we will open our Sapporo branch.

警棒で空をなぐりつけ、よろめいて体勢をたてなおしたガードマンは、自分に向かって突進してくる金網づくりのクズカゴを見た。The guard's truncheon hit air. Off balance, he regained his posture to see a metal-mesh rubbish bin flying towards him.
酔っぱらいはよろよろと彼のところへやって来た。The drunk rolled up to him.






メグはわくわくしている。Meg is filled with excitement.





アルクのホームページには英語表現のアーカイブがありますか。Does ALC's web site include an archive of English expressions?


あの社の新しいコンピューターはアーキテクチャーに問題があって回収騒ぎになっているんだってさ。There was a problem with the architecture of that company's new computer. They're going through a recall frenzy right now.



アーケード天井にたくさんの張りぼてが飾られてた。The shopping arcade was covered with lots of paper decorations.






トムはとても才能のあるアーティストなんだ。Tom is a very gifted artist.






アートと家で静かに夜を過ごすのが大好き。I love art and quiet evenings at home.















俺はアームチェアーに戻って本を開いた。I sat back in the armchair and opened the book.












彼女はアイシャドーをつけている。She's wearing eye shadow.


「ご注文は？」「オレンジジュース」「アイス付きで？」「そう」「まいど」"Your order?" "Orange juice." "With ice?" "Yes." "Thanks for your business."捨てられたアイスのまわりにアリがウヨウヨたかっていた。The area around the melting ice cream was crawling with ants.
アイスクリームを３つください。Give me three ice creams, please.

氷がない、その上今日はアイスティーを飲むには寒すぎる。There's no ice, and in any case it's too cold today for iced tea.





アイスホッケーはわくわくするスポーツです。Ice hockey is an exciting sport.











それぞれのアイテムがこと細かに描かれている。Each item was described in painstaking detail.
アイディアが足りないということはない。There is no shortage of ideas.




国家の文化とアイデンティティという枢要な問題から切り離された時点で、比較文化はその方向性を失う。Once divorced from key questions of national culture and identity, comparative literature loses its way.





アイドルのコンサート会場に、追っかけのファンがウジャウジャ集まっていた。At the pop star's concert the fans were swarming around the foot of the stage.彼女はいわば我々のアイドルだった。She was, so to speak, our idol.




私はアイヌの家族の構造を研究した。I studied the structure of Ainu families.













アイリス、君は普段朝食は何を食べているの？Iris, what do you usually eat for breakfast?


アイロンで手をやけどしました。I burned my hand with an iron.







最初の打者はアウトになった。The first batter was caught out.








アウトドアの活動が好きだけど虫は嫌い。I love the outdoors, but I hate bugs.



彼らはアウトドアスポーツに熱心だ。They are keen on outdoor sports.



パターソンの実験ではアウトプットされた物体がデザインされたモデルと完全に一致するかどうかが不明確である。It is unclear in Patterson's experiment whether the output objects fully correspond to the designed models.



ここでは、文字やパスのアウトラインの作成について説明します。Here we explain about creating outlines of characters and paths.






Windows系ＯＳではアドミニストレーターアカウントがルートに相当する。With Windows OS systems 'administrator account' corresponds to 'root'.

アカデミー授賞式は、ハリウッド最大の華やかな催しだ。The Oscar ceremonies are Hollywood's biggest extravaganza.



明日夜９時にアカデミック・アドバイザーに電話をかけることを、思い出させてください。Could you remind me to call my academic advisor at 9:00 p.m. tomorrow?

友人の結婚式にアカペラで歌うことになりました。I'm going to be singing a cappella at a friend's wedding ceremony.

４年ほど前にアキレス腱が痛くなりアキレス腱炎といわれました。About four years ago my Achilles tendon started to hurt and I was told it was Achilles tendonitis.ファーストがうちのチームのアキレスけんだ。The first baseman is the Achilles heel of our team.






雪道でアクシデントがなかったら、無事に帰って来れると思います。If you don't have an accident on the snowy roads I think you should be able to get back safely.
アクション場面の少ない映画にはいつも退屈してしまう。I'm always bored with films that have little action.




この服にはどんなアクセサリーを付けるの？What sort of jewelry are you going to wear with this dress?
空港へのアクセスがいいところに泊まろうよ。Let's stay somewhere with easy airport access.どういうわけかメールにアクセスできませんでした。For some reason I couldn't access my e-mail.





私は注意深くアクセルを踏んだ。I stepped on the accelerator carefully.

Australiaという語のアクセントはどこですか。Where do you place the stress in the word "Australia"?彼のアクセントから判断すると、彼は関西の出身だ。Judging from his accent, he is from Kansai.













アクリル性のペンキを使いなさい。Use acrylic paint.



彼はびっくりするほどのアクロバットができる。He can do the most amazing acrobatics.





内面を理解して貰うためのアピールも必要なのさ！ボクのアグレッシブな行動もその中の一つ！I also need to get people to understand the real me! My forceful behaviour is one way I try to do this!




私はアコーデオンをひいた。I played the accordion.










彼には２、３のかなり優秀なアシスタントがいた。He had two or three rather competent assistants.







アジアにはたくさんの民族がいる。There are many people in Asia.




諸君らのたゆまぬ努力と労働によって、ついに我らがアジトが完成した！！Ladies and Gentlemen, thanks to your untiring efforts our hideout is finally complete!!












冬でもなおアスパラガスが食べられる。You can still get asparagus in the winter.



アスピリンを持ってきてください。Could you send up some aspirin?

その通りはアスファルトで舗装されている。The street is paved with asphalt.






















彼女はいつも何か新しいことにアタックしている。She always tries something new.彼らは山頂にアタックしました。They made an assault on the summit.


















トムは勤務終了時間を超えて働くと、５割アップの時給をもらっていた。Tom got time and a half when he worked beyond his usual quitting time.



このデータをアップデートしていただけますか。Could I get you to update this data for me?




画像のアップロードの仕方が分かりません。I can't figure out how to upload an image.














今度のイベントのアトラクションにはＫ先生が出るんでしょ？楽しみだなあ実に。Prof. K is going to be a major attraction at this event, right? I can hardly wait.













明日夜９時にアカデミック・アドバイザーに電話をかけることを、思い出させてください。Could you remind me to call my academic advisor at 9:00 p.m. tomorrow?
あなたのアドバイスなしではいられません。I cannot do without your advice.


デパートの屋上にアドバルーンが上がっている。There is an advertising balloon flying above the department store.












このアドレスのところに行ってください。Please take me to this address.
アドレス帳を部屋に忘れちゃった。I left my address book in my room.






アナウンサーは早口が出来る。The announcer can talk rapidly.
今のアナウンスは何だったのですか。What did the announcement just say?










彼は金融アナリストで経済動向の分析には定評がある。He's a financial analyst with a pretty good reputation for his analysis of economic trends.











そのアニメは外国でも放送されています。The animation is on the air even in other countries.


Ａ社のアニュアルレポートは参考になる。A Ltd.'s annual report is worth having a look at.






私のアノラックは粗末なものでしたが大いに役に立ちました。My anorak, such as it was, stood me in good stead.

あいつもアバウトな性格だよな。He's not a very meticulous guy.


一夏のアバンチュールを求めて南の島へ行きました。I went to the South Pacific for a summer of romantic adventure.

このアパートは６家族が暮らしている。Six families live in this apartment house.２部屋あるアパートを借りたいのですが。I want to rent an apartment with two rooms.
















ここ品物は高いけど、その分アフターサービスが充実してるから。Prices are high here but that's because the after-sale service is really good.




















iPadアプリを作るのがこんなに大変だとは思ってもみなかった。I never thought it'd be this hard to create an iPad app.

Android 用アプリケーションの開発は今日から可能です。The development of applications for Android is possible from today.



これらの図式は求職に関する様々なアプローチを示している。These diagrams demonstrate different possible approaches to job seeking.




公園にたくさんのアベックがいた。There were a lot of young couples in the park.










保険のテレアポでアポイントを取るコツです。It is the art of getting insurance appointments when telemarketing.






私のおじはアマチュアのクリケット選手です。My uncle is an amateur cricket player.
















アメフトでタッチダウンは６点になる。In American football, a touchdown scores six points.




アメリカン・エクスプレスは使えますか。Do you accept AMEX?

アメリカンフットボールに夢中なんだ。I'm crazy about American football.


アメリカ人は速く走る車の好きな人が多い。Many Americans like fast cars.











日本は石油をアラブ諸国に頼っている。Japan relies on Arab countries for oil.








アリバイが彼女の無罪を証拠立てている。The alibi points to her innocence.



アルカリは酸を中和する。Alkalis neutralize acids.
小学校のときから、酸性・アルカリ性という性質をリトマス紙で調べたりしてきていますね。Since primary school we've been checking for the qualities known as acidity and alkalinity with litmus paper.




このビールはアルコール分が５％だ。This beer contains 5% alcohol.


このソフトウエアはギブスサンプリングのアルゴリズムによりマルコフ連鎖モンテカルロ法の計算を行います。This software carries out Markov Chain Monte Carlo calculations by the use of Gibbs Sampling.





アルコールが酸化するとアルデヒドとなりますが、アルデヒドが酸化するとどうなりますか。If you oxidise an alcohol you get an aldehyde but what do you get if you oxidise an aldehyde?

あなたはアルバイトをしているの。Do you have a part-time job?

棚にアルバムがある。There is an album on the shelf.

何かを記録するために、彼らはラマかアルパカの毛糸でできた、結び目のついたひもを使った。To record something, they used knotted cords made of the wool of the llama or alpaca.




トップのリーダーは犬の行動学では「アルファ」と呼ばれ、以下「ベータ」「ガンマ」と続きます。In dog ethology the leader is called 'alpha'; after that it continues with 'beta' and 'gamma'.
アルファベットを大文字で書きなさい。Write the alphabet in capitals.



これはアルプス山脈の絵です。This is a view of the Alps.




ずらりと並んだアルミのポットやなべ。A battery of aluminum pots and pans.


アルミニウム、マグネシウム、シリコンなどの粉末が爆発する。Powders of aluminium, magnesium, silicon, etc. explode.

そんなにがぶがぶ飲み続けると、アル中になるのがオチですよ。If you go on drinking so much, you may well end up an alcoholic.





私のおいは卵に対してアレルギー体質だ。My nephew is allergic to eggs.







会社にパンタロンとアロハシャツを着てくる彼は、かなりユニークな存在だ。He's a pretty unique guy, wearing bell bottoms and Hawaiian shirts to the office.

回答にはアンカーを必ずつけて下さい。半角で ">>"＋数字（例: >>1）です。Please ensure you always include a link-back in your replies. ">>" in plain ASCII + number (e.g. >>1).







６世紀にアングロ・サクソン族はローマ文字を採用した。In the 6th century, the Anglo-Saxons adopted Roman characters.
当社はアンケート入力、アンケート集計のお手伝いをする少数精鋭のベンチャーです。Our company is a small but elect venture business that assists in entry and totalling of questionnaires.
そのピアニストはアンコールに応えて２曲弾いた。The pianist played two encores.









































彼女はアンティークを見る目がある。She has an eye for antiques.
このアンテナを屋根につけると画面がはっきりする。You'll get a clear picture with this antenna on the roof.







ふふっ・・・その子、人間じゃないの。ロボットなのよ。ア・ン・ド・ロ・イ・ド。Ha-ha ... She isn't human. She's a robot; A-n-d-r-o-i-d.




２国間の貿易上のアンバランスを改善しなければならない。The trade imbalance between two nations should be improved.







昨日、アンプを組み立てた。I built an amplifier yesterday.







アンモニアは、非常に強い匂いをもった液体または気体である。Ammonia is a colorless liquid or gas with a very strong smell.






オレンジジュースと卵２個をオーバー・イージーでお願いする。Orange juice, and two eggs over easy.






よいイースターを迎えられますよう。Warmest Easter wishes for you.







イエスはこのことを最初のしるしとしてガリラヤのカナで行った。This, the first of the miraculous signs, Jesus performed in Cana in Galilee.
ミサは、食べたり飲んだりしてイエスキリストを偲ぶカトリックの儀式だ。Mass is a Catholic ceremony of remembering Jesus Christ by eating and drinking.
彼は何でも言うことを聞くイエスマンも同然だった。He was no better than a yes-man.











イギリスは多くの植民地を設けた。Britain established many colonies.





彼らは宗教イコール教会に行くことだと考えている。They equate religion with church-going.






「あなたはイスラエルの教師でしょう」とイエスはいった。"You are Israel's teacher," said Jesus.
私の考えでは、この政治の意味しているのは、セルビア人とクロアチア人とイスラム教徒ということだわ。I think this politics means Serbs, Croats, and Muslims.



この靴はイタリア製です。These shoes are made in Italy.










英語はイディオムが豊富である。English abounds in idioms.

これが私の固執しているイデオロギーだ。This is the ideology to which my speech is written.





イニシャルをサインしてご返送ください。Please initial and send back to us.






街はクリスマスムード一色・・・もうじきイブだ。The streets are in full Christmas mood - it's almost Christmas Eve.

彼女はピンクのイブニングドレスを着て人目をひいた。She really cut a dash in her pink evening gown.
このイベントに参加しませんか。Would you take part in this event?



調べてみるとその宝石はイミテーションだと分かった。On examination the jewel proved to be an imitation.

あの人はどうもイメージが悪い。He makes a bad impression.
その会社はイメージアップをはかっている。The company is trying to improve its image.


このスキャンダルにより我が社はひどくイメージダウンしてしまった。This scandal has severely damaged the public image of our company.
イメージチェンジをしたい。I'd like to change my image.


一からやるんだから、大胆にイメチェンすればよかったのに。As you're starting from scratch you might as well have gone for a major makeover...



イヤホンを頼んだはずなのですが。Do you have earphones?


彼女はハート型のイヤリングをしていた。She wore heart-shaped earrings.
日航のチケットがあまりにも高いので、国外在住者たちはイラク航空をつかった。With JAL tickets so expensive, expatriates flew Air Iraq.

有難くも、10000hit越えのお祝いイラストを頂いてしまいました！本当にかたじけないです。I'm very lucky to have been gifted with this 10,000 hit picture! Thank you so very much.



イランはアメリカ合衆国に対して宣戦布告をした。Iran proclaimed war against the US.




電気のイルミネーションが夜景の魅力を増す。Electric illuminations add to the attraction at night.






打球がインかアウトかを判定するのは難しいことが多い。It is often difficult to see if a ball is in or out.






あなたの名前はインクで書かなければならない。You must write your name in ink.



私はイングランドからその本を注文した。I ordered the book from England.

















インシュリンを打つので彼女は太っていた。The insulin was making her fat.







このインスタントスープは１つ１つ包みの中に入っている。This instant soup comes in individual packets.









彼女は２０代にエアロビクスのインストラクターとして働いていた。She worked as an aerobics instructor in her twenties.






米国において「リベート」は、主にメーカーが消費者に直接提供するインセンティブ手段として広く認識されている。In America 'rebate' is widely recognized, generally as an incentive where makers give back directly to consumers.













ちまたではインターネットなるものがはやっています。People are talking about this Internet phenomenon.









私たち、パパにインターホンで階下にすぐこれるかどうか尋ねたのよ。We asked him on the interphone if he could come downstairs quickly.




彼がインタビューで言ったことは理にかなっている。What he said in his interview makes sense.





ＰＣインタラクティブ社のハリソン氏をご紹介していただけませんでしょうか。I wonder if it would be possible for you to introduce me to Mr Harrison of PC Interactive Co. Ltd?









うちの息子は去年身長が５インチ伸びた。My son grew 5 inches last year.
彼女は例の金のインチキ証券商法に引っかかり持ち金のほとんどを失ってしまった。She was taken in by that fake gold certificate scandal and lost most of her money.



あの本の読者たちは自分のことをインテリだと思っている。The readers of that book think themselves sophisticated.
彼女はインテリア・デザインの仕事をしていきたいと考えている。She is pursuing her career in interior design.









このプロダクトはインテリジェント総合情報システムです。This product is an intelligent integrated information system.






労働集約・資本集約を超えて、時代はナレッジ・インテンシブへと大きくシフトしている。Surpassing labour intensive, capital intensive, the age has shifted greatly to knowledge intensive.



インディアンがこの地域に住んだ。Indians inhabited this district.













英語を話す時は、もっとイントネーションに注意しなさい。Pay more attention to intonation when you speak English.


私の祖父はインド人の血を引いていた。My grandfather was part Indian.




その船は原料をインドネシアから輸送している。The ship transports raw materials from Indonesia.








あのコマーシャルってインパクト強いね。特に、音楽が耳に残るよ。That commercial makes a strong impression - especially the music. It stays in your head.
















インフォーメーションカウンターはどこでしょう？Where is the information counter?




















インフルエンザが都市部で猛威を振るった。The flu struck the metropolitan area.


インフレを考慮した数値です。It's an inflation-adjusted figure.



どんなインプットでもいただければありがたいです。Any input would be appreciated!









インベーダーと和議の交渉をしないことに決めた。We decided not to have peace negotiations with the invaders.




















ウスターソースがいいんじゃない？How about adding some Worcestershire sauce?



彼女はウーマンリブ運動の指導者だと言われている。She is said to be a leader in the women's liberation movement.


彼はウールと綿の区別がつかない。He cannot tell wool from cotton.






Webマーケティングの弱点を克服するウィジェットです。It's the widget that overcomes web marketing's weaknesses.

ウイスキーは紅茶とよく合う。Whiskey goes very well with tea.


右上にある「バッテン」のボタンが、ウィンドウを消すボタンだよ。The "X" button in the top right shuts the window.その店のウインドウには最新のファッションが展示してある。The shop windows display the latest fashion.















センターの選手はウイニングボールをガッチリとった。The center fielder made a firm catch for the winning out.

ウィルスは人類が存在する限り存在するであろう。Viruses will exist as long as man.
ウインクが彼のたった一つの返事だった。A wink was his only answer.



彼はウィンタースポーツに興味を示している。He shows interest in winter sports.我々の国ではウインタースポーツが盛んだ。Winter sports are very popular in our country.






その男性は一人でウィンドサーフィンを楽しんでいる。The man is enjoying windsurfing alone.





こびへつらうウェイターは最上のテーブルをあてがわれる。なぜなら、そうしたウェイターは、いつもマネージャーや上役のきげんをとるから。The obsequious waiter is usually assigned the best table because he always curries favor with his manager and superiors.

きれいなウエイトレスが給仕してくれた。A pretty waitress waited on us.

ウェールズに諺があります。In Wales we have a proverb.
スキーシーズンも終わりに近づいて、ウエアとかのバーゲンやっているけど、余り物しかなくて丁度いいサイズのモノがない。Since ski season is almost over, the ski wear that's on sale is all leftovers, so there's nothing that's just my size.




妹の趣味はウェブ用のアイコンのデザインで、暇を見つけて作っては自分のサイトで無料で配布している。My little sister's hobby is designing icons on the web, and she distributes them free of charge on her website whenever she finds the free time to do so.










ギターでカントリー・ウエスタンを弾くのは本職のミュージシャンならごくたやすいことだ。Playing country-western music on guitar is real kid stuff to a true professional.


彼女のウエストは２４インチある。Her waist measures 24 inches.









































君はウオーミングアップを始めたな。You've started warming up.





ウォッカマティーニをお願いします。A vodka martini, please.










私たちはウッド氏を議長に任命した。We appointed Mr Wood chairman.












あなたの牧場は何エーカーありますか。What is the acreage of your ranch?







僕の所にエースが４枚来ている。I have been dealt four aces.彼はエースピッチャーです。He is an ace pitcher.













この部屋にはエアコンがありますよ。This room has air conditioning.























彼はエアホステスと結婚した。He married an air hostess.

エアポートバスはどこから出ていますか。Where do the airport buses leave from?










彼女は週に１回エアロビクスをやっている。She goes to aerobics once a week.


私はエイズの研究に従事している。I am engaged in AIDS research.
エイズウイルスの拡散は恐るべき速さで進んでいる。The speed of the spread of AIDS is horrifyingly fast.



私はエイリアンに誘拐されていた。I was abducted by aliens.

サッカーはエキサイティングなスポーツです。Soccer is an exciting sport.





樹皮からエキスを抽出する。Extract an essence from the bark of a tree.
ツインの部屋にエキストラベッドを入れてください。I'd like a twin with an extra bed.


過去において高齢者たちは人生の様々な問題を解決するときのエキスパートと考えられていた。In the past, the old used to be looked upon as experts in solving various problems of life.


貴社の小型コピー機を東京オフィス・エキスポ９７でしりました。I learned about your portable copier at the Tokyo-Office '97 Expo.
今日のアイツは、エキセントリックすぎてついていけない。That guy today, he's being too eccentric - I can't keep up with him.



エクアドルのキトは赤道のすぐ南にある。Quito, Ecuador, is a little south of the equator.

この時間帯は、エクササイズ目的の社会人がメインで、子供はそんなに多くない。At this time of day, most customers are adults here to exercise, there aren't that many kids.












アメリカン・エクスプレスは使えますか。Do you accept AMEX?






























エコロジーのために堪え忍ぶのではなく、自然と調和した住環境の快適性が必要である。Not just for the sake of the ecology, a natural living environment is necessary.

この問題は、アイドルのエゴとヲタのエゴの衝突だ。This problem is the clash of the idol's and obsessive fan's egos.

あの男は徹底的なエゴイストだ。That man is an egotist through and through.



エジプトでは何を食べて生活していますか。What do they live on in Egypt?

ＳＦのほうが好きですね。I like science fiction better.

ＳＯＳ！助けてくれ。SOS, please help!


上りのエスカレーターはどこですか？Where's the up-escalator?
脱線がどんどんエスカレートしていく。The digression is escalating more and more.




「あの６人はどこ行った？」「エスケープしまた」"Where have those six got to?" "They've escaped."
















エスニック料理の味は日本風になっている。This ethnic dish is arranged in a Japanese style.







このお料理は、パリのエスプリを意識して、味付けしてみました。This cuisine is seasoned to evoke the esprit of Paris.








それはエチケットの問題だ。It's a matter of etiquette.



念のためＸ線写真をとりましょう。Let's take an X-ray just in case.




彼女はエッセイを書き始めた。She set about writing the essay.




ちなみにここ一週間は、例えばフラグが立っていようとも、Ｈシーンが無い事は確定事項だからな。暫くの間、辛抱な！By the way, this week - no matter what flags are set - it's a certainty that there will be no ecchi scenes. You'll just have to bear with it a while.私よりもっとエッチな人もいて安心しました。I was relieved that there are people more wanton than me.女性だってエッチしたい。Women want to have sex too.







フロイトは、親子間の愛憎関係をエディプス・コンプレックスとして展開しました。Freud developed the love-hate relationship between parents and child as the Oedipus complex.












神様の名前はやっぱりＮＧだと思うよ〜。もう名づけた時点で名前負けなわけじゃん。I think a god's name has got to be out. From the moment the kid's named you know he's not going to be able to live up to it!



熱はエネルギーの一種である。Heat is a form of energy.僕はエネルギーを使い果たした。I have exhausted my energy.カロリーは食物が持つエネルギーを正確に示す尺度である。The calorie is an exact measure of the energy in food.

ピーターとエバは似合いのカップルだ。Peter and Eve make a handsome couple.













その痛ましいエピソードは私には痛切に感じられた。The touching episode came home to me.











エプロンの紐を結んでください。Tie the apron.















エムサイズの黄色い長袖のシャツが欲しいんだけど。I'd like a long-sleeved shirt in yellow, medium.






彼のエラーがなかったなら我々は勝てたのだが。If it had not been for his error, we would have won.

大容量のＲＡＭが搭載されていると、メモリ不足を示すエラーメッセージが表示される。If a very large amount of memory is installed, an 'insufficient memory' error message is displayed.


君はいまやエリート集団の一員だ。You are now among the elite.
警察はそのエリアを封鎖した。The police have blocked off the area.



















兄はエレキギターを買いました。My brother bought an electric guitar.








彼はエレクトロニクスについて何も知らない。He knows nothing about electronics.
















エレベーターの中でのタバコはご遠慮下さい。You may not smoke in an elevator.




















iTunesのＭＰ３エンコーダは音質が悪いって本当？Is it true that the iTunes' MP3 encoder has poor sound quality?



どうしてビルはエンジニアになる決心をしたのか。What made Bill decide to be an engineer?
エンジニアリングの仕事は日本の会社が担当することになっています。Engineering service will be taken up by the Japanese company.

彼は最後の試合をエンジョイしたんだろうか。I wonder if he enjoyed the last match.
そのエンジンは蒸気で動く。The engine is driven by steam.




彼は３回エンストを起こしてしまった。He stalled the engine three times.



ショーに来る人々を楽しませるのがエンターテイナーだ。The man whose work it is to amuse people who attend a show is an entertainer.







僕はエンディングが気に入らなかったな。Oh, I didn't like the ending.
ぱたぱたと足跡を立てて、エントランスへと駆けてゆく。With a pitter-patter of footsteps she runs off to the entrance.
エントリーはすべて、追加後にチェックします。All entries are subject to review once added.



エンドユーザーの視野にたった商品開発が必須。Our new product development efforts must be done from the end user's viewpoint.























ＯＬになってもう３年。今の生活に不満がある訳じゃないけど・・・。Already three years since I became an office lady. It's not as if I'm dissatisfied with my present lifestyle but, well ...





このテーブルは良質のオーク材でできている。This table is made of good oak.
今でもその値段でならオークションで買うというコレクターはいますよ。The prices are those collectors would expect to pay at auction now.

フルコースもあれば、サラダで軽いお食事もオーケー。You can eat a complete meal, or just go easy with our salad bar.
指揮者はオーケストラの指揮をする。A conductor directs an orchestra.





オーストラリアに行きたくてたまらない。I'm aching to go to Australia.
オーストリアのどこであなたは育ちましたか。Where in Austria did you grow up?




あなたのオーダーは提出されました。Your order has been submitted.








彼女は先週オーディションを受けた。She went in for the audition last week.














オートバイに乗るのは楽しい。It's fun to ride a motorcycle.











朝食には卵がいいが、姉はオートミールがいいという。I like eggs for breakfast, but my sister prefers oatmeal.

生産性はオートメーションの徹底によって向上する。Production improves by becoming more automatic.







錠そのものは普通のシリンダー錠ですから、ドアを閉めたらオートロックするということはありません。The lock itself is a normal cylinder lock so it doesn't automatically lock when you shut the door.



妻は魚のオードブルが好きだからね、釣りに出掛けるときはお許しが出やすいんだよね。My wife loves fish hors d'oeuvre, so it's easier for me to get a kitchen pass for my fishing.
オーナーの人達は彼を支配人に任命した。The owners appointed him manager.





あなたはオーバーなしですますつもりですか。Do you mean to do without an overcoat?このバッグは４キロの重量オーバーです。This bag is 4 kilograms overweight.

















































彼女はオーブンでパンとケーキを焼いた。She baked bread and cakes in the oven.
オーブントースターのタイマーが鳴る。食パンがコンガリ焼けた、香ばしい匂い。The toaster-oven's timer rings. The fragrant smell of well toasted bread.




新しいショッピングモールが街のはずれにオープンした。A new shopping mall opened on the edge of town.



私の新しいアルファ・ロメオのオープンカーは明るい赤色だ。My new Alfa Romeo convertible is light red.





























オーボエ奏者なんかは自分にあうリードを探すより作った方が速いと、自分で作ってしまう人もいる。Heck, with oboe players there are those who, rather than search for a reed that suits them, find it faster to make their own.


あ、あれ？なんか・・・すっごい負のオーラを感じますよ？E-eh? I somehow seem to feel a very threatening aura...






このボートは６本オールだ。This boat has six oars.
















オールディーズを聞くと故郷を思い出します。Listening to oldies reminds me of my hometown.

















そのオーロラは実に見事だった。The aurora was truly remarkable.

私たちは砂漠でオアシスとおぼしきものを見た。We saw what looked like an oasis in the desert.



新しいオイル・タンカーが進水した。A new oil tanker was launched.



彼らは第二次オイルショックで一儲けした。They cashed in on the second oil crisis.



























あなたはオクラと納豆はどちらがよりねばねばしているかわかりますか。Do you know which of okra and natto is more gooey?




彼女は、その演技でオスカーを取った女の子である。She's the girl whose performance won an Oscar.






私たちはオゾンを破壊する化学物質の使用をただちにやめなければならないのです。We must stop using ozone-depleting chemicals immediately.
たとえ私たちが即座に使用をやめても、南極のオゾンホールが元に戻るのにはさらに後６０年かかります。Even if we do this, it will be another sixty years before the Antarctic ozone hole is repaired.

オタワはカナダの首都です。Ottawa is the capital of Canada.

オックスフォードをいつ卒業したか。When did you graduate from Oxford?彼はオクスフォード大学で物理学を専攻した。He read physics at Oxford.







彼はオハイオ州で生まれた。He was born in Ohio.




このオファーは５日間有効です。This offer is good for five days.




いつでも私のオフィスを訪ねなさい。Call at my office at any time.




彼女は、オフィスレディーです。She is an office lady.














彼女はオフレコでこの話をしてくれた。She told me this story off the record.


鳥居と言うと、階段を上がったところにあった赤いオブジェ？By 'Torii' you mean that red objet d'art at the top of the steps?













エアコンはオプションの付属品です。An air conditioner is available as an optional extra.











彼はオペラを書いた。He wrote the score of the opera.










１０４のオペレーターに聞いてみて。Call the operator at 104 then.










たまごを割らずにオムレツは作れない。You can't make an omelet without breaking eggs.





彼は６月にオランダから帰国しました。He returned from Holland in June.


新入生向けのオリエンテーションを行う。We will have a period of orientation for freshmen.





違う違う。オリジナリティがあるっていうか。No, no. I mean to say that it has originality.
いくつかのシーンがオリジナルから外された。Several scenes have been cut from the original.





彼はオリンピックに参加した。He took part in the Olympic Games.


教会には普通オルガンがあります。There is usually an organ in a church.






オレゴンの友人のブラウン氏があす私たちを訪ねてきます。Mr. Brown, a friend from Oregon, will visit us tomorrow.
あなたはリンゴが好きですか、それともオレンジが好きですか。Do you like apples or oranges?

オレンジジュースと卵２個をオーバー・イージーでお願いする。Orange juice, and two eggs over easy.











金衡１ポンドは１２オンスである。One pound troy weighs 12 oz.

この川はオンタリオ湖に流れ込む。This river runs into Lake Ontario.





オンラインでお話しした方がよろしければそうします。If you need to go off-line, that is fine.



なにも田中さんの力がオンリーだというのはない。This is not to say that Mr. Tanaka did it all on his own.



あいつはカーマニアだから、車のことならなんでも知ってるよ。He's a car nut. Ask him anything.











カーテンが風になびいた。The curtains blew in the wind.






手荷物用のカートはどこにありますか。Where are the luggage carts?

彼はインクカートリッジを交換していて白いシャツを汚した。He soiled his white shirt when he changed the ink cartridge.

はい、こちらが予約カードです。Here is your appointment card.彼は花にきれいなカードを添えて彼女に送った。He sent her some flowers, along with a pretty card.彼は順番を間違えてカードを出してしまった。He has played his card out of turn.



リオのカーニバルは二月に開催される。Rio's carnival is held in February.
母の日にお母さんにカーネーションをあげた。I gave my mother carnations on Mother's Day.







彼は右に急カーブした。He made a sharp turn to the right.その少年はカーブの投げ方を知っている。The boy knows how to throw a curve.

このカーペットは実にお買い得だった。This carpet was a real bargain.















メグの髪は自然にカールする。Meg's hair curls naturally.
向こう見ずなカーレースでは、リードをうばおうとして、かえってにっちもさっちも行かなくなる時がある。In daredevil car races, there are moments when the drivers place themselves between the devil and the deep blue sea, trying to take the lead.







カウチポテトには、私はなりたくない。A couch potato is something that I don't want to be.

カウボーイが牛を牧草地へ追っていく。A cowboy is driving cattle to the pasture.


フェミニストカウンセリングを一言で説明するなら、女性の視点にたったカウンセリングということになるでしょうか。If you sum up feminist counselling in a few words, I suppose it would be counselling done from a woman's standpoint.
カウンターの値が指定の「キリ番」になったら記念メッセージを表示させます。When the counter value reaches the assigned 'lucky-number' it displays a congratulatory message.ホテルの案内カウンターは、どこですか。Where's the information center for hotels?あそこのカウンターでウイスキー飲んでいるヤツ、けっこう私のタイプだわ。See that guy over there at the counter drinking whisky? He's pretty much my type.






バッターのカウントはツーストライクツーボール。The batter has two balls and two strikes on him.
ボクサーはあごを打たれて、カウントアウトになった。The boxer was hit on the chin and went down for the count.


だけど俺の心はまだカオスの中にいる。But my mind is still in chaos.


あのカクテルは甘くて飲みやすいよ。That cocktail is sweet and easy to drink.


カクテルパーティーは退屈なときもある。Cocktail parties can be boring.


冬の冷たい風に何時間もさらされていたせいで肌がカサカサになった。After spending hours out in the cold winter wind, my skin got all chapped and dry.























私は財布をなくしてしまっていた、それでそのカセットが買えなかった。I had lost my purse, so I couldn't buy the cassette.
カセットテープを買うつもりです。I will buy cassette tapes.











あなたの最新のカタログを入手したいと思っています。I would like to get your latest catalogue.





1/4カットの白菜を太めの千切りにザクザク切る。Cut the quartered pak-choi into, slightly wide, strips.交通機関の労働者は賃金カットに抗議して、ストに突入しました。Transportation workers staged a walkout to protest pay cuts.肩までの長さでカットしてください。Could you cut it shoulder length?


カップの取っ手がこわれている。The handle of the cup is broken.
カップケーキ型に、ペーパーカップを並べます。Set up paper cups in the cupcake baking tray.


カップルは写真のためにポーズをとった。The couple posed for the photograph.





作家としての彼女は伝統的なカテゴリーのいずれにも当てはまらない。As a writer, she does not fit into any of the traditional categories.




彼はカトリック教徒である。He belongs to the Catholic faith.彼は最近改宗したカトリック信者です。He is a recent convert to Catholicism.


カナダではフランス語を話しますか。Do they speak French in Canada?



私のカナリアは猫に殺された。My canary was killed by a cat.

私たちはカヌーで川を下った。We went down a river by canoe.


その本のカバーにはインクのしみがいくつかあった。There were some ink spots on the book jacket.事故の場合、全て保険でカバーされていますか。Am I fully covered in case of an accident?







軽食の出来るカフェがありますか。Is there a cafe where I can have a light meal?






カフェテリアで働きたいのですが。I'd like to work at the cafeteria.


私はカフェバーで雰囲気に浸っていた。I was in a coffee bar soaking in the atmosphere.





食後に２カプセル飲みなさい。Take two capsules after a meal.










おじさんがぼくにカメラをくれました。My uncle gave me a camera.



女性は、写真から帽子を取り除く事は可能かどうか、カメラマンに聞いた。She wanted to know if the photographer could remove the hat from the picture.彼は大学卒業後カメラマンになった。He became a cameraman after he graduated from college.




カメレオンは周りの色に合わせて体色を変えることができる。The chameleon can take on the colors of its background.



カラーフィルムを一本ください。I want a roll of color film for prints.















私はカラオケ好きだが、たいした歌い手ではない。I love karaoke, but I'm not much of a singer.


あなたのカラフルなシャツは本当に目立ちます。Your colorful shirt really stands out.






入試制度の改革、カリキュラムの改革は着々と進んでいるが、歩みは遅い。The reform of both entrance examination system and curriculum makes slow progress.




とうとう我々はカリフォルニアに着いた。At last, we reached California.カルフォルニアではオレンジを栽培している。They grow oranges in California.







彼の食事にはカルシウムが欠けている。Calcium is absent from his diet.




外国に行くと我々は大抵カルチャーショックを体験する。In a foreign country most of us go through culture shock.

このカルテを持って３階のレントゲン室へ行ってください。Please take this chart to the X-ray Room on the third floor.









カレーのルーは非常に滋養に富んでいる。Curry sauce is very nourishing.


そのカレッジは大学に付属している。The college is affiliated with the university.

整えられた長机、いくつかのパイプ椅子、壁の掲示板にはカレンダーとプリント数枚が張られている。There were long desks lined up, several pipe chairs, and stuck on the bulletin board were a calendar and several printouts.







カロリーの高い食物は私の健康にはよくない。Rich foods don't agree with my health.

カンガルーの雌は子供を腹の袋に入れて動く。A female kangaroo carries its young in the pouch.

ご兄弟のことはカンザス州から問い合わせを受けたばかりです。We have just received an inquiry from Kansas concerning your brother.








カントリークラブに入った。We joined the country club.



私たちはみな試験でカンニングをすることは悪いと考えている。We all consider it wrong to cheat on the test.










カンボジアでの合併事業は失敗してしまった。The joint-venture in Cambodia backfired.




ガーデンフェンスを至急配達して下さい。We require the garden fences for immediate delivery.

天候が悪いために、ガーデンパーティーは取りやめになった。Owing to the bad weather, the garden party was called off.



彼はこのビルのガードマンだ。He is a watchman in this building.

車はガードレールに衝突した。The car ran into a guardrail.








私のガールフレンドは踊りがうまい。My girlfriend is a good dancer.




ガイドが私たちをホテルまで案内してくれた。The guide led us to the hotel.

ガイドブックを過信しちゃいけない。Don't rely too much on your guidebook.








彼女は繻子のガウンを着ていた。She was wearing a gown of satin.



もうガスは消した？Have you turned off the gas yet?












砂漠の真ん中で私たちの車はガス欠になった。We ran out of gas in the middle of the desert.




ガソリンはリットル単位で売られる。Gasoline is sold by the liter.
この辺にガソリンスタンドはありますか。Is there a gas station around here?
私にはガッツとやる気があります。I'm a person with guts and a strong will.
彼ガッツポーズをしているよ。Look at him raising his arm in triumph.
しまった、ガットが切れた。Oh, no. I broke a string in my racket.




ガムが靴底にくっついた。The gum adhered to the sole of the shoe.


テーブルの上にガラスのコップがある。There is a glass on the table.

手前のガラス張りの建物は薔薇園なんです。温室になっていて、いつも薔薇を観賞できるようになってるんですよ。The glass fronted building before you is the rose garden. It's a greenhouse so you will always be able to appreciate the roses.




「ガリバー旅行記」を読んだことがありますか。Have you ever read Gulliver's Travels?
米航空宇宙局によれば、ガリレオ搭載のものと類似した発電機を搭載して行った宇宙飛行２２回のうち、３回の飛行で事故が発生したとのことです。NASA says three of 22 space missions that carried generators similar to Galileo's ended in accidents.




父はガレージを掃除している。My father is sweeping the garage.
ロングさんのところではあすガレージセールをします。The Longs are having a garage sale tomorrow.
この缶にはおよそ４ガロン入る。This can holds about 4 gallons.

まだ頭はがんがんするけど熱はもうないよ。My head's still pounding but I don't have a temperature any more.






トップのリーダーは犬の行動学では「アルファ」と呼ばれ、以下「ベータ」「ガンマ」と続きます。In dog ethology the leader is called 'alpha'; after that it continues with 'beta' and 'gamma'.


彼女はキーを探してポケットをさぐった。She searched her pockets for the key.彼女はピアノのキーを押した。She depressed the keys of the piano.















ＯＥＣＤの調査で北欧諸国が税率において世界の上位をキープした。In the OECD survey, northern European countries are keeping their high ranking in tax-rates.この店は、ボトルをキープできるんですか。Can I reserve a bottle and have you keep it here for me?



マウスとキーボードを行ったりきたりするのが煩雑なので、キーボードのみで操作できるようショートカットキーはないのでしょうか？It's a fiddle going to and fro between the keyboard and mouse so are there shortcuts to allow operation using only the keyboard?





新しい文を追加するまえに、その文によって当サイトに新しい語彙がもたらされるかどうか、キーワード検索してご確認ください。Before adding a new sentence, please check that your sentence brings new vocabulary by searching the keywords.




彼女にばっちりキスされちゃったよ。She kissed me full on the lips.










この２日間皿洗いする時間もないよ。キッチンの流しに山積みしているよ。I haven't had time to do the dishes for two days; they are in a pile in the kitchen sink.



配線を間違えないように注意してキットを組み立てた。I built the kit taking care not to make mistakes in the wiring.





























彼は左手でボールをキャッチした。He caught the ball with his left hand.
これはなんだ。キャッチセールスじゃないのなら、新手の逆ナンだろうか。Then what is this, I wonder? If it isn't dodgy door-to-door sales, then could it be a new kind of pickup technique for the ladies?



私たちは先日、吉田君を我が野球チームのキャッチャーに選んだ。The other day, we chose Yoshida to be the catcher on our school's baseball team.





ゴルファーはキャディーに薬を与えた。The golfer gave his caddy some medicine.







彼はキャビアを実際に食べたことがない。He hasn't actually eaten caviar.

キャビネットは集めたものを陳列するための食器棚である。A cabinet is a cupboard used for displaying things.





２つのキャブレターを装備したことで、そのレーシング狂はエンジンをすこぶる強力にした。By installing two carburetors that racing-car enthusiast souped up his motor considerably.


キャプテンは静かにするように命じた。The captain commanded silence.

ライスとキャベツをお代わりお願いします。Can I have seconds on rice and cabbage?








彼の職業上のキャリアは破綻していた。His professional career was bankrupt.



キャロルはレンタカーを運転しています。Carol is driving a rent-a-car.

ロス出張をキャンセルしようかな。I should cancel my L.A. trip.

このキャンディーは８０セントです。This candy costs eighty cents.
そのキャンドルは勝手に消えた。The candle went out by itself.


彼は絵筆をカンバスにさっと走らせた。He swept his brush across the canvas.
若いキャンパーたちは新しい防水上着を身につけていた。The young campers were kitted out with new waterproof jackets.
彼女は私を連れてキャンパスを案内してくれた。She showed me around the campus.


丘の斜面にはキャンピングカーがいっぱいあった。Lots of campers were parked all over the hill-side.
私は家族と一緒にキャンプに行った。I went camping with my family.




そのキャンペーンは、彼を驚かせた。The campaign took his breath.






恥ずかしがってる立花はとってもキュートだ。You, Rikka, are very cute when you're embarrassed.
キューバの若い人達はよくアメリカのテレビを視聴している。Younger Cubans tend to tune into the American television network.
















キリストは人類のために一度死なれた。Christ died once for all humans.
キリスト教を信仰していますか。Do you believe in Christianity?
ローマ人はキリスト教徒を迫害した。The Romans persecuted Christians.





この車は時速６０キロで走っている。This car is going 60km an hour.
私の体重は５８キログラムです。My weight is 58 kilograms.

その湖は周囲が５キロメートルある。The lake is five kilometers round.







車のギアを入れずにリバースを入れたので店先に多大な損害を与えた。Instead of putting the car into gear, she put it into reverse, causing a great deal of damage to the store-front.




私は彼にギターを弾いてもらいたい。I want him to play the guitar.



私はギタリストになりたいんです。I'd like to be a guitarist.







苦しかったらギブアップして、お姉さんのお願いを聞きなさいっ。If you can't take it, give up and do what I, your older sister, asked of you.
結婚生活は公平なギブ・アンド・テイクであるべきだ。In marriage there should be equal give and take.
クリスマスの当日になっても、トムの右足には依然としてギブスがあてがわれたままであった。On Christmas Day, Tom still had his right leg in plaster.









彼女のギャラリーに２点ほど出展するのよ。I'm going to have two pieces in her gallery.




ランダーは暴動とギャング的行動は貧困と貧しい経済条件の結果であると仮定している。Lander assumes that rioting and gang behavior are a result of poverty and poor economic conditions.「おい、だまれ。口数が多いぞ」とそのギャングの一味が言った。"Hey, you shut up! You talk too much," the gangster said.
あいつはギャンブラーとして名が通っている。That man is notorious as a gambler.
彼はギャンブルに夢中になっている。He is mad on gambling.
ギリシア人もよく魚を食べる。Greeks often eat fish, too.






クーデターは慎重に遂行された。The coup was meticulously executed.



うちのクーラーが故障してしまった。The air conditioner is out of order.






カラー・キー・プログラム・システムでは全ての色が「クールパレット」と「ウォームパレット」の２つに分けられる。With the colour key program system, all colours are divided into two palettes, the "cool palette" and the "warm palette".彼女のクールな視線に、俺はドキッとした。Her cool gaze made my heart skip a beat.彼ってクールだから、私たちみんな彼にはカリスマ性があると思っている。He's so cool that we all think he's charismatic.







このクイズは全然分からない。I can make nothing of this quiz.







このタンカーはクウェート行きです。This tanker is bound for Kuwait.

クエーサーとは、非常に遠方にある、まぶしい輝きを放つ天体だ。Quasars are brilliantly shining heavenly bodies that are extremely far away.


アメリカでは１クォーターは２５セント、４クォーターは１ドルだ。In American money, a "quarter" is 25 cents; 4 quarters make a dollar.日本人離れしたこの美しい相貌からもわかるように、優奈は実は生粋の日本人じゃない。西洋人をおばあちゃんに持つ、クォーターだったりする。As you can also tell from these beautiful, far from Japanese, looks, Yuna is not pure-blood Japanese. She's a quarter-blood with a westerner as grandmother.





２パイントは１クオートと等しい。Two pints are equal to a quart.
注・かなり昔に描いてるのでクオリティは低いです。NB: This was drawn a long time ago so the quality is low.


彼女は夕食まで空腹をしのぐためいくらかクッキーを食べた。She had some cookies to stay her hunger until dinner.ウェブ・サーバーがクッキーを利用している場合はどうなるのでしょうか。I wonder how it is when the web server uses cookies?




二つ折りにしたクッションを枕代わりに、僕はフローリングの上にカーペットを敷いただけの固い床へと横になる。Using a doubled-up cushion in place of a pillow I lie down on the hard wooden floor with nothing but a carpet spread over it.



私、自動車にしょっちゅう乗ってるの。だから、クライアントが私にコンタクトが取れないって文句を言うの。I'm on the road a lot, and my clients are complaining that they can never reach me.






観客は映画がクライマックスの間すすり泣きした。The audience sobbed throughout the climax of the movie.



新しいクラウンをかぶせる必要があります。You have to have a new crown.
渋滞にいらいらして大勢の運転手達はクラクションを鳴らし出した。Impatient at the delay, many drivers began to blow their horns.


クラシックはありません。I don't have any classical music.
どんなに高くてもあのクラシックカーを手に入れたい。I will get that classic car at all costs.



あなたはうちのクラスで歓迎されています。You are welcomed in our class.





私たちはクラスメイトです。We're classmates.







クラッチペダルを数回踏むと、なんとかクラッチが切れたので、騙し騙し運転しました。Repeatedly slamming the clutch pedal, I somehow managed to get the clutch disengaged so I could just about drive for the time being.


クラッチペダルを数回踏むと、なんとかクラッチが切れたので、騙し騙し運転しました。Repeatedly slamming the clutch pedal, I somehow managed to get the clutch disengaged so I could just about drive for the time being.











撮影は３日間でクランクアップします。The picture will finish shooting in three days.





クリーニング取ってきておいて。Please pick up my dry cleaning.


彼女はデザート用にクリームを泡立てた。She beat the cream for dessert.


お待たせしました。お子様セットとクリームソーダです。Thank you for waiting. One kid's meal and an ice cream soda.









四天王も倒した、クソ長い地下迷宮もクリアした。I'd defeated the four sub-bosses and got through the damn long underground labyrinth.










第二に、いくつかのクリオールはそれ自体独立した「国語」となるかもしれない。Secondly, some of the Creoles may become independent "national languages" in their own right.
野球はクリケットとは違うよ。Baseball is different from cricket.



いかにも敬虔なるクリスチャンが送る、礼節重き言葉です。So characteristic of what a pious Christian would say, this courteous phrase.

いいクリスマスを過ごしましたか。Did you have a nice Christmas?
彼らはクリスマスイヴに結婚した。They married on Christmas Eve.
彼にもうクリスマスカードを送りましたか。Have you sent him a Christmas card yet?

母はクリスマスケーキを作ってくれた。My mother made me a Christmas cake.
ここにクリスマスツリーを立てましょう。Let's put up the Christmas tree here.
彼女はクリスマスプレゼントに本をくれた。She gave me a book for Christmas.

クリック：マウスの「左側」のボタンを素早く「一回」プチッと押す事です。Click: Quickly pushing the mouse's left hand side button once.


その文書にはメモがクリップでつけられていた。A note was attached to the document with a paper clip.





ちなみに、ウチのクリニックから数百メートルの近場に「ランプ」が建設中です。Incidentally a motorway ramp is being constructed in the neighbourhood, a few hundred metres away, of my clinic.






オックスフォードのクルーが勝つのは確実に見えた。The Oxford crew appeared secure of victory.











それから野獣がクレイジーになりたがり始める。Then the wild beasts start wanting to go crazy.忙しくって、クレージーだ。Staying busy and crazy!!




今日も一日クレーム処理ばかりで、もうくたくた。I've had it. All I've done today is handle complaints.
クレーンを操縦するのには、勿論、免許が必要です。Of course, a license is needed to operate a crane.



このクレジット・カードは使えますか。Do you honor this credit card?
クレジットカードで支払いたいのですが。I'd like to pay by credit card.








クレンザーでオーブンの汚れが落ちた。The cleanser removed the dirt from the oven.






今日この番組でハッカーの問題をクローズアップするんだって。This program is going to focus on computer hacking issues today.



この踏台を使えばクローゼットの上に手が届くよ。If you stand on this stool, you can reach the top of the closet.
クロールできる？Can you do the crawl?
倫理委員会では, クローン実験の一時停止が決定した。At the ethics committee, a temporary halt to cloning experiments was decided.



私の考えでは、この政治の意味しているのは、セルビア人とクロアチア人とイスラム教徒ということだわ。I think this politics means Serbs, Croats, and Muslims.

二本の道はそこでクロスしている。The two roads cross there.















彼はそのクロスワードパズルを簡単に解いた。He did the crossword with ease.
クロッカスは春の先駆けである。The crocus is a forerunner of spring.




















その犬は地面をくんくん嗅いだ。The dog sniffed the ground.






あなたはハワイへ行ったのですか、それともグアムへ行ったのですか。Did you go to Hawaii or Guam?
今年もいくつか怪しいグッズを見つけたので、それらをまとめて紹介しよう。This year again I found a number of dodgy goods so I'll introduce them all here.










グライダーは空高く舞い上がった。The glider soared high into the air.



雨がひどく降ったのでグラウンドはぐしゃぐしゃだ。It rained heavily, so the playground is muddy.







彼女はグラスにワインを満たした。She filled the glass with wine.




博文は天井にグラスファイバーの断熱材を入れた。Hirofumi installed fibreglass insulation in the ceiling.











炭素排出量の変動が、以下のグラフに描かれている。The differing volumes of carbon emissions are plotted in the graph below.


しかし、ほとんどの研究はエメットの理論がコンピューター・グラフィックに与えた影響については焦点を当てていない。Most studies, however, have not focused on the influence Emmet's theory had on computer graphics.









彼女はグラマーだね。She's a glamor girl.




このジャムの正味重量は２００グラムです。The net weight of this jam is 200 grams.







彼女はグランドピアノでその曲を引いた。She played that tune on her grand piano.
グランプリに勝つことは有名なレーサーにとっては名誉であった。Winning the Grand Prix was a feather in the cap of the famous drivers.

私はグリークラブのメンバーです。I'm a member of the glee club.
機械はグリースで動きが悪くなった。The machine was clogged with grease.

アリスにはグリーンが似合う。The green color becomes Alice.






グリーンピースは鉄分が豊富で爪の色がよくなる成分が含まれている。Green peas are high in iron and contain nutrients that improve the colour of fingernails.




アフリカは大陸であるが、グリーンランドはそうではない。Africa is a continent; Greenland is not.



















先生は私たちを二つのグループに分けた。Our teacher separated us into two groups.

パフィー亜美由美は日本のグループサウンズ。Puffy AmiYumi is a Japanese rock band.













私の事務所はあのグレーの６階建てのビルの４階だ。My office is on the fourth floor of that gray six-story building.







グレイビーをもう少しいかがですか。Would you like some more gravy?


私はオレンジよりグレープフルーツのほうが好きだな。I prefer grapefruits to oranges.













野球をするにはバットとボールとグラブが必要だ。You need a bat, a ball and gloves to play baseball.




ベイスギを材料に巨大でグロテスクな、しかし美しい円柱を作った。They made huge, grotesque, yet beautiful poles of red cedar.


ケイトはケーキの作り方を知っています。Kate knows how to make a cake.

あなたの名前がテープでケースに貼ってあります。Your name is taped on the case.これは大変まれにしかないケースだ。This is a very rare case.











海底ケーブルが両国の間に引かれた。A submarine cable was laid between the two countries.
これはなんて素敵なケーブルカーなんだろう。What a nice cable-car this is!

高齢者のケアについて考えなければならない。We must think about the care of old people.
彼にはよくあることだがケアレスミスをする。He made a careless mistake, as is often the case with him.

ケチャップは別で持ってきてください。I'd like to have ketchup on the side.












合衆国の第１６代大統領であるアブラハム・リンカーンは、ケンタッキー州の丸太小屋で生まれた。Abraham Lincoln, the 16th president of the United States, was born in a log cabin in Kentucky.


彼女はケンブリッジ大学でドイツ語を専攻して卒業した。She graduated in German at Cambridge.


５番ゲートへはどう行けばいいのですか。How do I get to Gate 5?






私達はいろいろなゲームをした。We played many kinds of games.






ゲイのクラブを推薦してください。Where can I find a good gay club?







その部屋のゲストは２０人いた。The guests in the room were twenty in number.









彼はゲリラの一隊に要撃された。He was waylaid by a band of guerrillas.














車はコースをはずれた。The car veered from its course.おすすめのコースはどこですか。Which course do you recommend?日本人とアメリカ人との重要な違いの一つは、日本人が安全な人生のコースを選ぶ傾向があるのに対して、アメリカ人は人生を探求し、それに挑戦したがることである。One of the important differences between Japanese and Americans is that Japanese tend to choose a safe course in life, while Americans choose to explore and challenge life.







コーチが助言をしてくれた。The coach gave me some advice.








あなたが家を出た後で、私はあなたのコートに気づきました。I found your coat after you left the house.
Ｍａｃ ＯＳ Ｘといっても、Ｍａｃ ＯＳのコードをバージョンアップした訳ではない。Although it's "Mac OS X", that doesn't mean that the Mac OS code itself has been upgraded to a new version.








ランナーはコーナーを回ってホームストレッチへ入った。The runners rounded the corner into the homestretch.






彼は熱いコーヒーをゆっくりすすった。He sipped the hot coffee slowly.
コーヒーショップはどこですか。Where is the coffee shop?





受け取ったコーヒーミルが動きません。The coffee mill that I received does not work.
マメちゃんがコーヒー豆を挽く為にコーヒーミルを使います。Mame uses a coffee mill to grind coffee beans.





コーラを飲んだら舌がぴりぴりした。The cola made my tongue tingle.
誰がコーラスを指揮しますか。Who leads the chorus?
彼は、自分のお気に入りのコーラス・ガールが、ほかの男と結婚した時、敗北を認めた。He threw in the towel in defeat when his favorite chorus girl married another man.



帰る前に必ず「帰るコール」を入れてね。Be sure to call home before you leave the office.
あの詐欺師と金髪のコールガールは下宿のおかみさんを怒らせるには申分のない取り合わせだ。The confidence man and his blonde call girl make a perfect match in enraging his landlady.


コールタールを蒸留して得られる成分名は下表の通りである。The components obtained by distillation of coal tar are as shown below.





雨が降ったので試合はコールドゲームになった。The game was called off because it rained.




















明日からコーンフレークとか、軽い物にしようか？Shall we go with cornflakes or something light from tomorrow?










向こうにいるあのコアラを見てごらん。Look at that koala over there.

電流が流れる電線にコイルを近づけると、コイルにも電気が流れます。When a coil is moved near to a wire with current flowing in it current flows in the coil as well.

私はこの箱のなかにたくさんのコインを持っている。I have many coins in this box.

コインランドリーから洗濯物を取ってきておいてね。Will you pick up the laundry from the laundrette?

彼はコカインに溺れている。He is addicted to cocaine.







ココアを一杯いかがですか。How about a cup of cocoa?






価格はコストと需要で決まる。Price depends on costs and demand.





性能的には問題なかったんだけど、一体あたりにかかる費用があまりにも膨大で、コストパフォーマンスが悪いということでね。There was nothing wrong with their ability, it was just that the expense for each unit was so vast that the cost performance was bad.














健二はコックになることに決めた。Kenji decided to become a cook.






ガラスのコップを流しにおこうとしたら手が滑って、ガシャッと割れた。When I tried to set the glass down in the sink my hand slipped and it shattered to pieces.

そのコテージは、彼女と過ごした楽しかった頃を私に思い出させた。The cottage reminded me of the happy times I had spent with her.



俺には何のコネもないから、就職するのが大変だ。My job search is really going rough. I don't have any connections.












完成した本のコピーを１部送っていただくという条件で、私どものソフトウエアを収録することを許可します。You have our permission to include our software on condition that you send us a copy of the final product.






コペルニクスは地球が太陽の周りを回ると教えた。Copernicus taught that the earth moves around the sun.





あのコマーシャルってインパクト強いね。特に、音楽が耳に残るよ。That commercial makes a strong impression - especially the music. It stays in your head.








下記のｑｕｉｔコマンドを使うとアプリケーションを終了させることが出来ます。If you use the quit command noted below, you can make the application exit.



コミックマーケット６７にてコピー本販売。無事完売したので製本しました。They were sold as photocopy books in Comic Market 67. We had no problem selling all of them, so we had bound copies made.












コミュニケーションと言う語はどういう意味であろうか。What do you mean by communication?





これらの人々がコミュニティから排除されたのだと考えることは非合理的だとは言えない。It is not unreasonable to think that these people were excluded from the community.













コメディは人を笑わせるものである。Comedy is something that makes you laugh.
コメディアンは無惨な死や大事故といった悲劇的状況を冗談のネタにしている。Comedians base their jokes on tragic situations like violent death or serious accidents.

あなたの報告書に目を通し、コメントを書いておきました。I've looked through your report and made some notes on it.











このコラムは面白かった。I found this column interesting.
そのコラムニストは古い醜聞を蒸し返した。The columnist raked up some old gossip.

我が家でコリーをペットとして飼っている。We keep a collie as a pet.





コルクの栓がどうしても抜けなかった。The cork would not come out.





世界中の銀のティースプーンのコレクションがある。I have a collection of silver tea spoons from all over the world.
今でもその値段でならオークションで買うというコレクターはいますよ。The prices are those collectors would expect to pay at auction now.

ロスにコレクト・コールを頼みます。I'd like to make a collect call to Los Angeles.

コレステロールをためたくなかったら、脂肪のない赤身の肉を食べるのがよい。If you want to avoid cholesterol, eat lean meat with no fat.







地球側の圧政に苦しむコロニーの人々の中で、テロによる現状打破を目論む勢力が誕生。Among the people of the colonies suffering under Earth's tyranny a force emerges intending to overthrow the status quo through terrorism.


彼はコロラドに大きな農場を持っている。He has a large farm in Colorado.








ピアノ・コンクールで私が第１位になるなんて夢想だにしなかった。Never did I dream that I would take first place in the piano contest.

その工場はコンクリートで建造された。The factory was constructed out of concrete.


手押し車を上手に使って、コンクリートブロックを運んでいる。A wheelbarrow fills the bill for moving concrete blocks.






コンサートはどうだった？How did you enjoy the concert?
興奮した観客はコンサートホールになだれこんだ。The excited audience ran into the concert hall.




どのコンサルタントを使うかと言う議論が何時間も続いた。The debate over which consultant to use went on for hours.





















エメットのコンセプトをもっともよく表現しているデザインに特に焦点を当てたい。I would like to focus attention on the particular design that best represents Emmet's concept.



今後は、新事業創造による経済の活性化という観点から、国民のコンセンサスに基づいた早急な内圧型規制緩和が推進されなければなるまい。Therefore, they cannot catalyze deregulation without "external pressure".
彼はラジオをコンセントにつないだ。He plugged in the radio.




私、自動車にしょっちゅう乗ってるの。だから、クライアントが私にコンタクトが取れないって文句を言うの。I'm on the road a lot, and my clients are complaining that they can never reach me.サリーは前の日に買ったコンタクトをなくした。Sally lost the contact lenses she had bought the day before.
私のコンタクトレンズを捜しているのよ。I'm looking for my contact lens.













スピーチコンテストは１１月９日に行われた。The speech contest took place on the ninth of November.







運動選手はよいコンディションを保たねばならない。An athlete must keep in good condition.







その洋服は赤と白のコントラストが美しい。The dress has a beautiful contrast between red and white.



関税を国ごとではなくブロックでコントロールする方が好都合であることを強調したい。I would like to stress that it is more convenient to control tariffs as a bloc rather than country by country.



彼女はうふふと照れながらコンドームを差し出した。Giggling with embarrassment, she held out the condom.
うちは、コンドミニアムです。Our home is a condominium.


コンドルは動物園では決して育たない。Condors have never bred in zoos.




コンバーチブルでアメリカを横断したい。I'd like to drive across the USA in a convertible car.




「ええと、その合コンというのはつまり・・・」「普通のコンパだよ」"Er, that 'mixer party' thing is then ..." "Just a normal get together."
列車のコンパートメントはすぐ窮屈になる。Train compartments soon get cramped.



コンパクト型にはおしゃれなデザインが多いですね。There are many smart designs among the compact models, aren't there?友人からもらったコンパクトの鏡の部分が割れてしまいました。The mirror on a compact I got from a friend has cracked.


あなたは誕生日にコンパクトディスクをもらうでしょう。You will get a CD set on your birthday.
私はコンパスで円を描いた。I drew a circle with compasses.



私は博覧会のコンパニオンに応募した。I applied to be an attendant at the exposition.








コンビニでは何でも買えます。I am able to buy anything in a convenience store.

私はコンビニエンスストアの近くに住んでいます。I live close to a convenience store.




あ、またコンピューターが固まっちゃったよ。Argh! My computer froze up again.















































良い所：様々なコンボで自由に敵を料理する楽しさ。Good points: The pleasure of disposing of enemies with a variety of combos.










コンマで文を次々につないではいけない。Don't run on your sentences with commas.


ゴーグルは砂ぼこりから目を守ってくれる。The goggles protect your eyes from dust.






ほとんどの旅行者はニューヨークのゴーストタウンに立ち寄らなかった。Few of the trippers called in at the ghost town of New York.



彼はボールをゴールに蹴り入れた。He kicked the ball into the goal.自転車はゴールに向かって走っている。The bicycle is racing to finish.彼女が最後にゴールした人です。She was the last to cross the finishing line.
ボブは１着でゴールインした。Bob reached the finish line first.





今、７日間の「ゴールデンウィーク」の休日です。Now we have a seven-day Golden Week holiday.








台所からゴキブリを駆除しなければならない。I must rid my kitchen of cockroaches.
それは典型的なゴシック式教会です。It is a typical Gothic church.











タイヤはゴムと路面の摩擦によってすり減る。Tires wear down because of friction between the rubber and the road surface.

ココは普通のゴリラではない。Koko is not an ordinary gorilla.

テニスとゴルフが好きですね。I like playing tennis and golf.
私はそのゴルファーの腕前に驚いた。I marveled at the golfer's skill.


あそこは会員制のゴルフクラブだ。That's an exclusive golf club.



私はクラブかゴルフ場で時たま彼に出会う。I meet him on occasions at the club or at the golf links.




サーカスで、商品としておもちゃを配っている。Circuses offer toys for prizes.



















サーバーがダウンしてて、メールチェックできない。I can't check my mail. The server is down.

あの店はサービスが良い。That store gives good service.このサービスは一時的にご利用いただけません。This service is temporarily out of order.先ごろのサービス上の不備について釈明したかった。We wanted to explain the recent service failure.







このビーチはサーファーにはパラダイスだ。This beach is a paradise for surfers.
彼はサーフィンにすっかり夢中だ。He is really crazy about surfing.







ウィンブルドンでは、現在、サーブを判定するための特別な電子機器がある。At Wimbledon there are now special electronic machines to judge the serves.





























あの若者はサイクリングに夢中である。That young man is very keen on cycling.

図表２を見ると、これらの貿易サイクルのいくつかは非常に短期のものであることが判明する。A glance at Chart 2 will reveal that some of these trade cycles are very short-lived.













近年では人間心理の謎を扱うサイコホラーも人気である。Psycho-horror films dealing with the mysteries of human psychology are popular these days.










このサイズは私には大きすぎます。This size is too large for me.
サイダーをください。I'd like some cider, please.

顧客を惹きつけるようなサイトを作りたいと思っています。I want to build my corporate site to attract customers.


こうじはついていた。交通事故でたった車のサイドをちょっとかすっただけだった。Kouji was lucky; his traffic accident left only a minor scratch on the side of his car.








この間、気づいたらサイドブレーキ上げっぱなしで運転してた。自分でも、よく車動いてたと思うけど。The other day I noticed I was driving around with the parking brake on. It's a wonder the car could even move.



サイドミラーがまっすぐになっていない。My side mirror is out of alignment.















葉子と私はサイレンが近くで止まるのを聞いて、何が起きたのかとすぐに飛び出していこうとした。When Yoko and I heard the sirens stop nearby, we quickly decided to go check it out.







もし彼女に気付いていたら、私はサインをもらっていただろう。If I had noticed her, I would have got her autograph.あなたはそのサインが消えるまでタバコを慎むように求められている。You are asked to refrain from smoking until the sign is switched off.







サウジアラビアは石油に非常に恵まれている。Saudi Arabia is very rich in oil.



軟木の絶縁された部屋およびよいヒーターはサウナのための絶対必要である。An insulated soft-wood room and a good heater are the absolute necessities for a sauna.
ヘヴィなサウンドが求められている。Heavy sound is being looked for.



















「ペット・セミタリー」は真に迫ったサスペンス映画だった。"Pet Sematary" was a real cliff-hanger.







サタンのこうした行いを神がなぜ許しているのか、その理由は聖書のヨブ記で説明されている。Why God allows these sorts of actions by Satan is explained in the Book of Job in the Bible.
健は毎日サッカーをする。Ken plays soccer every day.






サツにハジキを持っているのをみつかるなよ。Don't let the cops find a heater on you.


女性が安心して働くためには、生涯の仕事の機会を増やし、フレックスタイム、サテライトオフィス、託児所の充実などが必要である。Career opportunities, flex-time, satellite offices, and more childcare facilities are required to make women at home join the work force.














サハラは広大な砂漠です。The Sahara is a vast desert.
サハラ砂漠は世界で最も大きい砂漠です。The Sahara is the largest desert in the world.






でも典型的なサバンナ気候の国で、涼しい気温に恵まれているのです。But it's a typical savannah country, and we enjoy cooler temperatures.




夕方にまたサファリに出掛け、夜はカバの声を聞きながら眠りについた。In the evening I went out on safari again, at night I fell asleep hearing the grunting of the hippos.

サファリパークにいらっしゃるなら５番のバスです。If you are going to the safari park, take the No.5 bus.




























サブマリンのペリスコープが水中からにょっきり突き出ていた。The submarine's periscope was sticking right out of the water.













彼らはいつも学校をサボっています。They always escape from school.



彼はあなたをすすんでサポートします。He is voluntarily supporting you.




８月１０日からサマースクールに行きます。I am going to summer school from August 10.

私は先週サマータイムが終わったことを忘れていました。I forgot that the daylight saving time ended last week.







サミットが開かれるのはこの部屋です。It is in this room that the summit will be held.




もう少しサラダはいかがですか。Would you like some more salad?
私はサラダオイルを１びん買った。I bought a bottle of salad oil.

かしこまりました。サラダバーはあちらです。All right, sir. The salad bar is over there.






彼はサラリーだけによって仕事を選びます。He chooses his job only in term of salary.
なあに、しがないサラリーマンですよ。Me? I'm a plain old salaryman.













鶏卵生産におけるサルモネラ汚染を防止することが必要です。It is essential to prevent salmonella contamination in hen egg production.



落ち着いた雰囲気のサロンでゆったりとした時間をお楽しみください。Please enjoy a calm time in a relaxed atmosphere beauty salon.













度の強いサングラスが欲しいのですが。I need a good pair of sunglasses.








彼はサンタクロースの扮装をした。He got himself up as Santa Claus.





あんな底の厚いサンダル履いてたら、転んで捻挫しちゃうぞ。You're going to fall and sprain your ankle wearing sandals with such huge platforms.


弟はサンディエゴに住んでいます。My brother is living in San Diego.



サンドイッチだったらどれくらいかかりますか。How long would a sandwich take?








サンバはブラジルのリズムですね。Samba is a Brazilian rhythm, isn't it?




この鳩はサンフランシスコからニューヨークまで飛びました。This pigeon flew from San Francisco to New York.



ＤＮＡのサンプルを貯える事は許されるべきではない。It shouldn't be permitted to store samples of DNA.








ざあざあ雨が降った。It poured down.










ザンビアはアフリカの国だからあなた方は気候がとても暑いのではないかと思うかも知れませんね。It's an African country, so you may think the climate is very hot.








シークレット・サービスは大統領の安全に責任を負わなくてはならない。The Secret Service has to answer for the safety of the president.











まもなく野球シーズンが始まる。The baseball season opens before long.苺は今がシーズンだ。Strawberries are in season now.私はＸ―ファイル４シーズンを見ました。I watched the 4th season of X-files.

シーズンオフはホテルは割安だ。Hotels are cheaper in the off season.



試合は終始一点を争うシーソーゲームだった。The game was one point back and forth the whole game.



彼女はベッドにきれいなシーツを敷いた。She put clean sheets on the bed.


父が誕生日に数枚のＣＤを買ってくれました。My father bought some CDs for my birthday.

その車は３列のシートがあるので８人の客を運ぶことが出来る。The car has three rows of seats and is capable of carrying eight passengers.






シートベルトを締めてください。Fasten your seat belt, please.





ここは、この地域では飛び抜けて最高のシーフードレストランだ。This is by far the best seafood restaurant in this area.


シーラカンスは深海に生息する。The coelacanth inhabits the deep sea.










私達みんなは芝居を見るためにシアターへ行った。All of us went to the theater to see a play.
神戸はシアトルの姉妹都市です。Kobe is a sister city of Seattle.








肌にシェーバーを滑らす度に確かに滑らか〜な感じがします。It certainly feels smooth when you run the shaver over your skin.






私達の市場シェアは２０％です。We have a 20% share of the market.




そのシェパードは、びっこをひきながら道を歩いていた。The German Shepherd was limping down the street.

シェフが腕によりをかけて作った料理というわりにはたいしたことない味だね。It doesn't taste all that great for all the effort and technique the chef put into it.

ガブリエルは熱いスープとシェリー酒を少し飲んだだけだった。Gabriel took nothing but the hot soup and a little sherry.



戦争を恐れてシェルターが作られてきた。Shelters have been built in fear of war.






シカゴのあたりでは雨が降っていました。It was raining around Chicago.
彼はシガーを灰皿で押しつぶして消し、立って行こうとした。He stubbed out his cigar in the ashtray and stood up to leave.










すぐにシスターが参ります。Our sister will be with us soon.

このシステムには明らかな欠陥がある。This system has obvious defects.




























私の特製うさぎシチューです。It's my special recipe, rabbit stew.

今夜どこか行くの？シックに決めてるじゃない。Going somewhere tonight? Look at you - all dressed up like that.















シドニーは天然の美しい港がある。Sydney has a beautiful natural harbor.



シナモンドーナツを３個おねがいします。Could I have three cinnamon donuts?
映画のシナリオみたいですね。That's something like a movie scenario.





シニックと言うのは何だ？あらゆる物の価格を知って、いかなる物の価値を知らぬ人間である。What is a cynic? A man who knows the price of everything, and the value of nothing.


















労働集約・資本集約を超えて、時代はナレッジ・インテンシブへと大きくシフトしている。Surpassing labour intensive, capital intensive, the age has shifted greatly to knowledge intensive.由紀子ちゃんは、明日以降、火木金のシフトで出勤してくれればいいから。It's OK if Yukiko can do the Tuesday, Thursday and Friday shifts from tomorrow.







彼はシベリア経由でヨーロッパへ行った。He went Europe by way of Siberia.

上に示した数値はホブソンのシミュレーションによる結果である。The numerical values shown above derive from Hobson's simulation.







ひとつのヒントに目を輝かせた女の子は、可愛らしい猫型のシャープペンシルをノートに走らせていく。The girl, her eyes shining brightly from that single hint, makes her cute cat-motif automatic pencil run across her notebook.




「ちょっと・・・サンプル」シャーレに一部を保存した。"Let me get a sample," and she transferred part to a petri dish.






シャッターを押すだけで、最新のテクノロジーがキレイな一枚に仕上げます。Just press the button and a clear photo will be produced by the latest technology.
お前が大声出すから、せっかくのシャッターチャンスを逃しちゃったよ。You just made me miss the perfect shot when you hollered.

翌月にはＮＨＬ初シャットアウトゲームを記録しＮＨＬスーパーゴーリーとしての才能を見せた。The next month he achieved his first NHL shutout and showed the talent of an NHL super goalie.




あなたのシャツは洗う必要がある。Your shirts need to be washed.




彼は９時発ニューヨーク行きのシャトル便に飛び乗った。He caught the nine o'clock shuttle to New York.

すみません。ニューヨーク市外にいくシャトルバスはどのくらいの間隔で走っていますか。Excuse me. How often do shuttle buses run to downtown New York?







このシャフトはピストンとつながっている。This shaft links with a piston.
彼等はシャベルで除雪していた。They were shoveling the snow away.


子供たちがシャボン玉を吹いている。The children are blowing bubbles.





彼女は毎朝シャワーを浴びます。She takes a shower every morning.





ガラス製のシャンデリアがテーブルの真上に下がっていた。A crystal chandelier was hanging over the table.
いつものカクテルは言うまでもなく、フランス製のシャンペンも出された。We were served French champagne, not to mention the usual cocktails.

このシャンプーを買うと、素敵なヘアブラシがついてきます。This shampoo comes with a nice hair brush.
シュークリームを１ダース下さい。I want a dozen cream puffs.

ラケット１本とテニスシューズを送ってください。Send me a racket and my tennis shoes.

僕達はマックがすばらしいシュートを決めるのを見た。We saw Mac make a fantastic shot.




















これから始まるショーをどうぞごゆっくり。We hope you will enjoy the show.
彼女はショーウインドウをちょっとのぞいてみた。She looked in at the show window.




怪我をしたためにショートの選手は出場できなくなった。An injury put the shortstop out of action.


デスクトップにショートカットを作成しておいたほうが、いろいろ便利だと思います。I think you will find it convenient to put a short-cut on the desktop.
私はイチゴと言うとショートケーキを連想する。I associate strawberries with shortcake.


ショートスカートはすでに時代遅れである。Short skirts have already gone out.







迷彩のショートパンツを履く場合、上は何色のTシャツが合いますか？When you wear camo shorts, what colour t-shirt goes with that?



ショービジネスというのは本当に華やかだ。Show business is really glamorous.







我が社のショールームは若い女性に大人気だった。Our showroom made a hit with young ladies.



彼の息子が死んだという知らせは、とてもショッキングだった。The news of his son's death was a great shock.
私はその悲しい知らせを聞いてショックを受けた。I was shocked at the sad news.


シャラポアのショットはとても早いのですが・・・早い球というのはその分早くボールが返ってくるんです。Sharapova's shots are very fast but...a fast ball means that it will come back that much faster.





地下はショッピング街です。There is a shopping district underground.

ええ、いちばん近いショッピングセンターから目と鼻の先よ。Yes. And it's only a hop, skip and a jump to the nearest mall.
ショッピングバッグに入れていただけますか。Could you put it in a shopping bag for me?

一番近いショッピングモールはどこにありますか。Where's the nearest shopping mall?
一番近いアンティークショップはどこにあるか教えていただけますか。Can you tell me where the nearest antique shop is?
ショパンはピアノに向かってすわり、ひき始める。Chopin sits at the piano and begins to play.


革のショルダーバッグを探しているのですが。I'm looking for a leather shoulder bag.



その人気テレビシリーズが発端となって、秋には二つのショー番組が誕生することになっている。That popular television series is going to spin off two new shows in the fall.

こんなシリアスな芝居を見るのは初めてで貴重な経験ができました。That was the first time I had seen such a serious play so it was a valuable experience.






シリウスを回る軌道は楕円形である。The orbit around Sirius is elliptical.



アルミニウム、マグネシウム、シリコンなどの粉末が爆発する。Powders of aluminium, magnesium, silicon, etc. explode.






この服のシルエットが気に入ってるの。I like the silhouette these clothes give me.

これはシルクの感触だ。This feels like silk.


ガラス製品はペルシャからシルクロードを通ってきました。Glasswork came from Persia by way of the Silk Road.













アクが出なくなったら清潔な瓶にシロップを戻し冷蔵庫で保存します。When the scum stops appearing pour the syrup back into a clean bottle and keep it in the fridge.



あの女の子は信頼できるカントリーシンガーだ。That girl is a true blue country singer.

シンガポールでは通りにゴミを散らかすと罰金を課せられる。They fine you in Singapore if you throw trash in the streets.

恵子が手際よく食器を重ねて、シンクへ運んでゆく。Keiko deftly piles up the cutlery and takes them to the sink.



職場でOutlookのスケジュールを使用していますが、ＰＤＡを購入しシンクロさせたいと考えています。I use Outlook's scheduler at work and I think I'd like to buy a PDA and synchronize them.日本シンクロ界の悲願である金には、あと一歩で届かなかった。The 'gold' yearned for by the Japanese synchronized swimming world was not quite reached.





１泊５０ドルのシングルのお部屋がございます。We have a single for 50 dollars per night.

ウィンブルドンで行われる男子と女子のシングルス決勝は、１年で最もわくわくする、そして最も人気のあるスポーツ行事の１つである。The men's and women's singles finals at Wimbledon are among the most exciting and popular sports events of the year.

彼は、上手いよ！シングルプレーヤーだ。He's good. His handicap is in the single digits.












彼らの研究では患者たちがセラピーの期間中にこのシンドロームを克服したかどうかが明確に述べられていない。It is not clearly stated in their study if the patients overcame this syndrome during the therapy.
シンナーなどの常習性のある物をしてると言う事は、更正する可能性が低いと思います。I think that, as he's using addictive substances like thinner, the chance of rehabilitation is low.
シンバルがジャーンと鳴った。The cymbals clashed.
オーナーたちは組合のシンパを一人残らず解雇するために首切り役を投入した。The owners brought in a hatchet man to fire all the union sympathizers.



彼のすぐれたシンフォニーが演奏された。His great symphony was performed.




以上のように、実にシンプルな誰でも出来るノウハウで十分な利益と顧客は確保できるのです！As shown above, it is possible to obtain ample profit and customers with truly simple know-how that anyone can do!






ハトは平和のシンボルである。The dove is a symbol of peace.




エメット理論を検討する前に、「内部シンメトリー」という概念を明確にしておかなければならない。Before we examine Emmet's theory, we must clarify the concept of 'internal symmetry.'


日本は昨年５％の実質ＧＮＰ成長を達成した。Japan achieved a real GNP growth of 5% last year.

兄は私にジーパンをくれた。My brother gave me a pair of jeans.

彼は地雷の上を運転して、彼のジープは爆裂した。He drove over a land mine and his jeep blew up.



私は日曜日はたいていジーンズをはいている。I usually wear jeans on Sunday.




ジェスチャーは彼らに使われていない。Gestures are not used by them.
ＡＢＣニュースによれば、もう一機のジェット旅客機が、中近東でハイジャックされたそうだ。According to the ABC news, another jet-liner was hi-jacked in the Middle East.

宙返りするジェットコースターに乗ったら、気持ち悪くなっちゃった。I got sick riding the roller coaster with the loop-the-loop.




ジェット機は離陸する時に轟音を立てた。The jet roared during takeoff.












やがてジェラシーは叙事詩の１ページを飾り。Jealousy embellishes a page of the epic.




ジェントルマンとは独立した財産のある人のことだ。A gentleman is a man of independent means.







道は急斜面をジグザグにのぼっていた。The path zigzagged up the steep slope.













このジッパーはきつい。This zipper doesn't zip smoothly.





ジブの裏帆とラダーを使って、バックしながら船首を進みたい方向に向けました。Using the rudder and the jib with the wind behind it we backed up, turning the bow to the direction we wanted to go.


私は週に２、３回、ジムで運動している。I work out in a gym two or three times a week.


このふたはあのジャーのふただ。This lid belongs with that jar.





そのジャーナリストはいわゆる国際人だ。The journalist is what you call a cosmopolitan.
彼はジャーナリズム界の大物です。He is a big man in journalism.











ジャガイモはジャカルタからオランダ人によって伝えられました。Potatoes were introduced by the Dutch from Jakarta.
彼女は子猫をジャガーと名付けた。She called the kitten "Jaguar".


このジャケットの色違いはありますか。Do you have this jacket in different colors?






時計を確認すると、２１時ジャスト。Checking the clock it was exactly 21:00.
大丈夫、君ならジャストフィット間違いないよ。No worries, I'm sure it will be a perfect fit for you!


ジャズが使う音符は、バッハが使ったのと同じだJazz uses the same notes that Bach used.



私は舞踏家が職業で、ジャズダンスを教えています。I am a dancer by trade and I teach jazz dance.





















ジャパン・タイムズにはその話は載っていない。The Japan Times was carrying the story.






彼はジャマイカに住居を構えた。He took up residence in Jamaica.

イチゴはジャムに作られる。Strawberries are made into jam.





私たちはジャンクション１１で高速道路を出た。We left the motorway at junction 11.


この船はジャングルを通りぬける。This boat goes through the jungle.






彼はボールを取ろうとジャンプした。He jumped to get a ball.





このジャンルの曲が好きです。I like this kind of music.


彼女はオレンジからジュースを絞り出そうとした。She tried to express juice from the orange.彼が明日時間通りに来るかどうかジュース一本賭けない？I wonder whether he'll make it here on time tomorrow. Want to bet a can of juice on it?

とうとうジューンブライドになるのですね。At last, you are going to be a June bride.















多くの国際会議がジュネーブで開かれてきた。Many international conferences have been held in Geneva.

この社はジュピターにささげられたものだ。This shrine is sacred to Jupiter.




彼は、ジョーカーを持っています。He has the Joker.
君のジョークはひどすぎた。You went too far in your joke.










ええと、私はジョギングはよいと思う。Well, I think jogging is good.

夏はビールのジョッキ大に限るよ。Nothing beats a big glass of beer in summer.















このジンをトニック水で割ろう。Let's qualify this gin with tonic water.







ジンバブエはかつてイギリスの植民地だった。Zimbabwe was once a colony of Britain.

スーツを着て彼は目立っていた。He was conspicuous in his suit.
私は彼にスーツケースを運ばせた。I made him carry the suitcase.
私はスーパーでよく彼女と会う。I often run into her at the supermarket.ＯＤＳスーパーアロイは粉末冶金技術を伴うメカニカルアロイ法により製造されます。ODS super alloy is produced by the mechanical alloy method following powder metallurgy.












「スーパーソニック」は世界制覇すると思うかい。Do you think the Supersonics will go all the way to the world championships?





スーパーボウルを見るために会社を休んでいた事もありました。I've sometimes taken time off work to watch the Super Bowl.
スーパーマーケットへ行ってきたところです。I have been to the supermarket.

スーパーマンはロケットと同じくらいに速く飛ぶ。Superman flies as fast as a rocket.






このスープは、しょっぱ過ぎて飲めないよ。This soup is too salty to eat.









スイートルームのあまりの豪華さにウットリした。We were entranced by the fabulous suite.


これはスイス製ですか。Is this made in Switzerland?
この仕掛けはスイッチで動く。This device is actuated by a switch.



大丈夫、キミなら出来る！自分を信じて！キミはもう既に立派なスイマーなのよ！It'll be fine, you can do it! Trust yourself! You are already a splendid swimmer!

このスイミングスクールの毎月の月謝はいくらですか。How much is the monthly fee of this swimming school?





彼のスイングは実に見事だ。He has a perfect swing.

彼は肩で押してそのスイングドアを開けた。He shouldered the swing door open.

スウェーデンには独自の言語がある。Sweden has a language of its own.


茶色のスエードの上着は、どんなのがあるかな、サイズは４０なんだけど。What do you have in brown suede jackets, size 40?

あなたのサロン風のスカートが好きです。I like your sarong style skirt.
このスカーフは手触りが柔らかくてすべすべしている。This scarf feels soft and smooth.





スカイダイビングに挑戦したいんです。I'd like to try out skydiving.









スカッシュをしたいのですが。I'd like to play a game of squash.












あなたは毎年何回スキーに行きますか。How many times a year do you go skiing?あなたのスキーを逆Ｖ字型にしなさい。Place your skis in an inverted V.


今度そのスキーツアーに参加したら、５回参加したことになります。I will have joined the ski tour five times when I join it again.


あのプロのスキーヤーは離れ業をしながら山をおりるのが好きだった。The professional skier liked to "hot-dog" down the mountain.


ようやく辿りついたスキー場・・・雪が雨に変わっていた。We finally arrived at the ski hill... the snow had turned into rain.




その犬をスキッパーと呼ぼう。Let's call the dog Skipper.
「さぁ、私のようにホップ、スキップ、ジャンプ」小さい白いウサギが言いました。"Let's play Hop Skip And Jump like me," said the little white rabbit.







奴が俺をわなにはめてスキャンダルにおとしいれた。He set me up for the scandal.



スキューバダイビングをやったことがありますか。Have you ever tried scuba diving?




Windows Media Playerの新しいスキンを入手し、プレーヤーの外観を変えてみましょう。Why don't you try out getting a new Windows Media Player skin and changing the player's look?


子供とのスキンシップを大切にしないとね。Physical contact with a child is very important.





「１７歳の時スクーナー船で地中海を航海したわ」彼女はゆっくりと注意深く言う。"I sailed around the Mediterranean in a schooner when I was seventeen," she recited slowly and carefully.


人物画を描けるスクールを探しています。I'm looking for a school where I can paint portraits.
僕はあの学校のスクールカラーがすきではない。I don't like the atmosphere of that school.

スクールバスが学生を駅から大学構内まで運んでいる。A school bus ferries students between the station and the campus.














この車はもうすぐスクラップだ。This car will soon have to go for scrap.



スクラムはラグビーの特徴だ。Scrums are a feature of Rugby football.





それらの単語は彼のコンピューター・スクリーンに現れたのだった。The words would appear on his computer screen.










網がスクリューに絡まった。The net got entangled in the propeller.
スクリュードライバーをください。Could I have a screwdriver?






スケーターはこまのようにくるくる回った。The skater spun around like a top.

とても寒いからスケートが出来るよ。It's cold enough to skate.


なんで俺だけが文句言われるのかな。一罰百戒のつもりでスケープゴートにされたんじゃかなわないよ。Why am I the only one they complain about? They're just making an example out of me and using me as a scapegoat.





スケジュールがバッティングしなきゃ大丈夫です。The schedule's fine as long as nothing clashes.
次郎は富士山をスケッチした。Jiro made a sketch of Mt. Fuji.
できたらスケッチブックと４Ｂの鉛筆も買ってきておいてね。まだそんなに高い画材はいらないよ。If you can, get a sketchbook and a 4B pencil. You don't need such expensive art materials yet.











それが今迄のところ一番いいスコアだ。It's the best score up to now.





ジョンはスコッチを、メアリーはバーボンを飲む。John drinks Scotch and Mary bourbon.




イギリスの気候はスコットランドの気候よりも温暖である。The climate of England is milder than that of Scotland.

「これは・・・」「軍手とスコップ。園芸部基本道具のひとつだよ」"This is ..." "Working glove and trowel. One of a gardening club's basic tools."



スターの野球選手はよくサインを求められる。Star baseball players are often asked for autographs.














子供らは二人一組になったスタートした。The children started in pairs.


彼はいわばスタープレーヤーだ。He is, so to speak, a star player.










ビキニスタイルの美少女は浜辺では目を見張らすものだった。The pretty girl in the bikini was an eye-opener on the beach.ダンスはスタイルをよくするのにいい。Dancing is good for the figure.




私達はそのスタジアムに行き、そこでエキサイティングな試合を楽しんだ。We went to the stadium, where we enjoyed the exciting game.スタディアムは溢れんばかりの人込みだった。The stadium was overflowing with people.

夜にスタジオでは電気をつけない。I don't switch on the light in my studio at night.









この計画は５０人の訓練されたスタッフを必要とする。This project will involve 50 trained staff members.








僕がスタメンになるのは難しかった。It was difficult for me to become a starting player.










お客が雑な作りのスタンドに座って靴を磨いてもらっている。A customer is having his shoes shined on a slapped-together stand.私は大きな電気スタンドは嫌いだ。I don't like big desk lamps.次のスタンドまでどのくらいありますか。How far is the next gas station?






その歌手は放送室でスタンバイしていた。The singer was standing by in the studio.



スチームショベルは片方に三階建て、もう片方に四階建ての地下を掘りました。The steam shovels dug down three stories on one side and four stories on the other side.















１人の乗客が気を失ったが、スチュワーデスが彼の意識を回復させた。A passenger fainted, but the stewardess brought him around.





ステーキの焼き方はどうなさいますか。How would you like your steak?

そのスペースシャトルは、宇宙ステーションに行くために設計された。The space shuttles were designed to go to a space station.

ジョンはステージの上で「イマジン」を歌った。John sang "Imagine" on the stage.REM睡眠中の脳波は起きている時と同じ脳波であり、夢を見るステージです。The brain waves during REM sleep are the same as when awake, and it's the stage when you have dreams.














彼は「壊れ物注意」のステッカーを荷物に貼り付けた。He attached a "Fragile" label to the package.
彼女は手にステッキをずっと持っている。She always keeps a stick in her hand.



焦らずに、目の前のステップを一つ一つのぼっていきたい。I want to take things one step at a time without getting flustered. I want to live in the moment.ダンサーたちは楽団の音楽にあわせてステップを踏んだ。The dancers timed their steps to the music of the band.





ジャックとベティは１ヶ月前からステディだ。Jack and Betty have been going steady for a month.


私はあの店で新しいステレオを買った。I got a new stereo at that store.











「あの人たちは、またストをやるんだろうか」「どうもそうらしいね」"Will they go on strike again?" "I'm afraid so."
彼はストーブで体を暖めた。He warmed himself at the stove.


今回発売されたアルバムは、ストーリー仕立てになっていて力作だ。Her latest album is a tour de force. It even has a storyline.






どうぞわたしにＸＹＺストアへ行く道を教えて下さい。Please tell me the way to the XYZ store.





このストッキングはとても高い。These stockings are very dear.
一生懸命磨きました。困ったのは、意外と低級宝石のストックがないことです。I polished for all I was worth. The trouble is that my stock of low-grade gems was surprisingly low.








厳しい資金不足で計画はストップしている。An acute lack of funds is holding up the plan.
これは日本製のストップウオッチ。This is a stop watch made in Japan.






労働者達はストライキ中です。The workers are on strike.
バッターのカウントはツーストライクツーボール。The batter has two balls and two strikes on him.





これらのストラテジーがエメット理論と抵触するかもしれないというのが、彼らの仮説である。Their hypothesis is that these strategies may come into conflict with Emmet's theory.


これはメイン・ストリートまでしか行かないんですが、そこから３１番に乗れますから。It only goes as far as Main Street, but you can get the Number 31 there.













そんな風に言うと４語で済むところが２７語も必要になるし、長たらしい表現の伝えるストレートな内容は理解してもらえるだろうが、説得力は失われてしまうであろう。That would be twenty-seven words instead of four, and while the bare message of the longer statement would be understood, the persuasive force would be lost.このクラブはゲイ、それともストレートですか。Is the club gay or straight?



ストレスを避けることが必要です。It's necessary to avoid stress.




このことは水の入ったグラスにストローを入れて見れば容易にわかる。You can see this easily if you put a straw into a glass of water.




私は全ての苺類が好きですが、特にストロベリーが好きです。I love all berries, but especially strawberries.
ここでストロボ撮影をしてもいいですか。Is it all right to use a flash here?

ストロンチウム９０：ストロンチウムの放射性同位体の一つ；放射性降下物に含まれ人体に有害。Strontium 90: One of the radioisotopes of strontium; part of radioactive fallout, harmful to human health.
私たちはあらかじめスナックを用意しておいた。We prepared snacks beforehand.


彼女は旅行中に撮ったスナップを見せてくれた。She showed me the snaps which she had taken during her journey.









人々の一団はスノーブーツを履いて出発した。A group of people started off in snow boots.










艇長はボートレースの最後のラップで、乗組員をおだてて、レースを勝ち取るため、スパートをかけた。The coxswain egged his crewmen on, and made a winning spurt at the last lap of the regatta.



その男性はスパイとして逮捕された。The man was arrested as a spy.


シューズ・・スパイクのあるものを禁止しているコースが多いので気をつけましょう。Shoes ... many courses ban shoes with spikes, so take care.



この店はいろいろなスパイスを扱っている。This store has a variety of spices.
私の好きな曲はハングリー・スパイダーです。My favorite song is Hungry Spider.




スパゲッティのソースにバジルを加えるのが好きです。I like to add basil to season my spaghetti sauce.



どの学校であっても、体操着は、スパッツやハーフパンツばかりだ。In schools everywhere sports-wear is all spats and shorts.

そのスパナを取ってくれ。Hand me the wrench.



現在完了は、過去〜現在という長いスパンを表現するものです。The present perfect expresses the long span from past to present.


おかしいな、スピーカーがガーガーいってるよ。That's funny. The speaker is crackling.

私たちは彼にスピーチを頼んだ。We called on him for a speech.



スピードの出し過ぎは危険です。Driving too fast is dangerous.
どの官庁もお役所主義にはまり込まないで、仕事のスピードアップをはかるという点において問題があるようだ。Every government office seems to have problems in expediting matters without entanglement in its red tape system.




スピードメーターは時速９５マイルを指していた。The speedometer was indicating 95 mph.
















「もしおまえが私のなぞなぞ答えられたら、私はおまえを無事に通してやる」とスフィンクスは言った。"I will let you pass safely," the Sphinx said, "if you can answer my riddle."




この赤ん坊はまだスプーンが使えない。The baby cannot use a spoon yet.







スプリンクラーが芝生の一条の水を噴出している。The sprinkler is shooting out a stream of water onto the grass.







何があっても海に行く！タオルに、海パン。虫除けスプレー！No matter what I'm going to the beach! Towel and trunks. Insect repellant!




このあたりは駐車できるスペースがほとんどない。There are few places to park around here.





スペースシャトルは地球についても私たちに知識を与えてくれる。The space shuttle informs us about the earth, too.









どうしてスペイン語を学ぶのですか。What do you learn Spanish for?




虹の中にスペクトルの色を見る事が出来る。You can see the colors of the spectrum in a rainbow.



スペシャルというのはどんな味ですか。What does the special taste like?





彼はスペリングコンテストで一等賞を取った。He won first prize at the spelling contest.
あなたのお名前のスペルをお願いします。Could you spell your name, please?





スポークスマンはその報告は真実であると確認した。The spokesman confirmed that the report was true.
ところであなたはどんなスポーツが好きですか。Well, what sports do you like?



あそこのスポーツカーを見なさい。Look at the sports car over there.

あなたはこのスポーツクラブの会員なのだから、ここのルールに従わなければいけない。Since you're a member of this sports club, you'll have to conform to its rules.







スポーツマンにとって視力が悪いのは不利だ。Poor eyesight is a handicap to a sportsman.




インキ補充瓶のキャップを外し、スポイトでインキを吸い上げ、マーカーの吸収体へ適量、滴下してください。Remove the cap from the ink refill bottle, fill the dropper with ink, and drip an appropriate amount onto the marker's core.


ここが地元の人気スポット？Is this one of the local hot spots?






ホームステイをするにはスポンサーの面接を受けなくてはならない。In order to qualify for the homestay you must have an interview with the sponsors.
スポンジは水を吸い込む。A sponge absorbs water.



あんなドレスが着られたらいいんだけど。もっとスマートにならなくちゃ。I'd love to be able to wear a dress like that. But I'll have to lose some weight first.






課長が我々に対して、あれこれとうるさく言うのを止めた途端に、何もかもがスムーズに行き始めた。As soon as our manager got off our backs, everything started to go off without a hitch.



私たちの町は、スモッグで覆われていた。Our city was covered with smog.
パイをスライスにしてください。Cut the pie into slices.


彼はそのスライドを顕微鏡で見た。He looked at the slide under the microscope.年金の額は原則として前年の物価変動にスライドして算出される。As a general rule, the pension amount is based on price changes in the previous year.

彼のスラックスはしわくちゃだ。His slacks are all wrinkled.




早く原因を見つけて、スランプを治して谷崎主任の期待にこたえないと。I've got to find the cause quickly, get out of this slump and live up to Mr. Tanizaki's expectations.
スリーサイズは個人差がある。Measurements are different from individual to individual.




このスリッパに履きかえてください。Please put on these slippers.
雪道で急ハンドルを切っちゃだめだよ。スリップしちゃうから。If you whip the steering wheel around like that on a snowy road, the car is going to go into a slide.
スリムという名の男が事故で死んだ。A man named Slim was killed in that accident.

ジャックの冒険は、多くのスリラー物の主人公の冒険よりも素晴らしい。Jack's adventures are more amazing than those of the hero in many thrillers.
スリリングなテレビゲームに熱中させられた。The thrilling video game took all my attention.
とてもスリルがあって面白かったです。It was so thrilling and real fun.
くそっ、スルーしやがった。Dammit, she completely ignored me.

スレートの小道では芝は刈り残されており、雑草も残っており、道路のそばの生け垣の外側の芝は刈っていないことが多かった。The grass was left long and weedy in the slate walk, and very often he wasn't cutting the grass on the other side of the hedge by the road at all.




このスローガンは国民を奮い立たせる意図で作られた。The slogan was designed to rouse the people.
彼は３分でそのスロープを滑り降りることができた。He was able to ski down the slope in three minutes.

その場面はスローモーションで再生された。The scene was shown in slow motion.
スロットを打っているうちに、あれよあれよと今の時間です。I was hitting the slots, and before I knew it, it's this time already.





彼女は英語を話し、その上スワヒリ語も話す。She speaks English and also speaks Swahili.
スワン先生は私たちの英語の先生だ。Ms. Swan is our English teacher.








あなたは私のズボンをどうしたのですか。What did you do with my pants?
このセーターは洗っても大丈夫です。This sweater will stand washing.


葛西は３０セーブをあげた。Kasai was credited with 30 saves.


夏物は今セール中です。The summer goods are now on sale.
子供たちは、あのようなセールスにだまされやすい。Children are likely to be taken in by those sales representatives.

私はセールスマンと間違われた。I was mistaken for a salesman.






Windows Vistaのセキュリティ機能を迂回する方法を研究者が公表します。Researchers announce method of circumventing Windows Vista security features.

道の向う側にセクシーな女の子が歩いている。There goes a hot little number across the street.

引用した問題ではありませんが、関係代名詞と関係副詞の使い分けを問う問題がリーディングセクションにはあります。The problem quoted isn't one, but there are problems in the reading section that ask you to distinguish relative pronouns from relative adverbs.
各種の調査では、民間セクターが政策決定にほとんど影響力をもたないことが示されている。It has been demonstrated in various studies that the private sector has little influence over policy making.
女性の権利を主張する団体はセクハラ問題を追求しています。Women's rights groups are going after sexual harassment.





今ではセックスの話をすることは顔を赤らめることではなくなった。Now talking about sex is no blushing affair.
数人から、その日の後半にあたるテクニカルセッションの中にも出席したいセッションがあるという意見が出ました。A few people mentioned they would like to attend some sessions later in the day on the Technical Session Agenda.
セッティングは整えておいたから、後はまーくんが根性見せなきゃダメだからね？I've set the stage so now you just have to show some guts, OK?
当店にはベートーベンの交響曲の録音の完全なセットがございます。We have a complete set of the recordings of Beethoven's symphonies.目覚ましを７時にセットしよう。I'll set the alarm for seven o'clock.洗髪とセットの予約をしたいのですが。I'd like to make an appointment for a shampoo and a set.




ＵＭＬのセマンティクスと表記法の詳細については、ＵＭＬドキュメントを参照してください。Please refer to the UML documentation for the detailed information about UML semantics and notation.



８月１０日から３１日までドイツでセミナーに出席するために休みます。I'm taking a leave of absence from Aug. 10 till 31 to attend a seminar in Germany.
石の塊はセメントで接合された。The blocks of stone were jointed with cement.







食堂はセルフサービスでした。The cafeteria was self-service.












彼には素晴らしいユーモアのセンスがある。He has a great sense of humour.

その映画は一大センセーションを巻き起こした。The movie created a great sensation.
ウィンブルドンには、センターコートを含めて１８の芝生コートがある。Wimbledon has eighteen grass courts, including the Center Court.

来世紀の終わりまでに海は５０センチで上昇すると予想される。Oceans are expected to rise by 50 centimeters by the end of the next century.
センチメートルは長さの単位だ。A centimeter is a unit of length.
花火の弾ける音が止むと、急に辺りが静かになる。後に残った火薬の匂いが、なんだか俺をセンチメンタルな気分にさせた。As the popping sound of the fireworks stopped, it suddenly became quiet around me. The smell of gunpowder somehow put me in a sentimental mood.
このキャンディーは８０セントです。This candy costs eighty cents.５０セントしかくれませんでしたよ。You gave me only fifty cents.


ゼネストで国中の機能が麻痺した。The general strike paralyzed the whole country.



ピーナツバターとゼリーのをください。Peanut butter and jelly, please.





空腹は最上のソースである。Hunger is the best sauce.


熱いダックスフント・ソーセージはいかが。Get your hot dachshund sausages!










みんなソックスを引っ張り上げて。Everybody pulled their socks up, yeah.

ソナタを一曲弾いてあげよう。I'll play a sonata for you.

私はソビエト連邦のことはまったく知らない。I don't know about the USSR at all.
このソファーは場所を取りすぎる。This sofa takes too much room.
スミスさんはソフトな語り口の人物です。Mr Smith is a softly-spoken person.その子はプレイステーションの新しいソフトが欲しいとだだをこねた。When the kid wanted the latest PlayStation software, he acted like a spoiled child.
彼らはソフトウエア製品を扱っている。They deal in software products.

ジェーンはソフトクリームが欲しかった。Jane wanted an ice cream cone.

彼女はソプラノ歌手として有名だ。She is famed as a soprano.




彼がソロを歌うとき、音程が外れるんじゃないかって、手に汗握っちゃうよね。When he gets up on stage to sing one of his out-of-tune solos, I get so nervous for him that I get sweaty palms.

あなたはポップソングが好きではないのですね？You don't like pop songs, do you?
ソ連軍はアフガニスタンからの撤退を開始した。The Soviet troops started to withdraw from Afghanistan.


夫の死後私はゾンビのようにふらふら歩き回っていた。After my husband's death I walked around like a zombie.




ターミナルの所を右に曲がったところです。Go out of the terminal and turn right.



タールがどうしても落ちない。このスカートはドライクリーニングに出さなきゃならないだろう。The tar won't come off. I'm going to have to take this skirt to the dry cleaner.





需要関係がタイトだ。The supply-demand balance is tight.

その本のタイトルは何ですか。What is the title of the book?
彼女はタイピストの職を得た。She got a position as a typist.
コンピューターを使うには、タイピングを覚えなくてはならない。In order to use a computer, you must learn to type.
あそこでは多くのタイプの食品や雑貨を売っている。They sell many types of food and grocery products.こういうタイプの人はおもしろくない。That type of person is dull.彼は私にをタイプ使わせてくれた。He let me use his typewriter.
私のタイプライターにさわらないで。Keep your hands off my typewriter.

オーブントースターのタイマーが鳴る。食パンがコンガリ焼けた、香ばしい匂い。The toaster-oven's timer rings. The fragrant smell of well toasted bread.
その論文は教授の誕生日とタイミングが合うように出版された。Publication of the article was timed to coincide with the professor's birthday.
チェックアウト・タイムは何時ですか。What time do we have to check out?彼はマラソンで彼女のタイムを計った。He timed her in the marathon race.ちょっとタイム。I'll take a time-out.

あらいやだ。また、タイムカードを押し忘れた。Oh, no! I forgot to punch in again!

この商品管理伝票をこのタイムスタンプに差し込むと日付と時刻が打刻されます。Place this merchandise slip into the time stamp, and the date and time will be impressed.
ジャパン・タイムズにはその話は載っていない。The Japan Times was carrying the story.
タイムマシーンを持っていると想像して見てください。Imagine that you have a time machine.

もし彼のタイムリーヒットがなかったら、私たちのチームは試合に負けていただろう。If it had not been for his timely hit, our team would have lost the game.

私はタイヤの跡を見つけた。I found the track of the tire.
屋根から落ちてきたタイルは粉々に砕けた。The tile that fell from the roof broke into pieces.
彼は１００メートル平泳ぎで世界タイ記録を出した。He tied the world record for the hundred-meter breast-stroke.
彼女はタイ国に旅立った。She set out for Thailand.

タオルは全く役に立たなかった。The towel wasn't useful at all.
彼のピンクのタキシードには、みんな笑った。We all laughed at his pink tuxedo.
そのタクシーはいきなり左に曲がった。The taxi abruptly turned left.



順を追って基本的なタグを覚えていこう。Let's learn the basic tags in order.




このタッチは彼女独自のものだ。This touch is original with her.ところで、平河代議士は、この件にどのていどタッチしているんでしょうか。By the way, I wonder how much of a hand Hiragawa MP plays in this matter?


私は少女の頃にタップダンスを覚えました。I learned to tap dance when I was a young girl.
彼はタフだから少しのことではへこたれない。He won't be easily discouraged, because he's a tough guy.


その話はここではタブーです。The topic is taboo here.





あのタレントはひっぱりだこである。That talent is much sought after.
あなたは東京タワーを訪れましたか。Did you visit the Tokyo Tower?

新しいオイル・タンカーが進水した。A new oil tanker was launched.
ガソリンがなくなったので、予備タンクに頼った。I fell back on the reserve tank when the gas ran out.









タンポンはどこにありますか。Where are the tampons?


その品物を１ダースにつき３ドルで買う。I buy the goods at $3 a dozen.
私は恋人を「ダーリン」と呼びます。I call my sweetheart darling.



毎年、ダイアリーを買うときに、どんな点を重要視していますか。When you look for an annual diary, what's the most important thing you look for?

「太っている人はみんなダイエットすべきだと思う」「あなた、私のことを言ってるの」"I think all fat people should go on a diet". "Are you referring to me"?少しは働け。ダイエットになるぞ。Do a little work! You'll lose some weight.

彼女は「戦争と平和」のダイジェストを読んだ。She read the digest of War and Peace.

ダイナマイトがドカンと爆発した。The dynamite went off with a bang.




彼はダイビングの妙手だ。He is good at diving.
ダイヤの指輪なんて身につけていないけど、私は幸せだ。I'm not wearing a diamond ring, but I'm happy.

ダイヤモンドの硬度は１０である。The hardness of diamond is 10.
ダイヤル式の電話って、ほとんど見なくなったな。You don't see many dial phones around anymore.
人目をひく記事にするために、やっぱり冒頭にパンチのきいた一言をいれなきゃ。考えていることを、ダイレクトに伝えてください。If you want to do eye-grabbing work you have to put out something punchy at the outset. Say what you mean directly.

通信販売がダイレクト・マーケティングの主な形態である。Mail order is the main form of direct marketing.


彼女は風邪でダウンした。She came down with a cold.サーバーがダウンしてて、メールチェックできない。I can't check my mail. The server is down.

ダウンタウンにたくさんのホテルがあります。There are many hotels downtown.
全角文字を含むファイル名の場合、一部のＯＳでは文字化けが生じることがありますので、ダウンロードの際に適宜ファイル名を変更してください。On some OS's you get gibberish for filenames with full-width characters so when downloading please change to a suitable filename.
ダウ平均株価は今日２ポイント値上がりした。The Dow Jones average posted a gain of two points today.





あ、ダビングできるなら私のもお願いして良いですか？Ah, if you can dub it, can I ask for a copy as well?

今、キーボードがダブって見えるぐらい酔ってます。I'm so drunk now that I'm seeing two keyboards.祭日が日曜にダブると月曜が休みになる。When a holiday falls on Sunday, we have an extra holiday on Monday.
ダブルのバスつきの部屋がいいです。I'd like a double with a bath.


大雨のためにダムが決壊した。The dam burst owing to the heavy rain.

被弾しました。ダメージは軽微です。We've taken a hit. Trivial damage.





ダンサーたちは楽団の音楽にあわせてステップを踏んだ。The dancers timed their steps to the music of the band.

ダンスはスタイルをよくするのにいい。Dancing is good for the figure.

彼はチームでダントツの好選手だ。He is by far the best player on the team.

ダンプカーと正面衝突したタクシーはぐしゃぐしゃになった。The taxi collided head-on with a dump truck and was badly crushed.

ジョージは朝にたくさんのチーズを食べた。George had a lot of cheese for breakfast.


サッカーのチームはトムによって引率される。The soccer team is led by Tom.
野球の最もすばらしいところはチームワークだ。The most wonderful thing about baseball is teamwork.
お粥も作ってきました。チンして温めるだけですから。I also brought some gruel I made. It just needs warming up.

彼女はチアガールの中で最もじょうずに踊ることができる。She can dance the best of all the cheerleaders.

彼女はドアにチェーンをかけてから、ちょっと開けた。She put the chain on the door and opened it a crack.




あなたはチェスの仕方を知っていますか。Do you know how to play chess?


チェッカー盤の黒と白の枡は交互に並んでいる。The black and white squares on a checker board are arranged alternately.
彼の稿模様のスーツとチェックのネクタイは合わなかった。His striped suit and checked tie didn't match.エンジンをチェックしましたか。Have you checked the engine?私は仕事を一つ終えるごとにリストの上でチェックする。I check off each task on my list as soon as I complete it.
あなたのチェックアウトはいつですか。When do you plan to check out?
何時からチェックインできますか。What time do you start check-in?






私はチェロとピアノに興味があります。I have an interest in cello and piano.



それじゃ、僕はチキンをもらいましょう。Well then, I'll have chicken.
左目がチクチクします。I have a prickling sensation in my left eye.
ここがちくちく痛みます。I have a pricking pain here.

チケット購入に必要な個人情報をインプットする。To purchase a ticket, you need to enter your personal details.

日本には良いサービスに対してチップを払う習慣はない。In Japan it is not customary to tip for good service.
ぼくにチビと言われてあいつはすごくあたまにきた。He got mad at me for calling him Shorty.

中国やチベットの山に住んでいる白黒の熊はパンダと呼ばれている。The black and white bears living in the mountains of China and Tibet are called pandas.

車？ああ・・・あのリムジンでしたら、私がチャーターした物ですわ。Car? Ah, if you mean that limousine, - I chartered it.


今日はとてもチャーミングだね。You look very charming today.


いやぁ！あきちゃんのチャイナ、可愛かった。あぶなく、理性のタガが外れるとこだった。Oh man! Aki in a china dress was so cute. I almost lost it then.

教室に入って席に着くのとほぼ同時に、始業を知らせるチャイムの音が鳴り響く。About the same time as he entered the classroom and arrived at his seat, the chime to announce class rings across the school.



彼は上着のチャックを掛けた。He zipped up his jacket.


一番のチャンネルで英語が、７番のチャンネルでは日本語がお聞きになれます。You can hear English on Channel 1, and Japanese on Channel 7.


オペラ歌手は自発的にチャリティーコンサートを開いた。The opera singer held a charity concert of his own accord.
テニスにチャレンジすれば？Why don't you give tennis a try?

お願いだ！俺にチャンスをくれ。Come on! Give me a chance.
私はチャンピオンと対戦した。I played against the champion.


このチュートリアルではサンプルマンガを使用して、ダウンロードを含めてマンガを見る手順に慣れていただきます。With this tutorial you will use the sample manga to become accustomed to the procedures for seeing the manga including download.



彼は歯磨きをチューブから絞り出した。He squeezed the toothpaste out of a tube.
チューリップはまもなく咲く。Tulips come into bloom soon.





私が我慢できないことは、黒板でキーキーとチョークが音を立てることだ。What I can't bear is the sound of chalk squeaking on a chalkboard.

私はジムのためにチョコを買った。I bought the chocolate for Jim.
私のお気に入りの味はチョコレートです。My favorite flavor is chocolate.




今日の新聞によれば、昨日チリで大地震があったそうだ。According to today's paper, there was a big earthquake in Chile yesterday.





生産性をあげるため新たなツールを探してます。We'll employ a new tool to increase productivity.
そのツアーには昼食は含まれていますか。Is lunch included in the tour?
彼は古いツイードの服を着ている。He is dressed in an old tweed suit.
ツインの部屋にエキストラベッドを入れてください。I'd like a twin with an extra bed.








極端に言うと、彼は、自己のテーゼに完全に自信を持っているものが発揮できる虚心坦懐さで書いてはいないのである。He does not, in short, write with the candor of a man who is completely confident of his thesis.

赤木キャプテンは練習中に足を捻挫したので、試合前にテーピングでガチガチに固めた。Captain Akagi sprained his ankle during practice, so, before the game, he taped it up until it was stiff as a board.
このテーブルを頼んだのではない。I didn't ask for a table here.

テーブルクロスは戸棚にありますよ。The tablecloth is in the cabinet.







誰が彼女たちにテーブルマナーを教えたんですか。Who taught them table manners?

君はそのコンサートをテープにとったか。Did you tape that concert?
知事は新しい橋のテープカットをした。The governor cut the tape and opened the new bridge.



このテープレコーダーは新しくない。This tape recorder is not new.

このテーマに関するほとんどの研究では、立法府の介入が悪影響をもたらしたということが示されている。It has been shown in most studies on this subject that intervention of the legislature had adverse effects.

あのテーマパークでスリルを味わった。We had a thrilling time at the theme park.


テーラーさんはパーティーに来なければよかったと思っている。Mr Taylor wishes he had not come to the party.




彼はトップハットとテールを着て本当にすてきだった。He looked really wonderful in his top hat and tails.






少女たちはティーンエイジのアイドルを追いかけた。The girls chased after their teen-age idol.
その雑誌はティーンエイジャー向けに作られたものだ。The magazine is aimed at teenagers.
ティッシュを持ってきて。Bring me the Kleenex.










彼はテキサスかどこかその辺の出身だった。He was from Texas or thereabout.



このテキストは初心者向きにできている。This text is aimed at beginners.二度と数学のテキストを忘れてはなりません。You must not forget your math textbook again.

手伝ってもらった代わりに彼にテキストブックを３冊あげた。I gave him three textbooks in exchange for his help.


わたしのテクに抜かりはないわ。My technique is without flaw.


昼食は、テクニカルグループも交えて、十二時からです。Lunch is at 12:00 to coincide with the Technical Group.





詐欺師は新たに人をだますまえに、目隠し、すなわち、人をだますテクニックを磨く。A confidence man polishes his "hood winking" or "eye-washing" techniques before bilking a new victim.


















シャッターを押すだけで、最新のテクノロジーがキレイな一枚に仕上げます。Just press the button and a clear photo will be produced by the latest technology.







私は数学のテストの結果に満足しています。I am satisfied with the result of my math test.新しいエンジンは必要なテストをすべて受けなければならない。The new engine must undergo all the necessary tests.



















１日中テニスをしていたのだから。He was playing tennis all day.
テニスウェアってなんでミニスカートなのかしら？I wonder why tennis is played in mini-skirts.

このホテルにテニスコートはありますか。Do you have a tennis court in this hotel?

ジャックダニエルはテネシーのウイスキーです。Jack Daniel's is a Tennessee whiskey.





テラスがいいのですが。Could we have a table on the terrace?




彼女は自分のテリア犬を犬品評会に出した。She entered her terrier in a dog show.
























テレックスでご返事ください。Please answer by telex.



あなたはどこでテレビを見ますか。Where do you watch television?
トムはいつもテレビゲームばかりしている。Tom is always playing video games.

彼は深夜のテレビショッピングに騙されて高い買い物をした。He was deceived by the late night television shopping network and paid high prices.

古いテレビセットが十ドルで売れた。The old television set went for 10 dollars.
一番好きなテレビタレントは誰？Who is your favourite TV star?



この都市には大きなテレビ局がある。This city has a big TV station.

君はあのテレビ塔の高さがどれくらいあるか知っていますか。Do you know how high the television tower is?


テレフォンカードはどこで手に入れることができますか。Where can I get a telephone card?

















地球側の圧政に苦しむコロニーの人々の中で、テロによる現状打破を目論む勢力が誕生。Among the people of the colonies suffering under Earth's tyranny a force emerges intending to overthrow the status quo through terrorism.

その惨事はあのテロリストのせいだ。That terrorist was to blame for the disaster.

９.１１テロ以来、世界の各地で大規模なテロリズムが発生している。Since 9.11 large scale acts of terrorism have occurred all over the world.
米国の核廃棄物、テロ攻撃の標的になりうる。America's radioactive waste may be targeted in terrorist attacks.







中国語においては「テンス」を表す場合には上述のように「助詞」か「時を表す語」または文脈によるものが多い。When indicating 'tense' in Chinese, as shown above, there are 'particles', 'time-specifying words' and also many cases where it depends on context.




私たちは暗くならないうちにテントを張った。We set up our tents before dark.






リズムは軽快でテンポは速く、その曲は若者に好まれている。The rhythm is light, and the tempo fast - that song is liked by young people.




そのデータは全く役に立たなかった。The data was completely useless.














貴社のデータベースにある私どもの住所を、下記新住所に変更してください。Please change your database to reflect the new address as follows.







アンディはけっしてデートにおくれたことはない。Andy is never late for a date.









そのトラックにはディーゼルエンジンがついている。The truck is powered by a diesel engine.


ディーラーは車を売りたがっている。The dealer wants to sell a car.




まず目に入るのは真っ赤なディスカウントドラッグストアの看板である。The first thing that hits you is the bright red discount drugstore sign.





火災で全てのコンピューターディスクが駄目になってしまった時、会社はもうお手上げの状況だった。The company faced a major interruption in business when a fire destroyed their archive of computer hard drives and optical discs.








週末にディスコに行くのはどうですか。How about going to a disco this weekend?


















ディップが辛くて、舌がヒリヒリした。The dip burned my tongue.


ディナーを食べに階下に行こう。Let's go downstairs for dinner.




私はディナーパーティーで変わった料理を出すのが好きです。I like to serve unusual foods at my dinner parties.





アメリカンフットボールではディフェンスは特別な仕事だ。In American football the defense has a specific job.



ディベートにかけては彼は誰にもひけをとらない。He is second to none when it comes to debating.




















デオキシリボ核酸は、遺伝子を作っている複雑な化学物質である。DNA is a complex chemical that makes up a gene.






















デザートは何になさいますか？What would you like for dessert?


彼女の希望はデザイナーになることだ。She hopes to become a designer.

彼のデザインは大変独創的だ。His designs are highly original.












その年の流行語はデジタルで、例えばデジタル時計、デジタルマイクロウエーブオーブンとか、デジタルペンであった。That year's buzzword was digital: digital clocks, digital microwave ovens, even digital pens.







きれいな花が受付のデスクに飾ってありました。There were beautiful flowers on the reception desk.
デスクトップがグチャグチャになってきた。My desktop has gotten cluttered.デスクトップの壁紙を犬の写真にした。I used a photo of my dog for my desktop wallpaper.


この仕事はデスクワークとは全然違います。It's nothing like desk work.










彼女は長い髪を風になびかせてデッキに立っていた。She stood on the deck with her long hair waving in the wind.

私たちはその少年のデッサンのすばらしさに驚嘆した。We were amazed at the excellence of the boy's drawings.





彼はデッドヒートの末そのレースに勝った。He won a narrow victory in the race.

















あのデパートで新しいコートを買いたい。I would like to buy a new coat at that department store.



その女優のデビューは８歳の時でした。The actress made her debut when she was eight.















彼女は中年デブだ。She's a middle-aged fat woman.






彼はデマをでっち上げた。He invented a false rumor.






デメリットが多すぎます。It has too many disadvantages.
デモに参加しようと思う。I'm going to join a demonstration.







彼は今までに９体の人型ロボットを製造していたが、その全てはデモンストレーションモデルだった。Up to now he had made nine humanoid robots but they were all demonstration models.


















デリカテッセンから火災が発生し、灰の山を残して全焼した。A delicatessen caught fire and burned down, leaving a heap of ashes.
大統領はそのデリケートな質問に答える事をやんわりと拒否した。The president politely declined to answer the delicate question.







デンヴァーとモントリオールとどっちが好きですか。Which do you like better, Denver or Montreal?私たちにはデンバーに休暇用の別荘があります。We have a holiday cottage in Denver.
アイスランドは以前はデンマークに属していた。Iceland used to belong to Denmark.






トークンを５枚ください。Give me five tokens, please.



彼女はまたトースターを壊した。She has broken the toaster again.
このトーストはよく焼けていません。This toast is not done enough.

行って帰って、トータル１週間ぐらいの予定になりそうだね。There and back, in total, it looks like being a schedule of about one week.










トーテムポールと呼ばれるこれらの柱は、崇拝の対象として、あるいは敵を驚かせるために作られたと考えられている。These poles, called totem poles, are thought to have been worshipped or constructed for frightening enemies.


このトーナメントに優勝するには、７回続けて勝たなくてはいけません。We have to win seven times in a row to win this tournament.









トイレの水が止まりません。The toilet won't stop running.





トイレットペーパーの買い置きがある。We have a stock of toilet paper.










トッピングは全部のせて下さい。I want everything on it.
その新米のセールスマンが、トップの販売実績をあげたやり方は指導員の目を見はらせた。The manner in which the new salesman made top sales level was an eye-opener to his supervisor.彼はもう少しの所でトップの部にはいるところだった。He ranked close to the top.アメリカ企業のトップは日本企業のトップに比べ何倍もの報酬をもらっている。CEO's of American corporations are paid several times their Japanese counterparts.










一難去ってまた一難、またまた難題が社長からトップダウンで降りてきたよ。No sooner had we finished working on one tough problem than the president sent us yet another straight from the top.



彼はトップハットとテールを着て本当にすてきだった。He looked really wonderful in his top hat and tails.




彼らはまもなくトップランナーに追いつくだろう。They will catch up with the lead runner soon.




え？トナーが切れてるんですか？仕方ないですね。加藤さん、すみませんが職員室に取りに行って下さい。Eh? Have we run out of toner? Oh well, sorry, but can you go the staff-room and get some, Katou?
このジンをトニック水で割ろう。Let's qualify this gin with tonic water.


今日のトピックは「北朝鮮による日本人拉致問題」です。Today's topic is "the problem of Japanese people abducted by North Korea".
私たちは新聞を毎日読まずには最新のトピックスについてゆけない。We can not follow the latest topics without reading a newspaper every day.





トマトは１ポンド単位で売られる。Tomatoes are sold by the pound.






もう一度それにトライしてみたら。Why don't you give it another try?













その農夫はトラクターを納屋に置いている。The farmer keeps his tractor in the barn.









彼はトラックに跳ね飛ばされた。He was knocked down by a truck.















私はトラブルに巻き込まれた。I was involved in the trouble.我々のコンピューター・システムには最初若干のトラブルがあったが、今は全部解決されている。Initially we had some problems with our computer system, but they've been sorted out now.




トラベラーズチェックは使えますか。Do you take travelers' checks?









２階からトランクを降ろしてきてくれませんか。Can you bring down my trunk from upstairs?この荷物をトランクにいれてもらえますか。Could you put these bags in the trunk?







トランジスターの発明は新時代を画した。The invention of the transistor marked a new era.


















トランプでごまかすのはよくないことだ。It is wrong to cheat at cards.

テッドはトランペットを吹くのが好きです。Ted likes playing the trumpet.














このミステリーのトリックは、奇想天外だ。This mystery has a plot twist that's completely novel.

























かつてサルタンが今日のトルコを統治していた。Once the Sultan ruled over what today is Turkey.




給紙トレーに紙が入ってないよ。The printer needs paper.







ジョンソンがトレードされるという噂がある。There's a rumor Johnson is going to be traded.




トレーナーは彼女の健康のことを考えるべきだ。The trainer must think of her health.そのぎらぎらしたアクセサリーは君のトレーナーには合わないよ。こっちを試してごらん。That glittering accessory doesn't go with your sweatshirt. Try this on!
私は懸命にトレーニングして試合に備えた。I prepared for the game by training hard.彼は筋肉をつけるためにトレーニングしている。He has been working out to develop his muscles.




トレーラーがその車についている。The trailer goes with the car.















ここでの問題は、社会のトレンドを概観できるような枠組みを創出することである。The question here is one of creating the framework with which we can outline the social trend.
この咳止め用トローチは苦味があるがよくきく。These cough lozenges taste bitter but they will do you much good.


誇りたかいトロイの町はついに占領された。The proud Trojan city was taken at last.








どんなトロピカルドリンクがありますか。What kinds of tropical drinks do you have?



監督は彼にトロフィーを授けた。The manager bestowed a trophy on him.

トロント国際空港に近い部屋をとっていただけませんか。Would you please reserve a room near the Toronto International Airport?








汽車はトンネルを通り抜けた。The train traversed a tunnel.


その交響曲はト短調である。The key of the symphony is G minor.


シナモンドーナツを３個おねがいします。Could I have three cinnamon donuts?







東京ドームへ行ったことがありますか？Have you ever been to the Tokyo Dome?

このドアは書斎に通じている。This door leads to the study.








ドアボーイが私を劇場に入れてくれなかった。The doorman did not permit me to enter the theater.

そのドアマンは、私が劇場に入るのを許可してくれなかった。The doorman did not permit me to enter the theater.



ドイツ語はやさしい言語ではありません。German is not an easy language.
アクセントで彼がドイツ人だとわかる。I can tell by his accent that he is German.







あまり映画は見ないほうだが、ドキュメンタリーだけははずせない。I don't watch a lot of movies, but I can't resist a good documentary.































彼にはドライなユーモアはわかりませんよ。He doesn't have a dry sense of humor.このビールはドライだ。This beer is dry.


タールがどうしても落ちない。このスカートはドライクリーニングに出さなきゃならないだろう。The tar won't come off. I'm going to have to take this skirt to the dry cleaner.






あなたはけっして注意深いドライバーではありませんよ。You are far from a careful driver.このドライバーは小さすぎて役に立たない。This screwdriver is too small to be any use.

お昼からちょっとドライブに行きましょう。Let's take a short drive this afternoon.ドライブするのはどうですか。How about going for a drive?私は新しい高速道路をドライブして楽しかった。I enjoyed driving on the new highway.
街道沿いのドライブインで昼食をとった。We had lunch at a roadside restaurant.



彼女はその狭いドライブウェイを何とかバックで通り抜けた。She managed to back up through the narrow driveway.







ホテルの部屋にドライヤーはついていますか。Are the hotel rooms supplied with hair dryers?

しかも初陣があのドラゴン退治！What's more, our first battle is to defeat that dragon!


あそこの角には以前ドラッグストアがあった。There used to be a drugstore on that corner.


契約書のドラフトをありがとうございました。Thank you for the draft of the Agreement.

この秋は、珍しくドラマをたくさん見ている。This autumn I am, unusually, watching many drama series.ナポレオンの一生はすばらしいドラマだった。Napoleon's life was a great drama.




彼女はドラムたたくことができる。She can play the drum.











初めてドリアンを食べました。I ate durian for the first time.






ドリンク料金は別ですか。Do you charge separately for drinks?
来週ハワイにいくつもりなので、銀行へ円を少しドルに替えにいかなければなりません。I'm going to Hawaii next week, so I have to go and exchange some yen for dollars at the bank.















あのドレスは彼女によく似合う。That dress really becomes her.
ドレスアップしてきてください。Please come dressed up.


彼女はドレスメーカーに洋服代を支払った。She paid the dressmaker for her dress.



サラダのドレッシングはイタリアンがいいです。I want Italian dressing on my salad.





せき止めのドロップはありますか。Do you have cough drops?









「警察だ。ちょっと署まで来てもらおうか」「な、なんで？」「こんな街中でドンパチやって罪にならないわけないだろうが！！」"This is the police. Would you mind coming down to the station?" "W-why?" "You can't think it's not a crime to go shooting guns off in the middle of town?!"








昨日のけんかを気にしてるの？意外にナイーブなのね。Are you still letting last night's fight bother you? You're surprisingly sensitive.

ナイジェリアはかつてイギリスの植民地であった。At one time Nigeria was a British colony.

普段はとてもおとなしいナイスガイだが、理性のタガがはずれると人格が豹変する二重人格。He's got a dual personality - usually a quiet "nice guy" type, but when he flips, his character changes.


私はよくテレビでナイターを見る。I often watch night games on TV.

僕は首をひねる。このポーンではなくて、こっちのナイトを・・・。I tilt my head. Not the pawn, but the knight?



旅行者は、そのナイトクラブでむしり取られた。The tourists were ripped off at the nightclub.








すみません、ナイフを落としてしまいました。I'm sorry, I dropped my knife.

私たちはエジプトといえばナイル川を思い出す。We associate Egypt with the Nile.

柔らかいウールの方が粗いウールより高価で、そのどちらともナイロン製の人工繊維より上等である。Soft wool is more expensive than coarse wool and both are superior to synthetics made of nylon.

東京駅なう。I'm at Tokyo Station now.


ナショナリズムをファシズムと同一視してはいけない。You can't equate nationalism with fascism.


























ナチズムはドイツ独特のものでしたか。Was Nazism peculiar to Germany?



















そのボルトに嵌合するナットが必要です。We need a nut that will fit that bolt.

ＮＡＴＯはそのときにボスニアのセルビア人の基地などを空爆した。At that time, NATO bombed the bases of the Bosnian Serbs.











このプロジェクトは去年あるパーティーでナプキンに書き留めた草案から生まれた。This project grew out of a sketch I made on a napkin at a party last year.生理用ナプキンはどこにありますか。Where are the sanitary napkins?

ナポレオンは権威がある男だった。Napoleon was a man of authority.















それは、いくぶんナンセンスな趣きの楽しさがあった。It was a delightful bit of nonsense.

車のナンバーを書き留められなかった。I was unable to write down the number of the car.



その会社は日本ではナンバーワンです。That company ranks No. 1 in Japan.



当社には貴社のシステムに対するニーズがありません。Your system isn't suited to our company's needs.












彼女はいつも快活でにこにこしている。She is always bright and smiling.




わからない。東京にはニックネームがある？I don't know. Is there a nickname for Tokyo?
ニッケルは５セント玉です。A nickel is a five-cent coin.












スティービー・ワンダーのニューアルバムはありますか。Do you have Stevie Wonder's new album?







私はまだニュージーランドへ行ったことがない。I have not been to New Zealand.



そのニュースに彼はびっくり仰天した。The news took him by surprise.

そのニュースキャスターは国王に拝謁した。The anchorman had an audience with the king.






































ニューヨークのお天気はどうですか。How's the weather in New York?












その言葉には微妙なニュアンスがある。This word has a subtle nuance to it.








このヌードのポスターには若者の視覚に訴えるものがある。This nude poster appeals visually to the young.


















昔の作品ですが、ネーム無しで好き放題やってしまったので無駄に長いです。This is an early work, I did it freely without storyboarding so it's unreasonably long.










その当時、どこの公立の学校にもネイティブの英語の先生などいませんでした。At the time there were no native English speakers teaching in any public school.

















私たちを招くようにネオンサインが輝いていた。The neon sign shone as if to invite us.






このネクタイはあなたのシャツによく似合ってますよ。This tie goes with your shirt.












技術者の不足が当社の発展の最大のネックだ。The shortage of engineers is the greatest bottleneck to the development of our company.


その婦人は真珠のネックレスをかけていた。The lady wore a necklace of pearls.
私のパソコンなんかへんでネットに乗れませんでした。Something was wrong with my computer and I couldn't get on-line.









ネットワーク誌１１月号に掲載されていたあなたのレポートを７０部コピーし、私どもの代理店に配ってよろしいですか。Is it possible to reproduce 70 copies of your report which appeared in the November issue of The Network and distribute them to our agents?




カリフォルニアとネバダは互いに接している。California and Nevada border on each other.







トラファルガー広場にはネルソン提督の彫像がある。There is a statue of Admiral Nelson in Trafalgar Square.















私はその計画にはノータッチです。I'm not concerned with the plan.俺この件に関してノータッチなんで。I'm not getting involved in this.

彼女は本の絵をノートに書き移した。She transferred the picture in the book to her notebook.ジェレミは彼の会計士の一次試験のためノートを熱心に勉強していたよ。I left Jeremy poring over his notes for his first accountancy exam tomorrow.アップルの新型ノートは予定通りに発表されるだろうか。Will Apple's new model notebook be announced on schedule?



下着を買いに行くんだよ。お前、まだノーパンだろうが。We're going to buy underwear. You're still not wearing underpants, are you?







多分彼はノーベル賞を受賞することができるだろう。The chances are he will be able to win a Nobel prize.
１９６４年にキング牧師はノーベル平和賞を受賞した。In 1964, Rev. King won the Nobel Peace Prize.

よりによって相手がノーマークのスーちゃんなんて。That it be with the off-the-radar Sue of all people!








ソレノイドへの突入電流でノイズが発生します。Noise is produced by the sudden flow of current into a solenoid.



本物のノイローゼの奴がノイローゼだなんて自称するのかね？Do you think real neurotics really go and call themselves such?


以上のように、実にシンプルな誰でも出来るノウハウで十分な利益と顧客は確保できるのです！As shown above, it is possible to obtain ample profit and customers with truly simple know-how that anyone can do!









誰かがドアをノックした。Someone knocked on the door.
彼はノックアウト勝ちした。He won the fight by a knockout.








シート横にあるノブを前に動かし、シートを倒します。Move the knob at the side of the seat forwards, collapse the seat.ノブを回して、ドアをあけなさい。Turn the knob and open the door.





彼女はアカデミー賞の最優秀助演女優にノミネートされた。She won an Oscar nomination for best supporting actress.



ノルウェーやフィンランドのような国では冬には雪が多い。In such countries as Norway and Finland, they have lots of snow in winter.
アルペンスキーの方がノルディックより好きです。I like Alpine skiing better than Nordic skiing.




列車は名古屋までノンストップで走ります。This train runs nonstop to Nagoya.









あなたは創作とノンフィクションのどちらが好きですか。Which do you like better, fiction or non-fiction?





次の瞬間ヘラクレスは怪獣を捕まえた。The next instant Hercules caught hold of the monster.


彼女はハート型のイヤリングをしていた。She wore heart-shaped earrings.

ウーッ、今日の練習はいつになくハードで辛い。Whoo! Today's practice is tough - much harder than usual.Xbox 360については「いいハードです」と開口一番切り出した。On the Xbox 360 the very first thing he said was "good hardware."ハードが断片化を起こしてるみたい。It looks like your hard disk is fragmented.






外付けのハードディスクに保存しといて。Save it on the external hard drive.



あいつはハードボイルドなやつだ。He is a hard boiled egg.



バイクに乗るのとハードロックのコンサートが大好き。I love biking and hard rock concerts.






ハーフタイムでの得点はどうでしたか。What was the score at halftime?




ハーブの専門店を聞いたことがありませんか。Do you know a good specialty store dealing in herbs?

どこからかハープの流麗な調べが聞こえてきた。They could hear the elegant, flowing sound of a harp coming from somewhere.


その音楽の美しさはハーモニーにある。The beauty of the music consists of its harmony.
ハーモニカはお父さんからのプレゼントですか。Is the harmonica a present from his father?



何度も「やめましょうよ」と言ったのに、何杯もワインを飲み干し――ご覧の通り、酔っ払ってハイになってしまったのである。I kept saying "Let's stop" but she drained cup after cup of wine ― and now, as you can see, she's completely drunk.


この道はそこでハイウエイに合流する。This road joins the highway there.





その山で何人かのハイカーに会った。I met some hikers on the mountain.



ハイキングは中止にしたほうがいいわね。We had better cancel the hike.





ＡＢＣニュースによれば、もう一機のジェット旅客機が、中近東でハイジャックされたそうだ。According to the ABC news, another jet-liner was hi-jacked in the Middle East.



彼女はハイセンスの持ち主ですよ。She has a sense of fashion.





私の娘はハイティーンです。My daughter is in her late teens.
日本は世界のハイテク産業のリーダーだ。Japan is a leader in the world's high-tech industry.










ハイヒールのかかとが折れたとき、ストッキングがほつれた。She got a run in her stocking when she broke the heel of her shoe.



ロックの場合、何を基準にハイファイとするのかが難しいですね。For rock it's hard to know on what basis you should call something 'hi-fi'.




再使用型有翼ハイブリッドロケットシステムの基本設計と飛行性能予測。Baseline design and flight capability predictions for reusable winged hybrid rocket system.
























ハウスダストにアレルギーがあります。He is allergic to house dust.














忠犬ハチ公の像は渋谷駅前に立っている。The statue of Hachiko, the faithful dog, stands in front of Shibuya Station.
今日この番組でハッカーの問題をクローズアップするんだって。This program is going to focus on computer hacking issues today.








「その話の結末はハッピー・エンドですか」「まあ、とにかく、心温まる結末ではありました」"Does the story have a happy ending?" "Well, a warm one, anyway."





二人はハネムーンに出かけた。The couple went off on their honeymoon.




彼女は古い曲を低い声でハミングしながらベンチに座っていた。She sat on a bench, humming an old melody in a low voice.
ハムを１きれ薄く切ってくれませんか。Would you slice me a piece of ham, please?
彼はハムエッグが好きです。He likes ham and eggs.

このハムスターはポケットに入れて持ち運べるぐらい小さい。This hamster is small enough to carry in your pocket.




私ははらはらしながら結果を待っていました。I have been waiting for the results with anxiety.
ハリケーンによる死者の数は２００人にのぼった。The death toll from the hurricane climbed to 200.




そちらにはハローウィンと感謝祭がありますね。You have Halloween and Thanksgiving Day.


ハワイで何をしたか教えてください。Tell me what you did in Hawaii.

このハンカチはいくらですか。How much is this handkerchief?

コートをハンガーに掛けておきなさい。Put your coat on a hanger.

マリはハンガリーにいたことがある。Mari has been in Hungary.





私の好きな曲はハングリー・スパイダーです。My favorite song is Hungry Spider.


あのハンサムな男の子を見て。Look at that good-looking boy.
政治犯たちは待遇改善を求めてハンストをしています。Political prisoners are on a hunger strike for better conditions.

ハンターは犬を連れてウサギを狩った。The hunter hunted rabbits with his dog.



目の不自由なその青年はハンディキャップを克服した。The blind young man has got over his handicap.

ハント先生が私たちの学校の校長だ。Mr Hunt is principal of our school.





私のハンドバッグをどうしたの？What did you do with my purse?

青年の一団が運動場でハンドボールをしている。A group of young men are playing handball in the playground.



このハンドルがどうしても回らないんだ。This handle will not turn.ひでおは自転車をこいでいた人を避けるためにハンドルをきった。Hideo turned the steering wheel sharply to avoid the bicyclist.


あの店はハンバーガー店です。That shop is a hamburger shop.
彼女はハンバーグの肉をたたいて平たくした。She patted the hamburger meat into a flat shape.


私はハンマーを工具箱に入れています。I keep my hammer in the toolbox.
彼女はハンモックに寝そべって多くの時間を過ごした。She idled away many hours lying in the hammock.




二人の男はバーで飲んでいた。The two men were drinking in a bar.



このＴシャツはバーゲンで買ったんだ。I bought this T-shirt on sale.
バーゲンセールを利用してセーターを３枚買った。I took advantage of a sale and bought three sweaters.

その年彼らはバージニアに定住することを決めた。They decided to settle down in Virginia that year.

現在のバージョンは、アップグレード版で置き換えます。We will replace the current version with the upgrade.
Ｍａｃ ＯＳ Ｘといっても、Ｍａｃ ＯＳのコードをバージョンアップした訳ではない。Although it's "Mac OS X", that doesn't mean that the Mac OS code itself has been upgraded to a new version.




私たちは父にバースデイプレゼントをあげるつもりです。We will give Father a birthday present.



非ヴァーチャルアドレス帳を数分前に見つけたところです。I couldn't find my non-virtual address book until only a few minutes ago.





どうか私にバードウォッチングの話をしてくれませんか。Would you please tell me the story about bird watching?






男性たちはバーベキューをしている。The men are having a barbecue.
女性ではあるが、彼女はこのバーベルを持ち上げられる。Even though she is a woman, she can lift this barbell.
ジョンはスコッチを、メアリーはバーボンを飲む。John drinks Scotch and Mary bourbon.


バーミンガムまでの片道切符をください。Can I have a single to Birmingham?



中東の石油価格は１バレル当たり５ドルほど跳ね上がりました。Middle Eastern oil prices jumped by five dollars per barrel.














「バイオテクノロジー」という言葉が普通に使われるようになったのは、いつ頃ですか。When did the word "biotechnology" come into common use?











スミス氏は著名なバイオリニストである。Mr Smith is an eminent violinist.
トムは今、バイオリンを弾いている。Tom is playing the violin now.





朝食はバイキング形式だって。Breakfast is a smorgasbord.
ビルはバイクをとても欲しがった。Bill was crazy for a motorbike.




私はバイトをしながらいろんなタイプの人間に出会ってきたわ。I've run up against all kinds of people, working as a temporary.








数回バイブルに言及する。I make several allusions to the Bible.






インドのバイヤーと日本のビジネスマンは新製品の値をめぐって激しいやりとりをした。An Indian buyer and a Japanese businessman haggled over the price of the new product.







球はバウンドして塀を越えた。The ball bounced over the wall.










バクテリアはアルコールの中では繁殖しない。Bacteria will not breed in alcohol.
ああそうそう、コメント欄のバグは文字間を調節するletter-spacingタグを使うと起こるものだったみたい。Oh, while I remember, it seems that that was a bug that occurs when you use the comment field's 'letter-spacing' tag which adjusts the tracking.
同盟軍はバグダッドの検問所で彼女の車を襲撃した。The coalition force fired at her car at the checkpoint in Baghdad.




このバケツには穴が開いている。There's a hole in this bucket.

バザーは盛況のうちに終わった。The bazaar ended a great success.

私の息子はいつもバスに乗ると酔うの。My son always gets sick when he rides a bus.


近くでバスケットが作られている。Baskets are being made nearby.
マイクはバスケットボールをすることが好きです。Mike likes to play basketball.



バスタオルがぬれていて、役に立たなかった。My bath towel was wet, so it was of no use.
ああ、バスタブ付きがいいな。Oh, a bath, please.




お父さんがバスルームでひげを剃っている。Dad is shaving in the bathroom.


バスはバス停を通り過ぎてしまった。The bus went past the bus stop.



彼女はバターを２ポンド買いました。She bought two pounds of butter.



赤ん坊は足をばたばたさせて泣きわめいていた。The baby was kicking and screaming.彼はいつもばたばたと活動している。He is always up and doing.

ドアをバタンと閉めるな。Don't shut the door with a bang.






海をバックに記念写真撮ろうよ。Let's get a picture of us with the sea in the background.彼は車をバックさせて車庫に入れた。He backed his car into the garage.俺はバックで打つ方が得意だな。I have a strong backhand.




















テニスやピンポンのバックハンドでは手は球を打つ際逆向きになる。In tennis and ping-pong backhand the hand is turned backwards in making the stroke.


このバックパックは彼のものですか。Does this backpack belong to him?





バックミラーがはずれてしまいました。The rear-view mirror fell off.



その男は彼女のバッグを奪った。The man robbed her of her bag.
男子生徒のめいめいが帽子に学校のバッジをつけています。Each boy student has a school badge on his cap.




彼はバッティングに精通している。He is at home on batting.




その機械からバッテリーを外せ。Take the battery off the machine.

このバットを使ってよろしいか。May I use this bat?

この音楽はバッハによって作曲された。This music was composed by Bach.
外国人労働者は日本経済のバッファーであってはならない。We should not use foreign workers as a buffer against Japan's economic slowdown.



何百というバッファローが湖のほうへ移動した。Hundreds of buffaloes moved toward the lake.

私はいまだに高く上げたバトンをうまくキャッチできない。I am still clumsy catching batons thrown high up.




バドミントン部はまともな部員が極端に少ないため、ほとんど廃部ないし休部状態だった。There were so few proper members in the badminton club that it was half-way between dead and 'on break'.
バナーと同じ、白を基調としたデザイン。Like the banner, the design was based around the colour white.

私はリンゴ以上にバナナが好きです。I like bananas more than apples.





バニラアイスクリームを二つ下さい。Two vanilla ice creams, please.
そのばね１個で車の全重量を支えている。That one spring carries the whole weight of the car.

くず社債のディーラーは市場をつり上げてバブル状態にしました。Junk bond dealers left the market riding on a pillow of air.












鞍馬は、力よりもバランス感覚が必要です。The pommel horse requires more balance than strength.




バリウムをまず一口飲んでください。First, swallow one dose of barium.
ただ、毎日だとさすがに飽きるだろう。もっと料理のバリエーションを増やさないと。It's just if we have it every day we're bound to get fed up with it. I must increase the variety of my cooking.

抗議のデモ隊が入り口にバリケードを築いた。The protesters barricaded the entrance.











そのバルコニーからの眺めはすばらしい。The balcony commands a splendid view.




彼はバレーの選手です。He's a volleyball player.
バレーボールをするのは好きですか。Do you like playing volleyball?
バレエ音楽の指揮者として彼にかなうものはいない。He stands alone as a conductor of ballet music.
どの女の子もバレリーナになれると言うわけではない。Every girl cannot be a ballerina.
バレンタインにみんなにチョコレートをあげるのはやめよう。I'll stop giving them chocolate on Valentine's Day.
２月１４日、アメリカ人はバレンタインデーを祝う。On February 14 Americans celebrate St. Valentine's Day.

彼女は静かな音楽を好むー例えばバロック音楽を。She prefers quiet music - the baroque, for example.
血圧は健康のバロメーターとして重要である。Blood pressure is important as a barometer of health.





そのバンガローにいくためには狭い小道しかない。The bungalow is approached only by a narrow path.

この船はバンクーバー行きである。This ship is bound for Vancouver.







監督は打者にバントのサインを送った。The manager sent the bunt sign to the batter.

バンドの演奏は何時に始まりますか。What time will the band start playing?きついバンドは血液の循環を妨げる。A tight belt will interfere with circulation of the blood.






バンパーが衝撃をいくらか吸収してくれた。The car bumper absorbed some of the impact.




パー確実だ。This guarantees me par.




パーキングメーターに使いたいんです。I need it for the parking meter.

我々はその夜、ロードサイドパークで寝た。We bedded down at the roadside park for the night.












現金払いには１０パーセント割引いたします。We give a 10% discount for cash.







どこへ行けば、パーソナルチェックを現金に換えてもらえますか。Where can I cash this personal check?


弊社は機械パーツの輸入を行っています。We specialize in the import of machinery parts.
パーティーでは誰がホストを勤めるのですか。Who will host the party?



その試験は２つのパートに分かれていた。The exam was divided into two parts.ごめんね。明日は朝からパートがあるのよ。Sorry, I have a part-time job starting tomorrow morning.
スーパーマーケットでは多くのパートタイマーを雇った。The supermarket hired many part-timers.
パートタイム労働者は経済の発展に重要な役割を演じる。Part-time workers play an important role in the development of the economy.

２、３の欠点を別にすれば、彼は信頼できるパートナーだ。Apart from a few faults, he is a trustworthy partner.


容姿端麗、頭脳明晰、運動神経抜群、家は金持ちで、ついでに学生会の副会長をしてたりもする、いわゆるパーフェクトな奴だ。Looks, brains, reflexes, rich family and, for good measure, vice president of the student committee - in other words he's 'perfect'.



あまりきつくパーマをかけないでください。Don't make the perm too tight, please.












トムはパイを少しもらった。Tom got a small portion of pie.


パイナップルやレモンのような酸性の果実はすっぱい。Acid fruits like pineapples and lemons are sour.

パイプのひび割れからガスが漏れていた。Gas was escaping from a crack in the pipe.彼はパイプをくわえて話した。He spoke with a pipe in his mouth.


４０万ガロンの石油がパイプラインから溢れ出た。400,000 gallons of oil have spilled out of the pipeline.










私の夢はパイロットになることです。My dream is to become a pilot.









彼ははるばるパキスタンから私に会いに来た。He came to see me all the way from Pakistan.



パシフィック通りに行くには、このバスでいいんでしょうか。Is this the right bus for Pacific Boulevard?

このパジャマはよく汗を吸収します。These pajamas absorb sweat well.
彼が試験にパスしたのは不思議ではない。It is no wonder that he passed the examination.私はそこのプールのパスを持っている。I've got a pass for the swimming pool.ボールを後ろの人にすぐパスしなさい。Pass the ball quickly to a person behind you.

ここ、結構パスタがいけるのよ。あとピザも。The pasta here's pretty good. And the pizza too.




パスポートを拝見できますか。May I see your passport, please?
人のパスワードを乱用する「なりすまし」行為が問題になっている。Now that people can steal passwords, illegal impersonation is becoming a serious problem.
彼女はそのパズルを簡単に解いた。She solved the puzzle with ease.



パソコンを故障させてしまった。I broke the personal computer.



この母音変化はそれぞれの単語に指定される全体のアクセントパターンと大いに関係している。This vowel change has much to do with the overall accent pattern assigned to each word.




次郎はパチンコでガッポリもうけて上機嫌だった。Jiro was all smiles after he made a bundle at the pachinko parlor.



そのパッケージは全部でいくらですか。How much is the whole package?








なにやら唸りながら、ほとばしるパッションをキャンバスにぶつけている！Groaning strangely she is hurling her overflowing passion onto the canvas!
パッシングではなくロブで勝負だ。Rather than passing, lobbing is the way to win.






上手なパットだね。Excellent putt.


彼は割れ目をパテでふさいだ。He stopped up the crack with putty.



パトカーを見て彼は逃げた。He ran away at the sight of a police patrol.


１０人の警官がその地域のパトロールについた。Ten policemen were assigned to patrol that area.




スエズ運河とパナマ運河は国際管理化におくべきでしょうか。Should the Suez and Panama Canals be internationalized?
列車が脱線すると、たちまちパニック状態になった。The train was derailed, and panic ensued.


私は、ポーチに敷く木製のデッキパネルを購入したいと思います。I would like to purchase a wooden deck panel that can be laid on the porch.




ママもパパもひどくいらだっているの。Mummy and Daddy are very nervous.






そのパフォーマンスは冴えないものでしたよ。The performance was low-keyed.



あのパブではビールを水増ししているのではないか。I suspect they water down the beer in that pub.







彼はパブリックスクールで教育された。He was educated at a public school.






そのパラグラフは内容を重視しています。The paragraph emphasises the message.






パラソルは顔に陽が当たらないように夏に用いる。A parasol is used during the summertime to shade the face.
このビーチはサーファーにはパラダイスだ。This beach is a paradise for surfers.
これらのすべての現象を説明するにはまったくの異なるパラダイムを立てる必要がある。We need to postulate a completely different paradigm to explain all these phenomena.





屋根には雨がぱらぱら落ちていた。Rain was pattering on the roof.




うわっ？これ、勉強に運動神経、全てのパラメータがMAXじゃないか！おまけにお金もカンストするまで貯まってる・・・すげえ。Wha? Study, reflexes, all the parameters are MAX! You've even saved money up to the limit ... Amazing.




パララックスよりバンプマッピングの方が負荷かかるんですか？Does bump mapping generate more graphics load than parallax?



セーヌ川はパリを流れている。The Seine flows through Paris.
彼は目下パリーグの首位打者だ。At this time, he's the Pacific League's top batter.















それはこの上なくすばらしいパレードだった。It was a parade with a capital P.


カラー・キー・プログラム・システムでは全ての色が「クールパレット」と「ウォームパレット」の２つに分けられる。With the colour key program system, all colours are divided into two palettes, the "cool palette" and the "warm palette".

ハリソンがこの作品をパロディとして意図していなかったという証拠は、エヴァンズ夫人へ当てた手紙に見ることができる。Evidence that Harrison did not intend this work to be a parody can be seen in his letter to Mrs. Evans.
新しいモデルはパワーとスピードの点でより優れてます。The new model is featured by higher power and speed.









私は今朝バターつきのパンを食べた。I ate bread and butter this morning.

私の自転車はパンクした。My bicycle has got a flat tire.




彼女はパンジーを何株か花壇に植えた。She planted some pansies in the flower bed.


会社にパンタロンとアロハシャツを着てくる彼は、かなりユニークな存在だ。He's a pretty unique guy, wearing bell bottoms and Hawaiian shirts to the office.
パンダは竹林にすんでいます。Pandas live in bamboo thickets.
彼が謝ろうとしていたちょうどそのとき、その人は彼の顔にパンチをくらわせた。He was about to apologize when the man punched him in the face.




パンツとブラジャー以外は全部脱いでください。Please take off all your clothes except your underpants and bra.
店員さんがそう言うなら、ブラジャーとパンティーも買ってってやろう。Now that you mention it, she also needs a bra and panties.







彼はパーティーでパントマイムをやってみせた。He acted out a pantomime at the party.






こちらのパンフレットは無料です。This pamphlet is free of charge.

彼女はパンプスをはいていた。She was shod in pumps.
アメリカのパン屋では、「ｂａｋｅｒ’ｓ　ｄｏｚｅｎ」は１２ではなく１３だ。In U.S. bakeries, a "baker's dozen" is 13, not 12.
私達は鳥がパンくずを食べるのを見つめていました。その時、くしゃみをしたら、あっという間にその鳥は飛んでいってしまいました。We were watching the bird eat the crumbs; then I sneezed, and he was gone in a flash.
えーと、パン粉は有ったかな？Hmm, did we have some breadcrumbs?

ヒーターをつけたまま外出した。I went out with the heater on.







大部分の少年は野球のヒーローをすばらしいと思っている。Most boys admire baseball heroes.




お願いですからヒスを起こす前に話は最後まで聞いてください。I'm begging you, before freaking out on me listen to the end of what I have to say.

トムはすぐにヒステリーを起こすので、みんなが敬遠する。Tom loses his temper so easily that everybody avoids him.






あの歌は必ずヒットするよ。That song's bound to be a hit.インターネットで、「〜の歴史」を検索してみると、「世界の歴史」「野球の歴史」といったようなサイトがヒットする。If you search for "History of..." on the internet, you'll get hits for sites like "History of the World" and "History of Baseball."


この歌はヒットチャートの第１位にランクされています。This song is No. 1 on the hit chart.











雪男はヒマラヤの怪物だ。The Abominable Snowman is a Himalayan monster.
ヒューズが飛んだ。A fuse has blown.

























その小説はヒロインの死で終わっている。The novel ends with the heroine's death.
ヒンズー教徒は寺院で礼拝をします。The Hindus worship in temples.

極めて知能の高い人々の習慣は、それをどのように行うかについてヒントを与える。The habits of highly intelligent people offer a clue as to how to do that.





このビーチはサーファーにはパラダイスだ。This beach is a paradise for surfers.




実はビートを食べると、尿がうっすらピンク色をすることがあります。Actually if you eat beets your urine may turn a light pink colour.

ミロのヴィーナスは美の極致だ。The Venus de Milo is the perfection of beauty.
ウサギはビーバーやリスと同族です。Rabbits are related to beavers and squirrels.
もう少しビーフをいかがですか。Would you like some more beef?










ビアガーデンに客がたくさんいるかどうかは天気次第だ。Whether or not beer gardens get a lot of customers depends on the weather.



ジュディは新しいビキニを着ることにした。Judy decided to wear her new bikini.




ビクトリア女王は英国の君主だった。Queen Victoria was the sovereign of Great Britain.
このビザの有効期限はどれくらいですか。How long is this visa good for?





私のビジネスは再び回復しつつあります。My business is picking up again.









ビジネススクールに行きたいのです。I would like to go to a business school.


日本のビジネスホテルはそんなに高くない。In Japan it is less expensive to stay in a Business hotel.
彼は一介のビジネスマンにすぎない。He is nothing but a businessman.













あなたは自分の将来のビジョンを持っていますか。Do you have a vision of your future?


「ママ、ビスケット食べてもいいでしょ」「だめです。間食はいけません」"Mom, please can I have a biscuit?" "No, you can't; you shouldn't eat between meals."





ビタミンが豊富にある野菜を食べた方がいい。You should eat some vegetables rich in vitamins.
ビタミン剤売り場はどこですか。Where's the aisle for vitamins?
東京をビッグミカンってよぼうよ！Let's call Tokyo the Big Mikan!







これがビッグベンと呼ばれる鐘です。This is the bell called Big Ben.





ビデオで映画を見ました。I watched a movie on video.ビデオの代金を５回に分けて払った。I paid for the video in five installments.



ちょっとあなたのビデオカメラを見せて下さい。Let me have a look at your video camera.

ビデオゲームは割に合わない。It doesn't pay to play video games.
ビデオショップは３時まで営業しています。The video shop is open until 3 o'clock.



私は今朝、ビデオテープを借りてきた。I rented a videotape this morning.



その現在建設中の工場は、一日当たり3000台のビデオデッキを組み立てられる。The factory now under construction will assemble 3,000 VCR units per day.





ビニールは熱に弱いのが難点だ。The weakness of vinyl is that it is easily affected by heat.
ビニールハウスでトマトを栽培しています。I grow tomatoes in plastic houses.




こっちにきてから、ずっと近所でビバークしてたの？大変だったね。You've been camping out ever since you came over here? Must have been terrible.





ビフテキをおいしくいただきました。ほかの料理ももちろんですが。I really enjoyed the beefsteak you served, not to mention the other dishes.





















ランチブッフェを二人、お願いします。Two for the lunch buffet, please.
今回はじめてプライベートヴィラに滞在しましたが、これがなかなか良いです。This time I stayed for the first time in a private villa, and it was really quite something.


私の父はビリヤードの玉のように頭がつるつるだ。My father is as bald as a billiard ball.
私の事務所はあのグレーの６階建てのビルの４階だ。My office is on the fourth floor of that gray six-story building.








赤ん坊のほっぺたはビロードのような手触りがする。Little babies' cheeks feel like velvet.






朝のラッシュは今がピークだ。The morning rush is at its peak now.







我々は綿の代わりにピーナッツを植えた。We planted peanuts instead of cotton.
ピーナツバターとゼリーのをください。Peanut butter and jelly, please.





私、ピーマンが大好きなんだ。I like green peppers very much.




そのピアニストはアンコールに応えて２曲弾いた。The pianist played two encores.
誰かがピアノを弾いている。Somebody is playing the piano.
そのピエロはわざと転んだ。The clown fell down on purpose.

ピカソは卓越した画家だ。Picasso is an eminent painter.








いっしょにピクニックに行きませんか。Will you go on a picnic with me?







私は電話でピザを注文した。I ordered a pizza on the phone.



暴漢のピストルが発射された。A ruffian's pistol went off.
このシャフトはピストンとつながっている。This shaft links with a piston.

「ピッキングの道具無しで、どうやって侵入した？」「トイレの窓があいた」"With no picks how did you break in?" "The toilet window was open."
ピックは硬い地表を砕くために用いられる長い取っ手の道具だ。A pick is a long handled tool used for breaking up hard ground surfaces.






彼はエースピッチャーです。He is an ace pitcher.
君のピッチングは、僕よりはるかに優れています。Your pitching is far superior to mine.














ピラミッドは古代に建造された。The pyramids were built in ancient times.



文を書くときには、ふつう大文字で始め、ピリオド（.）、または感嘆符（!）、疑問符（?）、で終わる。When writing a sentence, generally you start with a capital letter and finish with a period (.), an exclamation mark (!), or a question mark (?).


ピルを服用したいのです。I'd like to take the pill.


写真はピンでとめられていた。The picture was held on by a pin.
何のことをいっているのか私にはピンときた。The allusion was not lost on me.彼女が彼の名前を言ったのでピンと来た。Her mention of his name rang a bell.





あのピンクの服を着た女性はだれですか。Who is the woman dressed in pink?







我々は絶体絶命のピンチに追い込まれた。We were driven to the wall.
最終回にピンチヒッターが起用された。A pinch hitter was brought into action in the last inning.

ピントがズレている。That's a little out of focus.
君の言うことはピントがはずれている。You are off the point.




テニスやピンポンのバックハンドでは手は球を打つ際逆向きになる。In tennis and ping-pong backhand the hand is turned backwards in making the stroke.











ファーストがうちのチームのアキレスけんだ。The first baseman is the Achilles heel of our team.

ファーストクラスでお願いします。I'd like to travel first-class.
大半のアメリカ人は私が彼らをファーストネームで呼ぶことをいやがらない。Most Americans do not object to my calling them by their first names.


























新聞をまとめておくファイルを持っている。I have a newspaper clipping file.秘書は過去の記録をファイルするように頼まれた。The secretary was asked to file past records.このファイルは削除して下さい。Please delete this file.






被写体に気づかれないようにそぉっとカメラを取り出し、ファインダーを覗く。I quietly take out my camera, so as not to be noticed by my photographic subject, and peek through the finder.


審判はそのボールをファウルと判定した。The umpire called the ball foul.













アメリカ人がファシズムを受け入れないのは、共産主義を受け入れないのと同じだ。The Americans don't accept Fascism any more than they do Communism.



彼はファジィ理論の研究に没頭しています。He is absorbed in the study of the Fuzzy Theory.
時間があまりないので、ファーストフード店に立ち寄るつもりです。I don't have much time, so I'm going to drop in at a fast-food restaurant.
ファスナーを発明したとき、その実業家は何と言ったか。What did the businessman say when he invented the zip-fastener?

この手紙を日本までファックスしてください。I'd like to fax this to Japan.


その店のウインドウには最新のファッションが展示してある。The shop windows display the latest fashion.






ファッションモデルは身のこなしがよくなければならない。A fashion model must have a good carriage.






最近王室ファミリーについて出された本で二冊が傑出している。Two books stand out among the dozens recently published on the Royal Family.














イギリスのサッカーファンはときどきまったく手に負えなくなる。British soccer fans sometimes get completely out of hand.

























１ヤードは３フィートに等しい。A yard is equal to three feet.




彼女と付き合うきっかけになったのは、なんとなくフィーリングが合ったからだ。I got together with her mainly because we seemed to share the same feelings about things.

オールブラックスがフィールドに現れると、観衆の声がウオーンと響き渡った。When the All Blacks came out onto the field a roar like 'woooaahh' swept over the crowd.







白い洋服を着ている子が私のフィアンセだ。The girl who is dressed in white is my fiancée.





このゲームはフィクションです。This game is a work of fiction.






















彼は昨年の今ごろフィリピンを旅行していました。He was traveling in the Philippines this time of last year.







このフィルムを現像してもらえますか。Can I have this film developed?







その船はフィンランド行きである。The ship is bound for Finland.









我々は、勝とうが負けようがフェアに戦わなければならない。We have to play fair, whether we win or lose.




試合に勝つことは重要だが、フェアプレーのほうがもっと重要である。大切なのは勝つことではないことを、理解しなければならない。Winning the competition is important. However, fair play is more important. You need to understand that winning is not the most important thing.














そのフェスティバルは来週開催されます。The festival will be held next week.

別にブルマに特別な関心があるわけじゃない。そういうフェティシズムはない、と思う。It's not like I've got any special interest in gym shorts - I've not got that fetish, I think.


フェニックスはアリゾナの州都である。Phoenix is the capital of Arizona.


フェミニストカウンセリングを一言で説明するなら、女性の視点にたったカウンセリングということになるでしょうか。If you sum up feminist counselling in a few words, I suppose it would be counselling done from a woman's standpoint.田中氏はフェミニストだ。Mr Tanaka is a chivalrous man.





大波がフェリーを転覆させた。A big wave turned the ferry over.









フェンスの向こう側に片足を振り出した。I swung my leg over the fence.


その子はナイフとフォークをうまく使う。The child handles a knife and fork well.

私はこれらのフォークソングすべてが好きというわけではない。I don't like all of these folk songs.









「君の車はどこの製品ですか」「フォード社のです」"What brand is your car?" "It's a Ford."




このフロッピーをフォーマットしてはいけません。You mustn't format this floppy disk.
何とまあ、フォーマルなパーティーにジーンズで現れるなんて、彼女は顔から火が出る思いだったろうね。Boy, did she have egg on her face when she showed up at the formal party wearing blue jeans!









































そのフォルダ、共有にしておいて。Make that a shared folder.


メニュー・バーの「返事」から、「フォローアップ記事の作成」を選ぶ。フォローする記事が引用される。From the menu-bar's "Reply" select "create follow-up message". The message you reply to is quoted.田中さんのミスを僕がフォローするんだから、労働に見合った報酬を受け取るのは当然だ。I'm patching things up after Tanaka's mistake so it's only natural that I get a reward appropriate to my labours.



フォワードがゴールを決めた。The forward kicked a goal.



フォント・ビジネスでは決して誰も信用してはいけないよ。In the font business you must never trust anybody!




私の好きな競技はフットボールです。My favourite game is football.

彼女はフットワークがいいね。She has good footwork.
すみませんが娘の歯にフッソ塗布をしてください。Please give her a fluoride treatment.
ふふ、恵一君いつも授業終わったら、ノビするよね。Ha-ha, you always stretch when class is over don't you?


私はえびはフライがいいです。I like my shrimps fried.
良いフライトを！Have a nice flight.







ガルフポートで一番のフライドチキンと言ったら、それはもうおばあちゃんの台所ですよ。For the best fried chicken in Gulfport, go to Grandma's Kitchen.
フライポテトのラージサイズをください。Large fries, please.
このフライパンのとっては持ちやすい。The handle of this pan is easy to hold.


あの選手は２回もフライングをした。The contestant made two false starts.









また、「安楽いすに座りながらの買い物」には、雑踏や交通から来るフラストレーションが伴わない。Also, "armchair shopping" gets rid of the frustrations of crowds and traffic.


フラッシュを使ってもいいですか。Is it all right to use a flash here?



彼は１００ｍを１１秒フラットで走った。He ran 100 meters in 11 seconds flat.撃ち合いが少し静まったとき、パパが走ってフラットに行って、私たちにサンドイッチを持ってきてくれたわ。When the shooting died down a bit, Daddy ran over to our flat and brought us back some sandwiches.











「ダックスフント・ソーセージ」は、フランクフルターにふさわしい名前であった。"Dachshund sausage" was a good name for the frankfurter.
それは、ドイツの一都市であるフランクフルトにちなんで名づけられた。It was named after Frankfurt, a German city.





フランス語が彼らの母語です。French is their mother tongue.







アメリカでは毎年多数のフリーエージェントがチームを移る。In America, scores of free agents switch teams every year.








僕のパソコンがフリーズしてしまった。My computer has frozen.






フリーダイヤル１―８００―４４６―２５８１にお電話ください。Call us toll-free at 1-800-446-2581.鍵のいらない暗証タイプには、お好きな番号を設定できるフリーダイヤル式と、あらかじめ番号が設定済みの固定式とがあります。For code-type locks that don't need a key, there are 'free dial' systems where you can set any number you like, and fixed types where the number is set in advance.





フリーマーケットをやっている場所がありますか。Is there anywhere I can go to find a flea market?












工場はフル稼動している。The factory is running at full capacity.
私たちは夕食後に新鮮なフルーツを食べた。We ate fresh fruit after dinner.




フルーツポンチをもういっぱい欲しい？Do you want another glass of fruit punch?
今、私はフルートに夢中になってきている。Now, I'm going mad to play the flute.


フルコースもあれば、サラダで軽いお食事もオーケー。You can eat a complete meal, or just go easy with our salad bar.










彼女はフルマラソンを走ることができる。She can run a full marathon.




このフレーズの意味はどうなるでしょうか。I wonder what this phrase means.


私は新しい眼鏡のフレームを買わねばならない。I need to buy new spectacle frames.













女性が安心して働くためには、生涯の仕事の機会を増やし、フレックスタイム、サテライトオフィス、託児所の充実などが必要である。Career opportunities, flex-time, satellite offices, and more childcare facilities are required to make women at home join the work force.













あの人は、見た目はこわそうだけど、フレンドリーな人ですよ。心配しないで。Don't worry. He may look intimidating at first glance, but he's actually a very friendly person.


フローズン・ヨーグルトがどうしても食べたい。I'm dying for frozen yogurt.





二つ折りにしたクッションを枕代わりに、僕はフローリングの上にカーペットを敷いただけの固い床へと横になる。Using a doubled-up cushion in place of a pillow I lie down on the hard wooden floor with nothing but a carpet spread over it.









フロスト氏はその地位につく資格がある。Mr Frost is eligible for the post.


このフロッピーをフォーマットしてはいけません。You mustn't format this floppy disk.



マイクにはフロリダに数人の友達がいる。Mike has a few friends in Florida.




フロントローラーのスラスト角は２度、多分レース時にはもう少し角度を強める予定です。The front-roller thrust angle is 2 degrees, probably there were plans to strengthen that angle a little when racing.貴重品はフロントにお預けください。Please check your valuables at the front desk.



フロントガラスをふきますか。Should I clean your windshield?


孵化後まもないヒナは、産毛が濡れていますが、２時間もすると乾いてフワフワになります。The down of chicks that have just hatched is damp, but after two hours it dries out and becomes fluffy.




私はスキーのブーツを１足買いたい。I want to buy a pair of ski boots.


小型車のブームは終わろうとしている。The small car boom is ending.
ブーメランは音を立てて空中を飛んだ。The boomerang hurtled whistling through the air.




そのヨットはブイを回って航行した。The yacht sailed round a buoy.







社長はブザーで秘書を呼んだ。The boss buzzed his secretary.























彼女はブラインドを引きおろした。She pulled down the blinds.




ノートパソコンの電源を入れ、ブラウザを立ち上げて、もう覚えてしまったアドレスを打ち込む。I switch on my laptop, start up the browser, and type in the address I've already learnt by heart.


そのブラウスを見せて下さい。May I see that blouse, please?


テレビを点け、彼女がブラウン管の前で遊弋している。「おい、飯だぞ？」Television turned on, she patrols in front of the CRT. "Hey you, food's up!"



パンツとブラジャー以外は全部脱いでください。Please take off all your clothes except your underpants and bra.
コーヒーはブラジルの主要産物である。Coffee is Brazil's main product.

ブラスバンドが行進曲を３曲演奏した。The brass band played three marches.


コーヒーはどんなふうにしましょうか。濃いブラックがいいですか。How do you like your coffee? Strong and black?


彼女がブラックコーヒーが好きかどうか、わかりません。I don't know whether she likes her coffee black.













次にあげる「ブラック・ユーモア」の例を見れば、自分で判断を下すことができるだろう。The following example of sick humor will enable you to judge for yourself.
ジムは私のブラックリストに載っている。Jim is in my black book.




どうやら、１年ブランクを取り戻し、旧交を温めることができたみたいだな。It looks like we've been able to fill in that one year gap and renew our old friendship.



紅茶にブランデーを少し入れてください。Put a dash of brandy in my tea.
好きなブランドはなんですか。Which brand do you prefer?








彼がブリーフケースを脇に抱えてやってくるのが見えた。I saw him coming with his briefcase under his arm.





船客のブリッジ立ち入り禁止。No passengers are allowed on the bridge.メイブルはブリッジをしながらおしゃべりするのが好きだ。Mabel loves to chew the fat while playing bridge.仮のブリッジをいれます。You'll need a temporary bridge.




あなたはブルーの服を着るととてもすてきだ。You are very attractive in blue.彼女、どうしたの？ちょっとブルー入ってるけど。What's wrong with her? She's looking kind of blue.
なぜ、会社によって、ブルーカラーの人のほうが、ホワイトカラーの人より給料がいいのですか？Why are, depending on the company, blue-collar workers better paid than white-collar ones?

懐かしい１２小節のブルース。There go the twelve bars blues.








享子の見えないところにブルーベリージャムを隠してね。Please hide the blueberry jam where Takako can't see it.



バルカン山脈はブルガリアの中央を東西に走る山脈。The Balkan Mountain range runs across Bulgaria from west to east.






その土地をならすのにブルドーザーが使われた。A bulldozer was used to level the lane.
噛みつくといけないのでそのブルドッグに近寄るな。Don't go near the bulldog. You wouldn't want him to bite you.
あのプレイボーイと結婚するのはブロンドの女の子か、ブルーネットの女の子か五分五分といったところだ。どちらもきれいだから。It is a toss-up whether the playboy will marry the blonde or the brunette; both girls are so beautiful.

ブレーカー上げてくればいいの。早く！You just need to reset the breaker. Hurry up!
しばらく車を運転していないと、アクセルとブレーキがごっちゃになることない？Have you ever got in your car after a long absence and got the brake mixed up with the accelerator?





マイクはブレーンの一人だ。Mike is one of our brains.


「おとこ」と付けると商品はブレイクする。Add "Men" and the goods take off.

このブレザーにあうブラウスがほしいのですが。I would like to get a blouse to go with this blazer.



このブレスレットはあれよりも高価だ。This bracelet is more expensive than that one.
プレゼンテーションの前に資料に目を通しておくのが一番いい。It is best to review the material before the presentation.
ホワイトブレッド、おねがいします。White bread, please.
このコーヒーはジャワとブラジルのブレンドだ。This coffee is a blend of Java and Brazil.


ブローカーは円高のおかげで大もうけしました。Brokers made a killing because of the high yen.



このブローチはあなたのセーターによく合う。This brooch goes well with your sweater.






銀行は３ブロック先です。The bank is three blocks away.





その像はブロンズで鋳造されていた。The statue was cast in bronze.
あのブロンドの女と一緒にいる現場を妻におさえられたのでは、彼ももう運のつきだ。His wife caught him out with that blonde and then he was really up shit creek without a paddle.

しばらくプータローしていて、迷ってたんです。勢いで辞表出しちゃったけど、本当は我慢して続けるべきだったのかな、って。Having idled jobless for a while I wavered. I'd rushed into handing in my notice but maybe I should have endured it and kept going...


私はプールで泳ぐのは好きではない。I don't like to swim in the pool.



例えば、たばこをぷかぷか吸う先生が、たばこを吸う生徒に注意してもその注意は矛盾しているだろう。For example, if a chain-smoking teacher cautions a pupil for smoking, that warning is self-contradictory.
そうだ、どうせなら散歩がてらに、林道に行ってプチ森林浴でも・・・。Right, while we're taking a walk anyway, we could like go along the woodland path and enjoy a little stroll through the forest...





このプッシュホンもそれなりに役に立つのが分かった。This push-button phone turned out to be useful in its way.



プディングのうまいまずいは食べてみてから。The proof of the pudding is in the eating.







彼のプライドはわずかだが傷ついた。His pride was slightly touched.
アメリカ人にとっては、日本の赤ん坊はプライバシーがないように見える。To Americans, a Japanese baby seems to have no privacy.
今回はじめてプライベートヴィラに滞在しましたが、これがなかなか良いです。This time I stayed for the first time in a private villa, and it was really quite something.















いいですよ。プラザデパートの隣です。Sure. It's next to the Plaza Department Store.
こうしたら君のプラスになる。If you do that, it will help you.



この椅子はプラスチックからできている。This chair is made of plastic.













ジョンはプラットホームでメアリーを待っている。John is waiting for Mary on the platform.





このプラムは食べごろだ。These plums are ripe.

このプランはみんなに満足がいくものです。This plan is acceptable to all.
鯨はプランクトンと小魚を餌にしている。Whales feed on plankton and small fish.












光線はプリズムによって七色に分解される。Light is resolved by a prism into seven colors.
ホワイトバランスをオートにした場合と白いコピー用紙でプリセットした場合の比較です。It's a comparison of setting the white balance to "auto" versus presetting it with white copy paper.













おやつにプリンを食べた。I had some custard pudding for an afternoon snack.





昨日このプリンターを買ったんだ。I bought this printer yesterday.

整えられた長机、いくつかのパイプ椅子、壁の掲示板にはカレンダーとプリント数枚が張られている。There were long desks lined up, several pipe chairs, and stuck on the bulletin board were a calendar and several printouts.
事務機が書類を次々とプリントアウトしている。An office machine is cranking out a stream of documents.








そのチームは今日ほどよくプレーしたことはなかった。That team has never played as well as they played today.





この板状の固い岩石の層をプレートと呼ぶ。We call these slabs of the solid-rock layer 'plates'.



いつも一人で仕事をしているから。僕は、チームプレーヤーではない。I always work alone. I'm just not a team player.
プレインイングリッシュは語学習得の近道です。Plain English is a shortcut to the goal of language learning.





ろうそくの両端を燃やすことは、極めて簡単にろうそくを溶かすことになる - 美女を両脇に抱え込んだプレイボーイのように。Burning the candle at both ends reduces the candle to wax in a hurry - just like a playboy having a pretty girl on each arm.






彼はズボンをプレスしてもらったか。Did he have his trousers pressed?







ハーモニカはお父さんからのプレゼントですか。Is the harmonica a present from his father?

ボスにプレッシャーをかけられている。I've come under pressure from my boss.




俺たちは小さなプレハブ小屋の中に荷物を置き、さっそく準備をする。We drop off our luggage in a small prefab hut and promptly start preparations.











彼女はコンピューター・プログラマーではないのですか。Isn't she a computer programmer?
そろそろプログラミングを覚えようかな。Maybe it's about time I started learning to program.
プログラムは今頃もう始まっているはずです。だから、前半はたぶん観られないでしょう。The program should have started by now, so we'll probably miss the first half.あの人たちにプログラムを配る手伝いをしてくれませんか。Will you help me give out the programs to those people?私は解読プログラムを持っていません。I don't have a decryption program.










そのプロジェクトは現在進行中である。The project is now in progress.







これらのプロセスのどれも意識されていないということを強調することがもっとも重要である。It is most important to emphasize that none of these processes are conscious.





あの若い歌手は、プロダクションが育て上げた。The agent built up the young singer.



このプロダクトはインテリジェント総合情報システムです。This product is an intelligent integrated information system.






















ドールが通信プロトコルの構成を変えることは意図していなかったということに注意すべきである。It should be noted that Dole did not intend to change the configuration of the communication protocol.













その新聞は新しい主筆のプロフィールを載せた。The paper published a profile of its new editor.


彼女は中年の都会派プロフェッショナルでした。She was a middle-aged urban professional.

ジェット機はプロペラ機よりもずっと速い。Jet planes fly much faster than propeller planes.


彼女は喜んで彼のプロポーズを受け入れた。She gladly accepted his proposal.








私はプロレスが好きです。I like pro wrestling.






部屋は香水のにおいでぷんぷんしていた。The room was pervaded with the scent of perfume.





メアリーの新しいヘアスタイルは人ごみの中でも彼女を目立たせた。Mary's new hairstyle made her stand out in the crowd.率直に言って、君のヘアースタイルは好きじゃないよ。Frankly speaking, I don't like your haircut.


彼女はヘアドライヤーの使い方を私に説明してくれた。She explained to me how to use the hair drier.




このシャンプーを買うと、素敵なヘアブラシがついてきます。This shampoo comes with a nice hair brush.

熱帯雨林は一日数万ヘクタールの割合でなくなっている。The rainforests are disappearing at the rate of tens of thousands of hectares a day.


















ヘッドホンから音が漏れているのは彼です。The noisy headphones are that guy's.

ヘッドライトをつけてみてください。Could you turn on your headlights?







ヘヴィなサウンドが求められている。Heavy sound is being looked for.彼はまだヘビー級の選手権を保持している。He still holds the heavyweight title.
以前はタバコを吸い、かなりのヘビースモーカーでした。I used to smoke. I was quite a heavy smoker.













彼らはヘリコプターで救出された。They were rescued by helicopter.




















ヘルメットをかぶらずにバイクに乗るのは危険だ。It is dangerous to ride a motorbike without a helmet.

彼はヘロインの常習者だ。He is a heroin addict.









ベーコンかソーセージはいかがか。Would you like bacon or sausage?




キューバリブレはラム酒をベースにしたカクテルです。A Cuba Libre is a cocktail with a rum base.


我々は吹雪の中をベースキャンプに戻るのに苦労した。We found it very hard going back to our base camp in the blizzard.




トップのリーダーは犬の行動学では「アルファ」と呼ばれ、以下「ベータ」「ガンマ」と続きます。In dog ethology the leader is called 'alpha'; after that it continues with 'beta' and 'gamma'.


ベートーベンは偉大な音楽家であった。Beethoven was a great musician.
会議は秘密のベールに包まれていた。The conference was cloaked in secrecy.

















ベジタリアンなので、できればお肉は遠慮したい。I'm a vegetarian, so I'd rather not have meat, if that's okay.
それぞれの選手がベストをつくした。Each player did his best.


この本はかつてはベストセラーだったが、今は絶版になっている。This book, which was once a best seller, is now out of print.

その先生は私たちの学校でベストドレッサーと見られている。The teacher is counted as the best dresser in our school.






どんなベッドでもないよりはよい。Any bed is better than no bed.

典型的なベッドタウンで、昼間においても人通りが少ない。It's a classic commuter town, even during the day there are few people around.


あれほどのベテランにもかかわらず、彼はどうしてよいのかわからなかった。For all his experience, he had no idea what to do with it.





ベニヤ板で十分だとのこと、教えられたとおりベニヤ板で作ることにします。Having been informed that plywood is sufficient, I will make it with plywood, as instructed.



しばらくの間、ベビーをみていてね。Keep an eye on the baby for a while.

そのベビーカーはうちのです。That stroller is ours.

うちの子供たちは、ベビーシッターに世話をしてもらった。Our little children were taken care of by the babysitter.





風がベランダの埃を吹き飛ばした。The wind blew the dust from the balcony.ネギをベランダに起きっぱなしにしていたら、カスカスになった。I left some scallions out on the veranda for too long and they dried out.






火事の時はベルを鳴らせよ。In case of fire, ring the bell.



彼女は腰に革のベルトをしている。She is wearing a leather belt around her waist.



例えばベルベットモンキーは、輪を描いて飛ぶワシがいるとある種の呼びかけを用いるようになる。ワシはサルを捕食するのだ。For example, vervet monkeys learn to use a certain call in the presence of circling eagles, who prey on the monkeys.
ベルボーイがお部屋にご案内します。The bellboy will show you to your room.
どうしたの、ベルボトムなんかはいて。Have you lost your marbles, wearing those bell-bottoms?









リナックスをサポートしているベンダーもいます。There are also vendors who support Linux.

私たちは公園のベンチに座った。We sat on the bench in the park.



当社はアンケート入力、アンケート集計のお手伝いをする少数精鋭のベンチャーです。Our company is a small but elect venture business that assists in entry and totalling of questionnaires.






もう３ページ残っている。I have three more pages to go.このページのコピーを３枚とってください。Please make three copies of this page.２２ページの一節を読んで下さい。Read the passage on page 22, please.







国民総生産の伸びはまったく遅いペースです。The GNP has been growing at a snail's pace.




日本創刊を果たしたイギリス発のホームレスの人だけが販売者となれるストリートペーパー「ビッグイシュー」について紹介しよう。I shall be introducing the street paper that is only sold by the homeless, "The Big Issue", started in England and has had its first Japanese issue.




俺、ペーパードライバーだから運転には自信ないんだ。電車でどこかに行こうよ。I'd rather go by train. I have a license, but no real driving experience, so I'm not very sure of myself behind the wheel.
この本のペーパーバック版はありますか。Is there a paperback edition of this book?


























その年はペストがはやった。The plague occurred that year.
ブレーキペダルを押して、ブレーキライトをつけてみてください。Press the brake pedal to turn on your brake lights.

彼はいわゆるペダンチックな男だ。He is what is called a pedant.






その人たちはココに新しいペットをあげようとしました。They tried to give Coco a new pet.
















アスピリン、ペニシリン、サルファ剤にアレルギーです。I am allergic to aspirin, penicillin, and sulfa drugs.









サブマリンのペリスコープが水中からにょっきり突き出ていた。The submarine's periscope was sticking right out of the water.

ペルーの共通語は何ですか。What is the common language in Peru?





ペンか鉛筆を持っていますか。Do you have a pen or a pencil?
彼は戸を白のペンキでくまなく塗った。He painted the door over white.



両親はスキーヤー用のペンションを経営しています。My parents run a pension for skiers.





君にこのペンダントをあげるよ。I'll give you this pendant.




あなたのペンパルになりたいのです。I would like to be your pen pal.
彼女は月に２回ロンドンのペンフレンドに手紙を出します。She writes to her pen pal in London twice a month.




彼はホースを使って庭に水を撒いていました。He was watering his garden with a hose.







列車は１０番ホームに到着します。The train will come in at platform ten.








全てのホームゲームのためのシーズンパスを買った。I got a season's pass to all the home games.

ホームシックとは、自分の出身地に戻りたいと思う願いのことである。Homesickness is a longing to go back to where you are from.


ホームステイをするにはスポンサーの面接を受けなくてはならない。In order to qualify for the homestay you must have an interview with the sponsors.
ランナーはコーナーを回ってホームストレッチへ入った。The runners rounded the corner into the homestretch.
















観客は彼のホームランに興奮した。His home run excited the crowd.


第４に、日本の私のホームルームのクラスには、能力が大幅に違う生徒がいました。Fourth, my homeroom class in Japan included students of a wide range of abilities.

ホールには聴衆が大勢いた。There was a large crowd in the hall.

ホールインワンは概して感動的だ。A hole in one is moving on the whole.


たった今、ホールドアップされました。I was just mugged.

ホイールに剛性があると、・・・の安定性は増す。Rigid wheels give sufficient stability to a low-speed vehicle steered by outside forces.

ホイッスルの音を聞くやいなや、彼らは全速力で走りだした。On hearing the whistle, they started at full speed.




魅力的なホステスのために乾杯！Let's drink to our charming hostess!

パーティーでは誰がホストを勤めるのですか。Who will host the party?



私の世話をしてくれたホストファミリーに送るつもり。I want to thank my host family.




ホッチキスを貸してくれませんか。Will you please lend me a stapler?

ボクシングやホッケーのようなスポーツは好きです。I like such sports as boxing and hockey.

あやはホットピンクや電子ブルーや深紫といった激しい色が好きだ。Aya likes intense colors, such as hot pink, electric blue and deep purple.







ホットドッグを２個、辛子とケチャップつきでおねがいします。I'll have two hot dogs with mustard and ketchup.










「さぁ、私のようにホップ、スキップ、ジャンプ」小さい白いウサギが言いました。"Let's play Hop Skip And Jump like me," said the little white rabbit.

あなたはこのホテルのお客ですか。Are you staying at this hotel?
彼はホノルル経由で帰ってきた。He came back by way of Honolulu.


ここだけの話だが、彼はホモらしい。Between ourselves, he seems to be a homosexual.









近年では人間心理の謎を扱うサイコホラーも人気である。Psycho-horror films dealing with the mysteries of human psychology are popular these days.















ホワイトさんはみんなに好かれています。Miss White is liked by everyone.

なぜ、会社によって、ブルーカラーの人のほうが、ホワイトカラーの人より給料がいいのですか？Why are, depending on the company, blue-collar workers better paid than white-collar ones?






首相はホワイトハウスを公式訪問した。The premier paid a formal visit to the White House.










ボーイさん、コーヒー３つください。Waiter, three coffees, please.
ボーイスカウトの団員が増えた。The membership of the Boy Scout troop swelled.



私はボーイフレンドにぜんぜん不自由させていません。I never want for a boyfriend.













橋の上流に私はボートを見た。I saw a boat above the bridge.


ボードに掲示を張ってください。Stick a notice on the board.




ボーナス全部を買い物と旅行に使ってしまった。I blew my whole bonus on shopping and travel.
夜はたいていボウリングに行きます。At night, we usually go bowling.
バッターのカウントはツーストライクツーボール。The batter has two balls and two strikes on him.


ボールペンで申込書に記入しなさい。Fill out the form in ballpoint.






彼はバスのボイコット運動を組織したのである。He organized a boycott of the bus service.





ボイラは湯あかがびっしりついた。The boiler was heavily scaled.

彼女はミルクをボールに注いだ。She poured the milk into a bowl.



そのボクサーはボディーに一撃食らった。The boxer received a blow to the body.
ボクシングは必ずしも荒っぽいスポーツではない。Boxing is not always a rough sport.


まるでボスのような話し方をする。You talk as if you were the boss.
私たちはボストンまでは行きませんでした。We didn't go as far as Boston.
ＮＡＴＯはそのときにボスニアのセルビア人の基地などを空爆した。At that time, NATO bombed the bases of the Bosnian Serbs.

コートのボタンが取れてたんだ。A button has come off my coat.緊急の場合は、このボタンを押しなさい。In case of an emergency, push this button.



あの町かどに公衆電話ボックスがある。There is a telephone booth at the corner of the street.





そのボクサーはボディーに一撃食らった。The boxer received a blow to the body.





彼はボディビルが趣味というだけあって体がガシッとしている。Bodybuilding is his hobby so he has a very firm tight body with lots of muscle definition.










そのボトルに水がいっぱい入っている。The bottle is filled with water.










彼らはボランティアを必要としている。They are in need of volunteers.
ラジオが大きすぎるからもっとボリュームを下げなさい。The radio is too loud. Turn the volume down.





掲示板には「危険！１万ボルト」と書いてある。The notice says, "Danger! 10,000 VOLTS."
二人の選手を相手にボレーの練習をする。Practice volleying against two players.








どうやってボンネットを開けるのですか。How do I open the hood?
その気体は圧縮されてボンベに詰め込まれた。The gas was compressed into a gas cylinder.


彼はポーカーがとても上手だ。He is very good at poker.







カップルは写真のためにポーズをとった。The couple posed for the photograph.
ポーターにあなたの荷物を運ばせなさい。Let a porter carry your baggage.


彼らは雨が止むまでポーチで待った。They waited on the porch until it stopped raining.
こういう風に合体すれば、１４ポートのＵＳＢハブになります。If you combine them in this way, you get a 14 port USB hub.





ヒトラーは１９３９年にポーランドを侵略した。Hitler invaded Poland in 1939.


そのポールは左に傾いた。The pole inclined to the left.




彼はポイントを生徒に充分わからせた。He drove a point home to his pupils.ダウ平均株価は今日２ポイント値上がりした。The Dow Jones average posted a gain of two points today.










ポケットに何を持っていますか。What do you have in your pocket?


このポケットベルはあなたのものですか。Is this beeper yours?





僕はバスケットボールチームの最後のポジションの申し込みをしようとスポーツ事務所へ行ったが、誰かが先を越してしまった。I went down to the sports office to sign up for the last position on the basketball team, but somebody else beat me to it.



彼は立ち止まってポスターをのぞき込んだ。He paused to look at the poster.



いったんポストに入れたものは、郵便局の所轄になる。Once a thing is posted, it is in the care of the Post Office.












コーヒーがポットの中で泡立った。The coffee bubbled in the pot.
あなたはポップソングが好きではないのですね？You don't like pop songs, do you?

ポップアップ広告をブロックする「Ｇｏｏｇｌｅ　ツールバー」Pop-up ad blocking "Google Toolbar"





若い人はポップスが好きだ。Young people like popular music.

長期にわたる病気のあとでジェーンはカウチ・ポテトになった。After being ill for a long time, Jane turned into a couch potato.
このポテトチップおいしくて後を引くね。These potato chips are good enough to make you want more.
もっとポテトチップスをご自由に召し上がれ。Help yourself to more potato chips.




髪をリボンで縛ってポニーテールにした。I used a ribbon to tie my hair into a ponytail.

毎年およそ４５００種のポピュラーのＬＰが登場する。Each year some 4500 different Pop LPs appear.






今年のポマトの生育はおしなべて良好です。On the whole, the pomato plants are growing well this year.





鼻にポリープがあるようです。I'm afraid I have a polyp in my nose.







彼らは自分たちの新しいコンセプトを広めるためにあるコミュニケーションポリシーを採用した。They implemented a communication policy so as to promote their new concept.




















アンゴラはかつてポルトガルの領土だった。Angola was once a Portuguese territory.
ニックはポルトガル語をとても上手に話せます。というのも５年間勉強しているからです。Nick can speak Portuguese very well. That's because he's been studying it for 5 years.
ポルノ映画はたいてい町のみすぼらしい所にある古びた映画館で上映される。Skinflicks usually play in old theaters in a sleazy part of town.


元来フットボールとは、ポロのように馬に乗って行われる競技とは違って、足で、ボールを使って行われる競技のことでした。Football originally meant "a game played with a ball on foot" - unlike a game played on horseback, such as polo.



彼女はバターを２ポンド買いました。She bought two pounds of butter.５ポンド紙幣をお持ちですか。Do you have a five-pound note?
ポンプはちゃんと動かなかった。The pump didn't work properly.

インキ補充瓶のキャップを外し、スポイトでインキを吸い上げ、マーカーの吸収体へ適量、滴下してください。Remove the cap from the ink refill bottle, fill the dropper with ink, and drip an appropriate amount onto the marker's core.

マーガリンをバターと間違えたの？Did you mistake the margarine for butter?




私はカレンダーの誕生日に赤いマークをつけた。I put a red mark on the calendar for my birthday.
htmlは、基本的ルールとして開始タグと終了タグでマークアップして要素とすると説明しました。We have explained that HTML is, as a basic rule, elements marked up with open and close tags.

あの大学はマークシート方式で入学試験を行っている。That university conducts its entrance examinations using a computer scored answer sheet.

マーケットが開いたとたんに火事がおきた。Scarcely had the market opened when the fire broke out.


同社の当面の重点はマーケットシェアの拡大である。The company's immediate priority is to expand the market share.





新サービスの料金設定はマーケティング部が行う。The marketing department is responsible for pricing new service.




「ちょっと、寮生相手にアンケートでもとってみる？」「あっ、いわゆるひとつのマーケティングリサーチだな」"Say, shall we try a questionnaire with the boarding students?" "Ah! One of those things they call 'marketing research'."












ウォッカマティーニをお願いします。A vodka martini, please.





夏はいつもマイアミに行ったものだ。During summers, I used to go to Miami.
友人はマイカーを欲しがっている。My friend wants a car of his own.
そのガイドは、私たちが彼女の言うことがよく聞こえるように、マイクを使っている。The guide is using a microphone for us to hear her better.
マイクロ波はオーブンの中の食物を突き抜ける。Microwaves penetrate the food in the oven.
その年の流行語はデジタルで、例えばデジタル時計、デジタルマイクロウエーブオーブンとか、デジタルペンであった。That year's buzzword was digital: digital clocks, digital microwave ovens, even digital pens.










このマイクロバスは25人乗りです。This minibus holds 25 persons.
















私は、ジミーにマイコンをかってやった。I bought Jimmy a home computer.
まだまだマイナーだが、遠からず近隣に出荷されるだろう。It's still minor league but in the not so distant future they'll be coming to a place near you.



昨夜、温度計はマイナス１０度を示した。The thermometer registered minus ten last night.彼のまじめさがかえってマイナスになった。His diligence turned out a disadvantage after all.


俺のマイナスドライバーどこにやった！！Where've you stuck my flat-head screwdriver?!
少数民族の雇用促進政策とはいっても、建前にすぎず、現状はマイノリティーが職に就けるチャンスなどほとんどない。Although many pay lip service to the idea of affirmative action, in reality, very few minorities get hired.
スミスさんは自分のマイペースな馬を田舎道で走らせた。Mr. Smith ran his sluggish horse along the country roads.
ところで、ベティ、夢のマイホームはもう決まった？So, Betty, have you decided on your dream home yet?


４マイルはかなりの距離だ。Four miles is a good distance.

「味がマイルドだな、この銘柄は」と父が言った。"This brand is very mild," Dad said.



マウスとキーボードを行ったりきたりするのが煩雑なので、キーボードのみで操作できるようショートカットキーはないのでしょうか？It's a fiddle going to and fro between the keyboard and mouse so are there shortcuts to allow operation using only the keyboard?












タイムマガジンを持ってきてください。Could you bring me a Time magazine?











マグニチュード５の地震が東京を見舞った。An earthquake of magnitude 5 shook Tokyo.
アルミニウム、マグネシウム、シリコンなどの粉末が爆発する。Powders of aluminium, magnesium, silicon, etc. explode.















部長が、すごいハイスペック・マシン買ったそうよ。The supervisor bought a really fast machine.





「・・・おい・・・おい、先生！」「え？・・・あ、ああ」「マジだいじょうぶ？休講にしたら？」"...Hey...Hey, teacher!" "Eh? Oh." "Are you really OK? Shouldn't you cancel the lesson?"
彼はちょっとしたマジシャンだ。He is something of a magician.
この指輪は、使用者に大いなる力を与えるマジックアイテムだ。This ring is a magic item that gives great power to its user.赤と黒のマジックかサインペン持ってない？I need red and black markers or felt-tip pens. Do you have any?














医師は鼻と口に白のマスクをしていた。The doctors wore white masks over their mouths and noses.

この犬は我が連隊のマスコットだ。This dog is our regimental mascot.
イメージはマスコミの情報に形成される。An image is formed by the information in the media.




１、２年でマスターするのは難しい。It is hard to master it in a year or two.



マスタードを別に持ってきてください。I'd like to have mustard on the side.





マストが折れて僕たちの船は漂流し始めた。The mast broke and our ship went adrift.



政府はともすればマスメディアを統制したがる。The government tends to control the media.














「帰ろ」「マックよってかない？」"Let's head back." "Shall we drop by McDonald's?"私はマックを使っていてウィンドウズ９５のファイルは読めません。I'm using a Mac and I can't read a Windows 95 file.
乗せられるのは１００キロがマックスです。A load of 100 kilograms is the max.






硫黄はマッチを作るのに使われる。Sulfur is used to make matches.




マットで靴を拭きなさい。Wipe your shoes on the mat.








マデイラはワインの名前だ。Madeira is the name of a wine.










誰が彼らにテーブルマナーを教えたんですか。Who taught them table manners?
あいつはカーマニアだから、車のことならなんでも知ってるよ。He's a car nut. Ask him anything.
先日、パソコンショップでＳＩＭＭの掴み取りをやっていた。いくらなんでもマニアックすぎる。I grabbed as much SIMM as possible in the computer shop the other day. Say what you like, it was more than just enthusiasm.

このマニキュアに合う色の口紅を探しているんですけれど。I'm looking for a lipstick to go with this nail polish.







君もこの手の仕事は初めてなんだろう？勝手がわかるまではマニュアル通りにやっておいたほうがいいよ。It's your first time doing this kind of work. You should follow the manual exactly until you get more experience.


船は明日マニラに向けて出発する。The ship is about to sail for Manila tomorrow.

「いいから金払えっての」「さっさとマネーよこせネ」"Just pay up already, I'm saying." "Hand over the money, Yo!"



彼のマネジメント能力は高く評価されている。He's well respected for his management skills.




スケジュールについてマネージャーと相談したい。I want to talk with the manager about the schedule.そのボクシング試合は完全に一方的だった。一方のボクサーはひどく打たれて怪我したので、そのマネージャーは敗北を認めなければならなかった。The boxing match was completely one-sided, one pug was so badly mauled that his manager had to throw in the sponge.












マフィアは隠れみのに合法的な事業を展開している。The Mafia uses legitimate business operations as a front.

私は初心者なので「ガーター編みのマフラー」か「一目ゴム編みのマフラー」から始めようと思います。I'm a beginner, so I think I'll start from a 'garter stitch' muffler or a 'knit-one-purl-one stitch' one.五次元のマフラーはよい音がする。The 5ZIGEN exhaust makes a nice sound.

ママのミルクはもう飲んだでちょ？泣かないでネンネしてくだちゃ〜い。You've already drunk mummy's milk. Don't cry, please go sleepy-sleep.
マヤ族の人々はボールをゴムで作っていました。The Mayas made their balls out of rubber.
マヨネーズの油は分離することがある。The oil in mayonnaise sometimes separates from the other ingredients.


私たちはそのマラソンに参加するつもりだ。We will take part in the marathon.
マラリアは蚊が媒介する。Malaria is carried by mosquitoes.







マリファナについてトムと議論した。I had an argument with Tom about the use of marijuana.















マルチするなアホ。Don't multi-post, idiot.
あなたはマルチーズは好きですか。Are you fond of Maltese dogs?


























これはマレーシアから輸入した原料です。This is a crude material imported from Malaysia.









マングースを見たことがないので、どんなものかわからない。Never having seen a mongoose, I do not know what they are like.

僕はまだマンゴーを食べたことがない。I have never eaten a mango before.

私のおじはマンションに住んでいる。My uncle lives in an apartment.





マンツーマンで指導して頂けたという点でも、非常に充実した実習になった。Just getting one-to-one guidance was enough to make it an extremely fulfilling practise session.




マントルピースの上にあるよ。It's on the mantelpiece.




この番組はマンネリになっている。This program has become stereotyped.

毎日マンハッタンの中心部にいくには１時間半もかかる。The daily trek to midtown Manhattan takes about an hour and a half.

マンパワーは世界で一番大きな人材派遣会社です。"Manpower" is the world's largest temp agency.




わたしたちの会社はマンモス会社で、繁雑な面を少くし能率を上げるために、改正あるいは撤廃すべき規則とか規約がいくつかある。Our firm is a giant one, and there are some rules and regulations, which should be revised or rescinded to reduce red tape and increase efficiency.




ミーティングを中止しなければならない。We have to call off the meeting.





私たちは博物館でミイラを見た。We saw a mummy at the museum.









ミサは、食べたり飲んだりしてイエスキリストを偲ぶカトリックの儀式だ。Mass is a Catholic ceremony of remembering Jesus Christ by eating and drinking.
ミサイル攻撃で多くの人命が失われた。The missile attack took a heavy toll of lives.



ランシングはミシガンの州都である。Lansing is the state capital of Michigan.
私は新しいミシンを買った。I bought a new sewing machine.
印刷ミスはすぐに指摘されなければならない。Mistakes in the printing should be pointed out at once.



上司のミスター田中が君を飲みに誘うかもしれないってことを言っておくね。I should tell you that my boss, Mr Tanaka, might try to take you drinking.




このミステリーのトリックは、奇想天外だ。This mystery has a plot twist that's completely novel.






この教科書は、急いで印刷したためにミスプリントがたくさんある。This textbook, having been printed in haste, has a lot of printing mistakes.



彼らはミズーリ州に植民する計画を立てている。They are planning to settle Missouri.








明日は朝イチで大事なミッションがあるのだ。こんなことしてる場合じゃない。Tomorrow, I've got an important mission first thing in the morning. I shouldn't be wasting my time with this.

木綿のミットをつければ赤ちゃんは自分の顔をひっかかなくなる。Cotton mittens will prevent the baby from scratching his own face.
その色は「ミッドナイト・ブルー」と言います。We call that color "midnight blue".




ステーキはミディアムで焼いて下さい。I like my steak medium.

私はステーキはミディアムレアが好きです。I like my steak cooked medium rare.





















ミニスカートはすぐに復活するだろう。Miniskirts will soon come back.ミニ・スカートをはいて、歩いたり、座ったりする少女たちは男の目を見はらすのにたいへん効果的である。Girls wearing mini-skirts, walking or sitting, are very effective eye-openers.




ミニディスクを売っていますか。Do you sell mini disks?




飲物のミニマムはありますか。Is there a drink minimum?




この食べ物は、それなくしては我々の身体が正しく機能しないすべてのミネラルを含んでいます。This food contains all the minerals without which our bodies would not function.
私はいつもミネラルウォーターを持ち歩いています。I always carry a bottle of mineral water with me.






この間ミュージカルに見に行ったんだけど、前から３列目でさ、もう憧れの人が目の前で、もう最高だったね。一段と彼を好きになった。I was at a musical recently, in the third row. Seeing the actor I love up close like that made me feel more smitten with him than ever.



彼はミュージシャンであることを誇りにしている。He is proud of being a musician.
私は場末のジャズクラブに行って、ライブミュージックを楽しみます。I like to go to a local jazz club where I can enjoy live music.










目の前で繰り広げられるやり取りは、俺が入り込む隙なんて一ミリもない。The exchange unfolding in front of my eyes had not a single millimetre of a gap in which for me to slip.









この定規にはミリメートルの目盛りがある。This ruler has the scale in millimeters.





このコップをミルクで満たした。I filled this glass with milk.

僕にミルクセーキを作ってください。Please make a milkshake for me.
朝食を２人分持ってきて下さい。メニューはＮｏ．２でミルクティもつけてください。Bring two breakfasts, please. Number 2 on the menu, and two teas with milk.


このミンクのコートは3,000ドルした。This mink cost $3,000.











街はクリスマスムード一色・・・もうじきイブだ。The streets are in full Christmas mood - it's almost Christmas Eve.













私の新しいムスタングを見せてなかったっけ？Didn't I show you my new Mustang?





そのテレビのメーカーは日本の企業である。The manufacturer of the television set is a Japanese company.

彼女はメーキャップを落としているところですよ。She's cleaning off the make-up.



メーターの数字を読んでください。Read the meter.ロープは、２〜３メーター短すぎた。The rope was a couple of meters too short.

つい先日の列車事故においてはメーデーを出す間もなく、多くの方々が命を奪われた。Only the other day in a railway accident, without the time to send out a mayday, many people lost their lives.

１マイルは約１６００メートルにあたる。A mile is equal to about 1,600 meters.
メイドは客を一人一人大声でとりついた。The maid announced each guest.


あなたからの最新のメールが見つかりません。再送していただけるでしょうか。I can't seem to find your last e-mail, I wonder if you can resend it to me.折り返しの見積書をメールで返信してください。We look forward to receiving your quote by return mail.
メールオーダー用のカタログを購入したいと思います。I would like to purchase your latest mail order catalogue.




昨日の競馬のメインレースは、とってもかたくおさまったよ。ああいうのを、銀行レースって言うんだよね。The main race yesterday was no surprise. That's the kind of race you can bank on.






その川はメインストリートと平行に流れている。The river runs parallel to the main street.




メイラー氏は明日までここに滞在の予定です。Mr Mailer is to stay here till tomorrow.




ＯＤＳスーパーアロイは粉末冶金技術を伴うメカニカルアロイ法により製造されます。ODS super alloy is produced by the mechanical alloy method following powder metallurgy.

この機械のメカニズムは複雑です。The mechanism of this machine is complicated.












我々は飛行機でメキシコへ旅行した。We traveled to Mexico by plane.





































ロイはそのメダルをピンで止めた。Roy fastened the medal with a pin.





このメッセージは意味をなさない。This message doesn't make sense.




このメディアには記録することができない。It is not possible to record in this media.













彼はサイモンとガーファンクルのメドレーを歌った。He sang a medley of Simon and Garfunkel hits.

もう一度メニューを見せていただけますか。Can I have the menu again, please?


私の電話番号をメモしましたか。Did you note down my phone number?

メモリ増設しようかな。Maybe I ought to expand the memory.














会議ではその計画のメリットを指摘しました。At the meeting I pointed out the plan's merit.










このメロディーは多くの日本人に知られている。This melody is familiar to many Japanese.


私はもうあなたに夢中、メロメロなのよ。I'm stuck on you - really far gone.
このメロン、スカスカじゃないの。だから安かったのか。This melon sounds hollow. Maybe that's why it was so cheap.






空腹はメンタル的に良くない。An empty stomach doesn't help on the mental front.






ボーリングに行くなら私をメンバーからはずしておいて。Count me out if you go bowling.



１９６８年４月、キング牧師はテネシー州メンフィスにいた。In April of 1968, Rev. King was in Memphis, Tennessee.



そのボートは動力にモーターを使用している。The boat uses a motor for the power.



どのようにしてモーターショーの入場券を無料で手に入れたのですか。How did you come by an admission ticket for the auto show free of charge?







君はモーツァルトの音楽は好きですか。Do you like Mozart's music?
このプログラムはＤＯＳモードでは作動しません。This program cannot be run in DOS mode.





７時にモーニングコールをお願いできますか。Could you give me a wake-up call at seven?
あの喫茶店のモーニングサービス結構いけるよ。That cafe has a pretty good breakfast special.






このモールの中にスーパーマーケットはありますか。Is there a supermarket in this mall?



局部には必ずモザイクをかけて下さい。Please ensure the genitals are obscured by a mosaic effect.

このモジュールを使用すると、エンターキーでイベントを生成することができます。With this module you can make the Enter key generate an event.






ナポレオンの軍隊はモスクワに進軍した。Napoleon's army has advanced to Moscow.






この付近はモダンな建物が多い。There are many modern buildings around here.

モダンジャズは私の趣味に合わない。Modern jazz is not to my taste.










このモップで床を綺麗にしてください。Please clean the floor with this mop.
この通りのモーテルはどこも満室だ。All the motels on this road are full.




モデムはコンピューターの中に組み込まれた。The modem was built into the computer.



彼は今までに９体の人型ロボットを製造していたが、その全てはデモンストレーションモデルだった。Up to now he had made nine humanoid robots but they were all demonstration models.彼女はモデルになる努力をしている。She is making an effort at becoming a model.彼のオートバイは最新モデルだ。His motorcycle is the latest model.











医師は患者の心臓の鼓動と血圧をモニターで監視した。The doctor monitored the patient's heartbeat and blood pressure.ディスプレイはモニタともいい、コンピュータなどの機器から出力される静止画または動画の映像信号を表示する機器である。A display, aka monitor, is an appliance that displays video signal of still images and moving pictures produced by a computer or similar device.




































皆さんは、モラルを大切にしていますか。Do you all place great importance on morals?











彼女はモルヒネ注射によって無痛の状態になった。She was kept under with morphine injections.

来週モロッコへ出発します。I will be leaving for Morocco next week.
例えばベルベットモンキーは、輪を描いて飛ぶワシがいるとある種の呼びかけを用いるようになる。ワシはサルを捕食するのだ。For example, vervet monkeys learn to use a certain call in the presence of circling eagles, who prey on the monkeys.









世界中のモンスターと戦えるのかぁ・・・。腕がなるなぁー。Fighting with monsters all over the world ... I just can't wait.








１ヤードは３フィートに等しい。A yard is equal to three feet.




警官がヤンキーに足を撃たれた。The policeman was shot in the leg by a delinquent.










この歌の名前は『オンリー・ユー』です。This song's name is "Only You".





マザー・テレサは１９１０年にユーゴスラビアで生まれた。Mother Teresa was born in Yugoslavia in 1910.

純粋に、ミクシィユーザーが言うところの「変な人」ってどんな人なのか、私にはいまいちわからないのだ。It's simply that I don't really understand what an "oddball" is when said by a Mixi user.










駐禁で切符を切られた直後にＵターン禁止でつかまった。運が悪いというか、弱り目に祟り目というか。It wasn't my lucky day. First, I got a parking ticket and then things went from bad to worse when I got pulled over for making a U-turn.





私自身はユーフォーを一度も見たことがない。I myself have never seen a UFO.



彼には素晴らしいユーモアのセンスがある。He has a great sense of humour.
ユーモラスな話から気持ちの悪い話まで、前巻同様にいろいろなタイプの話が楽しめます。From humorous to creepy stories, like the last volume, you can enjoy various types of stories.




私は一日に100ユーロ稼ぎます。I make 100 euros per day.












ユダヤ人の過越の祭りが近づき、イエスはエルサレムに上がられた。When it was almost time for the Jewish Passover, Jesus went up to Jerusalem.
ユナイテッドの１１１便に乗り換えるのですが。I have a connecting flight on UA 111.
会社にパンタロンとアロハシャツを着てくる彼は、かなりユニークな存在だ。He's a pretty unique guy, wearing bell bottoms and Hawaiian shirts to the office.


イギリス人はライオンと同じくらいユニコーンを愛する。The English love the unicorn as much as they love the lion.





２０ユニット以上注文したら、値引きしていただけますか。If we place an order for more than 20 units, would you reduce the price?

















チームのメンバーは道具とユニフォームを提供されます。Team members are provided with equipment and uniforms.





このヨーグルトは変な味がする。This yogurt tastes strange.



ヨーロッパにいる間に僕はパリをたずねた。I visited Paris in Europe.


そのヨットはブイを回って航行した。The yacht sailed round a buoy.


この事があったのは、ヨルダンの向こう岸のベタニヤであって、ヨハネはそこで、バプテスマを授けていた。This all happened at Bethany on the other side of Jordan, where John was baptizing.




私達は時々、ドライブを兼ねて大好きなラーメンを食べに行きます。We sometimes combine going for a drive with eating the ramen we love so.



ライオンは百獣の王です。The lion is the king of beasts.


ライスとキャベツをお代わりお願いします。Can I have seconds on rice and cabbage?


政府はライセンスなしに銃を携帯することを禁じている。The government prohibits us from carrying guns without a license.
お客様、テーブルにライターをお忘れですよ。Sir, you have left your lighter on the table.






突然ライトが消えた。All of a sudden, the lights went out.







私は屋根をライトブルーに塗った。I painted the roof light blue.








彼は自分のライバルをひどくこきおろした。He criticized his rival severely.







あなたのライフスタイルを見直してみましょう。Take a fresh look at your lifestyle.



突然ライフルの銃声がした。Suddenly there was a rifle shot.
その学者はライフワークを続けた。The scholar carried on his lifework.
私は場末のジャズクラブに行って、ライブミュージックを楽しみます。I like to go to a local jazz club where I can enjoy live music.







ライラックの花を見るには２、３週間待たねばならない。We must wait for a few weeks to see the lilacs.
相手チームはラインを越えさせまいとしたのです。The other team tried to keep them from crossing the line.






木曽川はしばしば日本のライン川と呼ばれている。The Kiso River is often called the Rhine of Japan.


全従業員ラウンジに発表を掲示します。We will post the announcement in all the staff lounges.

彼は第一ラウンドの一発のパンチでノックアウトされた。He was knocked out by a punch in the first round.











ラグビーをしているとき、彼はけがをした。Playing rugby, he got injured.

好きなラケットを選びなさい。Choose your favorite racket.










ラジウムを発見したのはマリー・キュリーであった。It was Marie Curie who discovered radium.

そのニュースはラジオで聞いたよ。I heard the news on the radio.















ラスト・オーダーは締め切らせていただきました。Last call!






プラモ作りは家でやってくださいよ。ラッカー液の臭い、充満してるじゃないですか。Please do your model building at home! The room's full of the smell of lacquer.
インテルの連中は君を得てラッキーだよ。The Intel people are lucky to have you!

上着と帽子を向こうのラックにかけなさい。Hang your coat and hat up on the rack over there.
あいにく朝の通勤ラッシュにぶつかった。Unfortunately, I hit the morning rush hour.
ラッシュアワーの交通渋滞にあった。I was caught in the rush hour.





私はお姉ちゃんの夕飯をラップに包んでしまわないと。I have to wrap my sister's dinner in cling film.




一番多かったのは、ヨーロッパからであったが、ラテン・アメリカ、アジア、アフリカ、オーストラリア、カナダからも大勢がやってきた。The greatest number came from Europe, but many also came from Latin America, Asia, Africa, Australia, and Canada.

その言葉はラテン語から来ている。The word is derived from Latin.

























君はラブストーリーが好きじゃないんだね。You don't like love stories.
この歌はラブソングです。This song is a love song.



今度書く小説でラブホテルが舞台になるんで、一度実際に見ておきたかったんです。The novel I'm writing next is set in a love hotel so I wanted to see what one actually looks like.
これは一種のラブレターだよ。This is a kind of love letter.




このラベルは簡単につきますよ。This label sticks easily.


この山を登ればラボに着きます。If you climb up this mountain, you'll reach the lab.













フレッドの意見がしゃくにさわったラリーは、居丈高な態度に出た。Because he thought Fred's comment was tacky, Larry got up on his high horse.



ランキング参加中です。面白ければ、ポチッと♪This site is in a toplist. If you found it interesting, please click!
この歌はヒットチャートの第１位にランクされています。This song is No. 1 on the hit chart.











あなたはこの店のランチがえらくお気に入りですね。You are very fond of the lunch menu of this restaurant.Microsoftがβ版をランチするのは「NetShow streaming server」で動画や音声をオンデマンドで提供する。What Microsoft is launching is a beta version of its "NetShow streaming server"; it supplies video and audio on demand.











ランドリーには洗剤がありますか。Are there any detergents in the laundry?
神田さんは何と速いランナーでしょう。What a fast runner Miss Kanda is!

私は毎朝朝食前にランニングをする。I run before breakfast every morning.







このランプは強い光線を出す。This lamp sends out a powerful beam.









今シーズンは我々のチームがリーグで優勝した。Our team has topped the league this season.








日本は世界のハイテク産業のリーダーだ。Japan is a leader in the world's high-tech industry.
力と脅しによるリーダーシップには確かにマイナス面があることは確かだ。Certainly there are downsides to leadership by coercion and force.










そのレースでは彼がリードしている。He has the lead in the race.



いったんはやりだしたら、リーバイスのジーンズは決してすたれなかった。Once they came in, Levi's never went out of fashion.












薫、今のところおまえが一番のリアクション、大賞だよ。Kaoru, yours is the best reaction so far - you win the grand prize.








まさかリアルに借金の催促だったの？No way, is this really a debt collection call?













このクリームは、リキッドっぽくて使いやすい。This is more like a liquid than a facial cream. That makes it easy to use.



そんなことリクエストしていません。I didn't request you to do that.


あの政治家はいわゆるリクルート・スキャンダルが発覚して以来落ち目になってしまった。That politician has come down in the world since the so-called "Recruit scandal" was publicized.





ボブとメアリーはリコーダーを演奏します。Bob and Mary play the recorder.






私たちは、より多くのゴミをリサイクルするようにもっと気を付けるべきです。We should be more careful to recycle more trash.


その少女はリサイタルでのすばらしい踊りで、入賞した。The girl took the cake for her wonderful dancing at the recital.
いつもあのお店は混んでいるけど、今日は席をリザーブしてあるから大丈夫。That place is always crowded, but I reserved a table today, so we don't have to worry.




銀行はリスクの高い顧客へのローンには高い金利をつける。Banks charge higher interest on loans to risky customers.





あなたの名前はリストからはずされた。Your name was dropped from the list.
今度は話題が途切れないように手のひらにリストアップしとこう。This time, so I don't run out of things to talk about, I'll write a list on the palm of my hand.




リスニングの練習は単調になってしまうことがある。Listening practice tends to be monotonous.


リスボンへ行くには海からが一番よい。The best approach to Lisbon is by sea.
子供はごく小さいときからリズミカルな音に反応することを身に付けていく。Children learn to respond to rhythmical sounds from a very young age.
妻はアメリカでの新しい生活のリズムに慣れるのにえらい苦労した。My wife had a hard time getting into the swing of our new life in America.

リセッションは一般的傾向としては経済活動が増大している時に一時的に落ち込むことである。Recession is a temporary falling off of business activity during a period when such activity is generally increasing.
今の子供たちは人生におけるどのような問題でもリセットできると思っている。Kids these days think that any issue in life can be resolved as easily as restarting a computer game.

現在はＴＥＴＲＡの操作的な意味を 「すべての消費可能なリソースを消費する」と与えている。At present "consume all consumable resources" is assigned as the operational meaning of TETRA.
いかにもリゾートってかんじの格好ね。Your clothes say "vacation resort" to me.















リッチ氏は彼女の好意に感謝した。Mr Rich acknowledged her favor.
ガソリンはリットル単位で売られる。Gasoline is sold by the liter.





ディールに近いリプルを出てすぐのところに住んでいます。She lives just outside Wripple, which is near Deal.













彼はリトル・ジョンと呼ばれる大男だった。He was a big man called Little John.














１０分休憩してからまたリハーサルを続けました。After a ten-minute break, we resumed our rehearsal.
彼はリハビリの後、毎朝散歩するようになりました。He came to take a walk every morning after rehabilitation.




車のギアを入れずにリバースを入れたので店先に多大な損害を与えた。Instead of putting the car into gear, she put it into reverse, causing a great deal of damage to the store-front.



















うちのマンションも古くなったから、リフォームして気分を換えるか。This condo is getting old. Why don't we redecorate to give it a fresh feel?








とても気分がリフレッシュされる。I feel like a brand new person.










米国において「リベート」は、主にメーカーが消費者に直接提供するインセンティブ手段として広く認識されている。In America 'rebate' is widely recognized, generally as an incentive where makers give back directly to consumers.社長はリベートを支払った件で告発されました。The company president was indicted for paying kickbacks.










リボンをかけてもらえますか。Could you tie it with a ribbon?





・・・・おいおいおい、奢りとわかったらリミッター解除ですか二人とも。... Hey-hey you two, is it no holds barred as soon as you know it's my treat?






車？ああ・・・あのリムジンでしたら、私がチャーターした物ですわ。Car? Ah, if you mean that limousine, - I chartered it.リムジンは何時に空港に出発しますか。What time does the shuttle bus leave for the airport?







テレビのリモコンがソファーの下にある。The TV remote control is under the couch.


医者によれば、彼女はリューマチをわずらっている。The doctor says she suffers from rheumatism.
彼女は背中にリュックサックを背おっている。She is carrying a backpack on her back.




その医者は手術の前に患者をリラックスさせた。The doctor made his patient relax before the operation.
Mozilla Foundationは5月1日、メール/ニュースクライアントソフトの最新版「Thunderbird 2.0.0.14」をリリースした。The Mozilla Foundation released the latest version of its email/news-client software, "Thunderbird 2.0.0.14" on May 1st.






リレー用のバトンが１本足りないんです。We're one baton short for the relay.






トムがブログに私のサイトへのリンクを貼ってくれた。Tom linked to my website from his blog.

彼はこれまでいとも簡単にたくさんの挑戦者をリングに沈めてきた。He's mowed down a parade of challengers before.




あ、ごめんなさい。めぐみ。リンスを取っていただけますか。Ah, sorry. Megumi, could you get me the conditioner?





ルーは、バターと小麦粉を炒めながら作ります。Roux is made while cooking flour and butter together.カレーのルーは非常に滋養に富んでいる。Curry sauce is very nourishing.








あなたがどのルートをとっても、そこに着くのは間に合うでしょう。Whichever route you take, you will get there in time.















ルームサービスはまだやっていますか。Is room service still available?
ルームチャージは一晩１００ドルです。The room charge is 100 dollars a night.
私たちは４年間ルームメイトだった。We stayed roommates for four years.




このルールはすべての場合に当てはまる。This rule applies to all cases.
利益追求に必死のブローカーは、必ずしもルールブックにのっとっているとは限らないのです。Brokers struggling to make a profit don't always play by the book.









私はなぜか、ルックスに関わらず三枚目の人を好きになることが多いんです。I often find myself falling for jokers, regardless of their looks.


イタリアンルネッサンスを開花させるきっかけを作ったのはジョットの功績だ。Giotto is credited with sowing the seeds of the Italian Renaissance.











見日はレークジェニーバをかたどって池を造った。Ken'nichi made a pond in the shape of Lake Geneva.
グランプリに勝つことは有名なレーサーにとっては名誉であった。Winning the Grand Prix was a feather in the cap of the famous drivers.




レーシング・カーのドライバー達は、大金をねらうばかりでなく、また、レースのスリルを味わおうとするのである。Racing car drivers aren't just in it for the prize money but also for the thrill of racing.
あのレースは八百長だった。The race was fixed.

その船にはレーダーが装備されていた。The boat was equipped with radar.

ドルの交換レートは、今いくらですか。What is the exchange rate for dollars now?




レール温度が上昇した影響で、列車は３０分遅れで到着した。The train arrived 30 minutes late due to a rise in the temperature of the rails.彼女はレールのように痩せていた。She was as thin as a rail.

ステーキはレアが好きです。I like my steak rare.










レイプ危機運動の内部においては、グリーンサイトによる異議表明は重要な意義を持っている。Within the rape crisis movement, Greensite's dissent is significant.

これらのグラフィック・デザインの背景に配置されているレイヤーの機能に注目しよう。Note the function of the background layers of these graphic designs.


雨が私のレインコートの下までしみとおった。The rain penetrated my raincoat.







彼はサッカー部のレギュラーだった。He was a regular member of the soccer club.レギュラー満タンでお願いします。Fill it with regular, please.






スキーをすることは良いレクリエーションである。Skiing is a good form of recreation.


レゲエのことをどう思いますか。What do you think of reggae?

ＣＤはすっかりレコードに取って代わった。Compact discs have entirely taken the place of phonograph records.










レシートはなくしてしまったのですが、返金できますか。I lost my receipt. Can I still get a refund?





くしくも、レジでの合計額は７７７円であった。Strangely, the cash register's total was 777 yen.レジはどこですか。Where's the checkout counter?



4つのレジスタは、呼び出された関数側が保存する。The contents of the four registers are preserved by the called subroutine.



彼女はここにレジャーで来たのですか。Did she come here to relax?



男性からの投稿や記事へのレスは一切お断りしております。Men are absolutely not allowed to post or reply to articles.
兄はレスキュー隊のメンバーだ。My brother is a member of the rescue squad.


いいレストランをご存知でしょうか。Do you know a good restaurant?





喫茶店に入ったら、二人の青年がテレビでレスリングの試合を見ていた。As I entered the café, I found two young men watching a wrestling match on television.

旧友がレセプションに招かれた。Old friends were invited to the reception.











このレッスンはやさしい事が分かるでしょう。You will find this lesson easy.

そして、こうしたものからほんのわずかしか隔たっていない知覚が、直接的な信号がまったくないのにおこる、「超感覚的な」というレッテルを付けざるを得ない知覚なのである。And it is only a very short step from there, to perception which occurs in the absence of all immediate signals and has to be labeled extrasensory.



彼女はレディーと呼ぶにふさわしい人だ。She is a very correct lady.



そいつは衰退のレトリックというものだ。But it's the rhetoric of failure.
時間無いから、レトルトでいいか？There's no time, so ready-made pack OK?

この喫茶店は、独特のレトロさが若者にうけている。The retro feel of this cafe is a hit with young people.





料理のレパートリーは限られてるの。I don't know how to cook too many things.







規則にうるさいレフェリーは試合を台無しにしかねない。A fussy referee can ruin a bout.

レフトが好走して大飛球を捕った。The left fielder ran hard and caught the long fly.





国際レベルの運動選手になるためには、毎日練習しなければならない。One must practice every day in order to become a world-class athlete.





そのレポーターは戦争について直接に知った。The reporter learned about war first hand.
いつレポートを提出するのですか。When do we hand in the report?

オレンジはレモンよりも甘いんだよ。Oranges are sweeter than lemons.


レモンティーを一杯ください。A tea with lemon, please.






レンジャーが道を拓く。The Rangers lead the way.
レンズを通ると像は逆になった。Through the lens the image was inverted.

キャロルはレンタカーを運転しています。Carol is driving a rent-a-car.

ハーツ社とエイビィス社はカーレンタルの業界でしのぎを削っている。Hertz and Avis are head to head competitors in the car rental business.

この店はレンタルビデオ店です。This shop is a rental video shop.


この間、歯医者行ったら、念のためとか言われて、歯型とレントゲンをとられた。いい商売してるよ。I went to the dentist recently and he did a cast of my teeth and took an X-ray, just in case. It sounds like a good business to be in.


















飲む分だけ豆をローストして、ミルで挽くんです。We roast just enough beans for the amount we're going to drink, and grind them in the coffee mill.
もっとローストビーフを召し上がれ。How about some more roast beef?

ローズはしゃぼん玉を吹いていた。Rose was blowing bubbles.

ロゼを一本ください。We'd like a bottle of rosé.





５人の選手でローテーションを組んだ。Five pitchers are to take the mound in rotation.
女の子はローティーンで化粧していますよ。Girls use makeup in their low teens.






ロードマップをください。May I have a road map, please?







ローブをなおしなさい。Pull your robe together.

このロープは強いですね。This rope is strong, isn't it?





フロントローラーのスラスト角は２度、多分レース時にはもう少し角度を強める予定です。The front-roller thrust angle is 2 degrees, probably there were plans to strengthen that angle a little when racing.

この公園でローラースケートをしてもいいですか。Can we roller-skate in this park?






ロールプレイングのテレビゲームは時間を食う。Role-playing video games are time consuming.




ローンの金利は現在高い。Interest on loans is high at present.






ログアウトするんじゃなかったよ。I shouldn't have logged off.
ログインできませんでした。再度ログインしてください。Your login attempt was not successful. Please try again.

システムにログオンするにはＣｔｒｌ＋Ａｌｔ＋Ｄｅｌキーを押してください。Please push the Ctrl+Alt+Del key to log on the system.







その飛行機は補助ロケットを使って離陸した。The airplane used a rocket motor to assist with takeoff.





デザインも、アーチ型のロゴデザインにより現代的で「登場感」「躍動感」のあるものに仕上げました。The design was also given the finishing touch to have launch impact and dynamism provided by the novelty of the arch shaped logo design.





ロシア語は大層学びにくい。Russian is very difficult to learn.







近道を行って時間のロスを埋め合わせるつもりだ。We are going to make up for lost time by taking a short cut.








学生たちはめいめい個人用のロッカーがある。Each of the students has his own locker.



彼は自転車のロックのダイヤルを回した。He turned the dial on the bicycle lock.



ロッククライミングも、海で深く潜ることもしたし、インドネシアの熱帯雨林で眠ったこともある。I've done rock climbing and deep-sea diving and slept in an Indonesian jungle.



ロックンロールは若い世代の発明だった。Rock and roll was a creation of the young generation.
ロッジはひぎめでかりられる。The lodge rents by the day.

右手には、いかにも、「魔法少女アイテムです」と言わんばかりの怪しげなロッドが握られていた。In her right hand was gripped a suspicious looking rod that practically radiated "I'm a magical girl item".



７時までにロビーに来てください。Please come to the lobby by 7 o'clock.

法案通過を推進しているロビイストは、運動資金に賄賂の金をまぎれこませました。Lobbyists for the bill funneled bribes into a campaign fund.


パッシングではなくロブで勝負だ。Rather than passing, lobbing is the way to win.
彼らはロブスターとステーキのごちそうを食べた。They feasted on lobster and steak.
彼はロボットを動かそうとした。He tried to make the robot run.

どこをどう考えたら、俺がロボット工学に明るいなどと思うんだろうか。Where did you come up with the idea that I'm familiar with robotics and such I wonder?





















その列車はロンドン行きだ。The train is bound for London.






仕事中毒にかかっている人はワーカホリックと呼ばれている。A person who is addicted to work is called a workaholic.










君のワークブックの最初の例題をしなさい。Do the first example in your workbook.




今度の秘書は１分間に７０ワードもタイプが打てる。The new secretary types about 70 words per minute.
ワードプロセッサーの使い方を知っていますか。Do you know how to use a word processor?



このワープロをお借りしていいですか。May I use this word processor?






アトランタ・ブレーブスは、ワールドシリーズで優勝できると思いますか。Do you think the Braves will take the series?
このワイシャツは首まわりが合わない。This shirt doesn't fit me round the neck.

いつもワイドな視野を持って、仕事をしなさい。You should always keep a broad perspective on the work you do.








操り人形はワイヤーで動く。Puppets work with wires.





しかし、その時、彼はロンドンで語学を学んでいる学生のジェーン・ワイルドを恋するようになった。But then he fell in love with Jane Wilde, a student studying languages in London.

あのおいしいワインをなぜ飲まないんだい。Why not try that delicious wine?


そのワイングラスの取り扱いには気を付けてね。You must be careful with the wine glass.

いいワインリストがなかったら、ここでは食事しないよ。Unless they have a good wine list, I don't want to eat here.
その町を色にたとえていうと、ワインレッドかな、こう、なんか気品があって、落ち着くのよね。If that city were a color, it would be a color with a quiet sort of dignity ... wine red, say.


流感の予防ワクチンの注射をした。I was vaccinated against the flu.
彼のワゴンがマーケットの入り口で止まった。His wagon drew up at the entrance to the market.


ワシントン市の友人宅に泊まります。I'm staying at my friend's house in Washington City.


その車は１日おきにワックスがかけられる。The car is waxed every other day.
１平方メートルの太陽光発電パネルの出力は約１ワットであり、今のところ大規模に太陽電力を利用するのは困難である。The output power of a one square meter solar panel is about one watt, so it is difficult to use solar power on a large scale at present.














このワンピースはいくらですか。How much is this dress?






あの犬、一日中ワンワンワンワン吠えてるんだから。That dog has been barking 'Ruff-ruff-ruff-ruff!' all day long.赤ん坊がベッドの中でわんわん泣いていた。The baby was crying in bed.







真鍮は銅と亜鉛の合金である。Brass is an alloy of copper and zinc.






















アメリカでは英語を話します。They speak English in America.コロンブスが１４９２年にアメリカを発見したということを私たちは学んだ。We learned that Columbus discovered America in 1492.
アメリカ合衆国は共和国である。The United States is a republic.












アラビアでは肉をとるために小羊を飼っている。They keep lambs for meat in Arabia.











彼女は哀れを誘う有様だった。She was in a piteous state.彼は神にあわれな少女を助けてくださいと祈った。He prayed to God to help the poor girl.

暴君の心は哀れみの情で和らいだ。The tyrant's heart melted with compassion.
人々はその孤児を哀れんだ。People took pity on the orphan.






彼は妻に別れないでくれと哀願した。He entreated his wife not to leave him.











この歌は哀調をおびている。This song sounds sad.

ご尊父のご逝去に対し、謹んで哀悼の意を表します。Please accept my condolences on the death of your father.





愛の動きは不可解。Love moves in mysterious ways.
少女は人形をいとしげに抱き締めた。The girl squeezed her doll affectionately.


ロメオはジュリエットが愛している男だ。Romeo is the man Juliet loves.

心静かに花鳥風月を愛でる気持ちの余裕も最近になってでてきたよ。Lately I've had the time to quietly enjoy the wonders of nature.


その女の子は小さな愛らしい口元をしている。The girl has a sweet, small mouth.
彼女はその子を自分の子として愛育した。She cherished the child as her own.


叔父は大の愛煙家です。彼にとってタバコは欠くことができない。My uncle is a very heavy smoker; tobacco is indispensable to him.

彼女はオウムを愛玩している。She keeps a parrot as a pet.



彼女はけっして美人ではないが、何とも言えない愛敬がある。She is not at all a beauty, but she has an indescribable charm.
私の愛犬に対する愛情は浅からぬものがあった。My love for my dog was very deep.

日頃のご愛顧にお礼申し上げます。We really thank you for your patronage.

フランス人は芸術を愛好すると言われている。The French are said to love art.
推理小説愛好家のための特別な休日です。It's a special holiday for people who like detective stories.
彼は世間でいう音楽の真の愛好者だ。He's what society calls a real lover of music.
家庭愛に愛国精神の根源がある。The spirit of patriotism has its source in the love of the family.
何人も空の胃の腑では愛国者たり得ない。No man can be a patriot on an empty stomach.
彼は愛国主義的な感情で興奮した。He was excited by nationalistic sentiment.
国家主義と愛国心とを混同してはならない。Nationalism is not to be confused with patriotism.
「うちの愛妻がケチでさー」「のろけてる？愚痴ってる？」"My wonderful wife is so stingy that ..." "You boasting? Or complaining?"


いやだったけど愛車を手放した。I parted with my old car, though I hated to do so.





私たちは彼女を「アン」という愛称で呼んだ。We nicknamed her "Ann".
とりわけ子供たちは愛情を必要とする。Above all, children need love.
ここだけの話だが、彼には愛人がいる。Between ourselves, he keeps a mistress.







私の両親は愛知県で生まれた。My parents were born in Aichi Prefecture.


この本は学生に愛読されている。This book is popular with students.
彼はスティーヴン・キングの熱心な愛読者です。He is a keen Stephen King fan.

私の愛猫がもう一週間も行方が解らない。My dear little cat has been missing for a week.



彼女は赤ちゃんを優しく愛撫した。She caressed her baby lovingly.


彼はいまだに古い車を愛用している。He still cherishes his old car.

彼女はにっこり挨拶をした。She greeted us with a smile.この場をお借りして一言挨拶を申し上げます。Please allow me to say a few words on this occasion.挨拶に困った。I was at a loss for an answer.


友理子はたまの逢瀬を心行くまで楽しんでしまいました。Yuriko thoroughly enjoyed her occasional secret meetings with her lover.






いかなる善意の考えもそれ自体はあくでありうる。Any virtuous idea can be vicious in itself.

「顔色がわるいけど具合が悪いのかい」「そういうわけでもないよ」"You look pale. Are you sick?" "Not exactly."私のステレオはあなたのより音質が悪い。My stereo set is inferior to yours in sound quality.すいません。あなたに悪いことをしました。I'm sorry. I did you wrong.

親がいないとどうしようもないほど悪さをする子供たちもいるものだ。Some children are as bad as they can be while their parents are gone.








あなたの周りの人々の普通の行いに悪意があると考えてはいけない。Don't read evil intentions into the ordinary actions of people around you.



奴の悪運が尽きるのも時間の問題だ。It's just a matter of time before his outrageous and undeserved good luck comes to an end.
このテーマに関するほとんどの研究では、立法府の介入が悪影響をもたらしたということが示されている。It has been shown in most studies on this subject that intervention of the legislature had adverse effects.
進化とは快適な悪疫である。Progress is a comfortable disease.

日が経つにつれて、天気は次第に悪化しつつあった。The weather was getting worse and worse as the day went on.

悪貨は良貨を駆逐する。Bad money drives out good.
ジャックは悪いことをいっぱい考える悪がきだ。Jack is an evil boy full of evil ideas.



悪漢は金銭登録機のお金を要求した。The bandits demanded all money in the register.
なんの気なしに言っただけで、別に悪気があってのことではありません。I just said so without thinking much about it. I didn't mean anything serious.
そこに立った彼はあたかも悪鬼のようだった。As he stood there he might have been a fiend.
少年たちは時々先生にいたずらしたものだった。Sometimes the boys would play a trick on their teacher.私はいたずらな子供を大目に見る事ができない。I cannot be tolerant of naughty children.子供に包丁をいたずらさせてはダメだよ。Don't let your boy play with a knife.
そのいたずらっ娘は何食わぬ顔をした。The naughty girl assumed an air of innocence.




窓ガラスを割ったいたずら坊主は誰だ？Who's the naughty boy that broke the window?



そんな事実にまったく悪びれることなく、千歳は今日も元気に過ごしております。Without flinching from that fact in the slightest, Chitose is spending today as well in fine spirit.


あの政治家は悪賢い。That politician is an old fox.

これだけ悪口雑言を浴びせられれば、後は怖いものなどありゃしない。かえってすっきりするよ。I'm not afraid of anything after having verbal abuse heaped on me like that. In fact, I feel empowered by it.
彼は絶対にその謀議に加担していなかった。反政府の悪だくみがあったのは、彼ではなくて、その兄だった。He has had absolutely no part in the conspiracy; it was not he, but his brother, who had an axe to grind against the government.
この世で男にとって最良のことは良妻を選ぶことであり、最悪のことは選び損なって悪妻を持つことである。The best thing in the world for a man is to choose a good wife, the worst being to mistakenly choose an ill-suited one.


他人の悪事を引き合いに出して自分の悪事の言い訳をすることはできない。Two wrongs don't make a right.

悪質なドライバーは免許証を取り上げるべきだ。Bad drivers should have their licenses taken away from them.

いない者がいつも悪者になる。The absent are always in the wrong.



悪習に染まるのは簡単だ。It's easy to fall into bad habits.
彼女は喫煙の悪習慣がある。She has a bad habit of smoking.
その気体は悪臭を放つ。This gas gives off a bad smell.
賃金と物価の悪循環を断ち切ることは困難だ。It is difficult to break the vicious circle of wages and prices.

悪書を追放しよう。まずは世界中にはびこってる聖書からだな。Let's remove harmful books from circulation. Starting first with the bibles that have spread all over the world.




私はもうこんな悪条件には我慢出来ない。I can't put up with such bad conditions any more.



悪人でも手柄は認めてやれ。Give credit where credit is due.


安物の日本酒は悪酔いします。Cheap sake makes you sick.

今悪性の風邪がまん延している。A bad cold is going about now.



悪政に苦しむ国民を無視するわけにはいけません。We must not ignore populations suffering under misgovernment.




トムはもう３時間もの間、眠りにつこうと悪戦苦闘しています。Poor Tom's been trying to get to sleep for three hours now.
悪銭身に付かず。Ill gained, ill spent.





彼は私に悪態を浴びせかけた。He flung a stream of abuse at me.
メアリーは彼に考えうる限りの悪態をついた。Mary called him every name she could think of.


彼は悪天候をついて来た。He came in spite of bad weather.


その悪党は高所恐怖症だ。The wicked man is scared of heights.



怠惰は悪徳のもと。Idle hands are the devil's tool.





彼には悪評が絶えない。He is a constant subject of scandal.


世間の悪風に染まる。Be infected with the evil ways of the world.
ヘミングウェイの文章は悪文だった。Hemingway had a poor writing style.

社会の悪弊を糾すべきだ。We must investigate social abuses.
彼らはその悪法を施行しようとしている。They are going to put the bad law in force.
悪魔は岩の間に隠れている。Devils are hiding among the rocks.

その臆病な兵士は恐ろしい悪夢に悩まされた。The timid soldier was tormented by terrible nightmares.

息子が悪友仲間に入った。My son has got into bad company.

彼は公金を悪用したかどで逮捕された。He was arrested for abusing public funds.


悪路になると、この小型の車が本当にその本領を発揮する。On bad roads this little car really comes into its own.

トムは私に悪ふざけをしては笑う。Tom enjoys playing tricks on me.



ドアを開けようとしたら、ドアの握りがとれた。I tried to open the door, and the doorknob came off.



ブライアンがケイトの手を握り締めている。Brian is holding Kate's hands.
彼らが眠っている間私がハンドルを握った。I took the wheel while he slept.刑事はその男が有罪だという確たる証拠を握った。The detective found absolute proof of the man's guilt.
彼は友人と握手した。He shook hands with his friend.

そのレスラーはおそろしいほどの握力がある。The wrestler has a formidable grip.






人間は一本のアシに過ぎず、その本性はきわめて弱いが、人間は考える葦である。Man is but a reed, the weakest in nature, but he is a thinking reed.

























その気体は圧縮されてボンベに詰め込まれた。The gas was compressed into a gas cylinder.圧縮したファイルを添付で送ってください。Send it to me as a compressed file.




その党は総選挙で圧勝した。The party won a sweeping victory at the general election.

民衆は圧制に立ち向かった。The people revolted against the tyranny.

彼は、前の政府に劣らず圧制的な現政府に公然と反抗している。He defies the present government which is no less oppressive than its predecessor.
地球側の圧政に苦しむコロニーの人々の中で、テロによる現状打破を目論む勢力が誕生。Among the people of the colonies suffering under Earth's tyranny a force emerges intending to overthrow the status quo through terrorism.






彼は彼女の愛情の強さに圧倒された。He was overwhelmed by the intensity of her love.
私たちの行動の圧倒的な部分は学んで身についたものだ。An overwhelming part of our behavior is learned.
議案は圧倒的多数で可決された。The bill was passed by an overwhelming majority.


その政府は国民を圧迫した。The government oppressed the people.
胃に圧迫感があります。I have a pressing feeling in my stomach.

橋が圧力で落ちた。The bridge crashed under the pressure.その計画は世論の圧力で中止になった。The plan was given up under the pressure of public opinion.





彼は友人のあっせんでその仕事についた。He obtained the job through the good offices of his friend.

この旅館は客の扱いがよい。This inn gives good service.彼女は息子がひどい扱いを受けたと憤慨していた。She was indignant at the way her son had been treated.彼はピストルの扱いに注意を欠いた。He was careless in handling his pistol.
心理学は人間の感情を扱う。Psychology deals with human emotions.この問題は私が扱います。I will deal with this problem.彼女はこの機械を扱うのに慣れている。She is used to handling this machine.
彼は自分のライバルをひどくこきおろした。He criticized his rival severely.

こびへつらうウェイターは最上のテーブルをあてがわれる。なぜなら、そうしたウェイターは、いつもマネージャーや上役のきげんをとるから。The obsequious waiter is usually assigned the best table because he always curries favor with his manager and superiors.彼に食物をあてがった。I provided him with food.クリスマスの当日になっても、トムの右足には依然としてギブスがあてがわれたままであった。On Christmas Day, Tom still had his right leg in plaster.
同一差出人から同一受取人に宛てて郵袋という、文字通り袋に印刷物を入れて郵送します。A mailbag from a single sender addressed to one recipient, as the name suggests, is for delivering a bag of printed matter.
３人の少年はさながら猿のように木に登った。Three boys climbed the trees like a bunch of monkeys.
見たこともないような数の虻が、私にまとわりついてきたのです。More horseflies than I'd ever seen came and flew around me.
息子は箱から飴を一つ取った。My son took a candy from the box.







彼女は夫が苦境にある時はいつも手助けをした。She stood by her husband whenever he was in trouble.
ある人が間違いをしたからといってそれを笑うのは無作法である。It is not good manners to laugh at someone when he makes mistakes.
ある日、彼は弱いカメを助けた。One day he helped a weak turtle.

どうしてなのか、心が粟立つのを感じていた。I don't know what, but I felt in my heart something that gives me the chills.

これはバーゲン商品なので定価よりやすくなっているんじゃないですか。Aren't you selling this at a discount price?
彼女の服はとても安っぽい生地でできていた。Her dress was made of very cheap material.
心安ければ眠りも安らか。A good conscience is a soft pillow.
私の望むのは安らぎと静けさだけです。All I want is peace and quiet.

彼は彼女を安易な餌で誘き寄せた。He lured her with trinkets.

この車は彼が買えるほど安価だった。This car was cheap enough for him to buy.

おじは今では安楽に暮らしている。My uncle now lives in comfort.





先回は安産でした。I had an easy delivery last time.
うちは、安手の居酒屋じゃないんですからね、放歌高吟はお断り。Would you please stop singing so loudly? This is not a cheap drinking place.




あなたの菜園で作れる穀物や野菜を食べて生活する方がずっと安上がりだ。It's much cheaper to live on grains and vegetables you can grow in your garden.
あいつに仕事を任せておけば安心だ。You can trust him with any job.

しばらく安静にしておきなさい。Keep quiet in bed for a while.

君は自分の安全にもっと気を配るべきだ。You should be more thoughtful of your safety.

その道路の幅は安全運転に不十分だ。The width of the road is insufficient for safe driving.



ファイアーウォールがインターネットの安全性を保証する。A firewall will guarantee Internet security.
徹底的な安全対策が実施された。Strict security measures were in force.

最近は安全地帯が必ずしも安全ではない。Nowadays, a safety zone is not always safe.


私の部屋は誰も人をいれない安息の場所です。My room is an inviolable refuge.

彼女に目をかけられれば、あなたは安泰でいられますよ。Try to stay on her good side and you'll be on easy street.

指導者が死んだ時、人々は彼の死体を大きな墓に安置した。When their leader died, they placed his body in a large tomb.


今日の政治状況はそれほど安定していない。The current political situation is not very stable.


ホイールに剛性があると、・・・の安定性は増す。Rigid wheels give sufficient stability to a low-speed vehicle steered by outside forces.

彼女の無事を知らされて、彼は安堵のため息をついた。Informed of her safety, he breathed a sigh of relief.




私はこのセーターを安売りで買った。I bought this sweater in a sale.
私は彼女の安否が気がかりなんだ。I am concerned for her safety.

彼女は安物は身につけません。She doesn't wear the cheap stuff.







あたりがもう暗くなっていることに気がついた。I observed that it had already got dark.

暗がりの中で何も見えなかったので、私たちは動けなかった。Not seeing anything in the dark, we couldn't move.
この事が暗に意味することは最初は理解されなかった。The implications of this did not at first sink in.
暗闇の中で小さな物が動いた。A tiny object moved in the dark.
暗雲が立ちこめていた後には、すっきりとした晴れ間になる。After dark clouds, you get periods of refreshing clear weather.



スパイは情報を暗号で送った。The spy sent information by code.
ファイルを暗号化しないでください。Please don't encrypt your file.






アフリカはかつて、暗黒大陸と呼ばれた。Africa was once called the Dark Continent.
そのヤクザ達は対立するヤクザの親分を暗殺する計画の仲間に彼を入れた。The gangsters let him in on their plan to knock off a rival gang leader.
年配の人はまだケネディー暗殺事件を覚えている。Older people still remember the Kennedy assassination.
彼は暗算をするほど頭が良くない。He doesn't have enough brains to do sums in his head.
彼の言葉は何を暗示しているのか。What do his words imply?

私はその話を暗唱することができた。I could recite the story by heart.
輸入割り当て量についての多国間貿易交渉は暗礁に乗り上げてしまいました。Multilateral trade negotiations ran aground over import quotas.
玄関にも取り付け可能な暗証タイプです。This is a code lock type that you can use on the entranceway as well.

偽造カードと暗証番号が揃えば、口座にある限りの現金が引き出されてしまう。If they can get both a forged card and its PIN then all the cash in the bank account will be withdrawn.




現状の打開策を暗中模索している。We are groping for a way out of the present situation.



我々には互いに支持しあおうという暗黙の了解があった。We had an implicit agreement that we would support each other.
支配人の背後で暗躍した。He acted behind the manager's back.




驚いたことに、彼は簡単に案を考え出した。To my surprise, he easily came up with a plan.
母は私の将来を案じている。Mother is anxious about my future.
案の定、彼は疑念を抱いていた。Sure enough, he entertained doubts.

ピクニックは案外つまらなかった。The picnic was a disappointment.
この案件をどう処理するか、彼に下駄を預けるよ。I'm just going to leave it up to him to figure out how to clean up this mess.


ガイドは観光客に博物館の案内をした。A guide conducted the visitors round the museum.１人の年老いた女性が私たちに城の中を案内してくれた。An old lady guided us through the castle.
私の仕事は博物館の案内係です。I work as a museum attendant.
館内に案内所がありますか。Is there an information counter?
観光案内書をもらえますか。Would you give me some travel brochures from your country?

闇とは光がないことです。Darkness is the absence of light.
彼には教職の経験が無かったが、やみくもにこの世界に飛び込んだ。He'd had no experience of teaching, but he plunged in nonetheless.










私は中古車を買う余裕などなく、ましてや新車などはもってのほかだ。I can't afford to buy a used car, much less a new car.


１６歳以下の子供は劇場には入場できません。Children of age sixteen and under will not be admitted to the theatre.君の要約は平均以下だね。Your summary is not up to par.以下の説明は多くの異なる理論を比較的対照することによって得られたものである。The explanation below was achieved by comparing and contrasting a variety of different theories.

その仕事以外ならなんでもやる。I'll do anything but that job.
以後こんなことはいたしません。I'll never do this again.それ以後彼女に会っていません。I haven't seen her since then.
それ以降彼は辛い一生を送った。He led a hard life after that.
６歳以上の子供は学校に通わなければならない。Children of six and above should attend school.これ以上の値引きは、私どもを赤字に追いやるでしょう。A further reduction would make us go into the red.必要以上にお金を使わないようにしなさい。Try not to spend more money than is necessary.
彼とはツーと言えばカーの仲だよ。以心伝心の仲とでも言っておこう。He and I have a near-telepathic understanding of each other. No sooner does one of us say something than the other is already responding.

最善を尽くしますが、よくいっても木曜以前に終える事は出来ません。I'll do my best, but I'll not be able to finish it before Thursday at best.以前はこの丘の上に城があった。There used to be a castle on this hill.

１週間以内に電話します。I'll call you within a week.


１９８８年以来トムに会っていません。I haven't seen Tom since 1988.













商売のいろはも知らない。I don't know the ABC of business.
５８１４を千の位に四捨五入すれば何になりますか。What is 5814 rounded to the nearest thousand?





















事業を継続しながら、事業が依拠している不動産を切り売りしていくことなど非現実的なのだ。It's ludicrous to continue business operations while selling off bit by bit the land on which your business depends.
３人が依然行方不明です。Three people are still missing.
依然として彼から便りがない。I still haven't heard from him.




事務弁護士に遺言状の作成を依頼した。I asked the solicitor to make out my will.
ヘタクソな人は英訳しないでください。英訳依頼者からのお願いです。Please don't do translations if you're crap at it. This is a plea from the English translation clients.



あの先生には女子学生をえこひいきする傾向がある。That teacher tends to be partial to female students.

私はあの人が将来偉くなると見取った。I discerned the potential of great things in him.あの偉い坊さんを見ろよ。Look at the big shot.妻はアメリカでの新しい生活のリズムに慣れるのにえらい苦労した。My wife had a hard time getting into the swing of our new life in America.
偉い人は身なりを気にしない。A great man doesn't care about his appearance.



人間は動物よりはるかに多くの偉業をなしてきたのである。Human beings have achieved a lot more than animals.




偉人が必ずしも賢いとは限らない。Great men are not always wise.

リンカーンは偉大な政治家であった。Lincoln was a great statesman.


家の周りには囲いがしてある。There is a fence about the house.
警官は、現場の近くをロープで囲った。The police roped off the street near the spot.

湖は緑の丘に囲まれている。The lake is surrounded by green hills.

私たちはいろりの周りに座りました。We sat round the fire.






君の命を彼女に委ねていいのか。Are you sure you want to put your life in her hands?
委員は全員出席している。The committee are all present.
委員会はその議案を可決した。The committee passed the bill.
スミス氏が後任の委員長として発表された。Mr Smith was announced as the succeeding chairman.



ベンは日記を弁護士が管理するよう委託した。Ben committed his diary to the lawyer's care.

長官は彼に全権を委任した。The governor invested him with full authority.


将軍の堂々とした恰幅は誰でも威圧される。The general's massive presence awes everyone.





その捕虜には威厳があった。The prisoner of war bore himself with great dignity.

こういう行いは君の威信にかかわる。Such conduct is beneath your dignity.
彼、今のところは飛ぶ鳥も落とす勢いだけれど、あの威勢いつまでもつのか、疑問だね。He's unstoppable right now but the question is how long he can remain at the pinnacle of his career.
彼は自分のオフィスで働いている人に威張り散らそうとしたがうまくいかなかった。He tried unsuccessfully to domineer over his office workers.
あの人はあまり威張るから好きになれない。That man is too boastful for my liking.








意外な結果が発表された。Unexpected results were announced.
良し、その意気で。That's the spirit.
「来年こそは一部上場だ」と、社長は意気軒高だ。You could see the elation in the president's face when he announced that our shares are going to be listed on the First Section of the TSE next year.
初めから意気込みすぎると、途中で息切れするぞ。You have to pace yourself or you'll choke halfway through.
君の犬は本当に意気消沈しているのだろう。Your dog may be really depressed.




ボブとはすっかり意気投合した。I found a kindred spirit in Bob.
レイプ危機運動の内部においては、グリーンサイトによる異議表明は重要な意義を持っている。Within the rape crisis movement, Greensite's dissent is significant.
ここではどんどん意見をおっしゃってかまいません。You can speak out freely here.
彼女はガードレールの強度について、ぜひ意見交換をしたいと望んでいます。She would value the opportunity to exchange views on the strength of guard-rails.

意志に反して何かを無理にさせる事はできない。No one can force you to do anything against your will.




意思伝達は色々な形をとる。Communication takes many forms.
取締役会は業務執行に関する意思決定を目的としたものだ。The Board of Directors aim is to make decisions regarding business affairs of the company.

これらのプロセスのどれも意識されていないということを強調することがもっとも重要である。It is most important to emphasize that none of these processes are conscious.このお料理は、パリのエスプリを意識して、味付けしてみました。This cuisine is seasoned to evoke the esprit of Paris.

ときには、機械によって意識不明の人が何年間も呼吸し続けることもあります。Sometimes machines can make an unconscious person breathe for years.


意図していたものとかけ離れた結果となった。It had an effect alien from the one intended.
彼は意図的に窓を割った。He broke the window intentionally.

彼の意地の悪い発言で、講義が一層激しくなった。His nasty comments fueled the argument.
彼女は意地っ張りだ。She is an obstinate girl.
彼女の意地悪な言葉は結局自分の身に跳ね返ってきた。Her unkind words boomeranged.




その語にはいくつかの意味がある。The word has several meanings.
私の言いたいことはもっと広い意味合いのものである。My point is a broader one.
彼女の態度は意味深長だった。She gave me a meaningful look.

読者の方から意訳と直訳について質問されました。I have been asked by a reader about free and direct translations.



こんなことをいっても大した慰めにもなりませんが。Please accept what little comfort these words can give you.









言うは易く行うは難し。It's easier said than done.彼は人の名前を忘れやすい。He is apt to forget people's name.悪習は身につきやすい。Bad habits are easy to get into.
この仕事は決してやさしくない。This work is by no means easy.



昨日の易者の占いなんか気にすることないよ。What that fortuneteller said yesterday is nothing to be concerned about.

ちょっと椅子をずらしてくれない？Could you move the chair a bit?彼は必ず大統領の椅子につく人物だ。He is a natural to win the Presidency.
あなたのためなら喜んでどんなことでもします。I am ready to do anything for you.１月３０日、３１日は葬式のため休みます。I'm taking bereavement leave on Jan. 30 and 31.それは、おまえの声をよく聞くためだよ。It is in order to hear your voice well.
ステーキの焼き方はどうなさいますか。How would you like your steak?


彼は作家として名を成そうという野心を持っている。He has an ambition to make a name for himself as a writer.イナゴが大群をなしてやってきた。Locusts came in big swarms.人間は動物よりはるかに多くの偉業をなしてきたのである。Human beings have achieved a lot more than animals.
彼は奴隷を自由にしてやると約束した。He guaranteed his slaves' freedom.
あなたは健康のためにもっと運動をするべきだ。You should take more exercise for the sake of your health.雨のために私は家にいた。I stayed home because of the rain.

「これ以上何も言うことはありません、いいわけをするのはいやですから」と彼は言った。He said, "I will say nothing more, because I hate making excuses."それらはあなたを暖かくするのに役立つでしょう。They will help you to get warm.頭痛を言い訳にして、彼は早く帰った。He used a headache as an excuse for leaving early.

いつも妙ちくりんなことばっかり書いてるもんだから、きっとコメントしにくいんだわ！I'm always writing weird and hoopy stuff so I'm sure it's difficult to comment on.

車を運転する時はいくら注意してもしすぎることはない。You cannot be too careful when you drive a car.
彼らは互いに非難しあっていた。They were criticizing each other.

人の価値は持ち物というより人となりにある。A man's worth lies not so much in what he has as in what he is.





この為替を作るのに銀行の手数料が５０ドルかかった。Arranging this money order cost $50 in bank fees and commissions.
円の為替レートを知りたいんですけど。I'd like to know the exact exchange rate for yen.




今日の為替相場はいくらですか。What is the exchange rate today?




私たちはその話を聞いたとき、畏敬の念に打たれてしまった。We were awed into silence when we heard the story.





彼らの意見は私のとは異なっている。Their opinions differ from mine.

モーターから異音がしている。The motor is making a strange sound.



だからといって異議があるわけではない。Not that I have any objection.





「あいつはいい奴だ」と皆が異口同音に言う。He's a nice guy - that's unanimous.

彼は学校時代から異彩をはなっていた。He made a figure in his school days.

彼らの考えは私たちには全く異質のものであるように感じられる。Their ideas seem totally alien to us.





そんなにたくさん食べるのは異常だ。It is abnormal to eat so much.



ｘ線写真で異状が認められます。We have detected an abnormality on your x-ray.
われわれの仲間ではあなたは異色の存在だった。You stood out in our circle.




彼女は異性の前では非常に恥ずかしがる。She feels very shy in the presence of the opposite sex.



私としては異存はありません。There is no objection on my part.


異端という非難に関しては、ここでの証拠ははるかに弱いものである。As for the accusations of heresy, here the evidence is much weaker.










僕が恋するたびに、相手の女の子は僕の異母妹だっておとうさんは言うんだ。Every time I fall in love, Dad tells me the girl is my half sister.





まずいよ。また遅刻だ！！はやくも遅刻魔の異名をとってしまう。Oh no! I'm late again!! I'm going to get the nickname 'King of Late arrival'.
異様な光景が彼女の目に留った。A strange sight greeted her eyes.

それは全く異例のことだ。That's an unusual thing, undoubtedly.
異論はないです。There is no objection on my part.
委員会は別のホールに会場を移した。The committee adjourned to another hall.知っていることと行動に移すことは別だ。To know is one thing, and to do is another.風邪を人に移すと治るって本当？Is it true that you recover from colds when you give them to someone else?
彼女の移り気にはみんな当惑している。We are all bewildered by her inconstancy.


青年期は移り変わりの時期と見られている。Adolescence is viewed as time of transition.
ハイジャック犯達は飛行機の後部に移った。The hijackers moved to the rear of the plane.枝葉末節の議論はもうそろそろ止めにして、本筋の話に移りませんか。Why don't we stop arguing over these piddling matters and get to the issues at hand?


英国は、１９７１年にその貨幣制度を１０進法に移行させた。In 1971 the United Kingdom changed its currency to the decimal system.



一家は１８３０年頃故国のドイツからシカゴに移住した。The family moved from their native Germany to Chicago around the year 1830.


アメリカの文化はヨーロッパから移植されたものだ。The American culture had been transplanted from Europe.







４月１日、南洋フーズ株式会社は横浜の新社屋に移転します。On April 1, Nanyo Foods Co. Ltd. will move to its new building in Yokohama.
平和な丘や田園地帯から、通りがあり群衆がいる忙しい世界へと移動するのである。They are moving from the peaceful hills and the countryside to the busy world of streets and crowds.



合衆国は長い間「るつぼ」として知られているが、それは国民のほとんどが移民の子孫だからである。The United States has long been known as a "melting pot" because most of its people are descended from immigrants.ドイツの首相は移民問題に悩まされています。The German Chancellor is plagued by immigration problems.
この車の維持は高くつく。It is expensive running this car.




食物は胃の中で消化される。Food is digested in the stomach.



彼は胃ガンで死んだ。He died of cancer of the stomach.





彼は胃袋に食べ物を詰め込んだ。He loaded his stomach with food.

この薬を飲めば胃痛が治ります。These pills will cure you of your stomach-ache.



胃薬を持ってきてください。Could you send up some stomach medicine?
最近気分が萎え気味だ。Recently I've been feeling a bit down.

その植物は水がなかったのでしおれた。The plants withered because they had no water.

衣ばかりで和尚はできぬ。The robes do not make the monk.




ぬれた衣装が彼女の体にくっついていた。Wet clothes clung to her body.
衣食は生活する上で不可欠なものである。Food and clothes are necessities of life.
私達が生きていくためには衣食住が必要です。We need food, clothes and a home in order to live.


彼らは衣服をほとんど着用しない。They wear very little clothing.

衣料品がだぶついている。We have an oversupply of clothing.

この刀には不思議ないわれがある。This sword has a strange history.
私は１分違いで列車に乗り遅れた。I missed the train by a minute.
その点では私は君と意見が違う。I differ from you on that point.そんなばかなことを言うなんて彼は気でも違ったのか。Is he mad that he should say such a foolish thing?君は違う方にいきますよ。You're going the wrong way.





法律が多ければ多いほど、違反者も多くなる。The more laws, the more offenders.
相次ぐ不祥事にも関わらず、警察はオメオメ違反切符を切っている。Despite their own scandals, the police continue to make arrests as though nothing had happened at all.
あそこに駐車するのは違法です。It is illegal to park a car there.





これまで我が社にそうしたシステムがなかったけど、別に違和感はないよ。Our company has never had that kind of system, and it's never made us feel uncomfortable.






それは遺憾ながら本当だ。That, while regrettable, is true.



彼は遺言で妻に全財産を残した。He left all his property to his wife in his will.
父は弁護士に遺言書を作成してもらった。Father had his lawyer draw up his will.
事務弁護士に遺言状の作成を依頼した。I asked the solicitor to make out my will.






彼の遺骨はここに埋められている。His ashes are buried here.
この部屋には遺恨がたくさんありますが、好意はほとんどありません。There is much hatred in this room, and little kindness.


彼は莫大な遺産を受け継いだ。He inherited a great fortune.






一番近い遺失物取扱所はどこですか。Where is the nearest lost and found?
叔父は去年遺書を作った。My uncle made a will last year.



新しい遺跡で未発掘はいくつだったのですか。How many new sites were uncovered?


音楽家が死んで遺族は貧困にさらされた。The musician left his family poor.
その遺体の身元は頬のほくろで確認された。The dead body was identified by a mole on the cheek.


この犯罪者は遺伝の犠牲者だ。This criminal is a victim of his heredity.



デオキシリボ核酸は、遺伝子を作っている複雑な化学物質である。DNA is a complex chemical that makes up a gene.




子供は遺伝病を持っています。My baby has a hereditary disease.










強盗は遺留品の一つから足がついた。The burglar was traced by one of the things he had left on the scene.



金髪女性が精神科医と会話をしている。A blonde is speaking to her psychiatrist.

手術は医院内で三十分以内に完了します。The surgery, performed at our clinic, is over in half an hour.






二人の医者が医学の話をしていた。Two doctors were talking shop.
彼は医学界に多大な影響力を持っている。He has great influence over the medical world.



医学生が手分けして勉強することはまれである。Shared studying among premeds is rare.

彼は医学部の教授だ。He is a professor of the medical department.




あの紳士は医師にちがいない。That gentleman must be a doctor.




医者は彼の折れた足をついだ。The doctor set his broken leg.



ビルは結局医大に行くそうだ。It looks like Bill will go to medical school after all.







ボランティアグループの人達は戦争被害者に食料と医薬品を配っている。The volunteer group provides war victims with food and medicine.


彼は医療に一生を捧げた。He dedicated his life to medical work.



サンプルは世界２００の医療機関から収集された。The samples were collected from two hundred medical institutions all over the world.



2000年に日本の医療制度が世界一だが、2003年に研修医制度が始まって目に見えて悪くなった。In 2000 Japan's health care system was the best in the world, but since clinical internship was introduced in 2003 it has clearly deteriorated.

医療品は被災者たちに配分された。The medical supplies were allocated to the victims of the disaster.
医療保険には入っていますか。Do you have medical insurance?




世間知らずにもほどがある。井の中の蛙大海を知らず、ということかね。I can't believe you're so clueless. You're like a babe in the woods.

井戸には少しの水も無かった。There was no water in the well.

彼の仕事は井戸掘りからゴミの処理にまで及ぶ。His tasks range from digging wells to getting rid of garbage.


今日は体調が悪い。あの井戸水が原因だ。I feel out of sorts today. That well water is why.













私は生まれも育ちも東京だ。I was born and raised in Tokyo.

植物は土壌で育つ。Plants are nourished by earth.
彼らは子供の育てかたと躾けかたではお互いに意見が合わなかった。They differed with each other on the care and upbringing of their children.

叔父が今日の私を育ててくれた。My uncle has made me what I am.
彼は医者になるように育て上げられた。He was brought up to be a doctor.




ほんの一握りの男性しか育児休暇を取りたがらない。Only a handful of men want to take childcare leave.















それは壱万円と計算されている。It is computed at 10,000 yen.卵を一ダースづつつめなさい。Pack eggs in dozens.これは東京一のインドレストランです。This is the best Indian restaurant anywhere in Tokyo.
正直なところ、それはいちかばちかだ。Honestly, it's all or nothing.
ちょっと郵便局までひとっ走りしてくれませんか。Just run down to the post office, won't you?
１つが通り過ぎたかと思うと、すぐに次の台風が接近する。No sooner has one typhoon passed than the next one approaches.一つには、私は貧しいし、それにまた忙しくもある。For one thing, I am poor; for another, I am busy.妻の死の知らせを聞いてもまゆ一つ動かさなかった。He did not even raise an eyebrow at the news of his wife's death.
１つ１つの出願を１件ずつ考慮しなければならないだろう。We will have to consider each application on a case-by-case basis.






彼らはひとつおきに席に着いた。They sat down at every other desk.

一つ話をしてあげましょう。I'll tell you a story.




少年は一握りのピーナッツを集め、それを小さな箱に入れた。The boy gathered a handful of peanuts and put them in a small box.ほんの一握りの男性しか育児休暇を取りたがらない。Only a handful of men want to take childcare leave.


それは確かに一案です。That's certainly one possibility.
あなたか私のどちらかが一位を取るだろう。Either you or I will get the first prize.




君はいまやエリート集団の一員だ。You are now among the elite.
大変な努力が彼の成功の一因であった。Great effort was one factor in his success.


ツバメ一羽で夏にはならぬ。One swallow does not make a summer.
この空模様だと、もしかしたら午後にはひと雨降るかもしれません。From the look of the sky, it may rain in the afternoon.
１円たりとも無駄使いはできない。I can't afford to waste a single yen.



ええ、先方から一応返事はありました。Yeah, there was some sort of reply from them.過去問がもしあるならば一応目を通すほうがいいと思います。If there are past exam questions then I think it would be best to give them a quick look over.

同社の昨年の対インド輸出は１億ドルに達した。The company's exports to India amounted to $100 million last year.

チャブ台を囲んで一家団欒している。The family is sitting in a happy circle around the dining table.




いやあ、見事に晴れ渡った秋の日になったね。これが台風一過というやつかね。What a glorious fall day. This is what they mean by the lovely weather you get after a storm.

私は生まれてこの方同じ隣人で、この一画に住んでいます。I have lived on this block, and next to the same neighbor, all my life.
彼は一介のビジネスマンにすぎない。He is nothing but a businessman.
毎月一回会合を開いている。We hold a meeting once a month.
ある日彼は町を一回りする長い散歩に出かけた。One day he set off on a long walk around the town.

ヒンギスが一回戦敗退の大番狂わせ。It was a big upset when Hingis was eliminated in the first round.
大人への一回分の最大の投薬量はどのくらいですか。What is the maximum dosage for an adult?

１階席が欲しいのです。I'd like seats on the first floor.
そうですね。一概には言えませんね。Yes, well, that depends.
選挙の結果その党は政権の一角を占めた。The election gave the party a role in the government.
彼は自分が一角の人物であると思った。He thought himself to be somebody.


３月１日から鉄道運賃が１割あがると発表された。It has been announced that railway fares will be raised by 10 percent starting on the first of March.

父に一喝されてそれを止めた。I gave it up after my father had given me a good scolding.
それらの議題は一括して取り上げられた。Those agenda items were taken up en bloc for discussion.






政府は取締の一環として不法入国外国人を追放しています。The government is expelling illegal aliens as part of a crackdown.

その学校は、中・高一貫校だということを頭の片隅にでも入れておいて下さい。Bear in mind that that school is an integrated junior high and high school.

夢に欠けている主な事は首尾一貫性である。The main thing that dreams lack is consistency.







彼は試合の結果に一喜一憂している。He is now glad, now sad at the progress of the game.



あの人と巡り会えたのは、一期一会なのでしょうか。Our meeting like that is probably the kind of thing that only happens once.


彼は一気に１０時間働いた。He worked ten hours at a stretch.
彼、一気呵成に書き上げたと言ってたけど、この提案書、少し雑だね。He said he dashed this proposal off in one sitting. It's pretty sloppy.







日陰で一休みしよう。Let's take a rest in the shade.


あの人は私の一挙一動を見守っている。He is watching my every move.
あの人の一挙手一投足が注目の的です。People notice every move he makes.
ＤＴＰで本を作れば、安いし早いし、まさに一挙両得だ。Desktop publishing lets you produce books quickly and cheaply. It's like killing two birds with one stone.




彼女はピアノで一曲弾いた。She played a tune on the piano.


なんか分からないが、一筋縄じゃいきそうにないってことだな。ううむ。I don't quite follow, but it looks like it will prove tricky. Ergh.


このバスは一区間９０円です。The bus fare here is 90 yen a section.



空高く一群の鳥が飛んでいるのを見た。I saw a flock of birds flying aloft.




一芸に長じることが大切だ。It is important to be accomplished in some art.
私は彼の耳に一撃を与えた。I dealt him a blow on the ear.


私は１９６８年の１月２日に生まれた。I was born on January 2 in 1968.
彼はひと月に１回散髪する。He has his hair cut once a month.
彼はその一件を調査し始めた。He began to look into the matter.


上空を飛行中に私たちはその湖ちらりと一見した。We had a glimpse of the lake as we flew over it.この問題は一見簡単そうだが実は難しい。This problem seems to be easy on the surface, but it's really difficult.

その家なら一軒おいて隣ですよ。The house is next door but one.







また、お説教が始まった。一言居士の面目躍如というところだね。Uh-oh, here comes another lecture. This guy likes to show he has something to say about everything.

そのオレンジは１個７ペンスでした。The oranges cost 7 pence each.


一戸建より共同住宅に住む世帯の増加率の方が高い。The rate of increase in households is higher for apartment houses than for individual houses.


その一節を一語ずつ訳しなさい。Translate the passage word for word.
彼女はそれを一語一語翻訳した。She translated it word for word.
ライオンはウサギをひと口で食べた。The lion ate the rabbit in one bite.一口乗りたがっている人が大勢だ。Many were eager to get in on the act.





彼の理論は一考に値する。His theory deserves consideration.




一刻の猶予も許されなかった。Not a moment could be lost.


国民総生産は一定の期間における一国の財及びサービスを貨幣価値で計った総生産高である。Gross national product is a nation's total output of goods and services during a given period of time as measured in monetary value.



彼はひところの元気がない。He isn't as energetic as he once was.

あの女優は一座の一枚看板だ。That actress is the shining star of the company.


町並みからひときわ高く昔のお城が立っている。High above the city stands the old castle.




机の上に一冊の本がある。There is an album on the desk.





一酸化炭素とは炭素化合物の不完全燃焼で発生する有害物質です。Carbon monoxide is a poisonous substance formed by the incomplete combustion of carbon compounds.
彼女を説得するのは一仕事だ。It is a labor to persuade her.

一子相伝の技と言うわりには、彼の蹴りは大した事はないね。For a guy who was chosen by his father as the only son to be taught the secrets of this martial art, he doesn't have that much of a kick.











一事成れば万事成る。Nothing succeeds like success.
彼は単語リストから選び出した単語を結びつけたり、一字一字アルファベットを組み合わせて単語をつづることができた。He could put together words from his word list, or spell out words letter by letter.

私達は海岸ですばらしいひとときを過ごした。We had a glorious time at the seaside.

１時間かそこらで帰ってきます。I'll be back in an hour or so.


彼は一時的に精神が錯乱状態になった。He became temporarily deranged.









用具を一式貸してください。Lend me a tool set please.

彼は八重洲ホテルに一室をとった。He took a room at the Yaesu Hotel.



何しろ小さい店なので、彼は会計係から倉庫係まで多くの仕事を一手にこなさなければならない。Because the store is so small, he has to wear many different hats, from accountant to stock boy.

イルカは哺乳類の一種です。A dolphin is a kind of mammal.怒りを抑えることは一種の美徳である。It's a kind of virtue to keep one's temper.
富士山に登った後で一首浮かんだ。After climbing Mt Fuji I got the inspiration for a poem.




議長は彼のばかげた提案を一蹴した。The chairman rejected his absurd proposal.

この町では１週に何回ごみを集めますか。How many times a week do they collect garbage in this town?
１週間も雨が降り続きました。It kept on raining for a week.
禅坊主じゃあるまいし、毎日毎日、一汁一菜のダイエットメニューは勘弁してよ。What? A little soup and celery is all I get? I'm not a Zen monk. I can't survive on an austerity diet like this.




彼からの思いがけないプレゼントが届いたよ。少々は一宿一飯の恩義でも感じてくれたのかな。We got an unexpected present from him. I guess he felt a little obligated after what we did for him.
それは私にとってはらはらする一瞬だった。It was a nervous moment for me.



一所懸命になって彼はその木に登った。With great effort he climbed up the tree.
「ご一緒してもいいですか」「もちろんです」"May I go with you?" "Of course."
著者は種々に異なるヨーロッパ文学をいっしょくたに扱っている。The author lumps all the different European literatures together.

宿題を一緒にしよう。Let's do the homework together.仕事と遊びを一緒にするのは、好きではない。I don't like to mix business with pleasure.俺を奴等と一緒にするな。Don't put me in the same class with them.






彼女はただ一笑に付した。She just laughed the matter off.

スプリンクラーが芝生の一条の水を噴出している。The sprinkler is shooting out a stream of water onto the grass.

１日に３度１錠ずつ服用してください。Please be sure to take one dose three times a day.
先ほどの彼らのやり取りにはひやひやしたよ。まさに一触即発の危機だったね。I was really nervous to see how they dealt with each other just now. I guess things were touch-and-go between them.
ほんの一寝入りしたら、さっぱりした。Just a spot of shut-eye has already refreshed my mind.


そのピアニストの演奏中、彼らは一心に耳を傾けた。They were all ears while the pianist was playing.

自分の仕事に一心不乱に打ち込みなさい。Give yourself to your work with body and soul.
その罪人はキリスト教徒になり、生活を一新した。The criminal became a Christian and turned over a new leaf.



目が見えない看護婦は年寄りの世話をすることに一身を捧げた。The blind nurse devoted herself to caring for the elderly.
私この度一身上の都合でやめさせていただきます。I wish to resign from my work for purely personal reasons.

私は彼女が１人で行くのがよいと言いました。I suggested that she go alone.
クラブ会員は１人残らずみな出席していた。Each and every member of the club was present.



私たちは子供にひとり寝の習慣をつけた。We accustomed our children to sleeping alone.
彼は焼き魚定食一人前を注文した。He ordered one grilled fish dinner.彼女も一人前の女になった。She has grown up to be a woman.

私はガンで一人息子に死なれた。I had my only son die of cancer.
パーティーの費用は一人当たり４０００円です。Each person's share of the expenses for the party is 4000 yen.




発言の一部だけがマスコミに取り上げられて独り歩きした。Just one part of what he said got picked up by the media and took on a life of its own.こんな夜更けに女の子の一人歩きは危ない。It is not safe for a girl to go out by herself so late at night.


電車が近づくと、トンネルから一陣の熱風が吹きつけた。There was a gust of hot wind from the tunnel as the train approached.



一寸の虫にも五分の魂。The worm turns.
この机は私にはちょっと低い。This desk is a little low for me.ネクタイを締める間、ちょっとじっとしてね。Hold still a moment while I fix your tie.それ以上の仕事はちょっと見つからないだろう。You won't find a better job in a hurry.
霧がとても濃かったので、一寸先も見えなかった。The mist was so dense that I could not see even an inch ahead.


１世紀は１００年です。A century is one hundred years.

私は一生涯彼の大ファンでした。I have been his greatest fan all my life.
もっと一生懸命勉強すべきだったのに。You should have worked harder.



人々が一斉に走り出した。People started to run all at once.




アテネへ向かう一隻の貨物船が何の痕跡も残さずに地中海で沈没した。A cargo vessel, bound for Athens, sank in the Mediterranean without a trace.



一昔前だったら、駅や、レストランや、病院の待合室でタバコに火をつけるのをためらう人はいなかっただろう。At one time, people would not have hesitated to light up a cigarette in stations, restaurants, or hospital waiting rooms.

その提案一石二鳥を狙ったものだろうけど、「虻蜂とらず」にならなければいいけどね。That proposal may be a way to kill two birds with one stone, but we also have to be careful not to get greedy and spoil everything.
それは他のいっさいに勝っている。It is paramount to all the others.

どうか私にパンを一切れください。Please give me a piece of bread.




君はこの一説の意味が理解できますか。Can you get at the meaning of this passage?
私は農場を抵当に彼から一千万円借りた。I mortgaged my farm to him for ten million yen.




でも、お箸、一膳しかないの。どうしよう・・・。But there's only one pair of chopsticks. What shall we do?



今まで以上にいっそう勉強に励みなさい。You should study even more than before.
スポーツ界はこの際、犯罪組織との癒着を一掃すべきです。The sports world should, at this time, eliminate the collusion with criminal organizations.


食後、私の車で町を一走りした。After dinner, we took a spin around town in my car.
彼女は新鮮な空気を一息吸いに表へ出た。She went outside to get a breath of fresh air.もう一息努力すれば成功するだろう。Make one more effort, and you will succeed.
この一足のストッキングは誰のですか。Whose is this pair of stockings?



彼はその一族に縁がある。He is related to the family.



彼のいちだは向かい風のため、余り伸びなかった。His shot didn't carry well against the wind.


一体どこで彼に会ったんだ。Where on earth did you meet him?いったいなぜ彼を駅に連れて行ったの？Why on earth did you take him to the station?ストライキとは従業員の集団が一体となって就労を拒否することです。A strike is a mass refusal to work by a body of employees.
ノリもさる事ながら、会場と一体化したような快感が忘れられない。I got really into it, and I just can't forget the exhilaration of becoming one with the audience.
一体全体何故君がここにいるのだ？Why on earth are you here?


雨があたり一帯に降っている。The rain is raining all around.
彼はゲリラの一隊に要撃された。He was waylaid by a band of guerrillas.
その仕事は一代では成し遂げられないだろう。It seems the task will not be accomplished in our generation.

１台の車が入り口に止まった。A car stopped at the entrance.
我々は一大危機に直面している。We are facing a violent crisis.


いったんしたことは元どおりにならない。What is done cannot be undone.いったん着地した怪物は、瞬間ふたたび跳躍して私の頭上にいた。Having once landed the monster immediately jumped again and was over my head.
彼が亡くなった責任の一端は私に有ります。His death was partly my fault.
君はいっぱしの大人だ。You are quite a man.
群衆は密集した一団となって動いていた。The crowd was moving in a solid body.
花嫁姿の彼女は一段と美しかった。She was all the more beautiful dressed in her wedding costume.

今回のプロジェクトが終わって、やっと一段落したって感じだね。Now that the project has come to an end, I feel like I've finally come to a resting-place.


凶器に残された指紋は容疑者のものと一致する。The fingerprints left on the weapon correspond with the suspect's.一致団結して何か新しいことをやろうじゃないか。Let's close ranks and do something new.

どうしてスーツがもう１着買えるって言うの？How can you afford another suit?







英語というのは一朝一夕にマスターできるものではない。English cannot be mastered overnight.
彼らの意見にはそれぞれ一長一短がある。Each of their opinions has both good points and bad points.

彼は仕事が終わるとすぐ一直線にパブへ向かう。As soon as work is over, he makes a beeline for the pub.
一通に署名の上ご返送ください。Please return one set to us with your signature.



金利自由化の方向性を一定するのはむずかしいことです。It is difficult to peg the direction of interest deregulation.国民総生産は一定の期間における一国の財及びサービスを貨幣価値で計った総生産高である。Gross national product is a nation's total output of goods and services during a given period of time as measured in monetary value.

しかし一定期間がたてば、全額お支払いできるようになると考えております。We believe, however, that over a period of time, we will be able to make remittance in full settlement.

乗客は一定量の荷物を機内に持ち込むことができる。Passengers can take a certain amount of baggage on the airplane.
私が見つけたのは１丁のハサミだけだった。I found nothing but a pair of scissors.
私は頭に一滴の雨を感じた。I felt a drop of rain on my head.
頑固一徹のボスだと思っていたけれど、結構かわいいところもあるじゃない。I thought our boss was stubborn as a mule but actually he has his cute side.






我々の関心はその一点に集中する。Our interest converges on that point.試合は終始一点を争うシーソーゲームだった。The game was one point back and forth the whole game.

彼女は利己一点張りの女だ。She puts her own interests above everything else.










１等になるなんて夢にも思わなかった。Never did I dream of winning first prize.


ここは一等車ではありません。These are not first-class carriages.
１等賞を得たのはジャネットだった。It was Janet that won first prize.





動物園から一頭のトラが脱走した。A tiger has escaped from the zoo.

我々一同恐怖にさいなまれた。We were all assailed with fears.
これだけまあ、多士済済の人材が一堂に集まったもんだよな。Not bad―not bad at all. This is quite a gathering of talent to have under one roof.




これは一読に値する本だ。This is a worthwhile book.
一難去ってまた一難。Out of the frying pan and into the fire.

年の功というのか、彼の意見はさすがに一日の長があるね。Maybe it's his age but his opinions seem a little more grounded in experience than everyone else's.
一日一日と寒くなってきた。It is getting colder and colder day by day.



１日中テニスをしていたのだから。He was playing tennis all day.


その知らせで私達の喜びもひとしおでした。The news added to our happiness.


彼は東京に一年間ずっといます。He has been in Tokyo for a year.
わたしは去年一年生でした。I was a first year student last year.なぜ一種の植物が一年生の草本になったり、多年生の木本になったりするのでしょうか。I wonder why it is that some plants become annuals and others perennials?

その島は一年中あたたかい。The island is warm all year.



小説の新しい一派が起こった。A new school of fiction has grown up.

コップ１杯の水をください。Give me a glass of water, please.仕事の後で、一杯どう？How about going out for a drink after work?列車は乗客でいっぱいだった。The train was full of passengers.
もう一杯機嫌だね。You're lit up like a Christmas tree.
この橋はあの橋の一倍半の長さがある。This bridge is one and half times as long as that.
一泊分の内金をお願いします。We'd like a deposit for one night.

馬鹿を承知で一肌脱ぎましょう。I'm putting my ass in a sling for you.彼らはひと肌ぬごうともせず、ぼんやり立っていた。They stood idle, instead of putting their shoulder to the wheel.
トムは頭にきつい一発を受けた。Tom received a heavy blow on the head.





その理論はまだ一般に認められていない。The theory is not accepted yet.
この単語は、一般によく使われていない。This word is not in common use.
こういう一般化は疑わしい。I doubt these generalizations.



その新しい理論は一般人には難しすぎる。The new theory is too abstract for ordinary people.


彼らは一般的な若者です。They are typical young people.
政府が住民に問う一般投票を実施しました。The government put the question to the people in a referendum.




一晩私たちを泊めていただけませんか。Will you put us up for one night?
このネクタイにしましょう、一番よさそうだから。I will take this tie, as it seems to be the best.
１つがいのカナリアだけが彼女の友達であった。A pair of canaries are her only friends.


君が一番乗りのようだ。It seems as if you are the first one here.




彼はネコを一匹と犬を二匹飼っている。He has a cat and two dogs.

あたし、最初は女の子がいいな！ほら、一姫二太郎っていうじゃない。I'd like to have a girl the first time. Look, they say 'First a girl, then a boy' don't they?

私が選挙で一票入れたところで、何も変わらないと思ってしまう。I figure that my vote won't change anything.
１秒にたったの６ペンスよ。It's only six pence per second.


ジョンはペルーについてひとしきりしゃべれるんだ。John can really talk a blue streak about Peru.

日本は一夫多妻制ではないんですよ、あなた。We don't have polygamy in Japan, dear.
一部の人々は日本がすべて一番だと思っている。Some people believe that Japan is No.1 in everything.
その事故の一部始終を私に話して下さい。Please give me the details of the accident.
その建物の一部分だけが地震で破壊された。Only part of the building has been destroyed by the earthquake.


あの車のセールスマンは一風変わった奴だった。That car salesman was a pretty off the wall kind of guy.
一風呂浴びてさっぱりした。I feel quite refreshed after taking a bath.

一服いかがですか。How about a smoke?ちょっと一服しませんか？What do you say to taking a rest?６時おきに彼に薬を一服飲ませてください。Please give him a dose of medicine every six hours.


１分違いで列車に乗り遅れた。He missed the train by a minute.


この一文を説明してください。Please explain this sentence to me.
凍死しそうな乞食が手当てのため、病院に運び込まれた。だが、その乞食は治療費を清算するような金は一文も、もってなかった。A freezing beggar was brought into the hospital for treatment. However, he didn't have even one cent with which to settle the bill.


一文惜しみの百知らず。Penny wise, pound foolish.
市場価格の暴落で一文無しになってしまった。The market drop has cleaned me out.
人に一癖。Every man in his way.

彼女は彼に疑い深そうな一瞥を投げた。She threw a suspicious glance at him.
夫妻は化学を近代科学へと一変させた。The couple transformed chemistry into a modern science.
私は犬を見た。その犬は一片の肉を口にくわえていた。I saw a dog. The dog held a piece of meat in its mouth.空には一片の雲もなかった。There was not a cloud in the sky.
彼は保守党一辺倒で押し通した。He has remained pro-conservative throughout.
北海道には一遍も行ったことがない。I've never been to Hokkaido.
もう一歩も歩けないよ。I can't walk another step.両者は解決に向かって一歩踏み出した。Both parties took a step towards a solution.もう一歩努力すれば、彼はうまくいっただろうに。With just a little more effort, he would have succeeded.
私は一歩一歩目標を達成するつもりです。I will accomplish my purpose step by step.



床は緑色に塗られていたが、一方壁は黄色だった。The floor was painted green, while the walls were yellow.しかし、その一方、ラテン語はそのときまでに「死語」となっていた。But, then again, Latin was already a "dead language" by that time.本屋で英語関係の本を見つけると、次々に買ってしまって、読まずにいるので、たまる一方です。I always buy the English-language books I come across at bookstores. But since I never read them, all they do is pile up.




この件に関する彼の解釈はあまりにも一方的だ。His interpretation of this matter is too one-sided.



「もう一本くれ」と彼が言った。"Give me a fresh bottle," he said.






彼はその詩を一本調子で朗読した。He read the poem in a monotone.



１枚の枯れ葉が地面に落ちた。A dead leaf fell to the ground.


あの女優は一座の一枚看板だ。That actress is the shining star of the company.




人生とは、一抹の泡みたいなものだ。Man's but a bubble.
「おい、だまれ。口数が多いぞ」とそのギャングの一味が言った。"Hey, you shut up! You talk too much," the gangster said.


仕込みはだいたい終わりましたし・・・、一眠りしていらしたらどうですか？We've nearly finished preparations. How about taking a nap?
ゆうべはほとんど一睡も出来なかった。I could hardly get a wink of sleep last night.


彼は事故で一命をとりとめた。He survived the accident.
彼は新聞を取り上げて何気なく１面を眺めた。He picked up the newspaper and glanced casually over the front page.地面は一面の雪に覆われていた。The ground lay beneath a blanket of snow.「言葉の一面は、伝達しようとする意志である」と彼は言う。"One aspect of language is an intent to communicate," he says.




私は泥棒を一網打尽に逮捕した。I arrested many thieves at the same time.


一目惚れなの。It was love at first sight.
犬は一目散に逃げ出した。The dog ran off as fast as it could.

結果は一目瞭然であった。The result was clear at a glance.




来週から中間テストだ。一夜漬けじゃ、太刀打ちできない問題ばかりだぞ。今日から始めろよ。Midterm exams start next week. Just cramming the night before won't get you ready. There'll be a lot of tough questions. You should start studying today.
我が社の新製品が、ライバル会社に一矢を報いる結果となった。This new product of ours is a serious blow to our rival company.
万次郎はこの二国をお互いに親しくするために一役果たしました。Manjiro played a part in making the two countries friends with each other.
彼女は一躍有名になった。She suddenly became famous.





一卵性双生児を出産しました。I delivered identical twins.


たばこは百害あって一利なし。Smoking does much harm but no good.

彼女のいうことは一理ある。She's got a point.
一つ間違えば一里も狂う。A miss is as good as a mile.



こんな一流選手が相手では勝ち目がない。We have no chance against those top players.
私たちは米一粒でさえ無駄にしてはいけません。We shouldn't waste even one grain of rice.




一両日中にお返事します。I'll give you an answer in a day or two.


一輪車は車輪がひとつしかありません。A unicycle has only one wheel.
彼は一塁へ投げた。He threw the ball to first base.
一塁手は、走ってきた打者にタッチしアウトを取った。The first baseman tagged the runner out.


これは英国の現代生活のほんの一例だ。This is an instance of modern British life.

私たちは一列に並ばされた。We were made to stand in line.

彼らは一連の音楽会を開催した。They gave a series of concerts.







党首は今後の方針を一瀉千里に述べ立てた。The party leader rattled on at great length about future policies.






その街は活気にあふれていた。The town was full of activity.
４０万ガロンの石油がパイプラインから溢れ出た。400,000 gallons of oil have spilled out of the pipeline.


わたしの気を仕事からそらさないでください。Please don't take my mind off the work.






ねずみはいち早く沈みそうな船を見捨てる。Rats leave a sinking ship.



これらの花は彼女の庭で咲いた逸品である。These flowers are the choice of her garden.



彼はまずユーモアのある逸話を話して講義を始めた。He began his lecture with a humorous anecdote.
稲は雨の多い地域で作られる。Rice is grown in rainy regions.


そのジェット機は稲光より速かった。Those jets were faster than lightning.
彼女は稲妻の閃光を見て悲鳴をあげた。She screamed at the flash of lightning.
台風で稲作は大きな被害を受けた。The typhoon did great damage to the rice crop.
イナゴが大群をなしてやってきた。Locusts came in big swarms.



実るほど頭の下がる稲穂かな。The boughs that bear most hang lowest.



いもを食べるとおならがでる。Potatoes give me wind.


この芋虫がきれいな蝶になるのだ。This caterpillar will become a beautiful butterfly.





発音できない語に印をつけなさい。Mark the words which you cannot pronounce.この印はどういうものですか。What does this mark mean?進んで責任を取るということは成熟の印である。Willingness to take responsibility is a sign of maturity.












そのニュースは急いで印刷された。The news was rushed into print.
最初の印刷機はグーテンベルグによって発明された。The first printing machine was invented by Gutenberg.
ビルは印刷業でいい暮らしをするに足るお金をかせいだ。The printing business made Bill a small fortune.




印刷術はいつ発明されましたか。When was printing invented?



印刷物には、特別郵袋印刷物というのがあります。Included in the printed matter category is what is called 'special mailbag printed matter'.








彼女は気の利く女の子である印象を強く受けた。She struck me as a tactful girl.

彼はなんと印象的な人なのでしょう。What an impressive person he is!
モネの芸術は印象派を代表している。Monet's art is representative of Impressionism.














彼はまったくの民主党員だ。He is heart and soul a Democrat.

忘れずに出席者の員数をかぞえなさい。Don't forget to count how many people attend.

ちなみに、ウチのクリニックから数百メートルの近場に「ランプ」が建設中です。Incidentally a motorway ramp is being constructed in the neighbourhood, a few hundred metres away, of my clinic.
造られたもので、この方によらずできたものは一つもない。Without him nothing was made that has been made.この理由により、著者に関する信憑性は、資料の信憑性に拠っているのである。For this reason, the credibility of the book's authors rests on the credibility of their sources.
早くこの世を去ったのも彼女の因縁だ。It was her fate to die young.
親の因果が子に報いる。The sins of the fathers are visited upon the children.
確かに、脳と意識の関係はもともと因果関係ではないのだと考える学者もいる。Indeed, some writers do not think the relation of brain to consciousness is a causal relation in the first place.


私の理解ではその二つの実験には共通の因子はない。In my understanding, those two experiments do not have common factors.







山田さんがその心ひかれるおとぎ話をやさしい日本語に翻訳した。Ms. Yamada translated the fascinating fairy tale into plain Japanese.


公定歩合の引き下げは産業界を苦しめてきた厳しい金融逼迫を緩和するだろうと期待されている。The bank rate cut is expected to relieve the severe financial squeeze that has hit industry.
彼女はブラインドを引きおろした。She pulled down the blinds.

彼女は自分のほうに椅子を引き寄せた。She drew the chair towards her.
彼の不注意な運転が事故を引き起こした。His careless driving caused the accident.


私の息子が仕事を引き継ぐだろう。My son will take over the job.
彼は声を引き絞って歌った。He sang with his voice strained.
長い目で見れば、正直は引き合う。Honesty pays in the long run.

彼は長い論争に引き込まれた。He was engaged in a long argument.
私は苦情を言ったが、店ではこのセーターを引き取るのを拒んだ。I complained, but they refused to take this sweater back.彼は戦災孤児をひきとって養女として育てています。He adopted a war orphan and is bringing her up as a foster daughter.


私は重い荷物を空港まで引きずって行った。I dragged the heavy baggage to the airport.彼は彼女の腕を取り、引きずっていった。He seized her hand and dragged her away.



彼を説得して私達の見解に引き入れるには、相当な時間がかかった。It took a long time to bring him around to our point of view.
母はひろしの夜具をぐいと引き剥がした。Mother yanked the bedclothes off Hiroshi.

社長は新しいセールスマネージャーを入れるため、引き抜き専門の人物を雇った。The company president has hired a headhunter to find us a new sales manager.
歯科医は彼女の虫歯を引き抜いた。The dentist pulled out her bad tooth.彼はライバル会社に引き抜かれました。He was poached by a rival company.


野球の試合は引き分けに終わった。The baseball game ended in a draw.
昨日の試合で早稲田は慶応と引き分けた。Waseda tied Keio in yesterday's game.
今は引き返すには遅すぎる。It's too late to turn back now.



再び惨めな現実に引き戻されました。It brought me down to earth.
警官は取っ組み合いをしている二人の男を引き離した。The policeman separated the two men who were fighting.私どもは完全に他社を引き離していますよ。We have completely outstripped the other companies.
赤いベルトが彼女の黒いドレスをひきたたせている。The red belt makes her black dress look even better.
オレの醜い部分がオレを引き裂く。The ugly side of myself tears me up.
彼は部下と馬を引き連れ雪山を越え暑い谷へといった。He led his men and horses over snowy mountains and down into hot valleys.
日曜日はいつも家に引きこもっている。I usually stay indoors on Sunday.

カーテンがゆっくり引かれた。The curtains were drawn slowly.あんな本みたらフツーの女は引くもんな！Obviously a normal woman would lose interest if she saw a book like that!あなたの引いたカードは赤のマークですね。The card you drew was a red, wasn't it?


ありがとう。お店がひけたら、僕の家でもう１杯飲もうよ。Thanks. When you get off work, we'll go to my place for another.


私なんか、親戚に会うと引け目を感じてしまうわ。I feel not quite up to snuff when I meet my relatives.
彼は体の平衡を失って、ひっくり返った。He lost his balance and fell down.
去年の秋、私たちはニューヨークに引っ越した。We moved to New York last fall.
凧が木に引っかかった。The kite got caught in the tree.
彼女は上着を引っかけると外へ出た。She threw on a coat and went outside.セーターをあの釘にひっかけちゃった。I caught my sweater on that nail.彼は私たちに水をひっかけた。He dashed us with water.


今までどこに引っこんでいたのですか。Where've you been keeping yourself?
彼はテーブルから手を引っ込めた。He withdrew his hand from the table.
少年が自転車に乗って通りすがりに私のハンドバッグをひったくった。A boy snatched my purse as he rode by on his bicycle.
このひっきりなしの騒音は頭にくる。This incessant noise drives me mad.
虫に刺された跡を引っかかないようにした方がいいよ。You should try not to scratch insect bites.
酔っ払っておそく家に帰ったかどで、怒った女房は亭主に食ってかかり、箒で亭主をひっぱたいた。The angry wife was on the warpath; she hit her husband with a broom for coming home late and drunk.

あのタレントはひっぱりだこである。That talent is much sought after.













彼は商売をたたんで引退した。He sold his business and retired.



ハムレットから１行引用できますか。Can you quote a line of Hamlet?彼はよく聖書から引用する。He often quotes the Bible.
私はこれらの引用句の出典をどうしても知る必要がある。I must know where these quotations originate.


もし論文の量が不足したら、引用文で水増ししておけばいい。If your essay is on the short side, you can always pad it out with a few quotations.
サッカーのチームはトムによって引率される。The soccer team is led by Tom.
ニュートンは引力の法則を確立した。Newton established the law of gravity.





彼はビールの大ジョッキを飲み干した。He drank that large beer mug dry.


飲み食いするものが十分ある限り彼は何も気にしない。He doesn't care, provided he has enough to eat and drink.
飲み代として使った金額は総計７千ドルだった。The total bill for drinks came up to 7000 dollars.


さあ、一晩飲み明かすぞ。Let's drink the night away.

この薬を飲まなければ行けませんか。Must I take this medicine?


彼は彼女に飲酒をやめるようにと忠告した。He advised her to stop drinking.
警官は飲酒運転で彼を逮捕した。The policeman arrested him for drunken driving.
彼の飲酒癖は今に始まったことではない。His drinking habit is an old one.

好きなだけ飲食していただいて結構です。You can eat and drink as much as you want.

とりわけ、飲食物には気をつけなさい。Above all, be careful about what you eat and drink.

この水は、飲用に適している。This water is good to drink.
この飲料に含まれている成分には有害なものがある。とりわけ妊娠中の人に。Some of the ingredients in this beverage are harmful, especially if you are pregnant.
緊急時の飲料水の確保は、大丈夫ですか？Are you OK for drinking water in an emergency?
彼は淫らな生活から足を洗った。He was converted from his licentious living.















その会社では、会長が院政を敷いていて、社長はお飾りにすぎない。The "retired" president of that company runs the whole show from behind the scenes, so the current president is nothing but a figurehead.








その家は見かけがたいへん陰気だった。The house looked very dismal.




彼は表面上は陰険そうに見える。He appears sly on the surface.
だれか人に、言い分があったら、陰口をいわないで、その人に面と向かっていいなさい。If you have a bone to pick with a person, tell it to his face instead of saying things behind his back.

中学・高校では陰湿ないじめが増える傾向にあるという。In junior high and high schools, they say insidious forms of bullying are on the rise.

ツベルクリン反応は陰性でした。The result of the tuberculin test was negative.





陰徳あれば陽報あり。Secret gifts are openly rewarded.




うちの前のやせ犬・陰弁慶。Every dog is a lion at home.
私は彼らの陰謀をすぐに見抜いた。I saw through their plot at once.




雨が降って、その秋の日を陰うつにした。The rain made the autumn day dismal.





彼は僕に何か隠し事をしてるに違いない。I'm sure he is keeping something from me.


なぜ君はそんなに隠し立てするのか。Why are you being so secretive?
私は母がケーキを隠すのを見た。I saw my mother hide the cake.
子どもは箱の中に隠れていた。The child was hiding in the box.太陽が雲のかげに隠れた。The sun disappeared behind a cloud.

その倉庫は麻薬密売者の隠れみのだった。The warehouse was a front for drug traffickers.






隠者は木造の小屋に住んでいた。The hermit lived in a wooden hut.










これまた政府の隠ぺい策のようです。This looks like another government cover-up.





「怒ると彼はトラになる」というのは隠喩の例である。"He's a tiger when he's angry" is an example of metaphor.




彼はいくつかの戯曲を韻文で書いた。He wrote several plays in verse.
言葉による詩とは、要約して言えば、韻律的美の創造であるとしたい。I would define, in brief, the poetry of words as the Rhythmical Creation of Beauty.
２つ目の角を右に曲がりなさい。Turn right at the second corner.










右手がしびれます。My right hand is numb.

右上の親知らずが痛みます。My upper right wisdom tooth hurts.
右折しなさい、そうすれば私の事務所が見つかります。Turn to the right, and you'll find my office.

本日乗馬後、馬の手入れをしている時にうっかり右足を踏まれた。Today, after riding, while grooming the horse I carelessly got my right foot trod on.私はその事故で右足を負傷した。I got my right leg hurt in the accident.







２年前に右目を失明しました。I lost the eyesight in my right eye two years ago.



右腕を骨折したようです。I think my right arm is broken.
宇宙には限りはない。There is no limit to the universe.



地球は宇宙空間に漂う球体にすぎない。The earth is just a sphere suspended in space.

みんな宇宙人になったつもりで。Let's pretend we are aliens.

宇宙船は月を回る軌道を外れている。The spaceship is out of orbit around the moon.

その宇宙飛行士は月に降り立つのを見られた。The astronaut was seen to land on the moon.


宇宙旅行はもはや夢ではない。Space travel is no longer a dream.

屋根の上にいる鳥はからすです。The bird on the roof is a crow.











このイカは鮮度が落ちはじめた。This cuttlefish has started to lose its freshness.







立派な羽が立派な鳥をつくる。Fine feathers make fine birds.羽に深い傷を負った小鳥を見つけました。I found a bird whose wing was severely damaged.

小鳥が物音にはばたきして飛び去った。The birds fluttered away at the noise.

その間ずっと、じいさんの言ったことが、メロンの周りを飛び回る蠅の羽音のように、頭の中でぶんぶんと鳴っていました。All that time the things granddad had said, like the sound of flies flying round a melon, buzzed in my head.



羽子板で突く羽の玉は「むくろじ」という大木の種です。The feathered balls you hit with a battledore are the seeds of a large tree called 'soapberry'.

水着の上に羽織られるもの持っていったほうがいいね。It's a good idea to bring something to slip on over your bathing suit.
彼女は羽振りのよいときもあった。She has known better days.

雄のくじゃくは尾の羽毛が色彩豊かである。The male peacock has colorful tail feathers.
最後の詰めを怠ったばかりに、画竜点睛を欠くはめになってしまったね。You kept putting off working on the fine details on this project so it ended up lacking the finishing touches.



Windows Vistaのセキュリティ機能を迂回する方法を研究者が公表します。Researchers announce method of circumventing Windows Vista security features.


そんな事をするとはうかつだった。It was careless of me to do something like that.
雨のために彼らは気力をそがれた。The rain dampened their spirits.



雨具をお持ちになりましたか。Do you have rain gear with you?


嵐が雨戸をがたがたとならした。The storm rattled the shutters.

いろいろトラブルもあったけど、雨降って地固まるってことになってほしいね。We've been through a rough patch, but I hope it will have made us stronger.



ここで雨宿りをしよう。Let's shelter here from the rain.





雨天の後には晴天が来る。After rain comes fair weather.
試合は雨天決行です。The game will be held even if it rains.




その家の屋根は雨漏りがした。The roof of the house let in the rain.




彼の話をうのみにすることはできなかった。We could not swallow his story.
彼がどうなっているか私にはうかがいしる事ができない。I cannot guess at all what is going on with him.
彼女の悲しそうな顔には哀願の様子がうかがえる。There is a look of appeal on her sad face.彼は発言の機会をうかがった。He watched for an opportunity to speak.この壁画からは古代人の生活の片鱗をうかがうことができる。We can get a glimpse of the lifestyle of ancient people from this wall painting.








大きな渦巻きと急流があります。It has a big whirlpool and a strong current.
まぁ実際問題、そんな噂が渦巻く中でよく部活が存続してると思うぜ。Well, for the practical problem, in the midst of those rumours flying around I'm surprised they've been able to keep that club running.






彼が言ったことが嘘であることが解った。What he said turned out to be false.えっ嘘でしょ。Oh my God, I can't believe this.
一郎はどことなく傷ついたように言ったが、それが嘘っぱちであることはこいつとの長年の付き合いが教えてくれた。Ichiro sounded somehow upset but my long years of hanging out with him told me that it was out and out fake.


うそをつくのは悪いことだと思う。I think it's wrong to tell a lie.

もし嘘なら、彼女はうそつきだ。If that's false, she's a liar.


あまりしっかりうなぎを握ると、かえって逃げられる。Holding an eel too fast is the way to let her escape.







あの双子は瓜二つだな。Those twins look like two peas in a pod.
うわさは四方八方に広がった。The rumor spread far and wide.

遅かれ早かれ、彼の運は尽きるだろう。Sooner or later, his luck will run out.
ケイちゃんはとても運がいいのよ。お産の時から、そうだったわ。Kei's very lucky! He has been since his birth.

凍死しそうな乞食が手当てのため、病院に運び込まれた。だが、その乞食は治療費を清算するような金は一文も、もってなかった。A freezing beggar was brought into the hospital for treatment. However, he didn't have even one cent with which to settle the bill.
この建物からガラクタを運び出してくれ。Get the rubbish out of the building.
荷物を二階に運んでいただけませんか。Would you carry my luggage upstairs?仕事はすらすらと運んだ。The work progressed smoothly.
運よく彼らは逃れることができた。By good fortune, they escaped.
運悪く仕事が見つからなかった。He had no luck in finding work.
我々はあらゆる学校を運営させ続け、あらゆる教師を職にとどめておくべきです。We should keep every school open and every teacher in his job.

この船は大きすぎて運河を通れない。This ship is too big to pass through the canal.


君は運がよかった。飛行機は定時運航だよ。You're in luck. The plane is on time.
バスは２０分間隔で運行されている。Buses are running at 20-minute intervals.潮の満ち干は月の運行に左右される。The rise and fall of the sea is governed by the moon.



私は運勢を占ってもらった。I had my fortune told.


運賃は片道1ドルです。The fare is one dollar each way.
現在５０台の機械が運転中です。Fifty of the machines are running at the present time.キャロルはレンタカーを運転しています。Carol is driving a rent-a-car.君は資金をうまく運転しなくてはならない。You must employ your capital well.
彼は運転士として鉄道で働いている。He works on the railroad as a driver.

運転者は停止信号を無視した。The driver ignored the stoplight.
運転手はベルトを締めるべきだ。Drivers should wear seat belts.


運転は下手だが、彼はどうにか運転免許に合格した。He managed to pass his driving test even though he was a poor driver.
その運動をして若返った。The exercise took years off me.堅実な草の根レベルの運動を築きあげることに集中しなければならない。We must focus on building a solid grass-roots movement.物理学は物質、運動、エネルギーの科学であると定義することができる。Physics can be defined as the science of matter, motion, and energy.

今日は学校の運動会なんだよ。Today is our school field day.
ケイトは今運動場で走っている。Kate is running in the field now.
お兄さんと比べて、彼は運動神経が鈍い。Compared with his brother, he is a poor athlete.

運動不足が健康に害を及ぼすかもしれない。Lack of exercise may harm your health.


男性は一人で運搬トラックに荷物を詰め込んでいる。The man is loading the moving truck on his own.

私たちは二度と彼女に会えない運命だった。We were never to see her again.

サービス産業には、通信、運輸、流通、金融をはじめものの生産には関係ないたくさんの分野が含まれる。Service industries include communication, transportation, distribution, finance and a host of other areas which do not involve production of goods.




雲がだんだん黒くなっています。The clouds are getting darker.
あいつどこに雲隠れしたのかな。I wonder where he is hiding.


雲間から一条の光が漏れてきた。A beam of sunlight came through the clouds.

雲行きが悪くなる。The situation is growing serious.


この議論の妥当性に関する疑問はデータを見れば雲散霧消する。Any doubts about the validity of this argument are promptly forgotten once we see the data.




「まがりなりにも通じている」ということと「正しい英語を使っている」ということには雲泥の差があります。There is a world of difference between, "somehow being understood" and "using correct English."









犬に毎日えさをあげてください。Please feed the dog every day.
その鹿はライオンの餌食になった。The deer fell prey to the lion.






その島には漁業を営む人たちが住んでいた。The island was inhabited by a fishing people.
営業の者と話をしてみました。I talked with our sales people.
営業マンだって、リストラ予備軍に配属されないように必死な訳です。After all, even salesmen are desperate to avoid being targeted for downsizing.
営業時間は十時から七時までです。Our store hours are from 10 to 7.



誰が営業部を担当しているのですか。Who's in charge of the sales section?






彼は営利のためにこれをした。He has done this for profit.







多くのテレビ番組が子供たちに悪い影響を与えている。Many TV programs have a bad influence on children.このデザインには中国の影響がみられる。This design shows Chinese influence.
あなたの忠告は彼らに影響を及ぼすでしょう。I daresay your advice will have its effect on them.
彼の意見には強い影響力がある。His ideas carry a lot of weight.

それは高い木の影法師にすぎなかった。It was nothing but the shadow of a tall tree.
自分の姿を鏡にうつして見なさい。Look at yourself in the mirror.
その映画をもう一度見たいな。I want to see the movie again.
その本が映画化されてから５年になる。It is five years since the book was made into a movie.
ある映画監督が一目見てケイトに魅了されました。The movie director was enchanted by Kate at first sight.
その映画館は人々でいっぱいだった。The cinema was filled with people.


彼はその劇場で映写係をやっている。He's the projectionist at the theater.

その映像はピントがあっていない。The image is not in focus.多くの場合、音楽を聴く時に心に浮かぶ映像はＣＤのアートワークです。In many cases, the image that comes to mind when you listen to music is that of the CD's artwork.




善人必ずしも栄える者でない。Not all good men will prosper.


彼は不滅の栄冠を得た。He was crowned with eternal victory.

栄枯盛衰は世の習い。A man's life has its ups and downs.
僕達の栄光の日々に乾杯！Let's all make a toast to our glory days.



ご栄転おめでとうございます。Congratulations on your promotion.
彼はその賞を最高の栄誉だと感じている。He feels the prize to be the superior.

この魚は安くてしかも栄養がある。This fish is inexpensive but nourishing.
栄養価の高い食事をするようにしてください。You have to eat nutritious foods.




過労やら栄養不足やらで彼は重病になった。What with overwork and lack of nourishment, he became very ill.
その画家は、いわば永遠の少年だ。The artist is eternally a boy.
息子の乳歯が永久歯に変わりました。All my son's adult teeth are in.







彼女はアメリカに永住することに決めた。She has decided to live in America for good.






この新薬は効果が永続的である。This new medicine has a lasting effect.
私の注意を引いた最も興味深いことの一つは、美の評価においては永続性などないということである。One of the most curious things that has forced itself on my notice is that there is no permanence in the judgement of beauty.





彼女は就寝中安らかに永眠した。She passed away peacefully in her sleep.

この湖で泳ぐのは危険だと思うんだ。I think it is dangerous to swim in the lake.



どなたがあなたがたに英会話を教えてくれるのですか。Who teaches you English conversation?


アメリカでは英語を話します。They speak English in America.


英国へ行ったことがありますか。Have you ever been to Britain?
英国人は偉大な国民だ。England is a great nation.

英作文の練習問題をしなさい。Do a composition exercise, please.

外国人は英詩をたくさん読んで初めてシェイクスピアの作品を理解することができる。Only if a foreigner has read much English poetry can he understand Shakespeare.








こと英単語の暗記にかけては、彼にかなう者はいない。When it comes to learning English words by heart, nobody can beat him.

僕は学生の頃日記を英文でつけていたものだ。I used to keep a diary in English when I was a student.
彼は英文学を専攻している。He majors in English literature.
この英文法は完璧には程遠い。This English composition is far from perfect.
ジョーンズ先生は英米の語法の微妙な違いにとても敏感である。Mr Jones is very sensitive to the nuances of English and American usage.

この日本語を英訳しなさい。Put this Japanese into English.
英雄も従者にはただの人。No man is a hero to his valet.
人々はみな彼の英雄的行為をたたえた。Everybody praised his heroism.



TOEICの学習に限らず、英語を学ぶのであれば英和辞典は必携の書の一つでしょう。An English-Japanese dictionary is surely a must have book, not just for those taking TOEIC, but for all studying English.


衛星は今軌道に乗っている。The satellite is now in orbit.


彼は衛生監視員である。He is a sanitary inspector.


その詩は無名の著者が詠んだ。The poem was composed by an anonymous author.






そのナイフは刃が鋭い。The knife has a very sharp edge.ここに鋭い痛みがあります。I have a sharp pain here.猟犬は鋭い嗅覚で獲物を追う。Hounds hunt by their keen scent.




目が見えない人の聴力は鋭敏な場合が多い。A blind person's hearing is often very acute.

鋭い舌は絶えず用いることによって、ますます鋭利になる片刃の道具である。A sharp tongue is the only edged tool that grows keener with constant use.
その液はいやな臭いを発した。The liquor gave off a sickly odor.


液晶画面は、見にくいなぁ。You can't see too well with these LCD displays.

リトマス紙で溶液の液性（酸性、中性、塩基性）を調べるときは、リトマス紙をすべて溶液に浸すのではなく、紙の先端の部分だけを浸します。When investigating the pH (acidic, neutral, alkaline) of a liquid, don't soak the litmus paper completely in the liquid but just put the end of the paper in it.
水と石油は共に液体である。Water and oil are both liquids.










グランド・セントラル駅までやってください。Grand Central Station, please.
駅員に連絡したが、男はその場を立ち去り、改札口を出て行った。They contacted the station staff but the man had left the area and gone out through the ticket barrier.

この本は駅前の書店で買ったんだ。I bought this book at the bookstore in front of the station.






お昼は駅弁にしよう。Let's have one of those boxed lunches they sell at train stations.





船は今夜赤道を越すだろう。The ship will cross the equator tonight.どうやって彼らはあのテントで寒い冬を越せるのだろうか。How will they get through the cold winter in that tent?２０３０年までには、全人口の２１パーセントが６５歳を越すようになる。By 2030, twenty-one percent of its population will be over sixty-five.







定期雑誌類は閲覧室より帯出禁止。Periodicals may not be removed from the reading room.


あの青年は大金を得るため一生懸命働くのをいとわなかった。The young man was extremely money hungry.












私はそのレコードを買うのに３０００円かかった。It cost me 3,000 yen to buy the record.これは100万円の価値がある。This is worth one million yen.ある気前の良い男性が、およそ二十億円を慈善団体に寄付した。A generous man contributed some two billion yen to charity.

これはとてもまろやかなコーヒーだ。This is a very mild coffee.

円安が進んでいるね。The yen is still low against the dollar.















この円高のうちに、海外旅行をしたいものです。I would like to travel in foreign countries while the yen is strong.

日本のＯＤＡは返済期間３０年、利率２％前後という条件の緩い円借款が大部分を占める。Japan's ODA largely consists of concessionary yen credit repayable in 30 years, carrying an interest rate of 2% or so.



これはターナーの円熟期の作品です。This is a work from Turner's mature period.


彼らは円陣を作った。They formed themselves into a circle.



円錐形の定義を教えてくれませんか。Can you give me the definition of a cone?

必要なのは四角いテーブルで、円卓ではない。We need a square table, not a round one.


ベイスギを材料に巨大でグロテスクな、しかし美しい円柱を作った。They made huge, grotesque, yet beautiful poles of red cedar.












直径23m(下段)及び18m(上段)、高さ5ｍの二段式の円墳である。It is a two level style round burial mound, 23m diameter (lower level), 18m (higher).


争議は円満に解決した。The dispute was settled peacefully.




「これは・・・」「軍手とスコップ。園芸部基本道具のひとつだよ」"This is ..." "Working glove and trowel. One of a gardening club's basic tools."


私達は明日、園遊会を開く予定です。We are to have a garden party tomorrow.

熱狂の宴が始まりを告げる。A frenzied feasting tells of the beginning.
宴会はたけなわだった。The banquet was in full swing.


仕事が多いので旅行はのびのびになっている。I have so much work to do that I have to put off my trip.

わが戦闘機の延べ出撃機数は平均１日４３０機であった。Our fighters averaged 430 missions a day.


延引は時間の盗人。Procrastination is the thief of time.

私たちは会合を延期しなければならなかった。We had to put off the meeting.





料金延滞で電話を止められた。My telephone service was cut off because of unpaid bills.
悪天候のため飛行機は延着した。Due to bad weather, the plane was late.
宿泊をもう一晩延長できますか。Can I extend my stay one more night?













サムは彼の援助を求める人なら誰でも援助する。Sam helps whoever asks him to.


私たちは川に沿って散歩した。We took a walk along the river.



トロール漁船は沿岸の魚をとりつくしました。Fishing trawlers have fished out all the local waters.
入学式も終わりました。同じ沿線の大学です。I've already had the entrance ceremony. It's a university alongside the same railway line.
人々はパレードを見ようと沿道に集まった。People amassed along the streets to watch the parade.

学生たちは「ハムレット」を演じた。The students performed Hamlet.



ケイトが演技を磨くために注ぐ力を邪魔する物は、何もありませんでした。Nothing could hinder Kate from using all her energy to polish her performances.


スポーツと演芸の分野でのオーストラリア人の卓越。Australians excel at sports and entertainment.
私はイギリス演劇を勉強しています。I'm studying the English drama.







その劇は彼によって演出された。The play was produced by him.照明はツマミ一つで光量を変えられるようになっていて好きな明るさを演出出来るようになっている。The lighting was set up to have the intensity controlled by one knob so you could produce the brightness as you want.
我々は彼に演説を頼んだ。We called upon him for a speech.
演奏会が始まろうとしている。The concert is about to start.



この運動は、フェミニストたちが女性問題について論じるための話の広場ないし演壇のようなものである。This movement is like a forum or platform from which feminists speak out on women's issues.





硫黄は青い炎を上げて燃える。Sulfur burns with a blue flame.


歯茎が炎症を起こしているようなのですが。I think I have a gum infection.

家は炎上していた。The house was in flames.



人々は都会の炎熱を避けようとする。People seek escape from the heat of the town.
エレベーターから煙の臭いがします。I smell smoke in the elevator.

あの人は煙たい。I feel awkward in his presence.

タバコで煙った空気を部屋から出して、新鮮な空気を入れてちょうだい。Let this smoky air out of the room and let some fresh air in.









あの煙突はとても高い。That chimney is very high.


たくさんのツバメがまもなく南からやってくる。Many swallows will come soon from the south.



何匹かのサルが木に登っているのを見た。I saw some monkeys climbing the tree.






猿まねはやめろ。Don't be a copycat.

金の切れ目が縁の切れ目。The end of money is the end of love.戸籍上の縁は切れても、昔日の絆はそのままだ。Our connection may be cut on paper but the bonds of old remain as they were.
彼らは水瓶を縁まで一杯にした。They filled the jug to the brim.

私の読んだ冒険談は実生活とは縁遠い。The adventures I read about are absent from my life.

縁起に塩をまいて清める。We sprinkle salt to ward off bad luck.









お庭の方にも縁台を並べれば、かなり座席数を確保できそうだなーと思いました。I thought that if we lined up benches in the garden as well, we could achieve quite a seating capacity.



飼い猫の毛のつやが悪くなった。Our cat's fur has lost its luster.


彼女はあでやかな肢体で男性の人気を得た。Her bewitching body made her very popular with men.






彼の家はここから遠くない。His house is not far from here.君の夢が実現する日も遠くないだろう。It won't be long before your dream comes true.彼は彼女の遠い親戚だ。He is a distant relation of hers.
私も遠からずおとなになるだろう。I will also become a grown-up before long.
遠くに富士山が見えた。Mt. Fuji could be seen in the distance.
船は岸壁からしだいに遠ざかって行った。The boat moved slowly away from the quay.
彼女は彼を遠ざけたいと思っている。She wants to keep him at a distance.




魚は遠火でゆっくり、こんがり焼き上げます。The fish is baked slowly till browned over a not-too-close fire.
遠まわしに彼の意見を探った。I sounded him out about his views.
もし遠回りでなければポストに入れてください。Please drop it in the mail if it's not out of your way.
傷むのを防ぐために、遠海で捕獲した魚は直ちに冷却される。To avoid spoiling, fish caught far out at sea are immediately cooled or even frozen.






彼は遠隔地を旅するのを楽しんでいる。He enjoys exploring remote areas.




遠近感がとぼしいのです。I'm afraid my depth perception is very poor.
遠近法がとられてないので、その絵は変にみえる。The picture looks strange because it has no perspective.
その絵の遠景には城がある。There is a castle in the background of the picture.
山は遠見の方がよい。Mountains look better viewed from a distance.









これは遠心力ですがニュートンは絶対運動と見なしています。This is centrifugal force, which Newton viewed as absolute motion.
彼はエベレスト登頂の遠征隊の一員であった。He was a member of the expedition which climbed Mount Everest.私たちは遠征試合でほとんど負けてしまった。We lost almost all our away games.


「まだ浅いね。足とどく」「結構遠浅だな。よつばもまだ足つくだろ」"It's still shallow, eh. My feet still touch the bottom." "It's quite a shallow beach. Yotsuba, you can still touch the bottom can't you?"

学校の遠足で奈良に行った。We went on a school trip to Nara.
太鼓の音は遠のいていった。The drum faded away.






遠方に城が見えた。We saw a castle in the distance.


昨夜犬の遠吠えが聞こえた。Last night, I heard dogs howling.彼の批判は犬の遠吠えだ。He can only criticize people behind their backs.







ここでのおタバコはご遠慮願います。Please refrain from smoking here.
どうぞ遠慮なく電話してくださいね。Please feel free to call me up.


遠路はるばる見送りに来てくださるとはなんとご親切なんでしょう。How kind you are to come all the way to see me off!
鉛と金とでは、どちらが重いんですか。Which is heavier, lead or gold?








ペンか鉛筆を持っていますか。Do you have a pen or a pencil?


このスープは、しょっぱ過ぎて飲めないよ。This soup is too salty to eat.






この沢庵は塩気が足りない。The pickled radish needs a touch of salt.

















塩分の高い食事をとると、高血圧の原因になるかもしれない。Maintaining a high salt diet may contribute to high blood pressure.
もうちょっと塩味をきかせてみたら？How about adding a little bit more salt?




ジャックは私に汚いいたずらをした。Jack played a dirty trick on me.

その本を汚さないように扱ってくれるなら、貸してあげるよ。You may borrow this book as long as you keep it clean.あんな行動は彼の体面を汚すものだ。Such behavior is beneath his dignity.
そんな汚らわしい話をするのはやめて。Stop telling those filthy stories.
お父さんの破産は家名の汚れでした。Father's bankruptcy was a blot on the family's reputation.

この部屋の空気は汚れている。The air in this room is foul.おまえを失いかけた時、俺は自分の汚れた心を見た。When I was on the verge of losing you, I saw how sinful my soul was.
そのプロジェクトの責任者であったジェイソンが、汚職に手を染めた理由で解任された。Jason, who was in charge of the project, was dismissed for corruption.

そして汚水を流すために地下に下水道を持っていた。The house has pipes under the ground to carry dirty water away.
汚染が地球を傷つけている。Pollution is damaging our earth.






その事件は彼の名声に汚点を残した。The incident left a spot on his reputation.
水の淀む所には汚物が溜る。Standing pools gather filth.
その男は反逆者の汚名をきせられた。The man was branded as a traitor.
私のおいは卵に対してアレルギー体質だ。My nephew is allergic to eggs.

















彼は奥さんが怖かった。He was afraid of his wife.



彼は奥の手を出してきた。He played his trump card.

その店は通りから奥まったところにあった。The store was just off the street.







間口も広いが奥行きも同様に深い。It's as deep as it is wide.



左上の奥歯が痛みます。My upper left back tooth hurts.


その話は、ある日曜日の午後も遅くなった頃、奥深い森の中で始まったんだ。It began late one Sunday afternoon, deep in the woods.




奥様にどうかよろしくお伝えください。Send my greetings to your wife.

「相変わらず短気だな」麗華の拳をいなしながら言う。"Short tempered as ever." He said while dodging Reika's fist.





医者は午後６軒往診した。The doctor made six house calls in the afternoon.
こういう実行不可能な提案には往生する。Those impossible suggestions just annoy me.



往復ですか、片道ですか。Round trip or one-way?


多くの人が往来する。Many a man comes and goes.私は往来で財布を拾った。I picked up a purse in the street.

あなたは御両親の期待に応えるべきだ。You ought to live up to your parents' hopes.それは彼の身に応えだした。It is beginning to tell on him.

我々は彼らの要求に応じなければならなかった。We had to yield to their request.
何事が起ころうとも、君を応援するよ。I will stand by you whatever happens.彼女は自分のひいきの馬を応援した。She cheered for her favorite horse.



これらの建物は応急の修理が必要です。These buildings need temporary repairs.


候補者たちは減税法案をめぐって応酬しました。Candidates traded blows over the proposed tax cut.敵は我々の砲火に応酬した。The enemy answered our fire.
第１次世界大戦で英国の成年男子の大半が応召した。In the First World War, a large proportion of England's young men enlisted.


今この応接間に入ってはいけません。Don't go into this drawing room now.
数人の客が応接室で待っていた。There were some guests waiting in the drawing room.

間髪を入れず、迅速かつ的確な応対、畏れ入ります。Such an accurate, lightning-quick reply. What can I say?

こちらアヤ、こちらアヤ、応答お願いします。This is Aya, this is Aya. Please respond.


その学校で新しい教師を必要としていたので、彼はその職に応募した。When the school needed a new teacher, he applied for the position.
５０人の応募者のうち２０人が不合格となった。There were 20 failures among 50 applicants.

この論文では生物学におけるエメット理論の応用については扱わない。We are not concerned in this paper with the application of Emmet's theory in biology.




政府はインフレを押え込もうと躍起になっている。The government is desperate to keep inflation down.
あなたはボタンを押しさえすればいい。All you have to do is press the button.君は押しが足りない。You don't have enough push.


彼女はそのドアを押し開けた。She pushed the door open.
たいへん困ったことに、彼がパーティーに押しかけてきた。To our great annoyance, he barged in on our party.

ダムが切れて流域に大水が押し寄せた。The dam gave way and sent a great flush of water down the valley.






ピストルを持った男が彼をせきたてて車に押し込んだ。A man with a gun urged him into the car.

警察は私をわきへ押しのけた。The policeman thrust me aside.
彼は保守党一辺倒で押し通した。He has remained pro-conservative throughout.

天井が落ちれば、彼は押しつぶされるだろう。If the ceiling fell, he would be crushed.
彼は車に押し倒された。He was knocked over by the car.
彼は壁に耳を押しあてた。He pressed his ear against the wall.
賊が彼の家に押し入った。Burglars broke into his house.

先月の日直当番全部私に押し付けた形でエスケープした野郎だ。He's the pest that, on last month's class-help day, escaped leaving me with all the work.
私は人込みを押し分けて進んだ。I thrust my way through the crowd.
劇の批評はおしなべて好評だった。Almost all of the reviews of the play were favorable.

私達はじっと押し黙っておはしを使って食事をした。We ate with chopsticks in restrained silence.

ここで意味のない押し問答を続けては・・・昨日の繰り返しですわね。If you continue with the pointless arguments here...it'll end up as a repeat of yesterday.


あまりにも雨が激しく降ったのでその神社は押し流されてしまいました。It rained so hard that the shrine was washed away.
シャッターを押してくれますか。Could you press this button?その箱には製造者の証印が押してある。The box bears the stamp of the manufacturer.
書式に必ず署名押印してください。Please be sure to sign and seal the form.


警察は家宅捜査をし２キロのヘロインを押収した。The police searched the house and seized 2 kilograms of heroin.



彼は知識欲が旺盛である。He is in a rage to know.
母親は赤ん坊をベッドに横にした。The mother laid her baby on the bed.道が濡れていたので、車は横にスリップしたにちがいない。As the road was wet, the car must have slipped sideways.家の横はつたで覆われていた。The side of the house was covered with ivy.
彼は枕に頭を横たえた。He laid his head on the pillow.
ケイトとは、目をひらいたまま、横たわっていた。Kate was lying with her eyes open.
彼は私の横っ腹を蹴った。He kicked me in the side.





その肖像画は美人の横顔を描いている。The portrait shows the profile of a beautiful woman.



横向きに寝ると「いびき」をかきにくい？Is snoring less likely if you sleep on your side?



学生のひとりによれば、中国では今なお粛清が行われ、恐怖政治が横行しているとのことです。One student says the purge is still going on in China and terror is widespread.









私は彼女が通りを横切るのを見た。I saw her crossing the street.



道路を横断する時は気を付けなさい。Take care when you cross the street.彼はヨットで太平洋を横断した。He crossed the Pacific Ocean in a sailboat.
あなたは横断歩道ではもっと注意すべきだ。You should be more careful at a crosswalk.
横着しないで、教わった漢字を使いなさい。Don't be lazy, use the kanji you've been taught.


「ところでよ、そのおめーのお父さんはどこにいんのさ？」「横転したトラックの下なんよ」"By the way, where's your old man?" "Under that over-turned truck."



その長さと横幅を１０で割りなさい。Divide its length and breadth by ten.
左横腹を下にして下さい。Lie down on your left side.


ボスは１ヶ月ずっと態度が横柄だった。The boss has been on his high horse all month long.


彼の横暴ぶりは目に余った。His tyrannies were beyond endurance.


ジルはジョンを横目で見た。Jill looked at John sideways.



その市長は市の金を横領した。The mayor appropriated city money for his own use.




欧州通貨はドルに対して弱くなった。European currencies weakened against the dollar.

欧州共同体の１２ヶ国は農産物価格についての妥協案を作成しています。The 12 countries of the European Community are working out a compromise on agricultural commodity prices.





生活水準の面では、その共和国は欧米諸国に追い付いた。As for the standard of living, the republic has caught up with the West.





他人をなぐり倒す権利がないのと同様に、無礼な言葉を浴びせる権利もない。We have no more right to say a rude thing to another than to knock him down.
警棒で空をなぐりつけ、よろめいて体勢をたてなおしたガードマンは、自分に向かって突進してくる金網づくりのクズカゴを見た。The guard's truncheon hit air. Off balance, he regained his posture to see a metal-mesh rubbish bin flying towards him.
ジョージは彼の腹を殴った。George hit him in the stomach.


誰が王位を継ぐのですか。Who will succeed to the throne?

その作家はギリシャの王家の血統を引いていた。The writer was descended from the Greek royal family.
彼女は出廷したとき、王冠のようなものをかぶっていた。When she appeared in court, she was wearing a sort of crown.百円じゃなくて、王冠でした。It wasn't a 100 yen coin, it was a bottle cap.
国王とその家族は王宮に住んでいる。The king and his family live in the royal palace.
何故イギリスだけが王権を弱めることに成功したのか。Why is it that only England succeeded in abridging the King's power?
我が軍はその王国を襲った。Our army attacked the kingdom.
現在のチャンピオンは彼であり、その王座を奪える新人挑戦者はいないだろう。He's reigning champion, and no young challenger is going to take it away from him.
王子は森で道に迷った。The prince was lost in the woods.


この土地は王室のものです。This land belongs to the Royal Family.
カリフォルニアには有名な大木、つまり、いわゆる森の王者がある。In California are the famous big trees, or "forest kings" as they are called.
王手をかけられたほうは、玉を逃げるなどの方法で王手を防がねばなりません。The checked player must find a way for the king to escape and block the check.
王女があくどい化粧をしていた。The princess was wearing too much makeup.









このメルマガは、昨今の語学産業界の甘言に躍らされることなく、文法解釈という古典的学習法こそ王道と信じて疑わない方のためのメルマガです。This e-zine is for those who, unswayed by the cajolery of the modern language industry, firmly trust that the traditional learning method of grammatical analysis is the way to go.
王妃は王のかたわらに立っていた。The queen stood beside the king.


その王様はいつも王冠をかぶっている。The king always wears a crown.


うぐいすが鳴いているのが聞こえた。I heard a Japanese nightingale.

カモメは風に乗って滑空した。The sea gull glided on the wind.
何本か花がある。一本は赤、もう一本は白で、その他は黄だ。There are several flowers. One is red, another is white, and the others are yellow.









絵の中の少女は黄金ではなくて花のかんむりをかぶっています。The girl in the picture is wearing a crown not of gold but of flowers.












花粉よりも小さな黄砂をマスクでどれだけ防ぐことが出来るのか？花粉よりもずっと厄介者のように思います。Just how well can masks block the, even smaller than pollen, yellow sand dust? I think it much more of a nuisance than pollen.



秋になると葉は黄色くなる。In autumn the leaves turn yellow.


私の娘は卵の黄身が好きです。My daughter likes egg yolks.





























鼻汁は黄緑色です。The mucus is greenish yellow.







その島は海岸から１マイル沖にある。The island lies a mile off the coast.







彼は沖縄への旅行を延期しました。He put off his trip to Okinawa.


１０億人の人たちが英語を話しています。One billion people speak English.

パーティーに着ていく服を選ぶのはおっくうだ。It's a hassle trying to decide what to wear to the party.

自分が億万長者だと想像してごらん。Imagine yourself as a billionaire.
彼らは屋外スポーツに熱心である。They are keen on outdoor sports.

彼は屋根の雪を取り除いた。He cleared the roof of snow.
デパートの屋上にアドバルーンが上がっている。There is an advertising balloon flying above the department store.

屋内にいるのがもったいないぐらいよい天気だった。It was too nice a day to stay inside.


彼がああ臆病だとは思わなかった。I did not think he was so timid.


まあその、自慢できる事でもないんだけど。というか、臆面もなく吹聴できる話でもない。Well, that is, it's not something I can boast about. In fact, it's not something I can talk about in public without shame
彼女が電話をしている間にふろ桶があふれた。The tub ran over while she was on the phone.
やつらは雄牛を丸焼きにするくらいの火をおこしていた。They had lit a fire fit to roast an ox.


牡丹餅で腰打つ。His bread is buttered on both sides.


牡蠣はどうも私の体質に合わない。Oysters don't agree with me.そのカキを食べた事を後悔しているんだ。I regret eating those oysters.
甲の損は乙の得。One man's gain is another man's loss.彼女の着物と帯の取り合わせはおつだね。Her kimono and obi combination is smart, isn't it?







そうは問屋がおろさないぞ。You won't get it so easily.



お前は恩を仇で返したな。You bit the hand that fed you.




オーストラリア人は全体として政治システムが安定していることによる恩恵に満足している。Australians are, on the whole, pleased with the stabilizing benefits of their political system.

私は恩師の世話でこの仕事に就いた。I got this job with my teacher's help.

彼らは恩赦法によって許されるはずだ。They should be pardoned by the amnesty law.




私は恩人にしたことを、恥ずかしく思った。I was ashamed of what I had done to my benefactor.




近い内にあなたの親切に恩返しをしたい。I would like to repay your kindness in the near future.

このコーヒーはぬるいです。This coffee is not hot enough.







彼は生まれつき温厚だ。He is kind by nature.
私は温室でランを栽培している。I grow orchids in my greenhouse.




泉はおよそ１７０フィートの高さまで温水を吹き出す。The fountain sends hot water to a height of 170 feet.
温泉はあなたに効くでしょう。The hot spring will do you good.

我々のところの気候は温帯性です。Our country's climate is temperate.
島の天候はとても温暖です。The island has a mild climate.


物質は温度によって形を変える。Matter changes its form according to temperature.
温度計は１５度だった。The thermometer stood at 15 degrees.






海は穏やかに、そしてなめらかに見える。The sea looks calm and smooth.
彼は穏健な考えをもった人である。He is a man of moderate opinions.
その組合の賃上げ要求は穏当だった。The union was modest in its wage demands.

シャンパンの栓がぽんと音を立ててとんだ。The champagne cork popped out.




レッスンの時は毎日音階を歌っていたのを覚えています。I remember singing scales every day during music lessons.
あの音楽は彼の気にさわる。That music gets on his nerves.

音楽会は入りがよかった。The concert was well attended.

私は音楽大学で声楽を専攻しています。I'm studying voice at a college of music.
「ここって・・・蝉の声が東京と違う」「あらまっ、よく気がついたこと。貴女、良い音感してるわよ」"Here ... the sound of the cicadas is different." "Oh my, I'm impressed you noticed. You've got a good sense of pitch!"
その瞬間、大音響とともに爆発した。At that instant it exploded with a great noise.





彼からは殴り書きの手紙が一通届いただけで、その後音沙汰が無い。I got a scribbled note from him, but haven't heard from him since.

私のステレオはあなたのより音質が悪い。My stereo set is inferior to yours in sound quality.

テレビの音声を低くしてもいい？Do you mind if I turn down the TV?

彼は言語学だけでなく音声学にも通じている。He is at home in phonetics as well as linguistics.
ｇｕｉｔａｒのアクセントは第２音節にある。The accent in "guitar" falls on the second syllable.



このジェット機は音速の約三倍で飛ぶ。This jet travels about three times as fast as the speed of sound.
その言葉が話された音調で、それがうそだとわかった。The tone in which those words were spoken utterly belied them.
彼がソロを歌うとき、音程が外れるんじゃないかって、手に汗握っちゃうよね。When he gets up on stage to sing one of his out-of-tune solos, I get so nervous for him that I get sweaty palms.

音読は彼にとってたいへん骨の折れる仕事であった。Reading aloud was a great effort for him.




彼は、ピアノを音符を見ずに弾いた。He played piano by ear.







お隣の音楽はとてもうるさい。音量を落としてくれたらなあ。The music next door is very loud. I wish they would turn it down.

「ところでよ、そのおめーのお父さんはどこにいんのさ？」「横転したトラックの下なんよ」"By the way, where's your old man?" "Under that over-turned truck."下に署名してください。Sign at the bottom, please.雨が私のレインコートの下までしみとおった。The rain penetrated my raincoat.

ランプは天井から下がっていた。The lamp hung from the ceiling.
ラジオの音を下げてくれませんか。Could you turn down the radio?









熱いココアを下さい。I'd like to have some hot chocolate.あなたの切手帳を見せてください。Please show me your stamp album.
もう一度言ってくださいますか。Could you repeat that, please?



問題は誰が決定を下すかということだ。The question is who will make the decision.これらの議論で問題になっている評決は、１９９４年のランダー裁判で下されたものである。The verdict at issue in these discussions is the one brought in the Lander's trial in 1994.手の下しようが無い。There's nothing to be done about it.



くだらない話はもうたくさんだ。We have had enough of empty words.
ここの下りも手掛かりがないので危険だ。The downclimb here is also dangerous as there are no handholds.
丘は川のほうまで下り坂になっています。The hill slopes downward to the river.

おりものが多いのです。I have a lot of discharge.

その宇宙飛行士は月に降り立つのを見られた。The astronaut was seen to land on the moon.

山を下ったところに学校がある。There is a school down the mountain.彼は懲役十年で、女房には三年の刑が下った。He was given ten years and his wife three.


彼は組んだ下位候補者が悪かったので落選しました。He was dropped because of his running mate.


イギリス国会は下院と上院とに分かれている。The British Parliament is divided into the House of Commons and the House of Lords.

スキャンダルが発覚したとき、その下院議員の支持者たちは激怒しました。When the scandal broke, the Congressman's constituents were seething.




化学業界はすべてが下火になるまで再投資を控えています。Chemical companies are waiting until everything dies down before reinvesting.


日本の１９９８年末の金・外貨準備高は６８９億ドルで、１年前の７７０億ドルを下回った。Japan's gold and foreign exchange reserves stood at $68.9 billion at the end of 1998, down from $77.0 billion a year earlier.







私の本当の住所は下記の通りです。My real address is as follows.













場所の確認：見合いの場所を本人か付き添い人が下見をしておきましょう。Location check: The parties involved themselves or their attendants should look over the place for the miai meeting in advance.








どの生徒も６時までに下校しなければならない。Every student has to leave school by six.


彼の人気は下降線をたどっている。His popularity is falling.








私は頂上から下山する途中彼らに会った。I met them during my descent from the peak.










私は駅を間違えて下車しました。I got off at the wrong station.
車を下取りに出して新車を買った。I traded in my car for a new one.

そこでベス下手より登場！Now Beth enters, stage right!
彼はイギリス生まれだが、英語がとても下手である。He comes from England, but is very poor at English.下手な動き方をしない様に気をつけなさい。Take care not to make a foolish move.
私のテニスは下手の横好きだ。I like playing tennis, though I'm not very good at it.



ヘタクソな人は英訳しないでください。英訳依頼者からのお願いです。Please don't do translations if you're crap at it. This is a plea from the English translation clients.



彼女は学生を下宿させている。She boards students.私は下宿を探していました。I was on the hunt for lodgings.
高い料金を下宿屋に払わねばならない。I have to pay high rates to the boarding.
隣の下宿人は月３万円ぐらいで暮らしている。The lodger next door lives on about 30,000 yen a month.

８月下旬に彼らは繁殖のために長い旅に出発します。In late August, they set off on a long journey for breeding.



私はスピーチの下書きを書いています。I am writing a draft of the speech.







彼はあの女性に下心を抱いている。He has designs on that girl.





下水が完全に詰まっている。The drains are blocked up.


そして汚水を流すために地下に下水道を持っていた。The house has pipes under the ground to carry dirty water away.








彼の一生は社会の下積みで終わった。He lived and died in obscurity.
下線のある文を訳しなさい。Translate the underlined sentences.
下線部を訳せ。Translate the underlined part.


彼女の収入では下層中流階級の生活を続けるのがやっとだった。Her income barely maintained her in the lower middle class.

そこの人々が下層社会の生活を送っているのを見た。I saw some people there leading a low life.



しかもメモの下側にあるのは汚れじゃなく・・・け、血判！？Moreover, what's on the bottom of the memo isn't dirt but a ... b-blood seal!?



下駄を突っかけて表に飛び出した。I slipped on my geta and dashed outside.
この案件をどう処理するか、彼に下駄を預けるよ。I'm just going to leave it up to him to figure out how to clean up this mess.













私は新しい下着が気に入っている。I'm pleased with my new underwear.
彼女は下町で生まれ育った。She was born and brought up on the backstreets.


下調べはしたかい。会議は２日後だよ。Did you do your homework? The meeting is only two days away.





文学、音楽あるいは演劇に対する批評家の仕事は、あらゆる仕事のうちで最も下等な仕事である。The trade of critic, in literature, music, and the drama, is the most degraded of all.

私達は下等動物の生き延び方についていろいろと知っている。We have learned much about survival from lower forms of animal life.
彼はある金持ちの家の下働きをしていた。He worked for a rich man.













コールタールを蒸留して得られる成分名は下表の通りである。The components obtained by distillation of coal tar are as shown below.

下品極まる盛り場に通いつける。He haunts the lowest resorts.



用紙の下部に名前を書きなさい。Write your name at the bottom of the paper.




下腹部が張ります。My lower abdomen feels bloated.





それから、最後の恐ろしい叫び声とともに、怪物は山から下方の岩に身を投げて死んだ。Then, with a final, terrible scream, the monster flung itself off the mountain to its death on the rocks below.











株式市場は今日、下落した。The stock market has dropped today.


下痢止めです。Here's some medicine for diarrhea.

まず、私の活動範囲は、おもに養老川下流域です。First off, my area of work is mainly in the lower reaches of the Yourou River.


そんな下劣なやつとは付き合っていられない。You must not keep company with such a mean fellow.








彼の化けの皮をはごうとしたが、むりだった。I tried in vain to catch him out.
猫は化けると言われる。It is said that cats can change shape.

データ化して、壁紙も作ってある。I also digitized it and made a desktop image.

貴方は、化学を勉強しますか。Do you study chemistry?






水の化学式は、Ｈ―Ｏ―Ｈである。The chemical formula for water is H-O-H.
私の友人には２人の研究者がいる。一人は言語学者で、もう一人は化学者だ。Two of my friends are researchers; one is a linguist, the other a chemist.
石油が化学製品の材料として用いられるようになったのはごく最近のことである。It is only recently that crude oil has come to be used to make chemical products.



石炭は化学的にダイヤと同類である。Coal is chemically allied to diamonds.

それは化学肥料よりも安い。It is cheaper than chemical fertilizers.






工場では複雑な化学化合物を製造している。The plants manufacture complex chemical compounds.





この化粧台は場所を取りすぎる。This dresser takes up too much room.





あの店ではもう化粧品は売っていない。That store no longer sells cosmetics.



彼は利己主義の化身だ。He is the personification of selfishness.





私が手にしてるのは貝の化石です。What I have in my hand is a fossil seashell.


その大陸は化石燃料が豊富だ。The continent is abundant in fossil fuels.

傷が化膿しました。Pus has formed in the wound.


仮のブリッジをいれます。You'll need a temporary bridge.
あなたがもし仮に一万ドルを持っていたらどうしますか。What would you do if you had, say, ten thousand dollars?
仮にも為す価値があるものならば何でも良く為す価値がある。Whatever is worth doing at all, is worth doing well.






































仮性近視というのは知ってましたが、まさか自分の子供が仮性近視になるなんて思ってませんでした。I've heard of pseudomyopia, but I never thought my own child would come to have it.


小中学生なんて、まだまだ善悪の見分けも、現実と仮想の見分けもつかない。Elementary and primary school children don't yet know good from evil or reality from fiction.




皆仮装していたのでだれがだれだかわからなかった。Everybody was disguised, so I couldn't tell who was who.







彼女がここにいると仮定してみよう。Let's suppose that she is here.












あなたは彼が仮病を使っていただけだと思いますか。Do you think he was only making believe that he was sick?



















彼は正体を見破られないように仮面をつけていた。He wore a mask so that no one could recognize him.




ここまでのところで何か落としていることはありませんか。Have I missed anything so far?「もしや、あなたは小川さんではありませんか？」「そうですが、何か？」"Might you happen to be Mr. Ogawa?" "Well, yes ... can I help you?"



この仕事は何が何だかさっぱり分からないわ。I can't make heads or tails of this assignment.
あなたが死ぬまでに何が何でも達成したいことはなんですか？What is it that you want to achieve, whatever it takes, before you die?
何しろ小さい店なので、彼は会計係から倉庫係まで多くの仕事を一手にこなさなければならない。Because the store is so small, he has to wear many different hats, from accountant to stock boy.
彼女はもう１０年もフランス語を勉強しているのだから、フランス語の何たるかはよくわかっているはずだ。She has been studying French for ten years, so she ought to realize what French is.
なんだかすごく辛いの。Somehow it's been a rough day.
彼は、なんだかんだ言って支払いを延期した。He delayed payment on some pretext or other.
彼はなんて大食らいなんだろう。What a big eater he is!「なんて言ってるの？」「祝詞も知らないのか？」「祝詞？」「神道の呪文のようなもん」"What is she saying?" "You don't even know 'norito'?" "Norito?" "It's something like a Shinto spell."
聞いた事をなんでもかんでも信じてはいけない。Don't believe everything you hear.
前の会社では何でも屋に終始したので今度は専門職に就きたい。I wore several hats at my last office so I'd like to specialize this time.
何でもないことに大騒ぎするのはやめなさい。Stop making a fuss over nothing.
英語でこの昆虫を何といいますか。What do you call this insect in English?あなたは何と賢い生徒なのでしょう。What a clever student you are!なんと素晴らしい発明だろう。What a wonderful invention!
なんとかその機械を動かした。He managed to run the machine.
なんとかかんとかしてこの仕事を一月間で終えなくてはならない。Somehow you must find a way to finish this work in one month.

なんというばかげた考えだ。What an absurd idea!
何なりと言って下さい。Just tell me what you'd like me to do.
なんの気なしに言っただけで、別に悪気があってのことではありません。I just said so without thinking much about it. I didn't mean anything serious.

過ちのない者は何も作り出せない。He who makes no mistakes makes nothing.車も何もなく、生活保護で生きてます。I'm living on welfare, without a car or anything.
私はなにやら彼に話さなければならないことがある。I have something or other to tell him.なにやら唸りながら、ほとばしるパッションをキャンバスにぶつけている！Groaning strangely she is hurling her overflowing passion onto the canvas!

祖父はいつも何やかやぶつぶつ不平を言っていた。My grandfather was always grumbling about something or other.
何より大事なことは、自分の頭で考えることだ。The most important thing is thinking for oneself.私は自分が健康で何よりだと思っている。I count myself lucky in having good health.一日中働いたあとは、一杯のビールが何よりだ。There is nothing like a glass of beer after a whole day's work.
チャンスというものはいずれにしても、まれにしかない。Chances come rarely in any case.
いずれにせよ、その隔たりは現実のものであり、実際に役に立つものではあるのだが、同時にそれは誤解を招くおそれのあるものでもある。In either case, the division is real and useful; but it can also be misleading.


その本はどれも読んでない。I have not read all the books.

彼は子供たちに何一つだめだと言わない。He denies nothing to his children.

妊娠何か月ですか。How far along are you?
あなたは何回京都を訪れましたか。How often did you visit Kyoto?
この話は何回も聞いたよ。I've heard this story scores of times.


何とも言いようがないなあ。I just don't know what to say.



君たちは来年何歳になりますか。How old will you be next year?
何事が起こったのか誰もが知りたがっていた。Everybody was anxious to know what had happened.私の友人は１年に３つも職を変えた。何事にも長続きはしないのだ。My friend has had three jobs in a year; he never sticks to anything for long.彼の信念は何事にも揺るがなかった。Nothing could sway his conviction.

いつ旅行においでになりますか。When will you go on a journey?
あなたの時計では何時ですか。What time is it by your watch?
いつか君は成功する。You will succeed some day.
テレビはいつからあるの？When did TV appear?
いつしか睡魔が忍び寄った。Sleep stole over us.


いつの間にかボブは外へ出ていた。Bob went out before I knew it.

いつまで東京にご滞在ですか。How long will you stay in Tokyo?
私はいつまでも彼の名を覚えている。I still bear his name in mind.
彼はいつも学校に遅れる。He is always late for school.私は日曜日にはいつも家にいない。I'm never at home on Sundays.いつものところでいつもの人達に会った。I met the usual people at the usual place.
彼はいつもの通り遅れてきた。He came late as usual.

あなたはいつ何時病気になるかもしれない。You may fall ill at any moment.

ビルは何時間も泣き続けた。Bill kept on crying for hours.
ダンスフロアは、何時頃混んできますか。What time does the dance floor get crowded?
そこで、今の人達が何者なのか説明しておきたいと思います。So I want to explain who these people are.
何者かが彼女を浴槽で溺死させた。Somebody had drowned her in the bathtub.
財布をどこかこの辺に落としたんだ。I lost my wallet somewhere around here.夏休みにどこかへ行きましたか。Did you go anywhere during the summer vacation?どこかおかしいと一目で私にはわかりました。I could tell at a glance that something was wrong.

彼女にはどことなく品がある。She is somewhat refined.
春になるとどこも美しく見える。Everywhere looks beautiful in the spring.彼らには、ほかにどこも行くところがありません。They have nowhere else to go.
どこまでドライブに行くの？How far are you going for a drive?
彼はどこからどこまでも紳士らしい。He looks every inch a gentleman.


そのいたずらっ娘は何食わぬ顔をした。The naughty girl assumed an air of innocence.

この街は何人もの著名人を生み出した。This town gave birth to several great men.あなたには何人子供がいますか。How many children do you have?
何千もの人々がそこにいた。Thousands of people were there.
写真をどうぞ見せて下さい。Please show me your picture.「電話を使わせてもらってもいいですか」「ええ、どうぞ」"Do you mind if I use your phone?" "No, please go ahead."「塩を取って下さい」「はい、どうぞ」"Pass me the salt, please." "Here you are."
浅学非才の私ではありますが、何とぞ皆様のお力を賜りたく、ここにお願い申し上げる次第です。I may not have much to offer in the way of learning or ability, but I want to do whatever I can for us all and humbly ask for your favor.
ワントライって何点？How many points is a try worth?
その本を何度も読みなさい。Read the book again and again.
そこには何度か行った事があるんですか？How often have you been there?

彼は戦場で何度も死をうまく逃れた。He cheated death many times on the battlefield.

彼はその不正事件に何ら関わりがなかった。He had no part in the scandal.
何日滞在する予定ですか。How long are you going to stay?
それを建てるのに何年もかかった。It took many years to build it.
ご自宅の電話番号は何番ですか。What's your home phone number?
ここから何番目の駅ですか。How many stops from here?
妻がいないと何かと不自由だ。I am inconvenienced when my wife is away.
何百羽とキジを撃った。We shot pheasants by the hundred.
何ものにもまして私は健康になりたい。Above all, I want to be healthy.水がなかったならば、何物も生きることはできないだろう。Were it not for water, nothing could live.
なにぶんこんな辺ぴな村に住んでいるので、めったに客は来ない。Living as I do in a remote village, I seldom have visitors.
この冷凍アスパラガスは何分ゆでましょうか。How many minutes shall I boil this frozen asparagus?


あの〜郵便局はどちらでしょうか。Uh..., where's the post office?「花子と太郎のどちらが若いですか」「太郎です」"Who is younger, Hanako or Taro?" "Taro is."
「どなたですか」「お母さんよ」"Who is it?" "It's your mother."
ごひいきのロックグループは何曜日と何曜日にやっていますか。Which days of the week does your favourite rock band play?
自分を何様だと思っているのだ、人をそんな風に見て。Who do you think you are, to look at me like this?







価格は需要を反映する。The price reflects the demand.


この価格では、貴社の製品は日本市場での価格競争に勝てないでしょう。With this price, your product would not be competitive in the Japanese market.




この新製品は価格表から２０％引きで提供する用意がございます。We can offer these new products at 20% below list price.

この本にはある程度の価値はあります。This book has a certain value.
このグループに存在する儒教的価値観を強調したい。I would like to emphasize the Confucian values that exist within this group.




















才子多病、佳人薄命。Whom the gods love die young.













水を加えてペースト状になるまでかき回しなさい。Add water and stir to a paste.

これがごく最近私の蔵書に加わった本です。This is the latest acquisition to my library.あなたはどちらのグループに加わりたいですか。Which group do you want to join?彼女が泣いたことで、この話にはそれだけ信憑性が加わった。Her tears gave more credence to the story.









お肉の焼き加減は、いかがなさいますか？How would you like your steak cooked?母の加減は少しもよくなっていなかった。むしろ悪くなっているようだった。My mother was not feeling any better. If anything, she looked worse.


神の御加護がありますように。May God keep you!
イチゴは加工されてジャムになります。Strawberries are made into jam.










あなたの給与は一定の基本給に販売手数料が加算されます。You will be paid a stable base salary plus commissions on sale.




けど、一晩加湿器つけっぱなしで朝になると窓が結露してドボドボ・・・。But because the humidifier is on all night, in the morning the condensation pours off the windows.








その政策は、インフレを加速させるだけだ。The policy will only accelerate inflation.





まさかの時のために彼は保険に加入した。He insured himself for a rainy day.










とある映画を文庫化した―いや、映画の為に書かれたシナリオを小説として加筆修正し、日本語にローカライズしたものだ。A certain movie was novelized - rather it was a scenario written for a movie that was expanded as a novel and localized to Japanese.



加盟国中数カ国は、Ｇ７の協定に従うことにあいまいな態度を見せています。Some member countries have been lax in abiding by G-7 agreements.












この試験は辞書持ち込み可です。You can use a dictionary for this exam.
公園の掲示に「芝生に入るべからず」と書いてあった。The notice in the park said, "Keep off the grass."
ケンは１人息子なので、父親は一層可愛がった。Ken's father loved Ken all the more because he was his only son.
兄は私にかわいらしい人形をくれました。My brother gave me a cute doll.




私はこれらの案が承認され、可及的すみやかに実施されることを要求するものです。I move that these proposals be approved, and that action be taken as soon as possible.
委員会はその議案を可決した。The committee passed the bill.



君のジョークは何度聞いてもおかしい。Your joke is funny no matter how many times I hear it.洗濯機の調子がどこかおかしい。Something is wrong with the washing machine.君の基本的な理論はおかしいと思う。I think your basic theory is wrong.



















男の子へのしつけは可能である。Boys can be trained to behave.

彼女が電車に乗り遅れた可能性はあるでしょうか。Might she have missed her train?




この問題に対して可否の論が色々とあった。There were a lot of opinions, pro and con, on this question.
















この夏最高の暑さだ。It is the hottest this summer.








この夏休みはどこかへ行くのですか。Are you going away this summer?








夏場の東京は台風に見舞われやすい。Tokyo is subject to typhoons in summer.







夏服を着ればいいのに。Why don't you wear summer clothes?
夏物は今セール中です。The summer goods are now on sale.






どんな男にもそれ相当の嫁のきてがあるもの。Every Jack must have his Jill.古今東西、嫁と姑の仲は上手くいかぬ例が多いと見える。In all times and places many examples of poor relations between wives and mothers-in-law can be seen.
スミス氏は娘を医者に嫁がせた。Mr Smith married his daughter to a doctor.



木立の間に家が見える。I see a house among the trees.あの家の繁栄は大戦中からのことだ。The prosperity of the family dates from the Great War.
家へついたら電話が鳴っていた。The telephone was ringing when I got home.うちには十頭の牛がいる。We have ten cattle.
その社会奉仕家はスチブンソン家に関する情報をあくまでも追跡するよう求められた。The social worker was asked to follow up the information about the Stevenson family.

この前の嵐で数軒の家屋が被害を受けた。Several houses were damaged in the last storm.


アヒル達は池のあちこちを泳いでいた。Ducks were swimming about on the pond.


彼に家業を継ぐようにときつけた。I persuaded him to take on the family business.


部屋には家具がない。The room was bare of furniture.
彼は家具屋だ。He deals in furniture.

音楽家の家系のお生まれですか。Did you come from a musical family?
我が家の家計は赤字だ。Our family budget is in the red.
妻が家計簿をつけています。My wife keeps the household accounts.





私達は、家事を分担することで合意した。We agreed to share the housework.
家主は彼がドアを赤く塗ることを許してくれない。The landlord won't permit him to paint the door red.



舞が家出を敢行する、直前のことだろう。That was probably just before Mai took the drastic step of leaving home.






梨奈は家政部で、主に洋裁をやっている。Rina is in the home economics club. Her main activity is dressmaking.
彼は家政婦に部屋を掃除させた。He had the maid sweep his room.



あなたの家族はきっと親切でしょう。Your family must be very nice.






警察は家宅捜査をし２キロのヘロインを押収した。The police searched the house and seized 2 kilograms of heroin.
警察はありうべき証拠を求めて家宅捜索した。The police searched her house for possible evidence.
飢饉のために、家畜が餓死した。Because of the famine, the cattle starved to death.
家中が力を合わせて麦の刈入れをしました。The whole family helped harvest the wheat.皆留守だというのに、不思議なことに家中の電灯がついていた。Strange to say, all the lights in the house were on, though no one was at home.

家賃は月いくらですか。How much is the rent per month?
食事は家庭で食べますか、外食ですか。Do you eat at home or eat out?

自慢じゃないが僕は通知表の家庭科で３以上を取ったことがない。１０段階評価で。I don't want to boast, but I've never gotten better than a 3 on my report card for home economics. Out of 10 that is.

家庭教師の先生は私が馬鹿なことをしたと叱った。My tutor scolded me for my stupid behavior.


このカーペットは家庭用にデザインされている。This carpet is designed for residential use.






家内は海外旅行中で、よく電話をかけてくる。My wife often rings me up, while she travels abroad.



彼は金持ちで、その上家柄がよい。He is rich and, moreover, well-born.
この先祖伝来の家宝は君の物だ。This heirloom shall be yours.


家名を嵯峨と改姓したのは明治３年でした。It was the third year of Meiji when their family name was changed to Saga.お父さんの破産は家名の汚れでした。Father's bankruptcy was a blot on the family's reputation.


ハンプティダンプティ、壁の上に座って、ハンプティダンプティ、ドシンと落ちた。王様の馬のみんなも王様の家来のみんなもハンプティを元に戻せなかった。Humpty Dumpty sat on a wall. Humpty Dumpty had a great fall. All the king's horses and all the king's men couldn't put Humpty Dumpty together again.


夜になってきたので、私たちは家路に着いた。Night coming on, we left for home.












裁判官は彼に重い罰金を科せるのだろうか。Will the judge fine him heavily?
科学は観察に基づいている。Science rests upon observation.

科学技術は確実に発達している。Technology progresses steadily.


彼は科学者であると同時に音楽家でもある。He is a scientist and musician.
彼の方法は科学的ではない。His methods are not scientific.

彼は酔払い運転のかどで５ポンドの科料に処せられた。He was fined five pounds for drunken driving.
暇なときはいつでも遊びに来て下さい。Come and see me whenever you are free.


暇潰しに街をぶらぶらした。I strolled along the streets to kill time.


君はその義務を果たすべきである。You must perform your duty.
この汽車は世界の果て行きの終列車です。This train is the last train to the world's end.


この果てしない宇宙にいるのは、私たち人類だけですか？Are we humans alone in this infinite universe?


初めから果敢に前へ出て圧倒し、体勢を崩した相手を押し出した。He resolutely pushed forward from the start, overwhelming and pushing out his off-balance opponent.

果実になる花は少ない。Few flowers develop into fruit.


陽気が暖かでやがて果樹の花が咲くだろう。The warm weather will bring the fruit trees into blossom soon.
その農夫は男の子達が自分の果樹園でリンゴを盗んでいるのをみつけた。The farmer caught the boy stealing the apples in his orchard.







彼は果物の他何も食べない。He eats nothing else but fruit.
彼は最初くだもの屋に行った。He went to a fruit store first.
彼は果報な男だ。He's a lucky guy.
できることはすべてやったよ。後は、果報は寝て待て、の心境だね。I feel like I've done all I can. Now all there is to do is wait and see what comes of it.

池には橋がかかっている。There is a bridge over the pond.
あなたは本当に幽霊を見たのではない。それは架空のものでしかなかったのだ。You didn't really see a ghost―it was only imaginary.




この歌を聞くと私はいつも、学生時代を思い出す。Whenever I hear this song, I am reminded of my school days.







この歌劇は５幕ものです。This is an opera in five acts.

私はこの歌を歌詞無しで歌える。I can sing this song without the text.
その歌手は若者たちのアイドルだ。That singer is a teenage idol.


彼女は私達に歌唱法を教授してくれた。She taught us singing.









歌舞伎は古くからの日本の芸術だ。Kabuki is an old Japanese art.








河川は豪雨で氾濫しました。The rivers were flooded by the heavy rain.
私は学校で日本文学の英語訳、特に漱石の『吾輩は猫である』や『心』、芥川の『鼻』や『河童』を楽しく読んだ。At school I had enjoyed reading Japanese literature in English translation, in particular Soseki's I am a Cat and Kokoro, and Akutagawa's The Nose and Kappa.

フグは日本の珍味だ。Blowfish is a delicacy in Japan.
夕方にまたサファリに出掛け、夜はカバの声を聞きながら眠りについた。In the evening I went out on safari again, at night I fell asleep hearing the grunting of the hippos.
英国の首都ロンドンはテムズ川の河畔にある。London, the capital of England, is on the Thames.
いすをもっと火の近くに寄せなさい。Draw your chair closer to the fire.
彼らは火の気がないので寒がった。They complained of the cold as there was no fire there.





雨で火の手は広がらずにすんだ。The rain kept the fire from spreading.






焼き肉の火加減を見なさい。Please check if the meat is being roasted at the right heat.
小さな火花はしばしば大きな炎を起こす。A small spark often kindles a large flame.

「状況報告を」「現在目標は目視４。最大７か。小口径火器を所有」"Situation report." "At present 4 in sight. At most probably 7. Holding small calibre arms."





火元は明らかでない。The origin of the fire is unknown.



火災の理由は何か。What caused the fire?
その家は火災保険に入っている。The house is insured against fire.

その火山は溶岩を流し出した。The volcano poured molten rock.

火山活動で地面が盛り上がった。The surface of the earth rose due to the volcanic activity.

火事の際は１１９番に電話してください。In the case of fire, dial 119.


おっと！火種が残りすくないぞ！薪割りしてくれ！Whoops! There aren't many live coals left! Go make some kindling would you?


私は気まずい思いで体がほてった。I was feverish with embarrassment.


暖炉には薪が足りず、早くも火勢が衰え始めている。Without enough wood on the fire, the flames are already beginning to die down.薪が足りず、はやくも火勢が衰えはじめた暖炉。The fireplace, lacking firewood, flames already starting to lose their vigour.

火星には生物の形跡はない。There is no sign of life on Mars.












この骨董の火鉢は今では実際に使われていない。This antique brazier no longer has any real utility.




火薬は注意深く扱わなければならない。Gunpowder needs to be handled very carefully.
その子はライターで火遊びをしていた。He was playing with a lighter.
火曜の朝までにすべて終えなければならないのです。We must finish everything before Tuesday morning.
火曜日に国会が開かれる。The Diet will meet on Tuesday.
火力とお鍋と貝の種類によるわ。It depends on the strength of the flame, the pan used and the type of ingredients.





こたつで寝ちゃったら風邪引くのはあたりまえ。自己管理がなっていない。Of course you'll catch a cold if you fall asleep under the kotatsu. You have to learn to take care of yourself.




禍福は糾える縄の如し。When an ill wind blows it does good to no one.
稼ぎに追いつく貧乏なし。Poverty is a stranger to industry.
その家族は一家の稼ぎ手を失ってショックを受けたが、保険金で大いに助かっている。Losing their breadwinner was a shock to that family, but the insurance money helps a lot.
私は自分の生活費を稼がなくてはならない。I've got to earn my own living.
悪くない。生活費くらいは十分稼げるよ。Not bad. I can earn a good enough living.

６ヶ月後私たちは結婚した。Six months later we were married.

私たちは梅の花で有名な水戸公園を見に行った。We visited Mito Park, which is famous for its plum blossoms.

薔薇の花びらはとても繊細だ。A rose's petals are very delicate.



近くに花屋があります。There is a flower shop near by.
花嫁はたいへん美しく見えた。The bride looked very beautiful.
すごい花火だ！These fireworks are spectacular!






花見ができる春が待ち遠しい。I can't wait for spring to come so we can sit under the cherry trees.お花見に行きませんか？Why don't we go and see the cherry blossoms?

春の訪れとともにつぼみはぱっと花咲く。The buds burst open at the first sign of spring.






池のほとりに花ショウブが綺麗に咲いていました。Many Japanese irises were flowering prettily on the lake's edge.


庭のバラは今花盛りです。The roses in the garden are in full bloom.詩人としての彼は２０代が花盛りだった。As a poet, he flowered in his twenties.
その女優は演じ終わると花束を贈呈された。The actress was presented a bouquet of flowers after the performance.

心静かに花鳥風月を愛でる気持ちの余裕も最近になってでてきたよ。Lately I've had the time to quietly enjoy the wonders of nature.





花びんは粉々になった。The vase broke into fragments.

花粉よりも小さな黄砂をマスクでどれだけ防ぐことが出来るのか？花粉よりもずっと厄介者のように思います。Just how well can masks block the, even smaller than pollen, yellow sand dust? I think it much more of a nuisance than pollen.
かわいそうにその子は花粉症に悩んでいる。The poor child suffers from hay fever.














花環が彼の頭に巻かれた。A wreath was bound around his head.



我々一同恐怖にさいなまれた。We were all assailed with fears.
あのいじめっ子を、やっつけておいで。Go and beat up that bully.
私は彼をいじめたことを後悔した。I felt bad about picking on him.





ママもパパもひどくいらだっているの。Mummy and Daddy are very nervous.



瓜のつるに茄子はならぬ。You don't get eggplants from a gourd vine.
船はその港で荷を下ろされた。The ship was unloaded at the port.

荷作りはもう終わりましたか。Have you finished packing yet?
かばん全部に荷札をつけなさい。Attach labels to all the bags.
芝刈り機が簡素な作りの荷車に積んである。Some lawn equipment is loaded into the jerry-built cart.







こんなデカイのがチャリの荷台に乗るわけないだろ。There's no way one that big is going to go on a bike's luggage rest.




駅にもどるには遠い道のりであったが、徐々にその古い荷馬車は近づいて行った。Although it was a long way back to the station, little by little the old wagon drew near.
彼は前もって荷物を送った。He sent his luggage in advance.

















女王は華麗な銀色のドレスを着ていた。The queen was wearing a magnificent silver dress.

踊り子達は白いドレスを着てきゃしゃに見えますが、実際には彼女たちは馬のように力強いのです。The dancers look delicate in their white dresses, but they are really as strong as horses.
この菓子を自由にお取り下さい。Please help yourself to these cakes.



私は１時間ではその課を全部は理解できない。I can't absorb all of the lesson in an hour.ウイリアムズ氏がその課を取り仕切っている。Mr Williams carries that section.１０課から始めましょう。Let's start with Lesson Ten.
新しい税金がワインにかせられた。A new tax was imposed on wine.
この学校は生徒達に高度な道徳水準を課する。This school sets high moral standards for pupils.





課税品をお持ちですか。Do you have anything to declare?

慈善事業への寄付は課税所得から控除されます。Donations to philanthropic programs are tax-exempt.
その学生は自分の課題に専念した。The student concentrated on his subject.私はとうとうこの課題を終えた。At last, I finished this homework.

私は課長に任命された。I was appointed to section chief.
その大学の課程は自然科学と社会科学から成り立っている。That university's curriculum covers natural science and social science.

貨車が脱線したため中央線は不通になった。After some freight cars were derailed, services were suspended on the Chuo Line.

その航空会社は貨物のみを扱っている。That aircraft company deals in freight only.


アテネへ向かう一隻の貨物船が何の痕跡も残さずに地中海で沈没した。A cargo vessel, bound for Athens, sank in the Mediterranean without a trace.
この代用貨幣では、会社の直営店に行き、その店で食料品や衣料を買うことしかできませんでした。With the token they could only go to the company shop and buy food or clothing from that shop.
国民総生産は一定の期間における一国の財及びサービスを貨幣価値で計った総生産高である。Gross national product is a nation's total output of goods and services during a given period of time as measured in monetary value.

１０時過ぎには電話をしないで下さい。Don't call me up after ten o'clock.スピードの出し過ぎは危険です。Driving too fast is dangerous.
今日もまた寂しい一日が過ぎる。Another lonely day.１年が過ぎ、彼の死体は塵と化した。A year had passed by and his body turned to dust.このスープは、しょっぱ過ぎて飲めないよ。This soup is too salty to eat.
くる日もくる日も同じように過ぎ去った。All the days went by, one like another.
お元気でお過ごしのことと思います。I hope this letter finds you well.いいクリスマスを過ごしましたか。Did you have a nice Christmas?
私は彼の過ちはたいしたことはないとみなしている。I view his error as insignificant.
雲が月を過った。A cloud passed across the moon.
私はいつまでも過去にこだわらないようにと心がけている。I try not to dwell on the past.
過去の動作については過去形を用います。"Past tense" is used in connection with actions in the past.

彼の考えは私には過激すぎます。His ideas are too extreme for me.
その過激派が政府打倒の陰謀を企てているという噂が立ってる。There is a rumor that the radicals are plotting against the government.




私は彼の過失を指摘している。I'm pointing a finger at his mistake.


音楽の重要性は過小評価されている。The importance of music is underrated.

安い輸入品で市場が供給過剰になるだろう。Cheap imports will glut the market.



ガイドブックを過信しちゃいけない。Don't rely too much on your guidebook.



世界的に過大に評価された中国書といえば、『孫子』ですかね。When it comes to Chinese books that are overvalued worldwide I suppose it's Sun Tzu, isn't it?
それはきっと、誤解だ。きみはわたしを過大評価してる。That's a misunderstanding, for sure. You're giving me too much credit.
その過程を彼に説明した。I explained the process to him.

教育制度は過渡期にある。The educational system is in transition.

過度の運動は身体のためというよりむしろ害になる。Too much exercise does more harm than good.



そのアイロンは過熱のために故障した。The iron broke down due to over-heating.労働力不足の発生は経済の過熱兆候と見られている。The emerging labor shortage is viewed as a sign of economic overheating.


合格者の過半数は大学出身者であった。The majority of the successful candidates were university graduates.

日本人は感情に対してあまりにも過敏だ。The Japanese are too sensitive about feelings.


これは過分の報酬だ。This is more than I have earned.
過保護でその子供はだめになった。Excessive indulgence spoiled the child.

彼は過密スケジュールを都合して、私の舞台を見に来てくれた。He organized his overcrowded schedule and managed to come to see my performance.


彼女は過労でくたくたになっていた。She was worn out from overwork.
死亡事例が19件と全体の20％を超えており、過労死の深刻な実態が浮き彫りになった。With 19 cases of death forming over 20% of the whole, the grave reality of overwork-deaths has been thrown into relief.

空はどんよりとした冬の陰にかすんでいる。The sky is a hazy shade of winter.彼の目は年のせいでかすんでいる。His eyes are dim with age.

蚊にたくさん刺されました。I got a lot of mosquito bites.


にわかに雨が降ってきた。Suddenly, the rain fell.




ウオーッ、みんなの励ましをもらって俄然やる気が出てきたぞ！All right! Everybody around me is so encouraging I'm getting a rush of motivation.




われに自由を与えよ。しからずんば死を与えよ。Give me liberty or give me death.彼も人なり我も人なり。What man has done, man can do.

彼女はわが身の不遇にじっと耐えねばならなかった。She had to smile at her misfortune.
我が党の党首は他の党首達と会見し、その問題について話をした。The leader of our party met with the other leaders and talked about the problem.
また同じ失敗をするなんて、我ながら愚かだと思う。It is silly of me to have made the same mistake twice.



彼は我を張ってきかない。He will have his own way.
君は何としても我を通そうとする。You will have your own way.

















この寒さは我慢出来ないな。I can't put up with this cold.


犬が骨をがりがりかじっている。The dog is crunching a bone.この薩摩芋は生焼けでがりがりする。This sweet potato is only half-baked and is still crunchy.彼女はがりがりに痩せている。She is all skin and bone.

あの子を甘やかしてはいけません。とてもわがままになりますよ。You shouldn't indulge that child. It will make him very selfish.
ライオンはさらに牙をむき出した。The lion bared its teeth even further.
あの村が敵の最後の牙城です。That village is the enemy's last stronghold.
「道」という漢字の総画数は何画ですか。How many strokes does the kanji for "michi" have?
トランジスターの発明は新時代を画した。The invention of the transistor marked a new era.





その画家は、いわば永遠の少年だ。The artist is eternally a boy.







できたらスケッチブックと４Ｂの鉛筆も買ってきておいてね。まだそんなに高い画材はいらないよ。If you can, get a sketchbook and a 4B pencil. You don't need such expensive art materials yet.
その陰謀を画策してる人たちを必要以上に大きく見てしまうことは、まさに彼らの思うツボだと思います。I think overestimating the people masterminding that conspiracy is exactly what they want.


私のテレビはほぼ１５年にもなるが、画質はまだ良い。My TV set is almost 15 years old, but it still has a good picture.

画集やカタログはどこで売っていますか。Where can I go to buy art books and catalogues?










テレビの画像はぼやけて見えた。The TV picture was blurred.
画像処理のソフトウエアを開発した会社をご存知でしたら教えてください。Please advise us, if possible, of a company which has developed image processing software.


その作品が画壇に大いに物議をかもした。This artwork excited much controversy in the world of art.


私は画帳と鉛筆を持って車で海辺にスケッチしに行くのが好きです。I like to take my pad and pencil and drive to the seashore to sketch.







この世は我々の想像力にとっての画布そのものである。This world is but canvas to our imaginations.

その芸術家は年を取るにつれて画風が変わるであろう。As the artist grows older his paintings may alter.




液晶画面は、見にくいなぁ。You can't see too well with these LCD displays.テレビの画面を調節してください。Please adjust the television picture.


一番近い画廊はどこにありますか。Where's the nearest art gallery?





私は長い間臥薪嘗胆の苦しみをなめた。I have struggled under extreme difficulties for a long time.
木々は芽を出し始めた。The trees are beginning to bud.


太郎と花子の間に愛が芽生えた。Love grew between Taro and Hanako.

がは灯に集まる。Moths are attracted by light.




















彼はしょっちゅうガキ仲間と街でたむろしている。He hangs out a lot with the kids down the street.






その老婦人は回復しつつあり、病院から派遣された看護婦によって充分な介護を受けている。The old woman is getting better and is being taken good care of by a nurse from the hospital.




このテーマに関するほとんどの研究では、立法府の介入が悪影響をもたらしたということが示されている。It has been shown in most studies on this subject that intervention of the legislature had adverse effects.

他人任せはダメ。ライフセーバーではないが、俺自身が介抱してあげないと。I can't leave this to others. I'm no lifesaver but if I don't help her myself....



この会に出席している他の代表者に直接話すのではなく、どうか議長に話して下さい。Kindly address yourself to the chairman, not directly to other representatives at this meeting.この会の名称はＥ．Ｓ．Ｓ．とする。This association shall be called the E.S.S.
前に彼にあったのを覚えている。I remember seeing him before.駅へ行く途中でにわか雨に遭った。I was caught in a shower on my way to the station.
私はマユコと会う約束をした。I made an appointment with Mayuko.
お嬢さんに会わせていただきたい。I ask to see your daughter.

会員は５人に減った。The number of members decreased to five.



あそこは会員制のゴルフクラブだ。That's an exclusive golf club.





会期は又延長されるであろう。The session will be prolonged again.
その法案は今会期中に成立する見通しである。The bill is expected to be enacted during the present session.

会議に彼は現れましたか。Did he show up at the meeting?

会議室は現在使用中です。The meeting room is in use now.

もっと会議場に近い場所の部屋の方がよろしければ、ご連絡下さい。Please let me know if you need help in reserving a room closer to the Convention Center.


会計係は会計が不足しているのがわかった。The treasurer was short in his accounts.チェックアウトしたいので、会計をおねがいします。I'd like to check out. Do you have my bill?会社は元会計を相手取って訴訟を起こした。The company took action against its former accountant.


会計監査があった。The accounts have been audited.
ジェレミは彼の会計士の一次試験のためノートを熱心に勉強していたよ。I left Jeremy poring over his notes for his first accountancy exam tomorrow.
その会社の会計年度は４月から翌年の３月迄である。The company's financial year runs from April until March of the following year.
我が党の党首は他の党首達と会見し、その問題について話をした。The leader of our party met with the other leaders and talked about the problem.


これはとても大切な会合だ。This is a very important meeting.

彼の努力は会社の成長に貢献した。His effort contributed to my company's growth.父は今朝普段より遅く会社に着いた。My father got to his workplace later than usual this morning.
私の父は会社員です。My father is an office worker.


「私も頂いていいですか」「ああ、勿論構わないよ、今日は会社持ちだからね」"May I have one as well?" "Yes, certainly. Today's on the company after all."
ただ会釈をするだけなのに、妙にしゃちほこ張ってしまった。It was just a simple greeting, but somehow I got strangely tense.

会衆は素晴らしい説教に感動した。The congregation was moved by the fine sermon.



私たちは会場の後ろに座った。We sat at the back of the hall.









会談は２日間続いた。The talks continued for two days.
協会は彼を会長にした。The society made him president.



会堂に鐘の音が響き渡った。The hall resounded with pealing bells.




各会員は会費を払うべし。Each member has to pay a membership fee.

機知は会話に趣を添える。Wit gives zest to conversation.
この医師はガンの多くの不可解な点を解こうと努力している。The doctor is trying to solve many of the riddles of cancer.彼は重責を解かれた。He was relieved of his heavy responsibility.外出する前に髪を櫛でときなさい。Comb your hair before you go out.
これらの包みをほどくのを手伝って下さい。Lend a hand with these parcels, please.
いちばん頭の良い生徒でさえ、その問題は解けなかった。Even the brightest student couldn't solve the problem.靴ひもがとけた。My shoelaces came undone.そのおかげで誤解が解ける。It removes misunderstandings.
ネクタイがほどけてるよ。Your tie has come undone.

セーターの袖がほぐれ始めた。The sleeves of the sweater began to unravel.
鮎漁が解禁になった。The ayu season has opened.
その問題はまだ解決されていない。The problem is not settled yet.
彼女はいい解決策を思いついた。She thought of a good solution.
いきなり解雇を言い渡された。I was discharged without notice.

警察は、群衆を解散させた。The police broke up the crowd.会は八時に解散した。The meeting broke up at eight.首相は国会を解散した。The prime minister dissolved the Diet.
それは２通りに解釈できる。That reads two different ways.

貿易障壁は戦争終結後解除されました。Trade barriers were lifted after the war ended.
私は婚約を解消しました。I have broken off our engagement.

ヒートアイランド現象の実体解析と対策のあり方について。An analysis of the nature of the heat island phenomenon and countermeasures.

彼の解説がわかった人はほとんどいなかった。Few people understood his comment.
その解説者は食糧危機を強調しすぎる。The newscaster puts too much emphasis on the food crisis.
この画像、解像度が低すぎてすごく汚い。The image quality is really bad - the resolution is so low.





あなたの解答には私たちとしてはまったく不満だ。Your answer is anything but satisfactory to us.



私は解読プログラムを持っていません。I don't have a decryption program.
そのプロジェクトの責任者であったジェイソンが、汚職に手を染めた理由で解任された。Jason, who was in charge of the project, was dismissed for corruption.



人質は解放されるだろう。The hostages will be released.
ウィルソンの解法は、同じ定数を使用したという点でハドソンのものと類似している。Wilson's solution is similar to Hudson's in that they used the same constants.
死体解剖の結果、絞殺と判明しました。The postmortem showed that she had been strangled.
もっとも重要なことは、脳にはこれらの解剖学的組織を結合する全体的な再入経路が必要である。Most important of all, the brain needs global reentry pathways connecting these anatomical structures.
政府は委員会を設けてその事故の解明にあたらせた。The government appointed a committee to investigate the accident.
私はその商品の予約を解約した。I canceled my order for the commodities.


新種の稲によっては年に２、３回収穫できる物もある。Some new kinds of rice can be harvested two or three times a year.このトーナメントに優勝するには、７回続けて勝たなくてはいけません。We have to win seven times in a row to win this tournament.

いや、それじゃだめだ。逆になるようにまわしてごらん。No, that's not the right way. You have to turn it the other way round.よろしければ塩をこちらに回して下さいませんか。The salt, if you please.内閣が触れを回した。The Cabinet sent round an official notice.
学校へ行く道が冠水してしまって、回り道をしていかなければならなかった。The street to school was flooded so we had to go around.

回れ右を命じる。I order you to turn right.





その老人はほとんどの時間を青春時代を回顧して過ごした。The old man spent most of his time looking back on his youth.


いよいよ賭け金を回収するときがきました。It's time to call in our chips.



いつもより尿の回数が多いです。I urinate more often than usual.
回数券を下さい。May I have coupon tickets?




この回線の細さじゃ、動画は見られないよ。This connection is too slow for me to watch movies.

彼女は子供時代を回想した。She looked back on her childhood.


先日便に回虫が出ました。He had a roundworm in his stool the other day.

こまはぐるぐる回転した。The top went around and around.



これらの回答は、原因と結果をはき違えている。These answers confuse cause with consequence.

現実を回避するのはもうやめろ。Stop hiding your head in the sand.

回復はほとんど不可能だった。Recovery was almost impossible.





学校での銃乱射事件はこの半年で3回目だ。This was third school shooting incident in six months.

彼はその手紙を全員に回覧した。He circulated the letter among the members.


保護回路を飛ばしてしまおう。Let's bypass the protection circuit.





その事が彼のすべての夢を壊した。That destroyed all his dreams.
あの壊れた花瓶は祖父のものです。That broken vase is my grandfather's.このイヤホンは壊れています。These earphones don't work.いさかいで私たちの融和が壊れた。Quarrelling spoiled our unity.
彼は「壊れ物注意」のステッカーを荷物に貼り付けた。He attached a "Fragile" label to the package.

壊滅そのものが豊かな生命を生む。Mere decay produces richer life.


私は昨夜快く眠った。I slept comfortably last night.
快楽しか求めない人もいる。Some people pursue only pleasure.

彼は彼女を快活な性格だとみなした。He characterized her as lively.
ノリもさる事ながら、会場と一体化したような快感が忘れられない。I got really into it, and I just can't forget the exhilaration of becoming one with the audience.




今日は快晴だ。これで一日中仕事が出来る。It's fair today, so we can work all day.




この車は以前ほど快調に走らない。This car is running less smoothly than it used to.
これはたいそう快適な暖炉ですね。This is a very nice fireplace.




快食快眠快便は健康のしるし。A good appetite, sound sleep, and regular motions are the three signs of good health.
こんなくだらないことに多額の金を支払うとはけしからん。It is criminal to pay so much money for such trifles.
怪しげな手つきで彼女はグラスを運んできた。She fumbled with the glasses as she brought them in.
私達はその食べ物のにおいを怪しみながらかいだ。We sniffed at the food suspiciously.

ラグビーをしているとき、彼はけがをした。Playing rugby, he got injured.
けが人は麻酔から覚めた後痛みで泣きわめいた。The injured person wailed with pain after recovering from the anaesthesia.




信じてもらえないだろうけど、茂みの中から怪獣が現れたんだよ。Believe it or not, a monster emerged from the bush.


その怪談はこわかった。The ghost story was terrifying.

怪物は残酷な微笑みを浮かべた。The monster's smile was cruel.





我が生涯に一片の悔いなし。I regret nothing of my life.
そのような悪い振る舞いは深く悔いなければならない。One must deplore such bad behavior.




あの方があんなに若くして亡くなったことは悔やまれます。It is regrettable that she should have died so young.よーし！覚えてろ。後で悔やむなよ。All right! You will be sorry for this.

私が悔恨の情をもって回顧することが一つある。There is one thing I look back on with regret.
彼は財布を上着の懐から取り出した。He took out the wallet from his inside jacket pocket.父の懐におられる一人子の神が、神を解き明かされたのである。But God the only begotten Son, who is at the Father's side, has made him known.彼が帰ってきたのは、ホームシックにかかったからではなく、ふところが心細くなったからである。He came back not because he was homesick, but because he was running short of money.
懐かしい１２小節のブルース。There go the twelve bars blues.

この犬はこの猫よりも私たちになつく。This dog is more attached to us than this cat.




い、いっつも食べ物で懐柔されるとは、限りませんからねっ。Don't think you'll always be able to placate me with food!



この懐中電灯は明かりが弱くなってきた。This flashlight is getting dim.



彼はカイロで体を暖めた。He warmed himself with a pocket heater.

大統領は憲法を停止し、戒厳令をしきました。The President suspended the constitution and imposed martial law.





長年の習慣はなかなか改まらない。Old habits die hard.
改めて言う事はない。I have nothing particular to say.
どうして考えを改めたのですか。What made you change your mind?


「冬の時代」が大学改革の起爆剤となってくれればと思う。So-called "winter time" is expected to enhance the college reform.
彼らは改革案を断固として推し進めるつもりのようだ。They seem determined to press forward with their program of reform.


ここで改行しなさい。Start a new paragraph here.
その劇は小説を改作したものだ。The play was adapted from a novel.
最近駅の改札あたりで、平気でイチャイチャしてる若い奴等多くなったよなあ。Lately you see more young couples making out at the train station ticket gates acting as though nobody in the world existed.
改札口で切符をお見せください。Show your ticket at the barrier.

彼は仏教からキリスト教へ改宗した。He was converted from Buddhism to Christianity.


彼は改心することを決心した。He resolved to turn over a new leaf.

家名を嵯峨と改姓したのは明治３年でした。It was the third year of Meiji when their family name was changed to Saga.
時刻表が改正された。The timetable has been revised.
参議院はどんな改正案も通さなくても構わないようです。The Upper House seems bent on defeating any reform bills.
今日の議題は生徒会の改選についてです。誰か立候補したい人がいたら手を挙げてください。Today's agenda concerns the re-election of the student council. If anybody wishes to stand as a candidate, please raise your hand.
２国間の貿易上のアンバランスを改善しなければならない。The trade imbalance between two nations should be improved.


家を改装してもらいたいのです。I want you to refurbish the house.
地下室を仕事場に改造した。The basement has been made over into a workshop.

わが家は全面的に改築された。Our house was entirely rebuilt.


時刻表が改訂された。The timetable has been revised.
その百科事典の改訂版が出版された。A revised edition of the encyclopedia was published.






コンピューターはたえず改良されている。Computers are constantly being improved.


私の同僚は報告書を改ざんした。My colleague doctored the report.

何としても海をひと目みたいものだ。I ache for a sight of the sea.
北海道に行ったら、やっぱり海の幸を食べないと行った意味がないでしょう。A trip to Hokkaido is not a trip to Hokkaido unless you try the seafood.
この海域を航行するのはとても気持ちがいい。It is very pleasant to sail these waters.

海運会社に勤めています。I work for a shipping company.

海王星は太陽系の8番目の惑星だ。Neptune is the eighth planet of the solar system.
君はどれくらいよく海外に行きますか。How often do you go abroad?

このバスは、海岸に行きますか。Does this bus go to the beach?


海がめは高齢まで生きる。Turtles live to a great age.
アメリカンインディアンの祖先は、ベーリング海峡を経由してアジアから米大陸へ渡った。The ancestors of Native Americans went to the continent from Asia by way of the Bering Strait.
彼らはパイロットに海軍のヘリコプターを操縦させた。They made the pilot fly the Navy helicopter.






この地方は海産物に恵まれている。This area is rich in marine products.





たくさんの船が海上を走っている。Many boats are sailing on the sea.


海水が傷にしみて痛いよ。The seawater stings my cut.


ハワイでは１年中海水浴が楽しめる。In Hawaii, we can enjoy swimming in the ocean all year round.
このバスは海水浴場に行きますか。Does this bus go to the beach?

あいつは海千山千だから、取り引き相手としてはかなり手強いぞ。All those tricks he's got up his sleeve make him a formidable client.

あなたの国では海草を食べますか。Do you eat seaweed in your country?

海賊たちは７つの海を航海した。The pirates sailed the seven seas.
うちの猫は大変海苔が好きである。Our cat is very fond of seaweed.

船は全乗組員を乗せたまま海中へと沈んでいった。Down under the sea went the ship with all her crew.
海の植物は海底に付着して育つ。Marine plants grow on the sea bed.

イルカは哺乳類の一種です。A dolphin is a kind of mammal.


エヴェレスト山は海抜29,002フィートです。Mt. Everest is 29,002 feet above sea level.
こうした熊独特の特徴が、熊が動かずに狩猟すること（アザラシの呼吸孔の脇でじっと動かず、アザラシが海面に上がってくるのを待つ）を好む説明になっている。These special characteristics explain its preference for still-hunting (lying motionless beside a seal's breathing hole, waiting for one to surface).


スミスさんが「海兵隊は必要ない」と言いました。Mr Smith said, "There's no need for the Marines."
２、３分歩いたら海辺に着いた。A few minutes' walk brought me to the shore.

海綿は水を吸収しますので水彩絵具をぼかしたりする時に便利です。Sponge absorbs water so it is convenient for shading water-colours and such.
大きな岩が一つ海面から突き出ていた。A big rock rose out of the sea.
ロブスターは海洋動物の一種に属します。Lobsters belong to a class of marine animals.


海流に変化が起きたのだろうか。Has a change in ocean currents occurred?
陸路を運ぶのは大変ですが、海路で運ぶのは簡単です。It's very difficult to transport them overland, but simple to do so by sea.
サーカスのアシカは曲芸を見せた。The circus sea lion did a trick.
すべては燃えて灰となった。Everything was burnt to ashes.






その缶は灰皿の代わりになる。The can will do for an ashtray.

４．煮え立たせる寸前で弱火にして、もう一度灰汁を取り除きます。4. Just before bringing it to the boil, set to a low flame and remove the scum again.
私の父は青と灰色のネクタイを持っている。My father has a blue and gray tie.















その界隈は行事で活気を呈している。The neighborhood is alive with activities.

生徒達はみんな家に帰りました。All the students have gone home.彼女はみんなに愛されている。She is loved by everybody.木の葉はみんな落ちてしまった。The leaves have all fallen.
皆さんじっとしていてください。Could you keep still, everyone?


来年６月２２日に観測される皆既日食。The total solar eclipse can be observed next year on June 22nd.




皆目見当がつきません。I don't have the slightest idea.
皆さまにもどうぞよろしく。My best wishes to you and yours.
あの絵を壁に掛けなさい。Hang that picture on the wall.
絵に書いた餅は食べられない。Never confuse art with life.
赤い絵の具に青い絵の具を混ぜなさい。Blend the red paint with the blue paint.
その絵画を見たらおもしろかった。I found the picture interesting.




彼はあれでも絵書きだってさ。He claims that he is a painter.


絵本は子供たちの頭を啓発する。Picture books will cultivate the minds of children.
ホットドッグを２個、辛子とケチャップつきでおねがいします。I'll have two hot dogs with mustard and ketchup.
私はカニを大ごちそうだと思っている。I regard crab as a great delicacy.

開き直られても困る。Giving me an attitude won't solve anything.
先週、私達は舞踏会を開きました。We gave a ball last week.庭のバラの木のつぼみが少しずつ開き始める。Little by little, the buds on the rosebush in my garden begin to open.
あなたの手紙を間違ってあけてしまってすいませんでした。I'm sorry I opened your mail by mistake.３人の少年達はその建物の扉を開けました。The three boys opened the doors of the building.財布の中身をこの袋に空けなさい。Empty the purse into this bag.
そうすればやがて運が開けるでしょう。And soon your luck will turn for the better.

彼はドアを開け放しにする癖がある。He has a habit of keeping the door open.




開演は何時ですか。What time does the play begin?

２、３日すれば開花するでしょう。The blossoms will be out in a few days.音楽の才能は普通早く開花する。Musical talent usually blooms at an early age.
国会は午後二時に開会されました。The Diet session convened at 2pm.

その博物館は今日開館していますか。Is the museum open today?

その病院は先月開業した。The hospital opened last month.
彼は開業医をやっている。He practices medicine.



会議の席で常務は、開口一番何を言ったと思う。大規模なリストラ計画を発表したんだよな。Guess what the managing director started off the meeting by saying. The first thing out of his mouth was an announcement of some major restructuring.

その学校は開校してから７０年になる。The school was founded seventy years ago.
新東京国際空港が成田に開港した。The New Tokyo International Airport was opened in Narita.
新たな入植者達がその広大な広野を開墾した。The newcomers cultivated the immense wilderness.

彼らは一連の音楽会を開催した。They gave a series of concerts.

その展覧会は今開催中です。The exhibition is now open.


何時に搭乗開始ですか。What time does boarding begin?



７月１０日より札幌支店を開設いたします。On July 10, we will open our Sapporo branch.


新たな入植者達がその広大な荒野を開拓した。The newcomers cultivated the immense wilderness.これらの製品の新たなる販路を開拓せねばならない。We have to find a new market for these products.
開拓者達は現地人たちから毛皮を物々交換で手に入れた。The colonists bartered with the natives for fur.
橋は開通している。The bridge is open to traffic.
法廷は来週開廷される。The court will sit next week.
いつ開店したの？When did you open your new store?レストランはいつ開店しますか。When does the restaurant open?
エンドユーザーの視野にたった商品開発が必須。Our new product development efforts must be done from the end user's viewpoint.
日本は開発途上国に対し、２０億円の包括援助を保証しました。Japan guaranteed a 2 billion yen aid package to developing countries.

開票は予想した通りだ。Election returns were what we had expected.
彼はその手紙を開封しないで送り返した。He sent the letter back unopened.


この庭園は一般に開放されています。This garden is open to the public.
オープン戦が終わり、いよいよ開幕だ。The exhibition games are over and the regular season finally begins.




それはもう一つ下の階ですよ。That's one level down.私の部屋は４階にあります。My apartment is on the fourth floor.
ディナーを食べに階下に行こう。Let's go downstairs for dinner.
彼は中流階級の出だ。He comes from the middle class.彼は２年前に、大佐の階級に昇進した。He was raised to the rank of colonel two years ago.

昔から今に至るまで存在する、あらゆる社会の歴史は階級闘争の歴史である。The history of all hitherto existing societies is the history of class struggles.

階層問題に対する、消費社会論の著である。It is a literary work confronting the class problem of a consumer society.
その階段を上ってはいけません。You must not go up the stairs.
私が手にしてるのは貝の化石です。What I have in my hand is a fossil seashell.


トムは美しい貝がらを浜辺でひろった。Tom picked up some pretty shells on the beach.




敵を蹴散らし、凱旋した俺はみなにこう呼ばれるんだ！Having scattered the enemy before me and triumphantly returned, this is how they would herald me.



あるものの意味がわかるためには、そのものの外に出て、離れたところからそれを経験することができなければならない。You have to be outside something, able to experience it from a distance, before it makes sense.いつもと変えてたまに外で食事しよう。Let's occasionally change where we go to eat out.うちはうち、そとはそと。Our house, our rules.
彼はほかに情報を求めることにした。He decided to seek information elsewhere.日本では琵琶湖ほど大きな湖はほかにない。No other lake in Japan is as large as Lake Biwa.地球は水があるという点でほかの惑星と違う。The earth is different from the other planets in that it has water.
彼は眼鏡を外した。He took off his glasses.私は野球チームから外された。I was dropped from the baseball team.
他に誰がパーティーに来たの？Who else came to the party?
ゴールは町のはずれに向かい合うように置かれていたのです。The goals were placed at the opposite ends of the town.
バックミラーがはずれてしまいました。The rear-view mirror fell off.私が最初に予測したことは的を遠くはずれていた。My first guess was wide off the mark.彼はけがでチームから外れた。He was dropped from the team because of an injury.






これらの患者には外科的な処置だけでは十分とは言い難い。For these patients, surgical treatment is far from being satisfactory.
父は熟練した外科医です。My father is an expert surgeon.

どこで外貨の交換をすることができますか。Where can I get my money exchanged?




Windows Media Playerの新しいスキンを入手し、プレーヤーの外観を変えてみましょう。Why don't you try out getting a new Windows Media Player skin and changing the player's look?
今朝は外気が冷たく感じる、もう冬が近づいている。The air feels cold this morning; winter is approaching.




その学校は外見が刑務所に似ている。The school looks like a prison.

英語は外交や観光事業に有効である。English is useful in diplomacy and tourism.

私は３人兄弟がいる。１人はパイロット、１人は外交官、もう一人は大工だ。I have three brothers; one is pilot, another a diplomat and the other a carpenter.その会議には１５０人の外交官がきた。The conference drew 150 diplomats.
その国は米国との外交関係を断絶した。That country broke off diplomatic relations with the United States.
外交的な対話によって、その紛争に終止符を打つことができた。Diplomatic dialogue helped put an end to the conflict.
ある調査によると、今日では５人中３人が外交問題には無関心のようだ。According to a survey, three in five people today are indifferent to foreign affairs.
内気な人は外向的な人より短命？Do introverts not live as long as extroverts?

あなたは外国の本を持っていますか。Do you have any foreign books?

あなたはなぜ外国語を勉強するのですか。What do you study a foreign language for?
「居住外国人」とは、どういう意味ですか。What does "resident alien" mean?


彼女の外国製の香水はほのかな香りがする。Her exotic perfume has a subtle scent.







彼は外車を買えるぐらい金持ちだ。He is rich enough to buy a foreign-made car.


見た目には優しそうだけど、彼って皆から外柔内剛の結構なタフネゴシエータと言われているよ。He seems like a softy on the surface, but at the core he's got an iron will that makes him an extremely tough negotiator.
ヒーターをつけたまま外出した。I went out with the heater on.
彼の負った傷はすべて外傷だ。All his injuries are external.

食事は家庭で食べますか、外食ですか。Do you eat at home or eat out?

その外人はスコットランド出身だ。The foreigner comes from Scotland.



この電話で外線がかけられますか。Can I make an outside call on this phone?


外相は、戦争は避けられないと言った。The Foreign Minister said that war was inevitable.








父は外泊するときはたいてい帽子をかぶる。My father usually wears a hat when he goes out for the night.

外付けのハードディスクに保存しといて。Save it on the external hard drive.
秘密が外部に漏れた。The secret leaked out.田舎の人々は外部の人に対して昔から疑い深い。Country people are traditionally suspicious of strangers.

外米はぼそぼそしていて、日本人の口には合わない。Foreign rice is hard and tasteless, and doesn't appeal to the Japanese palate.
その講堂の外壁はひどく黒ずんでいる。その原因の一つは酸性雨である。The outside walls of the auditorium are terribly stained. It is, in part, due to acid rain.



その会は外務省の後援で開かれた。That party was held under the auspices of the Foreign Ministry.
彼は外務大臣に収まった。He was established as Foreign Minister.
内面の欠点はきっと外面に現れるものだ。The inside defects never fail to express themselves outwardly.
彼は今日外野を守っている。He plays in the outfield today.




外用のみに使用し、内服しないで下さい。For external use only, do not ingest.

君は外来思想に偏見を抱いているようだ。You seem to be prejudiced against ideas that come from foreign countries.





せきには塩水のうがいが効く。Gargling with salt water helps stop coughing.母親はトムの咳のことを心配している。Tom's mother worries about his cough.
講演者は咳払いをした。The speaker cleared his throat.

ワインは本来害にならない。Wine is not harmful in itself.

残飯の屑は害虫の住処になる。Garbage harbors vermin.


その崖は道路の上に突き出ている。The cliff hangs over the road.
概して私は中華料理が好きだ。I like Chinese food in general.
あなたが言ったことはおおむね正しかった。What you said was in the main right.

ここでの問題は、社会のトレンドを概観できるような枠組みを創出することである。The question here is one of creating the framework with which we can outline the social trend.

この国の人口は概算５千万に達する。The population of the country is roughly estimated at 50,000,000.


彼の福祉の概念はかなり観念的だ。His notion of welfare is pretty abstract.

ここまでで、この時期の政治不安増大に関する概要を述べてきた。Up to this point I have presented an overview of the growth of political unrest in the period.
彼に計画の概略を述べてもらおう。Ask him to sketch out his plan.


このふたはあのジャーのふただ。This lid belongs with that jar.


ここは東京のビジネス街だ。This is a business section of Tokyo.
あの町かどに公衆電話ボックスがある。There is a telephone booth at the corner of the street.



このことは家が沈み始め、道路が裂けて街灯が途方もない角度に傾きつつあることを意味する。This means that houses are starting to sink, roads are breaking up and lamp-posts are leaning at crazy angles.
警察は街頭デモを阻止しようとした。The police tried to stop the street demonstration.
街道沿いのドライブインで昼食をとった。We had lunch at a roadside restaurant.
彼らは街路の雪を取り払った。They cleared the street of snow.

街路樹のある通りの向こうに海が見えた。The street, lined with trees, provided a vista of the sea.

この条件に該当する人は誰もいない。There is nobody who fulfils these conditions.



そこで、旅をするときは、私は鎧をつけることはしません。When I travel, I don't wear armor.
どこの家庭にも戸棚に骸骨がある。Every family has a skeleton in the closet.


この木のてっぺんは垣と同じ高さだ。The top of this tree is level with the fence.
私は彼の性格の悪い面を垣間見た。I had a glimpse into the negative side of his character.
よい垣根はよい隣人をつくる。Good fences make good neighbors.
春、カキの新芽がふき出したころのことを思うとすばらしい。It is wonderful to think of Spring, when the new buds of the persimmon burst forth.


各会員は会費を払うべし。Each member has to pay a membership fee.


この列車は各駅に停車する。This train stops at every station.
その列車は各駅停車です。The train stops at every station.







委員会は、大気汚染を抑制するために互いに協力し合うよう各国に要請した。The committee called on all nations to work side-by-side to curb air pollution.この研究は各国の移民政策を比較するものである。This study compares the immigration policies of various nations.

その俳優の死は各紙で大見出しで報じられた。The actor's death made big headlines in all the papers.
そのチームの選手は各自めいめいのバットを持っている。Each player on the team has his own bat.

就職活動の時期は早まる傾向にあり、マスコミ各社の面接がその先頭にたっている。The job-seeking season is starting earlier each year and it's the mass media that are causing that trend by moving up their job interview schedule.
その店は各種ワインをたくさん在庫している。The store has a large stock of wines.
大雪のため各所で電線が切れた。Electric wires were broken in many places from the heavy snowfall.


各人五分ずつ話す時間が与えられた。Each speaker was allotted five minutes.

私はイギリス各地を見物した。I visited many parts of England.



江戸時代に、各藩の奨励策によって、全国各地に地場産業が興った。Local industry flourished throughout the land in the Edo period thanks to the promotional efforts by each clan.



科学者たちはエイズ・ウイルスの拡散をくい止めようと戦っています。Scientists are fighting to stem the spread of the AIDS virus.
教育施設を拡充する金をもっと多くと望んでいる。People want more money to expand educational institutions.
今年は事業が５０％拡大した。The business has expanded by 50% this year.この顕微鏡は物を１００倍に拡大する。This microscope magnifies objects by 100 times.

学校の体育館が拡張された。The school gymnasium was enlarged.




thatには、主格、目的格の２つしかなく、格による形の変化はない。'That' has only the two cases, nominative and objective, and it does not inflect depending on the case.
何日前までに予約すれば格安料金の対象になりますか。How early do I have to make a reservation to qualify for the discount?
もう、そんな顔をするなら、またただの友達に格下げするわよ。Oh, you! If you go around with a face like that, I'll have to demote you back down to 'friend' again.
彼は自分のすきな格言をいれた。He worked in his favorite maxim.
これは格好のよい松の木だ。This is a well-shaped pine tree.


裕福な人々と貧しい人々との格差はますます広がっている。The gap between rich and poor is getting wider.
彼らはその格子を取り壊した。They broke away the bars.





防衛庁が防衛省に格上げされたのはなぜですか？Why was the Japan Defense Agency upgraded to the Japanese Ministry of Defense?
それは以前に比べて格段に進歩した。It has greatly improved compared with what it was.

彼は襲撃者を格闘して地面に倒した。He wrestled his attacker to the ground.




暑い日の生ビールの味はまた格別だ。Draft beer tastes especially good on a hot day.

この核時代にあっては、世界中どこの国だって安全ではない。No country under the sun is safe in this nuclear age.

核家族は親子のよりよい会話を可能にする。The nuclear family makes better communication possible between parents and children.


デオキシリボ核酸は、遺伝子を作っている複雑な化学物質である。DNA is a complex chemical that makes up a gene.

私は核実験に反対だと喜んで公式に言明する。I am willing to go on record as opposing nuclear tests.
これがその問題の核心である。This is the core of the problem.

仮に核戦争が起こったとすれば、人類は滅亡するだろう。If a nuclear war were to break out, mankind would perish.






その国は公然と核武装するとおどしている。That country has openly threatened to go nuclear.

その戦争は日本人の核兵器に対する見方に影響を与えた。The war affected the way the Japanese view nuclear weapons.

その物理学者は核融合の潜在的な危険性に気づいていた。The physicist was aware of the potential danger of nuclear fusion.

飲み物はヤシの実の殻に入れてあった。The drinks were served in coconut shells.
その子供達２人が賞を獲得した。Both of the children won a prize.
ワシは獲物めがけて急降下した。The eagle dived at its prey.
確かに彼は信頼できます。You can certainly rely on him.
窓が閉まっているか確かめとけ。See that the window is closed.

いずれの会社にも確固たる事業計画がある。Every company has a firm business plan.

これは遅いけど確実な方法だ。This is a slow but certain way.


連邦取引委員会は不正取引の調査で新たな確証を握りました。The FTC nailed down new evidence in the fraud investigation.
私は君の援助を確信している。I am assured of your help.
月曜までに確定見積もりが必要です。We need a firm quotation by Monday.

予約は確認されています。I have a confirmed reservation.
吉川かおりと言いますが予約しています。これが予約確認書です。Hello, I have a reservation, my name is Kaori Yoshikawa. Here is the confirmation card.
お庭の方にも縁台を並べれば、かなり座席数を確保できそうだなーと思いました。I thought that if we lined up benches in the garden as well, we could achieve quite a seating capacity.

確約は出来ないけど、何とかやってみましょう。I can't promise anything, but I'll do my best.
キャンセル待ちで乗れる確率はどれくらいですか。If I wait, what's the possibility I can get a seat?







どうやって最良の形式を確立するかという問題はまだ解決されていない。The question of how to establish the optimal formula is still open.
どこかであなたにお会いした覚えがあります。I remember seeing you somewhere.
あなたが知っている事を全部彼に話す事を覚えておいてください。You must remember to tell him all that you know.日本語は外人にとって覚えにくい。It is hard for foreigners to learn Japanese.その音楽には本当に感動をおぼえた。That music really gets me.
その物音が私を眠りから覚まさせた。The noise awoke me from my sleep.酔いを覚ますために散歩に出かけた。I went for a walk to try to sober up.
その叫び声で私は眠りからさめた。The cry roused me from my sleep.けが人は麻酔から覚めた後痛みで泣きわめいた。The injured person wailed with pain after recovering from the anaesthesia.
兵士たちは故国のために死ぬ覚悟が出来ていた。The soldiers were ready to die for their country.

３角形のすべての角の和は１８０度に等しい。The sum of all the angles in a triangle equals 180 degrees.
私は角にある劇場に行くところです。I am going to the theater on the corner.ぎざぎざのかどが彼のズボンに引っかかって穴を空けた。The jagged edge ripped a hole in his trousers.次の角で右に曲がりなさい。Turn right at the next corner.
カタツムリがすっと角を出した。The snail shot out its horns.

紅茶に角砂糖を２つ入れて下さい。Put two lumps in my tea, please.




それでは角度が小さすぎよう。The angle would be too narrow.





カッコウを見た事がありますか。Have you ever seen a cuckoo?


その時閣議はほとんど終わっていた。The Cabinet conference was all but over then.
その閣僚はついに辞表提出に追い込まれました。The cabinet minister wound up submitting his resignation.

問題は、この必要な隔たりを埋めるのが知覚であるという点にある。The problem lies in the fact that the necessary gap is bridged by perception.
その村は海から何キロも隔たっている。The village is many kilometers away from the seashore.

アイルランドとイギリスは海によって隔てられている。Ireland and England are separated by the sea.
もっと単刀直入に言ってくれないかな。隔靴掻痒の感なきにしもあらずだよ。You don't have to leave me hanging like this. Why don't you just come out and tell it to me straight?






その伝染病患者は他の患者から隔離された。The infectious case was isolated from other patients.




鉄道はある種の革命を引き起こした。The railroad provoked a kind of revolution.


いくつになっても学ぶことはある。One is never too old to learn.
彼は法学修士の学位を得た。He got a master's degree in law.
最初に、彼は学位論文を完成させた。First, he finished his thesis.
黒魔法の話を聞きたいです。学院ではさわりしか聞いたことがないんですが興味があります。I'd like to hear about black magic. I was only told the highlights in the academy, and it interests me.
「学園の廊下で、濃厚なキスシーン・・・聞いたぞ聞いたぞ」「濃厚じゃなーい！話に尾ひれ付いてるって・・・」"A passionate kiss scene in a school corridor ... I've heard all about it!" "It wasn't passionate! That's an exaggeration..."
学園祭は来週行われることになっている。Our campus festival is to be held next week.
数学は私の好きな学科です。Mathematics is my favorite subject.
夕食後は３時間、学課の勉強をする。After supper, he studies his lessons for three hours.
盛田教授は化学学会で司会を務めた。Professor Morita presided at a meeting of the Chemical Society.



前学期は成績がよかった。I had a good report last term.
学期末テストが近づいている。The final exams are approaching.

私たちは同じ学級で英語を勉強します。We study English in the same class.

スポーツにかまけて学業を怠る学生もいる。Some students neglect their studies in favor of sports.

大抵の学芸は、最初に基礎をしっかりやっておかないと、その先スムーズに身に付けることができません。With most of the arts, if you don't get the basics down properly then it is difficult to acquire further skills.
この学校はたくさんの生徒がいます。This school has many students.

学際的研究を促進するのにカリキュラム改革が不可欠であることは明らかである。It should be clear that the curriculum reform is mandatory in order to enhance interdisciplinary research.


学識を自慢している。He is proud of his scholarship.

彼は立派な学者になるだろう。He will be a wonderful scholar.

これは生物の学習法としてはあまりよくないと思う。I don't think this is a good approach to biology.
ほめることが学習者にやる気を起こさせる。Praise stimulates students to work hard.


彼は学術会議に出席した。He attended the scientific conference.


学生の半数が休んでいた。Half the students were absent.
この歌を聞くと私はいつも、学生時代を思い出す。Whenever I hear this song, I am reminded of my school days.
学生３枚ください。これが学生証です。Three students. Here's my student ID.


この学説は３部から成り立っている。This theory consists of three parts.



その大学の学長は辞職しそうである。The president of the university is likely to resign.

学童たちはどっと笑った。The pupils burst out laughing.

第１学年には５つクラスがあった。There were five classes in the first year.


その金は私の学費に大いに役立つだろう。The money will go a good way towards my school expenses.

学部の選択で迷った。He was at a loss as to which faculty to choose.

その場に居合わせた者は皆、かすかな後光に照らされる学部長に視線を向けた。Now, all heads turn toward the dean, who sits surrounded by a faint halo of light.


少しばかりの学問は危険なもの。A little learning is a dangerous thing.心理学は心を科学研究する学問である。Psychology is the scientific study of the mind.
ダーウィンの考えをこのように改訂したことは学問的立場からの攻撃対象となった。This revision of Darwin's ideas came under fire from academic positions.


駐車スペースを白いラインで囲み、「学寮長専用」という掲示板が立っている。There were white lines around it, and it had a notice saying, "Reserved for Head of College."
しかし、アメリカではふつう、スポーツチームは腕で選ばれ、学業のコースは学力によって選ばれます。However, in America, sports teams are generally chosen by skill, and academic courses by ability.

給料は、経験と学歴に基づいて決まります。Pay will be based on experience and educational background.


近頃は旅行は楽だ。Travelling is easy these days.
あなたと一緒にいて楽しかった。I really enjoyed your company.
水泳が私の楽しみの１つです。Swimming is one thing I enjoy.お便り楽しみにお待ちしております。I am looking forward to hearing from you.

グレイ先生は仕事を楽しんでいませんでした。Mr Grey did not enjoy his job.

この公園は子供の楽園だ。This park is a paradise for children.
それから二階の楽屋に歩いていきました。Then I walked upstairs to the dressing rooms.
父は私の楽観を乱さないことにした。My father chose not to disturb my optimism.
会議は楽観的な調子で終わった。The meeting ended on an optimistic note.
経済が好転するだろうという楽観論がかなりある。There is considerable optimism that the economy will improve.
楽器をなにか演奏しますか。Do you play a musical instrument?




相手チームがあまり闘志をわかしていなかったので、我々は楽勝した。The opposing team did not put up much of a fight, so we won hands down.


楽隊が先頭に立って市を行進した。A band led the parade through the city.
楽団は行進曲を何曲か演奏した。The band played several marches.

ヘレンは生来楽天家だ。Helen is by nature an optimist.


たとえ困っていても、マックはいつも楽天的だ。Even if he is in trouble, Mac is always optimistic.
彼女は楽譜なしにピアノを弾く。She plays the piano by ear.
ボブは装飾された額にその肖像画を収めたけれど、上下さかさまだった。Bob mounted the portrait in a fancy frame, but it was upside down.この額は税込みです。This amount includes tax.
額の汗をふきなさい。Wipe the sweat from your brow.

彼は街頭で買った絵を額縁に入れた。He framed the picture he had bought on the street.
彼の言葉をあまり額面通りに受け取ってはいけない。Don't take his remarks too literally.

私は彼のあごに１発食らわしてやった。I landed him a blow on the chin.

その新聞は彼の犯罪への掛かり合いを主張した。The newspaper alleged his involvement in the crime.
あれだけのコインを収集するのにどれだけの年月がかかりましたか。How long did it take you to collect so many coins?壁に地図がかかっています。There is a map on the wall.所得税は控除額を上回るいかなる所得にもかかる。An income tax is levied on any income that exceeds deductions.
長くつき合うには掛けは禁物。Short accounts make long friends.彼は上着をコート掛けにかけた。He hung his coat on a hook.
コートをハンガーに掛けておきなさい。Put your coat on a hanger.ウエートレスはテーブルの上に白いテーブルクロスをかけた。The waitress spread a white cloth over the table.その婦人は真珠のネックレスをかけていた。The lady wore a necklace of pearls.
その事で先生に掛け合ってもらうように彼女を選んだ。We elected her to approach our teacher on the matter.


このバーの持ち主は酒を決して掛け売りしない。The owner of this bar never sells liquor on credit.


丘の上にかしの木がはえていますか。Are there oak trees on the hill?


その少女はその布を裂いた。The girl tore the cloth.貴重なお時間の数分をさいていただけますか。Can you spare me a few minutes of your valuable time?
私、先週貰った割引券があるの。I have some coupons I got last week.
彼の話は割り引いて聞いた方がいい。You'd better take his words with a grain of salt.





登場人物がうまく割り振られていた。The characters were well cast.
９０の約数のうち、９でわり切れない数は何個あるでしょうか。Among the divisors of 90, how many numbers are not divisible by 9?

あなたのおっしゃることはもっともだけれど、何か割り切れないものがありますねえ。What you're saying is perfectly viable, but I can't shake off my unease.



私に新しい部屋が割り当てられた。A new room was assigned to me.








彼は１万円私に割り戻した。He gave me a ten thousand yen rebate.


マイケルは皿を割ってしまった。Michael broke the dishes.

プラスチックは割れにくい。Plastic does not break easily.


その事件の説明は、紙面が足りないため割愛された。The explanation of the event was omitted for lack of space.








彼の行為は世間のかっさいを浴びた。His behavior won general applause.

彼はあたかも病気であったかのような顔つきをしていた。He looked as if he had been ill.

将軍の堂々とした恰幅は誰でも威圧される。The general's massive presence awes everyone.

書類は全部テープでくくられて金庫におさめられた。All the papers were taped up and kept in the safe.
カッコ内の言葉を短縮形にしなさい。Put the words in parentheses into abbreviated form.

その活火山は周期的に噴火する。The active volcano erupts at regular intervals.
その街は活気にあふれていた。The town was full of activity.
株式市場は活況を呈している。The stock market is very active.

この大きな活字は眼に楽だ。This large type is easy on the eyes.



今後は、新事業創造による経済の活性化という観点から、国民のコンセンサスに基づいた早急な内圧型規制緩和が推進されなければなるまい。Therefore, they cannot catalyze deregulation without "external pressure".

テレビを見ることは受動的活動である。Watching TV is a passive activity.




私たちはとても活発な討論をした。We had a very vigorous debate.



仕事でご活躍ですね。I see you're doing very well in your business.元気で活躍していることと思います。I hope things have been going well for you.
政治家として、彼は、演技のうまさを目一杯活用している。As a politician, he makes utmost use of his acting ability.英語を学習する上で不可欠な、不規則動詞の活用。Conjugation of irregular verbs - essential for those learning English.

奴隷たちは宗教に活力を見いだす。Slaves find power in religion.


コップ１杯のビールを飲んで渇きをいやした。I had a glass of beer to quench my thirst.
お腹が空いたし、のども渇いた。I'm hungry and thirsty.

わが国の国民は独立を渇望している。Our people thirst for independence.


肌にシェーバーを滑らす度に確かに滑らか〜な感じがします。It certainly feels smooth when you run the shaver over your skin.
足元に注意して下さい。床がすべりやすいから。Watch your step. The floor is slippery.

列車は駅にすべりこんだ。The train pulled into the station.


そのうちペンが手から滑り落ちてしまい、ただ聞き入るだけでした。Then the pen fell from my hand and I just listened.
子供たちは氷の上を滑っていた。The children were sliding on the ice.滑って足首を捻挫した。I slipped and twisted my ankle.足元に気をつけてください。床が滑りますから。Watch your step. The floor is slippery.
カモメは風に乗って滑空した。The sea gull glided on the wind.
彼はこっけいな性質の人だ。He is of a humorous turn of mind.


ねじ、てこ、くさび、滑車などは単一機械と呼ばれる。The screw, the lever, the wedge, the pulley, etc. are called simple machines.



鳥は翼を動かさず空中を滑走できる。A bird can glide through the air without moving its wings.
飛行機は滑走路に着陸した。An airplane touched down on the runway.



父と私の葛藤に、彼は気付いていないようです。He seems not to be aware of the conflict between my father and me.

そのピアノは美しい、濃い褐色の木で作られていました。The piano was made of beautiful, dark brown wood.



彼は作家でもあり、かつまた政治家でもある。He is a writer and a statesman.

猫にかつお節。Setting a wolf to guard the sheep.
もし病気の人が千羽の鶴を折ると、その人の願いが叶うの。If a sick person folds one thousand paper cranes, her wish will come true.
母は私の望むものは何でも言わなくてもかなえてくれる。My mother anticipates all my desires.


かばん全部に荷札をつけなさい。Attach labels to all the bags.
彼は大金を株に投資した。He invested a lot of money in stocks.彼女はパンジーを何株か花壇に植えた。She planted some pansies in the flower bed.ＧＥはレイク（株）を３０００万ドルで買収したと発表した。GE announced the acquisition of the Lake company for $30 million.


あの会社の株価は下がらないだろう。The price of the stock of that company will not come down.
株券を盗んだと言ってジルを責める理由はあなたにはない。You have no grounds for accusing Jill of stealing the stock certificates.
ニューヨークの１９８７年１０月の株式大暴落はまだ生々しく記憶されている。The stock market crash of October 1987 in New York is still vividly remembered.
４月１日、南洋フーズ株式会社は横浜の新社屋に移転します。On April 1, Nanyo Foods Co. Ltd. will move to its new building in Yokohama.


株主たちはもうけまくっています。The stockholders are making money hand over fist.
株主総会が開かれた。The shareholders meeting was held.
勝って兜の緒を締めよ。You must keep up your guard even after a victory.
そのとき彼らはたんぽぽをつみとって、彼らの耳につけました。Then they picked dandelions and put them in their ears.










歯車がかみ合っている。The cog-wheels are in gear.噛み合う犬は呼び難し。You can't call dogs off from a fight.うまく噛み合わないまま何時間も話し合った。They talked for hours at cross purposes.


私はあくびをかみ殺した。I suppressed a yawn.

サメがその男の足を噛み切った。A shark snapped the man's leg off.
成功の喜びをかみしめる。I wish you success.
ほえる犬が必ずしもかみつくわけではない。Barking dogs don't always bite.

爪を噛むのはよしなさい。Don't bite your nails.噛むと痛いですか。Does it hurt when you chew?
彼はお人よしのカモから大金を巻き上げました。He made heaps of money by ripping off naive suckers.









若いときは貧乏でかゆをすすって暮らした。When he was young, he was so poor that he virtually had to live on gruel.







まいた種は自分で刈り取らなければならない。As a man sows, so he shall reap.

後ろを刈り上げてください。I want it tapered in the back.


家中が力を合わせて麦の刈入れをしました。The whole family helped harvest the wheat.
種をまくように刈り入れることになる。As you sow, so will you reap.




彼らはジャックの髪の刈り方をひやかした。They made fun of Jack's haircut.



一連の爆発で、その研究施設は瓦礫の山と化した。A series of blasts reduced the laboratory to ruins.

太陽が地面をからからにかわかした。The sun has dried up the ground.

そのぬれたシャツはすぐに乾くだろう。The wet shirt will soon dry up.












乾坤一擲の大勝負。情けないけどこれが見事空振りに終わったんだなあ。It was all-or-nothing and we struck out spectacularly.












椎茸を乾燥させて保存します。We keep shiitake mushrooms dry.
















1.5V乾電池を直接触っただけでは感電死することはないでしょう。You're not going to get electrocuted just by directly touching a 1.5V battery.










国会は、盗聴法案を巡ってまさに侃々諤々の体であった。Parliament members had a raucous argument over the Wiretapping Law.







洪水で何百という畑が冠水した。Hundreds of fields were submerged in the flood.




寒いからコートを着るべきだ。It's cold so you should wear a coat.この寒さにはもう耐えられない。I can no longer stand the cold.
寒がりなので、毛布をもう１枚かして下さい。I'm very sensitive to cold. May I have another blanket?
彼らは火の気がないので寒がった。They complained of the cold as there was no fire there.
大寒：１年で最も寒さが厳しくなる日ですが、春がもうすぐ間近に迫っているとも言えます。Major Cold: It's the day of the year that the cold is most severe, but you could also say that Spring is just coming around the corner.

その光景を見て私は背筋に寒気がした。The sight made a chill run down my spine.





寒暖計はしばしば零度以下になる。Thermometers often go below zero.



この地方を寒波が襲った。A cold wave hit this district.
寒風が骨身にしみた。The cold wind cut me to the bone.





その新聞記者はニュースを嗅ぎつける鋭い勘を持っている。The newsman has a nose for news.
彼はクラスで一番頭がいいと勘違いしている。He has the illusion that he is the smartest in his class.












勘定は合計５００ドルになる。The bill amounts to 500 dollars.








彼らは息子を勘当した。They renounced their son.
同じことを何回繰り返すの。屋上屋を架すようなくどい説明は勘弁してよ。You're wasting your time with all this needless repetition, so spare us the long-winded explanation.

もし彼のすすめに従っていたら、会社に一銭もなくなっていたかもしれません。The firm might have lost all its money if it had taken his advice.




勧工場には約２０の出店が並んだ。There was a row of about 20 stalls at the fair.

人に自分の勧告が理由のあるものであり、賢明であることを説得するためには、理由を挙げ、知られた例や大家を引用しなければならない。To persuade somebody that your recommendation is reasonable and wise, you have to give reasons and quote known examples and authorities.





その老人は、金と宝石で若い女の子の歓心を買った。The old man bribed a young girl with money and jewelry.





このドラマは単純な勧善懲悪もので、今一つ深みに欠けて物足りない。This drama is missing something. All it is is a simple cautionary tale with no real depth.


顧客に対する勧誘の電話が、テレマーケティング部の主要業務である。Cold calls are the primary function of the telemarketing department.


ボートは急流に巻き込まれた。The boat was sucked in.交通渋滞に巻き込まれたんだ。I was caught in a traffic jam.

トムは時々、彼のお客をだましてお金をまきあげる。Tom sometimes rips off his customers.


長い物には巻かれろ。If you can't lick 'em, join 'em.



その巻末には修辞学と論理学の技法についての２編の短い大要があり、後者はソクラテス式論争方の見本で結ばれていた。The end of which there were two little sketches of rhetoric and logic, the latter finishing with a specimen of a dispute in the Socratic method.
何人かの運転手は笑ったりわめいたりしていた。Some of the drivers were laughing and yelling.
この本があなたの想像力を喚起してくれるでしょう。This book will awaken your imagination.

証人を月曜日に喚問するよう提案します。I move that the witness be summoned on Monday.
あの騒音には耐えられないよ。I can not stand that noise.この家は地震に耐えますか。Does this house withstand earthquakes?

このにおいはたまらなく嫌だ。This smell disgusts me.あのカメラが欲しくてたまらない。I'm dying for that camera.

ただでさえ奴は普段から仕事に遅れて来るくせに、酒まで飲んで来るなんて堪忍袋の緒が切れた。もう会社を辞めてもらうしかない。It was bad enough that he usually came to work late, but coming in drunk was the last straw, and I'm going to have to let him go.
彼女はフランス語が堪能だ。She is proficient in French.ファン・ドーゲンの展覧会を十分堪能してきたよ。I thoroughly enjoyed myself at the Van Dorgen Exhibition.
ジョーはやかましい隣人と口をきく間柄ではなかった。Joe was not on speaking terms with his noisy neighbor.大気汚染に対しての世論がついにやかましくなった。Public feeling against air pollution has at last become vocal.彼はその事にはあまりやかましくない。He is not very strict about it.







私の友人はやっと借金を完済した。My friend got rid of his debt.


新しい鉄道はまだ完成していない。The new railway is not completed yet.

そして書かれていることはすべて完全にはっきりと書かれている。And then everything that was written was completely clear.


サムにはマラソンを完走するだけの力がない。Sam doesn't have the stamina to finish a marathon.
ドジャースはジャイアンツに完敗した。The Dodgers were annihilated by the Giants.

カズちゃん、さっき完膚無きまでに振っちゃおうとしたでしょ？You were about to dump her flat out, weren't you?


屋根が破損した家は今では修理が完了している。The house with the damaged roof has been repaired.








どの官庁もお役所主義にはまり込まないで、仕事のスピードアップをはかるという点において問題があるようだ。Every government office seems to have problems in expediting matters without entanglement in its red tape system.



彼らは官能的快楽にふけった。They gave themselves up to the enjoyment of sensual pleasures.








彼の辞職で官僚の席に空きができた。His resignation left a vacancy in the cabinet.




読書からくつろぎを得る事が出来る人もいる。Some people get relaxed by reading.
この音楽を聞いてくつろぎなさい。Listen to this music and relax.
ホテルではくつろげない。I can't feel at home in a hotel.


寛大に人を許すように努めなさい。Try to be generous and forgive.
我々は、誰であろうとテロ活動に携わるものに寛容でいるつもりはない。We will not tolerate anyone who engages in terrorism.

干し草を納屋に蓄えた。We stored the hay in the barn.


有明海は日本のもっとも広い干潟の一つです。The Ariake Sea is one of the biggest tidelands in Japan.

僕のことに干渉しないでくれ。Don't interfere in my affairs.

農夫たちは干天のため冬作の穀物は不作だろうとなげいた。The farmers complained that because of the dry weather there would be a poor harvest of winter grain.
干物は私の好みに合わない。Dried fish is not to my taste.
月の影響で潮の干満が起こる。Tides are caused by the influence of the moon.
私、幹事をやるのが初めてだから要領が悪いかもしれません。This is the first time I've worked as a coordinator, so I may not have the hang of it yet.



この前、混雑した幹線道路の真ん中でガス欠してしまったんです。The other day I ran out of gas in the middle of a busy Interstate.




彼は最近、うつ病を患い、仕事に支障が出ている。He has been suffering from depression recently, which is interfering with his work.
私はあなたの第一号の患者になるわ。I'll be your first patient.


その部屋は居心地の良い感じがした。The room had a nice cozy feel.
私はときどき悲しく感じる。I feel sad every now and then.
ある種の動物は嵐の訪れを感じ取る事ができる。Some animals can sense the coming of a storm.




私は指に感覚が無かった。I had no feeling in my fingers.


彼の言葉で彼女は感激のあまり涙ぐんだ。His words moved her to tears.我がチームにお迎えでき、感激します。We are excited about having you on our team.

ご協力に感謝します。I appreciate your cooperation.


トムは自分の感情をぐっと抑えた。Tom got a grip on his emotions.


これはシルクの感触だ。This feels like silk.
我々は彼女の勇気に感心する。We admire her for her bravery.
少女の鋭い感性に触れている。I am touched by the girl's acute sensitivity.
「トイレの便座からエイズが感染することってあるの？」「いいえ、ありません」"Is it possible to catch AIDS from toilet seats?" "No, it isn't."
ゲームについてのご感想は？How did you feel about the game?
私たちは富士山の景観に感嘆した。We admired the view of Mt. Fuji.
文を書くときには、ふつう大文字で始め、ピリオド（.）、または感嘆符（!）、疑問符（?）、で終わる。When writing a sentence, generally you start with a capital letter and finish with a period (.), an exclamation mark (!), or a question mark (?).
説得不能を感知してか、黒崎先生はため息をついて席に着いた。Perhaps having realized it was impossible to persuade her, Ms. Kurosaki sighed and sat down in her seat.

あの電線に触れると感電するよ。If you touch that wire, you'll get a shock.


その小説を読んで深く感動した。I was deeply moved by that novel.

君といたら、彼はきっと感づくだろう。He'll be sure to smell a rat if I'm with you.
君の勇気には全く感服する。I admire you for your courage.


彼の演説は私達にとても感銘を与えた。His speech impressed us very much.

このライオンはよく飼い馴らされている。This lion is very tame.彼はピューマを慣らすのに大いに骨を折った。He took great pains in taming a puma.

学生の時は勉強することになれていた。I was used to studying when I was a student.このらくだは人によくなれているからだれが乗っても大丈夫です。This camel is so tame that anyone can ride it.
その慣行は廃止すべきだ。The practice should be done away with.

我々は地方の慣習を尊重しなくてはならない。We have to respect local customs.



私はおろかにもその慣用語句を文字通りの意味で解釈してしまった。I foolishly interpreted the idiom according to its literal sense.







あなたは何でも金に換算して考えない方がよい。You had better not think of everything in terms of money.


あえて彼の意見を支持した。I dared to support his opinion.

舞が家出を敢行する、直前のことだろう。That was probably just before Mai took the drastic step of leaving home.
神を信じ、敢然と敵に向かった、そのクリスチャンの剣闘士は、たくさんの敵を倒した。Putting his trust in God and taking the bull by the horns, the Christian gladiator defeated many adversaries.



その歓楽に最も金のかからない人が一番の金持ちである。That man is the richest whose pleasures are the cheapest.


あなたはうちのクラスで歓迎されています。You are welcomed in our class.
彼女の歓迎会を行った。We had a welcome party for her.
国民は歓呼して彼を国王に迎えた。The people acclaimed him King.

群集は嬉しさのあまり歓声を上げた。The crowd yelled with delight.




彼女はコーヒーを飲みながらフットボールの試合について友人と歓談した。She chatted with her friends about the football game over coffee.
額の汗をふきなさい。Wipe the sweat from your brow.
今日は汗ばむような陽気だ。It's warm enough today to bring out a slight sweat.
激しい運動をすると汗をかきます。Vigorous exercise makes you sweat.







君は漢詩を読んだことがありますか。Have you ever read any Chinese poems?
漢字を書くときは点やはらいに気をつけて、なるべく早くていねいに書きましょう。When drawing kanji be careful of dots and sweeps, write as carefully and quickly as possible.


漢文の試験で満点を取る生徒はほとんどいません。Almost no students get full marks in Chinese classics.

この漢方薬を飲み続ければ効くでしょう。If you continue to take this herbal medicine, it will do you good.



私たちが環境面の問題を耳にしないで過ぎる日は１日とてない。Not a day goes by without our hearing of an environmental problem.



彼の公式の肩書きは環境庁長官です。His official title is Director-General of the Environment Agency.







このチョコレートはとっても甘くておいしい。This chocolate is very sweet and tasty.ゆりは甘い香りがする。Lilies smell sweet.メアリーにはつい甘くなってしまう。I have always had a soft spot in my heart for Mary.

甘えは禁物だよ。You shouldn't expect things to be easy.

少女は母親に甘えた。The girl played the baby to her mother.人の好意に甘えてはいけない。Don't depend on others' kindness.
世間を甘くみるな！Don't kid yourself.

私は甘やかされた子供は嫌いだ。I don't like spoiled children.

あやうく某業者の甘言に騙され、大損するところでした。I was almost deceived by a certain trader's sweet words into making a huge loss.

そんな甘口には乗らないよ。That sort of flattery will get you nowhere.
ジェーンが私達の家に車で来ていなかったら彼女に甘酒をごちそうしたのですが。If Jane had not come to our home by car, I would have served her amazake.
人は運命を甘受せざるを得ない。One can't quarrel with destiny.


俺、甘党だけど、お酒も飲むよ。I prefer cakes or candies to alcohol, but I do drink.
バラの花は満開よりも蕾の方が甘美である。A rose is sweeter in the bud than full blown.
甘味料として砂糖がはちみつに取って代わった。Sugar replaced honey as a sweetener.

こんな所に監禁されているのはもうごめんだ。I can't stand being cooped up in this prison!






彼は衛生監視員である。He is a sanitary inspector.



代表取締役は取締役の職務の執行を監督するものだ。The Representative Director supervises Directors' performance of duties.監督はチームをトーナメント優勝に今一歩という所までもっていったのに悔しいことだった。It was annoying, as the manager took his team to a near-miss in the tournament.
工場の監督者は部下に「仕事をやめてお昼にしよう」と言った。The plant supervisor said to his crew, "Let's knock off for lunch."







３人の看護婦が四六時中瀕死の大臣の看護に当たった。Three nurses attended the dying minister night and day.





なぜ看護婦になりたいのですか。Why do you want to be a nurse?







囚人は連行していた看守の手を振り切って脱走した。The prisoner broke away from the guards who were holding him.



日光で看板の文字があせた。The sun had faded the lettering on the sign.



医者は病気の老人を看病して夜を明かした。The doctor sat up all night with the sick old man.





その件は通産省の管轄下にある。The matter comes under MITI.




管弦楽団は郷愁に満ちた音楽を演奏し始めた。The orchestra struck up nostalgic music.


ジェット機は管制塔からの誘導で着陸した。The jet plane landed following the instructions of the control tower.


彼に財産管理を任せた。I entrusted my property to him.


仕事場の管理者は、正確さ、効率性、献身を期待する。Office managers expect accuracy, efficiency, and dedication.管理用画面に管理者しかアクセスできないようにしました。I made it so only root could access the administrative screen.

このセミナーは、日本企業のマーケティング担当管理職を対象としたものです。This seminar will target senior marketing leaders from Japanese firms.
管理人によってアカウントの認証が行われたあと、あなたに確認のメールが送られます。You will receive a confirmation email after your account has been activated by an administrator.


簡潔は機知の精髄。Brevity is the soul of wit.
芝刈り機が簡素な作りの荷車に積んである。Some lawn equipment is loaded into the jerry-built cart.


テニスをすることは私には簡単だ。Playing tennis is easy for me.




この辞書は簡約版だ。This dictionary is an abridged edition.


この靴は少し緩い。These shoes are a little loose.


その規則は最近緩められた。The rules were recently relaxed.
Ｖの角度が広ければ広いほど、スピードは緩やかになる。The wider the V angle, the slower the speed.この学校は規律がやや緩やかだ。Discipline is rather mild at this school.

いつもお世話になっていますから、一旦緩急あれば、すぐさま馳せ参じます。You're always there for me, so if you're ever in dire straits, just let me know and I'll come running.




コンピューターは、たとえ緩慢にせよ大きな変化を引き起こした。Computers caused a great, if gradual, change.
公定歩合の引き下げは産業界を苦しめてきた厳しい金融逼迫を緩和するだろうと期待されている。The bank rate cut is expected to relieve the severe financial squeeze that has hit industry.
この缶にはおよそ４ガロン入る。This can holds about 4 gallons.

なしはこの工場で缶詰にされます。Nashi are tinned in this factory.
私は時々はさみを缶切りとして使う。I sometimes use scissors as a can opener.





肝炎の新しい治療法が研究されている。A new treatment for hepatitis is being studied.

私は肝臓の病歴がある。I have a history of liver trouble.

危機の際にも冷静さを失わず、狂気に走るのを避けることが肝要である。It is essential to keep calm in a time of crisis and avoid going haywire.








これがアメリカ人から見た日本観です。This is Japan as Americans see it.


観客は彼のホームランに興奮した。His home run excited the crowd.
私は観劇中だった。I was at the theater.
江戸時代には、観月の宴がとても人気だった。In the Edo period, moon-viewing parties were very popular.
観光ガイドは雇えますか。Is there a tour guide available?
彼の仕事は観光バスの運転手です。His job is driving a sight-seeing bus.

地元の店は観光客相手に順調な商売をしている。Local shops do good business with tourists.

ナイアガラの滝は世界有数の観光地として名高い。The Niagara Falls are famous as a world leading tourist resort.
科学は観察に基づいている。Science rests upon observation.


そのショーは観衆には楽しいものであった。The show was pleasing to the audience.
手前のガラス張りの建物は薔薇園なんです。温室になっていて、いつも薔薇を観賞できるようになってるんですよ。The glass fronted building before you is the rose garden. It's a greenhouse so you will always be able to appreciate the roses.

テレビでそのフットボールの試合を観戦するのは面白かった。Watching the football game on television was fun.

ジャンスキーが観測したのは銀河系の中心核からの波長14.6mの電波であった。What Jansky had observed was the 14.6m wavelength radio wave from the Milky Way's core.

彼は私を違った観点から見るようになった。He came to see me in a different light.
幸福の観念はきわめて抽象的だ。The idea of happiness is extremely abstract.彼女には義務の観念が無い。She has no sense of duty.もう助からないものと観念した。I gave up all hope of survival.



観覧車が一番好きです。The Ferris wheel is my favorite.

光は闇を貫く。The light penetrates the darkness.大きな川がその市を貫いて流れている。A broad river runs through the city.そのキリスト教徒は自分の信念を断固として貫く。The devout Christian persists in his belief.
矢が厚い板を貫通した。The arrow pierced the thick board.
初志を貫徹したらどうですか。Why don't you carry out what you've set out to do?
テムズ川はロンドンを貫流する川である。The Thames is a river that flows through London.
君は課長としての貫禄がないね。You don't have proper dignity as chief of the section.
ゲイツ会長、広告収入をユーザーに還元する意向表明。Bill Gates announces intent to return advertising revenue to the users.



われわれは彼の能力にかんがみて成功することは期待できない。In light of his lack of abilities we cannot expect him to succeed.

芸術の研究には立派な鑑識力が必要だ。It requires a good taste to study art.鑑識班は今日の火事の原因を特定しようとしている。Investigators are trying to pin down the cause of today's fire.
よい音楽を鑑賞することはそれほど難しいことではない。It is not so difficult to appreciate good music.
彼は宝石の鑑定には目がきく。He has a sharp eye for jewels.

彼はメアリーとトムの間に座った。He was sitting between Mary and Tom.この列車は東京と大阪の間を走ります。This train runs between Tokyo and Osaka.彼は病気の間すごい勇気を示した。He showed great courage during his illness.
鬼の居ぬ間に洗濯。When the cat is away, the mice will play.

汽車に間に合うように急げ。Hurry up in order to catch the train.これで当分は間に合うでしょう。This will do for the time being.

まもなくお会いできることを楽しみにしています。I am looking forward to seeing you soon.私は回復する間もなく別のひどい風邪にかかってしまった。I didn't have time to recover before I came down with another horrible cold.

この本は間違いだらけだ。This book is full of mistakes.
彼は答えを三つ間違えた。He gave three wrong answers.彼女は砂糖を塩と間違えた。She mistook the sugar for salt.
そのスピードを出した車は道路に飛び出した子供を、間一髪で、避けることができた。The speeding car missed the child, who ran out into the road, by only a hairsbreadth.
我々は間一髪のところで死をまぬがれた。We escaped death by a hair's breadth.


バスは１５分間隔で運転されている。There is a bus every fifteen minutes.

この建物は完成間近だ。This building is near completion.


間口も広いが奥行きも同様に深い。It's as deep as it is wide.
音楽でも演説でも、間合いはすばらしい効果をあげるものとしてしばしば利用される。In music or speaking, a pause is frequently used for dramatic effect.
日経指数は大引け間際に大きく跳ね上がりました。The Nikkei index jumped dramatically just before closing.

彼女は私の叔母のところに間借りしている。She rooms at my aunt's.
間取りも狭いし、周りもうるさいけど、住めば都なんだよ、この部屋。It's a small noisy apartment, but it's where I live and I call it home.
彼は間食の癖を身につけてしまった。He acquired the habit of snacking.



新たな間接税が強い酒類に対して課せられた。New indirect taxes were imposed on spirits.
そのクーデターの間接的な情報しか得ていない。We only have secondhand information of the coup.



間断ない物価上昇の結果、社会不安が起こるかもしれない。Social unrest may come about as a result of the endless rising of prices.

食事の間中彼は一言も言わなかった。He kept silent during the meal.


あいつはクラスでいちばんのまぬけだ。He is the dumbest kid in the class.
君と彼とはどういう間柄なのだ。What's your relation with him?



その通りは１０時を過ぎると閑散としていた。The street was deserted after ten.

彼はジョンを閑職に祭り上げた。He kicked John upstairs.
昨日、閑静な住宅街にある猫のひたいほどの売り地を見つかって、すぐ買うことに決めた。Yesterday, I found a tiny piece of land for sale in a quiet residential area and I immediately decided to buy it.




君の関する事柄ではない。That is no business of yours.彼女は動物に関する本を書いた。She wrote a book about animals.
これとあれはどういう関係があるの。How is this connected to that?



聴聞会は報道関係者を閉め出して行われました。The hearing were made off-limits to the press.

私は美術に非常な関心を抱いています。I am deeply interested in art.
私の主たる関心事はあなたの身の安全なのです。My primary concern is your safety.

その飛行機は今ごろは関西空港に当然着いているはずだ。The plane should have arrived at Kansai Airport by now.

関税申告書が必要になります。A customs declaration is required.


気温が下がると関節が痛むんだ。My joints ache when it gets cold.



それは当社の関知するところではない。It is no concern of our firm.
ジョンは関東地区、そして太郎は関西地区を担当している。John covers the Kanto area and Taro covers the Kansai area.


これ以上ここでもたついてると、後ろの第二関門からも増援が来て、挟撃されるかも知れねーんだぜ。If we hang around here any longer, there could be reinforcements coming from the second gate to take us in a pincer movement!
ゲンドウがこの件に関与していたとしても不思議ではない。It is no wonder to me that Gendou has something to do with.
この事実はお互いに関連し合っている。These facts are mutually related.





これが原因でたいていの街の浴場は困難な状態に陥った。This caused most of the local bath-houses to fall on hard times.
奴が俺をわなにはめてスキャンダルにおとしいれた。He set me up for the scandal.この無限の空間に漂う永遠の沈黙が私を恐怖に陥れる。The eternal silence of these infinite spaces terrifies me.

パリは１９４０年に陥落した。Paris fell in 1940.

韓国料理は一般的に辛い。Korean food is generally very spicy.
しかし、中国語や韓国語を話すことができると、もっとたくさんの人と考え方を共有することができるんです。However if you can speak Chinese, Korean, etc. you're able to share your way of thinking with many more people.





ジョンとキャシーは興味も性格も違う。その二人を一緒にさせようとするのは丸穴に角釘を打つようなものだ。John and Cathy have different tastes and different characters. Trying to get them together is like putting a square peg in a round hole.我々は丸一ヶ月間、ブロードウェーで出演予定です。We're booked for the whole month on Broadway.

おもってたのとまるっきり違いますねえ。It's really different from what I expected.
まるで夢を見ているようだよ。I feel as if I were dreaming.ぼくにはまるでその理由がわからない。I have no idea why it is so.彼は私をまるで他人行儀に扱う。He treats me as if I am a stranger.

より寒い日には、体を丸めたり、雪の中に穴を掘ったりする。On colder days, they curl up or dig a hole in the snow.
彼女は早口でまくしたてて、人をまるめこみます。She talks a very fast game.彼女はすべての服をスーツケースに丸め込んだ。She bundled all her dresses into the suitcase.






その兵士は丸腰の兵士を撃つことを潔しとしなかった。The soldier disdained shooting an unarmed enemy.

彼女は１課を丸ごと暗記することで満点を取った。She got full marks by memorizing the whole lesson.

先ずは憧れの作家の文章の呼吸をつかむためにひたすら筆写、丸写しをする。First, in order to get a feel for your favourite author's work, transcribe and copy in full.



すこし落ち着け吉祥、おのぼりさん丸出しだぞ。Calm down a little, Kissho, your bumpkin nature is standing out!


やつらは雄牛を丸焼きにするくらいの火をおこしていた。They had lit a fire fit to roast an ox.
消防車が到着しないうちに、その家は丸焼けになった。Before the fire engine arrived, the whole house had burnt down.




彼は丸太をのこぎりでひいて板にしている。He is sawing a log into boards.

合衆国の第１６代大統領であるアブラハム・リンカーンは、ケンタッキー州の丸太小屋で生まれた。Abraham Lincoln, the 16th president of the United States, was born in a log cabin in Kentucky.



メンツ丸つぶれだ。I have lost face completely.













この丸薬は心臓に効く。These pills act on the heart.





和子が胸をはだけて赤ん坊に乳をふくませた。Kazuko bared her breast and fed the baby.

貸借対照表にはどんなものが含まれるのでしょうか。What's included in the balance sheet?
彼の発言は含みとして何を言いたかったのですか。What was the implication of his remark?


このビタミン剤は栄養分を豊富に含んでいる。The vitamin pill contains abundant nutrition.
ウィンブルドンには、センターコートを含めて１８の芝生コートがある。Wimbledon has eighteen grass courts, including the Center Court.











ペールエールはアルコール含有量の少ないビールだ。Pale ale is a low-alcohol beer.


彼らはその船を岸にあげた。They drew the boat on the beach.
船は岸壁からしだいに遠ざかって行った。The boat moved slowly away from the quay.
そのボートは岸辺に碇を降ろした。The boat anchored near the shore.
その工場は玩具を製造している。The factory manufactures toys.


クッキーのお母さんはガンで死んだ。Cookie's mother died of cancer.

眼下の景色を見る。Survey the landscape below.

彼の友人には医者が二人いる。一人は外科医で、もう一人は眼科医だ。There are two doctors in his circle of friends, a surgeon and an ophthalmologist.
これらはみんな、人間の生来の特質によって私たちに負わされた眼界を超えるための手段である。All these are ways of exceeding the bounds imposed on us by human nature.


子どもが父親を尊敬の眼差しで見上げている。The child looks up to his father with worship in his eyes.
芸術家の眼識によると、これは価値があるそうだ。To the eye of an artist, this is valuable, I hear.





この岩は何に似ていますか。What does this rock look like?








岩石や鉱物はいろいろな面で私たちに有益である。Rocks and minerals are useful for us in many ways.

岩棚から落ちて彼は足を折った。The fall from the ledge shattered his leg.
アダムは岩登りをしている時に、落下してあしを折りました。While Adam was rock-climbing, he fell and broke his leg.






















当局は地域住民の頑強な抵抗にあった。The authorities met with unyielding opposition from the locals.大男が必ずしも頑強だとは限らない。A big man is not always robust.
彼はとても頑健だ。He is strong as a horse.
彼は性質が頑固だ。He is obstinate in disposition.
これは掛けるのにたいそう頑丈ないすだ。This is a very sturdy chair to sit in.
いや、頑張ればできるよ。Yes, he can, if he tries hard.

ヘレンはみんなにほめられて顔を赤くした。Helen blushed at their praise.露骨に嫌な顔をして、彼を睨みつけた。I glared at him with a blatant look of disapproval on my face.

彼女は犬を見ると顔を顰めた。She made a face when she saw a dog.
よくも顔をつぶしてくれたな。You really made me lose face.
彼のことはこれ以上知りません。顔を合わせれば会釈する程度の知り合いですから。I don't know any more about him. I know him, but only to say hello to.



久夫は死人のように青ざめた顔色をしていた。Hisao's face was as pale as that of a corpse.

彼は怒った顔つきで外へでてきた。He came out with an angry face.
彼は拳で私の顔面を殴った。He struck me in the face with his fist.

とりわけ人目をひいたのは、彼女の卵型の顔立ちだった。Especially remarkable was her oval face.

私の願いはパリで絵の勉強をすることです。My wish is to study painting in Paris.市長は私達の願いを聞き入れてくれた。The mayor granted our request.私の願いはかなえられた。My prayers were answered.



ピーターは、昇給を願い出た。Peter applied to his boss for a raise.
私達は平和を願う。We long for peace.彼は私の許しを願った。He asked my pardon.足元に御用心願います。Do watch your step.








あなたの願書に最近の写真を貼りなさい。Attach a recent photograph to your application form.





私達は彼の大胆な企てに舌を巻いた。We marveled at his bold attempt.
きょうこそは彼らが脱走を企てる運命の日だ。Today is the fatal day that they will attempt their escape.
彼女はそのたくらみに加わったことを否定した。She denied having taken part in the scheme.
彼は何か企んでいるように思える。I think he is planning something.
私はあなたの企画に参加する。I take part in your enterprise.
飛田課長が、太鼓判を押した企画書ならクライアントも一発ＯＫだろう。When Tobita gives a plan his seal of approval, the client accepts it at first glance.

アメリカ企業のトップは日本企業のトップに比べ何倍もの報酬をもらっている。CEO's of American corporations are paid several times their Japanese counterparts.


その会社は戦後すぐに同社を始めた何人かの企業家が保有している。The company is owned by a group of entrepreneurs who started it right after the war.








百合子は家具業界への進出を企図している。Yuriko is planning to move into the furniture business.


危うい所を助かった。I had a narrow escape.危ういところで少女は湖でおぼれそうになった。It was a close call when the little girl almost drowned in the lake.彼は今入院中で、生きられるかどうかは危うい状態だ。He is now in the hospital and his life is in the balance.
我々はあやうく凍死するところだった。We were nearly frozen to death.
火は非常に危ない。Fire is very dangerous.こんな夜更けに女の子の一人歩きは危ない。It is not safe for a girl to go out by herself so late at night.彼の命が危ない。His life is in danger.


彼は死んでいるのではないかと危ぶまれている。They fear that he may be dead.


どんな理由があっても他人に危害を加えてはいけない。You should not inflict any injury on others on any account.
我々は一大危機に直面している。We are facing a violent crisis.





彼女は危急の事態に備えた。She provided for an urgency.



トムは危険に直面して彼の勇気を示した。Tom showed his courage in the face of danger.その時になって初めて私は危険な事態に気がついたのである。Not till then did I realize the danger of the situation.




赤い光は危険信号としてよく用いられる。A red light is often used as a danger signal.
彼らはその男を社会にとって危険人物と考えた。They regarded the man as a danger to society.
医者は彼にその薬の危険性を警告した。The doctor alerted him to the riskiness of the medicine.
そこは危険地帯である。そこへは行ってはいけない。That is a danger zone; don't go there.
危険物を飲み込んだ場合、飲み込んだものによって対処法が違います。When you swallow a dangerous substance, what you need to do depends on what you swallowed.


君のお母さんは危篤だ。Your mother is in critical condition.






彼は母親の到着を喜んだ。He rejoiced at his mother's arrival.彼らは良い知らせを聞いて喜んだ。They were delighted at the good news.喜んで質問に答えましょう。I'll be happy to answer your question.
喜んでご招待に応じます。I will be very happy to accept your invitation.



私たちはロンドンに喜劇を見に行った。We went to see a comedy in London.




彼女は喜色満面だった。She was all smiles.
喜怒哀楽を見せるな。Don't let your feelings show.
いくら器だけを日本一にしても、中身が三流やったらな〜んの意味もないんちゃうの？The container may be the best in Japan, but if the contents are third class, then isn't it completely meaningless?彼は将来国家の棟梁たるべき器だ。He has the capacity to be a future leader of the nation.

私たちは内臓器官を調べるためにカエルを解剖した。We dissected a frog to examine its internal organs.
これは主婦の手間を省く便利な器具です。This is a great time-saving gadget for the housewife.



マックスは手先が器用だ。Max is clever with his fingers.
いろいろできるし、みんなから重宝されるのはいいけれど、気がついたら器用貧乏といわれないようにな。People know how handy you are to have around. You're a real jack-of-all-trades but make sure you don't turn out to be master of none.
彼女は器量の点では姉に劣らない。She is not less beautiful than her sister.


シンガポールの中央基金は年金を支給する。Singapore's Central Fund provides pensions.


その考えが彼の理論の基礎となっている。The idea underlies his theory.




この近くに軍の基地がある。There is a military base near here.

バナーと同じ、白を基調としたデザイン。Like the banner, the design was based around the colour white.
そして記念碑の基底部分には願い事が刻まれている。And a wish is engraved on the base of the statue.


２１世紀は経済力を基盤とするようになるだろう。The 21st century is going to be based on economic power.

「これは・・・」「軍手とスコップ。園芸部基本道具のひとつだよ」"This is ..." "Working glove and trowel. One of a gardening club's basic tools."






順を追って基本的なタグを覚えていこう。Let's learn the basic tags in order.
人間は基本的には善良だと私は信じている。I believe people are basically good.
くしくも、レジでの合計額は７７７円であった。Strangely, the cash register's total was 777 yen.
岩が風化して奇異な形になる。The rocks are weathered into fantastic forms.
彼は奇怪な体験を詳しく話した。He recounted his unusual experiences.









１、３、５は奇数である。One, three, and five are odd numbers.

このミステリーのトリックは、奇想天外だ。This mystery has a plot twist that's completely novel.

彼は、奇抜なアイデアを出すため、もっと保守的な同僚と何度ももめごとをおこしている。His novel ideas are time and again getting him into trouble with his more conservative colleagues.


これはとても奇妙な手紙です。This is a very strange letter.

あなたに再会できてうれしい。I am pleased to see you again.
その結果の報道に満足して彼は手をもんでうれしがっていた。He was rubbing his hands over the report of the result.



道の脇に寄せてください。Pull over to the side, please.いすをもっと火の近くに寄せなさい。Draw your chair closer to the fire.誤字・誤訳のご指摘等は下記メールアドレスよりお寄せください。Please send reports of mistypings and mistranslations to the email address below.

二人は仲間、三人は寄せ集めの群れ。Two's company, three's a crowd.
彼らは母への贈り物を買うだけの金を寄せ集めた。They scraped up enough money to buy a gift for their mother.




彼女は夫のそばにぴったり寄り添っていた。She stood close to her husband.
ぶらぶら寄り道していこうよ。Let's just wander and see where it takes us.


ちょっと寄って行きませんか。Won't you come in for a moment?

その船は横浜に寄港する。The ship will call at Yokohama.
彼は新聞に何か寄稿しようと思った。He purposed writing something for the paper.


彼はまもなく寄宿舎の生活にも慣れ、友人も２・３人できました。He soon got accustomed to dormitory life and made two or three friends.






軍縮は必ずや平和に寄与する。Disarmament is sure to make for peace.









これが彼のたった一つの希望であった。This was his one and only hope.

そのクラブの入会希望者が多い。Admission to the club is eagerly sought.

白いガラスに、幾色かの色ガラスが入り、かわいらしい印象に仕上がりました。To the white glass, I added glass of various colours, producing a pretty feel.いく層もの卸業者の存在が特色である日本の流通機構は、複雑でコストもかかる。The Japanese distribution system, characterized by layers of wholesale, is complex and costly.
いいえ、おもちゃがいくつあるかじゃなくて、鍵がいくつあるかなのよ。No, not how many toys, how many keys?あなたのお父さんはおいくつですか。How old is your father?
いくつかの点で私は彼女が気に入らない。I don't like her in some ways.
入場料はいくらですか。How much is the entrance fee?所持金はいくらありますか。How much money do you have with you?このハンカチはいくらですか。How much is this handkerchief?
彼女は非常の場合に備えていくらか貯金した。She put by some money for a rainy day.クリスマスが近づくにつれて景気はいくらか回復した。With the approach of Christmas, business improved somewhat.
明日幾何の試験があります。We're having an examination in geometry tomorrow.
ギリシャ人たちは幾何学の理論的原形を作った。The Greeks made theoretical models of geometry.
一人の個人の中に幾千ものことなった人間がいる。Within every man are thousands.
我々は幾多の困難を克服しなければならない。We have to cope with hosts of difficulties.

この問題は私にとっては幾分難しい。This problem is difficult for me to some degree.そのケーキは幾分レモンの味がした。There was some taste of lemon in the cake.
考えるだけでも忌まわしい。The very thought is abhorrent to me.







その液から溶剤を揮発させる。残るのは、香り成分と植物ワックスの塊。Vaporise the solvent from the liquid. What's left is the perfume component and a lump of vegetable wax.
これらの溶剤は、揮発性のため、使用時に蒸発し大気に放出されている。These solvents, due to their volatility, evaporate into the atmosphere when used.



重荷で机がまた軋んだ。The loaded desk groaned again.

君の言っていることは机上の空論にすぎないよ。What you are saying is nothing but building a castle in the air.
彼は旗を上下に動かした。He moved the flags up and down.
敵の旗艦を撃破しました！We've destroyed the enemy flagship!

旗色が悪いからこの辺でやめよう。The odds are against me, so I think I'll quit now.



バス停に着いた時、バスはすでに出ていた。The bus had already left when I got to the bus stop.すでに言ってあるように、これもあなたの仕事のうちだ。This is also part of your work, as I told you before.

すんでのところで車にはねられるところだった。I was nearly hit by a car.

既婚女性が家や夫や子供たちの面倒を見ることがどんなことか、彼女は知っていた。She knew what it was like for married women to look after houses, husbands and children.
彼は既婚者なのだから、将来のことを考えなければならない。As he is a married man, he has to think of the future.



ドイツの分割は１９９０年まで既成事実と考えられていた。The division of Germany was considered a given until 1989.



どんなに優雅で堂々とした既存のビルも、今や、その怪物のわきでは、ちょっと滑稽にさえ見えるほど痛ましいまでに小さくなってしまうだろう。Even the most graceful and imposing existing buildings may now be so sadly diminished as to seem slightly ridiculous beside the monster.
あなたと私の間では、リサ、私がニックを好きでないのは既知の事でしょう。Between you and me, Lisa, we know that I simply don't like Nick.







経済は景気後退期に入った。The economy has entered a recession.
治るのにどのくらいの期間がかかりますか。How long will it take to get well?
すべてのレポートは期限を守って提出されなければならない。All essays must be handed in on time.
とにかく万事うまくいくように期待しよう。Let's hope for the best anyway.

すべて期待どおりになった。Everything fell out as I expected.

お支払いの期日を二ヶ月間延長していただけませんでしょうか。May we therefore ask you for a two months' extension of credit?
期末レポートははかどってますか。How is your term paper coming along?
やっと期末試験が終わった。At last, the end-of-term exams are over.
若い棋士が多少、尊大な感じになるのはよくあることで、 そういうことは将棋界に限った話ではないでしょう。It often happens that young shogi players become a little self-important, but I don't think that's something limited to the shogi world.
将棋の棋譜には著作権があるのか、といったことはいろいろなところで議論されています。The question "Do records of shogi games have copyright?" has been discussed in many places.

いざ投票という時、彼は棄権した。When it was time to vote, he abstained.








私の祖母ははたを織るのが好きだ。My grandmother likes to weave things.



またの機会にしましょう。Let's make it some other time.
僕は今日この機械を試験するつもりです。I am going to put this machine to the test today.血圧計が大切な検査器械です。The sphygmomanometer is an important diagnostic instrument.





この三つの機関とは国際通貨基金、国際復興開発銀行、関税・貿易一般協定である。The three organizations are the International Monetary Fund, the International Bank for Reconstruction and Development, and the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade.
機関車は長い貨物車の列を引っ張って走っていた。The locomotive was pulling a long line of freight cars.
彼は機関銃を持って侵略者たちを寄せ付けなかった。He kept the invaders at bay with a machine gun.
ディスプレイはモニタともいい、コンピュータなどの機器から出力される静止画または動画の映像信号を表示する機器である。A display, aka monitor, is an appliance that displays video signal of still images and moving pictures produced by a computer or similar device.


彼は他人の機嫌を損ねないように気をつけている。He is chary of offending people.
どこか機構が悪いに違いない。Something must be wrong with the machinery.ＷＨＯとは世界保健機構を表す。WHO stands for World Health Organization.



性能のよさとデザインの優美さが両々相まって本機種の声価を高めてきた。The high performance and the elegant design of this model have combined to give it a high reputation.
敵は機首を反転して我々の方向に向けた。The enemy's plane suddenly turned toward us.


機体が揺れ始めて乗客は不安になった。Passengers became nervous when the plane began to vibrate.

機長は気象訓示を受ける為に気象室へ行く。The captain will go to the meteorological office to get a weather briefing.
彼女は機転を大いにきかせてきわどい質問をかわした。She showed a great deal of wit in handling the delicate question.




機動隊が現場に到着した。The riot police arrived on the scene.

これは機内に持ち込めますか。Can I carry this on the plane?
こんな余計な機能なんでつけたんだろう。What did they add this needless function for?


女心の機微を存分に楽しめるドラマである。It's a drama where you can enjoy the delicate workings of a woman's mind.
警察は力があって、動作が機敏でなければならない。A policeman should be strong and quick in action.
あそこの会社から技術情報をもらうには、まず機密保持契約を結ばなければいけない。To get technical information from that company, we first have to sign a non-disclosure agreement.





けがを治療してもらったトラは、村人たちの手で無事、保護区に帰された。The tiger, having had its wounds treated, was returned by the villagers to the animal sanctuary without incident.
どうして帰りがこんなに遅くなったの。Why did you come home so late?
彼女は帰り道がわからなかった。She could not find her way back.
恋人よ、我に帰れ。Lover, come back to me.１１時を過ぎると、お客たちは三々五々帰り始めた。After 11 o'clock the guests began to leave by twos and threes.

２番目の議論は日本の外国人労働者の帰化に関するものである。The second argument deals with the naturalization of foreign workers in Japan.
そのうち３機はまだ帰還の報告はない。Three of the planes have not yet reported home.


我がチームは大勝利を収めて帰国した。Our team came home in triumph.
帰国子女があの組の中に溶け込むのは難しいよ。It's difficult for returnees to blend in with that class.



今夜帰省されるのですね。Oh, you're going home tonight!


乙が受託業務の実施により得た成果は、甲乙双方に帰属するものとする。Any result obtained through the execution of the Commissioned Business shall belong to each party hereto.
何が彼を帰宅する気にさせたのか。What tempted him to come home?

女事務員が銀行からの帰途、１０万円入った封筒を奪われた。An office girl was robbed of an envelope containing 100,000 yen on her way back from the bank.




帰路の航空券を見せてください。Could you show me your return ticket?

彼は年はとっているが気は若い。Though he is old, he has a youthful spirit.彼は親切というよりむしろ気がやさしい。He is more gentle than kind.もう待つ気が無くなった。I don't feel like waiting any longer.
あの女の子に気があるのかい？Are you interested in that girl?

こんな身なりで外出するのは気が引ける。I'm ashamed to go out dressed like this.
ハムレットはまるで気が狂ったかのようにふるまう。Hamlet acts as if he were insane.
私はきっと彼と気が合うと思います。私たちは同じ県の出身だから。I am sure I'll get along with him because we are from the same prefecture.
気が済むまでやってみたら。You should continue until you're satisfied.
やらなくてはならないことが多かったので、私は気が重い。I feel depressed because there were a lot of things I had to do.

海外に行くと、気が大きくなって思わず使いすぎちゃうんだよね。When you travel abroad, you start to feel very expansive, and it's easy to overspend in a mood like that.
彼女は気が短いのが玉にきずだ。A quick temper is the only defect in her character.
なぜ彼は気が変わったのか。What made him change his mind?
あいつは気が利くんだ。He is smart.ワインを冷やしておいてくれたとは気が利いてるね。How thoughtful of you to have chilled some wine for us.
ごめんね今は気が立っているからやめようね。Sorry, he's over excited now, so let's leave it.
ある意味では、丁寧語は気さくな雰囲気を壊す。Polite language, in a sense, spoils a casual atmosphere.
彼らは夫婦きどりだ。They pretend to be man and wife.

気になる男性の性欲を刺激するにはどうすればよいのでしょうか？What should I do to arouse desire in the man I'm interested in?
他人のいうことを気にかけるな。Don't worry about what others say.
あの音楽は彼の気にさわる。That music gets on his nerves.
何がそんなに気にくわないのですか。What makes you so dissatisfied?
いくつかの点で私は彼女が気に入らない。I don't like her in some ways.
気のせいだよ。It's just your imagination.

私たちはその老夫婦を気の毒に思った。We were sorry for the old couple.
気の利いたことが言いたいけれどいえないなあ。I wish I could think of something to say.

自分をかまってくれる人がいないと知って彼女は気を悪くした。She was hurt to find that nobody took any notice of her.

彼には気を許すな。Be on your guard against him.
クサクサすることばっかりだけど、気を取り直して頑張っていきましょう！We've been moping around too much. It's time to pull ourselves together and keep trying.

漢字を書くときは点やはらいに気をつけて、なるべく早くていねいに書きましょう。When drawing kanji be careful of dots and sweeps, write as carefully and quickly as possible.
飛行機でお酒飲むと、気圧のせいか酔いやすい。Maybe it's the low air pressure that means you get drunk more easily on planes.
気圧計の数値が下がっている。雨になりそうだな。The barometer is falling. It is going to rain.
デルバートは気違いだと思うよ。I think that Delbert is crazy.
気宇壮大な計画もいいけれど、まずは自分の足元を固めることから始めてほしいよ。It's fine to make grandiose plans, but I'd like you to start with what you have on your plate.



気温が下がると関節が痛むんだ。My joints ache when it gets cold.





ほんの気楽なパーティーだった。It was only an informal party.
私は将来のことが気がかりだ。I am anxious about the future.


彼女と一緒にいると気詰まりだ。I feel ill at ease in her company.


気球が空に浮かんでいた。A balloon was floating in the air.

気苦労で彼は急にふけた。Care aged him quickly.
私たちの惑星は飛ぶ鳥の気軽さで宇宙を動いている。Our planet moves in space with the lightness of a bird in flight.


彼の声には優しい気づかいが満ちていた。His voice was full of tender concern.
私たちは彼女の安否をきづかった。We felt anxious for her safety.

その国は気候が温和だ。That country has a mild climate.



人間の魂は何か気高いものにあこがれる。The human soul longs for something noble.
彼にはその法案に反対の発言をする気骨があるだろうか。Will he have the backbone to speak out against the bill?
その木の木陰で寝るのは気持ちいい。It is pleasant to sleep under the tree.何杯か飲むと、その男は酔って気持ちよくなった。After a couple of drinks, the guy was feeling no pain.
成功不成功は気質に左右されることが多い。Success often depends on one's temperament.
彼は彼女の前で気取って見せた。He put on airs in her presence.
環境汚染は、異常な気象状況を引き起こしている。Environmental pollution is causing abnormal weather conditions.


気象庁は今晩雨が降ると言っている。The weather bureau says it will rain tonight.
彼らは彼のきざな話し方を笑った。They laughed at the affectations in his speech.

このところあまり仕事に気乗りがしない。I don't much feel like working these days.


ツタウルシにかぶれました。I got a rash from poison ivy.

すっかり春奈のお天気モードのおかげで香の気勢が殺げているな。Thanks to Haruna's "weather mode" Kaori's fervour was greatly dampened.
彼の気性は手に負えない。He has an uncontrollable temper.
私の父の気晴らしはスカイダイビングをすることです。My dad's pastime is skydiving.
その暑さで気絶して、気がついたら救命いかだの中にいた。I fainted from the heat, and when I came to, I was in a life raft.
金はないが気前はよい。Poor as he is, he is generous.
気前のよきより、まず至当たれ。Be just before you are generous.



その気体は悪臭を放つ。This gas gives off a bad smell.

気長に構える必要があります。You have to be patient.


秋の気配が感じられた。There was a hint of fall in the air.
彼の演説は気迫に欠けていた。His speech was lacking in soul.

その町を色にたとえていうと、ワインレッドかな、こう、なんか気品があって、落ち着くのよね。If that city were a color, it would be a color with a quiet sort of dignity ... wine red, say.
私は気まずい思いで体がほてった。I was feverish with embarrassment.
会社気付で彼にこの小包を送ってください。Send this parcel to him in care of his company.


とても気分がリフレッシュされる。I feel like a brand new person.
あの人って本当に気分屋ね。私、ついていけない。He's so moody I have trouble keeping up with him.
気分転換に散歩しよう。Let's take a walk for a change.


その事件には何となく気味の悪いところがあった。There was something weird about the incident.
これらの容器は気密になっている。These containers are airtight.

なるほど彼女は美人ではないが、気立てがよい。She is not beautiful, to be sure, but she is good-natured.
ただ今気流の関係で揺れております。We are currently experiencing some turbulence.
雨のために彼らは気力をそがれた。The rain dampened their spirits.
直してある古い汽車に乗ることも出来ます。You can also ride on an old, restored, steam train.汽車はまだ着きません。The train has not arrived yet.


その汽船は香港に立ち寄った。The liner called at Hong Kong.
汽車の汽笛で夜明けに目を覚まされた。We were roused at daybreak by the whistle of a train.

彼女はひざまずいて神に祈りをささげた。She prayed to God on her knees.
早くよくなられるように祈っています。I hope you'll get well soon.






この季節は卵が安い。Eggs are cheap this season.

その会社は社員を季節的に採用する。The company employs new staff seasonally.

古代において塩は希少で貴重な商品であった。Salt was a rare and costly commodity in ancient times.

紀元２０２０年までには、この市の人口は倍増しているだろう。By the year 2020, the population of our city will have doubled.
フォークが食事用として一般に使われ始めたのは、紀元後１０世紀のことであった。The general use of forks for eating started in the tenth century A.D.
まずやって来たのはケルト族で、紀元前６００年のことでした。First came the Celts in 600 B.C.







交通規制には従わないといけない。We should obey the traffic rules.
この規則はあなたにも当てはまる。This rule applies to you, too.

規則正しく運動するのは良い事だと思う。I believe in exercising regularly.
規則的な運動は健康によい。Regular exercise is beneficial to good health.
この犯罪に対して法律はある罰則が規定されている。The law prescribes certain penalties for this offence.


我々のクラスは規模が大きくなった。Our class has increased in size.

新しい規約は全会一致で承認された。The new regulations were confirmed by the full committee.
この学校は規律がやや緩やかだ。Discipline is rather mild at this school.生徒の中には規律を守るのが大変なものもいる。Some pupils find it difficult to follow the rules.
その回想記は父に対する深い尊敬に満ち溢れている。The memoir breathes the deepest respect for his father.
最新の報告書には、全世界で密輸されているコカインの９０％が海路で運ばれており、そのほとんどがスピードボートによるものだと記されている。In the latest report, it is written that 90% of all the cocaine smuggled in the world is transported by sea, and most of that by speedboat.
私はその日の記憶を呼び覚まそうとした。I tried to call on my memories of that day.




＆という記号は、ａｎｄを指す。The sign '&' stands for 'and'.

ハーブ、レオン・トーマス著、ハーバルライフ社よりという名前を記載してください。Just make sure that credit is given: "from The Herbs, by Leon Thomas, published by Herbal Life."
ニュース記事を書くのが彼の仕事だ。Writing news stories is his job.
記者は話されたことはすべて書き留めた。The reporter took down everything that was said.
今日遅くに大統領は記者会見を開く。The president will hold a press conference later today.
記者団は大臣を質問攻めにした。The press besieged the minister with questions.
この２つのエスニック・グループの態度の相違点を記述するだけでは十分ではない。It is not sufficient to describe the differences in attitude between these two ethnic groups.




この紙に記入するのを手伝ってください。Please help me fill out this form.
今日の式典は、わが校の100周年を記念するものです。Today's ceremony marks the 100th anniversary of our school.アメリカ旅行のよい記念になります。This will be a good souvenir of my trip around the United States.

記念式典は閉会の辞で幕を閉じた。The commemorative ceremony ended with the closing address.

今日は私達の記念日なので、夕御飯もスペシャルでいこう。Today is our anniversary so let's make this a special dinner.
この記念碑は祖国に命を捧げた兵士を祭っている。This monument is dedicated to the soldiers who gave their lives to their country.



持ち物すべてに記名してください。Please put their name on everything they take with them.
今年になってやっとこれらの記録がみんなに利用できるようになった。It was not until this year that these documents were made available to the public.無言が記録されたためしはない。No silence was ever written down.日本の貿易黒字は史上最高を記録しました。Japan's trade surplus soared to a record high.
昨夜エイズの記録映画を見て、その恐ろしさがしみじみ分かった。The danger of AIDS came home to me when I saw a documentary film on it last night.





当社には貴社のシステムに対するニーズがありません。Your system isn't suited to our company's needs.
あれは貴重な経験だった。That was a valuable experience.
この貴重品を預かってもらえますか。Could you hold these valuables?

彼は貴族の出である。He springs from a noble family.


貴殿の娘さんは麻薬漬けです。Your daughter's on drugs.

彼女には貴婦人の風格がある。She has the air of being a lady.

毎晩十分な睡眠をとれば、あなたはずっと気分がよくなるだろう。If you get enough rest every night, you'll feel much better.ねえあなたたち行かないで。Don't go, dears.
何だ、貴様は。庇い立てする気か。What now, you wretch? You thinking of protecting her?
職業に貴賎をつけちゃいけないよ〜。You can't go putting your values on people's work!
６時ごろ起きた。I got up at about six.お子さんはまだ起きているのですか。Is the kid still up?「事故が起きれば、すぐにわかるよ」と彼は言う。"If there is an accident," he says, "they will know right away."
これを見ると、彼は起き上がってでていった。At this, he got up and went out.
わたしたちはその木を起こした。We got the tree up.病気の子供はベッドの上で体を起こした。The sick child sat up in bed.彼は火事だと言って僕を揺すって起こした。He shook me awake, shouting, "A fire!"
そのようなことが再び起こりうるだろうか。Can such a thing happen again?
あとで起こったことはなお悪かった。What followed was still worse.


この失敗は私の間違った判断に起因する。This fault results from my wrong decision.







松井、起死回生の逆転満塁サヨナラホームラン！Matsui pulled the Giants back from the brink with a grand slam that gave them a come-from-behind victory.

６時起床、７時家を出る。Got up at six, and left home at seven.

地方検事は彼を盗みと殺人罪で起訴した。The district attorney indicted him for theft and murder.



パソコンが起動しなくなりました。My computer won't start up anymore.





最終回にピンチヒッターが起用された。A pinch hitter was brought into action in the last inning.
名前を呼ばれたら起立しなさい。Stand up when your name is called.


その衛星は地球の軌道を１０周した。The satellite made 10 orbits of the earth.
その軍団は戦闘中多くの輝かしい作戦に従事した。The army was involved in a number of brilliant actions during the battle.

おまえの全てが俺の中で輝きを放ち続ける。All of you in my memory is still shining in my heart.
空には太陽が輝いています。The sun is shining in the sky.




何千という人が飢えで死んだ。Thousands of people died of hunger.
彼は飢えた者に食を与えた。He furnished food to the hungry.
これらの国では飢餓が普通のことである。In these countries hunger is the rule.

馬上の騎士をみてごらん。Look at that knight on the horse.


崖から落ちた騎手も馬もまもなく救助された。The man and his horse that fell off the cliff were soon rescued.





私達は昔鬼ごっこのような遊びをよくした。We used to play games like tag.





ある日、彼は弱いカメを助けた。One day he helped a weak turtle.





耐震性の悪い建物に亀裂が生じることもある。Also cracks may form in buildings that aren't Earthquake proof.
それは贋の真珠にすぎない。It is merely an imitation pearl.
彼の言葉には偽りが無い。He is sincere in what he says.



彼は年齢を偽った。He lied about his age.
















偽善とは悪徳が徳に対して払う忠順の誓いである。Hypocrisy is the homage that vice pays to virtue.
我々の睡眠中は偽善者ではない。We are not hypocrites in our sleep.
その文書は本物でも偽造されたものでもない。The document is neither genuine nor forged.








一般人を避けるため、その映画スターは偽名でホテルにチェックインした。In order to elude the eager public, the movie star checked into the hotel under a false name.


この儀式は幾世代にもわたって伝わってきた。This ceremony has been handed down from generation to generation.

















あなたに頼んでもよろしいですか。May I request a favour of you?
ご家族の皆さんによろしく。Give my love to your family.










彼はいくつかの戯曲を韻文で書いた。He wrote several plays in verse.






柔道では力より技のほうが大切である。In judo, technique is more important than strength.
この時計会社の優れた技巧は群を抜いている。The quality of craftsmanship in this clock company is unsurpassed.
トムは電気技師です。Tom is an electrical engineer.

私は彼の運転の技術は素晴らしいと思う。I admire his skill at driving.


オープンソースは技術革新をドライブするエンジンである。Open source is the engine that drives technological innovation.
クライブは電子工学の技術者になりたい。Clive wants to be an electronic engineer.


あなたはその技術的な問題をいつ片づけたのですか。When did you get through with your engineering problem?


この講座では応急手当の基本的な技能を教えます。This course teaches basic skills in first aid.
彼は絵画の技法を完成させた。He brought the art of painting to perfection.
私にはその仕事をするだけの技量がない。I'm not equal to doing the task.











擬声語的表現については、ホピ語に興味深い例がある。As to onomatopoetic expressions, we find interesting examples in Hopi.




私をあざむこうとしてもむだです。It is no use trying to deceive me.


数千人がこの病気の犠牲になった。Thousands of people became victims of this disease.
戦争は多くの犠牲者を出して終結した。The war ended with many victims.


それで疑いをさしはさむ余地はなくなる。That leaves no room for doubt.
田舎の人々は外部の人に対して昔から疑い深い。Country people are traditionally suspicious of strangers.
僕の言葉をまだ疑っているんですか。Are you still in doubt about what I have said?

彼が時間どおり来るかどうかは疑わしいと思う。I doubt if he will come on time.






彼は、だまされてばかりいて、疑心暗鬼になっている。He has a lot of fear and doubt because people are always fooling him.

案の定、彼は疑念を抱いていた。Sure enough, he entertained doubts.
何か疑問があったら彼にお尋ねください。Ask him if you have any doubt.


文を書くときには、ふつう大文字で始め、ピリオド（.）、または感嘆符（!）、疑問符（?）、で終わる。When writing a sentence, generally you start with a capital letter and finish with a period (.), an exclamation mark (!), or a question mark (?).
このような名詞句を隠れ疑問文（concealed　question）といいます。This type of noun phrase is called a "concealed question".
この種の事件はよく疑惑を生む。Events of that type generally arouse suspicion.








義兄は些細なことですぐ怒り出す。My brother-in-law is ready to lose his temper at trifles.
兄が急逝したのは２年前、義姉は一人兄の遺した小さな宝飾店を健気に守ってきた。Since my brother died suddenly two years ago, my sister-in-law has valiantly kept going the small jewellery store he left her.




まさか惚れたんですか。認めん、認めんぞ。あの男を義弟になるなんて、僕は絶対いやです！You haven't fallen in love, have you!? I won't have it! Having that man become my brother-in-law; I absolutely hate that!


数年前の母の日に、義母にロケットをプレゼントしました。A few years ago, on Mother's Day, I gave my stepmother a locket as a present.

このような義務があるなんて知らなかった。I never knew about such a duty.
その学者は、いわゆる義務教育は役に立たないものだと考えている。The scholar regards so-called compulsory education as useless.
義理だけの拍手をもらう。It was just polite applause.

１匹のキリギリスと多くのアリが野原に住んでいた。A grasshopper and many ants lived in a field.





この議案は我々の政策に合っている。This measure is in accord with our policy.
その議員は政治資金に関する法案を提出したが通らなかった。The member of the Diet brought in a bill on political contribution, but it didn't pass.

議会はさいごにけんかになった。The argument ended in a fight.
その条項は、議決はすべて過半数をもって成立すると規定している。The clause provides that all decisions shall be made by majority vote.


仮の議事内容を送付しました。Attached is the tentative agenda.

この議事録に関して、訂正、追加がありましたらお願いします。I welcome any corrections or additions to these minutes.

ニュースによれば、午後５時現在で連立与党が７２議席を確保している。According to the news report, the ruling coalition has secured 72 seats as of 5 p.m.
議題を変えてみたらどうだろう。Suppose we change the subject.
私たちはウッド氏を議長に任命した。We appointed Mr Wood chairman.

その議論は穴だらけだ。The argument is full of holes.


彼は砂を手いっぱいにすくいあげた。He scooped up sand by the handful.

菊はよい香りがする。Chrysanthemums smell sweet.










その吉報は大変すばやく村中に広がった。The good news spread through the village quickly.

若い男は急いで立ち上がり、二、三の言葉をどもってたちまち行ってしまった。The young man got up hurriedly, stammered a few words and in a moment was gone.


我がチームは全敗を喫した。Our team lost all its games.
ここでの喫煙は許可されていません。Smoking is not permitted here.
激論の後、喫煙者に喫煙コーナーでの喫煙を許す妥協案が生まれた。The compromise which permits a smoker to smoke in the smoking corner was born after heated discussion.


私たちは喫茶店で昼食をとった。We ate lunch in a coffee lounge.



のどが詰まった感じです。My throat feels clogged up.

どの電車も通勤者でぎゅうぎゅう詰めだった。The trains were jammed with commuters.最後の詰めを怠ったばかりに、画竜点睛を欠くはめになってしまったね。You kept putting off working on the fine details on this project so it ended up lacking the finishing touches.
この穴を何かで詰めなくては。We've got to fill this hole with something.このブラウスをつめていただけますか。Could I have this blouse taken in, please?

検察官が容疑者に詰め寄った。The prosecutors pressed the suspect for an answer.

彼はリンゴを詰め込んだ袋を持っていた。He carried a bag full of apples.
世の中をなじる者は世の中からなじられる。He who rebukes the world is rebuked by the world.
どうかしたのと彼女は詰問した。"What's the matter with you?" she demanded.


高望みをするとかえって損をする。You may go farther and fare worse.
議長はその提案を却下した。The chairman rejected the proposal.
夕食にお客を招いていますか。Do you have guests for dinner?春先だから客もあまりいませんでした。It was early spring, so there weren't many customers.



空港には数百台のタクシーがいて、皆客引きしていた。There were hundreds of taxis at the airport, all touting for business.


すべての実験には実験環境の整備と、まったく客観的な態度が必要だった。Every experiment required a protected environment and an entirely objective frame of mind.
この書斎は客間兼用だ。I also use this study for receiving guests.

乗客が客室で眠っていたときに船は巨大な氷山と衝突した。The passengers were asleep in their cabins when the ship hit a huge iceberg.
私は席を見つけるために列車の客車の中を歩いた。I walked through the cars of the train to find a seat.

このお庭の方にね。縁台を出して客席を増やしたいんです。こんな感じに。In the garden, you know. I'd like to put out benches and increase the customer seating. Like this ...
豪華客船が港に入った。A luxury liner arrived in the harbor.
主体・客体さえ訳せればあとはそこまで難しくないです。If you can translate the subject and object then after that it isn't so difficult.

脚韻と平仄が漢詩の基本的ルールとなっています。Rhyme and meter form the essential rules of Chinese poetry.

この劇は小説から脚色したものです。This play was adapted from the novel.

５ページ脚注を参照してください。See the footnote on page 5.


脚本を書いていて、行き詰まった時はどうする？What do you do when you get writer's block while writing a script?
いつもは脚立を使ってるんですけど、・・・揺れて怖くて・・・だから押さえていて欲しいんです。I always use the steps, but...it's scary how they wobble...so I'd like you to hold them steady.

独裁者は人々を虐げた。The dictator oppressed the people.
将軍は捕虜全員の虐殺を命じた。The general ordered the massacre of all war prisoners.

彼は幼児虐待で罰せられた。He was punished for child abuse.
夫の方が殴ったと彼女は言っているが、実はその逆だった。She said that her husband hit her, but in fact it was the other way around.
その晩私はテーブルの上で逆さにしたコーヒーカップの下にチップを置いて出た。That evening I left my tip under a coffee cup, which I left upside down on the table.
先輩は、嫌味なくらいの完璧超人でしたからね。だから逆にその「癖」は先輩の可愛げ・・・というか、チャームポイントでしたよ。You were always a perfect 'superhuman' to an infuriating extent, and so that 'habit' was actually one of your cute, or rather charming, attributes.
彼は世の風潮に逆らう。He is swimming against the tide.
逆境に直面しても彼女はにこにこしている。She carries on smiling even in the face of adversity.
そんなことをしたら逆効果になる。If you do that, it will only bring about a contrary effect.
この政府はまさしく時代に逆行している。This government is really putting the clock back.



先回は逆子でした。Last time I had a breech delivery.
パックマンが、ある条件を満たすと追ってくるモンスターを逆襲して食べることができる。Pac-Man, when a certain condition is reached, can counter attack and eat the monsters chasing him.
彼は怒りで逆上していた。He was beside himself with rage.



「急げば急ぐほど遅くなる」は逆説である。More haste, less speed is a paradox.


形勢は逆転した。Now the shoe is on the other foot.
彼の言うことすべてが、私の神経を逆なでするのです。Everything he says rubs me the wrong way.






逆立ちをした時に首がガクンとなりました。My neck snapped when I did a headstand.
幽霊を見た時、私はとても恐くて頭髪がさかだった。When I saw the ghost, I was so frightened that my hair stood on end.




飛行機から見ると、小さな丘陵は平地のように見える。Small hills look flat from an airplane.

驕る平家は久しからず。Pride will have a fall.
久しく彼に会わない。I haven't seen him for a long time.
久しぶりに彼は帰ってきた。After a long absence he came back.ええ、このところ野宿ばかりだったものだから、久しぶりにゆっくり出来ました。ありがとう。Yes, thanks. Recently I've been roughing it so I was able to get a proper sleep for the first time in a while.
やあビル、随分久しぶりだね。I haven't seen you for a long time, Bill.








お互い仇同士だ。They are bitter enemies.



ここへ来るといつも心が休まります。Whenever I come here, I feel at ease.
１０時４０分から１１時まで休み時間です。We have a break from 10:40 to 11:00.今度の休みはどこへ行くの？Where are you going on your vacation?
冗談も休み休みにしてよ。Don't pull my leg!



しかし、この少年達は、ウッドさんの農場で休み中を過ごしました。But the boys spent all their holidays on Mr Wood's farm.
彼はよく会合を休む。He often absents himself from meetings.彼はしばらくの間休んだ。He rested for a while.父はまだ休んでいる。Father is still in bed.
ちょっと手を休めて気持ちを和らげれば、肩のストレスや緊張感がとれるよ。If you stop and relax, this will relieve the tension and stress in your shoulders.


私は休暇で出かけていました。I was out of town on vacation.


議会は休会になりました。Congress went into recess.





移転にともない５月３０日、３１日は休業いたします。Due to our office moving, we will be closed from May 30 to 31.
キリスト教国では日曜日は休業日である。Sunday is a holiday in Christian countries.
休憩してコーヒーを飲もう。Let's take a break for coffee.
学生たちは今休憩時間中です。The students are having a recess now.


休校は大雪のためであった。The closing of school was due to the heavy snow.

この授業は明日休講です。This lesson is cancelled tomorrow.

こちらのレジは今休止中なんですよ。This register is out of commission.








彼らは休戦条件で合意した。They agreed on cease-fire terms.




私たちは昼は働き、夜は休息する。We work by day and rest by night.








クリスマスは特別な休日だ。Christmas is a special holiday.





医者は彼に休養するように命令した。His doctor ordered him to rest.


人間の力は自然に及ばない。Nature is beyond mortal control.
このような犯罪は罰金および投獄又はそのいずれかで罰せられる。Such an offence is punished by a fine and/or imprisonment.
政府は及び腰と言われないようなしっかりとした対応を見せてほしい。I'd like the government to respond resolutely so as to not end up looking timid.

その地震で広範囲に及ぶ被害がでた。The earthquake caused widespread damage.その問題は私の力の及ぶところではなかった。The problem was beyond my reach.彼は父親には及ばない。He is not equal to his father.
あなたに被害を及ぼそうなどとは夢にも思いませんでした。Little did I dream of doing you any harm.
彼は外務大臣としてはまず及第といえる。I think he gets a passing mark as Foreign Minister.

及第点よ。これぐらい大したことないわ。It's passable. Nothing out of the ordinary.

エアコンが空気を充分吸い込んでいない。The air-conditioner isn't taking in enough air.スポンジは水を吸い込む。A sponge absorbs water.
この吸い取り紙はインクをよく吸い取る。This blotting paper absorbs ink well.

教室でどうどうとタバコをすう高校生たちとそれを注意できない教師たちは罰を受けることになります。High school students who flagrantly smoke in class and the teachers who can't caution them will be punished.この紙はインクを吸わない。This paper does not absorb ink.




吸血鬼伝説はバルカン地方に流布している。Legends of vampires flourish in the Balkans.

この布は水をよく吸収する。This cloth absorbs water well.
インキ補充瓶のキャップを外し、スポイトでインキを吸い上げ、マーカーの吸収体へ適量、滴下してください。Remove the cap from the ink refill bottle, fill the dropper with ink, and drip an appropriate amount onto the marker's core.











シェークスピアの時代に、つまり１６世紀に、テニスはイギリスの宮廷でとても人気があった。In Shakespeare's time, in the sixteenth century, tennis was very popular at the English court.
宮殿は物々しい警戒ぶりだった。The palace was heavily guarded.



猫は背を弓なりに曲げた。The cat arched its back.


トムは高校生の時、弓道部に入ってたんだよ。Tom was in the kyudo club when he was in high school.

事態は急を要するので一刻も待てないと彼は言った。He said that the matter was urgent, and that there was not a moment to lose.屋根にいく階段は狭くて急でくらいです。The staircase leading to the rooftop is narrow, steep, and dark.この川の流れは急だ。The current of this river is rapid.

急かしたくはないけど、次のバスに乗ろう。I don't want to rush you, but let's try to catch the next bus.
そういらいらするなよ。急がば回れって言うだろ。Don't get so irritated. Rushing things will cost you more time in the end.


父はついてくるように私をせきたてた。My father urged me to go with him.
お急ぎでなければ、もう少しいてください。If you are not in a hurry, please stay a little longer.

ニックはバスに間に合うように急いだ。Nick hurried to catch the bus.

急患で診ていただきたいのですが。I need medical help.
その党は急激にのびた。The party gained ground rapidly.
彼らは事故の現場へ急行した。They made for the scene of the accident.急行の料金は幾らですか。How much is the express?
急行に乗るには、普通券に加えて急行券を買う必要がある。To take an express train, we have to get an express ticket in addition to an ordinary ticket.
ワシは獲物めがけて急降下した。The eagle dived at its prey.

彼女の急死で私は一時何も考えられなかった。I was numbed by her sudden death.
彼らは夜明けに敵を急襲した。They surprised the enemy at dawn.
急所を除くすべての攻撃を認める。I'm allowing all attacks except on vital organs.
彼女は人気が急上昇の歌手だ。She is a singer whose reputation is growing fast.





「どうだった？」「急性虫垂炎だって」"How did it go?" "They said it was acute appendicitis."
兄が急逝したのは２年前、義姉は一人兄の遺した小さな宝飾店を健気に守ってきた。Since my brother died suddenly two years ago, my sister-in-law has valiantly kept going the small jewellery store he left her.


被災地に救援物資が急送された。Relief supplies were raced to the disaster area.
７月の工業生産は急増した。Industrial production rose sharply in July.

コンピューターは急速な進化を遂げた。Computers have made rapid progress.
その車は急停車した。The car came to an abrupt stop.

円の価値が急騰した。The value of the yen has soared.


急病のために彼はそこへ行くことができなかった。A sudden illness prevented him from going there.
事態は急変した。There was a sudden change in the situation.サイレンが急変を知らせました。The siren sounded an emergency.


あなたに急用がある。I have urgent business with you.
経済回復の遅れは自動車の売り上げを急落させました。Slow economic recovery has sent auto sales plummeting.
この急流で泳ぐのはとても無謀なことだ。It is very imprudent to swim in the rapids.

アフリカの難民が救いを求めている。Refugees in Africa are seeking help.「神はわれらの救いである」と司祭は言った。"God is our salvation," said the priest.
向こうが彼女を捕まえる前に、彼女を救い出せないか。Can you help her out before they get her?

その犬は少女の命を救った。The dog saved the girl's life.神だけがあなたを救える。Nothing but God can save you.
彼らは直ちに我々の救援にやってきた。They came presently to our rescue.
救急診察を受けるにはどこへ行けばいいですか。Where should I go to be admitted into the emergency room?

時を移さず救急車がやってきた。An ambulance arrived immediately.




その老人は貧民救済に多額の金を寄付した。The old man contributed a large sum of money to the poor.


彼らはヘリコプターで救出された。They were rescued by helicopter.

彼はおぼれている少年を救助した。He rescued a boy from drowning.


彼は自分が救世主だとかんがえた。He saw himself as the savior of the world.



その暑さで気絶して、気がついたら救命いかだの中にいた。I fainted from the heat, and when I came to, I was in a life raft.



朽ちない物は何もない。There is nothing that does not decay.
いつか私は一人寂しく朽ち果てているだろう。Some day they will find me lying in neglect and decay.
求人広告には「女性を求む」とはっきり書かれていた。The job advertisement specifically requested females.
彼は我々の求めに応じて歌った。He sang at our request.
私たちは平和を求めている。We are longing for peace.救助された難民は自由を求めていた。The rescued refugees were longing for freedom.彼は私に助けを求めてきた。He asked me for help.




アンはヘンリーの求婚を受け入れた。Anne accepted Henry's proposal.
彼女の求婚者は皆彼女の金が目当てだった。Her suitors were all after her money.


これらの図式は求職に関する様々なアプローチを示している。These diagrams demonstrate different possible approaches to job seeking.




新しい仕事を探す際に、必ず新聞の求人情報を見なくてはならない。When looking for a new job, do not forget to read the want ads in the newspaper.

求人広告には「女性を求む」とはっきり書かれていた。The job advertisement specifically requested females.






読書するには趣旨をくみ取ることが必要だ。When you read a book you should read between the lines.
村人は井戸から水を手で汲み上げなければならなかった。The village people had to pump water from the well by hand.
彼は井戸へ行って水をくんできた。He fetched some water from the well.


あなたが何を言っても彼女を泣かせることになるだろう。Whatever you say will set her off crying.たまには赤ちゃんを泣かせておくのもいい。It's OK to leave the baby to cry on occasion.
私達は彼を泣かしてしまった。We made him cry.
見つけた人がもらう人、なくした人は泣きをみる。Finders keepers, losers weepers.
寝室に入るや否や、彼女は泣きじゃくり出した。On entering the bedroom, she started sobbing.
子供はおもちゃの車が欲しいと泣きわめいた。The child cried for a toy car.
幼児はしゃべることができないので、ほしいものが手に入るまで泣き叫ぶ。An infant is not capable of speaking, so it just screams until it gets what it wants.




病気の子どもの痛ましい泣き声を聞くのは我々には耐えられなかった。We could not bear to listen to the sick child's pathetic cries.
彼は相変わらず泣き虫だ。He's a crybaby, just like always.

案の定、あの業者今日になって泣きついてきたよ。Just like I thought, the contractor came back today, begging for more time.



かわいそうに、少女は知らせを聞いて泣き崩れた。The poor girl broke down upon hearing the news.



ビルは何時間も泣き続けた。Bill kept on crying for hours.
そのような話を聞くと必ず泣けてくる。I cannot hear such a story without weeping.

泣き寝入りなんて嫌だ。I can't let the matter drop.

たとえばバスケットボールや卓球のような球技は普通室内で行われる。Ball games, such as basketball and ping-pong, are usually played indoors.

昔の人は、地球は球形で、太陽の周囲を回っていることを知らなかった。Formerly people did not know that the earth is round and that it moves around the sun.



私は、甲子園球場に行く。I go to Koshien stadium.


地球は完全な球体ではない。The earth is not a perfect globe.


人類の究極的運命はどうなるであろうか。What is man's ultimate destiny?
われわれの宇宙はまだ生まれて間もないが、理論家たちはその最後の姿を究明することにやっきになっている。Although our universe is still young, theorists are busy exploring its ultimate fate.

列車のコンパートメントはすぐ窮屈になる。Train compartments soon get cramped.

その大臣は不正取引によって窮地に立ちました。The minister was in a fix over illegal dealings.

飢饉が人々にひどい窮乏をもたらした。Famine caused great distress among the people.



彼は級友からからかわれた。He was made fun of by his classmates.





我々に生命を与えた神は我々に同時に自由を与え給うた。The God who gave us life, gave us liberty at the same time.

きれいなウエイトレスが給仕してくれた。A pretty waitress waited on us.
給食はあるの？Do you have lunch at school?
水道料金を滞納すると給水を停止されるということをお聞きしましたが本当ですか？I've heard that if you default on the water rates your water supply will be suspended, is that true?





医療費・年金給付の抑制策の決め手はないといえよう。We can say that there's not a clear winner in terms of a policy to curtail medical expenses and benefits.

規制緩和が進んで、セルフサービスのガソリン給油は値段が少し安くなった。Gas is a little cheaper with self-service, now that deregulation is kicking in.
私は給与の５分の１を税金で取られてしまう。One-fifth of my wages go to taxes.
彼の給料では裕福になれないだろう。He won't get fat on his salary.
私は毎月給料日に母に５万円渡す。I give my mother fifty thousand yen on payday every month.
官僚は旧法規の改正に関して、成り行きを見守っています。Bureaucrats are testing the waters over revising old regulations.
ロバート・ハンセンが、旧ソ連に秘密情報を売りさばいた容疑で逮捕された。Robert Hansen was arrested on suspicion of having sold off secret information to the former Soviet Union.







私の家は旧家です。My family is an old one.































この機械は旧式になってしまった。This machine has gone out of date.





















反体制派はすべて旧体制のもとで粛清されました。All political dissidents were purged under the former regime.
























旧弊な人は新しい事になじめない。You can't teach an old dog new tricks.










私は、偶然旧友に会った。I met an old friend by chance.




中国では、旧暦にしたがって正月を祝う。In China, they celebrate New Year by the lunar calendar.




父は牧場を持っていて牛や馬を飼育している。My father has a ranch and breeds cattle and horses.日本の牛は広範囲に霜降りがある。In Japan beef has a high degree of marbled fat.




この牛車で島一周めぐりしませんか。Why don't we take a ride round the island on this ox carriage?


私の好みはどちらかというと牛肉ですね。I have a predilection for beef.
牛は我々に牛乳を与えてくれる。The cow supplies us with milk.
ボクシング・デイは、郵便屋さんや牛乳屋さんなどに贈り物をする日ですが、クリスマス後の最初の週日です。Boxing Day, when presents are given to the postman, the milkman, etc., is the first week-day after Christmas.




１９００年に彼はイギリスを去り、そのまま二度と戻らなかった。In 1900, he left England, and he never returned.古き良き時代は去って、二度ともどってこない。The good old days have gone, never to return.去る６月に私の姉は高校の教師と結婚した。My sister married a high school teacher last June.



ビルは去年の秋に私に会いに来た。Bill came to see me last autumn.


彼女は居間の壁に小さなピカソの絵を掛けた。She hung a little Picasso on the wall of the drawing room.

彼はいつもどこかの家に居候しているようだ。He always seems to be living rent-free in somebody's house.
その場に居合わせた者は皆、かすかな後光に照らされる学部長に視線を向けた。Now, all heads turn toward the dean, who sits surrounded by a faint halo of light.

招待もしていないのに息子の友達がおしかけてきて二週間も居据わった。My son's friend imposed himself on us for two weeks.
トムは授業中おしゃべりをしていたので居残りさせられた。Tom was given detention for talking during class.
ホワイト先生はトムに放課後居残るように命令した。Ms. White ordered that Tom should stay after school.
彼はその居酒屋によく出かける。He would often go to that tavern.
「居住外国人」とは、どういう意味ですか。What does "resident alien" mean?




彼は急に居直った。He changed his attitude suddenly.


授業中に居眠りすることは許しません。I do not allow sleeping in class.



この詩は読者の大いなる洞察を必要としている。This poem calls for great insight from the reader.

その会社は巨額の赤字を出している。The company is losing money heavily.










この美術館はオランダの巨匠が描いた作品がたくさんある。This art collection is rich in paintings by Dutch masters.


その巨人は誰にも愛されなかった。The giant was not loved by anybody.








巨大なタンカーがついに今し方出港した。The huge tanker has just left the dock.













その老人は巨万の富を所有している。The old man possesses great wealth.



あいにく彼は来ることを拒んだ。Unfortunately he refused to come.


彼の返答は拒絶も同然だ。His answer amounts to a refusal.
信じていたかどうかはともかく、超常的な話題に拒絶反応があるということはないようだ。I don't know whether she believed me or not but in any case it seems she doesn't automatically dismiss talk of the supernatural.
私はその質問に答えることを拒否する。I refuse to answer the question.
大統領はその法案に対して拒否権を行使しましたが、議会が再度それを無効にしました。The President vetoed the bill, but Congress overrode his veto.
リストラされた彼は心機一転、自宅を拠点にＳＯＨＯビジネスを始めた。After getting downsized he started off on a clean slate and started a business working out of a home office.



我々はこぞって君を支持する。We are solidly behind you.
晴雨にかかわらず、競技会は挙行されます。Rain or shine, the athletic meet will be held.


日本の神道の儀式に則って、挙式をしたいという方がおられれば、この教会で出来ます。If someone wants the ceremony to be held in accordance with Japanese Shinto ritual, then that is possible at this church.
会議で発言したいと思ったら挙手しなければ行けません。You have to raise your hand if you want to speak at the meeting.



警察は山田の挙動を注視している。The police are closely watching Yamada's behaviour.

いつも真っ向勝負だけでなく、たまには虚虚実実の駆け引きとやらもやってみたいよね。We have to be ready not only for a straightforward test of strength, but also for a struggle in which every strategy comes into play.


新聞のさまざまな虚偽や卑俗さにも関わらず。Reject all its lies and vulgarity.


あなたの虚言が、私を苦しめるんです。Your lies pain me.
ボブは酷く取り乱していて、現実と虚構の区別がほとんど出来なかった。Bob was so beside himself that he could scarcely tell fact from fiction.
彼は強健どころか実に虚弱だった。So far from being robust, he was extremely weak.


極端に言うと、彼は、自己のテーゼに完全に自信を持っているものが発揮できる虚心坦懐さで書いてはいないのである。He does not, in short, write with the candor of a man who is completely confident of his thesis.










失礼をお許し下さい。Please excuse me for being rude.
ＤＮＡのサンプルを貯える事は許されるべきではない。It shouldn't be permitted to store samples of DNA.あなたが後悔しているのなら許してあげよう。As you are sorry, I'll forgive you.
ここでの喫煙は許可されていません。Smoking is not permitted here.
許可書がなければここへは入れない。You can't enter here unless you have a pass.
使用許諾契約書の条項に同意されない場合は、未開封のメディアパッケージを速やかにABC社に返送していただければ、商品代金を全額払い戻し致します。In the case of not agreeing to the conditions of the usage consent contract, promptly return the unopened media package to ABC for a full refund.
すべての職業が女性に開かれるべきだ、というのは今や完全に許容されている考え。It is now a fully accepted idea that all occupations should be open to women.
４マイルはかなりの距離だ。Four miles is a good distance.




古本屋と古着屋をあさるのが好きです。I like shopping in used-book stores and in used-clothing shops.
我々はこの湾内で漁獲する特権を与えられた。We were granted the privilege of fishing in this bay.
その島には漁業を営む人たちが住んでいた。The island was inhabited by a fishing people.

漁師は釣り上げた魚の大きさをおおげさにいった。The fisherman exaggerated the size of the fish he had caught.



海岸から約１マイル沖に漁船が見えた。I saw a fishing boat about a mile off the shore.

漁夫の利を占める。A third party makes off with the profits.


サムは魚屋の店を持っている。Sam owns a fishmonger's business.




魚市場の景気はどうですか。How is it going in the fish market?


私たちは時々魚釣りに行く。We go fishing once in a while.

戦艦ビスマルク号を海のもくずとするには、何発もの魚雷を命中させなければならなかった。It took many torpedo hits to send the battleship Bismarck to Davy Jones's locker.


誕生と死との間を享楽する以外には、この両者に対して回復の手の施しようがない。There is no cure for birth and death save to enjoy the interval.




だれでも自由を享受する権利を持つ。まして人生を享受する権利はなおさらだ。Everyone has a right to enjoy his liberty, and all the more, his life.


誰にもみな、生存の権利はもちろん、自由を享有する権利がある。Everyone has a right to enjoy his liberty, much more his life.
















京葉鉄鋼の林様よりご紹介いただきました。Your name was given to us by Mr. Hayashi of Keiyo Steel Corporation.
小生のレポートをご高覧に供したいと思います。I would like to submit my report for your perusal.最初に来た者が最初に食物を供される。First come, first served.
空港までお伴しましょう。I'll accompany you to the airport.

お墓には供花が供えられていた。An offering of flowers had been placed at the grave.

水は外側から供給された。Water was supplied from outside.








彼の供述の真実性は疑わしいと思う。I doubt the veracity of his statement.











「これは何？供物か？」「そうだよ、このお賽銭箱の中に入れて・・・この紐を引っ張るの」"What is this? An offering?" "That's right. Put it in this offertory box ... and pull this rope."




クレジットとは銀行によって自由に使えることが許されている金額、すなわち信用供与、ローンです。Credit is the amount or sum placed at a person's disposal by a bank; a loan of money.












そして各チームはボールを蹴ってこの穴に通そうと互いに競い合ったのです。And the teams competed with each other to try to kick the ball through this hole.

彼はきっと競泳選手権に勝つだろう。He is sure to win the swimming championship.

あなたは競技に参加しましたか。Did you take part in the game?
その競技者は疲れがとれたようだった。The athlete seemed immune to fatigue.
すべての競合会社がパイの分け前を得ようとしています。All the competitors are trying to get their piece of the pie.



十中八九、彼が競争に勝つでしょう。In nine cases out of ten, he will win the race.ジェーンとメアリーはいつも人の気を引こうと競争している。Jane and Mary are always competing for attention.



ＳＥが辞め続けると会社の競争力が落ちる。The company's competitive edge will be eroded if system engineers continue to leave.
ゆっくりで着実なのが競走に勝つ。Slow and steady wins the race.

ダービー競馬の日は２週間後の水曜日だ。Derby Day is Wednesday fortnight.
競売でその絵画を手に入れた。I obtained the painting at an auction.


そのろくでなしどもはクビになりましたよ。Those good-for-nothing layabouts were sacked.
私と共に来てくれませんか。Would you mind coming with me?







アメリカでは多くの夫婦が収支をあわせるため共稼ぎをしている。Many couples in America both work to make ends meet.


あなたの考え方には共感できます。I really agree with what you're saying.



従業員は共済手当を守るために、ストライキのおどしをかけました。Employees threatened a strike to protect worker benefits.







アメリカ人がファシズムを受け入れないのは、共産主義を受け入れないのと同じだ。The Americans don't accept Fascism any more than they do Communism.

ついに、その共産主義者は手強い相手に屈した。The communist gave in to his tough opponent at last.










四種類の金属を使うことで特定の共振を抑えます。By using four types of metal, specific frequency resonance is suppressed.





私と彼は共通することが多い。I have much in common with him.

ペルーの共通語は何ですか。What is the common language in Peru?
でもね、わたしたち全然共通点がないんですもの。But we don't have anything in common at all.


「少しうちに寄っていかない？」「いいの？」「うち共働きで親は遅いの」"Want to drop round my place?" "Can I?" "My parents come home late as they both work."












一戸建より共同住宅に住む世帯の増加率の方が高い。The rate of increase in households is higher for apartment houses than for individual houses.



田中さん！殿方と共同生活してるのよ！ノーパンは慎みなさい！Miss Tanaka! You are living with gentlemen house mates! Please refrain from being pantless!
彼らは共同声明に同意した。They agreed on a joint statement.
共同責任は無責任になりがちだ。Everybody's business is nobody's business.






この共同体においても変化への刺激が一連の変化を示していた点に注目してみよう。Note that the impetus for change has undergone a series of transformations in this community.


彼は数週間共同募金運動に奉仕した。He worked for weeks on behalf of the community chest.




彼は共犯者とみなされた。He was considered an accomplice.






我々は共鳴する点がおおい。We have a lot of sympathies in common.



ケンは兄と部屋を共有している。Ken shared the room with his elder brother.




君が寝室を共用していた女の子はどうなったのだろう。What happened to the girl you were sharing the bedroom with?

共立物産に、貴社にご助力をお願いするよう提案しました。We suggested Kyoritsu Bussan approach you for assistance.

アメリカ合衆国は共和国である。The United States is a republic.



革命政府は、民衆から兵をつのって防戦するとともに、共和政治を確立して、捕らえていたルイ１６世を処刑しました。The revolutionary government, while raising troops from the masses and fighting a defensive battle, established a republic and executed Louis XVI.

新聞はその共和党候補を支持する立場を表明した。The newspaper declared for the Republican candidate.




昨年は異常な冷夏で、稲作は１０年ぶりの凶作だった。It was exceptionally cold last summer, and the rice crop was the worst in 10 years.









協会は彼を会長にした。The society made him president.
私たちはその問題を彼らと協議した。We consulted them about the problem.




サミット参加国は、自由貿易問題を協議事項のトップにおいています。The summit nations put free trade at the top of the agenda.






その曲はピアノ協奏曲に編集された。The piece was arranged for piano and orchestra.
企業経営で活躍するために必要となるのが多くの仲間と仕事を遂行するための協調精神です。What you need to take part in business management is the team spirit to work with many colleagues.


我々の協定を破ったのは君のほうだ。It's you who has broken our agreement.









協力者に対しては賞金が出ます。You'll get a reward for your cooperation.


壁には、ピアノに向かって座っているアンソニー卿の大きな写真がかかっていました。On the wall there was a big picture of Sir Anthony at the piano.
彼女の叫びが警察を呼び寄せた。Her scream brought the police.
人々から叫び声があがった。A shout arose from the people.




彼は生死の境をさ迷った。He hovered between life and death.
彼らは境界を越えてスペインに入った。They crossed the border into Spain.
ここで明確にしなければならない点は、スポーツにおいてアマチュアとプロフェッショナルの境界線が消失しつつあるということだ。The point we must clarify here is that the lines between amateur and professional in sport are beginning to disappear.


そのような境遇であったにもかかわらず、彼は自分一人で道を切り開いた。Although he was in such circumstances, he made his way by himself.






その釣り人は釣り糸に強い引きを感じた。The angler felt a strong tug on the line.象というものは強い動物である。An elephant is a strong animal.この布地は洗濯に強い。This material will stand up to lots of washings.

これと言って趣味はないんですが、強いて言えば、音楽鑑賞ですかね。I don't know if you'd call it a hobby, but to stretch it a little, you could say music appreciation is my hobby.
彼らは我々に服従を強いた。They enforced obedience upon us.


その言葉で彼に対する疑惑はさらに強まった。The words confirmed him in his suspicions.
彼には富と言う強みがある。He has the advantage of wealth.
フロントローラーのスラスト角は２度、多分レース時にはもう少し角度を強める予定です。The front-roller thrust angle is 2 degrees, probably there were plans to strengthen that angle a little when racing.

うちの一番腕利きの交渉者はいつも強引に有利な取り引きをする。Our best negotiators always drive a hard bargain.

我々は組織を強化しなくてはならん。We must beef up our organization.


あまり強気になるなよ。Don't press your luck, kid.
彼は強健どころか実に虚弱だった。So far from being robust, he was extremely weak.
大統領は強硬路線をとった。The President took a hard line.


日本は力のある強国になっていた。Japan has become a powerful nation.





何も私にそれをあきらめるように強制することができない。Nothing can force me to give it up.



彼女は強制的に私を一緒に連れ出した。She forced me to go out with her.

彼は父にねだってとうとう新車を買ってもらった。He finally talked his father into buying a new car.


強打者が簡単に凡退した。The slugger was easily put out.
強大な権力を有する大国が存在する限り、戦争は避け難い。As long as there are sovereign nations possessing great power, war is inevitable.
その男がスーザンからすべてのお金を強奪したのです。The man robbed Susan of all her money.
先生は毎日の練習の大切さを強調した。The teacher stressed the importance of daily practice.

この金属は強度では鉄に匹敵する。This metal is comparable to iron in strength.
父は強盗と取っ組み合いをした。My father struggled with the robber.暴力団は強盗を計画していた。The gang was planning a robbery.


強風が陸の方へ吹き始めた。A strong wind began to set in.



彼はもっとはやくくるように我々に強要した。He compelled us to come earlier.
たくさんのおもちゃを持っていたが、強欲から彼はもっと欲しがった。Although he had many toys, his greed made him want more.
日本の軍隊は非常に強力だった。Japan's army was very powerful.

彼の返報は鼻への強烈なパンチだった。His answer was a hard punch on the nose.
その音に赤ん坊はおびえた。The noise frightened the baby.
危険などにひるまず、彼は平気でいる。He remains calm in the face of danger.
首相はおそらく辞任するであろう。The premier is likely to resign.
環境汚染についての恐れは、人々に発電所の近くに家を建てることを思いとどまらせた。Fear of pollution discouraged people from building homes near power plants.
嵐の激しさに子供たちは恐れおののいた。The fury of the storm frightened the children.
間髪を入れず、迅速かつ的確な応対、畏れ入ります。Such an accurate, lightning-quick reply. What can I say?
その嵐の天候は恐ろしかった。The stormy weather was dreadful.
恐喝のその犠牲者は、ここ何年間というもの口止め料を払ってきた。だが、今では、それは愚かなことだと悟り、もうびた一文払わないことに決めた。The victim of blackmail has been paying hush money for years, but now he realizes it is foolish, and has decided not to pay a red cent more.
１９３０年代の恐慌の間、多くの金持ちが株式市場の崩壊で全てを失った。During the Depression in the 1930's, many wealthy people lost everything in the stock market crash.


恐縮ですが、２月２７日の約束をキャンセルさせてください。I am very sorry, but I must cancel our appointment for February 27.
私は恐怖で気も狂わんばかりだった。I almost went crazy with fear.

近隣諸国は決して彼の恐怖政治に屈服しなかった。The neighboring countries never submitted to his terrorism.






ハッキリ言ってくれよ。そんな奥歯に物のはさまったような言い方しないで。Quit talking like you've got something stuck in your mouth and say what you mean.

彼はあごの下にナプキンをはさみ込んだ。He tucked the napkin under his chin.

これ以上ここでもたついてると、後ろの第二関門からも増援が来て、挟撃されるかも知れねーんだぜ。If we hang around here any longer, there could be reinforcements coming from the second gate to take us in a pincer movement!
聖書には、賢い教えがたくさん見付かります。Much wisdom is to be found in the Bible.
ジョーンズ先生が私たちに英会話を教えてくれます。Mr Jones teaches us English conversation.地下鉄へ行く道を教えていただけませんか。Could you tell me how to get to the subway station?
言い換えれば、教育は知能に自然の法則を教え込むことである。In other words, education is the instruction of the intellect in the laws of Nature.
ロンドンで昔の教え子に会ったよ。I met an old student of mine in London.
わたしの教え方は間違っていると思いますか。Do you think that my way of teaching is wrong?
あなたが教わった事は間違っている。What you were taught is wrong.
教育は重大な要素である。Education is a critical element.


お前は教員になる決心をしたのか。Have you made up your mind to become a teacher?


どの教科が一番好きですか。Which subject do you like best?
教科書はどうしたらいいんでしょうか。Where do we get the textbooks?
その教会は１１７３年までさかのぼる。The church dates back to 1173.

教官は私に毎日運動するように勧めた。The instructor advised me to get exercise every day.
あの宗教団体はかなりいかがわしい教義にとりつかれている。That religious cult has got some pretty off the wall ideas.
教区牧師は法話の時しばしば聖書に言及する。The vicar often refers to the Bible in his sermon.
実例は教訓にまさる。Example is better than precept.


目標は授業設計をするときの、学生の思考を触発するメディア教材の選択および活用方法について理解することである。Our aim is that, when planning classes, we know how to select stimulating material for the students and how to put it into use.

私の兄は教師です。My older brother is a teacher.
ご教示ありがとうございます。助かりました。Thank you for your instruction. It really helped.
教室は生徒でいっぱいだった。The classroom was full of pupils.ＬＬ教室を使ってもよいですか。May we use the language lab?エアロビクス教室に一日入学したいのですが。I'd like to try out the aerobics class for a day.
一人の教授がささやいた。One of his colleagues whispered.

教習所の教師にそう焦るなと言われています。My driving instructor says I should be more patient.



彼女は教職につくことを望んでいる。She wants to engage in teaching.
彼女は、教職員の一人である。She is on the teaching staff.


宗教がらみの裁判で、野心的な弁護士は教団の指導者の代理をする。In the religious-cult trial, the ambitious lawyer will represent the cult leader.

これは古代の教典を解釈するという問題である。The problem is one of interpreting these ancient scriptures.
ヒンズー教徒は寺院で礼拝をします。The Hindus worship in temples.







その医者は教養のある人だ。The doctor is a man of culture.



あの橋は大変美しい。That bridge is very beautiful.




この本によれば、最初の人工橋梁は新石器時代にさかのぼるという。This book says the earliest man-made bridges date back to the New Stone Age.
それらの星は肉眼で見える、まして望遠鏡ならなおさらである。You can see the stars with your naked eye, and even better through a telescope.メアリーはフランス語を読むことさえできない、まして話すことはできない。Mary can't even read French, much less speak it.
彼の目に狂いはない。He has an unerring eye.

そんな話し方をするとは、彼は狂っていたに違いない。He must be crazy to talk like that.あなたの時計、時間は狂いませんか。Does your watch keep good time?たくさんのことが起こって、スケジュールが狂ってしまった。A lot of things happened and my schedule was messed up.

彼らは意外な成功に狂喜した。They exulted in their unexpected success.
それをやってみるなんて狂気に近い。It is little short of lunacy to try it.
狂犬にご注意。Look out for the wild dog!






その囚人達はまるで狂人のように互いに争った。The prisoners fought one another like so many mad people.





この部屋は私たちにとって狭すぎる。This room is too small for us.彼女は狭い範囲でしか物が見えない。Her viewpoint is limited.
両者の溝が狭まった。The gap between them has narrowed.




こんな狭苦しい部屋からは一刻も早く脱出したいよ。I want to move out of this cramped room as soon as I can.
狭心症の発作が起きました。I had an angina attack.
彼の上役は狭量さを軽蔑している。He is contemptuous of his boss's narrow mind.



眼鏡をかければ君の視力は矯正されるだろう。Wearing glasses should correct your vision.

その亡命者は故国への思いに胸を焦がした。The exile yearned for his home.







私の昇進は彼の胸三寸である。My promotion hangs on his decision.
胸焼けがします。I have heartburn.

彼女から来た手紙を見たとき、彼は何だか胸騒ぎがした。When he saw her letter, he felt somewhat uneasy.

私の胸中は悲喜こもごもだ。Joy and grief alternate in my breast.

弾丸は彼の厚い胸板を貫通した。The bullet penetrated his muscular chest.
胸部のレントゲンをとってください。I'd like you to have a chest X-ray.







彼はそれを公表すると脅した。He threatened to make it public.
この作戦に対する脅威は数多い。The threats to this strategy are numerous.

脅迫のもとになされた約束は無効だ。A promise given under a threat is worthless.




市長の家族は一日中脅迫電話に悩まされた。The mayor's family was harassed with threatening phone calls all day.



小人はつまらないことに興ずる。Small things amuse small minds.
江戸時代に、各藩の奨励策によって、全国各地に地場産業が興った。Local industry flourished throughout the land in the Edo period thanks to the promotional efforts by each clan.




それは大成功で長期興行になった。It was a great success, ending in a long run.







興ざめの人も、よく知るようになると、かならずしも不快ではない。Wet blankets are not always unpleasant after you get to know them.


観客は彼のホームランに興奮した。His home run excited the crowd.


あなたは花に興味がありますか。Are you interested in flowers?
その話はとても興味深かった。The story was very interesting.


長野にいる友人を訪問した際、おいしいそばをごちそうになった。When I visited my friend in Nagano, I was treated to delicious soba.

いえ、お気になさらず。郷に入っては郷に従えと学んできました。No, please don't concern yourself. I have learnt to do as the Romans when in Rome.

管弦楽団は郷愁に満ちた音楽を演奏し始めた。The orchestra struck up nostalgic music.


この近辺で、美味しい郷土料理を食べさせてくれるお店はありますか。Is there a restaurant around here that serves local delicacies?
私の郷里の町は海に接している。My home town is adjacent to the ocean.
海は鏡のようになめらかだった。The sea was as smooth as glass.




オールブラックスがフィールドに現れると、観衆の声がウオーンと響き渡った。When the All Blacks came out onto the field a roar like 'woooaahh' swept over the crowd.




その靴の値段の高さには驚かされた。I was surprised at how expensive the shoes were.
彼が失敗したのは少しも驚きではない。It is no wonder that he failed.

知事は委員会の反応に驚いた。The governor was surprised by the commission's response.町の人々は地震に大変驚いた。The townsfolk were frightened by the earthquake.

その光景を見て私は驚異の念にうたれた。The sight struck me with wonder.

その絵を見て彼女は驚嘆した。The picture set her wondering.

私は彼の勇気に驚愕した。I marveled at his courage.
空を仰ぎ見る。Look up to the skies.


彼は天を仰いだ。He looked up at the sky.彼は彼らの師と仰がれた。He was respected as their teacher.私は何事にも彼の指導を仰ぐ。I look to him for direction in everything.





ここではどんどん意見をおっしゃってかまいません。You can speak out freely here.


これについては「まことに仰る通りでございます」と答えるしかないのです。In connection with this I can only reply, "it is just as you say."


彼は気を失いあお向けに倒れた。He fainted and fell on his back.





凝った彫刻のしてある鞘に収まった長剣。A longsword sheathed in an intricately engraved scabbard.

そのキルトは本当によく技巧が凝らされていていいものですね。That quilt is really quite a piece of work with all its fine craftsmanship.その部屋は装飾を凝らしている。The room is richly ornamented.




最近はどんな物に凝っているの？What are you into these days?彼女は服に凝っている。She is particular about her dress.








彼女は大勢の少年たちに凝視されているのを意識していたと思う。I think she was conscious of being stared at by many boys.











当選のあかつきには皆様のために一生懸命に働きます。Once elected, I will do my best for all of you who supported me.




過ちは人の常、許すは神の業。To err is human, to forgive divine.



この会社は石油業界で２位に位している。This firm ranks second in the oil trade.





あぶく銭を稼ごうとする開発業者たちよ。They're some developers who aim to make a fast buck!

会社は昇進で彼の業績に報いた。The company rewarded him with promotion.
顧客からの苦情が増えるのは業績悪化の始まりかもしれない。An increase in customer complaints could signal a decline in business.






乙が受託業務の実施により得た成果は、甲乙双方に帰属するものとする。Any result obtained through the execution of the Commissioned Business shall belong to each party hereto.
わたしたちは業務提携しています。We are in the tie-up.
この地区では三局受信できます。We can get three stations in this area.

彼女は郵便局員になった。She became a postman.






局長は、現地の朝日の記者を現場に行かせようとしていた。The director wanted the local Asahi reporter to go to the scene of the crime.
私の自宅の電話番号は市外局番が２０１で１２３ー４５６７番です。My home phone number is, area code two-oh-one, one-two-three, four-five-six-seven.
天文学者が局部超銀河団の存在を推定しました。Astronomers inferred the existence of a local supercluster.２時間毎に局部を湿布しなさい。Apply a compress to the affected part every two hours.局部にかゆみがあります。I have an itchy crotch.
われわれは局面の打開を図らなくてはならない。We must try to break the deadlock.

そのピアニストはアンコールに応えて２曲弾いた。The pianist played two encores.
この道路は急な曲がり角が多い。This road is full of sharp turns.

風に吹かれて木が曲がった。The tree bent in the wind.黒塗りのリムジンがキーというタイヤの音と共に角を曲がった。A black limo rounded the corner with a squeal of tires.ネクタイが曲がってるよ。Your tie is crooked.
少年は考えを曲げなかった。The boy persisted in his opinion.









サーカスのアシカは曲芸を見せた。The circus sea lion did a trick.



























ダンサーたちはラテン音楽の曲目の間、実に活気づいた。The dancers really came to life during the Latin numbers.






彼女は行儀が極めて上品である。She is quite decent in conduct.











極小の虫でも踏まれれば、そりくり返る。Even the smallest worm will turn if trodden on.
彼は私に缶詰の極上品を贈ってくれた。He gave me a select brand of canned goods.



君の言うことは極端じゃないか。Aren't you pushing it too far?
オーロラは極地に特有の現象です。The aurora is a phenomenon characteristic of the polar regions.
ミロのヴィーナスは美の極致だ。The Venus de Milo is the perfection of beauty.

興奮は極点に達した。The excitement reached its peak.
人間も極度に寒い温度に対しては、防御装置を備えている。Man, too, has been given protective devices against extreme temperatures.
ハバロフスク市が極東ロシアで大都会の一つです。Khabarovsk is among the largest cities of the Russian Far East.

彼女は極秘で私にその話をした。She told me the story in confidence.



我々はあの悪い状況を極力生かした。We made the best of that bad situation.

彼の額には玉のような汗が浮かんでいた。There were beads of sweat on his forehead.弾が彼の頬をかすめた。The bullet grazed his cheek.艱難汝を玉にす。Adversity makes a man wise, not rich.








ボスには玉石混交のグループとは言われたけれど、俺は玉かな、それとも石なのかな。The boss said this group is a real mixed bag. I wonder if he places me with the wheat or the chaff.

首相の答弁は玉虫色だった。The prime minister's answer was equivocal.

タマネギだけは食べれないの。I can eat anything but onions.


袋はとうもろこしではちきれそうだった。The bag was bursting with corn.


わずかな誤りでも致命的な惨事につながるかもしれない。The slightest mistake may lead to a fatal disaster.こんなわずかな収入ではとてもやっていけない。I can't get by on such a small income.私はわずか１０００円しか持っていない。I have no more than 1,000 yen with me.




その救助投手でエースの代わりはとても務まらなかった。The relief pitcher was no substitute for the ace.
お勤めはどちらですか。Who do you work for?
お手伝いさんたちは主人の命令を実行しようと努めた。The servants tried to carry out their master's order.
彼は広告会社に勤めている。He works for an advertising agency.彼は１０年の刑期を務めた。He served a ten-year prison term.

あなたはあの勤め口に申し込むべきだ。You should apply for that post.






彼の勤め先はどこですか。Where does he work?








彼のところでちょうど２０年勤続した。I have been in his employ for exactly twenty years.




トムはいまや以前にもまして勤勉に働いている。Tom works more diligently now.
その警備員は一晩中勤務だった。The guard was on duty all night.




彼は勤務先の電話番号と住所を私に教えた。He gave me his office telephone number and address.



勤労によって日本は今日の日本になった。Hard work has made Japan what it is today.







その土地をならすのにブルドーザーが使われた。A bulldozer was used to level the lane.


アメリカには憲法上の抑制と均衡という入念な制度がある。America has an elaborate system of constitutional checks and balances.


彼女は均斉のとれた姿をしている。She has a well-proportioned figure.
ガスストーブは料理するのに最も均等な熱を供給する。A gas stove provides the most even heat for cooking.


錦あやなす木々で山が染まっていた。The mountainside was ablaze with the autumn colors of the trees.









彼女は琴を弾くことがとても好きだ。She likes to play the koto very much.

彼女は喫煙を禁じられた。She was prohibited from smoking.
ベッドでの煙草を禁ずる厳しい規則がある。There is a very strict rule forbidding smoking in bed.
いつ禁煙のサインを消すのでしょうね。When will they turn off the no-smoking sign?同様に、禁煙する最大の理由はたいてい、短期的な利点（例えば、以前より健康で魅力的になった気がするということなど）なのである。Similarly, the strongest reasons for stopping smoking are usually the short-term benefits (for example, feeling healthier and more attractive).




判事は彼に禁固１年を宣告した。The judge sentenced him to one year's imprisonment.
喫煙は絶対禁止。Smoking is strictly prohibited.

彼は禁酒、禁煙した。He renounced smoking and drinking.





ふっ、禁断の魔術とやらは、俺には通用しないぜ！Hah, your 'forbidden magics' aren't going to work with me!


長い付き合いにかけは禁物。Short accounts make long friends.

彼は僧侶に近い禁欲生活をしている。He practices austerities almost like a monk.





きみが言っていることは筋があまりよく通っていない。There isn't much logic in what you're saying.その小説の筋はわからない。I don't understand this novel's plot.私は去年、それを別の筋から聞いた。I heard about it from another source last year.
君が罰をうけるのは筋違いだと思った。We thought it was absurd that you got punished.

概して男性は女性よりも筋骨たくましい。Generally speaking, men are stronger than women.
筋書きは別として、その本は私をひきつけた。Apart from the plot, the book interested me.
彼の議論には筋道が無い。I find no logic in his argument.
水泳は筋肉を発達させる。Swimming develops our muscles.
この薬は筋肉痛を和らげる。This medicine helps relieve muscle pain.


緊急の場合は、１１９番に電話しなさい。In case of emergency, call 119.


「僕、飛行機に乗るのはこれが初めてなんだ。緊張するよ」と博がいいます。"This is my first flight. I'm nervous," says Hiroshi.冷戦の緊張が高まった。Cold-war tension has mounted.
第３世界の貧困問題は緊迫している。The issue of Third World poverty is very pressing.
彼女のフェチが緊縛と支配でしょう。I guess she's into bondage and domination.
今後とも、貴社と緊密なおつきあいをいただけますよう希望しております。I hope that your future activities will expand our relationship with your firm.









その人は私のえりもとをつかもうとした。The man tried to catch hold of me by the collar.
男は彼のえり首をつかんだ。The man seized him by the neck.


彼は口を謹んで何も語らなかった。He kept his tongue under a bridle.





聴衆は謹聴の姿勢で立っていた。The listeners stood in an attentive attitude.

クリスマスが近くなってきた。Christmas is fast approaching.
また近いうちにお会いましょう。I hope I'll see you again soon.
あなたの夢は近い将来実現するでしょう。Your dream will come true in the near future.
彼女は風呂付きの部屋を探していたのだが、この近くで見つけた。She was looking for a room with a bath, and found one near here.７時近くだ。学校へ行かなくては。It is close to seven o'clock. We have to go to school.国会は近く解散するだろう。The Diet will soon be dissolved.
クリスマスが近づいてきた。Christmas is fast approaching.
猫はトラと近縁である。Cats are related to tigers.


彼は近刊の本を批評する。He criticizes a book recently published.
十人に一人は近眼である。One out of ten persons is nearsighted.
彼は彼女に近寄って握手をした。He went up to her and they shook hands.
高校になってからは、クロスカントリースキー、ノルディック複合競技の大阪大会および近畿大会で幾度となく優勝。In high school, I won the Osaka and Kinki championships in cross-country skiing and Nordic combined skiing on countless occasions.




彼は東京近郊に住んでいる。He lives in the suburbs of Tokyo.
近頃は旅行は楽だ。Travelling is easy these days.近ごろ彼女から便りがない。I have not heard from her recently.

私は近視なので、あの看板に何が書いてあるか分からない。I am near-sighted, so I cannot make out what is written on that signboard.


彼が近所に越してきた。He moved into my neighborhood.


議論のため、母親と息子の近親相姦が黙認されている部族社会を仮定してみよう。Imagine, for the sake of argument, a tribal group in which mother-son incest was countenanced.

ＡへはＢから近接ことができる。Access to A is available from B.

トムには近代絵画の鑑賞能力がある。Tom appreciates modern art.
ほとんどの場合、近代化は西欧化と同一のものとみなされる。In most cases, modernization is identified with Westernization.
近代科学技術はなぜ中国で発展しなかったのだろうか。Why didn't modern technology develop in China?
彼はフランス近代史に詳しい。He is acquainted with the modern history of France.
近代的方法で産業は向上した。Modern methods improved industry.
フォークは、ヨーロッパや近東地域で長年にわたって使われていたが、それはもっぱら調理用にのみであった。Forks were used for many years in Europe and the Near East, but only for cooking.
近日中に彼女にまた会うことになっている。I will be seeing her again one of these days.

アジア諸国からの輸入品は近年増大している。The imports from Asian countries have expanded recently.
いすをもっと机に近づけなさい。Move the chair nearer to the desk.
この近辺で、美味しい郷土料理を食べさせてくれるお店はありますか。Is there a restaurant around here that serves local delicacies?



近隣の家は壊れたが、自宅は少しの修繕費ですんだ。The neighbouring house was destroyed, but mine survived just a bit of cost for repair.
あの国は近隣諸国との外交関係を絶った。That country broke off diplomatic relations with the neighboring countries.
金の切れ目が縁の切れ目。The end of money is the end of love.
輝くものすべてが金とは限らない。All that glitters is not gold.記念碑の一番上で禎子が頭の上に金の鶴をかざしている。On top of the statue, Sadako is holding a golden crane over her head.日本シンクロ界の悲願である金には、あと一歩で届かなかった。The 'gold' yearned for by the Japanese synchronized swimming world was not quite reached.
お金を使うも貯めるも自由にしなさい。You may spend or save at will.
カールは金メダルを見せてくれた。Carl showed me the gold medal.

社員は皆社長の言を金科玉条としている。The employees treat everything the company president says as a golden rule.
金貨は思ったよりはるかに価値があった。The gold coin was much more valuable than was supposed.
誰がここに金塊を埋めたのだろう。Who buried the gold bars here?
飲み代として使った金額は総計７千ドルだった。The total bill for drinks came up to 7000 dollars.




金魚に餌をやってるの。I'm feeding the goldfish.




鋳物が金型からすっぽりとれた。The casting came cleanly out of its mold.
今月はとても金欠だ。I have a little money this month.



貴重品は金庫にしまっておきなさい。Put your valuables in the safe.










金持ちが必ずしも幸福とは限らない。The rich are not always happy.
あの立派な金時計をどうやって手に入れたのか。How did you come by that fine gold watch?

今夜は金星を見ることが可能ですか。Is it possible to see Venus tonight?
金銭のことで彼と争いになった。I had a quarrel with him over money.

鉄は最も有用な金属です。Iron is the most useful metal.









彼は青い目と金髪である。He has blue eyes and fair hair.
彼は金物を商っている。He deals in hardware.






警棒で空をなぐりつけ、よろめいて体勢をたてなおしたガードマンは、自分に向かって突進してくる金網づくりのクズカゴを見た。The guard's truncheon hit air. Off balance, he regained his posture to see a metal-mesh rubbish bin flying towards him.
金儲けをするためには、彼はどんなことでもする。He will do anything to make money.



金融引き締め政策が実施されている。A fiscal tightening policy is being enacted.
低金利で企業の金融機関からの借入は増えている。Corporate borrowing from financial institutions is rising due to the low interest rate.
彼は月曜から金曜まで働く。He works from Monday to Friday.
金曜日の銀行は遅じまいだ。The bank shuts late on Fridays.
そのローンの金利は5.5％だ。The loan carries 5.5% interest.


私は金輪際カラオケバーでは歌わない。I'll never ever sing in a karaoke bar.


社の弁護士に暫定合意の内容を吟味してもらおう。We'll have our firm's attorneys look through the provisional agreement.

オリンピックでは金メダルが１位、銀メダルが２位、銅メダルが３位だ。In Olympic competitions, a gold medal is for first place, a silver medal for second, and a bronze medal is for third place.

宇宙にはたくさんの銀河がある。There are many galaxies in the universe.
このドル紙幣を１０セント銀貨１０個にくずしてください。Change this dollar bill for ten dimes.



ジェーンはお金を引き出しに銀行へ行った。Jane went to the bank to take out some money.
最近の銀行員の態度はなんと慇懃無礼なことか。何様だと思ってるんだ。These bank employees seem so politely insolent lately. I wonder what's behind it.


ニューヨークの五番街は銀座と比較される。New York's Fifth Avenue is comparable to Ginza.


女王は華麗な銀色のドレスを着ていた。The queen was wearing a magnificent silver dress.



太陽をまわる惑星は９つもあり、地球もその１つである。There are nine planets travelling around the sun, the earth being one of them.




カレンダーの日付は１９６４年９月２３日でした。The date on the calendar was September 23, 1964.



彼は九州へ旅立った。He has left for Kyushu.












スピーチコンテストは１１月９日に行われた。The speech contest took place on the ninth of November.大会９日目、ベスト８が出揃った。The top eight players survived the ninth day of the tournament.




私はどのクラブにも所属していない。I don't belong to any club.


彼はその句の文字どおりの意味を説明した。He explained the literal meaning of the phrase.この句では前置詞を省略できる。You can omit the preposition in this phrase.









綴りと句読法にもっと気を付けなくてはいけませんよ。You must be more careful about spelling and punctuation.

英国の南東区は人口密度が高い。The South East region of England is densely populated.
駐車禁止区域に車を止めてはいけません。You must not park your car in a no parking zone.


不通区間の開通の見込みはまだない。There's no hope at this moment that the closed section will be reopened.










土地は８つに区分された。The land was divided into 8 lots.

私は彼女と妹を区別できなかった。I couldn't tell her from her sister.
彼の意見が選挙区民には直接の影響を待たなかったことを付け加えておくべきであろう。It should be added that his remarks had no direct influence on the constituency.
１０年前の成人の日に区役所からボールペンをもらった。Ten years ago the ward office gave us ballpoint pens on the Coming of Age Day.


私は苦いものが好きだ。I have a fancy for bitter things.このビールは苦い。This beer tastes bitter.このコーヒーは苦い味がする。This coffee tastes bitter.
苦しい、やめろ。It's so painful. Stop it!彼は過去の苦しい生活を黙想した。He meditated on his past life of suffering.彼の家族はかなり生活が苦しい。His family is rather badly off.

私達は他人の苦しみに同情するべきだ。We should feel for the pains of others.
人々は貧困に苦しんだ。People were ground down by poverty.
その事実が彼女の心を苦しめている。The matter weighs on her mind.




私は苦学して大学を卒業した。I worked my way through college.
あおいは、苦学生だから、そんな高級なもの、持てないです。I'm putting myself through school, so I can't have things that are that expensive.
私は貴方と苦楽を共にしよう。I'll share both troubles and joys with you.
苦境にあるとき助けになるものだ。It helps us in times of difficulty.
一言苦言を呈したい。Let me give you a piece of advice.

私は数学は苦手だ。I am out of my element in math.
だからまあ、学生会としても苦渋の決断てやつなんだ。わかってやってくれ。So, well, it's a bitter decision for the student council to make as well. Give 'em a break.


その顧客の苦情は微妙な問題に関わるものだった。The customer's complaint was about a sensitive issue.
苦心の甲斐があった。That was well worth the trouble.


苦痛で彼の顔が歪んでいる。His face is distorted by pain.


彼等は多くの苦難をたえしのんだ。They endured many difficulties.
苦肉の策で企画したんですが、その本はよく売れました。We arrived at that plan out of pure desperation, but the book sold well.
その知らせは多くの人々を苦悩におとしいれた。Many people were plunged into distress by the news.

この咳止め用トローチは苦味があるがよくきく。These cough lozenges taste bitter but they will do you much good.


国会議員は問題の解決に苦慮しています。Legislators in the Diet are struggling to find a solution to the problem.
せっかくの苦労もあだになった。All my pains went for nothing.



ぱたぱたと足跡を立てて、エントランスへと駆けてゆく。With a pitter-patter of footsteps she runs off to the entrance.
子供たちは丘を駆け下りた。The children ran down the hill.
犬が庭をかけ回っていた。A dog ran about in the garden.
犬が私のところに駆けよってきた。The dog came running up to me.


雨が降り始めたので、私は家に駆け込んだ。Since it began raining, I ran into the house.
彼女が目に涙を浮かべて階段を駆け上がるのを見た。She was seen to run up the stairs with tears in her eyes.

彼は頂上に足早に駆け登った。He rapidly ascended to the top.
銀行スキャンダルは国会議事堂をかけぬけました。A banking scandal is sweeping across Capitol Hill.
空腹が彼を盗みに駆り立てた。Hunger drove him to steal.
彼は衝動に駆られた。He was borne away by an impulse.
彼は英語を自由に駆使する。He has a perfect command of English.
台所からゴキブリを駆除しなければならない。I must rid my kitchen of cockroaches.
悪貨は良貨を駆逐する。Bad money drives out good.




僕はボードの上の駒を一つ前に進めた。I moved a chess piece on the board one forward.

ぎょうざの具のあまりは？餃子を家で作りましたが、皮が少なかったせいか、具が少し余ってしまいました。Gyoza stuffing? I made some gyoza at home but, possibly because I didn't have enough dough, I had some of the filling left over.
このビルは非常階段を備えている。The building is equipped with emergency stairs.不時にそなえなくてはいけない。You should be prepared for emergencies.食虫植物は、昆虫を捕らえるための様々な種類の罠を備えている。Insect-eating plants are equipped with various kinds of traps to catch insects.






その案は具体化された。The idea was brought into shape.

その警告はわかりやすいし具体的だ。The warnings are clear and concrete.



そんな愚かなことを言うな。Do not say such foolish things.


愚行なしに生きている人は、その人が考えているほど賢明ではない。Who lives without folly is not so wise as he thinks.











貧しい人を愚弄してはいけない。You should not fool with poor people.

ほとんど空なのでガソリンを入れなくてはなりません。I need to put some gas in the car, as it's almost empty.
ワシが空を飛んでいる。An eagle is flying in the sky.
あそこの空缶をごらんなさい。Look at those empty cans there.

その空地は公園として設計されている。The vacant lot is laid out as a park.
まだ空き部屋がいくつかあった。There were several rooms still vacant.
彼は多くの日々をむなしく過ごさなければならなかった。He had to spend many barren days.
町のどの家も空っぽだった。All the houses in town were empty.
はい。これならそらで歌えます。Yes. This one I can sing from memory.




この無限の空間に漂う永遠の沈黙が私を恐怖に陥れる。The eternal silence of these infinite spaces terrifies me.

空気は音の媒体だ。The air is a medium for sound.


神に向かって話しかけてみてもそこにあるのは空虚のみ。I talk to God but the sky is empty.

彼は空軍から離れて休暇をとっている時は、家族と家でくつろぐのが好きだ。He likes to relax at home with his family when he is on leave from the Air Force.



真実と空言を区別するのは難しい。It is hard to distinguish truth from a lie.
どの空港から出発しますか。Which airport do I leave from?




空手は武器を用いない護身術である。Karate is an art of unarmed defense.


彼らは空襲を受けたとき敵の飛行機を２機撃墜した。They shot down two enemy planes during the raid.

空所を補充せよ。Fill in the blanks.

彼らは空席を任命で充足した。They filled the vacancy by appointment.
これは空前の大事件として歴史に残るでしょう。This will go down in history as the greatest event that has ever taken place.


彼は空想の世界に生きている。He lives in a world of fantasy.





煙は空中へと舞い上がった。The smoke ascended into the air.














日本も産業空洞化しています。In Japan, also, deindustrialization is happening.
母の死は私の生涯に大きな空白を残した。The death of my mother left a big blank in my life.正規表現で空白はどのように表されるのでしょうか？How is whitespace represented in regular expressions?

彼は空費した時間を取り返そうとした。He tried to make up for lost time.

それは間違いなく空飛ぶ円盤だったのだ。It was a flying saucer all right.
その食事で彼は空腹を満たした。The meal satisfied his hunger.




空模様から判断すると、雪が降りそうだ。Judging from the look of the sky, it is going to snow.
空輸のおかげで食べ物に季節感を感じなくなったというお話です。It's talking about how, thanks to air transport, we've lost the sense of 'season' for foodstuffs.

以下の空欄部分にご記入頂くだけで結構です。All you have to do is fill in the blanks below.


彼女は彼の死にそら涙を流した。She shed crocodile tears over his death.


みなさま、空路の事故で到着が遅れる見通しです。Ladies and gentlemen, due to an accident at the airport, our arrival will be delayed.









２、４、６などは偶数です。Two, four, six, etc. are even numbers.

私は、偶然旧友に会った。I met an old friend by chance.









彼が不作法なのは意識的であって、偶発的ではなかった。His rudeness was conscious, not accidental.


同じように現代美術の寓意的手順に関して捧げられたエッセイにおいて、バックローは６人の女性芸術家について議論している。In an essay similarly devoted to allegorical procedures in contemporary art, Buchloh discusses 6 women artists.
以下の一節は有名な寓話からの引用です。The following passage is a quotation from a well-known fable.

すみに誰かが隠れている。Someone is hiding in the corner.




外出する前に髪を櫛でときなさい。Comb your hair before you go out.

ラップは屑だ。Rap is crap.

警棒で空をなぐりつけ、よろめいて体勢をたてなおしたガードマンは、自分に向かって突進してくる金網づくりのクズカゴを見た。The guard's truncheon hit air. Off balance, he regained his posture to see a metal-mesh rubbish bin flying towards him.
その要求に屈するな。Do not give in to those demands.
彼は靴をはくためにかがんだ。He stooped to put on his shoes.彼はかがんでボールを拾った。He bent down and picked up the ball.


彼女は日本で屈指の優れたテニスの選手であると言っても過言ではない。It is not too much to say that she is one of the best tennis players in Japan.

死ぬ方が屈辱を受けるよりもましだ。Death is preferable to dishonor.




それに、もう庭も掘り起こしてしまったのよ。And, they've already torn up the garden.
何人かの人々が宝を掘り出そうとしたができなかった。Some people tried to dig the treasure out, but they couldn't.

山を掘り抜いてトンネルが造られた。A tunnel has been bored through the mountain.
彼らは穴をあけて石油を掘り当てようとした。They intended to drill for oil.ジャガイモを掘ったことがありますか。Have you dug up potatoes?
くつは革でつくられている。The shoes are made of leather.

おすすめの靴屋を教えてくれませんか。Can you recommend your favorite shoe store?

この靴下の片方はどこだ。Where is the mate to this sock?



ガムが靴底にくっついた。The gum adhered to the sole of the shoe.



その靴磨きを使ってもいいですか。May I use the shoe polish?
後ろのドアにへこみができた。They had a dent in the rear door.
スープを入れるくぼんだお皿がありますか。Do you have a bowl for soup?
ベンジャミンはライフルでクマを撃った。Benjamin shot a bear with a rifle.


栗は少なくとも15分は茹でなくてはいけない。Chestnuts have to be boiled for at least fifteen minutes.
リスは枝の中に隠れた。A squirrel hid among the branches.



その支払いは２年間繰り延べられる。The payment will be deferred for two years.

目の前で繰り広げられるやり取りは、俺が入り込む隙なんて一ミリもない。The exchange unfolding in front of my eyes had not a single millimetre of a gap in which for me to slip.



サーカスを見にみんなくりだした。Everyone turned out for the circus.
彼らは結婚式の日取りを繰り上げた。They advanced the wedding date.
言葉の学習には繰り返しが必要です。Repetition plays an important role in language study.電話は繰り返し鳴っていた。The telephone rang repeatedly.

「いいえ」とイギリス人は繰り返しました。"No," repeated the Englishman.
それがいつだったか日を繰って確かめた。I counted the days to see when it had happened.



カミナリが光ったその後【くわばらくわばら】と唱えたもしくは、唱える人を見たことがあるだろう。I expect you've chanted "kuwabara kuwabara" after a lightning flash, or have seen somebody do so.













その勇敢な行為で彼は勲章を貰った。His brave deeds earned him a medal.
宿題を忘れるなんて君は不注意だった。It was careless of you to forget your homework.
トニー君はなんと上手にテニスをすることができるのだろう。How well Tony can play tennis!
君子が恐れて踏み込まぬ所へも愚者は突入する。Fools rush in where angels fear to tread.

その君主は臣民に対して絶対の支配権を持っていた。The lord held absolute power over his subjects.

それらは君たちの椅子ではありません。Those are not your chairs.
その王は４０年間にわたって人民の上に君臨した。The king reigned over his people for forty years.







機長は気象訓示を受ける為に気象室へ行く。The captain will go to the meteorological office to get a weather briefing.





私たちは昨日防火訓練をした。We had a fire drill yesterday.

牧羊犬が、羊の群を牧場へ連れていく。A sheep dog drives the flock to the pasture.
群衆が現場に群がった。A crowd gathered at the scene.
鳥は群れをなして飛んでいた。The birds were flying in a group.














我が軍はその王国を襲った。Our army attacked the kingdom.












そのパレードは軍楽隊に先導された。The parade was led by an army band.



それは大きくて黒いアメリカの軍艦だった。It was a big black American warship.























彼らは軍事予算を増大させようとした。They intended to increase the military budget.






軍事訓練とは兵士たちが受ける訓練である。Military training is training given to soldiers.









その敷地は軍事上の目的で利用されている。The site is used for military purposes.



宇宙の利用は、日本の参加に関する限りでは、非軍事的目的に限定されるべきである。The use of space must be limited to non-military purposes, as far as Japan's involvement is concerned.








我々は軍事力を強化すべきだと、大統領は言っている。The President says we must beef up our military forces.

「これは・・・」「軍手とスコップ。園芸部基本道具のひとつだよ」"This is ..." "Working glove and trowel. One of a gardening club's basic tools."






軍縮は必ずや平和に寄与する。Disarmament is sure to make for peace.




彼は軍職を免職になった。He was discharged from the army.

安逸の生活が軍人精神をだめにした。Easy living corrupted the warrior spirit.




ナポレオンの軍勢は今や進撃し、大きな戦いが始まる。Napoleon's army now advanced and a great battle begins.







大尉は軍曹よりも階級が上だ。A captain is above a sergeant.



その軍隊は十分な武器を持っていた。The troops had plenty of arms.





その軍団は戦闘中多くの輝かしい作戦に従事した。The army was involved in a number of brilliant actions during the battle.









軍備のためにこのような巨額の支出が可能かどうかという問題を考えてみる必要がある。We must consider the question of whether we can afford such huge sums for armaments.


君は軍備縮小を支持すべきだ。You should advocate disarmament.




軍部は全領土を占領した。The armed forces occupied the entire territory.



























これは豊能郡の地図です。This is a map of the Toyono district.




係官は私を通してくれた。The official in charge let me in.








その係長は勤勉な男ではないが、上役にとり入る術を心得ているから、早く昇進するのだ。The chief clerk is not a hardworking man, but gets ahead rapidly because he knows how to curry favor with his superiors.



私は君の言うことには熱心に耳を傾けている。I am all ears to what you say.



その傾向はアメリカ人に強いようですね。That tendency is strong among Americans.


その土地は川に向かって緩やかに傾斜している。The land slopes gently toward the river.




その仕事に全努力を傾注しなければならない。We must concentrate our efforts on the desk.
彼らは１語も聞きもらすまいと傾聴した。They listened attentively so as not to miss a single word.




彼は懲役十年で、女房には三年の刑が下った。He was given ten years and his wife three.
彼は１０年の刑期を務めた。He served a ten-year prison term.



その泥棒は刑事を見ると走って逃げた。The thief ran away at the sight of a detective.











それは罪人に対する最も人道的な刑罰ではないか。Isn't that the most humane punishment for criminals?
証人が事実を隠せば刑法の罪に問われる。The concealment of facts by a witness is a criminal offense.


ここには刑務所があった。There used to be a prison here.







私の兄は技師になった。My brother became an engineer.
兄さんはよくおなりだと思いますが。I hope your brother is better.

「そっか。暇なら掃除しといて」「なんだそれ。兄貴をアゴで使うなよ」"Oh? If you're free get the cleaning done." "What's up with that? Don't order your brother around!"


ライト兄弟はエンジンで動く飛行機を飛ばすことに成功した。The Wright brothers succeeded in flying an airplane driven by an engine.あなたは何人兄弟がいますか。How many siblings do you have?






というわけで、人材を啓発するためのセンターが日本に作られるべきであろう。Therefore, a center for the development of human resources should be built in Japan.




６００―Ｊ型のプリンターが１９９７年の５月４日まで在庫切れとの御知らせありがとうございました。Thank you for letting me know that the Model 600-J printer will not be available until May 4, 1997.その像は型に入れられて作られた。The statue was cast in a mold.








退職を契機に茶道を始めた。I took the opportunity of retirement to begin studying the tea ceremony.
契約はかなりいいかげんなものだった。The contract was rather loose.

彼らは彼に無理矢理契約書にサインさせた。They made him sign the contract.
物質は温度によって形を変える。Matter changes its form according to temperature.神は自分の形に人を創造された。God created man in his own image.自然は、環境面での危険に対しては他の形の防御を与えている。Nature provides other forms of protection against environmental dangers.



これは亡くなった夫の形見としてお受け取りください。Please accept this as a keep-sake of my husband.
彼は粘土で像を形作った。He shaped the statue from clay.



彼はそれを小説の形式で表した。He expressed it in the form of fiction.朝食はバイキング形式だって。Breakfast is a smorgasbord.一般に若者は形式を嫌う。In general, young people dislike formality.



形勢は逆転した。Now the shoe is on the other foot.
世界の熱帯雨林は、この惑星上の生命が形成する生態学的な連鎖の中で、かけがえのない環をなしているのである。The world's tropical rainforests are critical links in the ecological chain of life on the planet.
その家には人の住んでいる形跡はなかった。The house gave no sign of life.

ジョギングは、運動として、好ましい形態になった。Jogging has become the favorite form of exercise.
このことの理由は、それらの形態素に変異形がまったく見出されなかったからである。The reason for this is that we found no variation of those morphemes.

その王女は形容できないほど美しかった。The princess was beautiful beyond description.
名詞を修飾するものは、形容詞または形容詞相当語句です。Things that modify nouns are adjectives or equivalent to adjectives.


神は私に富をお恵みくださった。God has blessed me with riches.
さまざまな才能に恵まれて、なんでもそつなくこなす姉にとって、平々凡々たる俺の存在はひどく許せないものらしい。For my multi-talented sister, able do anything with ease, it seems that my commonplace self is something whose existence she finds very hard to forgive.その男は私に金を恵んでくれと頼んだ。The man begged me for money.









彼は旗をかかげた。He put up a flag.以下に掲げる人が合格です。The following persons passed the examination.
それは昨日の産経新聞に掲載された。It came out in yesterday's Sankei.
掲示には「全席予約済み」とあった。"Fully booked" was on the notice.
掲示板には「危険！１万ボルト」と書いてある。The notice says, "Danger! 10,000 VOLTS."

彼らは固形燃料を携えていた。They brought solid fuel with them.
彼は医学の研究に携わっている。He is engaged in medical research.

アメリカ人は武器の携帯を許されている。Americans have the right to bear arms.最近の女子高生は、携帯でメールしているらしい。Lately high school girls are using their cell phones to exchange e-mail.
この型の携帯電話はよく売れています。This type of mobile phone sells well.
私たちは祖先をうやまうべきだ。We should worship our ancestors.
彼の家族は彼のことを敬愛していた。そしてある意味で彼は彼らに甘やかされていた。His family adored him and in a sense he was spoiled by them.
親に対して敬意を表さなければいけない。You should be respectful to your parents.
トムはすぐにヒステリーを起こすので、みんなが敬遠する。Tom loses his temper so easily that everybody avoids him.

日本語には敬語があります。The Japanese language has honorific expressions.
人にもよるけど、女性に対して「サー」（男性への敬称）を使うことは、とても失礼なことです。It depends on the person, but using "sir" for women (a title of honour for men) is very rude.





私たちは富士山の景観に感嘆した。We admired the view of Mt. Fuji.
近頃は景気が良くない。Business is so slow these days.

イタリア旅行で彼はいくつか景勝の地として有名な都市、例えば、ナポリやフィレンツェを訪れた。On his tour of Italy, he visited several cities which are famous for their scenic beauty, for instance, Naples and Florence.

その景色は言葉では表現できないほどだった。The scenery was beyond description.
その雑誌の購読予約をして景品をもらった。I got a premium for subscribing to the magazine.










彼女は六歳でピアノのけいこを始めた。She began lessons in piano at age 6.
Windows系ＯＳではアドミニストレーターアカウントがルートに相当する。With Windows OS systems 'administrator account' corresponds to 'root'.
徳川家の系図を列挙しなさい。Recite the names of the members of the Tokugawa clan.

システムのこの予測されなかった機能不全は不適切な配線系統によって引き起こされた。This unexpected malfunctioning of the system was caused by improper wiring.






時がどんどんたってゆく。Time is going by very quickly.

彼女が今の名声を得るに至ったいきさつは劇的である。The events that led up to her present fame are quite dramatic.
そのホテルは彼の叔父によって経営されている。The hotel is run by his uncle.






これは経営者の決定だ。This was an executive decision.
「日本の経営陣は米国の労働者の扱い方を身につけなければいけない」と彼は言った。Japanese management must learn how to deal with American workers, he said.



それ以来３年が経過した。Three years have passed since then.プロジェクトの経過は下記の通りです。The status of the project is as follows.

この仕事では経験がものを言う。Experience counts in this job.
彼は教師としての経験が浅い。He has little experience in teaching.

現在私どもは、カスタマーサービスの経験者を探しています。We are currently looking for individuals who have experience in customer service.

アメリカはサービス経済の国だ。The U.S. is a service economy.

経済回復の遅れは自動車の売り上げを急落させました。Slow economic recovery has sent auto sales plummeting.



彼には多少経済学の知識がある。He has a knowledge of economics.
小売物価指数は経済活動のバロメーターです。The retail price index is a barometer of economic activity.







あの国の経済状態は日ごとに変化する。That country's economic situation changes from day to day.




そのような国々、中でもアセアン諸国の人々は、日本の目覚ましい経済発展の秘密は教育であると信じている。People in such countries, especially the ASEAN countries, believe that the secret of Japan's remarkable economic growth is education.

２１世紀は経済力を基盤とするようになるだろう。The 21st century is going to be based on economic power.





赤道における経度1度当たりの長さ。Distance per degree of longitude at equator.
私たちは、経費を切りつめなければならない。We must cut down our expenses.


彼はホノルル経由で帰ってきた。He came back by way of Honolulu.

彼はビジネスの経歴がある。He has a background in business.
彼は１人で飛ぶことに慣れていた。そして彼は想像の中で何度もこの経路を飛んでいたのだ。He was accustomed to flying alone, and he had flown this route in his imagination many times.




誰が王位を継ぐのですか。Who will succeed to the throne?


彼は王位を継承することになっていた。He was to succeed to the throne.
英国人は自由の継承者である。The English are the heirs of freedom.

交渉を継続することで合意しました。We have agreed to continue the negotiations.



継母は彼女に辛く当たった。The stepmother was hard on her.
いすの継ぎ目はぐらぐらしていた。The joints of the chair were loose.
オランダ語はドイツ語と密接なつながりがある。Dutch is closely related to German.
その村と我々の町は橋でつながっています。The village is connected with our town by a bridge.電話がつながったよ。The call has come through.私たちは血がつながっている。We are related by blood.
すぐにおつなぎします。I'll put your call through in a minute.
スミスさんにつないで下さい。Please connect me with Mr Smith.
私のテープレコーダーは君のアンプにもつなげられる。My tape recorder is compatible with your amplifier.



その茎は君の小指よりやや太い。The stalk is a little bigger around than your little finger.


以前この辺にたくさんのホタルがいたものだった。There used to be lots of fireflies around here.




昭和天皇が靖国神社で７５年までに戦後計８回参拝した。In the post-War period, up until 1975, Emperor Showa prayed at the Yasukuni Shrine a total of 8 times.
彼女たちは、健一のはからいで、町の様々な場所で働くことになった。Thanks to the arrangements made by Ken'ichi, the women found various places to work around town.

損失の程度は計り知れない。The extent of the damage is inestimable.
その計画では彼に同調できました。We went with him on that plan.
どうやって実行にうつそう。How can we put it into practice?
わたしの再組織計画案が失敗した後、昇進の願いは全て失敗に終わった。All hope of my promotion went up in smoke after my reorganization plan fell through.

例えば、温度計や気圧計などの計器は器具です。For instance, gauges, such as thermometers and barometers, are instruments.
旅行の総費用を計算してくれますか。Can you work out the total cost of the trip?彼は自分の行為の結果がどうなるかを計算した。He calculated the consequences of his action.



計算書は四半期ごとに郵送されます。Statements will be mailed every quarter.

国防のため大きな額が計上された。A considerable amount of money was appropriated for the national defense.





計量する前にすりきりしなさい。Level off the sugar when measuring out.




彼は我々を警戒しているようだ。He seems to be wary of us.

２０人の警官が現場に現れた。Twenty police have arrived on the scene.


彼は私の警告に全く注意を払わなかった。He paid no attention to my warning.


その場合には警察を呼びなさい。In that case, call the police.
警察官がその泥棒を逮捕した。The policeman arrested the thief.
どのようにすれば警察署につけますか。How can I get to the police station?

警察当局はその犯罪が重大であると考えた。The police considered the crime to be serious.





５００人の警官が厳重な警備態勢おかれた。500 policemen were put on strict alert.


その警報で皆部屋から飛び出した。The alarm sent everyone rushing out of the room.

警棒で空をなぐりつけ、よろめいて体勢をたてなおしたガードマンは、自分に向かって突進してくる金網づくりのクズカゴを見た。The guard's truncheon hit air. Off balance, he regained his posture to see a metal-mesh rubbish bin flying towards him.

えりのスーツケースは重たそうだが、実際はとても軽い。Although Eri's suitcase looks heavy, it's actually very light.終わったあとも足が軽い感じがしました。I felt very light on my feet afterwards.しかし彼に大きなけがはなく、軽い打撲傷で済んだ。However he wasn't seriously hurt and got away with light bruising.
彼は私の不平を軽んじた。He made little of my complaints.


リズムは軽快でテンポは速く、その曲は若者に好まれている。The rhythm is light, and the tempo fast - that song is liked by young people.




軽挙妄動を慎んでください。Please behave prudently.





彼はわれわれの努力を軽視する。He makes little of our efforts.
彼は交通事故で軽傷を負った。He was slightly injured in a traffic accident.



軽食の出来るカフェがありますか。Is there a cafe where I can have a light meal?






「見た目は悪くないがちょっと軽薄そう」な外見とは裏腹に、彼女はいないし、女性に手が早いワケでもない。In contrast to his "not bad looks but seems a bit of a dandy" appearance, he didn't have a girlfriend and he wasn't particularly fast with the ladies.


私は彼をひどく軽蔑している。I have a fine contempt for him.




あの連中は軽率で、仕事がのろかったから、くびになった。They got the sack for being careless and tardy.






肥えた鶏は卵を産まない。Fat hens lay few eggs.この鶏の唐揚げをそのままにしておくのですか。Are you going to let this fried chicken go begging?
彼は小さな鶏舎を持っている。He keeps a small poultry yard.

鶏肉を３ポンド分ください。I'd like three pounds of chicken.この鶏肉はよく揚げられている。This chicken is fried well.

鶏卵生産におけるサルモネラ汚染を防止することが必要です。It is essential to prevent salmonella contamination in hen egg production.

歌舞伎は古くからの日本の芸術だ。Kabuki is an old Japanese art.
人は誰でも芸術家になれるわけではない。Not everybody can be an artist.
あのレンブラントの絵は芸術作品です。That painting by Rembrandt is a work of art.
父はおおよそ非芸術的な人だ。My father is far from artistic.
彼は芸人として成功した。He made good as an entertainer.

私はその犬を芸当ができるように訓練した。I trained the dog to do tricks.

ジャネットは芸能界での名声を求めていた。Janet was seeking for fame in the world of show business.
今日お気に入りの芸能人が出てるミュージカルを見に行った。彼は、今年の一押しだね。I went to a musical with my favorite actor today. He's the one must-see for this year.


そこにいて下さい。迎えに行きますから。Stay put. I'll come and get you.
医者を迎えにやったとき彼が病気になって１週間たっていた。He had been ill for a week when they sent for a doctor.６時にホテルに車で迎えて下さい。Please pick me up at the hotel at six o'clock.彼をすぐに迎えてやることに決まった。It was decided that he should be sent for at once.

こんな時は、迎え酒に限ります。In times like this, there's nothing like a hair of the dog.

このまま障壁を張っていても死ぬのを待つだけだ！だから俺たちは障壁の外に出て、敵を迎撃する、いいな！？To keep holding the barrier up is just to wait for death! So we're going to go out past the wall and counter attack the enemy, you ready!?

あの党はいつも中流階級に迎合しています。That party is always pandering to the middle class.

生きているクジラを見たことがある。I have once seen a live whale.



劇はちょうど定刻に始まった。The play began exactly on time.





イギリスの劇作家でシェイクスピアに匹敵する者はほかにいない。No other English dramatist rivals Shakespeare.



さあ劇場に着いたぜ。Here we are at the theater.

その劇団は３幕ものの劇を上演した。The company presented a three-act play.



彼女が今の名声を得るに至ったいきさつは劇的である。The events that led up to her present fame are quite dramatic.






警察は空砲を撃った。The police officer fired a blank.猟師は熊を撃った。The hunter shot a bear.

人々は侵略を撃退することができた。The people could repel the invasion.

彼らは空襲を受けたとき敵の飛行機を２機撃墜した。They shot down two enemy planes during the raid.
敵の旗艦を撃破しました！We've destroyed the enemy flagship!

その会社は競争の激化のあおりを受けて、倒産した。Having fallen victim to increased competition, the company went bankrupt.
先進国では虫歯が激減し、自分の歯で一生食べられる人が増えています。Cavities have become rarer in the developed countries and more people will be able to eat with their own teeth throughout their life.
彼の勇気には激賞に値する。His courage is worthy of high praise.
我々は激情を抑えねばならない。We must control our passions.
ここで激戦が行われた。A fierce battle was fought here.

その子は激怒していてどうにもならない。The child is helpless in his rage.


二台のバンが激突してめり込んだ。The two vans telescoped together.この週末には２つの最強のチームが激突する。The two strongest teams will clash with each other this weekend.


あなたの激励がなかったら、この計画は諦めていたでしょうね。Without your encouragement, I should have given up the plan.
我々の会社は激烈な競争に耐えきれなかった。Our company failed to survive against cutthroat competition.
彼はすきだらけだ。He is utterly unguarded.逃げるすきはなかった。I had no chance to escape.
歯が抜けて隙間が空いていた。His teeth had gaps.
この２桁は省くべきだ。You should leave out these two lines.医者なら６桁の収入は珍しくない。A six-figure income is not uncommon for physicians.

その偉大な画家の傑作が壁にさかさまにかかっているを見て、彼は驚いた。He was surprised to find the great artist's masterpiece hung on the wall upside down.わははは！そりゃ傑作だ！A-ha-ha-ha! What a blunder!

ターナーは同時代の画家の中でも傑出している。Turner stands out among the painters of his time.

さすがは、王子様ですわね。きっとただならない傑物の素質をお持ちなのですわ。Isn't that just what you'd expect from the prince? He certainly has the character of a truly great man.
スポーツではチームの和が成功には欠かせません。In sport, team harmony is vital to success.
彼は人間としての感情を欠いていた。He was devoid of human feeling.

奥歯が欠けました。My back tooth has chipped.夢に欠けている主な事は首尾一貫性である。The main thing that dreams lack is consistency.メアリーは思いやりに欠けている。Mary is lacking in delicacy.


このシステムには明らかな欠陥がある。This system has obvious defects.
この間の金曜日の欠勤を弁解できるからね。Can you account for your absence last Friday?

その飛行機は濃霧のために欠航になった。The flight was cancelled because of the thick fog.


あの先生の講義はあくびが出る。His lectures are terribly boring.
欠席された友人たちのために、乾杯しましょう。Let's drink to absent friends.

同社は第一四半期に４億ドルの欠損を出した。The company incurred a deficit of $400 million during the first quarter.
欠点があるけどやはり彼が好きです。I love him despite his faults.
それは相互理解の欠如がもとになっていると思う。I think that is based on a lack of mutual understanding.


彼らはパンのかけらを置くことによって道に迷わなかった。Putting pieces of bread prevented them from getting lost.彼は勇気のかけらもなかった。He didn't have a grain of courage.
知識は欠乏しており、知恵はさらに乏しい。Knowledge is scarce; wisdom is scarcer.
男女関係における嫉妬はしばしば信頼の欠落によってもたらされる。Jealousy in a relationship is often brought about by a lack of trust.

アンディはけっしてデートにおくれたことはない。Andy is never late for a date.
まだどちらと決したわけではありませんので、引き続き成り行きを見守りたいと思います。I haven't decided either way. I want to keep an eye on how things go.
毎日、決まりきったことをしている。I follow my routine every day.

決まり文句は便利だ、熟慮の必要がないのだから。A formula is very convenient, because you need not think about it.
そこに行くことに決めた。I made up my mind to go there.
本人は唯我独尊を決め込んでいるようだけども、周りから見れば単なるわがままだよね。He's completely convinced of his own greatness but to the people around him he's just a selfish jerk.私は、議論が終わるのを辛抱強く待つことに決め込んだ。I decided to bide my time and wait for the argument to finish.
ワインが食事の決め手です。Wine can make the meal.
そういうの、先入観っていうんだよっ！体験したこと無いのに、決め付けるのはよくないっ！That's what they call 'prejudice'! It's wrong to make your mind up on something you've never experienced!上司は僕の仕事振りがいい加減だと決め付けた。My boss took me to task for the poor quality of my work.
彼女は私に自分の決意を知らせてくれた。She informed me of her decision.
大雨のためにダムが決壊した。The dam burst owing to the heavy rain.
その集会はいかなる核武装にも抗議することを決議した。The assembly voted to protest against any nuclear armament.
その会社の労働者はストを決行した。Workers at the company went on a strike.



その会社は毎年３月に決算をする。The company closes its books at the end of March.


決勝まで残った走者は５人だった。Five runners reached the finals.

すぐ決心するようにしてください。Try to make up your mind soon.


決断の日は近い。The day of decision is at hand.
われわれは最終的決定を行った。We've made a final decision.
金を出す者に決定権がある。He who pays the piper calls the tune.
きっと無罪になるだけの決定的切り札を隠し持っているに違いない。I'm sure he has something up his sleeve.
西園寺は決闘に勝つと思っていたのに負けた。Kyouichi Saionji, who he supposed would win the duel, has lost.
仲間と決別してから、他のプレイヤーを邪魔するようになった・・。After the break-up with her game partners she started to make trouble for other players.
交渉の決裂は戦争を引き起こすことになるだろう。A breakdown in the negotiations will mean war.
出処進退の潔さをわきまえている、と彼は言っているけれど、いざとなったらどうだかね。He always talks as though he knows how to handle himself but you never know how he'll act when the chips are down.
私は彼が潔白だと断言した。I affirmed that he was innocent.

そして各チームはボールを蹴ってこの穴に通そうと互いに競い合ったのです。And the teams competed with each other to try to kick the ball through this hole.ミーティングに穴をあけてしまったことに対し、再度お詫びします。Let me apologize once again for missing our meeting.
時々、自分のけつを思いきり蹴りあげてやりたくなる。Sometimes I feel like kicking my own rump.





アナグマは深い穴を掘る。Badgers dig deep holes.

この温泉は穴場だね。This hot spring is a great find.

その国は貿易上の赤字の穴埋めに懸命である。The country is trying hard to make up for her trade deficit.
彼女は髪を結ってもらうために美容院に行った。She went to the hairdresser's to have her hair done.



彼の努力が好成績に結びついた。His efforts led to good results.
ロープを木に結び付けなさい。Fasten the rope to the tree.我々はしばしば黒色を死と結び付けて考える。We often associate black with death.
その結び目を守るのは重要なことだ。Maintaining that tie is important.
彼らは都市を鉄道で結ぶことを計画中だ。They are planning to connect the cities with a railroad.実も結ぶが、挿し木でも根付くらしい？It bears fruit, but it seems it may even set root from cuttings?
母は１本の紐で３本の鉛筆を結わえた。Mother tied up three pencils with a piece of string.
私達は息を殺して実験の結果を待った。We held our breath and waited for the result of the experiment.結果は気にするな。Don't worry about the results.結果、計算ミスが多い。There are a lot of results and a calculation mistakes.

何年か前には、結核にかかっていると知らされることは死の宣告を聞くのに等しかった。Some years ago, learning that one had tuberculosis amounted to hearing a sentence of death.

ゆっくりと着実なのが結局勝つ。Slow and steady wins the race.


好奇心がお旺盛なのは大変に結構なことである。A healthy curiosity is truly a fine thing.どちらの日でも結構です。Either day is OK.いや結構です。たくさんいただきました。No more, thank you. I'm full.
これらの州は結合して１つの国になった。These states were united into one nation.

結婚の申し込みが殺到した。Marriage proposals flooded in.
妊婦妻がいるのに結婚指輪外して合コンに参加してもいいですか？Is it OK for me to remove my wedding ring and go to a dating party when I have a pregnant wife?
彼らの結婚式に招待された。I was invited to their wedding.
私の結婚祝いに何くれる？What will you give me at my wedding?
あなたは私の結婚披露宴にもっと早く来るべきだったのに。You ought to have come to my wedding reception earlier.


非喫煙者は新しい禁煙法を支持して結集しています。Non-smokers are rallying behind the new anti-smoking law.
彼は海水から塩を結晶させて取り出した。He crystallized salt from seawater.あのかわいい赤ちゃんは彼らの愛の結晶です。That cute baby is the fruit of their love.


ボート競技に参加する為に新チームが結成された。A new team was formed in order to take part in the boat race.









よく結膜炎を起こします。I often get conjunctivitis.
物語は結末に近づいた。The story drew to a conclusion.
二人は同じ結論に到達した。The two came to the same conclusion.



ナイフは血に塗れていた。The knife was covered in blood.私たちは血がつながっている。We are related by blood.


あなたは血も涙も無い人ね。You are a cold-blooded person, aren't you?

血圧を計りましょう。Let me take your blood pressure.
血液は体内を循環する。Blood circulates through the body.


あなたの血液型は何ですか。What's your blood group?

正直なところ、その当時の僕は血縁がどうとか、続柄がどうとか、そういう話はまるで理解出来ちゃいなかった。Truthfully, at that time, I didn't have the first idea about such talk: family links, blood relations or whatever.
切れた血管から血がどくどくと流れ出た。Blood poured from the cut vein.



血筋は争えない。Blood is thicker than water.
適度な運動は血行をよくする。Moderate exercise stimulates the circulation of the blood.

路上の血痕は俺のものに違いない。The blood on the road must be mine.


彼女の顔は健康そうな血色をしていた。Her face glowed with health.



彼は私の血族である。He is my relative.



その作家はギリシャの王家の血統を引いていた。The writer was descended from the Greek royal family.






宇宙船は月を回る軌道を外れている。The spaceship is out of orbit around the moon.彼は月に３０万円稼ぐ。He earns 300,000 yen a month.







非常に高い収入を得るチャンスがあるビジネス、月額１００万円可能！！There's the chance to get a huge income in this business, a million yen a month is possible!

彼は新しい月刊誌を出版するつもりだ。He intends to bring out a new monthly magazine.
月間報告書を添付します。Attached is my monthly report.
私の月給は30万円だ。My monthly wage is 300,000 yen.
私は月ぎめで部屋を借りている。I rent a room by the month.



月経周期は約４週間です。My menstrual cycle is about every four weeks.

明日、月見の会があるだろう。They will have a moon-viewing party tomorrow.

月光は水面を明るく照らした。The moon fell brightly on the water.



このスイミングスクールの毎月の月謝はいくらですか。How much is the monthly fee of this swimming school?
彼は月収２０００ドルの金が入る。He has a monthly income of 2,000 dollars.


月食は珍しい現象だ。An eclipse of the moon is a rare phenomenon.




その二つの事件の間には何年もの月日が経っている。Years intervene between the two incidents.
このテレビを月賦で買った。I bought this TV on the installment plan.
月並みのパーティーだったよ。That was just another party.


月末に近づいている。The month is drawing to an end.

彼は月面に着陸した最初の人だった。He was the first man to land on the moon.
子供たちは月夜に踊るひなぎくを見ることができませんでした。The children failed to see the daisies dancing in the moonlight.
国会は来週月曜に開かれる。The Diet will open next Monday.
月曜日はいつも憂鬱だ。I always feel blue on Mondays.
月例のスタッフミーティングは決して月曜日には開かれない。The monthly staff meeting is never held on Monday.
私たちのクラブは次の水曜日に月例会を開きます。Our club will hold its monthly meeting next Wednesday.

ちょうどその時、件の二人が登校してきた。Just then the two in question arrived at school.
私はこの件に関しては、あなたに賛成です。I agree with you on this issue.死亡事例が19件と全体の20％を超えており、過労死の深刻な実態が浮き彫りになった。With 19 cases of death forming over 20% of the whole, the grave reality of overwork-deaths has been thrown into relief.
交通事故の件数が増加している。There has been an increase in the number of traffic accidents.
内容が件名で判断出来ますので、記入をお願い致します。I use the subject line to determine the contents so please fill it in.

彼女はけちとは言わないまでも、とてもつましい。She is very frugal, not to say stingy.

彼は金をためるため何年間もけちけち倹約した。He pinched and scraped for many years to save money.
彼はけちとは言わないまでも倹約家だ。He is thrifty, not to say stingy.


オルダス・ハックスリーが人間のもっとも危険な条件だと考えたのは倦怠であった。It was boredom that Aldous Huxley considered one of the most dangerous human conditions.




お宮参りで訪れた大西幸治さん(40)、由希恵さん(34)夫妻は「子どもが健やかに育つことを祈りました」と話していた。The couple who came on a shrine visit, Kouji Oonishi (40) and his wife Yukie (34) said, "We prayed that our child would grow up healthily."


彼が直向きに生きるその姿は実に健気です。The single-minded way he gets on with his life is truly admirable.
そんなに長い距離を歩いたなんて彼は健脚にちがいない。He must be a good walker to have walked such a long distance.
こんなに長い距離を歩いたなんて彼は健脚家に違いない。He must be a good walker to have walked such a long distance.
煙草をすうことは健康に悪い。Smoking is bad for the health.



２歳の娘の健康診断をお願いします。I'd like to get a medical examination for my two-year-old daughter.
医者や病院は、再び健康体になれる人々の手助けをすべきです。Doctors and hospitals should help the people who can get healthy again.

海辺の空気はきれいで健康的だ。The air by the sea is pure and healthy.


その会社は全社員に対して健康保険と生命保険をかけている。The company provides health and life insurance benefits for all of its employees.


彼女の４人の姉妹のうち１人は他界したが、ほかは健在だ。One of her four sisters has passed away, but the others are still with us.





母子ともに健全です。Mother and child are both doing well.












この雑誌の編集者兼出版社が一部の読者から批判された。The editor and publisher of this magazine was criticized by some readers.

こういう事情ですから、残念ながら、せっかくのご招待をお受けいたしかねるのです。As such is the case, I am sorry I can't accept your kind invitation.今日は、ばーさんのお使いを兼ねて街で買い物。Today I'm shopping in town as well as running an errand for my grandmother.私は勉強と遊びを兼ねている仕事につきたい。I want to get a job that mixes work and play.


その本を書いた人は、機知とユーモアを兼ね備えた人だね。The person who wrote that book is possessed of both humour and wit, isn't he?
















この書斎は客間兼用だ。I also use this study for receiving guests.
この券は２週間有効です。This ticket is good for two weeks.

剣を取る者は皆剣で滅びる。All who take up the sword will perish by the sword.














ついに剣道の呼吸をつかんだ。I've finally got the knack of kendo.







彼は非常な剣幕で私をにらみ付けた。He glared at me fiercely.

ケンとけんかしたのか。Did you have a fight with Ken?
えらくご機嫌ななめね、けんか腰にならないで。Wow, you're really in a bad mood. Don't get scrappy.

大都会の喧騒と雑踏の中に住んでいると、時折田舎に出かけて行きたくなる。Living in the noise and bustle of a large city, we sometimes feel like going into the country.
彼女のイントネーションから推すに少女時代はスペイン語圏に住んでいたと思われる。You can tell by her intonation that she lived in a Spanish speaking country when she was young.


卵は硬くゆでてください。Boil the eggs hard.このふたは固くて取れないよ。This lid is too tight for me to open.その機械の骨組みは堅くなければならない。The frame of the machine should be rigid.

堅苦しいことはぬきにしましょう。Let's dispense with formalities.
その市の防御は堅固だ。The defenses of the city are strong.






彼は堅物だから、どうも息子が転職するのにいい顔をしないんだよね。He's a really straight-laced guy, so he doesn't like the idea of his son changing jobs.

建築物は、現在では昔よりずっと堅牢になっている。Buildings are much stronger now than they used to be.
「あなたは仕事が気に入っていると思います」「いやそれどころか、嫌いです」"I think you like your job." "On the contrary, I hate it."ジムくんは行き過ぎの嫌いがある。Jim tends to go too far.
彼女は人前で話をするのを嫌う。She detests speaking in public.
彼女はエレベーターの中で性的いやがらせを受けた。She was sexually harassed in an elevator.
彼女の厚化粧が嫌らしい。Her thick makeup is disgusting.
ひどい仕打ちに彼の嫌悪感は憎しみに変った。Bad treatment fanned his dislike to hate.

丸田さんたちの騒がしさにはほんとうに嫌気がさした。I'm getting sick and tired of Ms Maruta and her noisy friends.
彼に窃盗の嫌疑がかかっている。He is under suspicion of theft.
この寺院は７８０年に建てられた。This temple dates back to 780.






良質の建材が不足している。There is a shortage of good building wood.

その金は体育館の建設に当てられた。The money was appropriated for building the gymnasium.
その役人は建設会社から賄賂を受け取った容疑をかけられた。The official was suspected of accepting bribes from the construction companies.
イギリス式の朝食はイギリス帝国の建設者たちによって流行らせたものだ。The English breakfast was made popular by the architects of the British Empire.

彼女が建設的な構想を持つ。She has constructive ideas.

これはわが国で建造された最大のタンカーです。This is the largest tanker that has ever been constructed in our country.
これは私が見た中で一番どっしりとした建造物です。This is the most massive structure I have ever seen.
彼らは家の建築にとりかかった。They set about building a house.
建築家は芸術家ぶってはならない。An architect should not pretend to be an artist.


あそこの建物が燃えているに違いない。That building must be on fire.
システィナ礼拝堂は、１４７３年にバティカン宮殿内に建立された壮大な礼拝堂です。The Sistine Chapel is a vast chapel built inside the Vatican Palace in 1473.
首相は憲章に署名した。The Premier subscribed his name to the charter.
憲政の危機が始まったのは、このような状況のもとであった。It was under these circumstances that the constitutional crisis began.

アメリカには憲法上の抑制と均衡という入念な制度がある。America has an elaborate system of constitutional checks and balances.







トム、懸垂何回できる？How many chin-ups can you do, Tom?

世界の航空産業は墜落事故についての懸念を募らせている。The world's aviation industry is growing increasingly worried about crashes.
父は私が懸命に働かなければならないと言った。My father said that I must work hard.
おまえも決して戦う拳を忘れるな。Never lose your fighting fists.
彼はげんこつでテーブルをたたいた。He struck his fist on the table.
その男は腰に拳銃をさげていた。The man wore a gun on his hip.


彼女は早口でまくしたてて、人をまるめこみます。She talks a very fast game.
半角カタカナをインターネット上の色んな所で使えば、いつか顰蹙をかいまくる事になるよ。If you go around the Internet, using half-width katakana in various places, eventually you're going to end up pissing off a lot of people.
彼女はぼんやりと雑誌のページをめくっていた。She was idly turning over the pages of a magazine.


「百八といえば煩悩の数だ」「お兄ちゃんはどんな煩悩があるの？」「言ってもいいが、検閲削除になるぞ」"Talking about 108, that's the number of worldly passions." "What worldly passions have you got then?" "I could say, but it'll get censored out."

私は検眼をしてもらいに病院に行きました。I went to the hospital to have my eyes tested.


子宮癌の検査をしていただきたいのです。I'd like to have a Pap smear done.
政府はその問題の決定案をまだ検索中だ。The government is still groping for a solution to the problem.
検察側は被告が子供を誘拐したと激しく非難した。The prosecution condemned the defendant for kidnapping a child.

検事は誘導尋問をした。The prosecutor asked me a leading question.
その食品の中からコレラ菌が検出された。Cholera germs were found in the food.
この段階を踏まえ、抑圧という概念をさらに詳細に検証していくことになります。From this point we go on to an even more detailed examination of the concept of repression.


ＳＴＥＰという文字は日本英語検定協会を表している。The letters STEP stand for the Society for Testing English Proficiency.
私たちはその件を詳細に検討した。We debated the matter at length.

コンピューターを見つけ、検尿を入れて１０ドルを払った。He located the computer, poured in the sample and deposited the $10.00.

検便をする必要があります。You need to have a stool examination.
警官は車を１台１台検問した。The police checked up on each car.
同盟軍はバグダッドの検問所で彼女の車を襲撃した。The coalition force fired at her car at the checkpoint in Baghdad.

息子は二人とも王位継承権があると主張した。Both sons pretended to the throne.
学生たちは権威に反抗した。The students revolted against authority.その建築家は権威ある賞を受賞したことを自慢した。The architect boasted that he had received a prestigious award.その教授はシェイクスピアの権威である。That professor is an authority on Shakespeare.



何の権限で私に出て行けと言うのだ。Who are you to tell me to get out?




この前の講和会議で完全に失敗してから、彼は斬新な権謀術策で十分に武装すべきことを学んだ。His utter failure at the last peace conference has taught him to arm himself to the teeth with new tricks and tactics.

あなたにはそこに行く権利がない。You have no right to go there.

王は権力を奪われた。The king was shorn of his power.










彼女は吠える犬を怖がる。She is afraid of barking dogs.気をつけて。警察の犬がかぎ回ってる。Watch out! A police spy is snooping around.

プチッ、と糸を犬歯で噛み切った。I snapped the thread on my canine.


彼は犬小屋作りに取りかかった。He went about making a doghouse.



多くのアメリカの政治家は選挙キャンペーンのため金持ちからの献金をあてにしている。Many U.S. politicians depend on contributions from fat cats for their campaigns.
献血はいやだ。I'm uneasy about donating blood.

仕事場の管理者は、正確さ、効率性、献身を期待する。Office managers expect accuracy, efficiency, and dedication.




それほど多くの人々のための料理の献立を考えるのはむずかしい。It is difficult planning meals for so many people.

私はエイズの研究に従事している。I am engaged in AIDS research.



企業は規模を縮小し、研究開発にふりむける利益分も減らしています。Corporations are downsizing and reducing the amount of profits they put back into R&D.
彼は自分の研究室で実験を行っている。He is carrying out experiments in his laboratory.
紫外線の急激な上昇は研究者たちにオゾンホールの存在を信じさせた。The sudden increase of ultraviolet rays made the researchers believe in the existence of ozone holes.
彼女はまだ若い研究生のうちに大発見をした。She made a great discovery while yet a young student.

私の専門の研究分野は社会学です。My special branch of study is sociology.



研修会は午後4時開始予定です。The training session is scheduled to begin at 4 p.m.


研修生達は彼から与えられた指示がさっぱりわからなかった。He gave instructions to the trainees, but they couldn't make heads or tails of them.

この美しいドレスは絹で出来ている。This beautiful dress is made of silk.
あの商人は絹織物を商う。The merchant deals in silk goods.







チューリップは、私たちの県の県花です。Tulips are our prefecture's official flower.





その県知事は７月の選挙で勝利をおさめました。The prefectural governor got the upper hand in the July elections.


ああ、多分この県道まっすぐで・・・。Ah, I reckon you go straight down this prefectural road ...




肩が痛い。I have a pain in the shoulder.

何よ！またその子の肩を持つ気！？What! You going to take her side again!?

肩こりがひどいのです。I have a bad stiff neck.

パパ、肩車して。Give me a ride on your shoulders, Daddy.








ジムは肩幅が広い。Jim has broad shoulders.
奴隷たちは宗教に活力を見いだす。Slaves find power in religion.
聖霊がある方の上に下って、その上にとどまられるのが見えたなら、その方こそ聖霊によってバプテスマを授ける方である。The man on whom you see the Spirit come down and remain is he who will baptize with the Holy Spirit.１１ページの地図はとても奇妙に見える。逆さまにしてみると、見慣れた地図になる。The map on page 11 looks very strange. Turn it upside down. Then it becomes a familiar map to you.佐藤さんという方があなたの留守中にお見えになりました。A person named Sato came to visit while you were out.
追及されて、つい、見え透いた嘘をついてしまった。I was pressed by their questioning and slipped into telling an obvious lie.

君は彼を見くびっている。You are selling him short.
どうやら、そのみすぼらしいアパートは空き家のようだ。Apparently that shabby flat is vacant.
彼は他の生徒の見せしめになっただろう。He was punished as a warning to other students.
彼女は宝石を得意げに見せびらかした。She proudly displayed her jewels.
彼女は背を高く見せるためにハイヒールをはいている。She wears high heels to make herself look taller.取り繕うように、笑ってみせる。She smiled to smooth things over.どんな手を使ってでも勝ちとってみせる。I'll win no matter what it takes.
彼女の涙はほんの見せかけであった。Her tears were just for effect.
やつらに実力の差を見せ付けてやった。I showed them the difference of ability.

人前でああいうみっともないことはするな。Don't do such a shameful thing in public.
ここでも、このアプローチがマシュー・アーノルドの「どこにも連結がある」という考えに由来していることを見て取ることができる。Again, we can see this approach as deriving from Matthew Arnold's idea that everywhere there is connection.

１０ページの５行目をみなさい。Let's begin with the fifth line on page 10.頭がくらくらしているので、深く考えずにいい加減なことを書いてみる。My head is swimming, so I'll try writing any old stuff without any deep thought.私も親の面倒とか見られないですね。I can't look after my parents and such either.
あまりにお変わりになっていて見違えるほどです。You have changed so much that I can hardly recognize you.

彼は大学を卒業して、いつも見栄を張っていた。He had graduated from the university and was always showing off.
女王の訪問を見越して展示会が開催された。An exhibition was given in anticipation of the Queen's visit.


貧者を見下してはいけない。Don't look down on the poor.
その建物から町全体が見下ろせる。The building looks down on the whole town.

あなたの見解は私とは正反対です。Your views are quite opposite to mine.
ポストを探して辺りを見回した。I looked about for the mailbox.

その小さい男の子は目を大きく見開いて巨大な象を見た。The little boy gazed at the huge elephant, eyes wide open.

その実施見学は非常にためになった。I found the field trip very educational.


ノートを教科書と見間違えた。I mistook a notebook for a textbook.
何か新しい考えを思いつくたびに、彼は前後の見境もなくそれを実行する傾向がある。He's given to going overboard every time he gets a new idea.
眼は手を見極め得るが、心までは見極め得ない。The eye may see for the hand, but not for the mind.
ここだけの話だけれど、あの太った見苦しい魔女は減量中なのだ。Between ourselves, the fat ugly witch is on a diet.
これらの品物は見計らい品です。Those goods are on approval.


彼女は弁護士になった途端に古い友達を見向きもしようとしなかった。Soon after she became a lawyer, she wouldn't even give her old friends the time of day.
私は彼がおじさんの世話で今日見合いをすることを知っています。I know that he will be introduced to a lady by his uncle today.

三人の少年たちは互いに顔を見合った。The three boys looked at one another.このお金であなたの要求に見合いますか。Will this amount of money meet your need?
ガラクタを見て、彼らは互いに顔を見合わせました。They looked at the rubbish, then they looked at each other.
今年の売り上げは倍増と見込んでいます。Sales should double this year.君を見込んで頼んでいるんだ。I'm asking you to do this because I trust you.
桜が見ごろだ。The cherry blossoms are at their best.
彼は私を見殺しにした。He sold me down the river.

彼のスイングは実に見事だ。He has a perfect swing.
我々は時代に一歩先んじた見識を持たねばならない。We must be a step ahead of the times in our outlook.
我々は群衆の中で彼女を見失った。We lost sight of her in the crowd.
彼は友人から見捨てられてしまった。He was deserted by his friends.

あなたの両親が私たちを見守ってくれました。Your parents kept an eye on us.
彼には容易に政治家としての態度が見うけられる。You can easily see the politician in him.
シュヴァイツァーは見習うべき人間です。Schweitzer is a man to imitate.

この辞書は見出し語が約４万はいっている。This dictionary contains about 40,000 headwords.
見上げると彼が入って来た。Looking up, I saw him come in.
我々は将来を見据えつつ、今そこにある危機を乗り越えていかねばならない。We have to look the future straight in the eye and prepare to get through the coming crisis.

そのホテルは見晴らしがよい。The hotel has a good prospect.
タワーからは眼下に平野が見晴らせる。From the tower you can look out across the plain spread beneath your eyes.
破壊の結果、毎日５０種類もの野生の動植物が消滅していると見積もられている。It has been estimated that, as a result of the destruction, fifty species of wildlife are disappearing from the earth each day.
できるだけ早くお見積書をいただけますようにお願いします。We are looking forward to receiving your quote as soon as possible.

私は空港へ母を見送りに行った。I went to the airport to see my mother off.政府が今国会への改正案提出の見送り方針を固めたことを歓迎する一方、小泉首相が提出断念を明言していない点を警戒する声も上がった。While welcoming the firming up of the present government policy to abandon the proposal of the reform bill to the Diet, at the same time some are worried that Prime Minister Koizumi won't clearly state the bill's withdrawal.
両親は空港まで私を見送ってくれた。My parents came to the airport to see me off.私たちは彼が見えなくなるまで見送った。We watched him until he was out of sight.彼に会う機会を見送った。I passed up an opportunity to see him.
私はすぐ出かけた、もしそうしていなかったら、パレードを見損なっていただろう。I left at once, otherwise I would have missed the parade.

その犬は見知らぬ人には誰にでも吠える。The dog barks at all strangers.
この見地からすると、君の言うことは正しい。From this point of view, you are right.
ビキニスタイルの美少女は浜辺では目を見張らすものだった。The pretty girl in the bikini was an eye-opener on the beach.
選挙区の見直しの試みは、反対の壁にぶちあたりました。Attempts to redraw voting districts have hit a wall of opposition.
見直したよ。I'm seeing you in a new light.
私は彼女の考えを見通した。I read anger in her face.彼女の先を見通す力が社の課題表明文書をまとめるうえで役立った。Her futuristic vision helped shape the company's mission statement.
この城から町を見渡すことができる。This castle overlooks the city.
それがどこにあるのか、およその見当はついている。I have a rough idea where it is.
なんだか見当がつきません。I've no idea what's happening.
スーツケースが一つ見あたりません。One of my suitcases is missing.
ウッ、嘘をついているのを見透かされて、答えに困った。Uh-oh. He knew I was lying - saw right through me. I didn't know what to say.

私は彼らの陰謀をすぐに見抜いた。I saw through their plot at once.
彼は入院中の病気の友人を見舞った。He visited a sick friend who was in the hospital.マグニチュード５の地震が東京を見舞った。An earthquake of magnitude 5 shook Tokyo.
私達は横浜を見物した。We did the sights of Yokohama.
彼が飛行機に乗り込むと、見物人が集まってきた。Spectators gathered as he climbed into the plane.
彼と彼の兄を見分けるのは簡単だ。It is easy to tell him from his brother.
彼の話からその見聞の広さがうかがわれた。His talk led me to believe that he knows a great deal.
自分の目耳で見聞きしていないものは、本当かもしれないが、本当ではないかもしれない。What you don't see and hear with your own ears and eyes might be true, but it might also not be true.
驚いて彼女の顔を見返した。I stared back at her in surprise.
彼は何の見返りも求めないで、昔の友人の娘さんに全財産を譲った。He gave away his entire fortune to an old friend's daughter, and expected nothing in return.
私の見方ではもう少し待つほうがよさそうだ。From my point of view, it would be better to wait a little longer.その戦争は日本人の核兵器に対する見方に影響を与えた。The war affected the way the Japanese view nuclear weapons.

テレビは見飽きたよ。I'm tired of watching TV.
無料で見本を配っています。They're giving away samples free.彼は登山家の良い見本だ。He is a fine type of mountain climber.
その見本市には注目に値するものはなにもなかった。There was nothing worthy of remark at the fair.


アメリカ人は何を見落としているのだろうか。What are Americans overlooking?



クリスはとても魅力的だし、お金も持っています。でも、少しばかり謙虚さが足りません。Chris is very attractive and wealthy, but not very modest.




彼の謙遜さは賞賛に値する。His modesty is worth respecting.

あなたは何と賢い生徒なのでしょう。What a clever student you are!

賢者はひと言にして足る。A word to the wise is sufficient.
賢人いわく、人生は失望の連続である。Some wise man has said life consists of one disappointment after another.


あなたが彼女と別れるのは賢明である。You will do well to leave her.
彼女は鳥かごを軒からつるした。She hung the cage from the eaves.



家々の軒先には旗が掲げられていた。The fronts of the houses were hung with flags.

やられる前にやれ。Get 'em before they get you!
彼をやり込めるくらい、赤子の手を捻るより簡単だよ。Cornering him in an argument is easy―like taking candy from a baby.
私は、その仕事をやり遂げるでしょう。I will carry through the work.
君は計画を遣り通さなければならない。You must go through with your plan.

あなたは誰ですか。私たちを遣わした人々に返事がしたいのです。Who are you? Give us an answer to take back to those who sent us.


ドアを開ける際に、私は鍵を壊してしまった。In opening the door, I broke the lock.
ドアに鍵をかけてくださいませんか。Would you please lock the door?

指は鍵盤のあちらこちらに動きました。They moved up and down the keys.
彼らは険しい北面を登った。They climbed the rugged north face.

事態は険悪だ。The outlook is grim.







高熱がこの病気の顕著な症状だ。High fever is a prominent symptom of this disease.

顕微鏡の焦点を合わせなさい。Adjust the microscope's focus.
憲政の危機が始まったのは、このような状況のもとであった。It was under these circumstances that the constitutional crisis began.やってしまったことは元に戻らない。What is done cannot be undone.私たちは人をその人の人格を基に判断しようと考えるかもしれないが、それらは一見したところでははっきりわからないものである。Although we may intend to judge a person on the basis of his or her personal qualities, they are not visible at first sight.
ここで中断したら元の木阿弥だぞっ。If we stop here, we'll be right back where we started!
もとより私は最悪の事態を覚悟していた。From the outset I was prepared for the worst.もとよりそんなことは承知の上だ。Of course I am aware of that.低賃金、劣悪な労働条件、一方的な首切りなどの経済・労働問題はもとより、各種の人道的問題までも引き起こしている。Of course, they are suffering from terrible working conditions such as low wages and arbitrary layoffs, as well as from various forms of discrimination.

こんにちは、ロジャー。とっても元気よ。Hi, Roger. I'm pretty good!

あなたは彼に会ったら元気づけてやりなさい。Cheer him up when you see him.
彼らは自分たちの仕事を元気よくすることが、決まりきった仕事を耐え得るものにする唯一の方法であることを知った。They knew that doing their work cheerfully is the only way to make routine work bearable.
















元栓、しまってる。The main tap is turned off.

一年の計は元旦にあり。New Year's Day is the key to the year.



いったんしたことは元どおりにならない。What is done cannot be undone.

元日に神社へ参拝する日本人は多い。On New Year's Day many Japanese go to the shrine to worship.





元来フットボールとは、ポロのように馬に乗って行われる競技とは違って、足で、ボールを使って行われる競技のことでした。Football originally meant "a game played with a ball on foot" - unlike a game played on horseback, such as polo.





私達がよく野球をして遊んだ原は今すっかり家が建て込んでしまった。The field where we used to play ball is now all built up.

彼は原案に固執した。He adhered to the original plan.


それで事故の原因が分かった。That accounts for the accident.





原画と複製とでは色調に微妙な差異がある。Subtle differences in tone discriminate the original from the copy.





ギリシャ人たちは幾何学の理論的原形を作った。The Greeks made theoretical models of geometry.

日本語のむずかしさが、一握りの外国人を除いてすべての外国人が、原語で日本文学に近づくのを妨げている。The difficulties of the Japanese language prevent all but a handful of foreigners from approaching the literature in the original.
この原稿は書き直したほうがいいな。I'd better rewrite this paper.





裁判官は原告に不利な判決を下した。The judge decided against the plaintiff.


その原材料のうちのいくつかは有害です。特に、妊娠中の方にとっては。Some of the ingredients are harmful, especially if you are pregnant.

そのドラマは原作と違っている。The drama differs from the original story.


じゃがいもは中南米高地が原産地である。The potato is native to the highlands of Central and South America.

その人類学者は原始文化に関する講演をした。The anthropologist delivered a lecture on primitive cultures.


原始人はその猛獣を見ておびえた。The primitive man was frightened at the sign of the beast.
彼らはああいった原始的な道具を使っていた。They used those primitive tools.

一人で原始林へ乗り込もうとは君はなんて勇ましいんだ。How brave of you to go alone into the primaeval forest!
鉄の原子番号は26です。The atomic number of iron is 26.


原子核には大量のエネルギーが封じ込められている。A great deal of energy is locked up in the nucleus.







科学が原子爆弾を生み出した。Science produced the atomic bomb.






ウラニウムは原子力製造に用いられる。Uranium is used in the production of nuclear power.


原子力発電所はすべての人に訴えるわけではない。Nuclear power plants don't appeal to everybody.





クック船長はその原住民達の手厚いもてなしに感謝した。Captain Cook thanked the natives for their hospitality.
この本は原書の要約版です。This book is abridged from the original.









条約は原水爆の使用を禁止している。The treaty bans atomic bombs and hydrogen bombs.











ずっと昔からこの原則は認められてきた。Years ago this principle was widely recognized.
年金の額は原則として前年の物価変動にスライドして算出される。As a general rule, the pension amount is based on price changes in the previous year.
その提案には原則的には賛成します。I agree to the proposal in principle.





その翻訳は原典に忠実だ。The translation is true to the original.






原爆は人類にとって重大な脅威だ。The atomic bomb is a grave threat to mankind.

村人たちは原発反対の陳情をした。The villagers petitioned against the nuclear power plant.
最高裁は原判決をくつがえしました。The Supreme Court overturned a previous decision.








あの翻訳は原文に忠実だそうだ。That translation is said to be true to the original.
事務員は原簿に記入した。The clerk made an entry in his ledger.
その写しは原本と合っている。The copy agrees with the original.

日本は原綿の供給を海外に仰ぐ。Japan depends on overseas countries for the supply of raw cotton.


この静かな原野で狩猟をすることは禁止されています。Hunting game is forbidden in this tranquil wilderness.

その油井はたくさんの原油を産出する。The well delivers a great deal of oil.


誰もがその考えを原理的には認めるだろう。Everyone will accept that idea in principle.


日本はいろんな原料に乏しい。Japan is lacking in raw materials.


結婚生活がうまく行っていない方は結婚式の時におごそかに神の前に誓った、夫婦の誓約を思い出してみましょう。And to the people whose married life is not going well, let's remember the marriage covenant sworn solemnly before God at the wedding ceremony.
彼は厳しい批判にさらされた。He was subjected to severe criticism.練習がどんなに厳しくても、彼女は決して泣かなかった。However hard the training was, she never cried.ツンドラ地帯の気候は厳しい。The tundra has a harsh climate.
ここではたばこを吸うことを厳に禁じられている。Smoking is strictly forbidden here.

兵士達は厳戒体制にあった。The soldiers were on the alert.
彼らは時間に関しては厳格な考え方をしている。They have a strict idea of time.

希少野生動物をこの国に輸入することは厳禁されています。The importation of rare wild animals to this country is strictly prohibited.






トップエンジニアが、その車に一連の厳重な検査を加えた。The top engineer put the car through a series of rigorous tests.
お坊さんが突然大声で笑い出し、厳粛な雰囲気を台無しにした。All at once, the Buddhist priest burst into laughter, spoiling the solemn atmosphere.










あ、みんなには内緒だよ？寮を夜中に抜け出すのは厳罰だからね？Oh, that's a secret, OK? Because slipping out of the dorm in the night is severely punished.




厳密な科学的観点からは、歴史は科学とはいえない。From a strictly scientific point of view, history cannot be called a science.
これは厳密にいえば間違いである。This is, strictly speaking, a mistake.



その幻は意識の中に宿り、静寂のなかで動かない。The vision that was planted in my senses still silently lingers.

ほのかな光が俺のねじれた視界を幻影に変えてゆく。Light shines on my sigh of doubt.
幻覚が見えると言っている。She says she is seeing things.



あなたの考えはいわば幻想にすぎません。Your idea is, as it were, a castle in the air.




その限られた性能のために私はコンピューターに幻滅を感じている。I feel disenchanted by the limited capacity of the computer.







ジョギングでもして体重を減らすようにしなさい。Try to lose weight by jogging.
会員は５人に減った。The number of members decreased to five.








あまりチームに頼りすぎると、個人の闘争本能が減少するかもしれない。When you rely on the team too much, it may reduce your individual competitive instincts.
彼は減食したが、それでもまだ相変わらずとても太っていた。Though he dieted, he still remained too fat.



彼は減税を唱えた。He advocated reduction of taxes.
日本の海外援助は、１つには国内の経済の減速によって減りつつある。Japan's foreign aid is decreasing in part because of an economic slowdown at home.
景気の減退が始まると、短期契約社員達は次々に一時解雇を言い渡された。As the recession set in, temporary employees were laid off one after another.





その地域に工場を設立する外国企業には、税が大幅に減免される。A generous tax break will be provided to foreign companies that set up factories in the area.
これはあなたの減量に役立つ良い運動です。This is a good exercise to help you lose weight.




トムが玄関にいるのでなかに入るように言ってください。Tom is at the door. Please ask him in.


彼は玄人にちかい。He is almost professional.



彼女は野菜と玄米を常食としている。She lives on vegetables and brown rice.

＆のマークはａｎｄの文字を表す。The sign "&" stands for "and".ご自分の栄光を現された。He thus revealed his glory.あなたのご親切に対し深く感謝の意を表します。I wish to express my deep appreciation for your kindness.

２０人の警官が現場に現れた。Twenty police have arrived on the scene.その薬の効きめが現れた。The medicine took effect.



現金で払う必要はありません。You don't have to pay in cash.






現金払いには１０パーセント割引いたします。We give a 10% discount for cash.
現行の法律は人種の多様性を考慮していない。Existing legislation does not take diversity of races into account.
私は現在の地位に満足している。I am content with my current position.現在、通常のサービスの早急な復旧に努めています。We are currently working to restore normal service as soon as possible.与党は５時現在で５０議席確保している。The ruling party has secured 50 seats as of 5 o'clock.




いい加減に現実をみつめろ。Open your eyes to reality.

イギリス人は現実的な国民であると言われている。The English are said to be a practical people.
あなたの現住所を教えてください。Please tell me your present address.
この現象に関してはまだ物理的な説明がなされていない。There is not a physical explanation for this phenomenon yet.
群衆が現場に群がった。A crowd gathered at the scene.
彼は現状を大いに嘆いた。He deeply deplored the situation.
報道機関は現職議員についてはいつもマル秘情報をつかんでいます。The press always has something on the incumbent.

このフィルムを現像してもらえますか。Can I have this film developed?
私は現代の音楽はあまり好きではない事を認めます。I must admit I don't like much contemporary music.私達が住んでいる現代に入ってから、私達は国際論争の結末として、２度の世界大戦を体験した。In modern times we have gone through two world wars as the end result of international disputes.
現代科学は多くの不可能を可能に変えた。Modern science has turned many impossibilities into possibilities.
現代詩はしばしばきわめて難解だ。Modern poetry is often most obscure.
現代人は車なしで済ますことができない。Modern people cannot do without cars.
現代文明は科学と教育の基盤の上に成り立っている。Modern civilization rests on a foundation of science and education.
現地企業でのインターンシップを体験する。I'm going to do an internship at a local company.

現物がこっちから行っちゃえば、雪花ちゃんも四の五の言わないって。I'm saying that if the real thing comes to her, Sekka won't have anything to grumble about.
現役から引退した人は足が遠のくものだ。People rarely come to see you once you are retired.





彼の演説には数々のすばらしい言い回しが含まれていた。His speech contained many fine phrases.



彼があまり熱心に言い寄ってきたので、その晩彼のお相手をした女性は、とうとう参ってしまった。He was so vigorous in making love that his companion for the evening went down for the count.






我々が静かに夕食をとっていると、突然、母がもう一度学校に行くつもりだと言い出した。We were having a quiet supper when out of the blue my mother announced she was going back to school.マネージャーは、私が彼と一緒に空港に行ってはどうかと言い出した。The manager suggested that I go with him to the airport.

彼女は、自分は正しいと言い切った。She declared that she was right.
あなたと言い争ってもむだだ。It is no good arguing with you.


「急ぐな」と彼は言いたした。"Don't hurry," he added.

彼らはそれが本当だと言い張った。They asserted that it was true.
この湖についての不思議な伝説が言い伝えられている。A mysterious legend has been handed down about this lake.
いきなり解雇を言い渡された。I was discharged without notice.
ある人物がどこの出身であるかを言い当てるのは非常に難しい。It is very hard to tell what country a person comes from.
新入社員は初めての失敗をうまくいいぬけた。The new employee glossed over his first mistake.
その物体がどんな物か言い表す事が出来ますか。Can you describe the object?
彼はちゃんと私が言いつけておいたとおりにやった。He did exactly as I had told him.あなたが彼に言いつけたって私はちっともかまわない。You can tell him for all I care.

彼には彼女に反論する立派な言い分がある。He has a good case against her.


私はいつも寛大であれと自分に言い聞かせている。I always say to myself to be generous.
ベスは言い返しましたが、お母さんは彼女にものすごく太りすぎていると注意しました。Beth protested, but her mother reminded her that she was incredibly fat.



私はそのような言い方をしたことが恥ずかしく思っている。I was ashamed of having said so.
マスコミが何もかも大げさに言いたてたのです。The media blew the whole thing out of proportion.
言うまでもないことだがローマは１日にしては成らず。It goes without saying that Rome was not built in a day.

愛するがゆえに言葉にできないこともあるし、言わぬが花ということもあります。My love for you won't let me tell you everything. Some things are better left unsaid.
その画家は、いわば永遠の少年だ。The artist is eternally a boy.

言外の意味をとってください。Please read between the lines.
数回バイブルに言及する。I make several allusions to the Bible.
ドイツ語はやさしい言語ではありません。German is not an easy language.
この本は言語学の新しい理論を扱っている。This book deals with the new theory of linguistics.
その言語学者はいくつかの中国語の方言を流暢に話す。The linguist is fluent in several Chinese dialects.
きみの言語道断な行いを恥ずかしいと思う。I am ashamed of your despicable deed.

彼は言行が一致しない。His words don't line up with his actions.
言行一致なんて、とても俺にはできそうにない。I could never be a true man of my word.
彼は言質をとられた。He got himself committed to it.
孔子の言説は有名である。The sayings of Confucius are famous.
彼が死んだことは言伝に知りました。I heard that he'd died.
彼の言動は一致していない。His words and deeds do not match.
「わたしはキリストではありません」と言明した。But confessed freely, I am not the Christ.
「言葉の一面は、伝達しようとする意志である」と彼は言う。"One aspect of language is an intent to communicate," he says.言葉が出てこなかった。Words failed me.乱暴な言葉を使ってはいけない。Don't be rough in speech.

言葉遣いにはいつも気をつけるべきです。You should always be careful in your speech.

私はあらゆる人の言論に賛成だ。I stand for freedom of speech for everyone.

このことわざが使われるのを聞いた事があります。I have heard this proverb used.
彼の好奇心には限りがなかった。His curiosity knew no bounds.私の力が及ぶ限り援助します。I'll help you to the best of my ability.アキラはお金の続く限りニューヨークに滞在するだろう。Akira will stay in New York while his money lasts.


金持ちが必ずしも幸福とは限らない。The rich are not always happy.暑い日は冷たいビールに限る。There is nothing like cold beer on a hot day.
あらゆるものに限界がある。There is a limit to everything.

切符の数は限定されていた。The number of tickets was limited.
最近ドル先安感が強まっているなかで、為替相場は米経済指標に対する反応はかなり限定的である。As expectation increases that the dollar will weaken, the foreign exchange market's reaction to US economic indicators has been fairly muted.
物事には限度がある。There is a limit to everything.


この懐中電灯は２個の電池が必要だ。This flashlight needs two batteries.
個室を予約したいのですが？I'd like to reserve a private compartment.
この部屋は個人専用です。This room is for individual use.

彼女はピアノの個人教授を受けている。She takes private piano lessons.

国家の価値は結局それを構成する個人個人の価値である。The worth of a state, in the long run, is the worth of the individuals composing it.

スリーサイズは個人差がある。Measurements are different from individual to individual.


個人消費の水準にとって大きな意味を持つのは可処分所得である。Disposable income is what counts for the level of personal consumption.
チケット購入に必要な個人情報をインプットする。To purchase a ticket, you need to enter your personal details.

あなたとちょっと個人的に話をする必要がある。I'd like to have a word with you.





学生たちはめいめい個人用の上履き靴がある。Each of the students has his own shoes.
彼はすばらしい個性を持っている。He has a wonderful personality.
彼女は非常に個性的な人だ。She has a very strong personality.


あらゆる事態を個別に分析する必要がある。Every situation requires individual analysis.



森のはずれに古小屋が立っているのが見えた。We saw an old hut standing at the margin of the forest.
ケンが使っている机はもう古い。The desk that Ken uses is old.
歌舞伎は古くからの日本の芸術だ。Kabuki is an old Japanese art.

けれども、急にめまいがして、再び古びた椅子に座りこんだ。But he suddenly felt dizzy and he sat down again in his old chair.






その古家はひどい状態であった。The old house was in bad shape.





腰掛けのつもりだったのに、気がついたら私もこの会社で古株になってしまった。I only figured on staying with this company a little while when I started, but before I knew it I'd become an old timer here.














彼は古今に並ぶ者のない偉大な政治家である。He is the greatest statesman that ever lived.
古今東西、嫁と姑の仲は上手くいかぬ例が多いと見える。In all times and places many examples of poor relations between wives and mothers-in-law can be seen.

古参議員たちは、選挙で参議院の議席を失いそうになりました。The old guard was nearly voted out of the Upper House.










私は彼の古くさい冗談にうんざりした。I was bored with his old jokes.
彼は珍しい古書を見つけた。He hit on a rare old book.

その古城は丘の上に建っている。The old castle stands on the hill.












彼は古銭を集めるのが好きだ。He likes collecting old coins.





古代インカの時代に、アメリカ大陸でもっとも大きい都市であった。In the days of the ancient Incas, it was the largest city in America.


彼は古代史に精通している。He is well acquainted with ancient history.
この壁画からは古代人の生活の片鱗をうかがうことができる。We can get a glimpse of the lifestyle of ancient people from this wall painting.
その神話を読むと古代文明を深く理解することが出来る。The myth offers insights into the ancient civilization.



私は自分の古着をのみの市セールに寄付した。I gave my old clothes for the flea market sale.
古典の文学書を読むことは価値のあることです。It is worthwhile reading classical works of literature.



もっと古典的な顔立ちなのかと思いきや、今の時代でも充分通用する美形です。I expected more classical features, but hers is a beauty that would do well even in this age.
彼女はモーツァルトやベートーヴェンといった古典派の作曲家が好きだ。She likes composers from the classical period like Mozart and Beethoven.
私は古典文学に非常に興味があります。I'm very interested in classical literature.



この古都に何か新しいものがあることは、だれでも知っている。Everyone knows that there is something new in this old capital.









私の母はとても古風なんです。My mother is really of the old school.


高松塚古墳は、奈良県明日香村に存在する古墳。The Takamatsuzuka burial mound is located in Asukamura, Nara prefecture.





古本屋と古着屋をあさるのが好きです。I like shopping in used-book stores and in used-clothing shops.

彼は古来まれな芸術家だ。He is as great an artist as lived.







私はその日の記憶を呼び覚まそうとした。I tried to call on my memories of that day.
遠くから誰かが私に呼びかけているのが聞こえた。I heard someone calling me from a distance.警官はすりに対する注意を呼びかけた。The policeman called attention to the problem of pickpockets.
ホワイト氏はアシスタントを呼び寄せて次のように言いました。Mr White called his assistant over and said the following:
戦いは人間の獣性をよびおこす。War arouses the animal in man.


その旅人は兵士に呼び止められて立ち止まった。The traveler stopped at the soldier's challenge.

どうぞ彼を電話口に呼び出してください。Please call him to the telephone.4つのレジスタは、呼び出された関数側が保存する。The contents of the four registers are preserved by the called subroutine.

谷は彼の呼び声でこだました。The valley echoed with his call.
ボスはジムをオフィスに呼び入れて解雇通知を渡した。The boss called Jim into his office and gave him his pink slip.


彼は旅行から呼び戻された。He was called back from his trip.

食事の最中に呼び鈴が鳴った。The doorbell rang during the meal.
あなたが呼べば、彼は来るでしょう。He will come if you call him.「本当に警察を呼びたいのか」と僕は彼女に尋ねた。"Are you sure you want to call the police?" I asked her.パーティーに呼んでもらいましたが今回は行けません。You invited me to your party, but I can't make it this time.


酸素は私たちが呼吸すると肺の中に取り込まれる。Oxygen is taken into our lungs when we breathe.英語の発音の呼吸がなかなか飲み込めない。I still can't get the knack of English pronunciation.




我々の計画はまだ固まってない。Our plans are not yet concrete.





彼は総理のたっての要請を固辞した。He firmly refused the Premier's earnest request.
彼らはなおもこの理論を固守した。They still clung to this doctrine.
私は興奮して固唾をのんだ。I held my breath in excitement.
固体が解けると液体になる。When a solid melts, it becomes liquid.
このテーブルはがたつく。しっかり固定させてくれ。This table is shaky. Make it stay firm.
そのような固定観念は捨てたほうがいいでしょう。We had better do away with such a fixed idea.






羽は鳥に固有のものだ。Feathers are peculiar to birds.



古今東西、嫁と姑の仲は上手くいかぬ例が多いと見える。In all times and places many examples of poor relations between wives and mothers-in-law can be seen.
実は、大量の資料を持ってくるのは、反論させないための姑息な手段である。Actually that I bring a huge volume of reference material with me is a makeshift way of preventing people from disputing my case.


人々はその孤児を哀れんだ。People took pity on the orphan.
彼は孤児院にその包みを配達した。He delivered the package to the orphanage.

俺は絶海の孤島の漂流者。I am just a castaway on an island lost at sea.
私はこの上なくさびしく、孤独だ。I am as sad and lonely as can be.
この地域はきわめて孤立している。This area is extremely isolated.


他人を己を持って計ってはいけない。You must not judge others by yourself.






誰かが戸をやかましくノックしている。Someone is knocking loudly at the door.
その日は戸外で過ごした。We spent the day in the open air.

支配人は戸口に立った。The manager stood at the door.


戸籍上の縁は切れても、昔日の絆はそのままだ。Our connection may be cut on paper but the bonds of old remain as they were.

この本は戸棚の上です。This book goes on the top shelf.
戸締まりをするの忘れるなよ。Don't forget to bolt the door.



しかし、どうしてそうなるのかについては私は説明にとまどう。But how that comes about I am at a loss to explain.

その起源ゆえに、カナダ英語にはアメリカ英語とイギリス英語の両方の特徴がある。Because of its origins, Canadian English has features of both American and British English.
ゆえに、筋肉の５０パーセントが脂肪に取って代わられる可能性がある。Hence 50 percent of the muscle can give way to fat.
偶然であれ故意であれ、彼がそれをしたのは本当だ。It is true that he did it, whether by accident or by design.

その亡命者は故国への思いに胸を焦がした。The exile yearned for his home.

車が故障したので遅れました。I was late because my car broke down.
故人をしのんで、記念碑が建てられた。A monument was erected in memory of the deceased.


その花は水がないために枯れた。The flower died for lack of water.
彼はその木から枯れ枝を切り取った。He cut away the dead branches from the tree.




湖の深さはどのくらいですか。What is the depth of the lake?

湖上にはたくさんのボートが浮かんでいた。There were a lot of boats on the lake.
この手紙を書き終えたら、あの山の２マイルほど先の湖水にご案内しましょう。When I have finished writing the letter, I will take you to the lake about two miles beyond the hill.
湖畔にはかなり多くのホテルが有る。There are quite a few hotels by the lake.
彼女は細かな雪が湖面に降るのを眺めていた。She was looking at the fine snow falling on the lake.
猟犬たちはキツネの匂いの跡をたどった。The hunting dogs followed the scent of the fox.





彼はメモをドアに糊で貼った。He pasted the notice on the door.


洗濯のりでののりづけの仕方を教えてください。Please tell me how to use laundry starch to starch things.









女の子があぐらをかいて座るものではない。A girl should not sit with her legs crossed.
彼女はその見知らぬ人を胡散臭そうに見た。She eyed the stranger suspiciously.
アレックスは、「クルミ」や、「紙」や、「とうもろこし」のような物の名前を言うことができる。Alex names objects, like "walnut," "paper" and "corn".


４．中華鍋にごま油を熱してバターを溶かす。4. Heat the sesame oil in the wok and melt the butter.

コショウを入れすぎたね。You put far too much pepper in it.
万一虎がおりから出てきたらどうしますか。If a tiger should come out of the cage, what would you do?
これは野球の虎の巻だ。This is the bible of baseball.









彼女の顔は誇らしさで赤く上気していた。She was aflame with pride.
イギリス人は自国の詩人を誇りにしている。England is proud of her poets.

あんなに長所が多いのに彼女は誇らなかった。With all her merits she was not proud.
彼は決して自分の学問を誇示することは無かった。He never made a display of his learning.




その報告ではホールの収容能力が誇張されていた。The report exaggerated the capacity of the hall.
もう二度とこの家の敷居はまたがない。I'll never set foot in this house again.


少数民族の雇用促進政策とはいっても、建前にすぎず、現状はマイノリティーが職に就けるチャンスなどほとんどない。Although many pay lip service to the idea of affirmative action, in reality, very few minorities get hired.
顧みられぬ無数の漂流者が家を求めてる。A hundred billion castaways are looking for a home.彼女は費用を顧みず家を飾りたてた。She decorated her house regardless of cost.
社長は会議のために顧問たちを集めた。The president assembled his advisers for a conference.











心臓が速く鼓動しているのを感じた。I felt my heart beating rapidly.
将校は部下を鼓舞して勇気を出させた。The officer inspired his men to be brave.




この箱にはリンゴが五つ入っている。This box contains five apples.





視覚は五感の１つである。Sight is one of the five senses.



英国では労働祭は五月にある。In England, Labor Day is in May.















君達は自分の提案が最高にいいと思っているのだろうけど、僕から見れば、五十歩百歩としか思えないけどね。You guys seem to think your proposal is far and away the best, but as far as I'm concerned it's all six of one and half-a-dozen of the other.














くーっ、ビールが五臓六腑にしみわたる。やっぱり仕事の後はビールだね。Ahhh! Feel that beer seep into every fiber of my being. Yep, nothing beats a cold one after work.







１月５日から１月１５日までおねがいします。From the 5th to the 15th of January, please.三日から五日で。Maybe three to five days.
ＡはＢの５倍の長さがある。A is 5 times as long as B.


鯨が今世紀の終わりに死に絶える可能性は五分五分である。As likely as not, whales will be extinct by the end of this century.





これからどう会社を経営していったらいいのか、五里霧中だ。We're all at sea about where to take our company from here.




五輪旗の右端の輪っかって何色だったっけか？What color is the far right ring on the Olympic flag?



結婚は２人が互いを理解し合えばすばらしいものとなりうる。Marriage can be a wonderful thing if two people understand each other.
私達は互いに依存しあっている。We are dependent on each other.
昼と夜は互い違いにやってくる。Day and night come alternately.


私と互角で渡り合える女の子でなければだめだ。The girl has to match me in skill.













その急行は午後六時三十分着だ。The express arrives at 6:30 p.m.
私たちは午後中ずっと勉強していました。We were studying all afternoon.




その電車は午前９時にここを出発します。The train departs here at 9:00 a.m.
午前中は在宅の予定です。I'll be at home in the morning.



彼は自分の金すべてをくれてやった。He gave away all his money.
友達がはがきをくれるように私に頼んだ。A friend of mine asked me to send her a postcard.時間通りに行かなければならないから、明日は待たさないでくれよ。We have to be there on time, so don't stand me up tomorrow!
くれぐれもお体をお大事に。Please take good care of yourself.


ドジャースとジャイアンツが呉越同舟でやってきた。The Dodgers and Giants, traditional rivals, arrived together.











あなたのお好きな娯楽は何ですか。What's your favourite pastime?


少女たちのうち一人が後に残された。One of the girls was left behind.雨天の後には晴天が来る。After rain comes fair weather.あと２通手紙を書かなくてはならない。I have another two letters to write.
船が沈没してしまってのち、船の残骸が引き上げられた。The wreckage of the ship was salvaged after it had gone to Davy Jones's locker.
後から後から客が来た。Customers came one after another.
あとで起こったことはなお悪かった。What followed was still worse.

アメリカの学生は数学で遅れをとっている。American students are falling behind in math.

後ろを刈り上げてください。I want it tapered in the back.
暗闇の中、俺は遠ざかる後姿に必死に手を伸ばす。In the darkness, I frantically reach out towards the receding figure.

後ろ足で砂をかけるようなことをした。He raised his heel against me.


その会は外務省の後援で開かれた。That party was held under the auspices of the Foreign Ministry.
もし彼の後押しがあったならば、彼女は市長に選ばれていただろう。With his support, she might have been elected mayor.
彼女はいわゆる野球後家だ。She is what is called a baseball widow.
その問題は後回しにしよう。Let's leave that matter for later.
今更後悔しても無駄だ。It's no use regretting it now.
後学のために、この出来事を記しておきます。For future reference, I'm going to record this event.

彼の後期の絵はすべて傑作とみなされた。All his later paintings were considered masterpieces.





国王の長男は、王座の後継者である。The king's eldest son is the heir to the throne.



女優は後ろ向きに舞台から落ちた。The actress fell backward over the stage.




出かける前に火の後始末をしなさい。Be sure to put out the fire before you leave.


いくつかの点で、前者は後者よりも劣っていると彼は指摘した。He pointed out that the former was inferior to the latter in some respects.



東京証券取引所は後場の終わり値になって持ち直しました。The Tokyo Stock Exchange rallied at the end of the day.


これらの絵は後世の人々のためにここに残される。These paintings will be left here for posterity.

ヒトラーは後生の悪い人だろう。I think Hitler will have an unpleasant afterlife.
彼女はそれを後生大事にとっておいた。She held on to it for dear life.
後先をよく考えて物を言え。Weigh your words well.
「あっ、後続のパーティが来たみたいだな」「あちゃー。休んでる間に追いつかれちゃったわね」"Ah, the trailing group has arrived." "Oh no. They caught up with us while we were resting."
自動車の売れ行きは年度末に後退しました。Automobile sales suffered a setback at the end of the financial year.





彼は彼女に、後ほど電話をかけてくれと頼んだ。He asked her to call him later.
その習慣は後天的で、先天的なものではない。That habit is acquired, not innate.

サッカーをしていて後頭部にボールが当たりました。A ball hit the back of my head while I was playing soccer.

スミス氏が後任の委員長として発表された。Mr Smith was announced as the succeeding chairman.
彼は後年は平穏に暮らした。He lived quietly in the latter years of his life.
彼は私より３年後輩です。He is my junior by three years.


社長の挨拶が長くて式の後半が押せ押せになってしまった。The company president's welcome was so long that we were squeezed for time in the second half of the ceremony.
我々は後半生に豊かな報酬を手にするだろう。We will reap rich rewards later on in life.
ハイジャック犯達は飛行機の後部に移った。The hijackers moved to the rear of the plane.

後片づけを手伝いましょうか。May I help you clear the table?

キング牧師は首を撃たれ、後方に倒れた。Rev. King fell backwards, shot in the neck.



そのオレンジは後味が変だった。The orange left a strange taste in my mouth.
もうここまで来たらやるしかないでしょう。もう後戻りはできない。We've come this far, so we can't stop now. I don't want to backslide.





私はあなたの援助のおかげで成功した。I succeeded through your help.おかげでほぼ完徹だ。Thanks to which I was up nearly all night.
おかげさまで助かりました。Thank you very much for your help.


私はお母さんにおとぎ話を読んでもらった。I had fairy tales read by my mother.


私たちの先生はごきげんです。Our teacher is in a good temper.

私たちがおかけしたご苦労に対してどうしたら償いができるでしょう。How can we make it up to you for all that you have suffered because of us?
お互いさまだろ。It seems we are in the same boat.



御社のお考えを先におっしゃってください。Please let us know your company's thoughts on this matter first.
あなたのご主人は食事にうるさいのかな？Is your husband a picky eater?
あなたはどのくらい日本においでですか。How long have you been in Japan?「おいでおいで」彼女は叫びました。「こっちであそぼ」"Come, boy," she called, "come and play."
私は彼を京都御所に連れて行きました。I took him to the Kyoto Imperial Palace.



よけいなお節介だ。Mind your own business.
ジェーンは奥さんが彼女の為に作ったおせち料理を食べました。Jean ate the osechi cooking his wife cooked for herself.







御中元や御歳暮の習慣はなかなかすたれない。The gift-giving custom dies hard.
１ドルでおつりがありますか。Have you got change for a dollar?

お日様が明るく輝いています。The sun is shining brightly.
それはいわゆる「お年玉」でした。That's what we call an "otoshidama".
ご飯とパンどちらがいいですか。Which do you prefer, rice or bread?友達にご飯をおごってもらった。My friends treated me to a meal.




２年間のご無沙汰でした。Two years have passed since I last met you.
皆様にご迷惑をおかけしております。Excuse us for the inconvenience.ご迷惑をおかけしまして申し訳ありません。I am sorry to have troubled you.
待たせてごめん。Sorry to have kept you waiting.自分の手を汚すようなことだけはごめんだ。I don't want to get my hands dirty.
お話し中、ごめんなさい。Excuse me for interrupting you.

誕生日おめでとうございます。Many happy returns of the day!

ご用のときはお電話ください。Please call me up if you want me.



あの木のてっぺんを見てごらん。Look at the top of that tree.あの黒い雲をごらん。じきに雨が来そうだ。Look at those black clouds. It is going to rain.
こちらへやってくる少年とその犬をごらんなさい。Look at the boy and his dog that are coming this way.ほらごらんなさい。長くなかったでしょ。There! That wasn't long, was it?受付で聞いてご覧なさい。Please ask at the information desk.



息子に成り代わってお礼を申し上げます。I thank you on behalf of my son.
いずれご連絡いたします。I will get in touch with you.
ピーターは新しいオムツを必要としているのかもしれない。Peter may need a new diaper.

彼はついに自分の誤りを悟った。At last, he realized his error.彼はドイツ語で自分の言いたいことを伝えるのは難しいと悟った。He found it difficult to make himself understood in German.

碁を打つことが一番の気晴らしだ。Playing go is my favorite pastime.



２００語以内でその文章を要約してください。Sum up the passage within 200 words.メキシコではなに語を話すのですか。What is the language spoken in Mexico?
私たちは、一杯のコーヒーを飲みながら、楽しく語らった。We talked cheerfully over a cup of coffee.

これらの伝説は私達の子孫に語り継がれるべきだ。These legends should be handed down to our offspring.
スミスさんはソフトな語り口の人物です。Mr Smith is a softly-spoken person.
我々は夜更けまで語り合った。We talked late into the night.

今夜は一つ語り明かそうではないか。Let's talk the night away tonight, shall we?
行動は言葉よりも声高く語る。Actions speak louder than words.

これは私の語学の能力を有利に使える好機である。This will be a good opportunity for me to use my language skills to my advantage.


彼女は話しているうちに語気が強くなった。Her voice began to rise as she spoke.
君の辞書で‘ｇｕｙ’の語義を調べなさい。Look up the definition of 'guy' in your dictionary.
その作家の文体は挿入語句が多い。The writer has a parenthetic style.
それらの方言におけるこの語形の分布に注意が向けられなければならない。We must draw attention to the distribution of this form in those dialects.
このように、名詞の変化のパターンがある他に、動詞の語形変化も現代英語よりもいろいろな種類がありました。Accordingly, besides noun declension patterns, there also existed a greater variety of verb conjugation patterns than in Modern English.
これらの語は同じ語源から出ている。These words are derived from the same root.


品詞を理解することは、正しい語順感覚を身につけるうえで非常に大切なことです。Understanding parts-of-speech is extremely important for getting the feel of word order.

英語はドイツ語と同語族である。The English language is cognate to the German language.
彼の語調はますます熱気を帯びてきた。His tone became more and more fervent.


「―osity」は語尾が「―ous」の形容詞から作られる抽象名詞の語尾。'-osity' is an abstract noun word ending created from the ending of an '-ous' adjective.
それは語弊がある。That's not a proper thing to say.
この辞書は特に語法に重点を置いている。This dictionary puts a special emphasis on usage.





読書は語彙を増やすのに役に立つ。Reading helps you build up your vocabulary.
私の誤りは彼の怒りを招いた。My mistake incurred his anger.
彼は判断を誤った。He erred in his judgement.戦争は誤った政策から起こった。The war resulted from a mistaken policy.私の判断を誤らすな。Don't mislead me.
あなたを誤解してしまってごめんなさい。I'm sorry I misunderstood you.
我々は誤差を見込んで余裕をとっておいた。We left a margin for error in our estimates.


・テキストデータの誤字脱字を修正。・ Corrected mistaken/missing characters in the text data.

この本にはほとんど全く誤植がない。This book has few, if any, misprints.


うん、誤診だったみたい。Yes, it seems it was a misdiagnosis.


科学者の通弊は、あらゆる問題に技術的解決策があると誤認すること。A fault common to scientists is mistakenly believing that every problem has a technical solution.




そんな手で私の目をごまかそうとしても無駄だ。You can't fool me with a trick like that.彼らは税金を逃れるために帳じりをごまかした。They falsified the account balances to evade the tax.彼はそのことを笑ってごまかした。He laughed the matter away.
誤字・誤訳のご指摘等は下記メールアドレスよりお寄せください。Please send reports of mistypings and mistranslations to the email address below.
その語は誤用されやすい。The word lends itself to misuse by beginners.
彼は多数の護衛を連れて旅行した。He traveled with a large escort.










凍死しそうな乞食が手当てのため、病院に運び込まれた。だが、その乞食は治療費を清算するような金は一文も、もってなかった。A freezing beggar was brought into the hospital for treatment. However, he didn't have even one cent with which to settle the bill.貧困者が乞食をしていた。The pauper was begging for a living.


鯉がおたまじゃくしを食べるって知ってた？Did you know that carp eat tadpoles?
その詩は韻文に散文をまじえている。That poem mixes prose with poetry.


これらの線は直角に交わる。These lines meet at right angles.
戦争中米国は英国との交易を中断しようとした。During the war, America tried to stop trading with England.



あなたと席を交換しよう。Let me exchange seats with you.






交換手は電話をカナダへつないでくれた。The operator put me through to Canada.


交換台、ボストンに電話しようとしているんですが。Operator, I'm trying to get through to Boston.






ロンドンの交響楽団のコンサートスケジュールを知りませんか。Do you know the concert schedule of London Symphony Orchestra?
その交響曲はト短調である。The key of the symphony is G minor.
好況と不況は交互に来る。Good times alternate with bad.

２本の道が十文字に交差している。The two roads cut across the street from us.

その男は妻と交際し始めた。The man took up with his wife.










労働組合は経営陣と交渉している。The labor union is negotiating with the owners.哲学者は世間とあまり交渉を持たない傾向がある。Philosophers tend to have little contact with the outside world.





交信が出来ません。I just can't seem to make contact.

わが軍は敵と交戦した。Our troops engaged with the enemy.








その事故で交通は止まった。The accident stopped the traffic.
あなたはシートベルトをちゃんと使用していたとして、カリフォルニア州交通安全大会において賞金５０００ドルを獲得されました。You have just won a prize of $5000 in a California state safety competition for proper use of your seatbelt.
地元の警察は交通違反にはとても厳しい。The local police are very strict about traffic violations.

交通機関は何を使うんですか。What form of transport will we take?
交通規則には従わなければならない。We should obey the traffic rules.

彼は交通事故に遭った。He met with a traffic accident.


この道を交通信号まで行き、左に曲がりなさい。Go down this road until you get to a traffic light and then turn left.
交通整理の警官は、手や腕を振ることで運転手たちに方向を伝える。A traffic policeman signals directions to drivers by waving his hands and arms.

私たちの毎月の収入は、食料、部屋代、衣料、交通費などをカバーできなければならない。Our monthly income has to cover food, rent, clothing, transportation, and so on.

現代の情報及び交通網のおかげで世界はますます小さくなっている。Because of modern communication and transportation systems, the world is getting smaller.
ここの交通量は増えた。The traffic has built up here.




馬とロバを交配させるとラバが生まれる。If you mate a horse with an ass you will get a mule.
向こうの交番で聞いてください。Ask at the police station over there.

市長は私に身分証明書を交付した。The mayor provided me with an identity card.


貸借の期間が短ければ交友期間は長い。Short accounts make long friends.


さらに、お年寄りが互いに交流し、アメリカの生活の中で何時までも積極的に参加していられるように、多くの団体が結成されている。In addition many groups have been formed so that the elderly can socialize with one another and remain active participants in American life.












スミス氏は市長候補である。Mr Smith is a candidate for mayor.
彼らは皆その候補者を応援した。They all boosted the candidate.


光が世にやって来た。Light has come into the world.

空は花火で光り輝いていた。The sky was ablaze with fireworks.

上部前方で何かが光っている。Something is flashing up ahead.

光ファイバーケーブルは膨大な量の情報を搬送できる。Fibre-optic cables can carry huge amounts of information.
光陰矢のごとしと言うのをよく耳にする。We often hear it said that time flies.

あなたにお会いできて光栄です。It is a privilege to meet you.

空気は光化学スモッグで汚染されていた。The air was infected with photochemical smog.
光学の研究で彼は拡大鏡の発明をした。His study of optics led him to the invention of the magnifying glass.




その光景を見てぎょっとした。I was frightened at the sight.
では、CGを作る場合はどのように光源を使用すればよいのであろうか。Then, when you're making CG, how should you use light sources?





このランプは強い光線を出す。This lamp sends out a powerful beam.

この指輪は光沢をうしなった。This ring lost its luster.






この世界は、あなたたちの住む世界から遥か３億光年離れた位置にあります。This world is a distant three hundred million light years away from the world where you live.


照明はツマミ一つで光量を変えられるようになっていて好きな明るさを演出出来るようになっている。The lighting was set up to have the intensity controlled by one knob so you could produce the brightness as you want.
多くの国が公の場所での喫煙を禁止する法律を通過させている。Many countries have passed laws to prohibit people from smoking in public places.その老人は１０年前に公の生活から引退した。The old man retired from public life ten years ago.





公益事業部門の急成長を見込んでいます。We expect rapid growth of the utilities sector.



この公園はすべての人に公開されている。The park is open to everybody.
ロイヤル・シアターの夜の部の公演が終わり、観客たちは帰って行った。The evening performance at the Royal Theater had ended, and the audience had gone home.




町の公会堂は人でいっぱいだった。The town hall was full of people.



この公園はすべての人に公開されている。The park is open to everybody.




この地域に公害はない。This district is free from environmental pollution.








公共の場所をきれいにしておこう。Let's keep public places clean.







４月から公共料金が値上げになる。Public utility charges will go up next April.



一般大衆は、公金がどのように使われるのかについての情報を知る権利がある。The public is entitled to information about how public money is spent.
彼はそのことについて何も知らないと公言した。He professed to know nothing about it.





戦争の資金を調達するために公債が発行された。Bonds were issued to finance a war.


彼はメキシコ駐在日本公使に任命された。He was appointed Japanese minister to Mexico.



公私のけじめをつけなければいけません。We should draw the line between public and private affairs.



ここでの事故の数が公式に記録されているものの２倍あると仮定してみよう。Let us suppose that the number of incidents is twice that of those officially recorded.これらの要素をすべて包含するような最良の公式はこれまでのところ提案されていない。The optimal formula which would encompass all these factors has not been proposed.


首相はホワイトハウスを公式訪問した。The premier paid a formal visit to the White House.


これは、あの殺人的な公爵に復讐しようという彼の願いを強めただけだ。This only increased his desire to be revenged on the murderous duke.

この建物には公衆トイレがありますか。Is there a public toilet in this building?


彼は公衆電話を見つけてタクシーを呼んだ。He found a public telephone and called a taxi.
私たちは公衆道徳についていっそう考えねばならない。We must think further about public morality.


最近沢山の公衆浴場が倒産しました。Recently, many public bath-houses have gone out of business.






公正証書遺言の作成や秘密証書遺言には公証人が関与します。Notaries are involved in the drawing up of notarial deeds and sealed envelope deeds.
当事者が公証役場に行く場合、下記のものが必要になります。When one goes to the notary public's office, the following are required.
彼らは秘密に投票し、公職をめざしてもよいし、また不適切な行為をする公職老の免職を要求してもよい。They vote in secret, may seek public office, and may demand the removal of public officials who behave improperly.



王は自分の王国を公正に治めた。The king ruled his kingdom justly.
公正証書遺言の作成や秘密証書遺言には公証人が関与します。Notaries are involved in the drawing up of notarial deeds and sealed envelope deeds.





その国は公然と核武装するとおどしている。That country has openly threatened to go nuclear.






公団は建設計画の入札を募集した。The corporation invited bids for the construction project.










地球は太陽の周りを公転している。The earth goes around the sun.







新しい候補者が、民主党の党大会で公認候補となりました。There was a new candidate on the ticket at the Democratic convention.



その殺人者は今、公判中だ。The murderer is now on trial.


彼はそれを公表すると脅した。He threatened to make it public.


















公僕も人間であること、また、人間である以上過ちを犯す可能性があることを、彼は認識している。He realizes that public officials are human, and that as human beings they are capable of misjudgement.



公民権運動はある夢に至る。The civil rights movement leads to a dream.

公務のために多くの時間がとられる。My public duties take a lot of time.
彼は２０年前、大学を卒業するとすぐに公務員になった。He entered civil service 20 years ago right after college.



裁判は公明正大であることが要求される。Judgment requires impartiality.

その無所属候補者は中絶問題を公約からはずしました。The independent candidate took the abortion issue off his platform.





彼は公用で大阪に行った。He went to Osaka on official business.
マオリ文化は私たちの間にますます広がり、彼らの言語は公用語の１つになっています。Maori culture is now spreading more and more among us and their language has become an official language.




その当時、どこの公立の学校にもネイティブの英語の先生などいませんでした。At the time there were no native English speakers teaching in any public school.
公立学校では宗教教育が禁止されている。Religious education is prohibited at a public school.





イタリアンルネッサンスを開花させるきっかけを作ったのはジョットの功績だ。Giotto is credited with sowing the seeds of the Italian Renaissance.

彼は抜けがけの功名をたてた。He forestalled everybody in accomplishing.



彼らがいくら弁解しても彼女には何の効果もなかった。Their excuses cut no ice with her.

その方法は粗雑なものであったが、効果的だった。The method was crude, but very effective.


絵画が有する第一の効能は見る人の目のごちそうとなることである。The first virtue of a painting is to be a feast for the eyes.


彼は事務効率をよくする案を出した。He put forward a plan for improving office efficiency.


効率的な機械が肉体労働に取って代わった。Efficient machinery replaced manual labor.
その法律はもう効力はなくなっている。The law is not in effect any longer.
しかし城にたどりつくなり、近衛兵を率いた人によって、わたしはこの牢獄に勾引されてしまった。However, when I finally reached the castle I was thrown into this prison by the commander of the imperial guard.


屋根の勾配をどうするか決めるのはとても重要です。It is very important to decide what to do about the slope of the roof.

氷は２インチの厚さだ。The ice is two inches thick.ご好意に対し厚くお礼を申し上げます。I'm deeply grateful for your kindness.
そう言うことは彼はあつかましい奴だ。It is impudent of him to say so.





彼女の厚化粧が嫌らしい。Her thick makeup is disgusting.

厚顔無恥とはまさにあいつのことだ。He's such a shameless jerk.



２．ペンで厚紙にブーメランの形を描く。描いたブーメランを切り取る。2. Draw a boomerang shape on the card with a pen. Cut out the boomerang you've drawn.









彼はいつも厚着している。He always wears heavy clothes.







椅子に横たわる私に、歯科衛生士の女性が「はい、お口を開けてください」と言ったのです。The woman dental hygienist said to me, lying down in the chair, "Right, please open your mouth."私たちはそのまま洞窟の口にボートで突っ込んで行きました。We plunged into the cave opening on our boat and continued on.瓶の口までいっぱいに入れて空気が入らないようにしなさい。Fill the bottle to the top so as to exclude all air.


あいつは口が軽いからこのことは言わない方がいい。Don't tell him. He's got a loose tongue.
彼は口が重い。He is a man of few words.

母は台所でせっせと料理しながら歌を口ずさんでいた。Mother hummed to herself as she went about her cooking in the kitchen.
この３日間何も口にしていない。I have eaten nothing for the past three days.そういうことは口にするな。Don't talk about such a thing.
私が返事をしようとした矢先に、彼が口を出してきた。I was about to reply, when he boldly cut in.





彼らは彼女を口汚なくののしった。They used abusive language to her.

彼は口下手で、お世辞にも要領がいいとは言えませんが、それだけかえって私は彼が好きなのです。He may be a poor talker and far from shrewd, but I like him all the better for that.


グループの人たち全員が沈黙しているときは、誰かが話の口火を切らねばならない。When all the group members are silent, somebody must break the ice.
スイスのチョコレートは口溶けがよい。Swiss chocolate really melts in your mouth.


この事は絶対に口外しません。I'll never tell this to anyone.









その女の子は小さな愛らしい口元をしている。The girl has a sweet, small mouth.



口語的な話し方が日常会話では使われている。Colloquial speech is used in everyday conversation.
この構文は口語英語ではまずめったに生じないだろう。These structures would rarely, if ever, occur in spoken English.

ブライアンはケイトのために口紅を買った。Brian bought a lipstick for Kate.


私は銀行に口座を開いた。I opened my account with the bank.



彼は、彼女の口止め料に、多くの金を払った。He paid much money to stop her mouth.


彼女は自分に不利になるような口実を彼に与えた。She gave him a handle against her.
彼の甘い口車にのるな。Don't fall for his sugar-coated words.



喫煙による短期的な影響には、体調が悪いこと、ぜいぜい息をすること、病気に対する抵抗力の全般的な低下、口臭、肌荒れなどが含まれる。Short-term effects of smoking include unfitness, wheezing, a general vulnerability to illness, bad breath, bad skin and so on.


他人のことには口出ししないよう彼に伝えてくれ。Tell him to mind his own business.
この前の娘は口述内容を筆記するのも無理だった。速記なんて論外さ。That girl couldn't take things down in longhand, let alone shorthand.









彼はまるで何でも知っているかのような口ぶりだ。He talks as if he knew everything.
私の父は口数が少ない。My father is a man of few words.




それ、私を口説いてるの？Are you making a pass at me?
口先だけの御世辞はやめてくれ。Don't pay lip service to me.言葉が口先まで出かかっているのだが、自分のいいたいことをどう表現したらいいのかよくわからない。The words are on the tip of my tongue, but I don't quite know how to put what I want to say.









彼は断固たる口調で「だめだ」と言った。"No", he said in a decided tone.
お口直しにミカンをどうぞ。Have a satsuma for dessert.
彼はメロディーを口笛で吹き始めた。He began to whistle a tune.

その物語は世代から世代へと口伝えで伝えられてきた。The story has been passed down from generation to generation by word of mouth.
このワイン口当たりが良くて飲みやすいわ。This is a smooth wine which goes down easy.

お母さんに口答えしてはいけませんよ。Don't answer your mother back.
刑事はその場で彼の口頭証言を書き取った。The detective took down his oral testimony on the spot.


口内炎ができて食事する時、痛くて痛くて。I have ulcers in my mouth, so it's very painful when I eat.





彼は手八丁口八丁だ。He is as ready to talk as to work.



彼女を胸に抱き寄せて、額に口付けをした。I clutched her to my chest, and kissed her on her forehead.



私の祖母は、口癖のように１００歳まで生きると言っていましたが、８５歳で亡くなりました。My grandmother used to say that she would live to be a hundred, but she died at the age of 85.








その来たばかりの子はおどおどして口ごもった。The new boy had a nervous stammer.
私たちはまた昨夜また口論をした。We had words again last night.



これは若者向きの車です。This is a car for young people.

女の子はお互いに向き合っている。The girls are facing each other.

私の方を向いてください。Turn toward me, please.この生地は洋服をつくるのには向かない。This material is not suitable for a dress.彼は先生に向いてない。He's not cut out for teaching.
乗り物は子供向けである。Rides in the cars are for kids.
強盗は店員に銃を向けた。The robber aimed his gun at the clerk.今度の土曜日の朝、シカゴに向けて出発します。I'm leaving for Chicago next Saturday morning.過去ではなく、未来に向けて取り組むのが当社の方針です。Our policy is to build for the future, not the past.



彼女は背が低すぎて塀の向こうがみえなかった。She was too short to see over the fence.その男の子は向こうにいます。The boy is over there.向こうの思う壷だぞ。You will play into their hands.
この事があったのは、ヨルダンの向こう岸のベタニヤであって、ヨハネはそこで、バプテスマを授けていた。This all happened at Bethany on the other side of Jordan, where John was baptizing.
向こう見ずな運転の為彼は免許を取り上げられた。He had his license taken away because of reckless driving.







近代的方法で産業は向上した。Modern methods improved industry.








早くビールを持って来いよ。のどが渇いてるんだ。Make with the beers, I'm thirsty!






いつもあかだらけで、食事も満足に与えられていない様子でした。He was always filthy and looked like he wasn't given enough food.
いいかげんな話はやめろ。Don't give me that!いいかげんに仕事をするな。Don't do the job just any old way.この静かな生活にはいい加減飽きてしまった。I'm about tired of this quiet life.
「ケーキはお好きですか」「はい、好きです」"Do you like cake?" "Yes, I do."実を言うと、私は彼が好きでないのです。To tell you the truth, I don't love him.
好き嫌い言わないで全部食べなさい。You shouldn't be so picky about food.
なんでもかんでも好き勝手にはさせないぞ。You shall not have your own way in everything.
ホワイトさんはみんなに好かれています。Miss White is liked by everyone.
この映画は、子供に好ましくない影響を与えるかもしれない。This movie may have an undesirable influence on children.
干物は私の好みに合わない。Dried fish is not to my taste.
かなり多くのアメリカ人が寿司を好む。Quite a few Americans like sushi.
リッチ氏は彼女の好意に感謝した。Mr Rich acknowledged her favor.

彼は「ハムレット」で好演した。He acted well in Hamlet.

その経験で彼女は民主党に対して好感を抱くようになった。The experience prejudiced her in favor of the Democratic Party.

私は好奇心からそこへ行った。I went there out of curiosity.
この好機を逃すな。Don't let this chance slip by.
好況と不況は交互に来る。Good times alternate with bad.





「好色と倒錯の違いとは？」「好色なら羽を使うが、倒錯なら鶏をまるごと使う」"What's the difference between erotic and kinky?" "Erotic is when you use a feather and kinky is when you use a whole chicken."


彼本人は好人物なんだが、その取り巻きがどうもいけないね。I really like him, but not his circle of friends.

滑り出しが好調なら事は半ば成就したのに等しい。Well begun is half done.

その状況はきっと好転するだろう。I am sure the situation will take a turn for the better.
天気が暖かくて我々のピクニックに好都合だった。Warm weather favored our picnic.

その劇は好評を得た。The play got a favorable notice.
ステーキとキャビアが私の好物だ。Steak and caviar are my favorite foods.

孔子の言説は有名である。The sayings of Confucius are famous.
雄のくじゃくは尾の羽毛が色彩豊かである。The male peacock has colorful tail feathers.




孝行したいときに親はなし。When one would be filial, one's parents are gone.











戦後日本は科学と工学に大いに進歩した。Since the war, Japan has advanced greatly in science and technology.


７月の工業生産は急増した。Industrial production rose sharply in July.


私はハンマーを工具箱に入れています。I keep my hammer in the toolbox.

腕のいい工芸師は自分の作品に誇りを持っている。A good craftsman takes pride in his work.
彼は工作に熟練している。He is skilled in handicraft.会計係が逮捕されたが、原因は彼の裏帳簿工作だという噂があった。When the accountant was arrested, rumour had it that it was for his creative bookkeeping.


その工事は住民からの強い反対にもかかわらず、続けられた。They carried on with the construction in the face of strong opposition from the residents.

この道を行ってもダメですよ。工事中ですから。You can't go along this road. It is under repair.




それをざっくりと各工程に割り振ったものです。I just roughly allocated it to each function.

これは私が工夫した計画です。This is a plan of my own devising.





今日は借金の工面で東奔西走した。I was on the go all day today looking for a loan.
彼は、話術が巧みだ。He has a good art of talking.

巧言令色少なし仁。Fair words butter no parsnips.


あのピアニストは巧妙でよく知られている。That pianist is known for his skill.
ちまたではインターネットなるものがはやっています。People are talking about this Internet phenomenon.


あなたがここに居たのは幸いでした。You were fortunate to be here.

金持ちが必ずしも幸福とは限らない。The rich are not always happy.
ジョンソン氏の部屋は広かった。Mr Johnson's was a large room.

彼は広がりを見せる汚職スキャンダルで摘発された最初の国会議員です。He is the first national politician to be named in a widening corruption scandal.
この家の広さはどのくらいありますか。What is the area of this house?
そのうわさはすぐ広まった。The rumors spread soon abroad.
彼らはキリストの福音を全世界に広めた。They spread the Gospel all over the world.旅行は人の視野を広める。Travel broadens one's horizons.



まあ、広義的には間違っていませんね。Well, broadly speaking that's right.
その商品はテレビで広告された。The goods were advertised on TV.


広告代理店はこの仕事にかなり入れこんでいます。The ad agency has a lot riding on this account.
その大きな広告塔は私達の市にとって恥だ。That big advertisement tower puts our city to shame.


何千人もの人々が広場にひしめき合っていた。Thousands of people were milling around in the square.広場で野球をするのはどうでしょうか。How about we play baseball in the open space?
サハラは広大な砂漠です。The Sahara is a vast desert.




その会社は広範な種類の楽器を製造している。The company manufactures a wide variety of musical instruments.
彼の研究は広範囲に及んでいる。His studies cover a wide field.
州警察のジャネット・ウェルプ広報官によれば、そのトラックは州間高速道路３０号線沿いの橋の欄干に激突して止まったとのことです。State police spokeswoman Janet Welp says the truck wound up crashing into a bridge railing along Interstate 30.

新たな入植者達がその広大な広野を開墾した。The newcomers cultivated the immense wilderness.






恒産なき者、恒心なし。From hand to mouth will never make a worthy man.
惑星は恒星の周りを回る。Planets move around a fixed star.
この問題はｋについての恒等式なので、まず与式を、ｋについて、解きます。This problem is an equality of k so we first solve the assigned equation for k.

トムは気難しい顔で、人々があわただしくドアから出て行くのを見ていた。Tom watched them hurry through the doors, a disagreeable expression on his face.
彼女はその知らせを聞いて慌てふためいた。She pushed the panic button when she heard the news.
その質問で彼はすっかりあわてた。The question threw him off his balance.
あわてものだから彼はたぶん早合点するだろう。Being a hasty person, he is likely to jump to conclusions.慌て者なので彼はきっと早とちりをするだろう。Being a hasty person, he is likely to jump to conclusions.

私はこれを抗議と解釈した。I interpreted this as a protest.
国際アムネスティは、政治囚への支援として一般市民による抗議活動を組織することがしばしばある。Amnesty International often organizes public protests in support of political prisoners.






医者は少女に抗生物質を服用させた。The doctor dosed the girl with antibiotics.
新聞は２党間の抗争を報じた。The newspaper reported friction between the two parties.




この決定は諸君全部を拘束するものではない。This decision is not binding on all of you.
三浦容疑者の拘置中の過ごし方が明らかになった。It has become clear what murder-suspect Miura's jail lifestyle is like.
ついに反逆者は捕らえられ、拘置所に入れられた。The rebel was ultimately captured and confined to jail.
君はあまり字句に拘泥しすぎるよ。You are too much letter-bound.
警官は彼を拘留した。The police held him in custody.

あなたは喫煙をひかえるべきです。You should refrain from smoking.先生は生徒たちにそれらの単語をノートに控えておくよう指示した。The teacher told the pupils to write those words down in their notebooks.彼女は入試を控えて神経質になっていた。She was nervous before the entrance exam.
彼の意見は控え目である。He is humble about his opinion.
税務署は控除を認めた。The tax agent allowed the deduction.
被告は上級裁判所に控訴するだろう。The defendant will appeal to a higher court.


彼は来客攻めにあった。He was besieged by callers.
彼は私にその問題をいかに攻めるべきかについて教えてくれた。He enlightened me on how I should attack the subject.



敵は夜に私達を攻撃した。The enemy attacked us at night.






われわれは敵の攻勢に後退した。We recoiled from the enemy's offensive.




だいぶ夜もふけました。もうおいとませねばなりません。It is getting rather late. I think I must be going now.

これでさらに困ったことになるだろう。This will add to our troubles.

私は更衣室で財布を盗まれた。I had my purse stolen in the changing room.



この冬は降雪量の記録を更新した。This winter the record for snowfall was broken.
シンナーなどの常習性のある物をしてると言う事は、更正する可能性が低いと思います。I think that, as he's using addictive substances like thinner, the chance of rehabilitation is low.




田中前外相の更迭に続く政治混乱がその象徴である。The dismissal of foreign minister Tanaka is symbolic of the continuing political turmoil.

マンション用地は杭で囲まれている。The site of the condominium is enclosed with stakes.

この校閲力の弱さは人手が足らないとしか考えられませんね。I can only put this poor checking down to lack of people at work.
どの生徒も校歌を知っている。Every student knows the school song.




３ヶ月すれば、私たちの新しい校舎が完成するでしょう。It will be three months before our new school building is completed.
その便せんには校章が打ち出しにされている。The note is embossed with the school emblem.
私は校正の仕事を引き受けた。I took on the job of proofreading.

校則は、順守すべきだ。You should observe the school rules.
私たちの校長先生は授業はしません。Our principal does no teaching.
校庭はたいへん小さかったです。The schoolyard was very small.

校門は8時に開く。The gates of the school open at eight.




ここではどんどん意見をおっしゃってかまいません。You can speak out freely here.
６時に起きるのはかまわない。I don't mind getting up at six.この子供達は親にかまってもらえない。These children are neglected by their parents.どうか私にかまわないでください。Please don't mind me.

彼はジャマイカに住居を構えた。He took up residence in Jamaica.


我々のヨットクラブは１０人のメンバーで構成されている。Our yacht club has ten members.


家族は社会の最小構成単位である。A family is the smallest unit of society.
個人は地域社会の基本的な構成要素である。The individual is the fundamental element of a community.
彼女が建設的な構想を持つ。She has constructive ideas.
この増加に加えて、世界の経済構造の変化があった。Along with this increase, there has been a change in the world's economic organization.

我々は他人との関係を構築し、維持していく。We build and maintain relationships with others.
構内で昨日彼女に会ったよ。I met her on campus yesterday.
２つの構文には意味の違いは何も無いようだ。There doesn't seem any difference of meaning between the two constructions.



外国人の一団が江戸、つまり東京に到着した。A group of foreigners arrived in Edo, i.e. Tokyo.

この習慣は江戸時代に始まった。This custom began in the Edo Period.



洪水がその村を飲み込んでしまった。The flood overwhelmed the village.





その船はいま港にある。The ship is now in the harbor.

横浜は美しい港町です。Yokohama is a beautiful port town.
君は港内に林立する帆柱を見るであろう。You will see a forest of masts in the harbor.
近代的な港湾施設がないために、多くの船積み業者が不便を被った。The lack of modern post facilities caused trouble for many shippers.



ハツカネズミとドブネズミは異なる。Mice are distinct from rats.
乙が受託業務の実施により得た成果は、甲乙双方に帰属するものとする。Any result obtained through the execution of the Commissioned Business shall belong to each party hereto.





子供の叫び声はとてもかん高かった。The child's shout was indeed shrill.ある男が甲高い声で何か不平を言っていた。A man was complaining of something in a sharp voice.










苦心の甲斐があった。That was well worth the trouble.
おもちゃコンサルタントの方々が甲斐甲斐しく働く姿がとても印象的でした。Seeing the briskly working toy consultants also left a strong impression.
うちの亭主は甲斐性がない。My husband isn't quite the provider he should be.







皇太子は、皇位を継承する人です。The crown prince is the one who is to succeed to the throne.

王家の家族は皇居に住んでいる。The royal family lives in the Imperial Palace.







皇太子はそのアメリカ婦人から英語を習った。The prince learned English from the American lady.
そのオペラにはおそれ多くも皇太子殿下ご夫妻が足を運ばれた。The opera was graced with the august presence of the Crown Prince and Princess.

皇帝ネロは極めて邪悪な暴君だった。Emperor Nero was an extremely evil tyrant.


これらの硬貨はほとんど価値がない。These coins are of little value.






貴殿宅の水道水は硬水過ぎます。軟水を使用しましょう。Your tap water is too hard. Get a water softener.
壁のまわりのバレリーナ達は筋肉が硬直しないように脚と足先を伸ばしています。The ballerinas around the walls are stretching their legs and feet so their muscles will not become stiff.
ダイヤモンドの硬度は１０である。The hardness of diamond is 10.



彼は最終稿に忙しく取り組んでいる。He is busy with the final draft.


君、本当に企画通ったこと確認しただろうね。糠喜びだけはごめんだよ。Are you saying that our plan was accepted? I hope you're not showing me any premature happiness here.







紅茶２杯とコーヒー１杯ください。Two teas and a coffee, please.

紅白の旗が風になびいていた。A red and white flag was flying in the wind.


座席ベルトをお絞めになり、タバコはご遠慮下さいませ。Please fasten your seat belts, and kindly refrain from smoking.

この明るさで絞りはどのくらいですか。What is the correct aperture in this light?
死体解剖の結果、絞殺と判明しました。The postmortem showed that she had been strangled.
小羊を盗んで絞首刑になるくらいなら親羊を盗んで絞首刑になるほうがましだ。As well be hanged for a sheep as a lamb.
罪人は絞首台に送られた。The criminal was sent to the gallows.
綱は張りすぎて切れた。The rope broke under the strain.
国会の動きはこの問題をめぐる与野党間の政治的綱引きとなった。Parliamentary activity has become a political tug of war between the ruling and opposition parties over the issue.


彼女は網を張らないで綱渡りに挑んだ。She dared to walk the tightrope without a net.


農家の人達は鋤で土を耕す。Farmers turn up the soil with plows.

３００年間、彼らは周囲の土地を耕作してきた。For three hundred years they have farmed the surrounding land.


あなたの考えを言ってください。Please tell me what you think.私達は他人の考えを尊重するべきです。We should respect the ideas of others.
考えてみれば彼のいう事はおかしいよ。Come to think of it, he is wrong.
あなたは家族の事を考えるべきです。You must think of your family.人々を幸福にするのは何なのかを考えることは価値がある。It is worthwhile considering what it is that makes people happy.私たちは人をその人の人格を基に判断しようと考えるかもしれないが、それらは一見したところでははっきりわからないものである。Although we may intend to judge a person on the basis of his or her personal qualities, they are not visible at first sight.
彼は心配事を考えこんで、一日中座っていた。He sat brooding over his troubles all day.
考え事をしてたら、乗り越してしまった。Lost in thought, I missed my stop.
彼は問題の解決策を考え出そうとしたけど、無理でした。He tried to solve the problem, but had no luck.
あなたがそれを考え直して止めてもらえればと思います。I hope you'll think better of it.
私はあらゆる困難について考え抜いた。I thought out all the difficulties.
彼らは時間に関しては厳格な考え方をしている。They have a strict idea of time.
フロイトは精神分析を考案した。Freud originated psychoanalysis.


彼は考古学者の助手である。He is an archeologist's assistant.

「割り当て」という概念を考察することから始めよう。We will begin by considering the concept of "quota".

彼らに同行しようかと考慮中です。I'm considering going with them.
ディベートとは肯定側と否定側で交わされる知的ゲームである。Debate is an academic game between the affirmative and the negative.

返答は肯定的なものだった。The answer was yes.



そのヨットは順調に航海中だ。The yacht is under smooth sail.

その航空専門家は統計を詳細に分析した。The aviation expert analyzed the statistics in detail.


その航空会社は貨物のみを扱っている。That aircraft company deals in freight only.

その新聞社は航空機を１０機待っている。The newspaper company has ten aircraft.
航空券はどこで受け取ればいいですか？Where can I pick up my ticket?


彼女は手紙を航空便で送った。She sent the letter by airmail.


そのヨットはブイを回って航行した。The yacht sailed round a buoy.




このボートのエンジンがハワイへの航路のなかばで駄目にならなければよいね。Let's hope this boat engine doesn't give up the ghost when we're halfway to Hawaii.
僕のボスは人使いが荒いんだ。My boss is a slave driver.

ボクシングは必ずしも荒っぽいスポーツではない。Boxing is not always a rough sport.
庭を荒らしたのは誰だ。Who destroyed the garden?彼らは私の果実園を荒らした。They robbed my orchard.掲示板を荒らす人の精神状態がわかりません。I just don't understand what goes through the minds of people who troll forums.
海はますます荒れてきた。The sea grew wilder and wilder.村への道路はとても荒れています。The road to the village is very rough.唇が荒れています。I have chapped lips.
吹雪はまる一週間荒れ狂った。The snowstorm raged for a full week.


荒稼ぎしているらしいね。I heard you're raking in the money.




彼らは風と荒天のなすがままに、航海中に行方不明になった。They were lost at sea, at the mercy of wind and weather.
荒唐無稽と皆に言われた彼のビジネスプランだけど、今となっては我々の不明を恥じるしかないのかね。Every one of us who ridiculed his business plan as a bunch of hokum should be embarrassed we did.
その船は荒波にあった。The ship encountered rough seas.
その国は戦争で荒廃してしまった。The country was wasted by war.



最も荒涼たる日は一日中笑わなかった日である。The most wasted day of all is that on which we have not laughed.
彼は１０行に１０個の間違いをした。He made ten mistakes in as many lines.
ふと通りに目をやると、行き交う人の中に、１人立ち止まり俺を見下ろす者がいた。As I glanced at the street there was somebody looking down at me in the middle of those walking past each other.

彼は行き先の違う列車に乗るほど不注意ではない。He is not so careless as to take the wrong train.行き先の住所はおわかりですか。Do you have an address?
「時間通りに、教室にうまく行き着くことができる」と彼は思った。"I can make it to my class on time," he thought.労働側と経営側の意見不一致はストライキに行きつくかもしれない。The disagreement between the union and management could lead to a strike.
その庭は手入れが行き届いている。The garden is tended with great care.

激しい雨が彼らの行く手を妨げた。The heavy rain prevented them from going there.
マウスとキーボードを行ったりきたりするのが煩雑なので、キーボードのみで操作できるようショートカットキーはないのでしょうか？It's a fiddle going to and fro between the keyboard and mouse so are there shortcuts to allow operation using only the keyboard?



彼は自分の行為を正当化しようとしている。He is trying to justify his act.
行員は私に過ちを認めた。The clerk admitted his mistake to me.



文字を大きくし、文字間や行間に余裕をもたせ、高齢者の方や、視力に障害のある方が読み易いように注意しました。I took care to make the letters large and be generous with character and line spacing in order for it to be easy to read for the elderly and those who have problems with their sight.
彼女は行儀が極めて上品である。She is quite decent in conduct.

ニクソンはウォーターゲート事件に関し、黙秘権を行使して無視しようとしたが、結局明るみにでた。Nixon tried to stonewall through Watergate by ignoring it, but it didn't work.

メグは学校のいろいろな行事に参加する。Meg attends many school affairs.




道は行進にさしつかえない。The way is free for an advance.

そのタクシーはいきなり左に曲がった。The taxi abruptly turned left.
その省は内政問題の行政をつかさどる。The ministry administers the internal affairs.
首相は行政改革を提案した。The Prime Minister proposed administrative reforms.




我々は旅行の最後の行程を歩かなければならなかった。We had to walk the last leg of the journey.


彼は友人の行動に憤慨した。He resented his friend's action.






容疑者の行方はまだ分からない。The whereabouts of the suspect is still unknown.納税者は払った金の行方を知る権利がある。Each taxpayer has the right to know where his money goes.
３人が依然行方不明です。Three people are still missing.
行方不明者を探そうと、できるだけの努力をした。We tried our best to find the missing persons.

子どもたちがサーカスの行列を追いかけた。The children chased after the circus parade.
数学。行列式のところが宿題になってるんだけど・・・どうも僕にはついていけなくて・・・。Maths. Homework's about derivatives, but I really can't seem to cope with it.
今夜の講演は誰ですか。Who is going to speak tonight?
彼の講演会にはたくさんの聴衆が集まっていた。His lecture had a large audience.
その講義へ来た人はほとんどいなかった。Few people came to the lecture.
この講座では応急手当の基本的な技能を教えます。This course teaches basic skills in first aid.
講師は本題から脱線してしまった。The speaker wandered away from the subject.正確に言うと私は大学講師です。Specifically, I'm a university lecturer.
集中講習で私のフランス語は驚くほど上達した。The intensive course did wonders for my French.



その教師は講堂に学生を集めた。The teacher assembled the students in the hall.




ジェーンの夢は、貢いでくれる金持ち男をみつける事だった。Jane's dream was to find herself a sugar daddy.
彼は国への貢献を認められてナイト爵位を与えられた。He was awarded a knighthood in acknowledgement of his services to the nation.
あなたは何か雑誌を購読していますか。Do you subscribe to any magazines?
予約購読料は今年末以前に全て払ってください。All subscriptions must be paid before the end of this year.
チケット購入に必要な個人情報をインプットする。To purchase a ticket, you need to enter your personal details.


お客様の今後の購買需要を明らかにしようとしています。We are trying to clarify your future procurement requirements.
この年齢層の人々は、購買力はものすごくあるが、働いておらず、したがって、何も生産はしないのである。While this group has a great deal of spending power, it is not working, and therefore, not producing anything.
私は東京の郊外に住んでいる。I live on the outskirts of Tokyo.







この鉱山は来月閉山になる。This mine will close down next month.







オーストラリアは鉱物が豊富だ。Australia is abundant in minerals.


彼は鋼を鍛えて刀を作った。He forged the steel into a sword.


鋼材不足にも関わらず、工業生産高は５％だけ増加した。Despite a shortage of steel, industrial output has increased by five percent.


コンクリートは中に鋼鉄の棒を入れる事で補強される。Concrete can be reinforced by putting steel bars inside it.
雪が降りしきっている。Snow is falling thick and fast.
雨が土砂降りに降り始めた。It began to rain cats and dogs.
その上雨が降り出している。Besides, it's starting to rain.
雨がまともに私に降り注いでいた。The rain was falling on my face.
シカゴのあたりでは雨が降っていました。It was raining around Chicago.

先週の激しい降雨のために出水した。We had flooding because of last week's heavy rains.
ここの７月の平均降雨量はどのくらいですか。What is the average rainfall for July here?
その大型機は鋭い音を立ててほとんど直角に降下した。The giant plane screamed down in an almost vertical dive.


海賊達には降参する以外に道はなかった。The pirates had no choice but to surrender.



今夏の降水量は普通でなかった。This summer we had an unusual amount of rain.
予報はさらに降雪があると伝えていた。The prediction was for more snow.


降伏するくらいなら死んだほうが増しだ。I would rather die than yield.



１０項を参照して下さい。Please refer to paragraph ten.

これは何の項目に入るか。What heading does this come under?

その汽船は香港に立ち寄った。The liner called at Hong Kong.

韓国料理は、香辛料のきいた味でよく知られている。Korean food is noted for its spicy flavor.
彼女はいつも香水のにおいがきつすぎる。She always wears too much scent.










銀行はリスクの高い顧客へのローンには高い金利をつける。Banks charge higher interest on loans to risky customers.富士山は日本で一番高い山です。Mt. Fuji is the highest mountain in Japan.そんな高い車を買う余裕はありません。I can't afford to buy such an expensive car.
水は私のひざの高さだった。The water came up to my knees.
昨夜彼女は神経が高ぶっていた。She was a bundle of nerves last night.
歓呼の声はどよめきにまで高まった。The cheers swelled to a roar.

その小説は彼の名声を更に高めた。The novel added to his reputation.



例えばジャック・パインの松かさは、高温により影響を受けるまでは自ら開いて種子を放出しない。The cones of the jack pine, for example, do not readily open to release their seeds until they have been subjected to great heat.

そんな高価な本は買えないよ。I can't buy a book this expensive.

小額の札にいたしますか、それとも高額の札にいたしましょうか。Do you want small bills or large?
このスキャンダルで一部の高官が罷免される可能性がある。The scandal could lead to the firing of some senior officials.
高感度フィルムは出してもいいですか。Can I unload the high speed film?



彼女はまるで王女のように高貴な顔立ちをしている。She looks as noble as if she were a princess.

高級な品物を買う事は、結局は損にならない。It pays in the long run to buy goods of high quality.彼の祖父は高級軍人だった。His grandfather was a soldier of high degree.
彼女はいつも高級品に囲まれていた。She was always surrounded by high-quality goods.
高給をとっていたので、彼は安楽に暮らすことができた。His high salary enabled him to live in comfort.

このシンボルは強さと高潔さを表す。This symbol stands for strength and integrity.
塩分の高い食事をとると、高血圧の原因になるかもしれない。Maintaining a high salt diet may contribute to high blood pressure.


高原を散歩するのは楽しい。It's pleasant to take a walk on the plateau.
私の息子は、高校に入学した。My son entered high school.
彼らの大部分が高校生だった。They were for the most part high school students.
高山では空気が希薄になる。The air is rarefied on high mountains.






その悪党は高所恐怖症だ。The wicked man is scared of heights.

彼は趣味が高尚です。He has elegant tastes.


企業倒産は先月も高水準に推移した。Corporate bankruptcies continued at a high level last month.
技師がその高性能なシステムの操作方法を実演してくれた。The engineer demonstrated how to operate the sophisticated system.




超高速がコンコルド機の特徴だ。Great speed is a feature of the Concorde.

私は新しい高速道路をドライブして楽しかった。I enjoyed driving on the new highway.
僕高卒だからそのぶん高校の問題とか出来る。I'm a high school graduate so I am that much able to answer high school problems and such.


イチゴは冬は高値だ。Strawberries sell at high prices in winter.


じゃがいもは中南米高地が原産地である。The potato is native to the highlands of Central and South America.
その子の顔がサンタクロースを見て高潮した。The child's face glowed when he saw Santa Claus.


これより次第に高度を下げてまいります。We are beginning our descent.この仕事は高度の熟練を必要とする。This work calls for a high degree of skill.

人類は高等哺乳動物である。Human beings are the higher mammals.
彼は高等学校の生徒ではありません。He is not a high school student.
この政策は結局物価の高騰を引き起こした。This policy resulted in a great rise in prices.
私は高熱があった。さもなければキャンプに行くことができただろう。I had a high fever; otherwise I could have gone camping.


高飛車に出たね。So you are acting high-handedly.

その会社は高品質の製品で知られている。The firm is known for its high-quality products.








小生のレポートをご高覧に供したいと思います。I would like to submit my report for your perusal.
海がめは高齢まで生きる。Turtles live to a great age.







彼女は１０マイル競争を走るほど剛健だった。She was strong enough to run a 10-mile race.
ホイールに剛性があると、・・・の安定性は増す。Rigid wheels give sufficient stability to a low-speed vehicle steered by outside forces.







あなたの定期購読予約は六月号で切れます。Your subscription expires with the June issue.



３１８号室のお客さんに持って行ってあげなさい。Take it to the men in Room 318.
ビュッフェ、またはカフェテリアは９号車にあります。The buffet or the cafeteria is in Car 9.









このチョッキは前が合わない。This waistcoat won't meet at the front.この白いコートはあなたによく合うでしょう。This white coat will look very nice on you.２人の女性はお互い微笑みあった。The two ladies smiled at each other.


彼はその破片をくっつけ合わした。He stuck the broken pieces together.
いつも、いつも員数合わせなどと言われないで、たまには嘘でも良いから一騎当千の兵と言ってほしいよ。You always ask me to join your team because you need one more guy. Come on - just once I'd like you to say it's because I alone am worth ten of them - even if it is a lie.
あなたの計画を私に合わせなさい。Your plan must fit in with mine.３人は合わせて５０ポンド持っていた。The three men had £50 between them.君の答えを彼の答えと合わせてみなさい。Check your answers with his.






彼らは休戦条件で合意した。They agreed on cease-fire terms.




私の兄は試験に合格できなかった。My brother failed to pass the examination.新車はテストを受けて首尾よく合格した。The new car underwent its tests successfully.

合格者の過半数は大学出身者であった。The majority of the successful candidates were university graduates.


勉強の合間に私はテレビをみた。I watched television during a break in my studies.




真鍮は銅と亜鉛の合金である。Brass is an alloy of copper and zinc.
この数字の列を合計しなさい。Add up this column of figures.










クラブで合宿がある。There is a training camp with the club.
私は合宿所から逃げ出した。I ran away from the training camp.
パーティーは合唱で終わった。The party ended up with a chorus.



彼女は海外の合唱団で歌わないかと誘われています。She has been invited to sing in a choir in a foreign country.

すぐにゴーの合図をしてください。Give us the sign to go soon.















こういう風に合体すれば、１４ポートのＵＳＢハブになります。If you combine them in this way, you get a 14 port USB hub.
彼の日々の振る舞いは彼の主義主張と合致していない。His daily behavior is not consistent with his principles.


どうも合点がいかない。I don't get it.






試験の合否はどのくらい勉強するかによる。Your success in the examination depends on how hard you study.



会社が日中合弁で経営しています。The company is operating under joint Sino-Japanese management.

その議論に関する討論は合法であるようだ。A discussion of the proposal seems to be in order.


あなたは合法的手段で行動する方がよい。It is better for you to act by legal means.



抜本的な合理化のおかげで、わが社の利益は３倍に増えた。Thanks to a fundamental restructuring, our surplus has swelled three-fold.



彼女の思考法は合理的だった。Her way of thinking was rational.
この道はそこでハイウエイに合流する。This road joins the highway there.



囚人は拷問で死んだ。The prisoner died under torture.


河川は豪雨で氾濫しました。The rivers were flooded by the heavy rain.


何と豪華な家々でしょう。What splendid houses they are!








その豪雪のため、私たちの列車は定刻に発車できなかった。The heavy snowfall prevented our train from leaving on time.








雷鳴がとどろいた。The thunder roared.







彼は多くの困難を克服した。He has overcome many obstacles.



時間が刻々と迫っている。Time is pressing every moment.


あなたの親切な言葉は大事に心に刻みつけておきます。I'll treasure your kind words.

彼は大理石を刻んで像を作った。He carved marble into a statue.



彼は刻苦して名声を得た。He carved his way to fame.




真っ赤な夕焼けは明日の晴天を告げた。The deep red of the setting sun portended fine weather.
なぜ君は僕のことを先生に告げ口したのか言ってくれよ。Tell me why you have told on me to the teacher.


スミス氏は損害賠償を請求して彼らを告訴した。Mr Smith sued them for damages.

彼の死亡告知が新聞に出た。An announcement of his death appeared in the newspapers.
自分の過ちを告白するのに恥じる必要は何もない。There is no need to be ashamed of confessing one's mistakes.彼は私を好きになったと告白した。He confessed that he had fallen in love with me.牧師は彼女のキリスト信仰の告白を聞いた。The minister listened to her profession of Christianity.
彼は無実の罪で告発されている。He is under a false accusation.








国民は歓呼して彼を国王に迎えた。The people acclaimed him King.
同じ事が国家についても当てはまる。The same is true of the nation.



イギリスに１７４５年以前に国歌がなかったという事実は、それ自体はほとんどたいしたことではない。The fact that Britain had no national anthem before 1745 is in itself of little consequence.
バラはわが国の国花である。The rose is the national flower of this country.
火曜日に国会が開かれる。The Diet will meet on Tuesday.
国会議員は問題の解決に苦慮しています。Legislators in the Diet are struggling to find a solution to the problem.
銀行スキャンダルは国会議事堂をかけぬけました。A banking scandal is sweeping across Capitol Hill.
我々は彼を国外に追放した。We banished him from the country.

合衆国の国旗は星条旗と呼ばれる。The national flag of the USA is called the Stars and Stripes.

イングランドとスコットランドの間の恒常的な国境戦争は終わった。The constant border wars between England and Scotland came to an end.


国庫は資金が潤沢である。The government coffers are replete with funds.
第二に、いくつかのクリオールはそれ自体独立した「国語」となるかもしれない。Secondly, some of the Creoles may become independent "national languages" in their own right.彼は国語が好きだし得意だ。He likes Japanese, and he's good at it.

国債の償還は、国民の平均所得の減少を意味することになるでしょう。Paying the national debt could mean reducing the average income.
今月は国際貿易見本市が開かれている。We are having an international trade fair this month.

かくて、国際化は日本人にとって今はやりのスローガンになっている。Thus, internationalization has become a fashionable slogan for the Japanese.
国際関係の仕事に興味があるのですね。You are interested in a career in foreign relations.



私は関西国際空港でトニー君を見送った。I saw Tony off at Kansai International Airport.

日本のいわゆるバブル経済の崩壊は、国際市場に衝撃波を広げました。The bursting of Japan's so-called bubble economy sent shock waves through international markets.
今こそ日本が国際社会で重要な役割を果たすときだ。It is high time Japan played an important role in the international community.
ＩＭＦというのは国際通貨基金を表している。IMF stands for International Monetary Fund.
麻薬汚染の問題は国際的である。The drug problem is international.




こうした２国間の紛争は、国際法に従って解決されなければならない。These disputes between the two nations should be solved in accordance with international law.

しかし、国産ワインといっても、国内で瓶詰めされたものは全て国産ワインとなります。Having said 'domestic wine', anything bottled domestically is deemed to be domestic wine.


















我々の真の国籍は人類である。Our true nationality is mankind.






彼は国中を旅した。He traveled around the country.



アメリカは国土が広く、人々はよく移動する。America is a large country and its people are mobile.

戦後国道のほとんどが補修を緊急に必要とされた。After the war most of the highways were in urgent need of repair.
アメリカへ行くくらいなら、国内にいるほうがましだ。You might as well stay at home as go to America.





貿易が国富を増大させた。Trade increased the country's wealth.


この国宝は年１回しか拝観を許されない。This national treasure can be seen by the public only once a year.
国防のため大きな額が計上された。A considerable amount of money was appropriated for the national defense.
国防総省関係者は、異常がいつ発生したかについては口を閉ざしており、飛行の詳細についても論評をさけました。Pentagon officials won't say when the problem turned up and refused to discuss details about the flight.


国民は歓呼して彼を国王に迎えた。The people acclaimed him King.


国民総生産は一定の期間における一国の財及びサービスを貨幣価値で計った総生産高である。Gross national product is a nation's total output of goods and services during a given period of time as measured in monetary value.
キルビーは１９４８年のギリシャ国民投票にエメット理論を適用した。Kilby applied Emmet's theory to his investigation of the referendum held in Greece in 1948.
彼は国務で忙しい。He is busy with affairs of state.


国務長官は対外関係を統括する。The Secretary of State administers foreign affairs.


老人のための国立の病院がもっとあってしかるべきだ。There should be more national hospitals for old people.


ＵＮは「国連」を表します。UN stands for the United Nations.


国連総会は停戦決議案を採択した。The United Nations General Assembly adopted the cease-fire resolution.



あなたの菜園で作れる穀物や野菜を食べて生活する方がずっと安上がりだ。It's much cheaper to live on grains and vegetables you can grow in your garden.


ビタミンＥを豊富に含む食物には、濃い緑色をした菜っ葉類・豆類・ナッツ類・全粒穀類がある。Foods rich in vitamin E include dark-green, leafy vegetables, beans, nuts and whole-grain cereals.
救援機は強風と酷寒に対処しなければならなかった。The rescue flight had to reckon with strong winds and freezing temperatures.

酷使されている不法外国人労働者は制度の隙間にこぼれ落ちてしまうことが多いのです。Mistreated illegal foreign workers often fall between the cracks of the social system.





２匹犬を飼っているが、１匹は白でもう１匹は黒だ。I have two dogs. One is white and the other black.
丈の長い黒いコートを着た、あの長身の男だった。It was the tall man in the long, black coat.ナンシーはヘレンよりもほんのすこし色が黒い。Nancy is a shade darker than Helen.州知事は黒い金に手をつけました。The governor took the money out of a slush fund.


その講堂はひどく黒ずんでいる。その原因の一つは酸性雨である。The auditorium is terribly stained. It is, in part, due to acid rain.
その黒っぽいコートは彼女の浅黒い肌には合わない。That dark coat does not match her dark skin.













彼は常に黒メガネをかけている。He always wears dark glasses.




待っていたのは黒光りのする大型車だった。The waiting car was big and black and shiny.



あの人は眼の横にほくろがある。That person has a mole at the side of his eye.

今月は黒字である。We are in the black this month.






「なんだか焦げ臭いね」「うっかりパンを黒こげにしちゃったの」"Can you smell something burning?" "Oh, I went and burnt the toast."
三原色を混合すると黒色ができる。Mixture of the three primary colors creates black.



マーテイン・ルーサー・キング・ジュニアは、黒人牧師を父として生まれた。Martin Luther King, Jr., was the son of a black minister.














太陽の黒点を観察しよう。Let's observe sunspots.
黒塗りのリムジンがキーというタイヤの音と共に角を曲がった。A black limo rounded the corner with a squeal of tires.





テーブルの下には黒猫がいた。Under the table was a black cat.

黒板に書きますね。I'll write it on the blackboard.





赤いドレスの女は、黒服の男を無視して、ケイタイで友達にかけた。The woman in a red dress ignored the black-clothed man and called a friend on her mobile.

私は誰が黒幕か知っている。I know who is pulling the strings.













その囚人は獄舎につながれている。The prisoner is in chains.


その液体はうまくこせない。The liquid does not strain well.
腰に持病があります。I have back problems.
彼女は腰掛けて足を組んだ。She sat down and crossed her legs.
腰を下ろし、手帳を開きました。I sat down and opened my notebook.
君が座っている腰掛けのペンキはまだ塗り立てだよ。The paint on the seat on which you are sitting is still wet.





腰痛がひどいんです。I have a bad pain in my lower back.

なによ！出来ないの？この度胸なし！腰抜けッ！What? You can't do it? You coward! Chicken!


切符はたちまち売り切れた。The tickets were sold out in a moment.
最近、物忘れが激しくて。少しボケてきたのかな？Could I be going soft in the head? I forget things so easily these days.

ビルはどうもメアリーに惚れているらしい。Bill seems to be stuck on Mary.
彼女は男性がほれぼれとするような着物をきていた。She was dressed fit to kill.
彼女は一目で彼に惚れ込んだ。She fell in love with him at first sight.
「うちの愛妻がケチでさー」「のろけてる？愚痴ってる？」"My wonderful wife is so stingy that ..." "You boasting? Or complaining?"
彼女は金もうけのこつを知っている。She knows the art of making money.
骨が完全にくっつくには１ヶ月くらいはかかるだろう。It'll take the bone a month or so to set completely.
彼女はまだ料理のコツを覚えていない。She hasn't got the knack of cooking yet.
骨格たくましい体格なので彼は柔道家でとおっている。With his muscular constitution he passes for a judoist.
２、３日骨休めして。Please take a rest for a few days.



この仕事に骨惜しみをしてはいけない。Don't spare yourself in this work.

右腕を骨折したようです。I think my right arm is broken.


その機械の骨組みは堅くなければならない。The frame of the machine should be rigid.


この骨董の火鉢は今では実際に使われていない。This antique brazier no longer has any real utility.
このテーブルは貴重な骨董品だ。This table is a priceless antique.

彼の提案は骨抜きになった。His proposal has been watered down.



込み合ったバスの中では若い人々は老人達に席を譲るべきだ。In a crowded bus the young should offer their seats to the old.
飛行機は込み入ってそうですか。Does it look like the plane will be crowded?
彼はこの銃に弾丸を込めたままにしている。He keeps this gun loaded.彼女のテクニックはすばらしいが、もっと感情を込めて演奏する必要がある。Her technique is superb, but she needs to play with more expression.新憲法には、王権を弱める意図が込められていました。The new constitution included the aim of abridging the king's power.
あの木はこれほど高くない。That tree is not so tall as this.
ここに手のないナベがある。Here is a pan without handles.この町の人口はここ１０年間動きがない。The population of this town has been static for the last ten years.
「君が休暇をとるころあいだな」とボスはジムに言った。"It's high time you took a vacation," Jim's boss said to him.

今のアナウンスは何だったのですか。What did the announcement just say?
その法案は今会期中に成立する見通しである。The bill is expected to be enacted during the present session.
私は彼が来るのを今か今かと待っている。I expect him to come every moment.


巨大なタンカーがついに今し方出港した。The huge tanker has just left the dock.

私は今でも彼女の名を覚えている。I still bear her name in mind.
いまに誰も相手にしてくれなくなるよ。Soon nobody will have anything to do with you.
トムは今にもここに来るはずです。Tom should be here any minute.彼女は今にも卒倒しそうだった。She was on verge of fainting.
今のところお金はいらない。I don't need money at present.



トムはいまや以前にもまして勤勉に働いている。Tom works more diligently now.

いまいち東芝は信用できない。I can't really trust Toshiba.
次に私達に犬の世話をする時間があるか今一度考えてみましょう。Next, let us think about whether we have the time to look after a dog.
あの店では今夏物の特売中です。The store is having a sale on summer goods.
今回はしくじれないぞ。You cannot fail this time.
今期、我が社の黒字はほぼ１０％増加した。Our surplus has swelled by nearly ten percent in this quarter.

今月の売り上げはよくない。Sales have been off this month.

今月末に僕の家にきなさい。Come to my house at the end of this month.

今後気をつけなくてはなりません。You must be careful from now on.
今更後悔しても無駄だ。It's no use regretting it now.
今頃にしては暖かい。It's warm for this time of year.

いまどきそんなことは子供だってしないだろう。A child today would not do that.
彼らは今時分もう家に着いているころだ。They must have arrived home by this time.


今週はどちらにいらしゃいましたか。Where have you been this week?



今宵、奈落の王が復活する。Tonight, the King of Hell returns.
彼は今少し大人になって分別がついている。He is older and wiser now.



我々は今人手不足だ。We need more workers.

科学は今世紀になって急速な進歩を遂げた。Science has made rapid progress in this century.


学生時代は彼は今ほど優しくなかった。In his school days he wasn't as gentle as he is now.
今度だけは遅刻を大目に見てやろう。I will overlook your lateness this time.今度ロンドンにいらっしゃったときには私たちのところにお立ち寄り下さい。Please drop in to see us next time you come to London.今度の土曜日、テニスをしませんか。How about playing tennis next Saturday?


こんにちは、ぼくの名前は斎藤健です。Hi, my name is Ken Saitou.
レポートは今日中に準備が出来ていることが絶対必要です。It's essential for the papers to be ready today.





今晩は少し熱っぽいのです。I feel a bit feverish tonight.




今夜、パーティーを開きます。We're giving a party tonight.



私はこの難問に困り果てている。I'm at my wit's end with this difficult problem.


困ったら私に助けを求めなさい。Turn to me for help if you are in difficulty.騒音でこまっている。The noise bothers me.僕はしばしばお金に困る。I am often in difficulties.
その家族はきわめて困窮していた。The family lived in the depths of misery.彼は仕事をくびになってから困窮している。He has been in deep water since he got fired from his job.

彼の言ってる事を理解するのは困難だ。I found it difficult to understand what he was saying.
その日彼は困惑した。He was bewildered on that day.


２人は２月５日に婚姻届を出した。They had their marriage registered on February 5.




とうとう私の姉は婚約した。Finally, my sister got engaged.
彼は彼女に昨晩婚約指輪を贈った。He gave her an engagement ring last night.
イエスも、また弟子たちも、その婚礼に招かれた。And Jesus and his disciples had also been invited to the wedding.
リサはスタンに恨みがある。Lisa bears a grudge against Stan.


彼は彼女を恨んでいる。He hates her.



芸術に没頭しているとてもたくさんの人たちとも懇意にしてきた。I have known intimately a great many persons who were absorbed in the arts.
彼らは我々に援助を懇願した。They appealed to us for help.













趣味は昆虫を集めることです。My hobby is collecting insects.

彼は昆虫採集に興味を持っている。He has an interest in collecting insects.

彼らは皆、根は善良な男たちなのだ。They are all good men at heart.
彼の考えは経験に根ざしている。His belief is rooted in experience.
彼女は根っからの冒険家だ。She has an innate love of adventure.
ジェーンはボブが助けてくれなかったのを根に持っている。Jane has it in for Bob because he didn't help her.

思いがけない大きな財産がころがりこんでくると信じることは、根も葉もないことだ。To believe that an unexpected big fortune will come your way is to build a castle in Spain.

大統領は辞任する前にお金に困らないように根回しした。The president made certain that he lined his pockets before he resigned.

この種の仕事には大変な根気が必要とされる。This sort of work calls for a lot of patience.
その噂は全く根拠がなかった。The rumor was completely without foundation.


その州では未だに古い慣習が根強い、とその文化人類学者は言っている。The anthropologist says old customs still prevail in the province.
金は諸悪の根源。Money is the root of all evil.


泥棒は、間違いなくここにいるはずよ。きっと、どこかに根城があるから、そこを見つけさえすればいいの。The thief has to be in here. I'm sure somewhere around is his stronghold so if we can just find that we've got him.
彼らは多くの根深い迷信に打ち勝った。They overcame many inveterate superstitions.
セッティングは整えておいたから、後はまーくんが根性見せなきゃダメだからね？I've set the stage so now you just have to show some guts, OK?


人間の野蛮性は決して根絶できない。The savage in man is never quite eradicated.

この議論の根底には、問題としている規則が言語に存在するという仮説がある。Basic to the argument is the assumption that the rules in question are present in the language.
ホントしつこいなぁ、しのぶさん。なんか根負けしそう。Shinobu is really persistent. It seems that I am beaten.
それでは根本的な問題を見てみることにしましょう。Let us turn now to the fundamental issue.

水を加え、練り粉がどろどろしない程度に混ぜなさい。Add water and mix to a firm dough.
その混ぜ物をかき混ぜて、泡立ったら脇に置いておきましょう。Stir the mixture until it foams, then set it aside.
「そっかぁ、アルクさんはワーウルフなんですね」「俺は混血だから変身したりはしねーよ」"Oh, right, you're a werewolf, aren't you?" "I'm mixed blood, so I don't transform or anything."

三原色を混合すると黒色ができる。Mixture of the three primary colors creates black.


その道は車で混雑している。The roads are jammed with cars.






そこに赤井選手も加わり、ゴール前は混戦模様となった。There Akai joins them and it becomes a free-for-all in front of the finish line.

欲望を愛と混同するな。Don't confuse desire with love.







国会は混乱のうちに散会した。The Diet broke up in confusion.
油は水と混和しない。Oil does not mix with water.
アテネへ向かう一隻の貨物船が何の痕跡も残さずに地中海で沈没した。A cargo vessel, bound for Athens, sank in the Mediterranean without a trace.
医者は紺のスーツの上に白衣を着ていた。The doctor was wearing a white coat over a blue suit.






人だけではなくて、建物や壁が微かに持っている魂魄も感じられます。I can feel not only people's souls, but also the faint spirit held by buildings, walls and such.
そんなささいなことで私を悩まさないでくれ。Don't bother me with such trifles.






イブを唆したのは蛇だ。It is the snake that tempts Eve.
そのポールは左に傾いた。The pole inclined to the left.フランスは左に、イギリスは右に揺れているように思われる。France seems to be swinging left - Britain to the right.
彼は怒って首を左右に振った。He gave an angry shake of his head.成功不成功は気質に左右されることが多い。Success often depends on one's temperament.








試しに左手で書いてみた。I tried writing with my left hand.銀行は病院の左手にあります。You'll see the bank on the left hand side of the hospital.

左上の奥歯が痛みます。My upper left back tooth hurts.
自動車は左折した。The car made a turn to the left.



その事故で彼は左足にけがをした。He was injured in his left leg in the accident.

上の左端の動物は、竜のつもりでしょう。The animal in the top left-hand corner is meant to be a dragon.



国勢調査の結果は左派に自己の政策が誤っていたことを信じさせるにいたった。The result of the census led the left wing to believe that their policy was wrong.
彼の左目に髪がたれていた。A wisp of hair fell over his left eye.
では今晩またね、さようなら。See you tonight, then. Cheers!

彼の馬は３馬身の差で勝った。His horse won by three lengths.


１０から２を差し引くと８です。Subtract two from ten and you have eight.



私達が峠にさしかかる頃に雨になった。It began to rain as we came near the pass.交渉はとても微妙な段階にさしかかっている。The negotiations are at a very delicate stage.
彼女に傘をさしかけた。I held the umbrella over her.

しかもなお、石の大きいブロックが非常にぴったりと合わさっているので、ブロックの間にナイフの先を差し込むことができない。And yet the large blocks of stone are fitted together so closely that you cannot put in the point of a knife between them.こんもりと茂った木々の葉を通して日光が差し込んだ。The sunshine penetrated the thick leaves of the trees.

そのニュースは当分の間差し止めになった。The news was suppressed for the time being.


差し出がましいようですが、私から意見を述べさせて頂きます。At the risk of sounding too forward, I'd like to make a comment.
赤ん坊は小さな手を差し出した。The baby held out his tiny hand.ソフイーは未知の差し出し人からまた手紙が来るのを心待ちにしていた。Sophie had been looking forward to getting another letter from the unknown sender.



彼はトロフィーを高々と差し上げた。He held the trophy up high.飲み物を差し上げましょうか。May I offer you a drink?
私が出来る限りの援助を彼に差しのべるつもりです。I'll offer him what help I can.
さしあたり、我々にはこれで間に合います。This will do us for the present.



ほお紅や口紅を差すだけで表情や笑顔がどんどん変わってくるんです。Expressions and smiles change like that just from applying rouge and lipstick.彼は雨の中を傘もささずに歩きつづけた。He went on walking in the rain without an umbrella.
それらの間には、ごくわずかな差異があった。There was a minute difference between them.

遅延便については、オリジナルの出発日に基づくシーズナリティを適用するため、マイル差額の払い戻しはいたしません。For delayed flights, seasonal adjustments are made on the basis of the original flight date and so refunds of air-mile difference will not be made.



その週間は差別とは関係がなかった。That week had nothing to do with discrimination.

朝鮮は国際原子力委員会の査察を受け入れた。Korea allowed an inspection by the IAEA.

クレジットカード会社は信用査定結果をあまり重視していません。Credit card companies are not looking so hard at credit ratings.




後ろ足で砂をかけるようなことをした。He raised his heel against me.


彼らは砂金を手に入れたいとは思わなかった。They didn't want to get any gold dust.



その子は砂場にトンネルを掘った。That child dug a tunnel in the sandpit.


はちには砂糖が全然ない。There is no sugar in the bowl.

数人の子供が砂浜で遊んでいる。Several children are playing on the sandy beach.


あっという間に砂嵐に襲われた。Before we knew where we were, the dust storm was on us.
道路修理のために彼らは砂利をセメントで固めている。They are binding the gravel with cement to repair the road.


私の知る限り、彼はその詐欺の企みには関与していません。To my knowledge, he has not been involved in the fraud scheme.
あの詐欺師と金髪のコールガールは下宿のおかみさんを怒らせるには申分のない取り合わせだ。The confidence man and his blonde call girl make a perfect match in enraging his landlady.


ジョージはその犬に鎖をつけた。George put a chain on the dog.
まぁ、日本も鎖国していたわけだしなあ。Well, after all Japan also cut itself off from the world.


ついに彼女は権力の座を手に入れた。Finally she attained a position of power.これは昭和座から舞台中継です。This is a direct broadcast from the Showa theater.

息を切らして座り込んだ。I was out of breath and sat down.
数人の学生がベンチに座り、昼食を食べていた。Some students were sitting on the bench and having lunch.
私はその本を座右に置いている。I keep the book at hand.
彼の座右の銘は「暮らしは質素に、理想は高く」だ。His motto is "Plain living and high thinking."





鞄を座席の下に置いてください。Stick the bag down under the seat.


彼は座禅を組んだ。He sat in Zen meditation.





この座布団を干して下さい。Please air the zabuton.


観客側から相手チームをわらってやることは、その士気をくじくことになろう。It would demoralize the opposing team to give it the razz from the spectators' side.
いざというとき決意がくじけた。My resolution dissolved at the last moment.

資金不足のためわれわれの計画は挫折した。Our plan failed because of the shortage of funds.


通貨市場、債券市場は比較的落ち着いている。Currency and bond markets are relatively calm.
債権と一緒にお金も盗まれた。Bonds together with some money was stolen.


アメリカの対外債務は５０００億ドルを突破しましたよ。America's foreign debt shot past $500 billion.
金利は、債務者が負担する事業リスクに応じて定まるものと存じます。I know that interest rates are fixed in accordance to the borrower's business risk.
今日の催しのチケットはありますか。Do you have any tickets for today's performance?
あなたはその催し物がいつ行われたか知っていますか。Do you know when the event took place?
彼は大々的にパーティーを催した。He gave a party on a large scale.彼は勉強を始めるとどうして眠気を催すのだろうか。Why should he feel drowsy whenever he begins to study?



催促がましくて恐縮ですが、先日お貸ししたお金を返していただけませんか。I'm afraid this sounds like a demand, but could you return the money I lent you the other day?

金銭的に余裕があるのなら併用しても構わないが催眠だけで、十分に効果がある。If you have the money, then you may use it with other treatments, but the results from hypnotism alone should be plenty.






ビザの再発給をお願いしたいのですが。Could you please issue me a visa again?
そのようなことが再び起こりうるだろうか。Can such a thing happen again?







ああ、彼らはいつ再会するだろうか。Ah, when will they meet again?
会議をお茶休憩の後再開する予定である。We'll resume the meeting after tea.
フライトの再確認をお願いします。Flight reconfirmation, please.






その選手は見事に再起した。The player made a splendid comeback.










その城は、１４８５年に全焼して、再建されなかった。The castle, burnt down in 1485, was not rebuilt.



エメット理論の妥当性について再検討する必要があることを指摘しなければならない。I should point out that it is necessary to re-examine the validity of Emmet's theory.
僕は実験方法を学んでいたのではなかったし、実験を再現する方法を学んでいるのでさえなかった。I was not being taught to experiment or even to repeat experiments.





抜本的に事業の再構築を行ったおかげで、当社の黒字は３倍に膨らんだ。Thank to a fundamental restructuring, our surplus has swelled threefold.
そうでないと、購入の再考をしなければなりません。We might otherwise have to reconsider the purchase.



私の兄の未亡人は再婚した。My brother's widow has married again.
彼は私に、再三電話をかけてきた。He telephoned me again and again.
彼は再三再四それをやってみた。He tried it over and over again.


















私たちは再生可能なエネルギー源を開発する必要がある。We must develop renewable energy sources.録音が終わったらそれを再生して聞かせてください。Please play it back for me after you've finished the recording.



私達はエネルギーの再生利用を考えなければならない。We must think about recycling energy.






彼が再選されるのは確実だろう。His re-election seems certain.

わたしの再組織計画案が失敗した後、昇進の願いは全て失敗に終わった。All hope of my promotion went up in smoke after my reorganization plan fell through.

あなたからの最新のメールが見つかりません。再送していただけるでしょうか。I can't seem to find your last e-mail, I wonder if you can resend it to me.





彼は事件を最初から再調査しようと思った。He intended to reexamine the case from the beginning.






それから、それが適切であることを確認するために再度見直した。Then he went back over it to make sure it was right.



化学業界はすべてが下火になるまで再投資を控えています。Chemical companies are waiting until everything dies down before reinvesting.







その問題が再燃した。The problem has come to the fore again.




１９５５年にガンが再発し、彼女は１９５６年に４２歳で亡くなった。In 1955, the cancer returned and she died in 1956 at the age of 42.
すぐに再発行していただけますか。Can you reissue them right away?














営業活動を強化するために再編成する必要があります。We need to reorganize it in order to strengthen our business activities.

多くのアメリカ人はテレビで「アイ・ラブ・ルーシー」の再放送を観るのが好きだ。Many Americans love to watch reruns of the I Love Lucy show.




再来月は１２月だ。The month after next is December.
再来週の木曜日はどう？How about two weeks from Thursday?
祖父は、再来年引退する予定です。My grandfather is planning to retire the year after next.



ケンは三人のなかでもっとも速く走ります。Ken runs fastest of the three.
彼は最愛の息子をなくした。He lost his beloved son.
私たちは最悪の場合の覚悟はできている。We are prepared for the worst.

最寄りの電話はどこですか。Where is the nearest telephone?
将来、いつかコンピューターが文学作品の翻訳に着手するようになれば、われわれが知るような文学は最期を迎えることになるだろう。When, one day, computers undertake to translate literary works, it will be the end of literature as we know it.
この週末には２つの最強のチームが激突する。The two strongest teams will clash with each other this weekend.
最近、彼のうわさを耳にしていない。We haven't heard of him lately.

それは現存する最古の木造建築である。It is the oldest wooden building in existence.
大丈夫、誠実でいれば最後には報われるよ。I can assure you that honesty pays in the long run.伝説の最後の部分は後世付け加えられたものだ。The last part of the legend was added later.

最後までその仕事をやり遂げなければならない。You must carry the task through to the end.

彼は現存する最高の芸術家である。He is the greatest living artist.株価指数は過去最高に上昇した。The stock price index soared to an all-time high.


最高裁が人種分離教育を攻撃。The Supreme Court attacks school segregation.


試合は最高潮に達した。The game came to a climax.
エベレスト山は世界の最高峰である。Mt. Everest is the highest peak in the world.

最終電車はいつ出ますか。When does the last train leave?
わがチームは最終回で５点入った。Our team scored five runs in the last inning.
戦争は最終段階にはいっていった。The war had entered its final stage.

あなたの人生の最終目的は何ですか。What is your ultimate goal in your life?
その考えは最初のうちはばかげているように思えた。The idea seemed absurd at first.
第二が周辺環境との親和性であり、最小の廃棄物、自然エネルギーの利用等、周辺の生態と調和した住空間を形成することである。The second is the affinity with environment. By utilizing natural energy and reducing wastes, we have to make houses which harmonize with ecology.

被害は最小限に食い止められた。The damage was held to a minimum.
最小限度の世話で、立派に育つ植物もある。Some plants grow well with a minimum of care.




私は最新の辞書を持っている。I have an up-to-date dictionary.
その工場では、設備はすべて最新式のものだった。In the factory, all the equipment was up to date.
その歌手はあの曲で最盛期にあった。The singer was at his best in that song.今はカキの最盛期だ。Oysters are in season now.

そのかわりに最前定義した二つの経済学的変数に関する議論を行うことにしよう。Instead, I will turn to a discussion of the two economic variables I defined a moment ago.


それが私たちが今できる最善の方法だ。That's the best way we can do now.
もはや言うことはない。I have nothing further to say.
彼の最大の欠点はしゃべりすぎることだ。His greatest fault is talking too much.


これはパリへの最短コースです。It's the shortest route to Paris.
私は最低２マイルは歩ける。I can walk at least two miles.こんな最低の目にあったことはないわ！This is the worst thing that has ever happened to me!あの映画、最低！That movie stinks!

多くの会社が人員を最低限にまで縮小した。A lot of companies have pared their staff down to a minimum.



彼はこの計画に最適である。He is the best for this project.

節制は最良の薬。Temperance is the best physic.

私は妻を見舞いに病院に行った。I went to the hospital to see my wife.
妻子は運命に与えられた人質である。Wife and children are hostages given to fortune.












彼はハンサムで才気も金もある紳士である。He is a gentleman, handsome, clever, and rich.



才子多病、佳人薄命。Whom the gods love die young.
彼女は美人と言うより才女だ。She is more clever than beautiful.

彼女は才色兼備だ。She is as clever as she is beautiful.








君には音楽の才能がある。You have a gift for music.




彼女は３０歳未満だと思いますが。I should think she is under thirty.






彼らはその動議について採決をした。They took a vote on the motion.
病院で検査用の血液を採血した。They took a sample of my blood at the hospital.
その事業もやがては採算が取れるようになるだろう。The business will pay in due course.

彼は庭でジャガイモを採取した。He harvested the potatoes in his garden.
砂から金を分離採集する方法をお見せしましょう。I'll show you how to separate gold from sand.

その委員会はその提案を採択した。The committee adopted the plan.

私達の先生は試験の採点をしている。Our teacher is marking exam papers.



６世紀にアングロ・サクソン族はローマ文字を採用した。In the 6th century, the Anglo-Saxons adopted Roman characters.都会の会社は有能な若者を採用しようと互いに張り合った。City firms vied with each other to hire the brightest young staff.
その農場経営者は色々な種類の作物を栽培している。The farmer cultivates a variety of crops.


「１７歳の時スクーナー船で地中海を航海したわ」彼女はゆっくりと注意深く言う。"I sailed around the Mediterranean in a schooner when I was seventeen," she recited slowly and carefully.
移住者の部落が野蛮人によって征服され、移住者の希望も生活も土壇場にきた時、長い歳月をかけての不幸とのたたかいに終止符がうたれた。Years of resistance to misfortune ended when the settlers' village was overcome by the savages and their hopes and lives came to the bitter end.

歳入は増えているが経費の増加には追いつかない。Revenues are growing, but not as fast as costs.





７時までに彼女は夕食を済ましてしまっているだろう。By 7:00 she will have eaten dinner.電話で済まそうと思いました。I thought I could settle it by phone.
私は宿題をすませてからテレビを見た。Having done my homework, I watched television.
すみません、この席あいていますか。Excuse me, is this seat taken?
１０時ちょっと前に仕事が済んだ。We got through the work just before ten.しかし彼に大きなけがはなく、軽い打撲傷で済んだ。However he wasn't seriously hurt and got away with light bruising.
災いを転じて福としなさい。Turn your misfortune to account.

嵐は、多くの災害を引き起こした。The storm caused a lot of damage.
人生に災難は付き物。Accidents will happen.





ピックは硬い地表を砕くために用いられる長い取っ手の道具だ。A pick is a long handled tool used for breaking up hard ground surfaces.彼の希望は無残に砕かれた。His hopes were shattered.

花瓶は粉々に砕けた。The vase burst into fragments.




砦は不意に攻撃された。The fort was attacked by surprise.
この記念碑は祖国に命を捧げた兵士を祭っている。This monument is dedicated to the soldiers who gave their lives to their country.
ヨハネの証言はこうである。ユダヤ人達が祭司とレビ人をエルサレムからヨハネのもとに遣わして、あなたは誰ですかと尋ねさせた。Now, this is John's testimony: Jews of Jerusalem sent priests and Levites to ask him who he was.


彼は祭壇の上をあちこちに歩いた。He walked to and fro on the stage.
その王室の結婚式は壮大な祭典であった。The royal wedding was a magnificent occasion.
今度の祭日は日曜日と重なります。The next holiday falls on a Sunday.














彼は細々とおもちゃやをやっている。He keeps a toyshop in a small way.
ムリエルさんはバイトで細細と暮らしている。Muriel is making a poor living from her part-time job.ほそぼそとしたアクセスや、たまにくるメールなどに励まされ、ズルズルここまできてしまいました。Encouraged by the continuing trickle of hits and the rarely arriving email I've somehow kept going till now.
彼は太っているくせに声は細い。His voice is thin even though he is fat.
それぞれのアイテムがこと細かに描かれている。Each item was described in painstaking detail.
塩漬けキャベツを細かく切る。Chop the pickled cabbage finely.目の細かい織りのカーペットが一般的には価値が高い。Tightly-knit carpets are generally more valuable.わたしはこまかい点までしらべました。I went into details.

愛情こまやかな老夫婦を見るのはいいものだ。It is pleasant to watch a loving old couple.
これはあなたの親切に対するささやかなお礼の印です。This is a small acknowledgement of your kindness.


この化学薬品は細菌の繁殖を防ぐだろう。This chemical will prevent germs from breeding.

彼らの最高の技術は木工細工に見られた。Their highest skill was woodworking.



ほんの些細なことにも細心の注意を払わなければならない。You must give close attention to the merest details.




そよ風で池の面にさざ波が立った。A gentle wind made ripples on the surface of the pond.
今後どんな細部にも注意を払いなさいよ。You must pay attention to every minute detail from now on.


この地域社会に住む一人一人は、健康な人間が持つ免疫機構の細胞のようなものだ。Every person in this community is like a cell in the immune system of a healthy human body.










彼は菜園でトマトを育てている。He grows tomatoes in his garden.




菜食主義者へのおすすめは、なんですか。Can you recommend any vegetarian dishes?

そういう行為は世論の裁きを受けるだろう。Such an act will be judged at the bar of public opinion.

誰がこの事件を裁くのでしょうか。Who is going to try this case?










布に応じて衣服を裁て。Cut your coat according to your cloth.


仲裁では普通６ヶ月に裁決を下す。With arbitration, judgement is usually passed in six months' time.

布に応じて服を裁断せよ。Cut your coat according to your cloth.

裁判は公明正大であることが要求される。Judgment requires impartiality.
ヤッパリさんが裁判官に慈悲を求めて訴えた。Mr. Yappari appealed to the judge for mercy.

その事件は裁判ざたになった。The matter was brought into court.
裁判所が法律を執行する。The courts administer the law.


裁判長は、２時間の休憩を告げた。The judge called for a recess of two hours.
本当に裁縫が上手ですね。You're a magician with a needle and thread.







火事の際は１１９番に電話してください。In the case of fire, dial 119.

きわどいところで終電に間に合った。I was just in time for the last train.

彼女のお金への執着心には際限がない。Her love of money is without bounds.

その二つの考えの対照は非常に際立っている。The contrast between the two ideas is very marked.
イースト菌はパンを膨らませる際の作用剤だ。Yeast acts as an agent in making bread rise.
この頃は仕事にありつくのが難しい。Jobs are hard come by these days.
それは日本ではありきたりの出来事だ。That is the common occurrence in Japan.
失礼だが、上記の記事にある３つの誤りを指摘しておきたい。Excuse me; allow me to point out three errors in the above article.悪いけどほかに用事があるの。I'm sorry, I have another engagement.



その学校には二千人の学生が在学している。There are 2,000 students in the school.


申し訳ありませんが、在庫がありません。I'm afraid we are out of stock.
彼らは年内に在庫品のかたをつけなければならなかった。They had to clean out the goods in stock within the year.

加藤氏は、パリに在住していて、家に残した家族を懐かしがっている。Mr. Kato, living in Paris, misses the family he left behind.

彼は大統領在職中日本を訪れた。He visited Japan while he was President.
この学校には数人の外国人が在籍している。This school has several foreigners on the roll.
午前中は在宅の予定です。I'll be at home in the morning.










きめの粗い材質がその子の柔らかい肌を傷つけた。The rough material hurt the child's tender skin.この机は堅い材質の木でできている。This desk is made of hard wood.
ひろしは材木をひいて板にしています。Hiroshi is sawing the wood into boards.
小麦粉はケーキの主な材料だ。Flour is the main ingredient in cakes.すぐれた材料で作られた家具は、売れ行きがよい。Furniture made of good materials sells well.彼は自分の書く物語の材料はたいてい子供時代の体験に頼っている。He draws on his childhood experiences for the material of most of his stories.
ビルはその罪を犯していなかった。Bill did not commit the crime.
大都会には罪悪がはびこっている。There is much crime in the big cities.
彼女には一抹の罪悪感があった。She had a vague feeling of guilt.



罪状は殺人らしいが、詳しい事は口に出そうとしない。His criminal record is apparently for murder, but he won't start to talk about the details.
シンガポールでは罪人の背中を鞭で打ったり、杖で何度か叩いたりする。In Singapore, one method of punishing criminals is to whip them, or hit them several times on the back with a cane.
人間は生来罪人である。Man is born a sinner.
彼は努力によって財を成した。He has made a fortune through hard work.国民総生産は一定の期間における一国の財及びサービスを貨幣価値で計った総生産高である。Gross national product is a nation's total output of goods and services during a given period of time as measured in monetary value.

財界では、法案提出断念に反発を強めているそうだ。In the financial world opposition is apparently increasing against the withdrawal of the proposed bill.


ミスで財産を失った。My mistake cost me my fortune.
国の財政は税収の落ち込みできわめて逼迫している。The government finances are severely constrained because of falling tax revenues.ブラウンさんは我々の財政上の相談相手です。Mr Brown is our financial adviser.

財政改革は今の財政難を改善するかもしれません。Financial reforms may ameliorate the current economic difficulties.
その国は財政危機に直面している。The country is confronted with a financial crisis.



財政改革は今の財政難を改善するかもしれません。Financial reforms may ameliorate the current economic difficulties.

政府は、財政問題に対処しなければならない。The government will have to deal with the financial problem.

何百という人々がゴリラ財団研究所へ電話や手紙を下さいました。Hundreds of people called or wrote to the Gorilla Foundation.


あなたの財布は私のに似ている。Your purse is similar to mine.

どんなに財産があっても、貪欲な人間は満足できない。世界中の財宝を集めても幸福にはなれない。No amount of wealth can satisfy a covetous man. All the treasure in the world won't make him happy.
財務的な事柄に関して、ジョーンズ氏は会社の誰よりも知っている。With respect to financial matters, Mr Jones knows more than anyone else in the company.


彼には武力と財力がある。He has swords and purse.

満月が空にさえている。A full moon is shining bright in the sky.昨日ゆっくり休んだ分、今日は頭が冴えている。I feel smart today, to a degree that is in proportion to the amount of good rest I had yesterday.






坂を下りるときに彼女のおんぼろ自転車はキーキー音を立てた。Her old bike squeaked as she rode down the hill.
フーッ、この坂道はきついよ。でも帰りは楽だよね。Whew! This is a tough hill. But coming back sure will be a breeze.
大雨のために本日の阪神・巨人戦は中止になった。Today's Tigers-Giants baseball game was called off due to heavy rain.
阪神大震災では地面が長時間に渡って揺れた。In the Hanshin earthquake, the ground shook for a long time.

豆腐は良い酒の肴になる。Tofu goes well with good sake.

彼女はりんごの木がいっせいに咲き出すのを見ました。She watched the apple trees burst into blossom.
庭には様々な花が咲き乱れていた。The garden was a riot of color.
これらの花は春に咲く。These flowers bloom in spring.


この絵はモネの作とされている。This painting is attributed to Monet.
あの家はレンガ造りだ。That house is built of bricks.彼女の顔のつくりの中で目が一番いい。Her eyes are her best feature.




過ちのない者は何も作り出せない。He who makes no mistakes makes nothing.もしも神が存在しないのならば、神を造り出す必要があろう。If God did not exist, it would be necessary to invent him.
「怒ってない。ほら見て、このにこやかな笑顔」「それは作り笑いっていうんですよ」"I'm not angry. Look, see this smiling face?" "That's what they call a forced smile!"
同社は新製品を作り上げた。The company crafted a new product.彼は王についての物語を作り上げた。He made up a story about the king.



彼女は自分の古い衣服をもっと流行に見えるように作りかえた。She altered her old clothes to make them look more fashionable.





ケイトはケーキの作り方を知っています。Kate knows how to make a cake.




これは事実であって作り話ではありません。This is fact, not fiction.


その作家は私たちによく知られています。The writer is well known to us.


私がいない間も作業を続けなさい。Carry on working while I'm away.








近年作業療法の需要は急速に高まった。Demand for occupational therapy has surged in recent years.

この音楽はバッハによって作曲された。This music was composed by Bach.
あなたの好きな作曲家は誰ですか。Who is your favorite composer?




その小説の作者は誰でしょうか。Who is the author of the novel?



その老人は遺言を作成した。The old man made out his will.



タイムをとって作戦を練ろう。Let's take time out to elaborate a strategy.








私が機械を作動させましょう。I will get the machine running.

これは母の作品の一つです。It is something my mother made.



日本の主要作物は米である。The main crop of Japan is rice.
「友情」という題で作文を書きなさい。Write an essay on "Friendship".
今年は米の作柄は良さそうだ。This year promises a good harvest of rice.
彼の貴族的な作法には感心する。I admire his aristocratic manners.

日光は皮膚に作用する。The sunbeam acts upon the skin.


雨のために彼らは気力をそがれた。The rain dampened their spirits.

洪水で家の土台が削り取られた。The house was undermined by the flood.


私はナイフで鉛筆を削った。I sharpened a pencil with a knife.彼の名前はリストから削られた。He was struck off the list.

彼女は支出を徐々に削減した。She pared down her expenditures.
「百八といえば煩悩の数だ」「お兄ちゃんはどんな煩悩があるの？」「言ってもいいが、検閲削除になるぞ」"Talking about 108, that's the number of worldly passions." "What worldly passions have you got then?" "I could say, but it'll get censored out."



わたしからはこれ以上お金は絞り取れませんよ。You can't wring any more money from me.
雇い主は、時に従業員を搾取する。Employers sometimes exploit their workers.



昨今は災害が頻ぴんとあった。Recently we have had several disasters.

ヘレンは昨年日本に来た。Helen came to Japan last year.
君は昨晩外出しましたか。Did you go out last night?
少年はらくらくと柵を飛び越えた。The boy skipped over the fence.
正直は決して最上の策ではない。Honesty is never the best policy.



彼は策略で役職から追い出された。He was maneuvered out of office.

その本には索引がついていますか。Is there an index to the book?







これはあれよりも長いように見えるが、錯覚だ。This looks longer than that, but it is an optical illusion.




今はフレッドの錯乱が治まって静かに眠っています。Fred's agitation has now subsided, and he's sleeping peacefully.
さくらんぼは六月か七月に熟す。Cherries are ripe in June or July.




ポール、8冊までなら借りられるからね。Paul, we can borrow up to 8 books.太郎は何冊かの英会話テキストをロンドンに注文した。Taro ordered some English conversation textbooks from London.


彼女は君の３倍の冊数の辞書を持っています。She has three times as many dictionaries as you do.











私達は招待状を５０通刷りました。We ran off 50 copies of the invitation.


靴のほこりをはけではらいなさい。Brush off the dust from your shoes.


蓮くんは察しは良い様だけど、もう少し心の機微というものを理解出来る様に努力するべきじゃないかしら。You're considerate, but don't you think you should work a little more at understanding the subtleties of the human mind?
この手紙から察すると彼は立腹しているようだ。I gathered from this letter that he was angry.
危険を察知して彼は逃げた。Sensing danger, he ran away.


これは私の妹を撮った写真です。This is a picture of my sister.この番組、ビデオに録っておいて。Will you record this program on video for me?
私は写真撮影に興味を持っている。I have an interest in photography.


撮影隊は、まずロケ地を求めてその国中を旅した。To start with, the film crew travelled around the country looking for locations.


その男の子はころんでひざをすりむいた。The boy fell and scraped his knee.


彼は責任を友人になすりつけた。He fixed the blame on his friends.
石けんを付けてごしごしこすれば汚れが落ちます。Rub briskly with soap, and the stain will soon wash off.




１０００円札をくずしていただけませんか。Could you break a 1,000 yen note?
彼は店の入り口に閉店の札をかけた。He put a Closed sign on the front door of the store.
そこには札束がいくつも入っていた。There were bundles and bundles of cash.
一度殺すと、殺しが楽しくなる。Once we've killed, we enjoy killing.
殺し屋というのはテレビ映画では人気のある題材だ。Hit men are a popular subject for TV movies.

おまえはオレを殺そうとしている。You are trying to kill me.
その男は殺意を抱いて彼女を襲った。The man attacked her with the intention of killing her.
彼らは王の殺害をたくらんでいる。They are plotting to kill the king.

この水は殺菌してある。This water is sterilized.


彼は殺人以外のことなら何でもするだろう。He will do anything but murder.
彼女は殺人鬼から逃れようとして必死に走った。She ran for her life to get away from the killer.
その殺人者の正体は手掛かりがまったくなかった。There was no clue as to the identity of the murderer.
これは、あの殺人的な公爵に復讐しようという彼の願いを強めただけだ。This only increased his desire to be revenged on the murderous duke.
彼は自分の母親にナイフで切り付け殺人未遂で有罪になった。He was found guilty of attempted murder for attacking his mother with a knife.



彼女は花に殺虫剤を振りまいた。She sprayed pesticide on the flowers.
その本の注文が殺到した。Orders for the book poured in.


この薩摩芋は生焼けでがりがりする。This sweet potato is only half-baked and is still crunchy.

お客が雑な作りのスタンドに座って靴を磨いてもらっている。A customer is having his shoes shined on a slapped-together stand.
ラジオに雑音が入る。The radio is disturbed by noises.
あそこでは多くのタイプの食品や雑貨を売っている。They sell many types of food and grocery products.






この川には雑魚がたくさんいる。This river abounds in small fish.
ぬれたぞうきんで窓をふきなさい。Clean the window with a damp cloth.


その雑誌はどこで買えますか。Where can I buy that magazine?


ヨーロッパは強力な雑種民族大陸である。Europe is a continent of energetic peoples.

弟の部屋はいつも雑然としている。My brother's room is always a mess.
雑草が急に生えた。Weeds sprang up in the garden.

ぜひ雑談でもしにいらしてください。You must come and have a chat with us.










彼はすぐに雑用を終えた。He finished his chores in no time.

早く帰った方がいい、暑いから。サバは、生き腐れとも言われるくらい足が早い。It's hot, so you'd better head back quickly. Mackerel goes off so fast that they coined 'fresh-looking rotten fish'.
首相は記者会見で難しい質問をうまくさばいた。The prime minister fielded some tough questions at the press conference.たくさん作っても捌ききれないから、控えめにね。If you make too many, we won't be able to sell them all, so don't go wild.
雨の中に放置しておくと自転車はさびるでしょう。A bicycle will rust if you leave it in the rain.
さびつかせるよりもすり切らしたほうがいい。Better wear out than rust out.

サメがその男の足を噛み切った。A shark snapped the man's leg off.
あなたが皿を洗っている間に、私は床を掃除します。I'll sweep the floor while you wash the dishes.
給仕は新しいお皿を持ってきた。The waiter brought a new plate.
皿洗いを手伝わせて下さい。Let me help you with the dishes.



ボーイさん、コーヒー３つください。Waiter, three coffees, please.

三つ子の魂百まで。The child is father to the man.














我々は１日に３回食事をする。We eat a meal three times a day.

私達の図書館は三階です。Our library is on the third floor.


多くの人間にとって三角関数を学ぶことは無意味であるように思える。I think that for many people learning the trigonometric functions is meaningless.
























３月になると多くの花が咲く。In March, many flowers come out.




三原色を混合すると黒色ができる。Mixture of the three primary colors creates black.

首相は三顧の礼をもって彼を法務大臣に迎えた。The Prime Minister has won his services as Minister for Justice.












その道を百メートル程行くと、三叉路があります。Go straight up the street for about 100 meters, and you will get to the junction of three roads.
私より彼のほうが三才年上です。He is my senior by three years.




三時までには着きますよ。You'll get there by three o'clock.
クモはいつも自分たちの巣を３次元に織る。Spiders always weave their webs in three dimensions.


三者凡退となった。The three batters were struck out quickly.










３０日の予約を確認したいのですが。I'd like to confirm my reservation for the 30th.


























そのホテルの宿泊料金は三食付きの値段です。The rates cover all the meals at the hotel.

バッターは空振りの三振をした。The batter struck out swinging.
ケンは三人のなかでもっとも速く走ります。Ken runs fastest of the three.
三人寄れば文殊の知恵って言うだろ。みんなで考えれば、いい案が浮かぶかもしれないよ。Let's all think on this together and we might be able to come up with some good ideas. They say two heads are better than one.


３人組の男が彼をナイフで脅した。Three men menaced him with knives.


















私の夫には、兄が２人います。そう、私は三男の嫁です。My husband has two older brothers. That's right, I'm a third-son's wife.

僕はまだ三途の川を見たくはない。I still don't wish to see the Styx.






１０月３日です。It's the third of October.彼女には３日前に会ったよ。I met her three days ago.



阪神三日天下。あっと言う間に首位から転落しちゃったよ。Hanshin's moment of glory didn't last. They fell out of first place in a hurry.
彼は何事でも三日坊主だ。He can't stick to anything very long.



彼は私の三倍も稼ぐ。He earns three times as much as I.





この部屋は三百人収容できる。This room can hold three hundred people.













チョークを三本ください。Give me three pieces of chalk.



自由席を三枚ください。Could I have three seats in the unreserved section?
私はなぜか、ルックスに関わらず三枚目の人を好きになることが多いんです。I often find myself falling for jokers, regardless of their looks.













いくら器だけを日本一にしても、中身が三流やったらな〜んの意味もないんちゃうの？The container may be the best in Japan, but if the contents are third class, then isn't it completely meaningless?



走者は三塁でアウトになった。The runner was called out at third.


トムは三塁打を打った。Tom hit a triple.


タクシーに傘を忘れてしまった。I left my umbrella in the cab.









参ったなあ。Now I'm done for.

２、３分したらそちらにまいります。I'll be with you in a few minutes.あの問題には参ったよ。That problem has really got me.本当に参りましたね。I'm really confused.
憲法の規定に従い衆院の議決が参院に優越する。Under the Constitution, the lower chamber's resolutions override those of the upper chamber.
あなたは競技に参加しましたか。Did you take part in the game?

その部屋は参加者の熱気でムンムンしていた。The air in that room was thick with the enthusiasm of the participants.









古参議員たちは、選挙で参議院の議席を失いそうになりました。The old guard was nearly voted out of the Upper House.





参考のためにカタログをお送りください。Please send me a catalogue for review.

この参考書は私の研究にとって重要である。This reference is valuable for my research.










１０項を参照して下さい。Please refer to paragraph ten.

星印は重要な参照文献を示す。The asterisks mark important references.












あと数社の企業が同国の利益の高いペットフード市場に参入をねらっている。Several more companies are moving to enter the lucrative pet food market of the country.
元日に神社へ参拝する日本人は多い。On New Year's Day many Japanese go to the shrine to worship.
私の参謀としてついたからには、危機感を持って任にあたって貰わねば困ります。If you're with me as a staff officer, then I need you to bring a sense of danger with you to your work.






たくさんの人が新しい橋の開通式に参列した。Quite a few people attended the opening ceremony of the new bridge.


高い山の頂上は空気が薄い。The air is thin at the top of a high mountain.洗濯物の山を見ながら、私はため息をついた。Looking at the pile of laundry, I sighed.うまくあの先生のやまを当てたわね。You've sure got the teacher's number.
ほら、今日は海の幸だったから明日は山の幸とかさ、取りに行こうよっ。Look, today was 'sea harvest' so let's go forage for edible plants tomorrow!

このすしはわさびがよく効いている。This sushi is seasoned with plenty of horse-radish.




アメリカではとても多くの山火事がある。There are a great many forest fires in America.
ついに病気で疲れた男たちは彼が待っている山岳都市に到着した。Finally, the sick, tired men reached the mountain town where he was waiting.


新しい道路は山間の住民の利益になる。The new road will benefit the people living in the hills.
山間部では雪が５０センチ以上降った。In the mountain area, snow has fallen more than fifty centimeters deep.








川越の山車は、いわゆる鉾山車と呼ばれる形で、車輪が3つ、もしくは4つ付いています。The Kawagoe festival float has the shape of what's called a hoko float. It has three, or four, wheels attached.


私たちは山小屋で一夜を過ごした。We passed a night in a mountain hut.







山賊がその村を襲った。The bandits made a raid on the village.
彼らは去年の夏は山地の保養地へ行った。They went to a resort in the mountains last summer.

はやく、逃げて山中に隠れて。Run and hide in the mountains.
山頂が雲の上にそびえている。The peak rises above the clouds.
お母さんは、あなたが山登りをすることに反対するんでしょう。Your mother will probably object to your climbing the mountain.

この山道を登ると美しい湖に出る。This mountain path ascends to the beautiful lake.





僕らの大学の校舎は、今福岡市の北部の山腹に建築中です。Our university building is now under construction on a hillside in the north of Fukuoka.
その金は仲間と山分けした。I halved the money with my pal.


私は山脈を見た。I saw a chain of mountains.
彼は羊とヤギの区別が付かない。He can not tell a sheep from a goat.






動物に対してむごいことをしてはいけない。You ought not to be cruel to animals.
彼は若い頃惨めな生活を送った。He lived a wretched life when young.





その大惨事で生き残った乗客はほとんどいなかった。Few passengers survived the catastrophe.


それはさんたんたる有様だった。That was a fearful scene.
床一面に新聞紙が撒き散らされていた。Newspapers lay scattered all over the floor.
まいた種は刈らねばならない。As you sow, so shall you reap.

お前の物をその辺りに散らかすな。Don't scatter your things about.
部屋は散らかり放題だった。The room was in total disorder.
先生はチラシを配布した。The teacher distributed the leaflets.

両替人の金を散らし、その台を倒した。He scattered the coins of the money-changers and overturned their table.

その銀行の支店は日本全国に散らばっている。The branch offices of the bank are located all over Japan.
あなたが帰国なさる頃には、桜はみんな散ってしまっていることでしょう。By the time you get home, all the cherry blossoms will have fallen.
会は八時に散会した。The meeting broke up at eight.
「すべき」というのは、現在形で書かれている論文も散見されるからです。I say "should", because theses written in the present tense are still seen around and about.
ニュージーランドはどんな所ですか。オーストラリアと同じように人口が散在していますか。What's New Zealand like? Is it as sparsely populated as Australia?
すっかり散財をおかけしてしまってすみません。I'm sorry to put you to such great expense.





何よりも散髪をしなければならない。What I need worst is a haircut.
彼らは果樹に農薬を散布している。They are spraying the fruit trees.
その詩は韻文に散文をまじえている。That poem mixes prose with poetry.
公園を散歩しましょう。Let's take a walk in the park.
寝不足だと注意が散漫になりがちです。When you lack sleep, you are apt to be careless.
鏡の破片が床に散乱していた。Fragments of the mirror were scattered on the floor.



その部屋には日光がさんさんと注いでいた。The room was bathed in sunshine.





産科・婦人科の計６１床も満床で、受け入れは不可能と答えたという。They replied that because all 61 beds in the obstetrics/gynaecology department were full, no admissions were possible.

９月３０日から１０月１４日まで産休を取ります。I'm taking maternity leave from September 30th to October 14th.
日本は産業国である。Japan is an industrial country.


カトリック教徒は産児制限に反対している。Catholics are against birth control.
この畑は良質の作物を産出する。These fields produce fine crops.




産婦人科医が減っているのは出生数の減少で医療ニーズが低減したのを反映している。The reduction in obstetricians and gynecologists is a reflection of the decrease in births, thus reducing need for medical care.
コーヒーはブラジルの主要産物である。Coffee is Brazil's main product.
孵化後まもないヒナは、産毛が濡れていますが、２時間もすると乾いてフワフワになります。The down of chicks that have just hatched is damp, but after two hours it dries out and becomes fluffy.
鮭は川をさかのぼって砂に産卵する。Salmon go up the river and lay their eggs in the sand.

年金の額は原則として前年の物価変動にスライドして算出される。As a general rule, the pension amount is based on price changes in the previous year.

算数は数を取り扱う。Arithmetic deals with numbers.

それは３００ドルかかると私は算定した。I calculated that it would cost 300 dollars.




蚕は繭を作る。Silkworms spin cocoons.















従業員も一緒に顧客からの賛辞の言葉を読むことができた。Employees were allowed to share in reading customer compliments.

私たちの計画に賛成してくれますか。Are you agreeable to our plan?
私たちが彼の意見に賛同するのは簡単なことだ。It is easy for us to agree with his opinion.
その法案には賛否の議論がたくさんあった。There was much argument for and against the bill.
その映画には賛否両論が出た。The movie received mixed reviews.
彼女の美貌は全校の賛美のまとだ。Her beauty is the admiration of the whole school.
その物質は酸で処理しなければならない。The substance must be treated with acid.

すっぱい木においしい林檎はならない。No good apple on a sour stock.
チョコレートにはＬＤＬの酸化を防止する力がある。Chocolate acts to prevent LDL oxidisation.


彼女は酸欠で死んだ。She died for lack of air.
パイナップルやレモンのような酸性の果実はすっぱい。Acid fruits like pineapples and lemons are sour.
カナダ人が言うところでは、魚は酸性雨として知られているもののために、死にかけているとのことです。The fish are dying, the Canadians say, because of what's known as acid rain.
酸素が無ければ生きられない。You can't live without oxygen.





これはいわゆる斬新なアイデアです。This is what we call a "brand new idea".
あなたは働きすぎです。しばらく座って楽にしなさい。You are working too hard. Sit down and take it easy for a while.ここしばらく彼にまるで会わない。I haven't seen anything of him for some time.昨日トムはバイクの事故でけがをしたので、しばらく体育の授業には出られません。Yesterday, Tom was injured in a motorbike accident, so he can't attend gym class for the time being.


社の弁護士に暫定合意の内容を吟味してもらおう。We'll have our firm's attorneys look through the provisional agreement.


私たちの内残りの者はあとに残ることになっている。The rest of us are to stay behind.


もう３ページ残っている。I have three more pages to go.
船が沈没してしまってのち、船の残骸が引き上げられた。The wreckage of the ship was salvaged after it had gone to Davy Jones's locker.

警官たちはその残虐な殺人事件の手掛かりを捜している。The cops are searching for clues to the cruel murder.

上司に残業させられたんだよ。My boss made me work overtime.
残金は６月３０日までに御支払いします。We will pay this amount by June 30.

私の預金残高はどうなっていますか。What's the balance of my account?
怪物は残酷な微笑みを浮かべた。The monster's smile was cruel.




かつて残忍な王様がいた。Once upon a time, there lived a cruel king.
お伺いできないのが残念です。I regret to say I can't come.
その悪い知らせは残念ながら本当だ。The bad news is unfortunately true.
たくさんの残飯が残っていた。Lots of leftovers remained inside.




コックは家族に長年仕えた。The cook served the family for many years.





彼はその動物をとらえるためにわなをしかけた。He set a trap to catch the animal.


仕官は兵士達に前進を命じた。The officer told his men to advance.

それ、ウィルスの仕業じゃないかな。That looks like the work of a virus.
あの男は裏切りもしかねない。He is capable of treachery.
彼の無礼には我慢しかねます。I have trouble putting up with his rude manner.

私はこの世で一番の幸せ者でした。I was the happiest man on earth.
にわか仕込みの知識ではその問題は解けなかった。Hastily acquired knowledge was not enough to solve the problem.

この猿は、きちんと仕込めばいろいろな芸ができるようになるだろう。The monkey, trained properly, will be able to do a lot of tricks.

私の心臓はどきどきし始めた。My heart began to beat fast.
「あなたは仕事が気に入っていると思います」「いやそれどころか、嫌いです」"I think you like your job." "On the contrary, I hate it."

仕事場の管理者は、正確さ、効率性、献身を期待する。Office managers expect accuracy, efficiency, and dedication.


仕事中は喫煙してはいけない。You must not smoke while working.








日本はアメリカから米を輸入しだした。Japan began to import rice from the United States.
素敵な仕上がりだわ。You have done a wonderful job.
仕事はどうにかこうにか仕上がった。The work got finished somehow.
ユミは１日でそれを仕上げられません。Yumi can't finish it in a day.


ホールは仕切りを設ける前は千人収容できた。The hall could seat a thousand people before it was partitioned.
庭は柵で小道と仕切られている。The garden is railed off from the path.部長の都合が悪くなってしまったので、飲み会の日程は仕切り直しだね。We'll have to organize the drinking party all over again as the section chief can't make it now.

そのゲームでは初めから彼女に不利になるように仕組まれていたことが後になってわかった。It turned out that the cards were stacked against her from the beginning of the game.
そのしぐさで観客は笑い出した。The gesture fetched a laugh from the audience.
私は月々５万円の仕送りを受ける。I am given a monthly allowance of fifty thousand yen.
その女の子は彼の残酷な仕打ちになすがままになった。The girl was at the mercy of his cruelty.




先生は問題を説明し直すことを嫌がらなかった。The teacher didn't mind explaining the problem again.


私達は原料をマレーシアから仕入れている。We get the materials from Malaysia.


厳しいしつけでその子は別人のようになった。Discipline transformed the child.


彼は鍵をかけて宝石を金庫にしまいこんだ。He locked up his jewels in the safe.
買い物を済ませてしまったら電話します。I will call you when I have done my shopping.本とノートをしまいなさい。Put away your books and notebooks.やってしまったことは元に戻らない。What is done cannot be undone.


この侮辱はきっと仕返しをしてやるから。I'll get even with you for this insult!
彼を待つより仕方がない。All we can do is to wait for him.自分でやったことだから仕方がないね。You brought it on yourself.そんなに健康のことを心配しても仕方がない。There is no sense in your worrying about your health so much.
彼は遊んでばかりでしかたのない奴だ。He is always idling about and good for nothing.
パーティーが待ち遠しくて仕方ない。I just can't wait for the party.





仕様、価格は変更することがあります。Specifications and price are subject to change.
彼の発言は他に解釈のしようがない。His remarks allow of no other interpretation.今回はあきらめな。しょうがないよ。Give up on this one. You're wasting your time.空席があるのに立っていてもしょうがない。There is no sense in standing when there are seats available.



その上着の仕立ては長すぎた。The jacket was cut too long.
生地を預ければドレスを仕立ててくれますか。Will you make me up a dress if I give you the material?
彼は息子を仕立屋に奉公に出した。He bound his son to a tailor.









病気のため本日はうかがうことができませんでした。On account of illness, I couldn't call on you today.体重をおうかがいしてもよろしいですか。May I ask you what your weight is?ワイルダー氏よりあなたのメールアドレスを伺いました。Mr Wilder gave me your e-mail address.

使いの途中道草をくうな。Don't delay on this errand.ひとことで言えば、彼はおべっか使いだ。In a word, he is a flatterer.

彼は英語をうまく使いこなす。He has a good command of English.
そのお金は使い果たしてはいません。The money has not been used up.


とうとう使い慣れた車を処分しました。We finally got rid of our old car.
さびつかせてしまうより使い古す方が良い。It is better to wear out than to rust out.
彼は私の資金をすっかり使い込んでしまった。He has really made a hole in my finances.






科学者の中には百年以内に世界の石油資源を使い切るだろうと予言する者もいる。Some scientists predict that the world oil reserves will be used up within a century.


鉄は使い道の多い金ぞくだ。Iron is a metal with many uses.
この古いスーツはもうほとんど使いものにならない。新しいのを買わなきゃならないだろう。This old suit has just about had it; I shall have to get a new one.
引用した問題ではありませんが、関係代名詞と関係副詞の使い分けを問う問題がリーディングセクションにはあります。The problem quoted isn't one, but there are problems in the reading section that ask you to distinguish relative pronouns from relative adverbs.


人類だけが火の使い方を知っている。Only man knows how to use fire.



「あなたの辞書を使ってもいいですか」「はい、どうぞ」"Can I use your dictionary?" "Yes, here you are."アジア諸国などから出稼ぎにきた外国人をメイドとして使うのが常識のようになっている。It has become common practise to employ foreigners working abroad from Asian countries as maids.お湯を全部使わないで。Don't use all the hot water.
使者はひそかにロンドンへ出発した。The messenger left for London in secret.


政府は外国へ使節を派遣した。The government dispatched missions abroad.
使節団は空路を利用して国境までの最短距離を行った。The mission took the direct route by air to the boundary.

しかし、使徒たちはその危険に気付いた。However the disciples awoke to that danger.









彼らは使命を果たした。They accomplished their mission.

実は、「have 目的語 done」は使役じゃない場合が多い。Actually, there are many cases where 'have [object] done' is not causative.

使用する前に瓶を振ってください。Shake the bottle before using.


その自動車の使用許可が私に与えられた。I was accorded permission to use the car.



特定の文脈でどんな語を使うべきか知っている人は語の有効な使用者である。An effective writer is one who knows what sort of words should be employed in any specific context.
私は使用人の一人をくびにした。I discharged one of my servants.

セールスマンはその機械の使用方法を実演してみせた。The salesman demonstrated how to use the machine.
アートファイル(.art)の使用法がわかりません。I don't know how to use an art file (.art).


特に、調和平均の実際の使用例としては、「平均速度」が主に取り上げられ、説明がそこで終わってしまうのが通例である。In particular, it is customary for actual examples of use of the harmonic mean to generally cover "average speed," and explain no further than that.



釘が車のタイヤに刺さった。A nail punctured the tire.



刺し傷はとても深く、感染の恐れがないか検査する必要がある。The puncture wound was very deep and had to be examined for infection.


蚊にたくさん刺されました。I got a lot of mosquito bites.アリスは頭に花をさしています。Alice has a flower in her hair.



彼女からすばらしい刺繍品をもらった。She gave me charming embroideries.


刺し身は好きではないのでしょう。You don't like sashimi, do you?

バラのとげで刺されるよりは、いらくさのとげで刺された方がましだ。It is better to be stung by a nettle than pricked by a rose.


市長は市政を司る。The mayor administers the affairs of the city.
その会議は森首相が司会をした。The conference was presided over by Mr Mori.
司会者から、一言お祝いのスピーチって言われて焦ちゃったよ。It made me nervous when I was asked by the host to offer some words of congratulation.
司教は、自暴自棄になった移民たちを哀れんで助けを与えた。The bishop felt pity for the immigrants who were abandoned, and gave them help.
司書は主題によって本を分類した。The librarian classified the books according to subject.

独裁者は司法権を自分のものとした。The dictator arrogated judicial powers to himself.


司令官は部下に向かって直ちに発砲するよう命令を発した。The commander gave orders that his men fire at once.

将軍は彼に司令部へ出頭しろと命じた。The general commanded him to report to headquarters.

彼の主な興味は史学にある。His main interest is in history.









日本の貿易黒字は史上最高を記録しました。Japan's trade surplus soared to a record high.

政府は史上最大の赤字をかかえています。The government is running its largest deficit ever.














この国は季節が４つあります。This country has four seasons.
彼は猫のように四つんばいにはった。He crept on all fours like a cat.

犬はちんちんをやめて四つ足に戻った。The dog stopped begging and went back on all fours.
四つ葉のクローバーを見つけたことがありますか。Have you ever found a four-leaf clover?
箱の形は普通四角です。The shape of a box is usually square.
必要なのは四角いテーブルで、円卓ではない。We need a square table, not a round one.

四季のうちで春が一番好きだ。Spring is my favourite of the four seasons.

ホームページ作りに四苦八苦してるようだけど、手伝ってあげようか。You look like you're having a lot of trouble setting up that web page. Want some help?


１学期は４月から始まる。The first term starts in April.

四国は台風１０号に襲われた。Shikoku was hit by Typhoon No. 10.


会議は午後四時に終わった。The meeting ended at 4:00 P.M.

５８１４を千の位に四捨五入すれば何になりますか。What is 5814 rounded to the nearest thousand?






７月４日はアメリカでは記念すべき日だ。July 4th is a red-letter day in America.長くても４日しか待てませんよ。I can wait four days at the longest.
計算書は四半期ごとに郵送されます。Statements will be mailed every quarter.



その木は広く枝を四方に張り出している。The tree thrusts its branches far and wide.
うわさは四方八方に広がった。The rumor spread far and wide.
あんな四面楚歌の状態で、彼よく仕事してられるよな。He's completely shunned. I'm surprised he's still working here.


３人の看護婦が四六時中瀕死の大臣の看護に当たった。Three nurses attended the dying minister night and day.
彼は海軍士官の任務を受けた。He has received a commission as a naval officer.

観客側から相手チームをわらってやることは、その士気をくじくことになろう。It would demoralize the opposing team to give it the razz from the spectators' side.




その試合は何時に始まりますか。What time does the game start?
彼の行為は始めから終わりまで正しかった。His action throughout was correct.
いいえ、はじめに９番におかけ下さい。No, please dial nine first.
初めは何でも難しそうに見えた。At first, everything seemed difficult.
いつゴルフを始めたのですか。When did you begin playing golf?私たちは姉妹３人で喫茶店を始めた。We three sisters opened a coffee shop.飲み過ぎて部屋が回り始めた。The room started to spin after I drank too much.
教室に入って席に着くのとほぼ同時に、始業を知らせるチャイムの音が鳴り響く。About the same time as he entered the classroom and arrived at his seat, the chime to announce class rings across the school.
私は始終あなたのことを考えています。You are in my thoughts at all times.


機械を始動するには、このボタンを押しなさい。Press this button to start the machine.
あなたは始発電車に間にあいましたか。Did you catch the first train?
彼は午後いっぱい使って昨年のほうれん草の根を始末した。He's spent all afternoon rooting up last year's spinach plants.世界からは【麻疹輸出国】と嫌味とも本音ともとれることをいわれている始末。Ending up with being called a "measles exporting country" by the rest of the world, something that you could take as insult or truth.
姉は私のズボンにアイロンをかけてくれる。My sister presses my trousers.
ジョーンは姉さんと同じように魅力がある。Joan is as charming as her sister.「なあ、そこの姉さん」「え？」「ちょっと相談に乗ってくれないか？」"Say, you, the lady over there." "Eh?" "Could you give me a bit of advice?"





神戸はシアトルの姉妹都市です。Kobe is a sister city of Seattle.
自分の姿を鏡にうつして見なさい。Look at yourself in the mirror.和服姿の男性は東京ではもうあまり見かけない。Men in kimonos are no longer a common sight in Tokyo.
いろいろな動物が地球上から姿を消した。Many kinds of animals have vanished from the earth.
私は部屋に姿見を置いておくのが好きです。I like to have a full-length mirror in my bedroom.
彼はまっすぐな姿勢で立っていた。He stood in an upright position.


その子は母親に甘えた。The child played the baby to his mother.ふふっ・・・その子、人間じゃないの。ロボットなのよ。ア・ン・ド・ロ・イ・ド。Ha-ha ... She isn't human. She's a robot; A-n-d-r-o-i-d.鯨は哺乳動物である。言い換えれば子に乳を与える。A whale is a mammal; in other words it feeds milk to its young.

彼女は三人の子育てにかかりきりだ。She is devoted to her three children.
美土里は時々子音が落ちる。Midori sometimes drops consonants.

その会社は我々の１００％子会社である。The company is our wholly-owned subsidiary.
子宮内膜炎は、細菌が子宮内に入り、内膜に炎症を起す病気である。Endometritis is a disease where bacteria enter the uterus and cause inflammation of the inner membrane.

あなたには何人子供がいますか。How many children do you have?

ジュディーは子供たちを寝室へ行かせた。Judy sent her children to bed.
彼は口座の中の一定額を子供用に用いた。He had some money in an account that he'd set aside for his kids.




彼らは１２人の子持ちです。They have twelve children.
私は今夜子供たちの子守りをすることになっています。I am supposed to babysit the children tonight.
アンは妹のために子守唄を歌ってあげた。Ann sang a lullaby for her little sister.

近頃日本の帰国子女が増えている。The number of Japanese students returning after life abroad has been increasing as of late.
ご子息のご結婚を心よりお祝い申し上げます。Please accept our heartiest congratulations on the marriage of your son.
合衆国は長い間「るつぼ」として知られているが、それは国民のほとんどが移民の子孫だからである。The United States has long been known as a "melting pot" because most of its people are descended from immigrants.



最も野性的な子馬が最高の駿馬になる。The wildest colt makes the best horse.



市は月曜ごとに立つ。The market is held every Monday.
ワシントン市の友人宅に泊まります。I'm staying at my friend's house in Washington City.


毎日市営プールに行きます。I go to the city pool every day.




私の自宅の電話番号は市外局番が２０１で１２３ー４５６７番です。My home phone number is, area code two-oh-one, one-two-three, four-five-six-seven.

地下鉄は、市街電車よりはやい。The subway is faster than the streetcar.
市街戦のために市中は上を下への大騒ぎだ。Because of the street fighting, the city is in utter confusion.
その市街地図をもう一度よく見て下さい。Take another good look at the city map.








誰かが、例えば、羊とか馬を市場に出ているもので等しい価値があると考えるものと交換することが出来たのである。Somebody could exchange a sheep or a horse, for example, for anything in the marketplace that they considered to be of equal value.
あと数社の企業が同国の利益の高いペットフード市場に参入をねらっている。Several more companies are moving to enter the lucrative pet food market of the country.











民生用・産業用を含めて、ゴミのかさをコンパクト化する機器の今後の市場成長性が法制度の動向と関連して注目される。Attention is focussed on the potential for growth of the personal and industrial use garbage compactor market in relation to trends in law.
市場調査のためにオクテル社は研究者らにかなりの助成金をだした。Octal paid a large grant for the researchers to carry out some market research.









市長は市政を立派に行った。The mayor governed the city very wisely.


市街戦のために市中は上を下への大騒ぎだ。Because of the street fighting, the city is in utter confusion.



市長は私達の願いを聞き入れてくれた。The mayor granted our request.
市長選は４年ごとに行われる。Voters cast their ballots for mayor every four years.
その市は市電を廃止することを決めた。The city has decided to do away with the streetcar.
市内をぐるっとご案内しましょう。I'll show you around the city.

これらは市販されている最も上等のかばんだ。These are the best bags on the market.


その新しい法律が市民から自由を奪った。The new law has deprived the citizens of their liberty.私は千葉市民ですが、東京で勤めています。I am a citizen of Chiba, but work in Tokyo.


彼は米国の市民権を得た。He acquired American citizenship.



どちらの道なら市役所に行けますか。Which road goes to city hall?





彼は大きな市立病院に勤務しておられます。He works in a big city hospital.










絶望的な戦いの中、貴君の師団が善戦したことは高く評価されている。Your division was highly praised for fighting well in the midst of a hopeless conflict.


その時、二人の間に師弟を越えた友情のようなものが芽生えた事は言うまでもない。It goes without saying that at that time a kind of friendship beyond master and disciple grew between the two of them.








何事をするにも志が大切。The will is as good as the deed.
このコーヒー店には芸術家を志すものが足しげく通う。This coffee shop is frequented by aspiring artists.

彼はその仕事に志願し採用された。He applied for the job and got it.
１９９２年には、大学志願者の数は１９８２年の２倍となった。There were twice as many university applicants in 1992 as in 1982.

その会社の強さは未来志向の戦略によって生みだされている。The strength of the firm is attributed to its future-oriented strategy.


あの大学は私の第１志望だった。That university was my first choice.
思いすごしですよ。Your imagination is running away with you.
風はその思いのままに吹きます。The wind blows wherever it pleases.
そんな事を言うなんて彼女も思いやりがないね。It's thoughtless of her to say so.
それは君の思い過ごしだよ。It is just your imagination.
今朝車中で思いがけず彼にあった。I met him by chance in the train this morning.
今回のことであまり思い詰めないほうがいいよ。だれにでも失敗はあるんだから。Everybody blows it once in a while. It's better not to obsess on it.
彼が僕にそう思い込ませたのです。He put the idea into my head.
思い残すことがないように頑張るぞ。I'll do my best to have no regrets.
私は彼女にスキーを思いとどまらせた。I argued her out of going skiing.
あなたを見るとお兄さんを思い出します。You remind me of your brother.
彼は自分の将来について思い巡らせていた。He has been speculating on his future.
私は彼女を思いこがれる気持ちを抑えられなかった。I couldn't stop myself from longing for her.
彼女はとても思いあがっているようだ。She looks so grand.


彼女の事が思い切れない。I can't forget her.重病には思い切った療法が必要だ。Desperate diseases require desperate remedies.

私はその事柄について彼の父に話すつもりだったが、思い直してやめた。I was going to speak to his father about that matter, but thought better of it.
夏休みも近いけど、どこかいいところ思い当たりますか。Summer vacation is near. Can you think of a good place for the holidays?

それを思い悩んだって無駄だよ。It is no use worrying about it.
それについて一つ思いつきを言ってもいいですか。May I make a suggestion about it?
これを言い表す適当な言葉が思い浮かびません。The right word for this does not come to me.




まさか彼女がそんな事をやるとはおもえない。I hardly think she'd do that.
私たちは砂漠でオアシスとおぼしきものを見た。We saw what looked like an oasis in the desert.
彼は思わず笑った。He laughed in spite of himself.
私には彼はそそっかしすぎるように思われる。It seems to me that he is too careless.
ここが思案のしどころだ。This is the point we need to think about.




彼女の思考法は合理的だった。Her way of thinking was rational.
彼らはその体系を大変な思索と労力を費やして仕上げた。They worked out the system with much thought and labor.
自分の思春期を振り返ると、いつも憂うつな気分になる。I cannot look back on my adolescence without feeling depressed.
我々は言葉によって思想を表現する。We express thought with language.




彼の思慮の無さには驚いた。He was amazed at his foolishness.
彼はとても思慮深い人だ。He is a very thoughtful person.
世間の思惑など気にするな。Don't mind what others think.

ドアに指をはさみました。I caught my finger in the door.
指し示す事ができるんだ。Yes, you can indicate everything you see.
彼女はどちらの医者を指したのか分からない。I don't know which doctor she meant.＆という記号は、ａｎｄを指す。The sign '&' stands for 'and'.


彼女は計画の立案を指揮した。She directed the planning of the project.指揮者はオーケストラの指揮をする。A conductor directs an orchestra.
指揮官は部下を銃火にさらした。The commander exposed his men to gunfire.
指揮者はオーケストラの指揮をする。A conductor directs an orchestra.






ツアーのガイドは景色を指さした。The tour guide pointed out the sight.好きなものを指差しなさい。Point your finger at your choice.
私たちはあなたを空港までお連れするようにとの指示を受けています。I have been instructed to take you to the airport.




俺は人事課の馬鹿野郎にあごで指図されるつもりはない。I will not be dictated to by some idiot in the personnel department.
日経指数は大引け間際に大きく跳ね上がりました。The Nikkei index jumped dramatically just before closing.
あのー、先生？黒板に書いてあるの、指数関数じゃなくて三角関数ですけど・・・。Er, Sir? What's written on the blackboard isn't an exponential function but a trigonometric one ...

彼は私の顔を指先でぽんとはじいた。He flicked me in the face.

切符を申し込まれる際は代替日もご指定ください。When applying for tickets, please give alternative dates.

この映画の指定席はありますか。Are there reserved seats for this film?
印刷ミスはすぐに指摘されなければならない。Mistakes in the printing should be pointed out at once.
彼女はその党の指導的任務につくことを承認した。She has consented to take the leadership of the party.
アンは彼らの指導者であると言われている。Ann is said to be their leader.
指導部の交代は、国際政治経済に重要な影響を与える。Changes of leadership have a great effect on the international political economy.
代わりと言っては何ですが、・・・私が、いささか、ご指南いたしましょう。It would be presumptuous to call myself his replacement, but I could offer some guidance.
指標は前月比４％上昇した。The index rose 4% from the preceding month.
どの美容師をご指名ですか。Which beautician would you like?

そもそも指名手配されただけでは「犯人」じゃないです。In any case, just being wanted by the police isn't enough to make you "a criminal."

ナイフの指紋が彼女の有罪の証拠である。The fingerprints on the knife attest to her guilt.
この指輪をある場所で買った。I bought this ring at a certain place.
戦勝国は敗戦国に講和条件を指令した。The victorious country dictated the terms of peace to the defeated country.

神は我々の力の支えです。God is our strength.
このくらいの収穫量では、そこの経済を支えるのに十分ではありません。That amount of crops isn't enough to support their economy.なんとかそこで支えよ。入市を許すな。Hold them there! Don't let them into the city!
私たちは支援を訴えた。We made an appeal for support.
彼は、翌日ほとんどホテルにいて、友人や支援者と話をした。He stayed in his hotel most of the next day, talking to friends and supporters.

私たちは制服を支給された。We were supplied with uniforms.

我々はこぞって君を支持する。We are solidly behind you.
キング牧師と彼の支持者は脅迫された。Rev. King and his supporters were threatened.
６つの先端技術の会社がその県に支社を設立した。Six high-tech companies set up branch offices in that prefecture.
彼女は支出を徐々に削減した。She pared down her expenditures.
私が行くことに支障は何もありません。There is nothing to prevent my going.



７月１０日より札幌支店を開設いたします。On July 10, we will open our Sapporo branch.


すぐに旅の支度をしなさい。Get ready for the trip at once.
静けさが森を支配していた。Silence reigned in the forest.
彼らは彼を自分たちの支配者だとおもっていた。They regarded him as their leader.
あの支部は炭鉱労働組合に属している。That branch is affiliated to the miners' union.
私はその本に３ドル支払った。I paid 3 dollars for the book.


アマゾン川には多くの支流がある。The Amazon is fed by a large number of tributaries.
かくて、国際化は日本人にとって今はやりのスローガンになっている。Thus, internationalization has become a fashionable slogan for the Japanese.
彼女は施しを受けることを拒んだ。She refused to accept charity.

彼は自分の王国に善政を施した。He ruled his kingdom fairly.

ドアが施錠されていて、私達は中へ入れなかった。The door was locked and we couldn't get in.

教育施設を拡充する金をもっと多くと望んでいる。People want more money to expand educational institutions.


彼女から結婚できませんという旨の手紙が届いた。I received a letter from her to the effect that she couldn't accept my marriage proposal.
彼女はテニスは上手いが、水泳は下手だ。She's very good at tennis, but she's not much of a swimmer.あそこの食べ物はうまいし値段も安いが、地の利が悪いのが難点だね。That place's food is great, and their prices are good, but the fly in the ointment is their terrible location.それはあまりにもうますぎる話だ。That's too good a story to be true.


私は彼女に取り入ってうまく秘密を聞き出した。I charmed a secret out of her.我々の計画はうまく進んでいる。Our plans are progressing smoothly.
彼らの計画はうまくいかないと思う。I do not think their plan will work out.会社の賭けはうまくいきました。The company's gamble paid off.

猫は枝の間に隠れた。The cat hid among the branches.





枝葉末節の議論はもうそろそろ止めにして、本筋の話に移りませんか。Why don't we stop arguing over these piddling matters and get to the issues at hand?
爪を噛むのはよしなさい。Don't bite your nails.
そして、電車はキーッという音を立てて止まった。Then, the train screeched to a halt.十分な情報を受け取ることができなかったという理由も一部にはあって、ハーパーの描写は不完全なものにとどまっている。Partly because he could not receive enough information, Harper's description remains imperfect.あの木の枝に数羽の鳥がとまっている。Some birds are sitting on the branch of that tree.
雨がやみさえすればいいのになあ。If only it would stop raining!敵の攻撃は夜明けに止んだ。The enemy attack ceased at dawn.
それはやむを得ず延期されなければならない。It must, of necessity, be postponed.

その新聞は政府にインフレを止めるように求めた。The newspaper called for the government to stop inflation.ここに車を停めるのは違法です。It's illegal to park your car here.この文書はあなたのお目にだけ留めていただきたい。This document is for your eyes only.
キャシーは花を摘むのをやめました。Cathy stopped picking flowers.



人は生まれるやいなや、死に向かう。As soon as man is born, he begins to die.
その少年は死んだものとしてあきらめられた。The boy was given up for dead.
叔父の死因は癌だったそうです。I hear my uncle died of cancer.



彼女の死期は近づいている。Her time is drawing near.

ノーベル賞受賞者湯川博士は１９８１年に死去した。Dr. Yukawa, the Nobel prize winner, died in 1981.
その犯罪は死刑に値する。That crime is punishable by death.
ここから逃げたって同じ、死刑囚はどこにも居るし誰もが犠牲者。It's the same wherever you try and escape: everywhere is a death row, and everyone's a victim.
彼は妻の死後、何年も生きながらえていた。After his wife died, he lived for quite a few more years.
しかし、その一方、ラテン語はそのときまでに「死語」となっていた。But, then again, Latin was already a "dead language" by that time.それって死語じゃないの。People don't say that anymore.

３年前死産しました。I had a stillborn baby three years ago.
その事故の犠牲者数は死者５名、負傷者１００名であった。The toll from the accident was 5 persons dead and 100 persons injured.
その事故では10名の死傷者が出た。Ten people were killed or injured in the accident.
iPhoneはインターネットにとって死神なんだって。Apparently "the iPhone sounds the death knell for the Internet."
久夫は死人のように青ざめた顔色をしていた。Hisao's face was as pale as that of a corpse.

死体解剖の結果、絞殺と判明しました。The postmortem showed that she had been strangled.


我々は彼の死亡のニュースにショックを受けた。We were shocked at the news of his death.


ある研究によれば、ガンによる女性の死亡数の中では肺がんが１７％を占めている。A study shows lung cancer accounts for 17% of women's cancer deaths.
出生率と死亡率は、ほぼ等しかった。The birth rate and death rate were nearly equal.

人は氏より育ち。Birth is much, breeding is more.




この封筒に住所・氏名を書きなさい。Write your name and address on this envelope.
眠れる獅子は起こすな。Let sleeping dogs lie.


今回の成果はひとえに彼の獅子奮迅の働きの賜物でしょう。Our latest results are the fruit of his furious efforts.
騒がしいホームで誰かが私の名前を呼んでいるのが聞こえた。I could hear someone calling my name on the noisy platform.
この人、あたしをどなりつけるんですよ！This man's shouting at me!
私宛に何か伝言がとどいていませんか。Are there any messages for me?


私見では、彼の意見は正しい。From my personal point of view, his opinion is right.

私自身の部屋があったらなあ。I wish I had a room of my own.





私生活を詮索しないでよ。Don't pry into my private life.



３月の終わりに私たちは結婚するつもりです。At the end of March we'll marry.


クリスはお気に入りの女の子、ケイトがベスと私的な会話をしているのを見かけました。Chris saw his favorite girl, Kate, having a private conversation with Beth.


私費で旅行した。I traveled at my own expense.
彼は私腹を肥やすのに余念がない。He is always busy feathering his own nest.


彼はわれわれの私有地に不法侵入している、無断で通っている。He is trespassing on our private property.
上司は会社の電話で私用の電話をかけたといって私をひどく叱った。My boss called me down for making private calls on the office phone.
私立の学校はどういう感じですか。How is it in a private school?
私立大学の数が増えた。The number of private colleges has increased.
その男は私立探偵だとわかった。The man turned out to be a private detective.
おばあちゃんは身をかがめて糸の付いた針を拾った。My grandma stooped down and picked up a needle and thread.
とても魅力的な人に初めて会って、話の糸口を見つけるのは、たいていかなり難しいものだ。People usually find it very difficult to break the ice when they meet someone extremely attractive for the first time.わずかなヒントを糸口にして、正しいこたえを見つけた。He took a slight hint as the start and found the correct answer.
糸車の使い方は知りません。I don't know how to operate a spinning wheel.

無礼もヘチマもあるものか。Who cares about bad manners?


紙は木から作られる。Paper is made from wood.紙に線を１本引きなさい。Draw a line on the paper.



あなたはその紙袋を何度も使うようにしなさい。You should use the paper bags again and again.

５ポンド紙幣をお持ちですか。Do you have a five-pound note?

その事件の説明は、紙面が足りないため割愛された。The explanation of the event was omitted for lack of space.

その色はピンクというより紫だ。The color is purple rather than pink.



紫外線の急激な上昇は研究者たちにオゾンホールの存在を信じさせた。The sudden increase of ultraviolet rays made the researchers believe in the existence of ozone holes.




あじさいは６月に咲く。The hydrangea blooms in June.
彼女はあでやかな肢体で男性の人気を得た。Her bewitching body made her very popular with men.
肌が脂っぽいのです。I have greasy skin.
歯医者で歯についたたばこのヤニを取ってもらうと、費用はどれくらいかかるでしょう？About how much does it cost to have a dentist remove cigarette tar from your teeth?

肉から脂身を取りなさい。Trim the fat off the meat.


脂肪分は減らしたほうがいいですね。You had better cut out the fat.


私がいたって彼がいうこと聞く訳ないじゃない。He never hears what I'm trying to say.

その語は広い意味を持つに至った。The word has acquired a broad meaning.この道は公園に至る。This road goes to the park.赤貧戸口に至らば、恋は窓より飛び去る。When poverty comes in at the door, love flies out the window.
私たちはいたるところで歓迎された。We were welcomed at every turn.
そのレストランのサービスは至れり尽くせりだった。The restaurant gave us perfect service.
彼女は私に至急電報を打ってきた。She sent me an urgent telegram.

奥さんが来れなかったなんて至極残念です。It's an awful shame your wife couldn't come.
時は金なりとは至言である。It is truly said that time is money.




エステサロンで優雅な至福のひとときを過ごしてみませんか？How about spending an elegant and blissful time at a beauty salon?

彼らはついに視界から消えた。They went out of sight at last.
視覚は五感の１つである。Sight is one of the five senses.


彼は来月中国へ視察旅行に出かけます。He is leaving for China on an inspection tour next month.

彼女は彼の方に視線を向けた。She cast an eye in his direction.
キューバの若い人達はよくアメリカのテレビを視聴している。Younger Cubans tend to tune into the American television network.



テレビは視聴者に娯楽ばかりではなく、知識も与える。Television enlightens the viewers as well as entertains them.

これは十分根拠のある視点だ。This is a valid point of view.
彼らはついに視野から消えた。They went out of sight at last.いつもワイドな視野を持って、仕事をしなさい。You should always keep a broad perspective on the work you do.
その事故で彼は視力を失った。The accident deprived him of his sight.



彼女の詩集が出版されたところだ。A collection of her verses has just been published.

誰の心にも詩情ごころはある。A vein of poetry exists in the hearts of all men.
イギリス人は自国の詩人を誇りにしている。England is proud of her poets.


私は試しにその山に登ってみた。I tried climbing the mountain.
もう一度試したが失敗しただけだった。I tried it again, only to fail.
私たちの試みはすべて無駄だった。All our attempts were in vain.
全ての手段が試みられたわけではない。Every means has not been tried.

試運転では車両はみんなうまく動いた。All the vehicles behaved well on their test runs.


夢は我々の性格の試金石である。Dreams are the touchstones of our characters.
彼らは石油を目当てに土地を試掘している。They are boring the ground for oil.
とにかく、試験が終わってほっとしたよ。Anyhow, I'm relieved the test is over.
その志望者は試験官に好ましい印象を与えた。The applicant impressed the examiner favorably.
５．反応が終わったら、濡れ雑巾の上に試験管をおく。5. When the reaction is over, place the test-tube on a damp cloth.
試験勉強をしなくちゃ。I have to prepare for the test.


解決策が功を奏したのは試行錯誤の結果だった。Finding a solution that worked was a process of trial and error.
その試合は何時に始まりますか。What time does the game start?





昨日の夜、特別試写会があった。There was a special sneak preview last night.
デパートの試食コーナーへ行くと、いろいろな物がただで食べられるよ。You can get all kinds of things to eat if you go to the free samples area in a department store.
このドレスを試着してみたいのですけれど。I'd like to try on this dress.
試着室は今使用中だ。The fitting room is being used now.






彼は厳しい試練を受けた。He was subjected to severe trials.

彼はタイム誌を予約購読している。He subscribed to Time magazine.ネットワーク誌１１月号に掲載されていたあなたのレポートを７０部コピーし、私どもの代理店に配ってよろしいですか。Is it possible to reproduce 70 copies of your report which appeared in the November issue of The Network and distribute them to our agents?



意志疎通のはかり方は、文化によって決まるからである。The methods of communication are determined by their cultures.
顧問は学長を推戴し、本会の重要事項に関し諮問に応じる。The consultant, who is under the authority of the Chancellor, gives the committee advice on important questions.


彼には弁護士の資格がある。He is qualified as a solicitor.
その計画には資金が不足していた。Money for the plan was lacking.
銀行が援助の手をさしのべるのを拒絶したら、あなたはどうして資金繰りの危機を乗り切るのか。How do you expect to weather the financial storm when the bank refuses to extend a helping hand?
海は各種の資源を与えてくれる。The ocean affords various kinds of resources.

建築資材は今高い。Building materials are expensive now.
株主たちは会社の資産を処分する事を決議しました。Shareholders voted to liquidate the company's assets.

彼は指導者の資質を全て持っていた。He had all the attributes of a leader.
彼らには次の工場を建設するだけの資本がある。They have enough capital to build a second factory.
まず第一に、私たちはそれを始める資本金がなくてはならない。In the first place, we must have capital to begin it with.
共産主義が崩壊したことにより、今や資本主義が「世界を支配」しようとしているという非難を浴びている。As communism has collapsed, capitalism is now accused of trying to "dominate the world."

新しい資料をお送りください。Please send us more information.


浅学非才の私ではありますが、何とぞ皆様のお力を賜りたく、ここにお願い申し上げる次第です。I may not have much to offer in the way of learning or ability, but I want to do whatever I can for us all and humbly ask for your favor.

カンガルーの雌は子供を腹の袋に入れて動く。A female kangaroo carries its young in the pouch.

ジャックは雌牛を種と交換した。Jack exchanged the cow for the seeds.





馬は飼い慣らされた動物です。The horse is a domestic animal.
ナンシーは犬を飼いたがっていますか。Does Nancy want to have a dog?
彼は牛の飼育の仕方を知った。He learned how to raise cattle.

その赤ちゃんは歯が生えはじめている。The baby is cutting his teeth.

この問題は難しくて私には歯がたたない。This problem is beyond my powers.


歯を食い縛る、喉元までせりあがった感情を強引に飲み込む。He grits his teeth and forces back his growing fear.
この歯ブラシを使っているのは母ではない。This toothbrush is not used by my mother.
今日歯医者へ行きました。Today I went to the dentist's.



たまたま彼女の夫は歯科医だった。It happened that her husband was a dentist.














この間、歯医者行ったら、念のためとか言われて、歯型とレントゲンをとられた。いい商売してるよ。I went to the dentist recently and he did a cast of my teeth and took an X-ray, just in case. It sounds like a good business to be in.
歯茎に当たるところはないですか。Does anything touch your gums?

歯垢がずいぶん付いていると思いますが。I think I have a lot of plaque build up.

下院議員は支出に歯止めをかけると言いました。The Representative said he will put a brake on spending.

歯車がかみ合っている。The cog-wheels are in gear.



歯石がたまっているようです。I think I have a lot of tartar.

あなたの話し方はなかなか歯切れがいいですね。You have a very crisp way of speaking.


最近いった歯医者で「歯槽膿漏がありますね」と言われ悩んでいます。I'm worried because the dentist I went to recently told me, "You've got periodontitis alright".



彼女は歯並びが悪い。She has a set of irregular teeth.


娘の歯列を矯正していただきたいのです。I'd like to have her teeth straightened.
歯列矯正についてご相談したいのですが。I'd like to have a consultation about getting braces.




「Ｕ．Ｆ．Ｏとは何を表しているの」「未確認飛行物体のことだと思う」"What does U.F.O. stand for?" "It means Unidentified Flying Object, I guess."彼は居空きとして知られ、日中でも家に忍び込んで貴重品を盗むことで評判となっていた。He was known as a burglar of houses where occupants are present and had a reputation for sneaking in and stealing valuables even during the day.
ことによっては意外な結末もあり得る。Depending on how things go, it's possible there'll be a surprise ending.オーストラリア人は全体として政治システムが安定していることによる恩恵に満足している。Australians are, on the whole, pleased with the stabilizing benefits of their political system.







彼女は社会福祉事業に従事している。She is engaged in social work.

あの大事業家は息子それぞれに１００万ドルを残した。The tycoon endowed each son with a million dollars.




この大分類には、金融業又は保険業を営む事業所が分類される。Into this broad category fall companies that run money lending and insurance businesses.






アンは友人に事欠かない。Ann does not lack for friends.
彼は贅沢品は言うまでもなく、日用品を買うのにも事欠く。He cannot afford the common comforts of life, not to mention luxuries.
この事件に手を貸してください。Give me a hand with this case.

その事故について彼に質問した。I asked him about the accident.
警察は事故原因を入念に調査した。The police carefully investigated the cause of the accident.

事後に事を悟るのは容易だ。It is easy to be wise after the event.


ジェーンは申込書に必要事項を書き入れた。Jane filled out an application.



彼は妻と離婚したという事実を隠した。He concealed the fact that he had divorced his wife.事実は小説よりも奇なり。Fact is stranger than fiction.事実と虚構を見分けなければならない。You have to distinguish fact from fiction.
彼の返事は事実上は拒絶だった。His reply was in effect a refusal.


事象として簡単なことを、いかにも難しそうに表現する人は、あまり頭がよさそうではない。A person who makes an easy matter sound difficult does not seem to be so smart.
そこに行くかもしれないが、それは事情次第だ。I may go there, but that depends.



事前に予約を取っておくべきだ。We'd better make a reservation beforehand.














その事典は約５０万語の単語を収めている。The dictionary contains about half a million words.

私はいつも事物をあるがままに描くことにしている。I always make it a point to paint things as they are.
君の関する事柄ではない。That is no business of yours.

彼は事毎に私に反対する。He opposes me at every turn.
事務弁護士に遺言状の作成を依頼した。I asked the solicitor to make out my will.
彼は一介の事務員にすぎない。He is nothing more than a clerk.






事務局は私の願書を受け取っていないと電報で知らせてきた。The office telegraphed that they had not received my application.


大学事務室はどちらですか。Where is the registrar's office?
それはその会社の事務取り扱いの上の不始末であった。It was mismanagement of the company's affairs by the acting director.
私のおじはこの事務所で働いている。My uncle works in this office.








彼は彼女に気づくことなく走り過ぎた。He ran past without noticing her.




これこそ適切な事例だと思う。I believe this is a case in point.
あの男の子は父親似だ。That boy takes after his father.

どっちの服にしたらいいか分からない。赤いのも緑のも似たりよったりで迷ってしまう。I don't know which dress to choose; it's a toss up between the red one and the green one.
似た者夫婦。Every Jack has his Jill.

私も似た話を聞いたことがある。I also heard a similar story.私の妹は、祖母に似ている。My sister resembles my grandmother.ニュージーランドの気候は日本のと似ている。The climate of New Zealand is similar to that of Japan.






ピーターとエバは似合いのカップルだ。Peter and Eve make a handsome couple.
あのドレスは彼女によく似合う。That dress really becomes her.

あなたと私の悩みは似通っている。Your problem and mine are similar.







『うぐいす侍』人間愛とユーモア溢れる侍物語。"The Nightingale Samurai" is a samurai tale full of humanity and humour.


























その学校の児童はみんなその新しい先生になついた。Every child in the school took to the new teacher.


彼女は児童心理学専攻だ。She majors in child psychology.

その出版社は児童文学を専門にしている。That publisher specialises in children's books.

君は字がうまいね。You write very neatly, don't you?



君はあまり字句に拘泥しすぎるよ。You are too much letter-bound.




今週、３日連続でカーアクションものの外国映画を字幕で見た。This week I've watched foreign car-action movies with subtitles for three days in a row.

これが彼の泊っているお寺です。This is the temple where he stays.
この寺院は７８０年に建てられた。This temple dates back to 780.

死がまさに我らを引離すまで愛し、いつくしむ。To love and to cherish, till death do us part.
慈愛は家庭から始まる。Charity begins at home.
慈雨があれば草木は生き返るでしょう。The plants will revive after a good rain.





その隠れた慈善を彼がしたことだと世間では信じている。They accredit him with the secret charity.



気前の良いその歯科医はおよそ２０億円を慈善事業に寄付した。The generous dentist contributed some two billion yen to charity.



ヤッパリさんが裁判官に慈悲を求めて訴えた。Mr. Yappari appealed to the judge for mercy.




両者の関係は持ちつ持たれつで都合がいいものだ。The relationship is convenient and symbiotic.
この箱は持ち運べるほど軽い。This box is light enough to carry.
仕事は金曜日の１１時に終わらなかったので、次の月曜日に持ち越すことにした。The work wasn't finished at 11:00 p.m. Friday, so they decided to carry it over to the following Monday.

彼は金を借りようとおじに話をもちかけた。He approached his uncle about lending him some money.
その病人がどれだけ持ちこたえるかは、誰にもわからない。Nobody knows how long the sick man can hold on.

男の子たちが、私の柿の木になっている熟した実を全部持ち去ってしまった。Some boys made away with all the ripe fruits on my persimmon tree.

お金のもちあわせがありません。I don't have any money on me.
これは機内に持ち込めますか。Can I carry this on the plane?私は妥協を許さずに希望していた通りの契約に持ち込んだ。I stood my ground and got the contract I wanted.
この棚の本を持ち出すな。Don't take out the books on this shelf.それは食事の席の会話で持ち出すのに適当ではない。That is not a proper subject to bring up in conversation at the dinner table.
この石は重すぎて持ち上げられない。This stone is too heavy to lift.
どんなことがあっても持ち場を離れてはならない。In no case are you to leave your post.
社内はそのニュースのことで持ちきりだった。They talked about nothing but the news in the company.

メアリーは持ち前の優しい性格から級友たちから親しまれた。Mary's kind nature quickly won her the friendship of her classmates.

東京証券取引所は後場の終わり値になって持ち直しました。The Tokyo Stock Exchange rallied at the end of the day.
私はお金をあまり持ち歩かない。I don't carry much cash with me.
酒で彼は身を持ち崩した。Drink brought about his downfall.
３１８号室のお客さんに持って行ってあげなさい。Take it to the men in Room 318.
お水を持ってきてください。Could you bring me some water?
コートを持ちましょうか。Shall I carry your coat?ＡＢＣ海外旅行障害保険を持っています。I'm a holder of ABC Travel Insurance.私たちは数回会合を持った。We've had several meetings.
彼はもてる物すべてを失った。He lost his all.
主人はパーティーで私達をもてなしてくれた。The host entertained us at the party.
彼女は暇を持て余しているらしい。She doesn't seem to know what to do with her leisure time.
この歌手はあまりにももてはやされている。This singer is made too much of.


ほとんどの観光客がカメラを持参している。Almost every tourist carries a camera with him.
この机は重くて持ち上がらなかった。This desk was too heavy to lift.株価上昇を契機に新工場建設の話が持ち上がった。They took advantage of the stock price increase to raise the idea of building a new factory.



１２才の時彼は声変わりした。His voice broke when he was twelve.車を運転する時はいくら注意してもしすぎることはない。You cannot be too careful when you drive a car.

ときには試合は一日中続きました。Sometimes the game lasted all day.





いつだって読書の時間は見つけられる。We can always find time for reading.彼は勤勉な生徒だ。毎日３時間彼は勉強している。He is a diligent student. He studies three hours every day.

彼は時間稼ぎをしているだけだよ。He is just killing time.

私たちは時間割に従って勉強する。We study according to the schedule.
私は時間給で時間をもらっている。I'm paid by the hour.


「もう少しで時間ぎれだからね」と先生は言った。"You are almost out of time", said the teacher.
毎日働く時間帯が違うんです。Every day I work different hours.

今月５日から時間表が改正される。The revised timetable will go into effect on the 5th of this month.
１年のこの時期は天候がよく変わる。The weather changes very often at this time of year.


今その計画を実施するのは、時期尚早である。It is premature to put the plan into practice now.

あの修理工たちは時給一万円ももらっている。Those mechanics are paid as much as ten thousand yen per hour.



あなたの時計では何時ですか。What time is it by your watch?




１時限は何の授業ですか。What do you have the first period?
空港で時限爆弾が爆発し１３名もの命を奪った。A time bomb went off in the airport killing thirteen people.

そろそろ寝る時刻だ。It's almost time to go to bed.
時刻表が改正された。The timetable has been revised.
会社は時差通勤を導入しようとしています。The company is attempting to stagger work hours.
時差ボケで辛い。I've got a bad case of jet lag.
我々は時勢に遅れずに付いて行かなければならない。We must keep up with the times.
物には時節、番茶も出花。There is a time for all things.

この車は時速６０キロで走っている。This car is going 60km an hour.
今や時代との競争になった。It was now a race against time.
私は時代劇を見にその劇場へ行った。I went to the theater to see a period drama.


神様の名前はやっぱりＮＧだと思うよ〜。もう名づけた時点で名前負けなわけじゃん。I think a god's name has got to be out. From the moment the kid's named you know he's not going to be able to live up to it!
彼は若い時分にはバイオリンを弾いていた。He used to play the violin in his youth.


この次来るときは、花を持ってきてあげよう。Next time I come, I'll bring you some flowers.
それは教育に次いで大きな問題だ。That is the principle problem next to education.
きれい好きは敬神に次ぐ美徳。Cleanliness is next to godliness.
私は幸福を次のように定義しよう。I will define happiness as this.




次回は奈良を訪ねたいと思います。I hope to visit Nara next time.
その次官は政界のボスたちのおかげで地位に留まることができた。The undersecretary was maintained in office by the political bosses.
水泳が次期オリンピックの主要競技となるだろう。Swimming will be the main event of the next Olympics.



あなたの劇に対する好意的な批評が次号に出ます。A favorable review of your play will appear in the next issue.










時と場合によっては次善を選ばなくてはならぬ。You must choose the second-best policy according to the circumstances.

トムが次打者として控えています。Tom is the on-deck batter.

仕事の成功はあなた方の努力次第です。Our success in this work depends on your efforts.空港に着き次第、電話します。I'll phone you as soon as I get to the airport.こういう次第だ。This is how it stands.
日が経つにつれて、天気は次第に悪化しつつあった。The weather was getting worse and worse as the day went on.










カレーのルーは非常に滋養に富んでいる。Curry sauce is very nourishing.

嵐がしだいにおさまってきた。The storm has gradually abated.その薬のおかげで彼の腹痛はおさまった。The medicine relieved him of his stomach-ache.
王は自分の王国を公正に治めた。The king ruled his kingdom justly.




王を得た麒麟もまた寿命を持たない生き物だが、この病ばかりは治癒の方法がない。A qilin with a king too has no limit on its lifespan, but this illness alone admits of no remedy.
治療よりも予防。Prevention is better than cure.









その機械は磁気の力で動く。Magnetic force drives the mechanism.








キートンはハトの頭に磁石を取り付けた。Keeton put magnets on the heads of his pigeons.磁石の針は北を指す。Compass needles point to the north.


何もかも彼の有罪をしめしている。Everything points to his guilt.

アントレの書物の事実誤認の数は、アベルが示唆した数よりも相当に少ない。The number of errors of fact in Arendt's book are considerably fewer than Abel implies.



私は受話器を耳に当てた。I put the receiver to my ear.耳の不自由な人は手話で会話が出きる。Deaf people can talk in sign language.彼等には音楽を聴く耳がない。They don't have an ear for music.
もっと大きな声で話してくれませんか。私は耳が遠いんです。Could you speak louder? I'm hard of hearing.
彼は耳をすましたが、何も聞こえなかった。He listened, but heard nothing.
彼は私の忠告に耳を貸そうともしなかった。He wouldn't listen to my advice.
耳垢を取って欲しい。I want the wax cleaned from my ears.


耳障りな音が聞こえる。I hear a noise offensive to the ear.







油断なく注意さえしておれば好機はおのずからうまれる。Plenty of opportunities will present themselves, if only you are awake to them.
彼は自らを日本のエジソンと称した。He called himself an Edison of Japan.大統領自ら我々に話しかけた。The President himself addressed us.

ご自愛のほどお祈り申し上げます。Please take good care of yourself.




政府が自衛隊に沖縄への災害派遣を要請した。The government asked the SDF for a disaster relief deployment to Okinawa.

あの老人は５０年も自家製ウイスキーを作っていた。The old man had been making white lightning for 50 years.


彼らは喜びのあまりすっかり自我をわすれた。They were quite beside themselves with joy.
あいつのことを好きなやつは誰もいない。なぜならあいつはいつも自分のことを自画自賛ばかりしているからだ。Nobody likes him, because he is always blowing his own horn.
この自画像の私があなたを見つめているように思えても、そうではありません。If in this self-portrait I seem to be staring at you, I'm not.
彼は社会人としての自覚に欠ける。He lacks consciousness that he is a member of society.彼は事故の原因が自分にあると十分に自覚していた。He fully realizes that he was the cause of the accident.自分たちの欠点を自覚するべきです。We should be conscious of our shortcomings.
初期の自覚症状としては、排尿障害がありますが、多くの場合、はっきりとした症状がありません。One of the early noticeable symptoms is trouble with urination, but often there are no clear symptoms.
彼は自活するだけで精一杯だ。All he can do is support himself.




犯人は窃盗を自供した。The criminal confessed to theft.
嘘ばっかりついてるから、皆に総すかんを食うんだ。自業自得だよ。You're always lying- that's why people don't take you seriously. You get what you deserve.
彼は自己を没却する男ではない。He knows how to assert himself.


彼の死は崇高な自己犠牲だった。His death was a sublime self-sacrifice.



自己紹介してもいいですか。May I introduce myself to you?

彼は自己中心な人だ。He is a self-oriented person.

彼女はどうしてもそれを自己流に料理したがった。She would cook it in her own way.
イギリス人は自国の詩人を誇りにしている。England is proud of her poets.

誰でも大なり小なり自惚れはある。Everyone is more or less conceited.
人気がでて彼女はうぬぼれた。The popularity turned her head.
彼はフランス語が自在にこなせる。He has a good command of French.
彼はその少女のために自作の曲を一曲弾いた。He played the girl a piece of music of his own writing.
彼は自殺しようとしたが、未遂に終わった。He tried to kill himself but it ended in failure.

彼女は自殺未遂をした。She tried to commit suicide.
自賛は推薦にならない。Self-praise is no recommendation.
その教師は学生自治委員会の決定を支持した。The teacher affirmed the decision of the student council.



会議場内で自社の製品の展示場を設けたいとお考えでしたら、早急にご連絡下さい。Please let me know immediately if you would like to set up an area of the conference room for your products.


山火事の後なので今年の花火大会は自主的に中止を決定しました。After the bushfires, we have independently decided to call off this year's fireworks display.
その犯人は警察に自首した。The criminal gave himself up to the police.


彼は自粛の波に乗らなかった。He refused to exercise self-restraint.
彼の自叙伝が今日発売され、午前中に完売した。His autobiography was released today and was sold out by noon.

彼は財政の専門家であると自称した。He claimed to be an expert in finance.それからまもなく幾人かの測量士と自称する変な服装をした人たちが集落にやってきて、祖母の小屋の前を測っていきました。Pretty soon along came to the village some strangely dressed people who called themselves surveyors; and they surveyed a line in front of my grandmother's little house.
君は自分が申し立てていることに自信がありますか。Are you sure of your facts?
自信過剰にならないよう注意しなくてはいけない。You should beware of overconfidence.
ジェーン自身がこの手紙を書いた。Jane wrote the letter herself.
私は自炊に慣れている。I'm used to cooking for myself.
君は自制しなければならない。You must control yourself.
各自席につきなさい。Go to your respective seats.

誰がなんと言おうと彼女は自説を曲げない。She will not budge an inch no matter what anyone says.


自前で買ったのです。She got it at her own expense.
われわれは自然の法則に従う。We are subject to the laws of nature.エコロジーのために堪え忍ぶのではなく、自然と調和した住環境の快適性が必要である。Not just for the sake of the ecology, a natural living environment is necessary.
その大学の課程は自然科学と社会科学から成り立っている。That university's curriculum covers natural science and social science.

地震や洪水は自然災害です。Earthquakes and floods are natural disasters.








彼女の態度は私の自尊心を傷つけた。Her attitude hurt my self-respect.


車自体は良くも悪くもない。運転する人次第です。A car in itself is neither good nor bad; it depends on the driver.
ご自宅の電話番号は何番ですか。What's your home phone number?
地球は自転している。The earth revolves on its axis.

ケンは自転車を白く塗りました。Ken painted his bicycle white.
ひでおは自転車をこいでいた人を避けるためにハンドルをきった。Hideo turned the steering wheel sharply to avoid the bicyclist.

自伝の中で彼はくりかえし不幸な少年時代に言及している。In his autobiography, he repeatedly refers to his unhappy school days.
彼女は自動式の洗濯機をもっている。She has an automatic washing machine.




動詞には目的語をとらない自動詞と、目的語をとる他動詞があります。With verbs there are intransitive verbs that don't take an object, and transitive verbs that do take an object.
私達はその自動車を12,000ドルで買った。We bought the car for $12,000.





コンピューター・システムは午後８時に自動的に停止する。The computer system shuts down automatically at 8pm.
この自動販売機、動かないんですが。This vending machine isn't working.




その金を盗んだという彼の自白に家族は驚いた。His admission that he had stolen the money astonished his family.


彼は自発的に降伏した。He surrendered of his own accord.
自販機でコーヒーを買おうと１００円入れてボタンを押したら、一気に４本も、どかどかと落ちてきた！When I put 100 yen in and pressed the button to buy a coffee at the vending machine, four cans dropped down all at once!
私は自費でパーティーを開いた。I held the party at my own expense.

彼は経済にかけては誰にも負けないと自負している。He flatters himself that he is second to none in finance.
矛盾する報告を受けて、その役員は自分の立場を考え直した。Conflicting reports prompted the director to reconsider her position.スミスさんは、自分はニューヨークの生まれだが妻は日本だと言う。Mr Smith says he was born in New York, but that his wife comes from Japan.
自分自身でするべきだと思いますよ。I think you should do it yourself.
その自分勝手な男は、一緒に行動している人達に軽蔑された。The selfish man was despised by his companions.


司教は、自暴自棄になった移民たちを哀れんで助けを与えた。The bishop felt pity for the immigrants who were abandoned, and gave them help.
われわれは体力を自慢した。We took pride in our strength.
ジョーダンがこの実験でメイン・エンジンを交換したことは自明である。That Jordan replaced the main engine in this experiment is self-evident.

今の日本は自滅へのみちを突き進んでいますよね。Present-day Japan is going down the route to self destruction, isn't it?
お金を使うも貯めるも自由にしなさい。You may spend or save at will.
ご自由に果物をお取り下さい。Help yourself to the fruit.
金利自由化の方向性を一定するのはむずかしいことです。It is difficult to peg the direction of interest deregulation.

私の秘書は英語が自由自在だ。My secretary has a good command of the English language.
彼はいわゆる自由主義者だ。He is a so called liberal.
自由席を三枚ください。Could I have three seats in the unreserved section?

投票の結果は自由党の勝利だった。The result of the vote was a win for the Liberals.



安倍内閣は、自由民主党、公明党を与党とする連立内閣である。The Abe Cabinet is a coalition Cabinet where the Liberal Democratic Party and New Komei Party form the government.


私はもう自立できる年です。I'm old enough to support myself.


アメリカは自国の問題を自力で解決するであろう。America will solve her problems for herself.


彼はやめるほか仕方がない。He has no choice but to resign.
この手紙で彼は辞意を表明している。This letter purports to be his resignation.
正確なつづりは辞書で調べなさい。I refer you to the dictionary for the correct spelling.
私は辞職する意志はまったくない。I have no intention of resigning.
芥川賞の受賞を辞退したいのですが。I would like to excuse myself from receiving the Akutagawa Prize.
彼は大統領を辞任した。He resigned as president.
彼は辞表を提出しましたか。Did he hand in his resignation?
彼は辞令を受けるように結局説得された。He was eventually prevailed upon to accept the appointment.
私たちは鹿の通ったあとをたどった。We followed the deer's tracks.


彼は事故でその式に出席できなかった。An accident prohibited his attending the ceremony.社長の挨拶が長くて式の後半が押せ押せになってしまった。The company president's welcome was so long that we were squeezed for time in the second half of the ceremony.式に余分の変数を加えたことによって、この実験結果は不明瞭なものになっている。The result of this experiment is obscured by the extra variables added in the formula.



彼はその式典で堂々と振る舞った。He bore himself well at the ceremony.
学生服は普段着としても式服としても着られるので便利だ。The school uniform is convenient because it can be worn for both informal and formal occasions.


第二に、当時のヨーロッパの識字率が低かったことだ。Secondly, the literacy rate in Europe of that time was low.

私の目は色が識別しにくくなってきた。My eyes have become less appreciative of colors.

その小説は南北戦争を軸にしている。The novel is centered on the Civil War.

私は今朝7時に起きた。I got up at seven this morning.
海賊たちは７つの海を航海した。The pirates sailed the seven seas.





７月１日から仕事を始めます。I will start working on July the first.

今年は娘の七五三だ。Our daughter will be in the Shichi-Go-San festival this year.













件の七不思議の話。調べてきてくれたのでしょう？This is about the case of the "seven mysteries". Did you investigate it?






主人はお客に七面鳥の肉を切り分けた。The host cut the turkey for the guests.




あの無礼な男を誰かが叱り付けなければならない。Somebody should tell off that rude man.
ママに叱られますよ。You'll catch it from Mummy.あなたは先生にしかられましたか。Were you scolded by your teacher?
彼はそれを叱責の意味にとった。He took it for an implied rebuke.

教会では儀式が執り行われた。Rituals were performed in churches.

裁判所が法律を執行する。The courts administer the law.






あいつは執念深いから気をつけた方がいいよ。Watch out for him. That guy can really hold a grudge.
ホーキングは、その本の執筆を始めたとき、手で書くことがまったくできなかった。When he started the book, Hawking was unable to write by hand at all.


彼女は彼の執拗さにうんざりしていた。She was disgusted at his persistence.
ミスで財産を失った。My mistake cost me my fortune.




ビルは失意のうちに死んだ。Bill died a disappointed man.

彼女は２度のフライングで失格した。She was disqualified from the race for two false starts.


彼は放漫だったので失脚した。He lost his job through his irresponsibility.
この地域の失業はほぼないに等しい。Unemployment in this part of the country is virtually nonexistent.失業した後、彼は大変苦労した。After losing his job, he went through a very difficult time.
この失業者の増加は不景気の当然な結果である。This increase in the number of unemployed people is a result of the bad economy.


高い失業率の責任は誰にあるのか。Who is responsible for high unemployment?
よく失禁します。I urinate involuntarily.



それは君の失言だ。That is something you should not have said.





執行部の交替で彼は失職した。Owing to a change of administrations, he lost his job.







どんな理由があろうと、せっかく軌道に乗せた貿易を失墜させたのは大失態だ。Whatever the reason, forfeiting the trade that we finally got on track is a fiasco.




１度や２度の失敗はだれにでもある。Everybody fails once or twice.


私はその結果に失望した。I was disappointed at the results.



彼はあやうく片目を失明するところだった。He came close to losing an eye.

あなたはこの前の夜の失礼な振る舞いをスミス夫人に謝罪すべきです。You should apologize to Mrs. Smith for your rude behavior the other night.「失礼ですが」とアンが話に割って入った。"Excuse me," Ann broke in.それではそろそろ失礼します。Well, I must be going.

それから８ヶ月が過ぎると、ジョージは失恋から立ち直り、次第に色んな女とデートをするようになる。After eight months passed and his broken heart healed, George eventually started dating girls again.
３日後になってはじめて彼女が失踪したことを知った。It was not until three days after that I knew she had disappeared.

すこし嫉妬深く感じたように思う。I suppose I felt a little jealous.
恋は嫉妬深いもので、正常な目を斜視にさせる。Love, being jealous, makes a good eye look asquint.
先生は生徒達に講義室を退出させなかった。The teacher did not permit the students to leave the lecture hall.




たとえ外はどんなに寒くとも、室内は気持ちよく暖められている。No matter how cold it is outside, the rooms are comfortably heated.



洗濯物はまだ湿っている。The washing is still damp.
夏はとても湿気が多いんです。In the summer, it's very humid.
あらやだ、このお煎餅もう湿気ってる。Yecch. This rice cracker is soggy.


肛門のまわりに湿疹があります。I have a rash around my anus.



ニューヨークの天候は、夏は暑く湿度も高い。New York weather is hot and humid in the summer.

２時間毎に局部を湿布しなさい。Apply a compress to the affected part every two hours.


黒い天使は、その漆黒の翼を大きく広げて、空へと舞い上がる。The black angel spread those jet-black wings wide and flew up into the sky.


もうとっくに寝る時間だ。It is high time we went to bed.

１台のトラックが道路を疾走していた。A truck was careering along the road.




お茶の質は下がりつつある。The quality of tea is going down.
彼は他人につらくあたることができないたちだ。It is not in his nature to be hard on other people.

彼は質屋から時計買い戻した。He redeemed his watch from the pawnbroker.



私達は質素な食物を食べるのに慣れている。We are used to eating plain food.ドイツ人は質素な国民だ。Germans are a frugal people.




その事故について彼に質問した。I asked him about the accident.

終わり次第すぐにこの質問用紙を送ります。I'll mail this questionnaire as soon as I finish.

生物は、実がついにそのうちの１つにわかり始めるまで、３０億年以上の間、全くその理由を知らずに地球上に存在していた。Living organisms had existed on earth, without ever knowing why, for over three thousand million years before the truth finally dawned on one of them.名を捨てて実を取る。Profit is better than fame.
男の子たちが、私の柿の木になっている熟した実を全部持ち去ってしまった。Some boys made away with all the ripe fruits on my persimmon tree.
彼女は実のところ全く信用できない。In fact, she's quite unreliable.
実はそれはただのうわさだったよ。Actually, it was just a rumour.
ドイツに滞在した１年間は非常に実りの多いものだった。Their stay in Germany for a year was very fruitful.
この木には毎年おいしい桃が実る。This tree bears good peaches every year.君の努力はもうじき実るだろう。Your efforts will soon pay off.
実を言えば、彼女は私の妹だ。To tell the truth, she is my sister.


セールスマンはその使い方を実演した。The salesman demonstrated how to use it.
私の両親は二人とも今、実家にいます。Both my parents are at home now.

オーストラリアへ行って初めて、日本はなんと小さい国かと実感した。I didn't realize till I visited Australia how small Japan really is.

それは実業人にとって一つの赤信号になる。It raises a red flag for businessmen.
トムは実業家になるのに向いている。Tom is fit to become a businessman.

実験は成功だった。The experiment was successful.

その実験室には最新式の設備がある。The laboratory has the most up-to-date equipment.
ここでは６０年代後半のエメットの実験的な作品で初めて提示されたダイアド・スタイルを扱う。We deal here with Emmet's 'dyad' style first presented in his experimental works in the late sixties.

あなたの夢がみんな実現されますように。May all your dreams come true!

私は彼の実行的能力を信頼している。I trust his executive ability.

新計画は実行可能とみなされた。The new plan was accounted practicable.




この物語は実際の出来事に基づいている。This story is based on actual events.理論と実際とは必ずしも一致しない。Theory and practice do not necessarily go together.人間は実際自然のなすがままである。Man is indeed at the mercy of nature.
彼はキャビアを実際に食べたことがない。He hasn't actually eaten caviar.実際にうまくいかなければ理論は全く役に立たない。Theory is quite useless unless it works in practice.
サンタクロースが実在しないなんて信じない。I don't believe that Santa Claus is imaginary.
その計画は実施された。The plan was put into operation.


実質成長と名目成長率の差は物価上昇を意味する。Price increases explain the difference between the real and nominal growth rates.
これは実質的にはそれよりも高くはない。This is in effect less expensive than that.
道具としての実需がないから品揃えに深みがでない。There's no demand for them as tools, so the product line-up is poor.
マンツーマンで指導して頂けたという点でも、非常に充実した実習になった。Just getting one-to-one guidance was enough to make it an extremely fulfilling practise session.
この理論の根拠をこれから実証しよう。I am going to substantiate this theory.


その新米のセールスマンが、トップの販売実績をあげたやり方は指導員の目を見はらせた。The manner in which the new salesman made top sales level was an eye-opener to his supervisor.

あなたが結婚し子供を持ったら、言葉より実践ということを悟るでしょう。When you get married and have kids, you'll realize that actions speak louder than words.
実践的見地からすれば彼の計画は実行しにくい。From a practical point of view, his plan is not easy to carry out.






ヒートアイランド現象の実体解析と対策のあり方について。An analysis of the nature of the heat island phenomenon and countermeasures.
死亡事例が19件と全体の20％を超えており、過労死の深刻な実態が浮き彫りになった。With 19 cases of death forming over 20% of the whole, the grave reality of overwork-deaths has been thrown into relief.

実地は理論と同様に大切であるが、われわれは理論を重んじ、実地を軽んずる傾向がある。Practice is as important as theory, but we are apt to value the latter and despise the former.
トムはこの上なく実直な男だ。Tom is a man of absolute sincerity.



あの彼の写真は実物より悪く撮れている。That picture does not do justice to him.


法律的な実務は政府が任命する弁護士、そのほかの専門家が行うことになっている。Legal services will be provided by lawyers and other experts to be appointed by the government.

そのような技術は多くの実用が可能であろう。Such skills could be put to many practical uses.


彼の考えはいつも実用的だ。His ideas are always practical.

けっきょく、実力が勝つ。Real ability wins in the end.

彼はどう見ても実力者だった。He was to all appearances a strong man.
実例は教訓にまさる。Example is better than precept.

その劇は実話に基づいていた。The play was based on a true story.
ミサは、食べたり飲んだりしてイエスキリストを偲ぶカトリックの儀式だ。Mass is a Catholic ceremony of remembering Jesus Christ by eating and drinking.
母は私に芝を刈るように言った。Mother told me to mow the lawn.
芝刈り機が簡素な作りの荷車に積んである。Some lawn equipment is loaded into the jerry-built cart.
どの芝居がいいですか。Can you recommend a good play?
芝居小屋跡地に学校が建てられたのが1905年4月でした。It was April 1905 when a school was built on the site of the theatre.
芝生に露が降りている。Dew has formed on the lawn.

あのグリーンの縞のシャツ、今洗濯してるん？Is that green striped shirt in the wash?










その写しは原本と合っている。The copy agrees with the original.

私は鏡に写っている自分を見つめているのです。I'm staring at myself in a mirror.







あなたに何枚かの写真を見せましょう。I will show you some pictures.
ホテルの中に写真屋はありますか。Is there a photo shop in the hotel?
その写真家は表現するのが下手でした。The photo artist had trouble expressing himself.






彼は写真うつりがよい。He comes out well in photographs.




彼は彼の写真帳を私に見せてくれた。He showed his photograph album to me.











コズビの議論はヘッテ写本の信頼性に関するものである。Cosby's argument concerns the reliability of the Hette Manuscript.
雲間が開け光が射した。The clouds opened and the sun shone through.
あなたは私にとってヨーダのような存在でした、あなたの的を射たアドバイスを恋しく思うでしょう。You were my Yoda and I'll miss your right-on-target advice.


彼は射撃がうまい。He is a good shot.

ジョンはトラを捕まえ、２匹のライオンを射殺した。John caught a tiger and shot two lions.
彼には彼女のハートを射止める見込みはないだろう。He will have no chance of winning her heart.


この銃は３００メートルの射程がある。This gun has a range of 300 meters.



私はあなたの皮肉な言葉は聞き捨てにはできません。I resent your cynical remarks.
そのような悪い習慣は捨て去らねばならない。You should do away with such evil customs.





その囚人は刑期に服した後赦免された。The convict was pardoned after serving his sentence.
えらくご機嫌ななめね、けんか腰にならないで。Wow, you're really in a bad mood. Don't get scrappy.



恋は嫉妬深いもので、正常な目を斜視にさせる。Love, being jealous, makes a good eye look asquint.


岩は丘の斜面を転がり落ちた。The rock rolled down the hillside.

スープがなべでぐつぐつ煮えている。The soup is bubbling in the pot.

煮えたぎっている湯にその卵を入れなさい。Put the eggs into the boiling water.
スープがとろっとするまで煮つめてください。Boil the soup down until it becomes thick.

くたくたに煮る。Reduce to pulp by boiling.

長い議論は現実的な結論に煮詰まった。The long discussion reached a realistic conclusion.





コップを十分に煮沸しなさい。Give the glasses a good boil.

必ず弱火で煮立たないように煮ること。Be sure to simmer on a low heat so it doesn't boil.

この社はジュピターにささげられたものだ。This shrine is sacred to Jupiter.
私が前にいた会社では、ある冬の暗い夜に全社員の給与が強奪されました。I have worked for one company where the payroll was snatched on a dark winter's night.


彼の一生は社会の下積みで終わった。He lived and died in obscurity.

その大学の課程は自然科学と社会科学から成り立っている。That university's curriculum covers natural science and social science.
彼は社会学の研究をしている。He is doing research in sociology.
彼らは資本主義にピリオドを打ち社会主義社会を建設した。They ended capitalism and built a socialist society.
その社会主義者は女性の通訳を同伴させていた。The socialist was accompanied by a female interpreter.

この時間帯は、エクササイズ目的の社会人がメインで、子供はそんなに多くない。At this time of day, most customers are adults here to exercise, there aren't that many kids.


社会党の猛烈な反対にもかかわらず、その議案は過半数で可決された。The bill was passed by a majority, although the Socialist Party was strongly opposed to it.
彼は社会福祉のために働いている。He is working for social welfare.
私はあの新聞の社会面に興味があります。I find interest in the social page in that newspaper.
彼は社外で人脈を築いている。He's building up a network of acquaintances outside his office.


六月はロンドンでは社交の季節だ。June is a social season in London.
子供ではあるけれど、彼女はとても社交的です。Child as she is, she is sociable.
くず社債のディーラーは市場をつり上げてバブル状態にしました。Junk bond dealers left the market riding on a pillow of air.
今朝の新聞の社説を読みましたか。Have you read the leading article in today's paper?


この会社の社長は誰ですか。Who is the boss of this company?
社内で煙草を吸うのは社の規則に反する。Smoking in the office is against our rules.





じっくり彼に耳を貸す者はいない。No one stops to listen to him.

私は彼女に謝らなければならない。I must make an apology to her.
彼女は自分の本の中で彼の助力に謝意を述べた。She acknowledged his help in her book.
太郎は屈辱を忍んで謝罪し辞職した。Taro had to eat dirt and resigned.
通常の謝辞を含みます。We will include the usual acknowledgments.


その弁護士への謝礼はとても高かった。The lawyer's fee was very high.
車を運転する時はいくら注意してもしすぎることはない。You cannot be too careful when you drive a car.
彼らは、特別のコンピューター・システムを開発し、それを彼の車椅子に取り付けた。They developed a special computer system and fixed it to his wheelchair.

車検を受けたいのですが。I'd like a safety check on my car.
私は車庫付きの家を借りた。I rented a house with a garage.


車輪は車軸で回転する。Wheels turn on axles.
社長さんの車種と色は？The colour and make of the president's car are?
オレンジカードは車掌が販売している。"Orange Cards" are available from the conductor.
一番右側の車線は現在工事中である。The rightmost lane is now under construction.


車道の向こう側にあるバリケードは、「入れない」ということである。Barricades across driveways say "Keep Out."
氷のような冷気が車内に忍び込んできた。An icy chill stole into the car.


試運転では車両はみんなうまく動いた。All the vehicles behaved well on their test runs.

一輪車は車輪がひとつしかありません。A unicycle has only one wheel.
この大木で光がすっかりさえぎられている。The light is completely blocked out by the big tree.


がけくずれで交通は遮断された。Traffic was blocked by a landslide.
我々はしゃにむに突き進んだ。We pressed on, regardless.

「君はヘビが好きですか」「もちろん好きではありません」"Do you like snakes?" "Of course not."

この蛇口は使えません。故障しています。You can't use this faucet. It's out of order.




今の、ゼッタイなんか邪なこと考えてたでしょ。I just bet you were thinking something perverse just now.
彼は邪悪な行為のかどで罰せられた。He was punished for his evil acts.


邪険にしないで下さいよ！Please don't be cold!



お邪魔じゃないでしょうか。I hope I'm not disturbing you.
ロバートは安全委員会では邪魔者だ。Robert is the fifth wheel on the safety committee.

なした約束は払ってない借りである。A promise made is a debt unpaid.

この本をお借りしてもよろしいですか。May I borrow this book?２部屋あるアパートを借りたいのですが。I want to rent an apartment with two rooms.










この家はすぐ借り手が見つかるでしょう。This house will let easily.












彼は当日借り着をした。He rented the garment for the day.




英国人はたくさんの語をフランス語から借入した。The English have adopted many words from French.

本の借り方を教えて下さい。Please tell me how to take a book.




国際通貨基金は同国に対する新たな借款も認めませんでした。The IMF ruled out any new loans to that country.
君は借金を払うべきだ。You should pay your debts.

彼は借財がかさんでいた。His debts were piling up.






彼らは借入金が多すぎて、中小企業向け融資を受けられない。They are too far in debt to get the small business loan.
この語はフランス語から借用したものだ。This word was borrowed from French.






寸を与えれば尺を望む。Give him an inch and he will take a yard.

金銭は価値の尺度である。Money is the measure of worth.




灼熱の太陽で体が焦げるほどだった。The scorching sun grilled us.
彼は国への貢献を認められてナイト爵位を与えられた。He was awarded a knighthood in acknowledgement of his services to the nation.
夜どおしシャンペンが酌み交わされた。Champagne flowed all night.

彼を雇うときは、彼が若いのだということを酌量してやらねばならない。When you employ him, you must make allowances for his youth.


どうも釈然としない。I just don't feel satisfied.
警察は彼を釈放した。The police released him.
あなたはこの事態をどう釈明するのですか。How do you account for this situation?
この鉄の板はすずでメッキしてある。This iron sheet is coated with tin.

「彼女は若いですか」「はい」"Is she young?" "Yes, she is."

７０年もしくは８０年が人間の普通の寿命期間である。Seventy or eighty years is the normal span of a man's life.
公園のつつじの世話をする庭師が若干名いる。Several gardeners look after the azaleas in the park.
悲しいことに、彼女の息子は若死にした。Sad to say, her son died young.
若者達は本来、親の考えに対して反発するものだ。It is quite natural for young people to rebel against their parents.その歌手は若者たちのアイドルだ。That singer is a teenage idol.
その歌手は若手にとても人気がある。That singer is very popular with young people.
この若人に対してねたましく思う気持ちを、君はやむを得ないものと受け入れなければならない。You need to come to terms with your jealousy of this young man.





その運動をして若返った。The exercise took years off me.
５月になると木々は緑の若葉で覆われる。In May the trees have fresh leaves.

あなたがいなくなると友人が寂しがるでしょう。You'll be missed by your friends.


６月末に参加者を募ったら１週間弱で約５００席が予約でいっぱいになった。When participants were sought at the end of June all, about 500, seats were reserved in under a week.
それを言われると弱いなあ。That sure puts me on the spot.
彼は弱い者を愛し、助けた。He loved and helped weak people.




あらしの勢いが弱まった。The storm abated.
大きなかしわの木が風の力を弱めている。The big oak tree breaks the force of the wind.


彼は弱りきっていて、食欲がなかった。He was weak as a rat, and had no appetite.
弱り目に祟り目。Misfortunes never come singly.
駐禁で切符を切られた直後にＵターン禁止でつかまった。運が悪いというか、弱り目に祟り目というか。It wasn't my lucky day. First, I got a parking ticket and then things went from bad to worse when I got pulled over for making a U-turn.
彼は寄る年波で弱った。He sank under the weight of age.


５年に及ぶ、つらかったガンの治療期間中、彼は何とか弱音をはかず毅然とした態度を崩さなかった。Throughout the five years of painful cancer treatments, he managed to keep a stiff upper lip.


弱気が美人を得たためしがない。Faint heart never won fair lady.


思い切って聞き出せない、弱腰な僕。That's me - the coward unable to screw up his courage and find out the truth.



強者は弱者を助けなければならない。The strong must help the weak.





彼は弱虫扱いをされておこった。He resented being called a coward.


数学は彼女の弱点です。Mathematics is her weak point.





読書が彼のおもな楽しみだ。Reading is his chief amusement.

のろいはのろい主に返る。Curses, like chickens, come home to roost.
私の主たる関心事はあなたの身の安全なのです。My primary concern is your safety.
これらの手紙は主として母から来たものだ。These letters, in the main, are from my mother.
彼の病気は主に精神的な物だった。His illness was mainly psychological.





私は昨日チャーリーチャップリン主演の古い映画を見た。I saw an old film featuring Charlie Chaplin yesterday.






thatには、主格、目的格の２つしかなく、格による形の変化はない。'That' has only the two cases, nominative and objective, and it does not inflect depending on the case.
不定詞の形容詞的用法には２種類あり、（１）限定用法、（２）叙述用法。（２）はもちろん主格補語です。There are two ways of using the infinitive as an adjective, 1. attributive, 2. predicative. Naturally 2. is a subject complement.




いろいろ考えてみると私の主観ですが、プレゼントはどれだけ気持ちがこめられているかで価値がかわってくるのだと思います。All things considered, and it's just my opinion but, I think that the value of a present changes depending on how much thought is put into it.


彼の文章はとても主観的だ。His writing is very subjective.




それは私の主義に反する。That runs against my principles.









主権は人民にある。Sovereignty resides in the people.



市民は最高の主権者である。Citizens are the ultimate sovereigns.

英語の文構造は大抵、主語、動詞、目的語／補語だ。In English, the usual sentence structure is Subject - Verb - Object/Complement.


今日のパーティーは誰が主催なの？Who was in charge of today's party?
スペインは１９９２年のオリンピックの主催国です。Spain is the host country for the Olympics in 1992.
パーティーは主催者のスピーチで終わった。The party ended with a speech by the host.
第６条議長は全会議を主宰するものとする。Article 6. The president shall preside at all meetings.



大麦は我国の主産物である。Barley is our main product.


彼の主治医は全速力でやって来た。His doctor came with all speed.


彼はそのチームの主将になった。He was made captain of the team.




日本では米が主食です。The main diet in Japan is rice.



主人公は、本の最後で死んだ。The hero died at the end of the book.





恵子はクラスで首席だ。Keiko is at the head of her class.









主体・客体さえ訳せればあとはそこまで難しくないです。If you can translate the subject and object then after that it isn't so difficult.
学生は自分の主体性を見失ってはならない。A student should not lose sight of his own identity.
社長が社員の主体的な取り組みを促した。The president urged employees to act on their initiative.
私はこの主題に精通している。I am familiar with this subject.



私たちはその重要性を主張した。We insisted on its importance.







市当局は公害訴訟で主導権をとった。The city took the initiative in the pollution suit.




その問題は主任をひどく苦しめた。The problem tortured the chief.




彼は男が主犯ではないかとさえ思った。He even suspected that the man was the principal offender.


その新聞は新しい主筆のプロフィールを載せた。The paper published a profile of its new editor.
今夜の主賓に乾杯しよう。Let's toast the guest of honor!
主婦は節約に努めるべきである。A housewife should be economical.
「主部」とは、文の中の動作をする人・物で、日本語に直した場合に「〜は」「〜が」になる部分です。The "subject" is the person or object to carry out the action in the sentence. Transformed to Japanese it would be the part that end in "wa" or "ga".









ケイトは映画で主役を演じる機会を与えられました。Kate has been given an opportunity to play a major role in a movie.


日本の主要作物は米である。The main crop of Japan is rice.


上昇しすぎているとみられるときは、主要国の中央銀行が協力して介入に当たります。When it is seen to have risen too far, the central banks of major countries cooperate to intervene.

彼は主要点を点検した。He did a check on the quality.
ヨーロッパの主要都市の多くはドーナツ化現象に悩まされている。Many of Europe's metropolises are plagued by the doughnut phenomenon.


ユダヤ正統派の主流から外れた部分においては、黙示録はある種の運動に対して、より成功を収めたのである。Outside the mainstream of orthodox Judaism, the apocalyptic books were more successful with certain movements.












算数は数を取り扱う。Arithmetic deals with numbers.
彼は群衆に取り囲まれた。He was surrounded by the crowd.
彼は私と弟を取り違えた。He mistook me for my younger brother.
若さゆえに彼に対する告訴は取り下げられた。The charges against him were dropped because of his youth.

カーテンを取りはずして洗濯に出しなさい。Take down those curtains and send them to be cleaned.
彼は犬小屋作りに取りかかった。He went about making a doghouse.
音楽は空気のように我々の生活を取り巻いている。Music surrounds our lives like air.
お取り寄せいたしましょうか。Would you like me to order it?


彼はジョージから新聞を取り去った。He took the newspaper away from George.
１０時までに夕食の準備をしておくように取り計らいなさい。See that dinner is ready by ten.




もし雨になったら洗濯物を取り込んでね。If it rains, take the washing in.酸素は私たちが呼吸すると肺の中に取り込まれる。Oxygen is taken into our lungs when we breathe.

２、３人の生徒が取り残された。A few students were left behind.
ノルウェー人外交官が、歴史的文書を生んだ秘密交渉を取り持った。The Norwegian diplomat mediated the secret negotiations that produced the historic document.

もう一つの面白いエネルギー源は、放射能の廃棄物質から取り出せる熱である。Another interesting source of energy is the heat that can be recovered from radioactive waste material.適合率とは取り出した記事のうち、どの程度の記事が検索条件に合っているかを示す指標です。The precision ratio is an index that indicates how many articles meet the search criteria out of all of the articles retrieved.
私は庭から雑草を取り除いた。I rid the garden of the weeds.
ごめん、取り消すよ。I'm sorry. I take back my words.
彼女はガラスの花瓶を取り上げた。She picked up one of the glass vases.明日の会議では、新しい営業戦略を採り上げる予定です。In tomorrow's meeting, we're planning to adopt a new marketing strategy.このブログは情報インフラを中心としたトピックを取り上げています。This blog covers topics that centre on information infrastructure.
取り繕うように、笑ってみせる。She smiled to smooth things over.
そろそろ本気で仕事に取り組むころだよ。It is time you get down to work.
これを青いのと取り替えてください。Please change this for a blue one.彼らは欠陥テレビを新しいのと取りかえた。They replaced the defective TV with a new one.
事件の原因を取り調べるために実情調査委員会が作られた。A fact-finding committee was set up to determine the cause of the incident.

市は飲酒運転を非常に厳しく取り締まって、罰金を課している。The city is cracking down on drunk drivers and giving them fines.
私は彼女に取り入ってうまく秘密を聞き出した。I charmed a secret out of her.
洗濯物を中へ取り入れて下さい。Please bring in the washing.私達はいつも彼の忠告を取り入れるというわけではない。We do not always take his advice.
彼女は悪霊に取りつかれているように見える。She seems to be possessed by an evil spirit.妻は家を買いたい欲求に取りつかれている。My wife is possessed with the desire to buy a house.
メイドは客を一人一人大声でとりついた。The maid announced each guest.
彼は壁に本棚を取り付けた。He fixed the bookshelf to the wall.私はケネディ氏と会う約束をとりつけました。I have made an appointment with Mr Kennedy.
天真爛漫なところが彼の唯一の取り柄だな。Naivete is his only merit.
私は彼からお金を取り返した。I got the money back from him.
私たちは、失った時間を取り戻さなくてはならない。We must make up for lost time.
ボブは酷く取り乱していて、現実と虚構の区別がほとんど出来なかった。Bob was so beside himself that he could scarcely tell fact from fiction.
王は人民から税を厳しく取り立てた。The king exacted taxes from his people.

先生はノートを取ることの大切さを強調した。The teacher stressed the importance of taking notes.お皿に取ったものは全部食べなさい。You'd better eat everything that's on your plate.塩をとっていただけますか。Could you pass me the salt, please?
鋳物が金型からすっぽりとれた。The casting came cleanly out of its mold.しびれがとれるまで食事はしないでください。Don't eat till the numbness wears off.オリーブの実から油が取れます。Oil is extracted from olives.
私の望みは、世界中の人々がいつの日か手を取り合うことだ。My wish is that one day all the people in world will go hand in hand.

彼女は金融市場の取材を担当している。She covers Wall Street.
ウイリアムズ氏がその課を取り仕切っている。Mr Williams carries that section.


取締役会は業務執行に関する意思決定を目的としたものだ。The Board of Directors aim is to make decisions regarding business affairs of the company.
彼女は博士号を取得した。She received a doctor's degree.


守りを固めろ！来るぞ！Tighten the defences! They're coming!
彼は約束を守り抜いた。He stuck to his promise.
あなたは、自分の家族を守らなければならない。You have to protect your family.いったん約束したのであれば、守らなければならない。Once you have made a promise, you must keep it.
守衛にとがめられた。I was challenged by a gatekeeper.





こちらに来るように手で合図した。I made motions at him to come here with my hand.ここに手のないナベがある。Here is a pan without handles.いい手を思いついた。I hit upon a good idea.
書店で手に入ります。You can get it at a bookstore.
どうやってそのお金を手に入れたんですか。How did you come by the money?



彼女はナイフで手を切った。She cut her hand on a knife.彼はようやくそのおんなと手をきった。He finally broke up with that woman.
その生徒たちは皆手をたたいた。All the students clapped their hands.
それは定石通りというだけで、手を抜いたわけではないのです。That's just standard practise, it's not like they're cutting corners.
この手違いについて説明を要求します。I demand an explanation for this mistake.


彼は手加減をしない人です。He likes to play hardball with people.
私の手荷物は輸送中に紛失した。My baggage was lost in transit.


私は４年前からこの仕事を手がけています。I started doing this work 4 years ago.

食べるのにどうしてそんなに手間がかかるのか。Why do you take so long to eat?
「おはようございます。今日は遅かったですね」「うん。ちょっと手間取っちゃって」"Good morning. You're a bit late today, aren't you?" "Yes, I ran into a bit of trouble."


あいつは海千山千だから、取り引き相手としてはかなり手強いぞ。All those tricks he's got up his sleeve make him a formidable client.
彼は交渉させるには手づよい人です。He is a right person who can drive a hard bargain.
この部屋はとても手狭なので、もうこれ以上家具を置くのはむりだよ。This room is very small, so it is impossible to put more furniture in it.
今朝は髪の毛が撥ねてるんだ。せめて手鏡を貸してくれ、そこの引き出しにしまってあるだろ。My hair's messed up this morning. At least lend me a hand mirror - it should be shut in the drawer there.
いつも手近に辞書を持っていなさい。Always have your dictionary near at hand.
彼女はロープをたぐりながら登って行った。She climbed a rope hand over hand.
手形は来月１日が支払日になっている。The bill is due on the 1st of next month.
年来の経済病には手軽にきく万能薬などありません。There is no easy cure-all for old economic ills.
去年手芸コースを取っていたのです。I took a handicraft course last year.

私はいつも辞典を３冊手元に置いています。I always keep three dictionaries at hand.

クック船長はその原住民達の手厚いもてなしに感謝した。Captain Cook thanked the natives for their hospitality.




競馬の騎手は、レースが始まる前、はやる馬を抑えて、手綱を握りしめる。Before the horse race begins, the jockeys grip the reins tightly to restrain the impatient horses.


この辞書は大きさが手ごろだ。This dictionary is handy in size.値段が手ごろなら、その車を買いたい。If the price is reasonable, I want to buy the car.



手始めは、三大宗教の聖地、エルサレムを訪れることだった。For a start, I visited Jerusalem - a sacred place for three major religions.

ここにあなたあての手紙が何通かあります。Here are some letters for you.
手持ちのお金が少しあります。I have a little money with me.



転んで手首を痛めました。I fell down and hurt my wrist.
六十の手習い。It is never too late to learn.
手術をしなければなりません。You have to have an operation.
彼女を手術室に運んでくれ。Take her to surgery.
Windows XPにはＣＤを焼く機能があるそうですが、その手順を解説しているページを教えてください。I hear that you can burn CDs with Windows XP; could you tell me a website that explains the procedures involved?
手初めにこれをやってみましょう。Let's do this as a first step.
我々は手紙を手書きにしているので、時間が余計にかかる。We're eating up a lot of time writing letters by hand.
私の仕事には手助けがいる。I need some help with my work.
彼女は僕に中へはいるよう手招きした。She beckoned me to come in.




抗議することもできないうちに、僕は手錠をかけられ、留置場に送られていた。Before I could protest, I was handcuffed and was on my way to prison.
このスカーフは手触りが柔らかくてすべすべしている。This scarf feels soft and smooth.


わずか３６ヶ月後に、ココは１８４語にあたる手振りを使うことができた。After only 36 months, Koko could use 184 signs.

この為替を作るのに銀行の手数料が５０ドルかかった。Arranging this money order cost $50 in bank fees and commissions.
これらは彼女の手製のケーキです。These are cakes of her baking.

マックスは手先が器用だ。Max is clever with his fingers.あいつの手先じゃない。I don't live in his pocket.
婦人用手洗いはどこですか。Where is the ladies' room?
手前のガラス張りの建物は薔薇園なんです。温室になっていて、いつも薔薇を観賞できるようになってるんですよ。The glass fronted building before you is the rose garden. It's a greenhouse so you will always be able to appreciate the roses.あの信号の手前で降ろしてください。Please let me off on this side of that traffic light.自分の直感が、いかに確かなものか自慢した手前、当てがはずれた時は首をやらなければならなくなった。Having boasted how sure his hunches were, he was forced to eat his hat when he guessed wrong.



占い師に手相を見せました。A fortune-teller read my hand.
手足がむくんでいます。My hands and legs are swollen.
この手袋は両方がそろっていない。Their gloves are not in pairs.
彼らは手探りで進み続けた。They kept on feeling their way.
全ての手段が試みられたわけではない。Every means has not been tried.
手後れにならないうちに、必要な措置を取るべきです。We should take the necessary steps before it's too late.

家を購入してからいろいろ手直しをしてきた。We have made numerous improvements to our house since we bought it.

彼女は手提げから何かを取り出した。She took something out of the bag.
４年間は彼は最初の値段で芝を刈ってくれたが、その年の終わりに彼はしょっちゅう手伝いを連れていることに気がついた。For four years, he cut the grass at the original price, but I noticed that toward the end of that year, he had a helper with him quite often.台所でお母さんの手伝いをしていたの。I helped my mother in the kitchen.

いつでもお手伝いします。I am always ready to help you.

彼女は私に１枚の紙を手渡した。She handed me a sheet of paper.
手当たり次第に買物をするのはやめたほうがいいですよ。You had better stop buying things at random.
コンピューターのキーボードの操作は、手動タイプライターほど努力を要しない。The operation of a computer keyboard requires less effort than that of a manual typewriter.
あなたに庭の手入れを手伝って頂きたいのですが。I would like you to assist me with my gardening.本店は警察の手入れを受けた。The main office was raided by the police.
何とか手配してあげましょう。Let's try to arrange something.
聴衆は音楽に合わせて手拍子を打った。The audience kept time to the music.

夏の旅行の手はずはついていると父はほのめかした。My father implied our summer trip was arranged.

少年はたくさんの手品が使える。The boy knows many magic tricks.
手品師はごまかしを使う。Magicians use deception.

医学生が手分けして勉強することはまれである。Shared studying among premeds is rare.
悪人でも手柄は認めてやれ。Give credit where credit is due.
このセーターは手編みです。This sweater is made by hand.
その指輪を手放すな。You must not part with the ring.
彼の手法は全く驚くべきものだった。His technique was absolutely amazing.
彼の行儀をお手本にしなさい。Model your manners on his.

島を出る手だてはありません。There's no way off the island.
君の手料理がきっと恋しくなると思うよ。I'll miss your cooking.

１９７２年に、フランシーヌ・パターソン博士はココに手話を教え始めた。In 1972, Dr. Francine Patterson started to teach sign language to Koko.
製品販売には天才的手腕が必要なときもある。Selling products sometimes requires having a stroke of genius.














朱肉をお借りしてもよろしいですか。May I use your ink pad?








男たちはライオン狩りに出かけた。The men went hunting for lions.


世界で、鹿やムースやキジといった野性獣を狩ることは違法とする国が多い。In many parts of the world it is illegal to shoot wild game such as deer, moose or pheasant.
男は狩人で、女はその獲物である。Man is the hunter, woman is his game.
こうした熊独特の特徴が、熊が動かずに狩猟すること（アザラシの呼吸孔の脇でじっと動かず、アザラシが海面に上がってくるのを待つ）を好む説明になっている。These special characteristics explain its preference for still-hunting (lying motionless beside a seal's breathing hole, waiting for one to surface).




６種の道具がひとまとまりになっている。A half-dozen tools make up the tool collection.１つの種が絶滅するたびに、我々は自然界の一部を永久に失うことになる。Every time a species dies out, we lose forever a part of our natural world.
蒔かぬ種は生えない。You must sow before you can reap.そんなことをすれば笑いものの種なるよ。If you do that, you're going to subject yourself to ridicule.
例えばジャック・パインの松かさは、高温により影響を受けるまでは自ら開いて種子を放出しない。The cones of the jack pine, for example, do not readily open to release their seeds until they have been subjected to great heat.
その島には未開種族がいる。There are still some savage tribes on that island.虎は消滅しかかっている種族である。The tiger is a vanishing species.



彼女はあまりにも多くの種目に参加して、どれにも勝てなかった。She went in for too many events, and so won none.
動物園にはたくさんの種類の動物がいる。There are many kinds of animals in the zoo.破壊の結果、毎日５０種類もの野生の動植物が消滅していると見積もられている。It has been estimated that, as a result of the destruction, fifty species of wildlife are disappearing from the earth each day.

扁桃腺がはれている気がするのですが。I'm afraid my tonsils are swollen.
歯痛のために彼の顔ははれあがった。The toothache made his face swell up.


胃に腫瘍ができたので切ってもらった。I got a stomach tumor and had to have it operated on.
それは、いくぶんナンセンスな趣きの楽しさがあった。It was a delightful bit of nonsense.彼の最新作は趣を異にする。His latest work belongs to a different category.趣を説明することはできない。There is no accounting for tastes.

彼のスピーチの主旨を教えてください。Tell me the substance of his speech.医者は私の父がまもなくよくなるだろうという趣旨のことを言った。The doctor spoke to the effect that my father would soon get better.
趣味については話しましたか？Did you talk about your hobby?
僕は酒も煙草もやらないんだ。I neither drink nor smoke.
夫はたまに御酒をたしなみます。My husband enjoys his glass once in a while.


私は酒屋でビールを一本買った。I bought a bottle of beer at the liquor store.
酒気帯び運転をするな。Don't drive under the influence of alcohol.


たった一センチで酔っ払いますか！健介は酒豪だったと言うのに。You get drunk on just one centimeter? And Kensuke was such a heavy drinker.


彼はその酒場で歯医者に成りすましていた。He posed as a dentist at that bar.


うちが援助してる酒造さんがね、新しい甘酒を造ったから試飲してみてくださいって持ってきてくれたんだけど。A brewery we finance has made a new sweet sake and brought some to us asking us to try it.



この店では酒類は売っていない。Liquor is not sold at this store.
彼はメアリーにすっかり首ったけだ。He's head over heels in love with Mary.
私は使用人の一人をくびにした。I discharged one of my servants.



お着きになるのを首を長くしてお待ちしておりました。I've been looking forward to your arrival.
彼の首筋を血がすっと伝った。A trickle of blood ran down his neck.

彼女は高価な首飾りをしています。She is wearing an expensive necklace.
首相の留守中は外務大臣が代理を務める。The foreign minister will act for the Prime Minister in his absence.


泥棒にロープを十分に与えれば、彼は首吊りをするであろう。Give a thief enough rope and he'll hang himself.
東京は日本の首都です。Tokyo is the capital of Japan.
首都圏でも燃料が不足している。There's a fuel shortage even in the Tokyo area.
７カ国の首脳がその会議に出席した。The top leaders of seven countries attended the meeting.
首脳会談のことは世界中で放映される予定だ。The summit talks are to be broadcast around the globe.

彼女の考えは首尾一貫している。She is consistent in her opinions.



彼らは彼をその殺人事件の首謀者だと考えた。They regarded him as the ringleader of the murder case.
犬は首輪をすり抜けた。The dog slipped his collar.








このグループに存在する儒教的価値観を強調したい。I would like to emphasize the Confucian values that exist within this group.




彼はかろうじて試験に受かった。He barely passed the examination.
６５歳以上の人たちは政府から年金を受けている。People 65 and above get a pension from the government.立ち退きの予告を受けた。We received an eviction notice.喜んでお申し出をお受けします。We gladly accept your offer.
彼はその財産を受け継ぐ資格はない。He has no claim to the property.

・・・はぁ、どう状況を受け止めればいいのかしら。... Aaah, just how am I supposed to cope with this I wonder?
この病院では、各看護婦は５人の患者の看護を受け持っている。In this hospital each nurse attends five patients.
この贈り物は受け取れません。I cannot accept this gift.彼女は私の言葉を侮辱と受け取ったようだ。She seems to have taken my remark as an insult.
彼は彼らの受け入れ方接待のしかたが気にいらないのだ。He is displeased with their way of reception.
このホテルは犬は受け入れない。This hotel does not take dogs.
それは受け売りだろう？You are telling it second hand, aren't you?
後になってテストを提出しても、受け付けられません。If you turn in a test late, it will not be accepted.
あいつにはまいったよ。どんなに厳しく怒っても、柳に風と受け流すだけだよ。I don't know what to do with that guy. No matter how mad I get at him he just takes it in stride and pays no attention.
日本はガット自由貿易体制における最大の受益者の一つだったということができる。Japan has been one of the greatest beneficiaries of the free trade system under the GATT regime.


受験したが失敗するだけだった。I sat the exam only to fail it.
受験地獄での戦いが終わりました。My fight in our examination hell is over!
学生はこれらの英語コースの中から１つを受講する。Students will take one of these English courses.
お受け取りくださって幸いに存じます。It was gracious of you to accept.

１９９５年、安藤氏は建築におけるもっとも権威ある賞を受賞した。In 1995, Andou received architecture's most prestigious award.
ノーベル賞受賞者湯川博士は１９８１年に死去した。Dr. Yukawa, the Nobel prize winner, died in 1981.
この地区では三局受信できます。We can get three stations in this area.




どうしてそんなに受け身的なのか。仕返ししてはどうだ。How can you be so passive? Why don't you retaliate?




この工場ではテレビ受像機を製造しています。They are manufacturing TV sets in this factory.

乙が受託業務の実施により得た成果は、甲乙双方に帰属するものとする。Any result obtained through the execution of the Commissioned Business shall belong to each party hereto.


彼は申し出を受諾することが賢明だと考えた。He deemed it wise to accept the offer.



ジョンソンの研究では受動喫煙が非常に有害であることが明確に示されている。It is clearly shown in Johnson's investigation that passive smoking is very harmful.
テレビを見ることは受動的活動である。Watching TV is a passive activity.

受付係の態度が急にかわった。The receptionist changed her tune.



招待を受理したのに、彼は来なかった。Having accepted the invitation, he failed to show up.

彼は急いで受話器を置いた。He put the phone down in haste.
のろいはのろい主に返る。Curses, like chickens, come home to roost.

全人類の罪のために俺達は呪われる。For all man's sins damned we shall be.

呪術は未開社会においては重要な役割をもつ。Magic plays an important part in primitive society.

「なんて言ってるの？」「祝詞も知らないのか？」「祝詞？」「神道の呪文のようなもん」"What is she saying?" "You don't even know 'norito'?" "Norito?" "It's something like a Shinto spell."







これらの発見のおかげで人間の寿命が以前の２倍になった。Thanks to these discoveries, man's life span has become twice as long as before.作動温度が高いと、潤滑剤の寿命は短くなる。High operating temperatures shorten lubricant life.


妻が早産で１５００グラムの女の子を授かった。My wife gave birth prematurely to a 1,500-gram baby girl.そのピアニストは非凡な才能を授かっている。The pianist is endowed with extraordinary talent.フランクス陸軍大将がナイト爵位の名誉称号を授かりました。General Franks received an honorary knighthood.
聖霊がある方の上に下って、その上にとどまられるのが見えたなら、その方こそ聖霊によってバプテスマを授ける方である。The man on whom you see the Spirit come down and remain is he who will baptize with the Holy Spirit.
それは授業の終わりだった。That was the end of the class.

授業料は本月２５日限り納付の事。Tuition fees must be paid not later than the 25th of this month.


彼女が授賞する見込みは十分にある。She stands a good chance of winning the prize.

学校はメアリーに賞を授与した。The school awarded Mary a prize.

樹皮からエキスを抽出する。Extract an essence from the bark of a tree.
きれいな樹氷を見せてあげたいものです。I wish I could show you the pretty ice on the trees.
果実がなる樹木は、成長するための空間がかなり必要だ。Fruit trees require a large amount of space in which to grow.
イギリス人は１６０９年アメリカに植民地を樹立した。The English established colonies in America in 1609.
この木はあの木と同じ樹齢だ。This tree is the same age as that one.
需給関係が緩和している。The supply-demand balance is relaxing.

価格は需要を反映する。The price reflects the demand.

１０人の囚人たちが脱獄した。Ten prisoners broke out of jail.

彼は外務大臣に収まった。He was established as Foreign Minister.最後にはうまく収まるだろう。It'll come right in the end.凝った彫刻のしてある鞘に収まった長剣。A longsword sheathed in an intricately engraved scabbard.
その投資は現在６％の収益を彼にもたらしている。The investment now yields him 6%.
私たちはみな収穫の手伝いをした。We all helped with the harvest.

もうじきリンゴの収穫期になる。The apple harvest will soon come.
真珠の収穫高は少なかった。The harvest of pearls was small.









アメリカでは多くの夫婦が収支をあわせるため共稼ぎをしている。Many couples in America both work to make ends meet.

事態は収拾に向かいつつある。The situation is gradually moving towards a resolution.
瞳は日のあたる所では収縮する。The pupils of the eyes contract in sunlight.







大地震の発生から、応急対策の収束までの避難の流れです。We are interested in the flow of evacuation events from the occurrence of a large earthquake to the conclusion of emergency countermeasures.



収入以上の生活をするな。Do not live above your income.

この仕事が私の収入源です。This job is my bread and butter.

アンディーは自分のシャツを収納室に掛けた。Andy hung his shirt up in the closet.




このホテルは５００人の客を収容できる。This hotel can accommodate 500 guests.あの教会施設は避難民を収容している。That church organization takes in refugees.




このホールは２千人の収容能力がある。This hall is capable of holding 2,000 people.



除草剤耐性品種でなぜ収量が増えるのか？Why do yields increase with herbicide-resistant varieties?
完成した本のコピーを１部送っていただくという条件で、私どものソフトウエアを収録することを許可します。You have our permission to include our software on condition that you send us a copy of the final product.
収賄スキャンダルは海外で激しい反発を生みました。The bribery scandal created a backlash overseas.


その衛星は地球の軌道を１０周した。The satellite made 10 orbits of the earth.
生活のしかたを周囲の状況に合わせたらどうだい。Why don't you adapt your way of life to circumstances?この木は周囲３メートルある。This tree measures three meters around.

















天才がその存命中に名をなすことはめったにないということは周知の事実である。It is a matter of common knowledge that a man of genius is seldom successful in his own lifetime.

その理論は周到な研究に基づいている。The theory is based on thorough research.
今年タイ航空は５０周年記念を祝います。Thai Air celebrates its 50th anniversary this year.

周波数の平均値は振幅の増大にしたがって減じる。The mean value of the frequency decreases with increasing amplitude.



北極圏とは北極周辺の地域の事である。The Arctic is the area round the North Pole.









手始めは、三大宗教の聖地、エルサレムを訪れることだった。For a start, I visited Jerusalem - a sacred place for three major religions.
あの宗教団体はかなりいかがわしい教義にとりつかれている。That religious cult has got some pretty off the wall ideas.









ついては、私の手紙のコピーを添付いたします。I am sending a copy of my letter to you.
つきましてはカタログを郵送してください。Would you please send me a catalogue by mail?
友人の好意で職に就くことができた。I was able to get a job through the good offices of my friend.１６０３年、ジェームズ一世が政権の座についたとき、フットボールは再び許可されたのです。In 1603, when King James I came into power, football was allowed again.私たちは家路についた。We set out for home.
君が職に就けるといいんだが。I should be glad if you got the job.
就学前の子供は入場無料です。Admission is free for preschool children.





もう就業時間です。仕事にとりかかりましょう。It's time to work now. Let's get down to business.





なぜ就職を断られたのか。Why was I turned down for the job?


議員に就職口の世話を頼んでみたが鼻であしらわれた。I asked my local member for a job, but he brushed me off.


近頃は就職難だ。Nowadays jobs are hard to come by.
７時に鳴るように目覚しを掛けた後で、彼女は就寝した。She went to bed, having set the alarm for seven.

彼は大統領に就任した。He was inaugurated as President.




ストライキとは従業員の集団が一体となって就労を拒否することです。A strike is a mass refusal to work by a body of employees.
南部の州へ冬期に旅行すると、今旅行するよりも料金が高くなります。Traveling to the southern states during the winter will be costlier than it is now.





彼はすべての科目で、とりわけ数学で、良い成績を修めた。He did well in all subjects and, above all, in mathematics.





たいていの学生は修学旅行で京都を見物する。Most students do the sights of Kyoto on their school excursion.





彼は法学修士の学位を得た。He got a master's degree in law.

その巻末には修辞学と論理学の技法についての２編の短い大要があり、後者はソクラテス式論争方の見本で結ばれていた。The end of which there were two little sketches of rhetoric and logic, the latter finishing with a specimen of a dispute in the Socratic method.

名詞を修飾するものは、形容詞または形容詞相当語句です。Things that modify nouns are adjectives or equivalent to adjectives.
「修飾語」は、その名前のとおり、文を飾る役目をします。A "modifier" has, just as it sounds, the role of embellishing sentences.



失礼ですが御提案を修正させていただきます。I beg to modify your proposal.



この椅子は修繕する必要がある。This chair is in want of repair.


近隣の家は壊れたが、自宅は少しの修繕費ですんだ。The neighbouring house was destroyed, but mine survived just a bit of cost for repair.


当時は修道僧達が修道院でよくテニスをしていた。Monks used to play tennis in monasteries.
当時は修道僧達が修道院でよくテニスをしていた。Monks used to play tennis in monasteries.


修道士のように頭巾をかぶった雲は、ポツリポツリと落ちる雨を数珠のようにつまぐっている。The hooded clouds, like friars, tell their beads in drops of rain.
マザー・テレサはインドのカルカッタに住んで働いていたカトリックの修道女であった。Mother Teresa was a Catholic nun who lived and worked in Calcutta, India.



その城は修復され市民に公開されている。The castle has been restored and is open to the public.







その車は修理する価値がない。The car isn't worth repairing.
知り合いの修理屋さんに電話して壊れた洗濯機をすぐさま直してもらうわ。I'll call a repairman I know who'll be at your house to fix the washing machine promptly.
修理工はエンジンを組み立てた。The mechanic assembled the engine.
修理代は少なくとも二〇ポンドはかかりそうだ。The repairs will cost at least 20 pounds.
クッキーの家は修理中だ。Cookie's house is under repair.
私は高校の全課程を修了した。I completed the whole high school curriculum.



彼が永眠したという知らせを受けましてまことに御愁傷さまです。I heard the news of his death with deep regret.

彼らは木の実を拾い集めている。They are gathering nuts.

ジェイはその古いはさみを拾い上げた。Jay picked up the old scissors.

床からペンを拾って下さい。Please pick up the pen from the floor.この財布はどこで拾ったのですか。Where did you find this wallet?ホテルの前で私を車で拾ってください。Please pick me up by car in front of the hotel.


その選手はあらゆるスポーツに秀でていた。The athlete excelled in all kinds of sports.

エジソンは秀才ではなかった。Edison was not a bright student.

秋には木の葉が落ちる。Leaves fall in the autumn.






秋風が立ち初める。An autumn breeze begins to blow.

秋分の日は、今年は金曜日に当たります。Autumn Equinox Day falls on Friday this year.

その仕事をもう終えましたか。Are you through with the work?
終演は何時ですか。What time does the curtain fall?


人生の終局的な大きな目的は知識を獲得することではなくて行動することである。The great end of life is not knowledge but action.
戦争は多くの犠牲者を出して終結した。The war ended with many victims.
前の会社では何でも屋に終始したので今度は専門職に就きたい。I wore several hats at my last office so I'd like to specialize this time.私服警官が終始大統領の身辺を固めていた。The private detectives accompanied the President everywhere.


移住者の部落が野蛮人によって征服され、移住者の希望も生活も土壇場にきた時、長い歳月をかけての不幸とのたたかいに終止符がうたれた。Years of resistance to misfortune ended when the settlers' village was overcome by the savages and their hopes and lives came to the bitter end.


その男は終身刑に処せられた。The man was given a life sentence.

彼は終戦直後に出獄した。He was released from prison immediately after the war.


その会社の株の昨日の終値は９３２円だった。This company's stock closed at 932 yen yesterday.

この線の終点はどこですか。Where is the end of this line?
彼は終電に乗り遅れたのかもしれない。He may have missed the last train.
僕たちは、きわどいところで終電車に間に合った。We were only just in time for the last train.
１月１４日（火曜日）のＤＴＡ終日技術会議には、１８社、３２人が出席しました。The all-day DTA Technical meeting on Tuesday Jan 14 was attended by 32 people from 18 DTA firms.
これが原因でタイムを大きくロスしてしまい、もしかしたら、このアクシデントがなかったら、レース終盤はもっと良くなっていただろう。Due to this a lot of time was lost, it's possible that if it wasn't for this accident the final stage of the race would have been better.




トムは勤務終了時間を超えて働くと、５割アップの時給をもらっていた。Tom got time and a half when he worked beyond his usual quitting time.

栄枯盛衰は世の習い。A man's life has its ups and downs.
車の運転を習っています。I've been learning to drive.

彼はたばこを吸う習慣をやめた。He got out of the habit of smoking.その習慣は中国で始まった。The custom originated in China.


彼はフランス語に習熟しようとした。He tried to master French.
清潔は日本人の習性だ。Cleanliness is proper to the Japanese.

「汗でびしょ濡れだよ」「離れてっ。臭いわっ！」"I'm soaked with sweat." "Step back. You stink!"あいつが臭い。He looks suspicious.








憲法の規定に従い衆院の議決が参院に優越する。Under the Constitution, the lower chamber's resolutions override those of the upper chamber.
衆議院の少数派の議席は、急速にむしばまれてきています。The number of minority seats in the Lower House is rapidly eroding.




強盗が彼女にそこで襲いかかった。The robbers fell on her there.

奇妙な病気が町を襲った。A curious disease struck the town.小泉氏が総理大臣として森氏の後を襲った。Mr Koizumi succeeded Mr Mori as prime minister.
彼はそこで反徒の襲撃を受けた。He was attacked there by the rebels.





けってドアを開けるな。Don't kick the door open.彼は私たちの要求をきっぱりとけった。He rejected our demand flatly.

敵を蹴散らし、凱旋した俺はみなにこう呼ばれるんだ！Having scattered the enemy before me and triumphantly returned, this is how they would herald me.

ごめん！蹴飛ばすつもりじゃなかったんだ。I'm so sorry. I didn't mean to kick you.
それはその前の週に買ったものでした。I had bought it the week before.


ここに週刊誌が１冊あります。Here is a weekly magazine.
もう２週間たったら帰ります。I will be back in another two weeks.

あなたは週末に何をしましたか。What did you do on the weekend?

すべての野獣が集う。The wild beasts all gather.
私達は先生の前に集まった。We gathered around the teacher.
趣味は切手を集めることです。My hobby is collecting stamps.
捨てられたアイスのまわりにアリがウヨウヨたかっていた。The area around the melting ice cream was crawling with ants.彼は働かないで親類にたかることばかり考えている。He doesn't work, but only thinks of sponging off his relatives.

集会は７時に解散した。The meeting broke up at seven.



当社はアンケート入力、アンケート集計のお手伝いをする少数精鋭のベンチャーです。Our company is a small but elect venture business that assists in entry and totalling of questionnaires.



隊長は部下に直ちに集合するように命令した。The captain ordered his men to gather at once.


科学は単に事実と方法論の集積では決してない。Science is far more than a collection of facts and methods.

君はいまやエリート集団の一員だ。You are now among the elite.

私は読書に集中していた。I was concentrating on reading.彼の仕事の大半が都市部に集中している。The bulk of his work is in the urban area.


晴雨に関わらず、郵便集配人は郵便を配達する。Rain or shine, the postman delivers the mail.
資本集約産業は必ずしも知識集約産業ではない。Capital-intensive industries are not necessarily knowledge-intensive industries.

「美しい」とか「醜い」といった言葉は相対的な用語である。The words 'beautiful' and 'ugly' are relative terms.オレの醜い部分がオレを引き裂く。The ugly side of myself tears me up.
市のこの地区の建物は皆醜悪だ。The architecture in this part of the city is ugly.

ブ男の兄で悪かったな。Well, excuse me for being an ugly-ass brother.
そのコラムニストは古い醜聞を蒸し返した。The columnist raked up some old gossip.






言葉は人となって、私たちの間に住まわれた。The word became flesh and lived for a while among us.



残飯の屑は害虫の住処になる。Garbage harbors vermin.

彼は住み心地がよい小さな家に住んでいます。He lives in a little cozy house.
我々は横町の住み心地のよい小さな家に住んでいる。We live in a cozy little house on a side street.

数年後、ヨーロッパ人たちは沿岸の植民地に住み着いた。Years later, Europeans established colonies in the coastal areas.

あなたはどのくらいの間、神戸に住んでいますか。How long have you lived in Kobe?



あなたの名前と住所を記入しなさい。Fill in your name and address.
古い住所録で偶然、彼の電話番号を見せた。I ran across his telephone number in an old address book of mine.

その町の住人は全滅した。The population of the town was wiped out.



どちらかといえば木造住宅に住みたい。I'd rather live in a wooden house.
昨日、閑静な住宅街にある猫のひたいほどの売り地を見つかって、すぐ買うことに決めた。Yesterday, I found a tiny piece of land for sale in a quiet residential area and I immediately decided to buy it.

町は工場地区と住宅地区に分けられた。The town was zoned for factories and residences.

外国人労働者の流入が、この地域で深刻な住宅難を引き起こした。The influx of foreign workers has caused a serious housing problem in this area.
ウェストハンプトン州住民によって、議会の構成員として選出されるのです。We're chosen by the people of Westhamptonshire County to be members of the council.



彼はその金を借金の返済に充てた。He applied the money to the payment of debts.


あなたの左目は充血していますよ。Your left eye is congested.

ここ品物は高いけど、その分アフターサービスが充実してるから。Prices are high here but that's because the after-sale service is really good.
彼らは空席を任命で充足した。They filled the vacancy by appointment.

この電池は充電されている。This battery is charged.

その金は負債の支払いに充当することになっている。The money is to be applied to the debt.


プラモ作りは家でやってくださいよ。ラッカー液の臭い、充満してるじゃないですか。Please do your model building at home! The room's full of the smell of lacquer.

私達は全部で十一名です。We are eleven in all.
スピーチコンテストは１１月９日に行われた。The speech contest took place on the ninth of November.








私は１９７２年１０月１０日に生まれました。I was born on October 10, 1972.

１１時１５分前を少し過ぎています。It is a little after a quarter to eleven.





教会は地図の上では十字架で表されている。Churches are designated on the map with crosses.









その事故はある十字路で起こった。The accident happened at a crossroads.







英国は、１９７１年にその貨幣制度を１０進法に移行させた。In 1971 the United Kingdom changed its currency to the decimal system.




十中八九彼らは列車に乗り遅れるだろう。Ten to one they'll miss the train.


再来月は１２月だ。The month after next is December.







彼は自分の役割を十二分に生かしていますよ。He's living his role to the hilt.
３月１０日までに予約を再確認して下さい。Please reconfirm the reservation by March 10.会議は１０日後です。The meeting is ten days away.






いいえ、一日に十分も進むんです。No, it gains ten minutes a day.
私はこの本を買うのに十分なお金を持っている。I have enough money to buy this book.「もっと召し上がりますか」「いいえ、じゅうぶんいただきました」"Would you like any more?" "No, I've had enough."
サンフランシスコの人口は、ニューヨークのわずか１０分の１に過ぎない。San Francisco is only one-tenth as populous as New York.
２本の道が十文字に交差している。The two roads cut across the street from us.

タバコ一箱は二十本入りです。Each package contains a score of cigarettes.
あの大名は十万石を領している。That daimyo holds a fief yielding 100,000 koku of rice.





善良な市民は法律に従う。A good citizen obeys the laws.
可算名詞か不可算名詞かどちらかを従えている表現を2つ書け。Write two expressions that are followed by either count or non-count nouns in conversation.
したがって、すべての政治的理想の中で、人々を幸せにさせるものがもっとも危険であると言うことができる。Hence one can say that, of all political ideals, that of making people happy is the most dangerous.

従業員たちは超過勤務をするのに異議を唱えた。The employees demurred at working overtime.


スミスさん一家は私たちのいとこです。The Smiths are our cousins.
私には弁護士のいとこがいる。I have a cousin who is a lawyer.

彼の従姉妹は、名前は忘れたが、看護婦だった。His cousin, whose name I forget, was a nurse.
私はエイズの研究に従事している。I am engaged in AIDS research.
英雄も従者にはただの人。No man is a hero to his valet.
子供は親に従属している。Children are subject to their parents' rules.

私は従弟から１０００円借りた。I borrowed 1,000 yen from my cousin.
警察は従犯者を探した。The police hunted for an accessory.


彼は従来の習慣と違ったことをした。He departed from the old custom.



柔道では力より技のほうが大切である。In judo, technique is more important than strength.
骨格たくましい体格なので彼は柔道家でとおっている。With his muscular constitution he passes for a judoist.


考え方は柔軟でなければならない。You must be flexible in your thinking.

柔軟性の欠如は進歩の障害となる。Lack of flexibility is an obstacle to one's progress.
柔和な答は怒りをしりぞける。A soft answer turneth away wrath.
彼女は御茶にレモンの汁をたらした。She dropped lemon juice into her tea.

僕的にはもっと地味ってか渋い服が欲しいんですけどね。For my tastes, I'd prefer plainer, or rather, more tasteful clothing.まず目に飛び込んできたのは、大きなソファだ。渋い色の革張りで、座面も背もたれもゆったりしている。The first thing that came to my attention was the large sofa. It was covered in sober-coloured leather, and the seat and the back both looked wide and comfortable.
役員達はそんな危険な事業に乗り出すのをしぶった。The directors were reluctant to undertake so risky a venture.

渋滞で遅れました。I was delayed by a traffic jam.

世界で、鹿やムースやキジといった野性獣を狩ることは違法とする国が多い。In many parts of the world it is illegal to shoot wild game such as deer, moose or pheasant.
彼女は成長して獣医になった。She grew up to be a veterinarian.


テーブルを縦一列に並べなさい。Put the tables end to end.









体積が大きいからといって常に重量も重いとは限らない。Great bulk does not always mean great weight.前途に苦難があるという思いで彼の心は重かった。A sense of trouble ahead oppressed his spirits.私はそんな重い責任を引き受けたくない。I don't like to take on such heavy responsibilities.


その箱は重たくて運べません。The box is too heavy to carry.

私の誕生日とあなたの誕生日が、偶然重なる。My birthday coincides with yours.


机の上には漫画本が重ねてあった。The comic books were piled on the desk.彼は悪事を重ねた。He committed one crime after another.


穂木を台木に差し込む際、形成層を重ね合わせるようにします。When inserting the budwood into the root stock, make the cambium layers overlap.






たいていの女性は流行を重んじる。Most women make much of fashion.


彼はかなりの重圧にあえいでいる。He is under considerable stress.
















言葉は消え去っても、打撃はおもくるしく残る。Words may pass but blows fall heavy.

重工業はいつも戦争で利益を得る。Heavy industry always benefits from war.







人生においてお金を重視する人もいる。Some people place a lot more emphasis on the importance of money in life.














ウイスキーには重税が課せられていた。A heavy tax was imposed on whiskey.

彼は重責を解かれた。He was relieved of his heavy responsibility.





彼は重大な発見をした。He made an important discovery.

彼らはその光景を重大視した。They made much of what they saw.



このショーではロボットに重点がおかれている。In this show, the accent is on robots.








そのような行いをすれば違反者は重罰を受けるだろう。Such conduct would subject the offender to a heavy penalty.
新聞に「重版出来」と広告した。It was advertised as a second edition in the newspapers.
彼は重病だと言われている。They say that he is seriously ill.






この重役のポストに適当な人物を見つけるには、人材斡旋業者に依頼する必要がある。We'll need a head hunting agency to find the right man for this executive position.
昨日の重役会は大成功だった。Yesterday's board meeting was a ten-strike!



その結び目を守るのは重要なことだ。Maintaining that tie is important.

その議論を彼は重要視した。The argument weighed with him.
私たちはその重要性を主張した。We insisted on its importance.
奈良は、国宝や重要文化財が豊富である。Nara is rich in National Treasures and Important Cultural Assets.



体積が大きいからといって常に重量も重いとは限らない。Great bulk does not always mean great weight.






月の重力は地球の６分の１である。The gravity of the moon is one-sixth of that of the earth.
赤ちゃんを育てるのは重労働です。Bringing up a baby is hard work.
警察は簡単に銃を使ってはいけない。Police can't be trigger happy.
指揮官は部下を銃火にさらした。The commander exposed his men to gunfire.
銃器メーカーは小火器による暴力事件に対する責任を逃れてきた。Gun makers have been able to escape responsibility for firearm violence.




その銃声に我々はあっと驚いた。We are astonished at the shot.
銃弾が胸を貫通し、彼は危篤状態に陥った。The bullet penetrated his chest, leaving him in critical condition.


宿の主人は召使い達にがなりたてた。The landlord barked at his servants.






正直者に神宿る。Honesty is the best policy.

宿屋といってもまるで丸太小屋のようだった。The inn was no better than a log cabin.



今日は宿題が無い。I have no homework today.
今夜は彼が宿直です。He is on night duty tonight.

６人宿泊させて欲しい。We need accommodation for six.
宿泊先を教えてください。Let me know where you're staying.

洪水はかつてはこの地方には宿命であった。Previously, floods were fate for the region.
その婦人の態度はしとやかだ。The lady has a graceful manner.
彼女はどこから見てもイギリスの淑女だ。She's every bit an English lady.

私は彼の卒業祝いに電報を打った。I wired him a message of congratulation on his graduation.

今年タイ航空は５０周年記念を祝います。Thai Air celebrates its 50th anniversary this year.
満ち足りた心は永遠の祝宴である。A contented mind is a perpetual feast.




「なんて言ってるの？」「祝詞も知らないのか？」「祝詞？」「神道の呪文のようなもん」"What is she saying?" "You don't even know 'norito'?" "Norito?" "It's something like a Shinto spell."
そのめでたいときに当たり彼は祝辞を述べた。He offered his congratulations on the happy occasion.
私はその祝典に出席できなかった。I could not attend the ceremony.
彼は私に祝電を打ってきた。He telegraphed me his congratulations.

その日は国会の法令によって祝日になった。That day was made a holiday by an act of the diet.
これまでがんばったことに対して、新しい家での最初の祝杯をあげた。In honor of all the hard work we raised a toast to our first day in our new home!
私たちは彼の成功を祝福した。We congratulated him on his success.司祭は幸せな二人の結婚を祝福した。The priest blessed the marriage of the happy couple.彼は私に「神の祝福がありますように」と言った。He prayed that God would bless me.



セーターが洗濯で縮んだ。My sweater shrank in the wash.


パーマをかけたので、髪の毛が縮れています。Now I have curly hair, because I had a perm.


テキサス州の、縮尺25万分の1の地図が欲しいんですよ。I want a map of Texas on a scale of 1 to 250000.
縮小コピーを撮ってくるよ。I'm going to make reduced copies.










学生のひとりによれば、中国では今なお粛清が行われ、恐怖政治が横行しているとのことです。One student says the purge is still going on in China and terror is widespread.


あの子を無理に塾に通わせるのは反対だね。I'm against us forcing the child to go to cram school.

ぶどうがだんだん熟してきた。The grapes are getting mature.
まだそのためには機が熟していないと思う。I'm afraid the time is not yet ripe for it.
早熟れの早腐り。Soon ripe, soon rotten.
できるだけたくさん熟語を暗記しなさい。Learn as many idioms as possible by heart.
その新しい方法は熟考に値する。The new method is well worth consideration.

彼女が熟睡しているのを確かめて、彼はこっそり部屋を抜け出して行った。After making sure she was sound asleep, he crept out of the room and set off.
ワインはたるの中に入れて熟成させる。Wine is put in casks to age.
２、３年でフランス語に熟達するのはきわめて難しい。It's quite difficult to master French in 2 or 3 years.


決まり文句は便利だ、熟慮の必要がないのだから。A formula is very convenient, because you need not think about it.

彼はそのゲームに熟練していた。He was an old hand at the game.

我々はニューヨークで彼らに出くわした。We came upon them in New York.
私をだしにして彼らは大笑いをした。They had great fun at my expense.
だしに使われるのはごめんだ。I don't want to be made a cat's paw.


その件については我々はみんなのアイデアを出し合って、もっといい案を出した方が良い。We'd better brainstorm about it together and get a better idea.








気を付けないと彼女に出し抜かれるよ。She'll get the better of you if you aren't careful.
彼は出し抜けに私に結婚してくれといった。All of a sudden, he proposed to me.
来月の歌舞伎座の出し物はなんですか。What is the program of the Kabuki for next month?


お金がいくらか必要なら銀行から出してもよい。You can withdraw some money out of the bank, if you need any.この件では名前を出したくない。I want to remain anonymous in this.答案を出す前にもう一度読み返しなさい。Read over your paper before you hand it in.

さらに、横から見ると、前歯は出っ歯の状態にあります。Moreover, when viewed from the side, the front teeth are protruding.



私の家におばけが出たのは本当だ。It's true that a ghost appeared at my house.電話には出なかったからメールしておきました。He didn't answer the phone, so I left him an email.アメリカの学生の中には苦労して働きながら大学を出る者が多い。Many American students work their way through university.


我々は丸一ヶ月間、ブロードウェーで出演予定です。We're booked for the whole month on Broadway.
その映画の出演者はほとんどアメリカ人であった。The movie was cast mostly with Americans.


出火のときはそのボタンを押してください。In case of fire, push the button.
物には時節、番茶も出花。There is a time for all things.
品物は昨日出荷されました。The goods were sent out yesterday.




私たちの出会いはまったくの偶然でした。Our meeting was quite accidental.

外国製品がどかっと市場に出回った。Foreign products arrived on the market in large quantities.





いつお出かけになりますか。When will you go out?


１つ１つの出願を１件ずつ考慮しなければならないだろう。We will have to consider each application on a case-by-case basis.









朝食前に出勤するなんていかにも彼らしい。It is characteristic of him to go to work before breakfast.










出迎えにきてくださってありがとう。Thank you for coming to meet me.
ジェーンを出迎える事はわくわくします。It is exciting to welcome Jane.
わが戦闘機の延べ出撃機数は平均１日４３０機であった。Our fighters averaged 430 missions a day.

２、３時間出血が続きます。You'll have bleeding for a few hours.





そうした高層ビルが出現する前は、町の全ての建物が相互に特別な関係を持って建っていたのである。Before the arrival of this skyscraper, all the buildings in the city stood in special relationship to each other.


B2出口から地上に出てください。Go up to ground level at exit B2.

私はその会社に出向中だ。I'm on loan to the firm.
私がそこに出向く必要がありますか。Is there any need for me to go there?
巨大なタンカーがついに今し方出港した。The huge tanker has just left the dock.


その船は出航しようとしている。The ship is about to set sail.

彼は終戦直後に出獄した。He was released from prison immediately after the war.





彼女は健康な赤ん坊を出産しました。She gave birth to a healthy baby.




寝不足の影響がではじめた。Lack of sleep began to tell on me.

私達は同社に５０％出資している。We have a 50% interest in the company.





日曜日に出社したので月曜日が代休だった。I worked on Sunday, so I had Monday off.






２０チームがトーナメントに出場した。Twenty teams entered the tournament.



私は東京出身です。I'm from Tokyo.彼女は神戸大学の出身です。She graduated from Kobe University.

合格者の過半数は大学出身者であった。The majority of the successful candidates were university graduates.ニックは地方出身者ならだれであろうと見下している。Nick looks down on anyone who comes from a rural area.
どの学生も名前と出身地を聞かれた。Every student was asked his or her name and birthplace.




もちろん私は自らの努力で出世するべきだという考えに賛成です。Obviously I agree that you should advance in life through your own efforts.








彼は出生地は確かにイタリアだと誓った。He said under oath that his birthplace was Italy.


委員は全員出席している。The committee are all present.
会の出席者は多かった。The meeting was well attended.

出席率はどうでした？How was the attendance?







ボタンを押すだけで出窓はあく。You have only to push the button to open the bay window.




どういった時事が公務員試験で出題されるのか。What sort of current affairs appear in the civil service examination?
彼はでたらめな約束をして彼女を誘惑した。He seduced her with false promises.彼は本棚に本をでたらめに入れた。He put the books on the shelf out of order.


ロス出張をキャンセルしようかな。I should cancel my L.A. trip.








心機一転して出直すのが一番だね。You'll have to turn over a new leaf.

彼女は出廷したとき、王冠のようなものをかぶっていた。When she appeared in court, she was wearing a sort of crown.

確かに、Ｍａｎｋｉｎｄ　Ｑｕａｒｔｅｒｌｙ誌は出典として頼るにはもっとも奇妙なものである。Surely the most curious of sources consulted is Mankind Quarterly.
彼女のギャラリーに２点ほど出展するのよ。I'm going to have two pieces in her gallery.

勧工場には約２０の出店が並んだ。There was a row of about 20 stalls at the fair.



彼は法廷へ出頭を命じられた。He was summoned to appear in court.君は、すぐ警察に出頭しなくてはならない。You have to report to the police at once.
その反乱を鎮圧するために軍隊の出動が要請された。The army was called to suppress the revolt.

彼の図書室への出入が許可されている。I have access to his library.
そのドアから台所へ出入りできる。The door gives access to the kitchen.


彼はそう言ったがそれは出任せに決まっている。He must have said so without giving it much thought.



彼は大統領選挙に出馬しないことに決めた。He chose not to run for the presidential election.
すぐに出発した方がいいですよ。You had better depart at once.

その船はまさに出帆しようとしている。The ship is about to set sail.
ついにその本を出版した。We finally published the book.














金をためるには出費を切りつめないと。We must cut our expenses to save money.
トムが出品した絵は皆入賞した。Tom got prizes for all the pictures he sent to the exhibition.










彼女は夜にひとりで出歩くべきではない。She shouldn't go out by herself at night.


かつてこの海域には海賊がよく出没していた。Pirates once appeared frequently in this area of the sea.







新聞に「重版出来」と広告した。It was advertised as a second edition in the newspapers.
全般的にみてまあまあの出来だった。He hasn't done badly, all in all.
そこのお店の息子さんが、今度この土地の女の子と出来ちゃった結婚をすることになってる。Well the son of that shop's family, seems it's come about that he's to have a shot-gun wedding with a local girl.
申し訳ないけど長居できないんですよ。I'm sorry, I can't stay long.「論文できましたか」「いや、残念ですが、まだ書き終えていません」"Is the essay ready?" "No, I'm sorry. I haven't finished writing it yet."あのサッカーボールは本物の革でできている。That football is made of genuine leather.
できるだけ多くの本を読みなさい。Read as many books as you can.
私はできる限りあなたの援助をします。I'll help you as much as I can.

この小説は作家の最高の出来栄えを示しているようだと思う。I think this novel shows the author at his best.

株価が史上最高に上昇する中、記録的な出来高となった。A record number of shares changed hands in busy trading as prices soared to a historic high.
出来高払いでやっています。We are doing business at piecework payment basis.


このようのしてその出来事は起こった。This is how the incident happened.
あなたの用意が出来次第出発しましょう。We'll leave as soon as you are ready.


このドレスはいつ頃、できあがりますか。How soon can you have this dress ready?
彼は出来心で盗みをした。He fell prey to an impulse to steal.

料理人が多すぎるとスープができそこなう。Too many cooks spoil the broth.



二人の道連れと一緒に出立した。I started with two traveling companions.

ディスプレイはモニタともいい、コンピュータなどの機器から出力される静止画または動画の映像信号を表示する機器である。A display, aka monitor, is an appliance that displays video signal of still images and moving pictures produced by a computer or similar device.


先頭打者がヒットで出塁した。The first batter up got a base hit.




ボクシングは、打たれずに打つ術だと定義されている。Boxing has been defined as the art of hitting without being hit.
今となっては事の真相を知るすべもない。At this distance we cannot hope to know the truth.

この前の講和会議で完全に失敗してから、彼は斬新な権謀術策で十分に武装すべきことを学んだ。His utter failure at the last peace conference has taught him to arm himself to the teeth with new tricks and tactics.
私は客に別れのあいさつを述べた。I bade farewell to the guests.


「述部」とは、動作を表す部分で、最後が「〜だ」「〜する」などになる部分です。The "predicate" is that part that shows the action in the sentence. In Japanese it would be the part that ends in "da", "suru", etc.













「事実」と「意見」を峻別するということは重要なことだと思います。I think to clearly distinguish opinion from fact is important.
多くの植物は春に花をつける。Many plants bloom in the spring.







春休みはどれくらいの期間ですか。How long is your spring vacation?


１月と言うのに春先のような暖かさだ。Though it's now January, it's warm like early spring.







星が空に瞬いていた。The stars were twinkling in the sky.
この瞬間は歴史に記録されるだろう。This moment will be recorded in history.


コンピューターは、非常に複雑な仕事を瞬時にすることができる。Computers are capable of doing very complicated work in a split second.







血液は体内を循環する。Blood circulates through the body.
イチゴは今が旬です。Strawberries are in season now.





















そのチームは準決勝に勝って決勝に進出した。The team won the semifinals and advanced to the finals.








準備ができるまでちょっと待ってくれ。Hang on a bit until I'm ready.

人生のそれぞれの時期は、それ自体独立したものであるとともに、次の時期のために準備期間でもある。Each stage of life is a preparation for the next as well as a complete life in itself.

米国連邦準備銀行は銀行の取り付け騒ぎを食い止めようとしています。The Fed is trying to stave off a run on the banks.





ポールの髪には潤いがない。Paul has dry hair.犬は確かに家庭に何か潤いを与えているね。Man's best friend certainly makes a good addition to a household.

長くお風呂に入っていたら手がふやけてしまった。My hands became swollen up while taking a long bath.

彼女は目をうるませて、そこにじっとすわっていた。She sat there silently with tears in her eyes.
お茶は仕事をスムーズに運ばせるための潤滑油のようなもの。Tea is like the lubricating oil of work to allow it to proceed smoothly.
盾の両面を見よ。Look on both sides of the shield.



その小さな像は純金でできていると言われている。The small statue is said to be made of fine gold.
ゆりの白さは純潔の象徴だ。The whiteness of the lily is a symbol of purity.

君って、意外に純情だね。I'm surprised that you're so naïve.
彼女の純真げなそぶりは見せかけで本物ではない。Her air of innocence is apparent, not real.
純粋に、ミクシィユーザーが言うところの「変な人」ってどんな人なのか、私にはいまいちわからないのだ。It's simply that I don't really understand what an "oddball" is when said by a Mixi user.

これは純正の英語とは違った文体だ。This is a writing style different from genuine English.






このセーターは純毛でできている。The sweater is made of pure wool.
あの人と巡り会えたのは、一期一会なのでしょうか。Our meeting like that is probably the kind of thing that only happens once.

我々は太陽を巡るすべての惑星を探検するだろう。We will explore every planet that goes around the sun.春がまためぐってきた。Spring has come around.国会の動きはこの問題をめぐる与野党間の政治的綱引きとなった。Parliamentary activity has become a political tug of war between the ruling and opposition parties over the issue.

巡査はいつものように夜間の巡回中だった。The policeman was on his usual nightly round.



すぐに巡査が呼びにやられた。A policeman was sent for at once.






校則は、順守すべきだ。You should observe the school rules.



見出し語はアルファベット順に並んでいます。The entry words are arranged alphabetically.
少年たちは順々にしゃべった。All the boys spoke each in turn.
少年達はみんな順にしゃべった。All the boys spoke, each in turn.

当日雨天の場合は順延となります。If it rains on that day, the game will be postponed until the next fine day.
若者は変化にたやすく順応する。The young adapt to change easily.





まずご両親に話してみるのが順序というものだろう。First of all, you should talk it over with your parents.



すべてが順調にいっている。Everything is going very well.
私たちは彼の順番をわざと飛ばした。We skipped his turn on purpose.
会社の経営があまりにも順風満帆で、かえって恐いぐらいだ。The company is running so well, it's unnerving.


チャールズ１世は断頭台で処刑された。Charles I had his head cut off.



私たちは必要な処置を講じた。We took the necessary measures.
この規則を破った人は厳しい処罰を免ぜられない。Anyone who breaks this rule is liable to severe punishment.
私たちはその土地を処分しなければならない。We have to dispose of the land.
医者は患者に薬を処方した。The physician prescribed his patient some medicine.
あなたはあの車をどう処理したのですか？What did you do with that car?

彼らはエベレストに初登頂した。They made first ascent of Mount Everest.
旅行の初めの二日間は雨降りだった。The first two days of my trip were rainy.会うは別れの始め。To meet is to part.この語学センターでは、英語をはじめ世界１５か国の外国語が学べる。At this language centre, about 15 international languages are taught, including English.
１６歳の時、初めてテニスをした。When I was sixteen, I played tennis for the first time.しかし、抗議を通して初めて自由で開かれた社会が維持されるのである。Only through protest can a free and open society be maintained.







子供の初期の教育はふつう家庭で始まる。Early education for children usually begins at home.

初期設定のまま使ってるの？Are you using the default settings?





この辞書は初級者に、いやそれどころか上級者にも役に立つ。This dictionary is useful to beginners, yes, and to advanced learners.
初詣、ご利益があるのはどこの神社？New Year shrine visit; which shrines are potent?


初志を貫徹したらどうですか。Why don't you carry out what you've set out to do?

初耳ですね。This is the first time I heard about it.

初秋の頃のほど、その平原が美しく見えるときはない。At no time does the plain look so perfect as in early autumn.





初心を貫徹したらどうですか。Why don't you carry out what you've set out to do?
このテキストは初心者向きにできている。This text is aimed at beginners.
まもなく初雪が降った。The first snow came before long.
「カイちゃんよー、お姉ちゃんはスゴク悲しいよー。こんなことで人生初体験だよ」「え？」「夜・逃・げ」"Kai dear! I'm really sad! Having my first experience in this way." "Eh?" "Skip-ping-town."初体験の相手は、年上の女性だった。My first sexual experience was with a woman some years older than I was.
初対面の時、彼は偉そうな態度を取っていると思った。When I first met him, I thought he was putting on airs.
それはアメリカの初代大統領にちなんで名づけられた。It was named after the first American president.


初潮は13歳の時でした。I had my first period when I was 13 years old.



事実、海は今世紀の初頭よりすでに10cmも上昇しているのである。In fact, the sea has already risen 10 centimeters since the beginning of this century.
初日から番狂わせが多かった。There were many upsets right from the first day.




初版は１０年前に出版された。The first edition was published ten years ago.
裁判官は、それが初犯であることを考慮に入れた。The judge took into consideration the fact that it was his first offense.



かいつまんで話せば、彼は初恋の人と結婚したのだ。To make a long story short, he married his first love.
「夫は２年前に亡くなりました」と初老の女性は言った。"My husband passed on two years ago," an elderly lady said.
さあ、今汲みなさい。そして宴会の世話役の所に持っていきなさい。Now draw some out and take it to the master of the banquet.「そのうちに、あなたのところにお邪魔してもいいですか」「どうぞ、どうぞ」"Do you mind if I call on you sometime?" "No, not at all."驚かない所をみると知ってたのね。Seeing that you're not surprised, I think you must have known.
「ところでよ、そのおめーのお父さんはどこにいんのさ？」「横転したトラックの下なんよ」"By the way, where's your old man?" "Under that over-turned truck."ぶつくさ言ったところでしょうがない。Complaining won't change anything.
その祭りはつまらないどころではありませんでした。The festival was far from dull.


これがいわゆる「天ぷら」というものです。This is what we call "tempura".
いったんポストに入れたものは、郵便局の所轄になる。Once a thing is posted, it is in the care of the Post Office.
彼女は戦争について所感を述べた。She expressed her sentiments on the war.
いったんポストに入れたものは、郵便局の所管となる。Once a thing is posted, it is in the care of the Post Office.
彼はその本に関していくつかの所見を述べた。He made a few remarks on the book.
その書類は何年も所在が分からなくなっていたが、不思議にも先日出てきた。Missing for years, the document miraculously came to light the other day.
会社は税金上の目的で本社所在地を香港に移した。The company moved its corporate domicile to Hong Kong for tax purposes.

これは私達自信の創造活動の所産です。This is a product of our own creative activity.
海外へ行くのならパスポートの所持が必要です。If you are going abroad, it's necessary to have a passport.

全部所持品です。They are all my personal belongings.


時間はあなたの好きなように過ごせばいい。所詮、あなたの時間なのだから。You can spend your time in any way you want; it's your time, after all.
私はどのクラブにも所属していない。I don't belong to any club.

所長が出かけている間、事務所の責任者は誰になるのですか。Who is in charge of the office while the boss is away?
私たちは所定の場所で会った。We met at the designated spot.
給与が増えるに比例して、所得税率もあがっていく。The income tax rate increases in proportion as your salary rises.
所得税は控除額を上回るいかなる所得にもかかる。An income tax is levied on any income that exceeds deductions.

この土地は池田氏の所有だ。This land belongs to Mr Ikeda.
ジョンはその絵の所有権を主張した。John laid claim to the painting.
この家の所有者は山田さんだ。This house belongs to Mr Yamada.

この土地は私の所有物だ。This land is my property.


この夏最高の暑さだ。It is the hottest this summer.

その暑さで気絶して、気がついたら救命いかだの中にいた。I fainted from the heat, and when I came to, I was in a life raft.

昨夜は暑くるしかった。It was sultry last night.



渚に人が群がっていた。There were flocks of people on the beach.

庶民はまるで羊のように独裁者の後ろにしたがった。The people followed the dictator like so many sheep.

彼の庶民的な経歴は前任者のそれと似ている。His humble background parallels that of his predecessor.

彼女は庶務課に所属している。She is attached to the general affairs section.
勝って兜の緒を締めよ。You must keep up your guard even after a victory.


この手紙には署名がない。This letter bears no signature.







スペイン語の書き言葉は、ほんのいくらかわかるが、スペイン語の話し言葉ときたら、ちんぷんかんぷんだ。I can understand written Spanish just a little, but spoken Spanish is Greek to me.
日付は自分で書き込みなさい。Write in the date yourself.

この書類を書き写すとき一語もおとすことのないように気をつけなさい。In copying this paper, be careful not to leave out any words.
旅の恥はかきすて。A man away from home need feel no shame.
それを書き取るだけでよい。All you have to do is write it down.

１ます空けて書き出しなさい。Begin to write, leaving one space blank.

数行、手紙を書き送ります。I'll drop you a few lines.
彼はその物語を子供向けに書き直した。He adapted the story for children.
ジェーンは申込書に必要事項を書き入れた。Jane filled out an application.

その美観は筆では書き表せない。The beauty of the sight is beyond description.
彼女は自分の意見を紙に書きつけた。She put down her thoughts on paper.

私なんぞには野牛と鹿と馬とを描き分けることなど到底出来ない。Me? I can't even begin to draw buffalo, deer and horses so you can tell them apart.

彼は私に詩の書き方を教えてくれた。He taught me how to write a poem.
新聞はその事件を盛んに書き立てた。The newspapers devoted a lot of space to the affair.

私は彼の電話番号を書き留めた。I wrote down his phone number.
ここにあなたの名前をかいてくれませんか。Would you please write your name here?

書架の本は１冊残らず全部読みました。I have read every book on the shelf.


われわれの討議は書記によって記録される。The records of our discussions are kept by the secretary.


このドアは書斎に通じている。This door leads to the study.


この書式はやや複雑そうだ。書きこむのを手伝ってくれ。This form looks kind of complicated. Help me fill it out.


ここのところ書籍の価格が上がっている。The price of books is getting higher these days.

これらの本を書棚へ戻しなさい。Carry these books back to the bookshelf.
書店で手に入ります。You can get it at a bookstore.
書道を習うのは楽しい。Learning calligraphy is fun.
その書評者はその小説に鋭く批判的である。The reviewer is sharply critical of the novel.
私たちは、書物から楽しみを得ることができる。We can derive pleasure from books.

彼は私が今、その書名を思い出せない本について述べた。He mentioned a book the title of which I can't remember now.
書面でお申し込み下さい。Apply in writing.

この手紙を書類にしてもらいたい。I want this letter registered.
諸設備の費用は払っていただきます。You have to pay for utilities.

私は諸君のすべてを知っているわけではない。I don't know every one of you.諸君、ちょっと御挨拶申し上げます。Gentlemen, allow me to say a few words in greeting.



日本は石油をアラブ諸国に頼っている。Japan relies on Arab countries for oil.





スペインは昔フィリピン諸島統治していた。Spain once governed the Philippine Islands.

多くの国々が経済の分野で困難な諸問題を抱えている。Many countries are having difficulties in the economic sphere.


もう助からないものと観念した。I gave up all hope of survival.
けがした男は大声で助けを求めた。The injured man cried for help.
彼は助けてと大声をあげた。He gave a loud cry for help.
彼は池で溺れそうになっている子どもを助けた。He saved a child from drowning in a pond.私は老婦人が通りを渡るのを助けた。I helped an old woman across the street.教育は人格の形成を助ける。Education helps to mold character.

女の子達はみんなお互いに助け合った。All the girls helped each other.


私たちは写真家が子供をまず助け出さなかったといって非難した。We criticized the photographer for not rescuing the child first.

私が質問に答えられないでいると、彼が助け舟を出してくれた。When I didn't know how to answer the question, he gave me a hint.

彼女はアカデミー賞の最優秀助演女優にノミネートされた。She won an Oscar nomination for best supporting actress.



私は教授です、いやもっと正確に言えば、助教授です。I'm a professor, or rather an associate professor, to be exact.







中国語においては「テンス」を表す場合には上述のように「助詞」か「時を表す語」または文脈によるものが多い。When indicating 'tense' in Chinese, as shown above, there are 'particles', 'time-specifying words' and also many cases where it depends on context.

私は助手を探している。I am looking for an assistant.



彼のプロジェクトは助成金でまかなわれていた。His project was funded by grants.



この文は現在完了形です。haveは動詞ではなく、助動詞。This sentence is in the present perfect. 'have' is not a verb, but an auxiliary verb.


あの人達の助力はあてにできないよ。You can't count on their help.






やがてジェラシーは叙事詩の１ページを飾り。Jealousy embellishes a page of the epic.



私は叙事詩よりも叙情詩の方が好きだ。I like lyric better than epic.


彼が戻ってきた時には、女は歩み去っていた。When he came back, the woman had walked off.


その女の子達は、とても忙しい。Those girls are very busy.
今、女の人が１人入っていきましたよ。A woman is going into it now.
スージーには女らしさがほとんどなかった。Susie wasn't very feminine.


女王は豪華な服装をしていた。The queen was richly appareled.

女王陛下万歳！God save the Queen.
彼女は、女学生がやるように、手を口にあてて笑った。She laughed the way schoolgirls do, with her hand over her mouth.







コブ女史が帰ってくる日が待ち遠しいよ。ほんとに。I'm looking forward to the day when Miss Cobb comes back, I can tell you.
このクラスには１５人の男子と２８人の女子がいる。This class consists of 15 boys and 28 girls.
彼は女子高で教えている。He teaches in a girls' high school.
私は日本の女子高生です。I am a Japanese high school girl.




ローマ人は彼らの女神であるジューノを崇拝した。The Romans worshiped their goddess, Juno.

彼は自分の選んだ女人と結婚した。He married a girl of his own choice.

その少女は大きくなってすらりとした女性になった。The girl has grown into a slender woman.


彼女は女性差別撤廃を主張した。She advocated equal rights for women.


その店では女性用の高価なアクセサリーを売っている。The shop sells expensive accessories for women.


女装しているエドを想像してごらんよ。Can't you just picture Ed in woman's disguise?


その劇で彼女は女中と女店員との二役を努めた。In the play she doubled the parts of a maid and shop girl.

なんか・・・女湯から悲鳴が聞こえてくるんだけど。Say ... I can hear screams coming from the women's bath.


女房の手は店員さんより一回り小さい。My wife's hands are slightly smaller than the shop assistant's.
その女優はせりふを台なしにした。The actress murdered her lines.









彼はその戯曲にすばらしい序文を書いた。He wrote a fine preface to the play.




車に徐行するようにと合図した。I signaled the car to go slow.

そろそろ寝る時間だぞ。It's time you went to bed.

鋤は鋤と呼べ。Call a spade a spade.農家の人達は鋤で土を耕す。Farmers turn up the soil with plows.
一人を除いて全員が彼の計画に賛成した。All except one agreed to his plan.
医者は彼の苦痛を除いてやった。The doctor released him from his pain.発音の点を除けば、みんな上手なフランス語を話す。Except for pronunciation, everyone can speak good French.
このデータは除外した方がいい。正確というには程とおいものだ。We should leave out this data. It's far from accurate.

我々はあらかじめすべての危険を除去しようとした。We tried to eliminate all danger beforehand.



彼らは通りを除雪した。They cleared the streets of snow.
このとき除雪車は確かに私たちの英雄でした。At that time the snow plow was certainly our hero.

これらの植物は除草剤に抵抗力がある。These plants are resistant to weed killers.




彼はその会から除名された。He was excluded from the society.




母は傷口にばんそうこうをつけてくれた。Mom applied the plaster to the cut.

彼は失恋のために傷心した。He was heartbroken from unrequited love.



他人を傷つけることはよくない。It is bad to hurt others.彼の感情を傷つけるのを恐れて、本当の事を言わなかった。Afraid of hurting his feelings, I didn't tell him the truth.
その店では傷物の値段を４０パーセント下げた。They marked the damaged goods down by 40%.





この次に償いをするよ。I will make up for it next time.
彼はどうやって損失を償うのだろうか。How will he make good the loss?
国債の償還は、国民の平均所得の減少を意味することになるでしょう。Paying the national debt could mean reducing the average income.






勝ち抜いていけるよう幸運を祈るよ。Best of luck in your tournament.

こんな一流選手が相手では勝ち目がない。We have no chance against those top players.
この病気に勝てる人は少ない。Not many survive this disease.

彼はその選挙に勝算がある。He has the election under his belt.
群集は勝者に拍手喝采を送った。The crowd gave the winner a big hand.
いつまでもぶつくさ言っているのは君の勝手だけどね、それじゃあ事態は何一つ変わらないよ。You can complain 'til the cows come home, but it's not going to make a bit of difference.君もこの手の仕事は初めてなんだろう？勝手がわかるまではマニュアル通りにやっておいたほうがいいよ。It's your first time doing this kind of work. You should follow the manual exactly until you get more experience.
書類は勝手にいじられた形跡があった。The documents were tampered with.

勝敗は問題ではない。It doesn't matter whether you win or not.
ゆっくりでも着実にやってゆけば勝負には勝つ。Slow and steady wins the race.ボブはスケートではきみといい勝負だ。Bob is a good match for you in skating.
勝利を確信している。We're confident of our victory.
群集は勝利者を歓呼して迎えた。The crowd hailed the winner.


灯火をますの下にかくすな。Hide not your light under a bushel.チェッカー盤の黒と白の枡は交互に並んでいる。The black and white squares on a checker board are arranged alternately.






ここで召し上がりますか、それともお持ち帰りですか。Is this to eat here, or to go?







洒落たお帽子をお召しになっていらっしゃいますね。That's a stylish hat you are wearing.お風呂をお召しください。Please take a bath.お祖父さまはお風邪を召していらっしゃいます。Grandfather has caught a cold.
彼は証言をするために召喚された。He was called to give evidence.


大使はワルシャワから召還された。The ambassador was recalled from Warsaw.
彼は１９４２年８月に召集された。He was called up in August, 1942.







彼はあの店で野菜を商いしています。He deals in vegetables at that shop.
あの商人は絹織物を商う。The merchant deals in silk goods.














英語は商業において役に立つ。English is useful in commerce.
肥大化、過度の商業化などの問題も抱えて、五輪は新世紀に向かう。Despite the problems of excessive commercialization, etc. the Olympics will go forward into the new century.







私はハリウッド映画の商業主義に懸念を抱かずにはいられない。I cannot help but be concerned about the commercialism of Hollywood movies.




















彼女は鋭い商才の持ち主だ。She is a lady of business acumen.


彼女は商事会社に勤めている。She is employed in a trading company.
ニューヨークにはたくさんの商社がある。There are many commercial firms in New York.
トニーは重要な商取引をするためにボストンへ行った。Tony went to Boston for the purpose of carrying out an important business transaction.

海賊は武装していない商船を餌食にした。Larger pirates often preyed on unarmed merchant ships.





商談に入る前に、少し雑談でもしましょう。Shall we shoot the breeze for a while before talking business?
この地域は商店が多い。There are many stores in this area.
近くに商店街がありますよ。There is a shopping area nearby.
地元の店は観光客相手に順調な商売をしている。Local shops do good business with tourists.




３０過ぎての商売替えは大変だからしたくないのですけれどね。Well it's very difficult changing jobs after you're thirty so I don't really want to do it.
商売敵は仲が悪い。Two of a trade seldom agree.

商売柄いつもネクタイを締めなければならない。I always have to wear a tie because of my job.


食料品と衣類の陳列台にある商品は非常に安かった。Goods at the food and clothing stalls were very cheap.

お金を与えると言う考えを好まない人にとっては、商品券はいい考えである。For people who dislike the idea of giving money, a gift certificate is a good idea.



彼女は例の金のインチキ証券商法に引っかかり持ち金のほとんどを失ってしまった。She was taken in by that fake gold certificate scandal and lost most of her money.


商務省の報告によれば、先月の小売り販売は０．７％増加しましたが、これはもっぱら好調な自動車販売によるものです。The Commerce Department reports retail sales rose seven-tenths of 1 percent last month mainly thanks to strong auto sales.
彼は商用でニューヨークへ行った。He went to New York on business.







彼は減税を唱えた。He advocated reduction of taxes.


彼はその奨学金に応募した。He applied for the scholarship.

人々はフットボールをするように奨励さえされたのです。People were even encouraged to play football.




まだ宵の口だ。The night is still young.

彼は、将官に、昇進した。He was advanced to the rank of general.
いつ来てくださっても、将棋の相手をしますよ。No matter when you come, I'll play a game of Japanese chess with you.


将軍は私たちと握手をした。The general shook hands with us.
その将校は彼らの復讐を恐れているようだった。The officer seemed to be afraid of their revenge.

これを将来使えるように取っておこう。I'll keep this for future use.
この仕事には将来性がない。There is no future in this job.


その机はメグには小さすぎる。The desk is too small for Meg.

こぢんまりと商売していた男は失敗した。そして彼の商売は完全に駄目になった。The small business man failed and his business went down for the count.



昨日は小雨だった。There was a light rain yesterday.

遠くに小屋が見えた。I saw a cottage in the distance.
合衆国には小火器の販売に関する法律上の制約はほとんどない。There are few legal constraints on the sale of firearms in the U.S.
彼は小学４年生です。He is in fourth grade of elementary school.
あなたは小学校に通っているの？Do you go to an elementary school?
彼らはそのころ小学生でした。They were school children then.





国境問題での小競り合いから重大な国際紛争へと広がりました。A small border dispute ballooned into a major international incident.
小金に賢く大金に愚か。Penny wise, pound foolish.






あなたは時には妹さんにおこづかいをあげますか。Do you sometimes give your sister money?

私が他の子供たちに言った小言はお前には当てはまらないよ。The scolding I gave to the other children doesn't apply to you.奥さんのがみがみ小言にフレッドさんは大弱りの体であった。Fred was very troubled by his wife's nagging.



私たちの学校は小高い丘の上にあります。Our school stands on a hill.
その帝国はすべての小国を併合した。The empire absorbed all the small states.

それらの小作農は、米を作る土地をとても必要としている。Those peasants badly need land to grow rice.


あいつは小山の大将だった。He was the cock of the walk.
小指がはれました。My little finger is swollen.
小枝で火はおこせますか。Can you build a fire with twigs?
彼は五歳の時に小児麻痺にかかった。He was struck with polio when he was five.





私たちは小船でその川を渡った。We went down the river in a small boat.





かぜには大食、熱には小食。Feed a cold and starve a fever.



５歳未満の小人は、入場料は要りません。There is no admission fee for children under five.



小生のレポートをご高覧に供したいと思います。I would like to submit my report for your perusal.
少年は犬をめがけて小石を投げつけた。The boy threw a stone at the dog.
この小切手を現金にしてくれますか。Can you cash this check for me?
懐かしい１２小節のブルース。There go the twelve bars blues.
事実は小説よりも奇なり。Fact is stranger than fiction.トムは小説を読んでいる。Tom is reading a novel.
彼は、詩人ではなくて小説家だ。He is not a poet but a novelist.
みんなクリスマスに小雪がちらつくのを望んでいた。Everyone hoped for a snow flurry for Christmas.
小川がさらさらと流れる音が聞こえる。We can hear a brook murmuring.
私は小銭の持ち合わせがない。I have no small change on me.彼は就寝前にポケットから小銭を取り出して、テーブルの上にどさっと置く。Before retiring he usually dumps the chicken feed from all his pockets onto the table.
また僕をかつごうとしているのかい、このいたずら小僧め。Are you going to play tricks on me again, you naughty boy?門前の小僧習わぬ経を読む。A saint's maid quotes Latin.
ったくケイコちゃんって可愛いんだか小憎らしいんだか・・・。Sheesh, that Keiko - she's cute or she's hateful, just can't make her out.


浅草小町と呼ばれたものだ。She used to be called the Belle of Asakusa.
小鳥たちはたのしそうにさえずっています。The birds are singing merrily.

我々の船はその小島に近づいた。Our boat approached the small island.

これらの小道具は役に立ちそうにない。These gadgets seem to be of no use.
俺はおまえだろうと誰だろうと、こづき回されるような事はさせないぞ。I'm not going to be pushed around by you or anyone else.
小脳は血液の不断の供給を必要とする。The brain needs a continuous supply of blood.
この小麦は粉にされる。This wheat is made into flour.
私はこんがりと小麦色に日焼けした。I was browned to a nice tan.
麺はふつう小麦粉から作られる。Noodles are usually made from wheat.

それじゃ猫に小判だ。It is like casting pearls before swine.

面疔ができた。小鼻の奥に1個、痛い塊がある。I have a facial boil. There's a painful lump at the back of one nostril.



ライザは大変器用なので、自分でネジや同じような小物を作ることさえできる。Lisa is so skillful that she can even make screws and similar small objects for herself.



彼らはその少女は小柄だと言った。They described the girl as being small.





少年はバットを小脇に抱えている。The boy has a bat under his arm.


子供に少し愛情を注いで見給え、すると君におびただしい愛情が戻ってくる。Give a little love to a child, and you get a great deal back.少しテレビを見てもいいですか。Do you mind if I watch TV for a while?
彼は少しずつよくなっています。He is getting better bit by bit.

コックさんは少しもかけていない。The cook hasn't put any on it.
この病気に勝てる人は少ない。Not many survive this disease.


小額の札にいたしますか、それとも高額の札にいたしましょうか。Do you want small bills or large?


少佐は大尉の上官である。A major is above a captain.





ヨットは少数の金持ちだけが楽しめるものだ。Yachts are for the wealthy few.

少数党はその法案を阻止するため、最後まで頑張りました。The minority party made a last-ditch effort to block passage of the bills.
少数民族の雇用促進政策とはいっても、建前にすぎず、現状はマイノリティーが職に就けるチャンスなどほとんどない。Although many pay lip service to the idea of affirmative action, in reality, very few minorities get hired.





少年は木に自分の名前を刻んだ。The boy carved his name on the tree.



全ての少年少女はコロンブスを知っています。Every boy and girl knows Columbus.


少年犯罪の増加は深刻な問題だ。The increase in juvenile delinquency is a serious problem.



あとで起こったことはなお悪かった。What followed was still worse.僕は君が欠点を持っているので、なおいっそう愛してる。I love you all the more for your faults.なお、会社説明会後でも、会社見学は随時受け付けております。Furthermore, even after the company information session, we sometimes hold company tours.
彼女は快活で愛想がよく、親切でなおかつ思いやりがある。要するに立派な人です。She is bright, friendly, kind, and considerate. In brief, she is a good person.
それらの星は肉眼で見える、まして望遠鏡ならなおさらである。You can see the stars with your naked eye, and even better through a telescope.



私が床に入るか入らないうちに電話が鳴りだした。I had hardly gotten into bed when the telephone began to ring.
床の上に何がありますか。Is there anything on the floor?


おや、床屋へ行ってきたのだね。Oh, you've been to the barbershop.
床下にパイプを通す。Run pipes under the floor.
金は床板の下に隠されていた。The money was hidden beneath the floorboards.
展示会へのご招待、本日ありがたく承りました。Today, we received your invitation to the exhibition with pleasure.ご用は承っておりますか。Is anybody waiting on you?


沈黙は承諾を意味する事が多い。Silence often implies consent.
人はすべて死すべきものと承知している。We know that all men are mortal.よろしい。お申し出は承知しました。All right. I'll accept your offer.



私の提案を承認していただけますか。Could you approve my proposal?




お招き下さってありがとうございました。It was kind of you to invite us.

私たちはジェーンとエレンを招くつもりだ。We are going to invite Jane and Ellen.警官は人差し指で僕を招いた。The policeman beckoned to me with his forefinger.私の誤りは彼の怒りを招いた。My mistake incurred his anger.
大統領は軍隊を招集した。The President called out the troops.
ご招待をありがとうございます。Thank you for your invitation.

私は招待状の封筒の宛名書きをしました。I addressed the envelope containing the invitation.


彼女は担任のクラスをよく掌握している。She has good control over her class.

父は私の弟を掌中の玉のようにかわいがった。My brother was the apple of my father's eye.




ただの男友達っていう立場から彼氏に昇格させてくれるかい？How about giving me a promotion from just-a-friend to boyfriend?

昇給を当てにしないほうがいい。You'd better not count on a raise.

彼は課長に昇進した。He was promoted to section chief.

君は次の昇任予定者です。You are the next in line for promotion.

昭和１０年は西暦１９３５年です。The 10th year of Showa is 1935 in the Western calendar.



これは格好のよい松の木だ。This is a well-shaped pine tree.

今は松茸が旬でお安いですよ。Matsutake mushrooms are in season now so they are cheap.




彼は足の骨を折った時、３ヶ月間松葉杖を使わなければならなかった。When he broke his leg, he had to use crutches for 3 months.



王子は木こりの娘と恋に陥った。The prince fell in love with a woodcutter's daughter.
その沼にはサギがたくさん住んでいる。Lots of herons live in the marsh.

沼地に建物は建てられない。Swampy land is no use for building purposes.
たくさんの虫が一晩のうちに消えてしまった。A lot of insects vanished overnight.突然、明かりが消えた。All at once the lights went out.時間がたつにつれて我々の希望は消えた。As time went on, our hopes sank.

ついに彼らの友情が壊れ、二人の親密な関係は消え失せた。Finally, their friendship ended and their close relationship disappeared.

ちょっと消しゴムをかしてくれませんか。Can I borrow your eraser for a moment?
幸い、火事は大事に至らぬ内に消し止められた。Fortunately, the fire was put out before it became too serious.
沈着な彼女の言葉で我々の恐怖は消し飛んだ。Her calm words banished our fears.
寝る前に電気を消してください。Turn off the light before you go to bed.消防士たちはすばやく火事を消した。The firemen quickly extinguished the blaze.どんな言葉も彼女の深い悲しみを消す事はできない。No words can relieve her deep sorrow.


食物は胃の中で消化される。Food is digested in the stomach.

その火事を消火するのに長い時間かかった。It took a long time to put out the fire.





警察が医療事故の立件に消極的だ。The police are reluctant to pursue criminal charges in medical cases.
ここで明確にしなければならない点は、スポーツにおいてアマチュアとプロフェッショナルの境界線が消失しつつあるということだ。The point we must clarify here is that the lines between amateur and professional in sport are beginning to disappear.

それ以来、彼の消息を聞いていない。He has not been heard of since.
消息筋によると、○○社は東証一部への上場を準備している。According to informed sources, ____ Ltd. is preparing for the move up to the first section of the Tokyo Stock exchange.


その車は多量の燃料を消費する。The car consumes a lot of fuel.
米国において「リベート」は、主にメーカーが消費者に直接提供するインセンティブ手段として広く認識されている。In America 'rebate' is widely recognized, generally as an incentive where makers give back directly to consumers.

政府は近々、消費税を引き上げるつもりなのかしら。Will the government raise the consumption tax soon?
アルコールの消費量は年々増えている。Alcohol consumption is increasing every year.
彼が言うには、消防の仕事というのは大忙しか全く暇かのいずれかだそうだ。He says firefighting is a feast or famine job.
私の夢は消防士になる事だ。My dream is to be a firefighter.
５台の消防車が火事の現場に駆けつけた。Five fire engines rushed to the scene of the fire.
消防署に連絡してください。Please call the fire department.
虎は消滅しかかっている種族である。The tiger is a vanishing species.





彼の今回の判断、理解に苦しむね。焼きが回ったということかね。I have a hard time seeing the logic of this latest decision of his. He just isn't as sharp as he used to be.


それらの牛には焼き印がついている。The cattle are marked with brands.

焼き魚は好きではありません、ましてや生魚は言うまでもありません。I don't like grilled fish, let alone raw fish.


連邦議会がその法案を可決した結果、それまで以上に多くの国旗が焼き捨てられたに違いありません。I am sure that more flags were burned as a result of Congress passing that law than had ever been burned before.



その光景は私の記憶に焼きついた。The scene was burned into my memory.
これらの家は敵軍の手で焼き払われた。These houses were burnt down to the ground by the enemy.

このパンは焼き立てです。This bread is fresh from the oven.
このお肉をもうすこし焼いてくださいませんか。Could you cook this meat a little more?この夏はこんがり焼こうと思います。I am going to try to get a good tan.２枚ずつやいてください。I'd like two prints of each.
このトーストはよく焼けていません。This toast is not done enough.
彼はその火事で焼け死んだ。He was burned to death in the fire.
君の煙草の火でコートに焼け焦げができた。You burnt a hole in my coat with your cigarette.
焼けつくように暑いね。It's baking hot.
その城は焼け落ちた。The castle was burnt to ashes.

最新のバイオ技術によって、芋の臭みを最小限に抑え、非常に飲みやすい「芋焼酎」です。It's very easy to drink potato shochu now that the potato-like smell has been reduced to a low level through use of the latest biotechnology.

このフィルムの現像と焼付けをお願いします。Please develop and print this film.

その亡命者は故国への思いに胸を焦がした。The exile yearned for his home.

あーあ、トーストが真っ黒に焦げてしまっているよ。Oh, the toast is burned black.
ドアを開けたとたんに、彼は焦げ臭い匂いを嗅いだ。The instant he opened the door, he smelt something burning.

鍋を焦げつかせるな。Don't let the pan boil dry.

彼は新しい仕事を始めようとあせっていた。He was in a hurry to begin the new job.


顕微鏡の焦点を合わせなさい。Adjust the microscope's focus.


君の答えを彼のと照らし合わせなさい。Check your answer with his.
太陽の照り返しが強い。There's a lot of glare.
降っても照っても明日は出発します。Rain or shine, I will start tomorrow.

彼女はうふふと照れながらコンドームを差し出した。Giggling with embarrassment, she held out the condom.

彼は彼女のいる前ではとても照れくさそうにする。He acts very shy in her presence.
詳細は事務所に照会してください。Apply to the office for further details.
私たちは学生の成績の照合をした。We made a check of the student' records.





太陽がまともに照り付けている。The sun is shining in my face.
我々は明るさを抑えた照明の中でダンスをした。We danced in the subdued lighting.
メアリーは本当に心配症ね。Mary is such a worrywart.


よくこういう症状が起きますか。Do you have this symptom often?
細かい所は省いて構わない。You may leave out the details.
省エネのためにコンビニの２４時間営業を廃止しろ！Save energy by abolishing the convenience stores' 24-hour-a-day trading!





この句では前置詞を省略できる。You can omit the preposition in this phrase.









人々はみな彼の英雄的行為をたたえた。Everybody praised his heroism.

私は建築を凍結した音楽と称する。I call architecture frozen music.彼は自らを日本のエジソンと称した。He called himself an Edison of Japan.
フランクス陸軍大将がナイト爵位の名誉称号を授かりました。General Franks received an honorary knighthood.
教科書の各章に約１２もの練習問題がついている。Each chapter in the textbook is followed by about a dozen comprehension questions.
赤ん坊は敵意のある笑いができるほど年をとってはいない。The baby is not old enough to be capable of hostile laughter.日本文化の文脈の中では当然と思われる微笑みも、外国人の間では、不気味な笑いとして多くの混乱を生み、また悪評が高い。Our smile, which is understandable in the context of Japanese culture, sometimes causes a lot of confusion and is notorious among foreign people as a mysterious smile.ぎこちない笑いをした店員が答えた。The smirking male clerk replied.
それは笑いごとでない。It is not a matter to laugh about.

彼女の笑い声が家にこだました。Her laughter echoed through the house.



彼はおもしろい笑い話を無限に知っている。He has an endless store of good jokes.
クラスのもの皆が彼の冗談に笑った。The whole class laughed at his joke.しかし、彼はめったに笑いませんでした。But he did not often smile.ベェーだっ！乙女のことを嗤った罰よ！Pfft! That's what you get for laughing at a girl!
その子供は無邪気な笑みを浮かべて話していた。That child was talking with an innocent smile.


彼女の笑顔が感謝の気持ちを表した。Her smile expressed her thanks.


あなたを私の両親に紹介したい。I want you to meet my parents.
紹介者はいらっしゃいますか。Did anybody recommend us to you?
女王にあやかって、その船にクイーンメリー号と名付けた。They named the ship Queen Mary after the Queen.
この切手には誰の肖像が印刷してありますか。Whose image is on this stamp?
ボブは装飾された額にその肖像画を収めたけれど、上下さかさまだった。Bob mounted the portrait in a fancy frame, but it was upside down.
その庭園は菖蒲の名所です。The garden is famous for its irises.


バンパーが衝撃をいくらか吸収してくれた。The car bumper absorbed some of the impact.昨日見たニュースに衝撃を受けた。I was shocked by yesterday's news.
日本のいわゆるバブル経済の崩壊は、国際市場に衝撃波を広げました。The bursting of Japan's so-called bubble economy sent shock waves through international markets.
彼は衝動に駆られた。He was borne away by an impulse.

彼女はそのドレスを衝動買いした。She bought the dress on impulse.
車がトラックに衝突した。The car collided with a truck.日米の利害がこの点で衝突した。Japanese and American interests clashed on this point.

しかし、あなた方は私たちの証を受け入れません。But still you people do not accept our testimony.
その箱には製造者の証印が押してある。The box bears the stamp of the manufacturer.
この証拠は彼にとって不利だった。This evidence was against him.
彼女は例の金のインチキ証券商法に引っかかり持ち金のほとんどを失ってしまった。She was taken in by that fake gold certificate scandal and lost most of her money.


またヨハネは証言して言った。Then John gave this testimony.
証書貸付は連帯保証人が必要でした。Loan on deeds needed the joint surety.
彼らはその証人を買収しようとしたがだめだった。They attempted in vain to bribe the witness.
証人喚問はとんだ騒ぎになってしまいました。The confirmation hearings turned into a free-for-all.
私が間違っていない事を証明しよう。I'll show you that I am right.
彼の、証明済みの能力は、信頼できます。You can rely on his proven ability.
もし予防接種証明書があったらお持ちください。If you have a certificate of immunization, please bring it when you come.


もっと詳しい情報が欲しい。I want more detailed information.このあたりはお詳しいですか。Are you familiar with this area?
我々は研究計画を詳しく述べた。We elaborated on our study plan.

私たちはその件を詳細に検討した。We debated the matter at length.





その小さい男の子は目を大きく見開いて巨大な象を見た。The little boy gazed at the huge elephant, eyes wide open.
彼は象牙に図案を彫った。He carved designs in ivory.





オリーブの枝は平和を象徴している。An olive branch symbolizes peace.
期待されたとおり彼は賞を得た。As was expected, he won the prize.

あなたはシートベルトをちゃんと使用していたとして、カリフォルニア州交通安全大会において賞金５０００ドルを獲得されました。You have just won a prize of $5000 in a California state safety competition for proper use of your seatbelt.


先生はジョンに賞品を与えた。The teacher gave John a prize.
来客達は彼の奥さんの料理を十分賞味した。All the guests did justice to his wife's cooking.
このパンって賞味期限大丈夫か？Is this bread's best-by OK?




鐘の合図で彼らは食事をした。The bell chimed them to meals.

トムの話し方は私の癇にさわる。Tom's way of speaking gets on my nerves.
先駆者達は一連の障害を克服してきた。The pioneers have overcome a series of obstacles.彼の記憶喪失は物理的な記憶障害というよりは心理的な障害である。His loss of memory is a psychological problem rather than a physical one.
公共の安全のために、非常口に障害物を置かないこと。Emergency exits must be kept free of blockages for public safety.

壁に耳あり障子に目あり。Walls have ears, shouji have eyes.

我々は社会的障壁を取り壊すために、懸命に努力しなければならない。We must work hard to break down social barriers.
凝った彫刻のしてある鞘に収まった長剣。A longsword sheathed in an intricately engraved scabbard.
飛行機は山の上を飛んだ。The plane flew over the mountain.本棚の上に手が届きますか。Can you reach to the top of the bookshelf?机の上に本があります。There is a book on the desk.


彼は経済上の理由で計画を断念した。He gave up the plan for economic reasons.地図上の青い線は川に相当する。The blue lines on the map correspond to rivers.
不況で私の商売は上がったりだ。My business is at a standstill because of the recession.
道はなだらかな上がりになっていた。The road climbed gradually.色の上がりがよい。The color has come out well.
物価の上がり下がりが金融危機を引き起こした。The rise and fall of prices caused a financial crisis.

彼らは夜遅くどかどかと私の家に上がり込んできた。They crowded into my house late at night.




物価は上がり目だった。Prices showed a tendency of going up.
２階へ上がると赤城山がよく見える。There's a good view of Mt. Akagi from upstairs.我々はエレベーターで上がったり降りたりした。We went up and down by elevator.家にあがる前に靴を脱げば靴の泥を家の中に持ち込まずにすむ。If you take your shoes off before coming into the house you won't bring in any dirt from your shoes.
追い風の時に帆を上げよ。Hoist your sail when the wind is fair.
両手をあげろ！Hands up!左手を上げなさい。Raise your left hand.右腕を上げられません。I can't lift my right arm.

















君はいつもうわの空だ。You are always hearing but not listening.
道はここからゆるやかな上りだ。The road ascends gently here.
私は丘を登り下りして息切れがした。I was out of breath from walking up and down hills.エレベーターが昇り降りしている。The elevator is moving up and down.

道は上り坂になってその村に出る。The road ascends to the village.


あなたは、上れませんよ。You cannot climb!そのとき太陽がのぼるところだった。The sun was coming up then.損失は１００万ドル以上にのぼる。The loss adds up to more than one million dollars.

フォーチューン誌上位５００社は新しい法律で最も打撃を受けました。Fortune 500 companies were the hardest hit by recent legislation.
旧システム用に書かれたソフトとの上位互換性を保つのは大切です。It is important to maintain backward compatibility with software that was written to run on the former system.


その問題で上院議員の意見が分かれた。The issue divided the senators.

二回目の上映がまもなく始まります。The second showing will start soon.今週はよい映画が上映されてますか。Are there any good films on this week?

その劇場では何が上演されていますか。What is playing at the theater?



彼は旗を上下に動かした。He moved the flags up and down.





所得税は控除額を上回るいかなる所得にもかかる。An income tax is levied on any income that exceeds deductions.
この前中国へ行ったとき、上海を訪れた。The last time I went to China, I visited Shanghai.






少佐は大尉の上官である。A major is above a captain.
その子は上機嫌で飛行機に乗り込んだ。The child got on an airplane in good mood.
彼女の顔は誇らしさで赤く上気していた。She was aflame with pride.
失礼だが、上記の記事にある３つの誤りを指摘しておきたい。Excuse me; allow me to point out three errors in the above article.




この辞書は初級者に、いやそれどころか上級者にも役に立つ。This dictionary is useful to beginners, yes, and to advanced learners.
上級管理職は部下の教育に多くの時間を費やす。Senior executives spend a lot of time training their subordinates.



彼は商用で上京した。He came up to Tokyo on business.


寒波が日本の上空を通過したのです。A cold wave passed over Japan.

















その判決が不満で上告する。I will appeal against the sentence.





上司に残業させられたんだよ。My boss made me work overtime.




あのシャツを着てみなさい。上質の綿でできています。Try on that shirt. It's made of fine cotton.
あなたは上手にバスケットボールができますか。Do you play basketball well?





上出来でしたね。You have done a very good job.
中国語においては「テンス」を表す場合には上述のように「助詞」か「時を表す語」または文脈によるものが多い。When indicating 'tense' in Chinese, as shown above, there are 'particles', 'time-specifying words' and also many cases where it depends on context.
７月の上旬は、海に行くのは早いかな？I wonder if the first week or so of July is too early to go to the beach.

あ、上書きしちゃった。Uh oh, I saved over it.

機は急角度で上昇し、それから海岸を離れるにつれて水平飛行に移った。The plane rose sharply before leveling off as it left the coast.




１０００銘柄以上の株が取引所に上場されている。More than 1000 issues are listed on the stock exchange.










その女の子は、数冊の本を抱えていた。教科書じゃなく、分厚い上製本。The girl was carrying several books. Not textbooks, but thick hardback books.























君の英語は上達している。Your English is improving.

直径23m(下段)及び18m(上段)、高さ5ｍの二段式の円墳である。It is a two level style round burial mound, 23m diameter (lower level), 18m (higher).





上長者には敬意を払わなければ、いけない。We have to be respectful to our seniors.


その日は上天気となった。The day turned out to be fine.


彼は壁にペンキの上塗りをした。He put the final coat of paint on the wall.


どうしてこんな上等のぶどう酒を今まで取って置いたのか。Why have you kept such an excellent wine back till now?









彼はほぼ６フィート上背だ。He is almost six feet tall.




その少年は上半身裸であった。The boy was naked to the waist.




彼女は行儀が極めて上品である。She is quite decent in conduct.

上部前方で何かが光っている。Something is flashing up ahead.








彼は彼女のうわべだけの好意にだまされた。He was deceived by her apparent friendliness.





上役にやたらにぺこぺこするな。Don't be subservient to your boss.





学生たちはめいめい個人用の上履き靴がある。Each of the students has his own shoes.
毎年、日本には台風が上陸します。Typhoons strike Japan every year.


橋の上流に私はボートを見た。I saw a boat above the bridge.







丈の長いコートは、ほとんどくるぶしまで届いていた。He was wearing a long black coat that reached almost to his ankles.



私は好機に乗じた。I took advantage of an opportunity.



軍が政府を乗っ取った。The army took over the government.乗っ取り犯人の要求には応じられない。We cannot meet the demands of the hijackers.

自転車の二人乗りは危険だ。Two people riding on a bicycle at the same time is dangerous.ノリもさる事ながら、会場と一体化したような快感が忘れられない。I got really into it, and I just can't forget the exhilaration of becoming one with the audience.






考え事をしてたら、乗り越してしまった。Lost in thought, I missed my stop.
私は居眠りをして降りる駅を乗り過ごした事に気づいた。I noticed that I had slept past my station.
今度の日曜日に車を乗り回して行けるところまで行こうぜ。This Sunday let's take a joy ride and see where we end up.

乗りかかった船ということでやっていく所存です。I've come this far, so I'll keep going.




私たちは、ここでバスを乗り降りします。We get on and off the bus here.

メアリーと私が同じ汽車に乗り合わせたのは全くの偶然だった。It was sheer coincidence that Mary and I were on the same train.
ロンドン行きの列車に乗り込んだ。I got on the train for London.一人で原始林へ乗り込もうとは君はなんて勇ましいんだ。How brave of you to go alone into the primaeval forest!
これこそ事件現場に乗り捨ててあった自動車だ。This is the same car that was left at the scene of the crime.

人類は宇宙に乗り出すことに成功した。Human beings succeeded in flying into space.彼は新しい事業に乗り出した。He embarked on a new enterprise.


我々は最悪の事態を乗り切ったと思います。We think we are over the worst.
それは２５人の水夫が乗り組んだ船だった。It was a ship with a crew of 25 sailors.
一生懸命走ったが、列車に乗りそこなった。I ran and ran, but missed the train.
終電に乗り遅れたんだよ。I was late for the last train.











１１時の列車に乗るつもりです。I'm catching the 11:00 train.そんなに沢山パンに乗るんか？You really put that much in the sandwich?「騙された」と言ってしまえばそれまでですが、「うまい話」に乗った当人であることは間違いありません。If you say "I was tricked," well that's certainly so but there's no mistaking that you were the one who signed up on a "sweet deal".
乗客、乗員合わせて７９名の生存者の中に操縦士が含まれていた。The pilots were among the 79 survivors consisting of passengers and crew.

乗り換え券をください。Could I have a transfer?











列車に乗車した後で、私は財布を家に置き忘れてきたことに気が付いた。After I got on board a train, I found I had left my wallet behind at home.

「乗車券を拝見できますか」「はい、どうぞ」"Can I see your ticket?" "Yes. Here it is."






２人の女性が乗船していた。There were two women on board.

乗組員の何人かは溺れ死んだ。Some of the crew were drowned.
私は乗馬を体験した。I experienced horse riding.




ＣＦＩＴは乗務員が航空機を完全にコントロールし、すべてが正常に作動しているにもかかわらず、地面に激突する場合に起こるものである。When the flight crew has their aircraft under control, everything is working normally, and yet it still crashes into the ground, that's a CFIT.

大きな乗用車が止まり、背の高い女性が降りた。A big car drew up and a tall lady got out.







冗談はもうたくさんだ。No more of your jokes, please.









著者の冗漫なスタイルは膨大な書類を作り出したが、その内容は乏しい。The author's verbiage produced a document of mammoth size and microscopic import.




その城は１６１０年に建てられた。The castle dates back to 1610.

彼は農夫に身をやつして城下町に潜入した。Disguising himself as a peasant, he crept into the castle town.



その町のまわりには高い城壁がある。There are high walls about the town.

場が白けた。The party grew chilly.このネクタイはこのような場にふさわしくありません。This tie is not suitable for a situation like this.
あなたの言った事は場違いでした。Your remarks were out of place.
この規則はどんな場合にでも当てはまる。This rule applies to any case.
この薬品は場合によって毒にも薬にもなる。This medicine will do you good or harm, as the case may be.
それはよく分かりません。場合によるでしょうね。I'm not sure about that. It depends.

このソファーは場所を取りすぎる。This sofa takes too much room.


会議場内で自社の製品の展示場を設けたいとお考えでしたら、早急にご連絡下さい。Please let me know immediately if you would like to set up an area of the conference room for your products.
私は場末のジャズクラブに行って、ライブミュージックを楽しみます。I like to go to a local jazz club where I can enjoy live music.

その場面は彼の記憶の底に留まっていた。The scene was embedded in his memory.アクション場面の少ない映画にはいつも退屈してしまう。I'm always bored with films that have little action.
田中嬢は長年アメリカにいたので英語を話すのが非常にうまい。Having been in America for many years, Miss Tanaka is a very good speaker of English.


常に疲労感があります。I always have a tired feeling.
君は常軌を逸しているよ。You are way off track.
彼は常時彼の才能をねたむ人々から中傷されることにうんざりしていた。He was sick of being vilified all the time by people who were jealous of his ability.
彼女には常識が欠けている。She is lacking in common sense.
シンナーなどの常習性のある物をしてると言う事は、更正する可能性が低いと思います。I think that, as he's using addictive substances like thinner, the chance of rehabilitation is low.
彼はヘロインの常習者だ。He is a heroin addict.






健康を害さないように、常日頃から、体に対して様々な気配りをしています。In my daily life I take care in various ways of my body so as not to damage my health.



会議の席で常務は、開口一番何を言ったと思う。大規模なリストラ計画を発表したんだよな。Guess what the managing director started off the meeting by saying. The first thing out of his mouth was an announcement of some major restructuring.
後に、高校生になると、僕はビタミン剤を常用するように化学を「摂取した」Later, in high school, I would take chemistry the way I took vitamin pills.







旅は道連れ世は情け。No road is long with good company.
彼は全く情愛に欠けているようだ。He seems to be bankrupt of all tender feeling.



今までに一度も私はこんなに美しい情景を見たことがない。Never have I seen such a beautiful scene.



男は情状酌量を求めたが、犯した罪に対して２０年の懲役刑が言い渡された。The man pleaded for mercy, but he was sentenced to twenty years in prison for his crime.
情勢は我々が行動を取ることを必要としている。The situation calls for our action.
彼の私に対する情熱はさめない。His passion for me doesn't cool.



この情報は正しいか。Is this information right?




記者はその情報源を明かすことを拒んだ。The reporter refused to name his sources.






彼は理性で情欲を制することが出来る。He is able to subordinate passion to reason.
そちらの条件を受け入れましょう。We will accept your conditions.
たとえ条件付きの妥協策だとしても、何も決めないよりはましだ。A watered down compromise resolution is better than none at all.


最初の条項には何と書いてあるか。How does the first article run?
彼は法律の条文の意味に固執する。He keeps to the letter of the law.

ＥＣ諸国は新たな安全保障条約を検討中です。The EC countries are working out a new security pact.


杖は彼に何の役にも立たなかった。The stick didn't help him any.


くれぐれも浄水器の悪質訪問販売業者や無料点検商法にはご注意ください。Please exercise every caution against cowboy salesmen of water purifiers and fraudulent-test sales.




状況をお知らせください。Please let me know the status.
現在、参加を希望する方々がとても多く、状況によって１ヶ月先まで満席になっております。At present a very great number of people are seeking to participate and, depending on circumstances, up to a month ahead is fully booked.
その古家はひどい状態であった。The old house was in bad shape.

彼は畳の上に大の字になった。He lay on the mat at full length.


彼女はタオルをきれいにたたみ、それを物入れに仕舞った。She folded up the towels and put them away in the cupboard.彼は商売をたたんで引退した。He sold his business and retired.








その晩はとてもむし暑かった。It was very sultry that night.
バリの１２月はひどく暑くてむしむしします。It is extremely hot and humid in Bali in December.
そのコラムニストは古い醜聞を蒸し返した。The columnist raked up some old gossip.



そのエンジンは蒸気で動く。The engine is driven by steam.


露は太陽が昇ると蒸発した。The dew evaporated when the sun rose.聞きましたわよ。ご両親が借金を残して蒸発したそうですわね。I've heard about it. Your parents disappeared, running out on their debt didn't they?
コールタールを蒸留して得られる成分名は下表の通りである。The components obtained by distillation of coal tar are as shown below.



ジョーンズ氏は年をとったら事業を息子に譲り渡すつもりだ。When Mr Jones gets old, he will hand over his business to his son.
叔父は私に車を譲ってくれた。My uncle gave me his car.彼は老婦人に席をゆずった。He offered his seat to an old woman.私はこの点については一歩も譲れません。I will not give an inch on this point.

あなたの意見が道理に適っていれば彼らは譲歩するだろう。They will give way to you if your opinion is reasonable.

その作品が画壇に大いに物議をかもした。This artwork excited much controversy in the world of art.

ビールは麦芽から醸造される。Beer is brewed from malt.


錠剤のおかげで痛みがなくなった。The tablets took away my pain.
「かぎは錠前に差し込んである」と、彼は付け加えた。"The key," he added, "is in the lock."

彼は教師になることを嘱望している。He aspires to become a teacher.
その箱に飾りのテープをかけてください。Do up the box with decorative tape.
彼女は飾り気のない青いドレスを着ていた。She wore a plain blue dress.

私はこの部屋は飾り付けをする前のままのほうが良かったと思います。I think I prefer this room as it was, before we decorated it.
彼女は費用を顧みず家を飾りたてた。She decorated her house regardless of cost.
私たち自身が部屋を飾ったのです。We decorated the room ourselves.彼の絵が壁に飾られていた。His pictures were hung on the wall.
彼は額の汗を拭った。He wiped the sweat from his brow.
テーブルの汚れをスポンジでふき取って下さい。Please sponge the mess up off the table.
額の汗をふきなさい。Wipe the sweat from your brow.
私は庭にバラを植えた。I planted roses in the garden.
とうとう子供たちは山の真中に、りんごの木が植わっている小さな果樹園を見つけました。Finally the children saw a little orchard in the middle of the mountain with apple trees growing inside it.


植物は土壌で育つ。Plants are nourished by earth.
その植物園は薔薇の花が満開だった。The roses were in full bloom in the botanical garden.


彼らはミズーリ州に植民する計画を立てている。They are planning to settle Missouri.
数年後、ヨーロッパ人たちは沿岸の植民地に住み着いた。Years later, Europeans established colonies in the coastal areas.その習慣を彼は植民地時代から始まると推定している。He dates the custom from the colonial days.

植木屋さんに木を何本か植えてもらった。I had the gardener plant some trees.
植木鉢が歩道に落ちて、ガチャンと割れた。The flower pot crashed to the sidewalk.
自然環境の回復を宣伝する組織がリサイクルに力を入れて、植林に貢献しないのは何故か。Since many organizations are putting effort into recycling in order to restore the natural environment, why won't you contribute to reforestation?


彼女はずっとナプキンを織り続けた。She folded napkins all the way.


あの店には織物類が置いてありますか。Does that store keep textile goods?


職探しはどうなったの？How is your job hunting going?
職員以外入室禁止。Admittance to staff members only.
彼らは職員室にいます。They are in the teachers' room.
彼の職業は弁護士です。He is a lawyer by profession.
彼は職権を乱用する。He abuses his authority.

私は職場から１時間の所に住んでいる。I live an hour away from work.
私はその職人がとても腕がよいと分かった。I found the workman very good.


私が君の職務を引き継ごう。I'll take over your duties.
政府での私の職歴は数多くの海外勤務を含む。My career in the government includes many overseas assignments.
その色は彼女の髪の毛とよく合った。The color went beautifully with her hair.満足の色が彼の顔に浮かんだ。A look of contentment appeared on his face.
男性は色っぽい女性が大好きなのです。Men love amorous women.

この石鹸を使えば彼女の顔の色艶がよくなるだろう。This soap will improve her complexion.



彼女はお色気たっぷりだ。She is loaded with sex appeal.色気より食い気。Fair words fill not the belly.


彼女の色香に迷った。He was fascinated with her beauty.
その建物は実に美しい色合いの大理石でできている。The building is built of marble of a most lovely color.
雄のくじゃくは尾の羽毛が色彩豊かである。The male peacock has colorful tail feathers.

彼女は色仕掛けで男を誘惑する。She knows how to use her good looks to get what she wants out of men.











原画と複製とでは色調に微妙な差異がある。Subtle differences in tone discriminate the original from the copy.





色盲のために、色彩の区別ができない人もいる。Some people are color blind; they cannot tell one color from another.
あなたが長島さんに色目をつかってるのをみたわよ。I saw you making eyes at Mr Nagashima.




触らぬ神に祟りなし。Let sleeping dogs lie.
何かが足に触れるのを感じた。I felt something touch my feet.彼の手紙はその事件にそれとなくふれている。His letter alludes to the event.
彼女はそのうわさを町中にふれ回った。She spread the gossip all over the town.
彼には子供と触れ合う時間がなかった。He didn't have time to spend with his children.




最初に、この実験で使用された触媒について吟味したい。As a beginning I would like to examine the catalyzer used in this experiment.

目標は授業設計をするときの、学生の思考を触発するメディア教材の選択および活用方法について理解することである。Our aim is that, when planning classes, we know how to select stimulating material for the students and how to put it into use.

２人の意見には大きな食い違いがあった。There was a great gap between the views of the two.
私たちの意見が食い違うのはこの点です。It is on this point that our opinions differ.


色気より食い気。Fair words fill not the belly.

虫に食い荒らされて桃は中空になっていた。The insect ate the peach hollow.

医者の費用は本当に貯金に食い込む。Doctors' bills really cut into our savings.


被害は最小限に食い止められた。The damage was held to a minimum.
彼は賭け事で財産を食いつぶした。He ate up his fortune by gambling.

男はレストランで食い逃げした。The guy jumped his bill at the restaurant.

しかし今は、一目見て、サメがその人にくらいつくのは避けられないようだということに気づかずにはいられない。However, I can't help noticing, at this moment, that at first glance it seems inevitable that the shark will devour the man.

もっと果物を食べるべきです。You should eat more fruit.僕は脚本家で食べていく決心をした。I am determined to make a living as a playwright.
彼は食べ過ぎに注意した。He was cautious about overeating.
昨日食べすぎた。I ate too much food yesterday.

私は食べ残しを犬にやった。I fed the leftovers to my dog.

冷蔵庫の中にたくさんの食べ物が入っていますか。Is there much food in the refrigerator?

先週はパチンコで勝った友人に焼き肉をごちそうになりました。食べ放題でたらふく食べました。Last week I was treated to dinner by my friend who'd won at pachinko. It was all-you-can-eat so I ate to my heart's content.
彼の食べ方といったら、胸が悪くなるね。Speaking of his eating habits, they're revolting aren't they?
彼の靴はとても古かったので足の指が靴からはみ出ていた。His shoes were so old that his toes were sticking out of them.
私は彼のあごに１発食らわしてやった。I landed him a blow on the chin.
オーブントースターのタイマーが鳴る。食パンがコンガリ焼けた、香ばしい匂い。The toaster-oven's timer rings. The fragrant smell of well toasted bread.
めんどうですが食塩をとっていただけませんか。May I trouble you for the salt?

弟は銀の食器類を磨いた。My brother polished the silver.
食券はここで出しているのですか。Are you giving out meal tickets here?
食後に２カプセル飲みなさい。Take two capsules after a meal.



あなたのロボットは食事の支度、掃除、皿洗いその他の家事ができるでしょう。Your robot will prepare meals, clean, wash dishes, and perform other household tasks.彼女はやせるために食事を制限した。She went on a reducing diet.

何あんた、またパン？相変わらず変わり映えのしない食生活送ってんのね。What, you having bread again? I see you're still leading the same thrilling dietary life as ever.
食前ごとにこの薬を飲みなさい。Take this medicine before each meal.
彼女は食卓に料理を並べた。She spread dishes on the table.

私達の家は食堂を含めて７部屋あります。Our house has seven rooms including the dining room.私は角を曲がって、開店早々の食堂を見つけた。I turned the corner and caught sight of a newly opened restaurant.
食堂車はどこにありますか。Where's the dining car?


われわれの金のほとんどが食費になる。Most of our money goes for food.
この食品は有毒である。This food is unhealthy.

私はたくさんの食物を持って帰ろう。I will bring back a lot of food.
食物繊維はダイエットに効果的だ。Dietary fibre is good for losing weight.
その肉は全く食用に適さなかった。None of the meat was fit to eat.
最近食欲がないんです。Recently I have had no appetite.
彼らはじゅうぶんな食料を手に入れられなかった。They could not get enough food.
日本の食料品を扱っていますか。Do you have any Japanese foods?
食糧が不足している。Food has been in short supply.


まもなく世界は食糧不足になるだろう。It will not be long before the world runs short of food.
彼の名誉は貪欲によってむしばまれた。His honor was corroded by greed.

彼は女の子の尻ばかり追いかけている。He's always chasing girls.
われわれは、彼女を尻軽女と見ているんだ。We look on her as a loose woman.


その犬はしっぽを振っていた。The dog was wagging his tail.彼は尻尾を巻いて逃げた。He turned tail and ran.

その税は農民に重くのしかかった。The tax bore hard on the peasantry.責任が、私に重くのしかかっている。The responsibility weighs on me.




このセーターは伸びてすっかり型崩れしている。This sweater is all stretched out of shape.会議は来週までのびた。The meeting has been put off until next week.



子どもはのびのび育つべきだ。Children should grow up carefree.

産業の伸び率には驚きだ。I'm amazed by the rate at which industries grow.




この水着は伸縮性のある素材でできている。This swimming suit is made of elastic material.





きっと彼はあなたを信じると思いますよ。I am sure of his trusting you.

私にはそれをやる能力が十分にある事を彼に信じ込ませようとした。I tried to convince him that I was perfectly capable of it.
見ることは信ずることなり。Seeing is believing.


彼らは爆弾が爆発する前にその信管をはずした。They defused the bomb before it could blow up.




キリスト教を信仰していますか。Do you believe in Christianity?








信号が青に変わったわよ。The traffic light turned green.
ちょっと屈めば、信号旗がチラチラと見え隠れします。If you just crouch a little, the signal flag can just be seen flicking in and out of sight.
信号機が赤の間は道路を渡るな。Don't cross the road when the signal is red.





信号無視して道を渡ると、ここでは捕まる？Is there a law here about jaywalking?

キリスト教信者は、一人の神が存在し、イエスキリストは神の子であると信じている。In the Christian faith, followers believe that there is only one God, and Jesus Christ is the Son of God.


１銭たりともむだにしないのが彼の信条だ。He makes a religion of never wasting a penny.


インカ人は信心深い民族だった。The Inca were religious people.














彼の信念は何事にも揺るがなかった。Nothing could sway his conviction.

信販会社は毎月顧客に請求書を送ります。Credit companies send their customers monthly bills.
開拓民たちはキリスト教を信奉した。The settlers embraced the Christian religion.
彼の信奉者たちは彼を賢明で勇敢な人だと尊敬していた。All his followers looked up to him as a wise and courageous man.
彼女はその町での信望を得た。She acquired credit with in the town.

私はもう彼を信用しない。I do not trust him any longer.相当の信用がないと家を買うのは無理だ。Unless you have good credit, buying a house is impossible.









確かに彼は信頼できます。You can certainly rely on him.



これらのすべての装置は信頼性に欠けている。All these devices are unreliable.

この理由により、著者に関する信憑性は、資料の信憑性に拠っているのである。For this reason, the credibility of the book's authors rests on the credibility of their sources.
自然はあらゆる領域で侵されている。Nature is under attack on all fronts.
彼は他人の私事を侵害する。He invades the privacy of others.


都市化が田園生活をどんどん侵食しています。Urbanization is encroaching on rural life.
「ピッキングの道具無しで、どうやって侵入した？」「トイレの窓があいた」"With no picks how did you break in?" "The toilet window was open."

ビルは侵入者によって殺された。Bill was killed by an intruder.
民間機が軍事的領域を侵犯したとのことです。A commercial airplane allegedly violated military airspace.


その国は侵略者の手に落ちた。The country fell into the invader's hand.


冬は唇があれます。In winter, our lips get chapped.

アメリカの典型的な中流階級に生まれた赤ん坊は、病院から戻ってくると自分用の部屋の自分用のベッドに寝かされる。The typical middle-class American baby comes home from the hospital to sleep in his own bed in his own room.
彼女は子供をそっと寝かせた。She laid the child down gently.机の上に寝かせて置くと転がって落ちることがあるので、試験管立てに立てておく。If you leave them lying on the desk they may roll off, so stand them in the test-tube rack.ブランデーを、カシのたるにねかせる。Age brandy in oak casks.

ジョンは長いすに長々と寝そべっていた。John stretched out on the couch.

赤ん坊は１日中寝ていた。The baby was sleeping all day long.寝る前に歯を磨きなさい。Brush your teeth before going to bed.少年は春の日差しを浴びて仰向けに寝ていた。The boy lay on his back, basking in the spring sunshine.





夏の夜は寝苦しい。We cannot sleep well on summer nights.
寝具も土埃で汚してしまいました。Also my bedding got dirt on it.

就寝中、寝言が多いのです。I talk in my sleep very often.
あなたゆうべ寝言を言っていたわよ。You were talking in your sleep last night.

マイクは病気で寝こんでいるそうだ。They say that Mike is sick in bed.
ジュディーは子供たちを寝室へ行かせた。Judy sent her children to bed.
子供は寝床ですっかり目を覚ましている。The child is wide awake in bed.
内弟子とは師と寝食をともにし、あらゆる武術のノウハウと秘伝を伝える制度だ。Apprenticeship is a system where you eat, sleep and live with your master and are taught various martial arts know-how and secrets.






寝台車を予約したいのですが。I'd like to reserve a sleeping berth.



寝不足の影響がではじめた。Lack of sleep began to tell on me.
私は１０時ごろ寝ついた。I went to sleep about 10 o'clock.父はまだ病気で寝ついている。My father is still ill in bed.


彼はときどき寝坊する。He sometimes sleeps in.



その問題は審議中です。That question is under discussion.

彼の作品を審査するときには、彼の経験不足を考慮に入れなければならない。In judging his work, we must take account of his lack of experience.
その学生は、自分の弁論に対して審査員が批判的に述べたことをひどく気にした。The student took to heart the judge's critical comments on his speech.

大衆の注意は彼の審判に向けられた。The public interest was directed at his judgement.彼一人だけ余る、だから審判させよう。He's an odd man; so we'll have him referee.審判は試合を終わらせるために笛を吹いた。The referee blew his whistle to end the match.

あなたのお姉さんは審美感があるね。Your sister has a sense of beauty.
彼には審美眼がある。He has an eye for the beautiful.


被告人が審理中に保安係りのピストルを掴み判事を撃った。The defendant was about to stand trial when he grabbed the deputy's gun and shot the judge.
あなたの親切な言葉は大事に心に刻みつけておきます。I'll treasure your kind words.




２人は何年ぶりかで会ったように、心をこめて握手していた。The two people were shaking hands heartily as if they had not seen each other for years.





私はいつでも真実を言うように心がけている。I always try to tell the truth.

いやあ面目ない。穴があったら入りたい心境だよ。I'm so sorry about what I did. I wish I could just crawl into a hole and die.
僕には警察よりも何よりもみんながいてくれることの方が心強いのですよ。For my part, having you lot with me is more reassuring than the police or anything!

お心づかいに厚くお礼申し上げます。I'm very grateful for your sympathy.
何事が起ころうとも、彼女はそれに対する心構えが出来ている。Should anything arise, she will be prepared for it.
彼が帰ってきたのは、ホームシックにかかったからではなく、ふところが心細くなったからである。He came back not because he was homesick, but because he was running short of money.
私は彼に一度も優しくしてやらなかったのが心残りだ。I regret that I have never been kind to him.
消費は心持ち伸びる程度でしょう。Spending will grow only a touch faster.

嫉妬心くらい強く人間の心情に巣食う情熱はない。There is not a passion so strongly rooted in the human heart as envy.


彼は心身ともに健康だ。He is sound in both mind and body.
学生たちは彼に心酔していた。His students adored him.
私は自分の心臓が激しく打っているのがわかった。I felt my heart beating wildly.


お返事を心待ちにしております。I'm looking forward to your reply.
くつろげば、自信に満ちて心地もよくなります。If you are at ease, you are feeling confident and comfortable.「その洗濯機の使い心地はどうですか」「まあまあです」"How do you find your washing-machine?" "Not so bad."
花は大変心地良い香りを発する。The flowers give off a very pleasant scent.

心停止の患者を応急処置で生かした。We used emergency measures to revive the cardiac arrest patient.
彼は心底は善人だ。He is a good man at heart.君には心底失望したよ。I'm very disappointed in you.

心電図をとりましょう。I'll take your ECG.


彼には自分が悪かったことを認めるぐらいの心得もなかった。He didn't have the decency to admit that he was wrong.
彼女は夫の心理を心得ている。She knows her husband's psychology.
その男の子は心配して病気になった。The boy got sick from anxiety.心配してくれる人がいて幸せだ。I'm so lucky to have someone who cares.

三村・泰之氏（みむら・やすゆき＝コニチカ株式会社取締役）三日、心不全で死去。４５歳。Mimura Yasuyuki (Konichika LTD, Managing Director) died of heart attack on the third, age 45.
お心付けはご辞退いたします。No gratuity accepted.

イスラエル側の心変わりのために、中東和平交渉の構成国に変更があるかもしれません。The makeup of Mideast peace talks may change due to a change of heart on the part of Israel.
台座に心棒を立てて、各パーツをずらしながら重ねていきます。You stand the axis on the base and then proceed to stack up each part, staggering their position.
私は彼の心理が分からない。I can't understand his psychology.
この本は心理学を取り扱っている。This book deals with psychology.
その著名な心理学者は、見た目が私の叔父に似ている。The prominent psychologist resembles my uncle in appearance.
このセラピーにおいて心理学的準備が重要だということは正しい。It is correct to say that psychological readiness is important in this therapy.




彼女は心労に打ち勝てなかった。She could not cope with anxiety.
若い娘には慎みが似つかわしい。Modesty is befitting to a young girl.
その人は慎み深いのか、それとも怠惰なのかと人は思うだろう。They would think the person is modest or lazy.
裁判官には慎重さがなくてはならない。Discretion is proper to judges.
ガーン。彼女にふられたショックで頭が混乱した。When she dumped me, the shock of it was like a huge gong going off and scrambling all my thoughts.
人のふり見て我がふり直せ。Learn wisdom from the faults of others.私は彼の言っている事がわからないふりをした。I affected not to understand what he was saying.
彼は彼女の話し振りが気に入らなかった。He did not like her manner of speech.彼は５週間ぶりに出社した。He went to his office after an absence of five weeks.

二人の警官が彼を押さえつけようとしたが彼は身をふり解き、近くの家に走り込んだ。Two police officers tried to restrain him, but he broke away and ran into a nearby house.
そのように刃物を振り回すことは危険だ。It is dangerous to wield an edged tool in such a way.
彼女はドレスに香水を振り掛けた。She sprinkled some scent on her dress.
私が呼んだとき彼は振り向いた。He turned around when I called.
彼は顔を振り向けさえしなかった。He didn't so much as turn his head.企業は規模を縮小し、研究開発にふりむける利益分も減らしています。Corporations are downsizing and reducing the amount of profits they put back into R&D.
４５０ドル、私の口座に振り込んでください。Please transfer 450 dollars to my account.
彼女は花に殺虫剤を振りまいた。She sprayed pesticide on the flowers.ヘレンはパーティーでお世辞を振りまいた。Helen made herself agreeable to everyone at the party.

フェンスの向こう側に片足を振り出した。I swung my leg over the fence.小切手はＡＢＣ社あてに支払われるように振り出してください。Checks should be made payable to the ABC Company.
囚人は連行していた看守の手を振り切って脱走した。The prisoner broke away from the guards who were holding him.

私は彼の手を振り払うことができませんでした。I couldn't shake off his hand.
上司は部下に仕事を振り分けた。The boss allotted tasks to his men.
彼は振り返って私に微笑みかけた。He looked back and smiled at me.今までの人生を振り返って考えてみた後、私は目標を変える必要があると判断した。After reflecting on my life up to now, I decided that I needed to change my goals.



私は頭を数回振った。I shook my head a few times.カズちゃん、さっき完膚無きまでに振っちゃおうとしたでしょ？You were about to dump her flat out, weren't you?

陳列物に手を触れるな。Do not touch the exhibits.


政府は工業の振興計画を開始した。The government started a program to promote industry.




周波数の平均値は振幅の増大にしたがって減じる。The mean value of the frequency decreases with increasing amplitude.



新サービスの料金設定はマーケティング部が行う。The marketing department is responsible for pricing new service.
あなたの新しい車は調子よく動いていますか。Is your new car behaving well?

彼女は記憶を新たにするためにその写真を見た。She looked at the picture to refresh her memory.


春、カキの新芽がふき出したころのことを思うとすばらしい。It is wonderful to think of Spring, when the new buds of the persimmon burst forth.

まもなく新学期が始まります。It will not be long before the new term begins.

教授は新刊本を何冊かニューヨークに注文した。The professor ordered some new books from New York.
新しい新幹線の速いこと！How fast the new Shinkansen goes!


彼女新顔だよ。She's new fish in the pond.

新規開店した宝石店は私の御得意様を奪った。The newly-opened jewelry shop took away some of my best customers.

私の新規事業が旨くいってくれたらなあ。I wish my venture would work out.


新記録を立てたことが彼の名声をさらに高めた。Setting a new record added luster to his name.
総会に出席し、データ転送の新技術を知ることができました。Participating in the general meeting raised my awareness of the new technologies in data transportation.

自分の新居にわくわくしている。I am thrilled with my new home.



彼らは新型車をテレビで宣伝した。They advertised a new car on TV.




その新婚夫婦は手をつないで歩いた。The newly married couple walked hand in hand.
いいえ。新婚旅行で一度グアムへ行きました。No. I went to Guam once on my honeymoon.

その作家は来月新作を発表する。The writer is bringing out a new book next month.


村人達は新参者に対しても偏見を持っていた。The villagers had a bias against any newcomer.

トランジスターの発明は新時代を画した。The invention of the transistor marked a new era.
彼は新式の穀物生産方法を学びにアメリカへ渡った。He went to America for the purpose of learning a new method of grain production.
この車は新車同様だ。This car is like new.
これはなんだ。キャッチセールスじゃないのなら、新手の逆ナンだろうか。Then what is this, I wonder? If it isn't dodgy door-to-door sales, then could it be a new kind of pickup technique for the ladies?
新種の稲によっては年に２、３回収穫できる物もある。Some new kinds of rice can be harvested two or three times a year.
彼が新進気鋭の学者と新聞で紹介された男かい。Is he the man painted by the newspapers as an up-and-coming scholar?
新人俳優がハムレット役をすると広告してあった。A new actor was billed to appear as Hamlet.





同社は新製品を作り上げた。The company crafted a new product.
タバコに新税が課せられた。A new tax has been imposed on cigarettes.

新設校の用地が出来ました。The site for the new school has been bought.

新雪でスキーをするのはとても楽しいことです。It is great fun skiing on new-fallen snow.
どうやって新鮮な魚をえらぶのですか。How can I pick out fresh fish?




家を新築中です。I'm getting a new house built.
図書館への多数の新着書。The library has many new acquisitions.

彼女の新調の服を忘れずにほめなさい。Remember to admire her new dress.


船田氏が新党に加わるかどうかは、定かでは、ない。It is not certain if Mr Funada will join the new party.
新入部員にクラブの規則をよくわからせる。Acquaint a newcomer with the rules of the club.
新入社員は初めての失敗をうまくいいぬけた。The new employee glossed over his first mistake.

新入生が教室へ入ってきた。A new student came into the class.
クラスのみんなは新任の先生を快く迎えた。The class accepted the new teacher.
新年が近づいていた。The New Year was drawing near.
新年会はとても楽しかった。We had a very good time at a New Year's party.

著者が本を書き直す度に新版となる。Each time an author re-writes a book, it is a new edition.


新貿易協定は国際経済に新風を吹き込むことになるでしょう。The new trade accord will pump fresh blood into the international economy.
ジョンのことが新聞に出ていた。John was mentioned in the paper.
その新聞記者はニュースを嗅ぎつける鋭い勘を持っている。The newsman has a nose for news.
いなくなった犬を新聞広告によってみつけた。I found my lost dog by means of a notice in the paper.
床一面に新聞紙が撒き散らされていた。Newspapers lay scattered all over the floor.
どちらの新聞社にお勤めですか。Which newspaper do you work for?
新米のくせに大きな顔をするな。Act your place.
新期にスタートしたテレビ番組だが、あいも変わらず新味がないな。The new season's T.V. programs are as much old hat as ever.






野獣は森に住んでいる。Wild animals live in the forest.


大病からようやく生還した私の目には、森羅万象が美しく映った。Since I recovered from my serious illness, all of creation is beautiful to me.
その国は森林でおおわれている。The land is clothed with woods.

鳥は首をひょいと水に浸した。The bird dipped its head into the water.
私はその場の幸福な雰囲気に浸っていた。I was immersed in the happy atmosphere of the occasion.


そのボートは浸水し始めてまもなく沈んだ。The boat began to take in water and soon sank.

日本からの輸入製品がアメリカの消費者市場に浸透するには長い時間がかかった。It took a long time for Japanese imports to penetrate the American consumer markets.
湖の深さはどのくらいですか。What is the depth of the lake?

夕闇が次第に深まっていった。The twilight merged into darkness.
ここだけの話だが彼の考え方は深みに欠ける。Between you and me, he's a shallow thinker.
我々は親睦を深めた。We deepened our friendship.
彼は深遠な学識を備えた人だ。He is a man with profound learning.

シーラカンスは深海に生息する。The coelacanth inhabits the deep sea.
深呼吸するのは健康に良い。It's healthy to breathe deeply.
事態は非常に深刻である。The situation is very serious.






深夜テレビでカウボーイの映画を見ましたか。Did you see the cowboy film on TV last night?





我々は執務中の禁煙を申し合わせた。We agreed to refrain from smoking while we are at work.
切符は、申し込み順に割り当てます。Tickets will be allotted in order of application.
あなたはあの勤め口に申し込むべきだ。You should apply for that post.

別にサービス料を申し受けます。The service charge is extra.
なぜ彼の申し出を断ったのですか。Why did you turn down his offer?彼らの申し出には両面があるぞ。Their offer cuts both ways.
私は彼女にお金を貸そうと申し出た。I offered to lend money to her.

お礼の申し上げようもありません。I can never thank you enough.





同じ頃、事務員・有村夏恵は、今月を限りに退職する旨を五鬼上に申し入れた。At the same time, the clerk Natsue Arimura told Gokijo of her intent to resign after this month.
何かご用がありましたらためらわずに私に申し付けて下さい。If there is anything you want, don't hesitate to ask me.
その人が申し分がないからといって、恋に落ちるわけではない。You don't fall in love with somebody because he's perfect.



君は自分が申し立てていることに自信がありますか。Are you sure of your facts?

こちらはスミスと申します。ジョンソンさんはおいででしょうか。This is Mr Smith speaking. Is Mr Johnson in?
申告にはどの書類が必要ですか。What forms do we need to file?

もうパスポートを申請しましたか。Have you applied for a passport yet?
日本語の申請書はありますか。May I have an application form in Japanese?
あれはさる年に因んだ猿の絵です。That's a picture of a monkey associated with the Year of the Monkey.

逆もまた真なり。The converse is also true.

外は真っ暗だった。It was pitch black outside.
いつも真っ向勝負だけでなく、たまには虚虚実実の駆け引きとやらもやってみたいよね。We have to be ready not only for a straightforward test of strength, but also for a struggle in which every strategy comes into play.
私はコンサートの真最中に劇場を出なければならなかった。I had to leave the theatre in the middle of the concert.
トムは仕事のことでは真っ正直だ。Tom is scrupulous in matters of business.
花は今や真っ盛りです。The flowers are at their best now.
真っ赤な夕焼けは明日の晴天を告げた。The deep red of the setting sun portended fine weather.そいつは真っ赤なうそだ。That's a blessed lie.
あすの朝まっさきにそれを片付けます。I'll do that first thing in the morning.
彼は真っ昼間に車を盗まれた。He had his car stolen in broad daylight.





その店はちょうど駅の真ん前にあります。The shop is just in front of the station.
彼は自分の真意を漏らしてしまった。He gave away his real intention.






私の部屋はこの真下です。My room is just below.
魅力は見る目を打つが、真価は魂を勝ち取る。Charms strike the sight, but merit wins the soul.
警察によれば、真夏のうだるような暑さがその暴動に火をつけたということだ。The police blamed the hot dog-days for sparking the riot.

鑑定をする時には、絵の真贋や保存状態等を調べる為、持ち主に本物を借りたりしなければいけなくなる。When it is appraised, in order to check the authenticity and state of preservation of the painting, the real thing has to be borrowed from its owner.
彼は真顔で馬鹿げた話をする。He keeps a straight face while telling a ridiculous story.


まさかもう彼が来たのではないでしょうね。He hasn't come already, has he?




その実験には真空が必要だ。For that experiment they need a complete vacuum.
その爆発で真空管は粉々になった。The tube was shattered by the explosion.



ジョージは勉強に真剣でない。George is not serious about his study.「親父これって・・・真剣？」「当たり前だろう、決闘なのだからな」"Dad, this a real sword?" "Of course, it is a duel after all."
おやおや。いかな体育の授業といえど・・・真剣勝負の意気込みで臨まなければ、いざ実戦と言う時に役に立ちませんよ。Well, even if it is just P.E. class, if you don't take it seriously, it won't do you any good in a real match.

彼は私の真後ろにいた。He was just behind me.

客は私の真向かいに座っていた。The visitor sat across from me.


その少年は馬鹿なまねをした。The boy made a fool of himself.

オウムはしばしば人の言葉をまねる。Parrots often imitate human speech.
彼は自殺の真似事をやった。He put on a suicide act.
その真実が明るみに出た。The fact was brought to light.私たちにとっては耳の痛い「真実」でしたが、この映画を観て地球の危機を改めて感じました。It's a painful 'truth' for us, but watching this movie brought home to me again the danger facing Earth.

私は、その報告の真実性を疑う。I doubt the truth of the report.
それは贋の真珠にすぎない。It is merely an imitation pearl.











ガラス製のシャンデリアがテーブルの真上に下がっていた。A crystal chandelier was hanging over the table.

彼女は彼に真心こめて感謝しました。She thanked him with all her heart.




その魚は真水に住む。That fish lives in fresh water.



猫がバスの真正面に走ってきてひかれた。The cat ran right in front of the bus and was run over.




真相を知っておいたほうがいい。You may as well know the truth.




真昼の太陽がテニスコートを目も眩むほどに照らしあげた。The noonday sun beat down with dazzling brightness on the tennis court.




しかもやたらと散歩好きで、真冬だというのに、こうして一日二回の散歩は欠かさずに要求してくる。Moreover, she liked walks so much that even in the middle of winter she would come like this to ask to go out twice a day without fail.
船の進路は真東だった。The course of the ship was straight east.













サムは仕事に関してまじめです。Sam is serious about his work.

私たちは真夜中にロンドンに着いた。We reached London at midnight.

ついに彼は真理を知った。At last he found out the truth.


金は色が真鍮と似ている。Gold is similar in color to brass.
人間は神ほど万能ではない。Man is not as almighty as God.


父のわずかの蔵書は主に論争神学の本から成り立っていたが、その大半を読んでいた。My father's little library consisted chiefly of books on polemic divinity, most of which I read.



彼の行為は全く神業だった。His act was nothing short of superhuman.
必ずしも成長段階の子供たちを、あまり細かい神経をつかって扱うべきでない。Growing children should not always be handled with kid gloves.







彼女は入試を控えて神経質になっていた。She was nervous before the entrance exam.

ジェーンはもっと休憩をとらないと、神経衰弱になるかもしれない。If Jane does not rest more, she may have a nervous breakdown.



京都には多くの神社がある。There are many shrines in Kyoto.



実はこれこそが科学の神髄なのである。This, in essence, is the secret of science.

インドでは牛は神聖な動物です。In India, the cow is a sacred animal.

神託は実現した。The oracle was fulfilled.

この神殿は建てるのに４６年かかりました。It has taken forty-six years to build this temple.
彼は本当に神童である。He truly is a prodigy.
日本の神道の儀式に則って、挙式をしたいという方がおられれば、この教会で出来ます。If someone wants the ceremony to be held in accordance with Japanese Shinto ritual, then that is possible at this church.



その夢は私には神秘だった。The dream was a mystery to me.

それは壁に神秘的な影を投げかける。It casts mysterious shadows on the wall.

戦後の日本はいくつかの力強い長期繁栄を経験し、その中には神武景気や岩戸景気がある。The postwar has experienced several long periods of continuous strong prosperity, among which are the Jinmu Boom and the Iwato boom.



危険が過ぎると神様は忘れられる。The danger past and God forgotten.

どの民族も独自の神話を持っている。Every nation has its own myths.
彼が紳士だなんてとんでもない。He is anything but a gentleman.

その老人たちは紳士服を生産します。Those old people manufacture men's clothes.


その君主は臣民に対して絶対の支配権を持っていた。The lord held absolute power over his subjects.
もう少し火にまきをくべなさい。Put some more wood on the fire.


アナは、親が知らないうちに結婚した。Anna married without the knowledge of her parents.
犬は人間の最も親しい友達である。Dogs are man's closest friends.ジョンは私の親しい友人です。John is a good friend of mine.
ここであなたに応対する人たちはとても親しみやすい人たちです。People who wait on you here are very friendly.
アメリカ人は大変親しみやすい。Americans are very friendly people.
彼が今日あるのも親の七光りさ。What he is today he owes to his father.





いやいや、結構結構。下の名前で呼び合うのは親近感がわいてよろしいことだ。Not at all, that's perfectly fine. Calling each other by one's given name is a good thing; it produces a feeling of fellowship.
君は親元から飛び出せるか。Can you break away from your parents?
親孝行したいときには親はなし。By the time you wish to be a good son, your parents are long gone.
狐の親子が走っていたのに気がつきましたか。Did you notice that a fox family were running?

その手袋は親指に穴があいている。The glove has a hole in the thumb.

彼は親譲りの財産をもとにして富を作った。He built on his father's fortune.

クニ子は長井さんと親戚です。Kuniko is related to Mr Nagai.

あなたの家族はきっと親切でしょう。Your family must be very nice.

私の親族は皆この町に住んでいる。All my relatives live in this city.
親知らずがはえかけてきた。My wisdom teeth are coming in.


それが親ばかというものさ。We parents sometimes become blind in loving our children too much.

親父はじっと私の顔を見た。Father looked me full in the face.
そのヤクザ達は対立するヤクザの親分を暗殺する計画の仲間に彼を入れた。The gangsters let him in on their plan to knock off a rival gang leader.

我々は親睦を深めた。We deepened our friendship.
我々は親睦会の最後に電話番号を交換した。We exchanged phone numbers at the end of the gathering.
ついに彼らの友情が壊れ、二人の親密な関係は消え失せた。Finally, their friendship ended and their close relationship disappeared.

トムとフランクは親友だ。Tom and Frank are good friends.
彼は親類の者と意見が合わない。He disagrees with his relatives.

第二が周辺環境との親和性であり、最小の廃棄物、自然エネルギーの利用等、周辺の生態と調和した住空間を形成することである。The second is the affinity with environment. By utilizing natural energy and reducing wastes, we have to make houses which harmonize with ecology.
歯医者に診てもらうべきだ。You ought to see a dentist.
医者は私ののどを診察した。The doctor examined my throat.
診察台にうつ伏せになってください。Lie on your stomach on the examination table.
その女性は一人一人を注意深く診断している。She'll diagnose each person carefully.
コンピューターは再び音を立てると、以下のような診断書が出てきた。The machine again made the usual noise and printed out the following analysis.
診療予約を取ってもらえますか。Can I make an appointment to have a medical examination?




学生達は身じろぎもせずに講義に聞き入っていた。The students sat still, listening to the lecture.

こんな身なりで外出するのは気が引ける。I'm ashamed to go out dressed like this.この店ではちゃんとした身なりをしなさい。You are expected to dress well for this shop.
冷たい風が彼のコートを通して身にしみた。The cold wind cut through his coat.
これはみんな身の回り品ですか。Are these all your belongings?
彼女は深呼吸してから、身の上を語り始めた。She took a deep breath and then started to talk about herself.
そのハイジャック犯は２００万ドルの身代金を要求した。The hijacker demanded a ransom of two million dollars.
私はペンを拾おうと身をかがめた。I bent over to pick up the pen.医者は病気の子供の上に身をかがめた。The doctor bent over the sick boy.


そもそも事故の大半は熱帯雨林ではなく、身近な場所でおこるのである。Most accidents, after all, happen around the corner, not in the rainforest.

彼の身元は我々には分からなかった。His parentage was unknown to us.




彼はもう我慢がならないという身振りをした。He made a gesture of impatience.
彼らは森の中で死体を見つけた時、身震いせずにはいられなかった。They could not help shuddering when they found a dead body in the wood.
身体障害者を助けるのが本当に楽しいのです。I really enjoy helping disabled people.
その司祭は病気の男の身代わりになった。The priest took the sick man's place.
息子はもう私と同じ身長だ。My son is now as tall as I am.
彼女はある湖に身投げした。She drowned herself in some lake.
いつくしみは、身内から始めよう。Charity begins at home.
彼は身分の高い人です。He is a man of high social status.支配人はドアを開いて身分を名乗った。The manager opened the door and identified himself.身分相応に暮らせ。Cut your coat according to your cloth.
身分証明書を二枚拝見できますか。May I see two pieces of identification?
悪名高い反乱兵はついに捕らえられ、拘置所に身柄を拘束された。The notorious rebel was ultimately captured and confined to jail.
私服警官が終始大統領の身辺を固めていた。The private detectives accompanied the President everywhere.
私は辛い食物はあまり好きではない。I don't care too much for hot food.彼女は多くの辛い思いを経験してきた。She has gone through many difficulties.

われわれはかろうじて事故を免れた。We narrowly missed the accident.
なぜ彼女にそんなにつらく当るのだ。Why are you so bitter against her?



彼は辛党だから、お土産にはワインがいいだろう。He's a drinker, so wine would probably be good for a souvenir.
他人には辛抱するようにしなさい。Try to be patient with others.

彼の辛らつな言葉が彼女を傷つけたようだ。His sharp words seemed to hurt her.
高校卒業後、彼は大学へ進み、父同様牧師になるための勉強をした。After high school, he went to college and studied to be a minister, like his father.
その勇敢なる騎士は進み出てその貴婦人の手にキスをする。The brave knight steps forward and kisses the lady on the hand.
彼は人混みをかき分けて進んだ。He made his way through the crowd.彼は１歩前へ進んだ。He took a step forward.船は目的地に向かって進んだ。The ship proceeded to her destination.
ナポレオンは軍隊をロシアに進めた。Napoleon marched his armies into Russia.その計画は進められている。The project is underway.
絶滅は進化の一部である。Extinction is part of evolution.
彼は大学院に進学しないだろう。He won't go on to graduate school.



軍隊は敵に向かって進撃した。The army advanced on the enemy.
その仕事は現在進行しています。The work is now in progress.このころ、病気の進行は遅くなった。About this time, the disease slowed.
進行状況は毎日確認され、データベースに記録されます。Progress is monitored daily and stored in a database.
その会社は中国への進出を目指している。The company aims to branch out into China.私達は決勝戦に進出した。We advanced to the finals.






その事件の進展について逐一知らせてください。Please keep me informed of the development of the case.

右から進入して来る車にはいつも道を譲りなさい。Always give way to traffic coming from the right.
科学の進歩は止まることがない。Advance in science is continuous.
どの進路を選んでも危険が待ち受けている。Whichever way we choose will involve danger.進路のことで先生に助言を求めた。I asked my teacher for advice on my future course.
針で親指を突いてしまった。I pricked my thumb with a needle.変な魚が針にかかっている。A strange fish is on the hook.彼女は時計の針を１０分進ませた。She advanced the hand ten minutes.

私達は二本の柱の間に針金を張った。We extended a wire between two posts.
お前は何でも針小棒大に言う悪い癖がある。You have a habit of exaggerating everything.



震えが背筋を走った。A shiver ran down my spine.
少年は物音に震えた。The boy quivered at the sound.
彼女はその事故のことを思って震え上がった。She shuddered at the thought of the accident.
彼女は怒りに声を震わせていた。Her voice was shaking with anger.

















調べてみたら人違いだった。When I inquired I found that it was the wrong person.

レギュラーになるなら、人一倍頑張らなくっちゃ。If I'm to become a regular, I have to work twice as hard as the rest.
多くの会社が人員を最低限にまで縮小した。A lot of companies have pared their staff down to a minimum.





この辺りには人家がない。There are no houses around here.

ケンは人懐っこい人であるようだ。Ken appears a friendly person.


人垣をかき分けて出なくちゃね。You have to blast your way out.
それは彼の人格を阻害することになる。It runs against his character.


私は彼のことを人格者とみなしている。I regard him as a man of character.
どんなに財産があっても、貪欲な人間は満足できない。世界中の財宝を集めても幸福にはなれない。No amount of wealth can satisfy a covetous man. All the treasure in the world won't make him happy.


『うぐいす侍』人間愛とユーモア溢れる侍物語。"The Nightingale Samurai" is a samurai tale full of humanity and humour.


このことがよい人間関係を生みだす。This makes good human relations.


あなたは徹底した人間嫌いですね。You're a complete misanthrope.

言語は人間社会にとって欠くことのできない道具である。Language is an indispensable instrument of human society.
その詩人は常に何よりも人間性を大事に考える。The poet always takes account of humanism before everything.
その男には同情心といった人間的感情はなかった。The man was devoid of such human feelings as sympathy.
人間同士が戦うところを天使が空から眺めている。Angels watch from above as men fight amongst themselves.



彼の人間味はあなたとは比べもんにならない。His humanness is not to be compared with yours.


人気がでて彼女はうぬぼれた。The popularity turned her head.
こんな人気のないところで一体何をしているの？What on earth are you doing in such a lonely place?
ディズニーランドでは一時になるといろいろな物語の中の人気者達が行列をなして行進します。In Disneyland, popular characters in various stories march in procession at one o'clock.





伝説では、彼女は人魚だったと言われる。The legend says that she was a mermaid.


メアリーは私にアメリカの人形をくれた。Mary gave me an American doll.







ある学者が人権についてすばらしい演説を行った。A scholar made an excellent speech about human rights.
私は人権侵害に反対だ。I don't agree with violation of human rights.




彼女は人見知りをする。She is shy of strangers.



紀元２０２０年までには、この市の人口は倍増しているだろう。By the year 2020, the population of our city will have doubled.





英国の南東区は人口密度が高い。The South East region of England is densely populated.




人工栄養で育てています。I'm bottle-feeding my baby.

現在では我々が作った人工衛星が地球の周辺を回転している。Today our artificial satellites are revolving around the earth.

彼は人工呼吸で子供を生き返らせた。He revived the child with artificial respiration.



彼らは人工芝の上に横たわっていた。I found them lying on the artificial grass.
ベンソンとホームズは人工受精が両親に及ぼす心理的影響を分析した。Benson and Holmes analyzed the psychological effect of artificial insemination on parents.




私たちは人工雪でスキーをした。We skied on artificial snow.
ＡＩは人工知能の略です。AI stands for artificial intelligence.


人工的な光は電力という手段によって作られた。Artificial light is produced by means of electricity.








私は人込みを割って前進した。I made my way through the crowd.





この重役のポストに適当な人物を見つけるには、人材斡旋業者に依頼する必要がある。We'll need a head hunting agency to find the right man for this executive position.


彼は、人殺しも同然だ。He is no better than a murderer.
人参はビタミンＡをたくさん含んでいる。Carrots contain a lot of vitamin A.


僕のボスは人使いが荒いんだ。My boss is a slave driver.


人事を尽くして天命を待つ。Man proposes, God disposes.山田さんは人事課長です。Mr Yamada is in charge of the personnel section.
君はまるで人ごとみたいな顔をしているね。You look as if it were none of your business.


俺は人事課の馬鹿野郎にあごで指図されるつもりはない。I will not be dictated to by some idiot in the personnel department.




人質は解放されるだろう。The hostages will be released.




あなたの人種、年齢、宗教は問いません。I don't care about your race, age, or religion.


あんな人種差別の発言をするなんて、あの政治家も取り返しのつかないことを口にしたものだ。That politician put his foot in his mouth when he made those racist comments.

黒人に対するひどい人種的憎悪はまだ存在している。There is still serious racial hatred against black people.


話し手の周りには人だかりがしていた。A crowd of people gathered around the speaker.
大勢の人出ですよ。We're filled to the rafters.






隣近所に対して見栄を張るのは人情ですよ。It's only natural to keep up with the Joneses.

















できるあいだに人生を楽しみなさい。Enjoy your life while you are able to.

君の人生観は僕のと違っているね。Your philosophy of life varies from mine.




私は床についてからも応接間の人声が意識に会った。Even after I went to bed, I was conscious of the voices in the parlor.


彼は３人前注文した。He ordered three dinners.
人前で歌うのは苦手です。I don't like to sing in public.


その泥棒の人相とか服装を簡単に話してくれますか。Can you give me a brief description of the thief?

その男は人相書に合っている。The man answers the description.

評論家たちは、保護貿易主義について人騒がせのうそを言っています。Critics are just crying wolf about protectionism.
これらの真珠は人造ではなく本物です。These pearls are genuine, not artificial.








この科学物質が人体に有害であるという事実は、すべての人に知られている。Everyone knows that this chemical is harmful to man.



良い医者は患者に説明する時、人体模型を使うなどして、わかりやすく説明してくれる。Good doctors explain things to patients in easily understandable ways, using anatomical models and such.


あの人たちが昨日あなたが会った方々ですか。Are those the people you saw yesterday?





ほんの、とるに足らないものが、しばしば人中で、大きなことをいう。A person who is only a pawn in the game often talks big in company.

その道路は人通りはなかった。The road was clear of traffic.



その知らせは人づてに聞いたよ。I heard the news through the grapevine.
彼は人当たりがよい。He is an agreeable person.





それは罪人に対する最も人道的な刑罰ではないか。Isn't that the most humane punishment for criminals?
難民に人道的援助を行いました。We have supplied humanitarian aid to refugees.

やがて、動物の肉を食べることは人肉を食べるのと同じようにひどいと見られるようになるだろう。In due course, eating meat will be considered as horrible as eating human flesh.
他人任せはダメ。ライフセーバーではないが、俺自身が介抱してあげないと。I can't leave this to others. I'm no lifesaver but if I don't help her myself....






彼は人付き合いに辟易している。He's fed up with socializing.


あの人はどんな人物か教えて下さい？Tell me what that man is like.
人物画を描けるスクールを探しています。I'm looking for a school where I can paint portraits.





歴史学は人文科学の一部門である。History is a branch of the humanities.





彼女は魅力的な人柄である。She has a magnetic personality.






彼は社外で人脈を築いている。He's building up a network of acquaintances outside his office.
専制君主は人民を弾圧した。The tyrant kept the people down.











その勝利は多数の人命を犠牲にしてかちとられた。The victory was won at the cost of many lives.
彼は人命救助で賞賛された。He was praised for saving a life.






彼は人里離れた農家に住んでいる。He lives in a farmhouse remote from the world.



人類だけが火の使い方を知っている。Only man knows how to use fire.


この本は人類学を扱っている。This book deals with anthropology.
その人類学者は原始文化に関する講演をした。The anthropologist delivered a lecture on primitive cultures.




巧言令色少なし仁。Fair words butter no parsnips.



盗人にも仁義。There is honor even among thieves.












私のナイフの刃は、とても鋭い。My knife has such a fine edge.
彼女はいつも人に対してやいばをといでいます。She always has some axe to grind.




そのように刃物を振り回すことは危険だ。It is dangerous to wield an edged tool in such a way.
彼女は玄関のごみをはいた。She swept the dirt from the porch.

１年が過ぎ、彼の死体は塵と化した。A year had passed by and his body turned to dust.

私は彼にどこへ駐車したら良いか尋ねた。I asked him where I should park my car.

ジェーンの死は尋常ではない。Jane didn't die a natural death.

警察は彼を詳しく尋問した。The police questioned him closely.
私は彼のスピーチにいたく感動した。I was deeply impressed by his speech.
彼はやたらに故事来歴に詳しいけれど、それが人生の役に立っているのかはなはだ疑問だね。He has a great storehouse of knowledge about historical details but I seriously doubt that's of any use in life.
あんなことを彼女に言うなんて非常識も甚だしい。It's quite absurd of you to tell her that sort of thing.


その会社は甚大な被害を被った。The company suffered big losses.

毎晩飲み歩いてばかりいたら、奥さんに愛想尽かされるぞ。If you stay out drinking every night, your wife is going to leave you.
私たちの悩みはつきない。There is no end to our troubles.

トロール漁船は沿岸の魚をとりつくしました。Fishing trawlers have fished out all the local waters.あらゆる所の人々が世界平和に尽くす民衆の指導者を切望している。People everywhere yearn for public leaders dedicated to world peace.
彼は平和を促進するために尽力した。He worked hard to promote peace.
腎臓が悪いのです。I have kidney trouble.

間髪を入れず、迅速かつ的確な応対、畏れ入ります。Such an accurate, lightning-quick reply. What can I say?

クリントン陣営は、両州でオバマが取った白人票を取り崩そうと必死になった。The Clinton camp became desperate to eliminate the white votes Obama had got in both states.


敵が守っている陣地はたいへん重要なので、その陣地を守るために敵はあくまで戦う。The position held by the enemy is so important they will fight to the bitter end to hold it.


陣痛が３０分おきに起こります。I have labor pains every thirty minutes.


酢はすっぱい味がする。Vinegar has a sharp taste.




図で説明しましょう。Let me explain it with a diagram.

彼は象牙に図案を彫った。He carved designs in ivory.

この図解は地球の深い内部を示している。The illustration shows the deep interior.
昔は、平気で昆虫触れたのに、今は、図鑑を見るだけでもだめ。When I was a kid, touching bugs didn't bother me a bit. Now I can hardly stand looking at pictures of them.


これらの図式は求職に関する様々なアプローチを示している。These diagrams demonstrate different possible approaches to job seeking.
私のところの図書は自由にお使い下さい。You're welcome to any book in my library.
私たちの学校には立派な図書館があります。We have a nice school library.

図書室ではしゃべるな。Don't talk in the reading room.




図表２を見ると、これらの貿易サイクルのいくつかは非常に短期のものであることが判明する。A glance at Chart 2 will reveal that some of these trade cycles are very short-lived.
その図柄はまったくよく似ている。The figures are exactly alike.

実施設計とは基本設計で決まった計画を、工事ができる図面に書く作業です。Detailed design is the work of drawing up a diagram that is capable of being manufactured from the plan set in the baseline design.



息を吹きかけて両手を暖めた。I blew on my hands to warm them.
あらしは２日間吹きまくった。The storm blew for two days.
外では冷たい北風が轟々と吹き荒れていた。The cold north wind was roaring outside.
新鮮な空気が吹き込んでくる。Fresh air is blowing in.船長は疲れている乗組員に新たな活力を吹き込んだ。The captain breathed new life into his tired crew.彼は自信を吹き込んでくれた。He inspired me with confidence.
風が葉を吹き散らした。The wind scattered the leaves about.
強風が陸の方へ吹き始めた。A strong wind began to set in.
ろうそくは風に吹き消されれた。The candle was blown out by the wind.



その木は吹きたおされた。The tree was blown down.


テロリストが手榴弾を投げる前に爆発してしまい、片腕を吹き飛ばされてしまった。The grenade blew up before the terrorist could throw it, and his arm was blown off!
風でかさが彼女の手から吹き飛んだ。The wind blew the umbrella out of her hand.

雲は風に吹き払われた。The clouds were driven away by the wind.
おぼれかけた人は息を吹き返した。The man who nearly drowned began to breathe.
丘の頂上に着いた時、風はいっそう吹きつのった。The wind blew harder yet when we reached the top of the hill.

あの日は強い風が吹いていました。There was a strong wind that day.ローズはしゃぼん玉を吹いていた。Rose was blowing bubbles.テッドはトランペットを吹くのが好きです。Ted likes playing the trumpet.
爆発がとてもすさまじかったので、屋根が吹っとんだ。Such was the explosion that the roof was blown off.
吹雪はまる一週間荒れ狂った。The snowstorm raged for a full week.

吹奏楽隊が通りを行進している。A brass band is marching along the street.
彼は吹奏楽団に所属しています。He belongs to the brass band.


彼女は御茶にレモンの汁をたらした。She dropped lemon juice into her tea.


彼の左目に髪がたれていた。A wisp of hair fell over his left eye.濡れたタオルから滴が垂れている。Water is dripping from the wet towel.
その少女はすらりとたれさがった髪をしていた。The girl had flowing hair.








ヘリコプターは垂直に離陸し、着陸することができる。A helicopter is able to take off and land straight up and down.

厳密に言えば、それは垂直線ではなかった。Strictly speaking, it was not a vertical line.

まずは自ら見本を示す。そういった率先垂範の気持ちがなければ誰も君には付いてこないよ。You have to think of the example you're setting. You'll never be able to lead if you don't set an example worth following.




彼女のイントネーションから推すに少女時代はスペイン語圏に住んでいたと思われる。You can tell by her intonation that she lived in a Spanish speaking country when she was young.
企業倒産は先月も高水準に推移した。Corporate bankruptcies continued at a high level last month.
バリー・テイラーの名が議長職に推挙されている。Barry Taylor's name has been put forward for the post of chairman.

彼の表情から本当に怒っているのだと推察した。I gathered from his expression that he was very angry.


法案通過を推進しているロビイストは、運動資金に賄賂の金をまぎれこませました。Lobbyists for the bill funneled bribes into a campaign fund.

調査担当者はどのルートが一番容易に、すなわち一番安上がりに作れるかも、鉄道の推進者にアドバイスしうるであろう。The surveyor could also advise the promoters which route could be most easily―and therefore most cheaply―constructed.
私達は彼を議長に推薦した。We recommended him as chairman.

課長からもらった推薦状が物を言った。The recommendation from my boss made all the difference.
あなたも同意見だと推測します。I gather you'll agree with me.
彼の死は事故だとする君の推定は間違っているようだ。Your assumption that his death was an accident seems to be wrong.推定によれば、今年の鉄鋼生産は１億トンに達するだろう。According to an estimate, steel production will reach 100 million tons this year.
彼女は推理作家として有名になった。She became famous as a mystery writer.
あなたの推量は的はずれだ。Your guess is quite wrong.
言語がどのように始まったのかについてはいくつも推論はあるが、実はだれもあまり知らない。There are many guesses about how language began, but the fact is that no one really knows.

水を加えてペースト状になるまでかき回しなさい。Add water and stir to a paste.

それは結局水掛け論だ。It will only mean an endless debate.
水たまりに映った影が見えた。Reflections could be seen in the puddles.
人の話に水を差さないでくれ。Don't throw a wet blanket over our conversation.
海の氷はきわめて変わりやすい――寒く風のない天候のときは固く凍っているが、嵐のときは外洋の広い水域で割れてしまう。The sea ice is highly variable - frozen solid during cold, calm weather and broken up in large areas of open water during storms.

水泳が私の楽しみの１つです。Swimming is one thing I enjoy.
まだ水温低いから泳ぐつもりはないんよ？The water temperature's still low so you're not going to swim, are you?



我々は水害の被害者に食物と衣類を支給した。We provided the flood victims with food and clothing.
水割りをもう一杯ください。Another Scotch and water, please.

水牛は牛に似ている。A buffalo is akin to an ox.

彼女のスカートは黄色で水玉模様がついている。Her skirt is yellow with polka dots.



川の始まるところが、水源である。The place where a river starts is its source.

私は水彩画が好きです。I like the picture painted in water colors.
彼らは水際でキャンプをした。They camped at the water's edge.
今日の午後、彼女に庭の水まきをさせよう。She shall water the garden this afternoon.







彼女は子供を水死させてしまった。She allowed her child to be drowned.

水車小屋は皆自分の水車に水を引く。Every miller draws water to his own mill.
君の仕事は期待している水準に達していない。Your work comes short of the expected standard.




熱は水を水蒸気に変える。Heat turns water into steam.
頭上の空は濃い水色だった。The sky above was a deep blue.
川が氾濫して広い地域が水浸しになった。The river flooded a large area.









酸素と水素から水ができる。Oxygen and hydrogen make water.

水槽にボウフラがうようよしている。The water tank teems with mosquito larvae.
あのパブではビールを水増ししているのではないか。I suspect they water down the beer in that pub.
水族館へ行く道を教えて頂けますか？Can you show me the way to the aquarium?
彼女は赤い水着を着ていた。She was dressed in a red bathing suit.
魚は水中でなければ生きられない。Fish cannot live out of water.


水虫が痛みます。My athlete's foot hurts.
気密性でない窓ならば、水滴ができるだろう。If your windows are not airtight, moisture will seep in.


水筒にはほとんど水が残っていない。There is little water left in the canteen.
昨日水道を止められた。The water was cut off yesterday.

水道管が凍って破裂したんです。The water pipes froze and then burst.



水瓶に水を満たしなさい。Fill the jars with water.

トムは水夫の役を演じた。Tom acted the part of a sailor.
水分をたくさん取ってください。You should drink a lot of liquid.


水は水平になろうとする。Water tries to find its own level.

太陽が水平線の下に沈んだ。The sun sank below the horizon.


町全体が水没した。The entire town was under water.


魚が水面から飛び上がった。A fish leaped out of the water.
彼女は水面下にもぐった。She sank under the surface of the water.


あなたからご都合が悪いというお知らせがなければ水曜の夕方に参ります。I will come on Wednesday evening unless I hear from you to the contrary.
ダービー競馬の日は２週間後の水曜日だ。Derby Day is Wednesday fortnight.




川幅が広くなるにつれて、水流はいっそう緩やかになった。As the river become broader, the current moved slowly.




船は水路を下った。The ship sailed down the channel.

その子には水疱瘡の症状がある。The child has a case of chicken pox.



私は炊事が全然できない。I'm all thumbs in the kitchen.
炊飯器のスイッチを入れてね。Turn on the rice cooker, please.
睡眠は薬に勝る。Sleep is better than medicine.

睡眠不足が響いてきた。Lack of sleep began to tell on me.
医者達は私に睡眠薬しか出してくれなかった。Doctors have offered me nothing but sleeping pills.
今日の格好はとっても粋ですね。You're looking snappy today.

私は体力が衰えた。My physical power has decayed.





じきにその衰弱は回復しますよ。You will recover from your weakness soon.





４７５年はローマ帝国の「衰退」を示す年ではあっても、「滅亡」を意味する年ではありません。Although 475AD is the year that shows the 'decline' of the Roman Empire, it is not the year of its 'fall'.

近年多くのそれぞれの地方の伝統が衰微してきている。Many local traditions have fallen into decay in recent years.



浪士は本懐を遂げた。The rōnin attained their long-cherished ambition.
ついに病気で疲れた男たちは彼が待っている山岳都市に到着した。Finally, the sick, tired men reached the mountain town where he was waiting.
クーデターは慎重に遂行された。The coup was meticulously executed.
まるで酔っているようだ。She looks as if she were drunk.
酔っぱらいはよろよろと彼のところへやって来た。The drunk rolled up to him.
彼は非常に酔っぱらっていたので家まで車を運転していくことはできなかった。He was too drunk to drive home.



随意に退席してかまいません。You may leave your seat at will.
彼が当代随一の作家のひとりであるのは言うまでもない。Needless to say he is one of the best writers of the present generation.


なお、会社説明会後でも、会社見学は随時受け付けております。Furthermore, even after the company information session, we sometimes hold company tours.随時に退席してもかまいません。You may leave your seat at will.

論文だなんて・・・私が書いてるのは、ただの随想、エッセイみたいなもんですよ。Theses! ... What I write are just my ramblings, they're just something like essays.
この随筆は一個の旅行かばんについてのものです。This essay is about a piece of luggage.
私たちはもうずいぶん長くここにいます。We've been here long enough.あなたはこの１年に英語が随分進歩した。You've made remarkable progress in English in the past year.
みずみずしい桃をかじった時の味が何とも言えません。I love the taste when I bite into a juicy peach.


彼は皆から神のようにあがめられている。He is worshiped as a god by everyone.
その勇敢な母親に私は深い崇敬の念をいだいた。I felt profound reverence for the courageous mother.
その人たちは崇高な心をもつべきだ。They should have a noble mind.
その部族は祖先を崇拝している。That tribe worships its ancestors.
彼は借財がかさんでいた。His debts were piling up.
この箱はかさばりすぎて運べない。This box is too bulky to carry.
あの子は２０まで数えられる。That child can count to twenty.


空には数え切れないほど星が出ている。There are more stars in the sky than I can count.

彼女が最も気に入ったのは数の子でした。What she liked best was herring roe.

彼には数回会ったことがある。I've met him on several occasions.
数学は彼女の弱点です。Mathematics is her weak point.

私は数奇な運命にもてあそばれてきた。I have lived a life of a puppet of fortune.


この発電所だけで数個の市に電力を供給している。This power station alone provides several cities with electricity.
私はいつも手元に数冊の辞書をおいている。I always keep several dictionaries at hand.

小切手の金額は数字と文字の両方で書いて下さい。Write the amount on the check in letters as well as figures.数字は天文学的なものだろう。The figure will be astronomical.

修道士のように頭巾をかぶった雲は、ポツリポツリと落ちる雨を数珠のようにつまぐっている。The hooded clouds, like friars, tell their beads in drops of rain.
私は東京に数人の友人がいる。I have a few friends in Tokyo.

ギャングたちは銀行から数千ドルを奪った。Gangsters robbed a bank of thousands of dollars.

人生には数多くの不可解なことが起こる。There are many mysteries in life.
インフレを考慮した数値です。It's an inflation-adjusted figure.血圧計の数値は？What's the reading on the blood pressure monitor?



数日留守にします。I am leaving town for a few days.
数日間休みを取ります。I'm taking a couple of days off.
数日後、彼には知性が欠けている事に彼女は気付きました。After a few days, she realized that he lacks in intelligence.
私は数年前にゴルフを始めた。I began playing golf years ago.
彼は研究の目的でねずみを数匹飼っている。He keeps some mice for the purpose of studying.
ちなみに、ウチのクリニックから数百メートルの近場に「ランプ」が建設中です。Incidentally a motorway ramp is being constructed in the neighbourhood, a few hundred metres away, of my clinic.

彼は数秒待ち、それからドアを開けた。He waited for several seconds and opened the door.
ここの数枚の銅貨がある。Here are a few coppers.
彼には、自分のために働いてくれる部下が数名いる。He has several men to work for him.








国家の文化とアイデンティティという枢要な問題から切り離された時点で、比較文化はその方向性を失う。Once divorced from key questions of national culture and identity, comparative literature loses its way.
世論の趨勢は体罰反対の方向である。The trend of public opinion is against corporal punishment.
ヒヨコが餌を探して地面をつついている。The chickens were scratching for food on the ground.ルチアーノは大声援を背負って戦えるかもしれないが、彼はまだヒヨコに過ぎない。Luciano might have the crowd behind him, but he's still wet behind the ears.


３月３日はひな祭りです。March 3 is the day of the Dolls' Festival.


中央には机が据えられていて、赤い革張りの回転椅子がそえてあった。A desk stood in the centre, with a red leather swivel chair.
バス料金は２年間据えおかれてきた。Bus rates have stayed the same for two years.

昔そこにはスギの大木があった。There used to be a large cedar tree there.


彼の態度はすこぶる無骨だ。He is very blunt in his manner.
スズメの鳴き声一つしなかった。Not a single sparrow was to be heard.
雀の涙ほどの給料では何の役にも立たない。The chicken feed I get for a salary is good for nothing.
家では赤味がかった髪とそばかすのせいで、母が侮蔑を込めて「にんじん」と名付け、皆にもそう呼ばせています。At home, because of his reddish hair and freckles, his mother scornfully named him "carrot" and had everybody else call him that.
スズメバチにこっぴどく刺された。I got a nasty sting from a wasp.

カレンの裾が捲れている。Karen's skirt is riding up.



あの社長秘書はいつも澄ましている。That president's secretary is always prim.

秋の空は澄み渡っている。The autumn sky is clear and serene.
水が底まで澄んでいる。The water is clear to the bottom.



その寸劇は５年生全員によって上演された。The skit was presented by fifth grade students.


彼の古い車はポンコツ寸前。His old car is on its last legs.

これを寸断してくれ。Cut this into very fine pieces.



あなたの寸法を計るのを許して下さい。Please allow me to measure you.



世の中全体がおかしくなっているんだよ。The whole world is off its rocker.
愛の力は世界を動かす。Love makes the world go round.

アメリカは天然資源では世界一だ。America is second to none in natural resources.
船で世界一周をしてみたい。I'd like to sail around the world.
パリは世界最大の都市の一つである。Paris is one of the largest cities in the world.
世界史をやらないと卒業できません。World history is required for graduation.

再び世界大戦が起こりませんように。May there never be another world war!
トルストイは世界的名声を博した。Tolstoy achieved worldwide fame.



世間話をしなくてもいいからね。You don't have to chat with them.
彼は１９世紀に生まれた。He was born in the 19th century.
１９世紀末になって初めて植物の品種改良は科学の一分野となった。Not until the end of the nineteenth century, did plant breeding become a scientific discipline.







歌舞伎界では才能だけでなく世襲も重要だ。In Kabuki not only talent but also heredity counts.







幸福と言うものを世俗的な成功と言う点から考えるのは間違っていた。It was wrong to try to judge happiness in terms of worldly success.


あの人たちは同じ世代です。Those men are of a generation.

世知辛い世の中だね。This is a rough world we are living in.






その世論調査は無作為に選ばれた成人に基づいてなされた。The opinion poll was based on a random sample of adults.
日本では親は年をとると、通例子供たちの世話になる。When parents get old in Japan, they are customarily looked after by their children.私たちが留守の間、誰が犬の世話をするの？Who'll take care of the dog while we're gone?彼は友達の親切な世話でその職に就いた。He obtained the post through the good offices of a friend.

赤ん坊の世話を焼けるのが嬉しい。I'm very happy that I can take care of the baby.いらぬ世話をやくな。Mind your own business.



人生沈む瀬あれば浮かぶ瀬あるわけだから、あまりくよくよしないように。Don't be so glum about it. Life has its ups and downs.
名古屋と言えば、あなたは瀬戸へ行ったことはありますか。Speaking of Nagoya, have you ever been to Seto?
のるかそるかの瀬戸際まできた。The situation has come to the point where we either sink or swim.

その店は瀬戸物を使っている。The store carries earthenware.



川はうねるように平野を流れている。The river meanders across the plain.




これは、お前の体躯、護衛能力を考慮した上でのプランなのだ。是が非でもやってもらう。This is a plan that takes into account your stature and your ability to guard. By all means do it for me.
製造業に比べて大きく遅れをとっている非製造業における生産性向上、それも設備投資の活性化により内外価格差の是正と成長力を確保するというのがベストシナリオだ。The best way for adjusting the gap between the internal and the external price and securing economic growth is to promote the non-manufacturing industry's productivity by aggressive investing in facilities.

「キャッチボールしようか」「よし、是非やろう」"How about playing catch?" "Sure, why not?"
そんなすごい目で睨み付けないでください。Don't look so fiercely at me.今すごい名案がうかんだぞ。I've just come up with a great idea.マドンナのコンサートはすごい数の客を集めた。Madonna's concert drew a large audience.





とってもいい会社ですよ。社長は凄腕だし、社員はみんな一生懸命だよ。It's a very good company! The president is a real go-getter and the workers all put in their best.
その企業は週５日労働制を実施した。The enterprises carried the five-day workweek.
毒をもって毒を制すだ！We've got to fight fire with fire!彼は理性で情欲を制することが出来る。He is able to subordinate passion to reason.彼らは国会で過半数を制した。They commanded a majority in the Diet.
軍隊は反乱を制圧した。The army had the revolt well in hand.





制限スピードを超えるなよ。Don't go beyond the speed limit.



あなたの車は制限速度を超えた。Your car exceeded the speed limit.





国連は制裁を加えるために動き出しました。The U. N. moved to impose sanctions.
彼の次の制作は非常に意欲的なミュージカルだった。His next production was a very ambitious musical.



警察は群衆を制止した。The police held back the crowd.

その法律は明治時代に制定された。The law was enacted in the Meiji era.
新制度は成功だと分かった。The new system proved a success.





私たちの学校では制服を着る。We wear uniforms at our school.


合衆国には小火器の販売に関する法律上の制約はほとんどない。There are few legal constraints on the sale of firearms in the U.S.





あらしの勢いが弱まった。The storm abated.勢いに流されているんですよ。You are carried along with the slide.


水道の水が勢いよく出ている。The water is running with great force.







地球側の圧政に苦しむコロニーの人々の中で、テロによる現状打破を目論む勢力が誕生。Among the people of the colonies suffering under Earth's tyranny a force emerges intending to overthrow the status quo through terrorism.


それ以来我々の勢力範囲は拡大してきた。Our sphere of influence has expanded so much since then.
あなたの姓はどう発音するのですか。How do you pronounce your last name?



ノルマン人は１０６６年にイングランドを征服した。The Normans conquered England in 1066.彼はエベレストを征服した。He conquered Mt. Everest.

そんなことが気になってしまうのが人の性ですね・・・。It is human nature to be bugged by such things.
習い性となる。Habit is second nature.最近の漫画は暴力や性の描写が多すぎる。Recent comics have too many violent and sexual scenes.３番目に考慮すべき事柄は、カーペットの時代性である。The age of the carpet is a third thing to consider.


あいつもアバウトな性格だよな。He's not a very meticulous guy.
「昨日の今日だし・・・その・・・性器が痛かったりは？」「まだ、少しヒリヒリしますけど」"It's right after yesterday so ... that is ... do your genitals hurt or ...?" "It still smarts a little but..."
性急な判断は危険です。Quick judgements are dangerous.

性交の最中彼女はつまらなそうな顔をしていた。She looked bored while we were making love.


梅毒は性行為を通じて感染する病気です。Syphilis is an infection that can be transmitted through sexual intercourse.
こいつの性根が悪いから非モテなんだろ。I expect it's his lousy personality that drives off the ladies.

彼は性質が頑固だ。He is obstinate in disposition.



彼女は科学における性的偏見について書いた。She wrote on gender bias in science.彼女はエレベーターの中で性的いやがらせを受けた。She was sexually harassed in an elevator.



この車はあの車より性能がよい。This car has a better performance than that one.

性病にかかっているかもしれません。I'm afraid I've contracted a venereal disease.
彼は得な性分だ。He has an optimistic turn of mind.
彼の変わった性癖が彼らを困らせた。His strange habit confounded them.
国籍や性別または職業などで人を差別してはいけない。Don't discriminate against people based on nationality, gender, or occupation.

気になる男性の性欲を刺激するにはどうすればよいのでしょうか？What should I do to arouse desire in the man I'm interested in?
あなたは、目的を成し遂げましたか。Did you accomplish your purpose?
あの男も人から金をもらう所まで成り下がった。That man was reduced to begging for money.

彼は日雇い労働者から知事になりあがった。He rose from day laborer to governor.
このクラスは３５名の生徒から成り立っている。This class is made up of thirty-five pupils.君の理論は成り立たないと思う。I think your theory does not hold water.そんな場所で本屋をやっても商売が成り立たないだろう。A bookstore in that location wouldn't make enough money to survive.
あなたがいなくなるととても寂しくなります。When you go, I'll miss you very much.１週間してそのニュースは本当になった。The news turned out true in a week.１チームは９人の選手から成る。Nine players make up a team.
なるべく安いほうがいいです。I would like the least expensive one.


努力したが何の成果も得られなかった。My efforts produced no results.
土地で彼は成り金になった。Land made him a rich man.
Ｃａｌｌ　ｕｐは電話をかけるという意味の成句です。"Call up" is a phrase that means to telephone.

成功。おめでとうございます。Let me congratulate you on your success.人生における成功とはかならずしも富の獲得と同じものではない。Success in life is not necessarily the same thing as the acquirement of riches.

滑り出しが好調なら事は半ば成就したのに等しい。Well begun is half done.
進んで責任を取るということは成熟の印である。Willingness to take responsibility is a sign of maturity.
その映画は成人しかみられない。Only adults may watch that film.サンドラは成人して美人になりました。Sandra has grown up to be a beautiful woman.
１０年前の成人の日に区役所からボールペンをもらった。Ten years ago the ward office gave us ballpoint pens on the Coming of Age Day.
学校の成績は普通でしたよ。My school grades were average.
明日成績表をもらいます。Tomorrow we will receive our report cards.

ジェーンは成長して素敵な女性になった。Jane grew up to be a fine lady.


なるほど彼は若いが、用心深い。Indeed he is young, but he is prudent.
あなたの娘さんはいつ成年に達したのですか。When did your daughter come of age?


グリーンピースは鉄分が豊富で爪の色がよくなる成分が含まれている。Green peas are high in iron and contain nutrients that improve the colour of fingernails.

新しい法が成立した。A new law has come into existence.

その劇は政界を風刺したものだ。The play is a satire on the political world.


彼の政権はきっと崩壊する。His regime is bound to collapse.

彼は新しい政策を決定していた。He had decided on a new policy.
各種の調査では、民間セクターが政策決定にほとんど影響力をもたないことが示されている。It has been demonstrated in various studies that the private sector has little influence over policy making.
政治について討論しよう。I suggest we discuss politics.
その政治家は何年間も、麻薬の密売買をしてきた。That politician has been trafficking in drugs for years.
意味のある変革がなされるならば、私は政治改革に総じて賛成だ。In the main, I am in favor of political reform if meaningful changes are made.
今学期は政治学を取っていますか。Are you taking politics this semester?
国会の動きはこの問題をめぐる与野党間の政治的綱引きとなった。Parliamentary activity has become a political tug of war between the ruling and opposition parties over the issue.

外国資本家は現地の政情不安が理由で手を引きました。Foreign investors backed off because of regional political unrest.

パーティーの席上にて政敵の一人が、大勢の招待客の前で彼を侮辱した。At the party, one of his political opponents humiliated him in the presence of many guests.
２つのグループが団結して１つの政党になった。Two groups united to form a party.
政府は倒された。The government was overthrown.
その政府高官は総選挙の可能性を否定した。The high-ranking government official ruled out the possibility of a general election.





私の姉は毎週、髪を整えてもらう。My sister has her hair done each week.私たちはスキーの装備を整えた。We fitted ourselves out for skiing.





その別荘は清潔で整然としていた。The cottage was clean and tidy.
整地すれば、その土地は値段が上がるだろう。Cleared, the site will be valuable.
部屋は全く整頓されていなかった。The room was anything but tidy.
彼は自分の車をよく整備している。He maintains his car well.
部屋の整理をしたほうがいいよ。You should set your room in order.
最悪・・・入場制限を設けるしかないでしょう。整理券の配布とかで。What a mess... I suppose there's nothing for it but restricting admissions. Handing out numbered tickets or something.



軍隊は戦闘の配置で整列していた。The troops were in battle array.
昨夜、屋上から星を観察した。Last night, we watched the stars from the rooftop.その星は必ずしも肉眼で見えるわけではない。We cannot necessarily see the star with the naked eye.ドアには大きな金色の星がついていました。There was a big gold star on the door.


夜ともなれば彼は好奇心を抱いて星空を見上げたこともあろうと思う。There were times, at falling night, when he looked up with curiosity to the stars.

古代の天文学者は、星座を見つけ、名前をつけた。Ancient astronomers noticed constellations and gave them names.

合衆国の国旗は星条旗と呼ばれる。The national flag of the USA is called the Stars and Stripes.


星占いによると彼女と僕はあまり相性がよくないようだ。According to the stars, she and I aren't supposed to have much chemistry between us.



彼は父の死の恨みを晴らした。He avenged his father's death.
その日は晴れだったので、私たちは泳ぎに行った。It was a fine day, so we went swimming.
明日は晴れるだろう。It will be fine tomorrow.彼の憂うつは彼女がキスをすると晴れた。His depression came to an end when she kissed him.指輪を盗んだというトムの自白で女中の容疑は晴れた。Tom's acknowledgement that he stole the ring cleared the maid of suspicion.
暗雲が立ちこめていた後には、すっきりとした晴れ間になる。After dark clouds, you get periods of refreshing clear weather.
すぐ晴れ上がりそうです。It looks like it is going to clear up soon.




晴耕雨読の人生にも少々は憧れるけれど、僕にはそんな生き方、３日ももたないだろうな。I sometimes wish I could live a quiet retired sort of life but I doubt I could stand it for more than a few days.
雨天の後には晴天が来る。After rain comes fair weather.


その日は天気晴朗、上空には雲一つなかった。The day was bright, nor were there clouds above.

これが正しいかどうか自信がないんだ。I'm not sure if this is correct.
彼女はまさしく支払わされたのだ。She was jolly well made to pay.
間違いがあれば正しなさい。Correct errors, if any.
ＤＴＰで本を作れば、安いし早いし、まさに一挙両得だ。Desktop publishing lets you produce books quickly and cheaply. It's like killing two birds with one stone.あなたの電話が鳴ったときまさに出かけようとするところだった。I was about to leave when you telephoned.









正解をまるで囲みなさい。Please circle the right answer.

この時計の時間は正確だ。This watch keeps correct time.









正規表現で空白はどのように表されるのでしょうか？How is whitespace represented in regular expressions?


最後には正義は勝つものだ。Justice will prevail in the end.
君には正義感がないのか。Don't you have a sense of justice?









正月はすぐそこまで来ている。New Year's Day is close at hand.




私たちは、普通正午に昼食を食べます。We usually have lunch at noon.












彼らは１２時に正餐をとった。They had a banquet at 12:00.







彼女の服装は正式なパーティーでは場違いだった。Her clothes were out of place at a formal party.




正邪を識別することは必ずしもやさしいことではない。It is not always easy to separate right from wrong.




赤ん坊は正常な発育を示した。The baby showed a normal development.



これは正真正銘の九谷焼です。私が保証いたします。This is genuine Kutani-ware. I guarantee it.



彼は入浴して正装した。He bathed and dressed.




ついに正体を暴露したな。Now you've given yourself away.





その事実は彼の正直さを証明している。The fact proves his honesty.正直言って私はクラシック音楽が好きじゃない。かたや、モリーの方が完全にはまっている。To tell the truth, I don't like classical music. On the other hand, Molly is really into it.
正直者に神宿る。Honesty is the best policy.





先生は彼女に正当な取り扱いをしなかった。The teacher didn't do her justice.
目的は手段を正当化するだろうか。Does the end justify the means?

彼は裁判で正当防衛を主張して無罪となった。He pleaded self-defense at the trial and went scot-free.

どちらの王子が正統な王位継承者か。Which prince is the legitimate heir to the throne?

ユダヤ正統派の主流から外れた部分においては、黙示録はある種の運動に対して、より成功を収めたのである。Outside the mainstream of orthodox Judaism, the apocalyptic books were more successful with certain movements.

死は生の正反対である。Death is the antithesis of life.
















正方形は４つの同じ長さの辺をもつ。A square has four equal sides.






このジャムの正味重量は２００グラムです。The net weight of this jam is 200 grams.

彼女の夢が正夢となった。Her dream has come true.

正面のドアは鍵がかかったままだった。The front door remained locked.
まともな仕事につかなければいけませんよ。You've got to get a steady job.


ダンプカーと正面衝突したタクシーはぐしゃぐしゃになった。The taxi collided head-on with a dump truck and was badly crushed.


車が正門のところへきて止まった。A car drew up at the main gate.


彼の言葉は正論だったが、僕は心のどこかで引っかかりを感じていた。Even though what he said was sound, I still wasn't completely convinced.
水清ければ魚住まず。Clear water breeds no fish.心の清い人たちは幸いである。Blessed are the pure in heart.


縁起に塩をまいて清める。We sprinkle salt to ward off bad luck.


その別荘は清潔で整然としていた。The cottage was clean and tidy.
凍死しそうな乞食が手当てのため、病院に運び込まれた。だが、その乞食は治療費を清算するような金は一文も、もってなかった。A freezing beggar was brought into the hospital for treatment. However, he didn't have even one cent with which to settle the bill.


作文を清書する必要はありません。You don't have to write out a clean copy of your composition.


山中では空気はとても清浄だ。The air is very pure in the mountains.
登山家は清水が欲しくてたまらなかった。The mountaineer craved fresh water.


美術館の東の陳列棟は清掃のため閉鎖されていた。The museum's eastern gallery was closed for cleaning.







清涼飲料の自動販売機はどこですか。Where is there a soft drink vending machine?
コカ・コーラは清涼飲料水ではいつも最有力会社だ。Coke has always been the top dog when it comes to soft drinks.

清廉潔白できこえた彼が、汚職なんかに手を染めるわけない。He has a reputation as being straight as an arrow. He'd never get involved in corruption.

アメリカ人にはよくあることだが彼はなまの魚を好かない。As is often the case with Americans, he does not care for raw fish.ゴムをすると確かに性感が落ちるので、出来れば生でしたいです。The sensitivity certainly drops if I use a condom, so if possible I'd like to do it bareback.ある批評家が、バレーを描いた私の絵を見たら、生のバレー公演を見に行く必要がないと言ったことがあります。A critic once said that if you saw my ballet paintings, you didn't have to go to a live performance.
その木々は葉が生い茂っている。The trees have exuberant foliage.


おたまじゃくしは大きくなるにつれ、尻尾が消えて足が生えはじめる。As a tadpole grows, the tail disappears and legs begin to form.この子は今歯が生えかけているところです。This child is teething now.


この本はまだ版権が生きている。This book is still copyrighted.
自然がそうした生き延びるための手段を与えているのである。Nature provides them with the means of survival.

今や彼には何の生きがいもない。Now he has nothing to live for.
彼が生き残ったということは注目すべきことだ。That he survived was remarkable.

彼は妻の死後、何年も生きながらえていた。After his wife died, he lived for quite a few more years.
王を得た麒麟もまた寿命を持たない生き物だが、この病ばかりは治癒の方法がない。A qilin with a king too has no limit on its lifespan, but this illness alone admits of no remedy.
雨が降ればこの木は生き返るでしょう。The rain will revive this tree.

その動物を生け捕りにしなければならない。You must catch the animal alive.

この台所で生ごみはどこに捨てますか。Where do you put the garbage in this kitchen?
事故は不注意から生じる。Accidents arise from carelessness.
この構成において、三角形の代わりに長方形を用いても類似の困難が生ずる。We encounter similar difficulties when we substitute rectangles for triangles in this configuration.

ガウスには数学的な問題を考える生まれついた才能があった。Gauss had an innate talent for mathematical problems.
あなたは何座生まれですか。What sign were you born under?

信じて。生まれ変わるよ。Believe me. I'll be a new man.
このことがよい人間関係を生みだす。This makes good human relations.あなたはそのチームを誰が生み出したか知っていますか。Do you know who brought that team into being?

あごひげをはやした神様は自分が離れたのと同じ方法で戻ってくると約束していた。The bearded god had promised to return someday in the same way he had left.
この生まれつきのあざに悩んでいます。I'm troubled by this birth-mark.
暑い日の生ビールの味はまた格別だ。Draft beer tastes especially good on a hot day.
彼は父親に生意気な事を言った。He was impertinent to his father.
雨の量が作物の生育に影響するのですか。Does the amount of rain affect the growth of crops?

生化学の試験はやさしかった。The biochemistry test was a cinch.
これが彼の生家です。This is the house in which he was born.
叔母は幸せな生涯を送った。My aunt lived a happy life.彼は生涯独身のままだった。He remained a bachelor all his life.
生涯教育は絶え間ない再訓練を意味する。Lifelong education means perpetual retraining.
収入に応じた生活をするように。You should try to live within your means.田舎の生活にすぐ慣れるでしょう。You'll soon get used to living in the country.

生活難はますます深刻になったきた。It is getting more and more difficult to make a living.
インフレで給料が高い生活費に追いつかない。Because of inflation, salaries can't keep up with the high cost of living.

母は生協に入っていました。My mother attached herself to a cooperative society.



生後６か月の息子に歯が生えかかっています。My six-month old son is teething.

あのボスに俺たちの生殺与奪の権を握られているとはね。悲しくなっちゃうよ。I get depressed thinking that a guy like our boss can have ultimate power over us.
この工場はＣＤプレーヤーを生産している。This factory produces CD players.
私たちは生産技術では国際的に競争力がある。We are internationally competitive in production technology.


生産性はオートメーションの徹底によって向上する。Production improves by becoming more automatic.
この辺はりんごの生産地です。Apples are produced in this district.

その戦いは生死を賭けた戦いのようであった。That fight seemed like a life-or-death struggle.


この肉は生煮えだ。The meat is only half cooked.





彼女はきまじめな気質である。She is a serious person.

彼は生粋のパリっ子です。He is a Parisian born and bred.
AとBを反応させるとCが生成されます。C is formed by reacting A with B.

彼は生前は偉大な政治家であった。He was a great statesman in life.
あいにくですが本日は予約でいっぱいです。I'm sorry, today is fully booked.
シーラカンスは深海に生息する。The coelacanth inhabits the deep sea.
その子の生存に対する希望は急速に消えつつある。Hope of finding the child alive is fading rapidly.いかなる動物も、植物なしでは生存できない。No animal can exist without plants.




第二が周辺環境との親和性であり、最小の廃棄物、自然エネルギーの利用等、周辺の生態と調和した住空間を形成することである。The second is the affinity with environment. By utilizing natural energy and reducing wastes, we have to make houses which harmonize with ecology.
世界の熱帯雨林は、この惑星上の生命が形成する生態学的な連鎖の中で、かけがえのない環をなしているのである。The world's tropical rainforests are critical links in the ecological chain of life on the planet.
地球の生態系はある程度自己修正されるもので、その結果が他の変化によって隠されているという可能性もある。The earth's ecosystem is to some extent self-correcting, so it is also possible that the effects are being masked by other changes.


生地を預ければドレスを仕立ててくれますか。Will you make me up a dress if I give you the material?イースト菌がパン生地を膨らます。Yeast makes dough rise.

そのコンサートは生中継された。The concert was broadcast live.
植物の生長と生産性は、気温と湿度が作り出す入り組んだ関係に敏感に反応する。Plant growth and productivity react sharply to a complex combination of temperature and moisture.
あなたは何と賢い生徒なのでしょう。What a clever student you are!


生年月日は１９６０年２月１４日です。I was born on February 14, 1960.

地球以外の天体に生物はいますか。Is there life on other worlds?

この本は生物学を理解する基礎となるものだ。This book is fundamental for an understanding of biology.
その生物学者は自分の歴史的な発見を誇りに思っている。The biologist is proud of his historic discovery.






生命はいつ誕生したのですか。When did life come into being?

その会社は全社員に対して健康保険と生命保険をかけている。The company provides health and life insurance benefits for all of its employees.

生卵はだめ。調理しないと。I can't eat a raw egg; it must be cooked.
生理用ナプキンはどこにありますか。Where are the sanitary napkins?
子供や赤ちゃんは生理的に苦手なの。I'm instinctively bad with children and infants.




桜の花は４月が盛りだ。The cherry blossoms are at their best in April.彼は今男盛りだ。He is now in the prime of manhood.


あまりにも短時間に、あまりにもたくさんのことを盛り込むと、よい戦術は生れない。If there are too many irons in the fire in too short a time, good strategy cannot result.

火山活動で地面が盛り上がった。The surface of the earth rose due to the volcanic activity.観客は盛り上がっているよ。The audience is really charged up.
音声を盛り上げたり、静めたりすることができない情熱があるだろうか。What passion cannot music raise and quell?
下品極まる盛り場に通いつける。He haunts the lowest resorts.
市場は盛り返してきた。The market rallied.


日本では英語教育が盛んである。English education flourishes in Japan.我々の国ではウインタースポーツが盛んだ。Winter sports are very popular in our country.彼はまだ元気盛んだ。He is still full of energy.


バザーは盛況のうちに終わった。The bazaar ended a great success.


彼女は盛装してパーティーに出かけて行った。She dressed up and left for the party.
盛大な溜息をつきながら、テーブルの上にどさどさとパンを置き、椅子にどっかりと腰掛ける。Heaving a great sigh I plunk my bread on the table and flump onto the chair.



その速さで精一杯ですか。Is that as fast as you can go?私は会社のために精一杯やってきた。I've given my best for the company.

唯一の証拠は、下着に付着していた精液の痕跡。The only evidence was the traces of semen stuck to the underwear.
その機械は精巧に出来ているので、すぐ壊れる。The machine is so delicate that it easily breaks.


彼は精算をしてホテルを出た。He checked out of the hotel.

我々は精神を養わなければならない。We need to nourish our spirit.日本人の精神はその独特の風土に根ざしている。It is the particular environment that has shaped the Japanese mentality.



金髪女性が精神科医と会話をしている。A blonde is speaking to her psychiatrist.
移民達は肉体的、精神的苦痛に耐えてきた。The emigrants have endured physical and mental pain.



天才は１パーセントが霊感であり、９９パーセントは精進である。Genius is one percent inspiration and ninety-nine percent perspiration.

簡潔は機知の精髄。Brevity is the soul of wit.
原油は精製されて多くの製品を産出する。When refined, crude oil yields many products.


彼は英語に精通している。He is quite at home in English.
今日では私たちは天気がどうなるかを高い精度で当てることができる。Today, we can tell how the weather will be with a high degree of accuracy.
多読は精読と同様重要である。Extensive reading is as important as intensive reading.
彼は逃げるように野菜売り場を立ち去って、精肉コーナーへ。As if fleeing, he left the vegetable aisle to go to the meat corner.




なぜならば、精密に検査しても何か欠点が現れないほど美しいものは存在しないからである。This is because there is nothing so beautiful that, even on close inspection, no defects will be found.

彼女はその仕事に精力を傾けた。She addressed herself to the task.












君は聖書に手をのせて誓うべきだ。You should swear on the Bible.
彼の聖人ぶった態度が気にいらない。I don't like his holier-than-thou attitude.




その聖者が埋葬されている聖堂を多くの人々が訪れた。Many people visited the shrine where the saint lay buried.

聖霊がある方の上に下って、その上にとどまられるのが見えたなら、その方こそ聖霊によってバプテスマを授ける方である。The man on whom you see the Spirit come down and remain is he who will baptize with the Holy Spirit.
あなたの声が聞けてうれしいわ。I am happy to hear your voice.日本人は鳥や虫の声を楽しむ。The Japanese enjoy the songs of birds and insects.どこの国でも、何時の時代でも、子供は親の価値観を見習って育つものである。いわゆる「教育ママ」の教育に対する考え方が、子供を精神的にいびつに育ててしまっていると指摘する声もある。As children are known to emulate the values of adults, it is often pointed out such "education mamas" instill a warped sense of values in their children.

その野球の試合の観客は自分達のチームに声援を送った。The spectators at the baseball match cheered their team on.
私は音楽大学で声楽を専攻しています。I'm studying voice at a college of music.
彼は声楽家になろうと決心している。He is bent on becoming a vocalist.
労働者達は声高に賃上げを要求した。Workers made loud demands for higher wages.


１２才の時彼は声変わりした。His voice broke when he was twelve.

彼の声明は疑いの余地がない。His statement admits of no doubt.



これらの箱はプラスチック製です。These boxes are made of plastic.何社製のコンピューターをお使いですか。What make of computer do you use?






この工場では自動車の部品を製作している。This factory manufactures automobile parts.



その工場は玩具を製造している。The factory manufactures toys.
その箱には製造者の証印が押してある。The box bears the stamp of the manufacturer.

その製鉄工場を建てるのは非常に大変な事業だった。Building the steel factory was a great enterprise.



この製品はイタリア製だ。This product is made in Italy.




チーズの製法を教えてください。Would you teach me how to make cheese?
コミックマーケット６７にてコピー本販売。無事完売したので製本しました。They were sold as photocopy books in Comic Market 67. We had no problem selling all of them, so we had bound copies made.

列車は西へ走っていた。The train was hurrying west.

彼女の息子は西ドイツに配置されている。Her son is stationed in West Germany.
３世紀前においてさえも、ほとんどの西ヨーロッパ人はまだ指を使っていた。Even three centuries ago, most Western Europeans still used their fingers.
スイカは今が出盛りだ。Watermelons are in season now.

その会社は西海岸にあります。The company is located on the West Coast.





この公園の西側に近いところは、道路の騒音も大きいが、奥にはいるともう聞こえない。Near the west side of the park there's a lot of noise from the road, but when you go into the park you can't hear it any more.


僕の部屋は西日をまともにうける。The afternoon sun comes directly into my room.

黄金を捜し求めて多くの男たちが西部へと出かけていった。Many men went west in search of gold.
彼はアリゾナで何本か西部劇を撮っている。He has shot some Westerns in Arizona.



それらは西洋の風呂よりずっといいです。They are much better than Western baths.

彼らは西洋人がやってくる以前から、もともと住んでいたニュージランド人なのです。They were the native New Zealanders before the Western people came.

昭和１０年は西暦１９３５年です。The 10th year of Showa is 1935 in the Western calendar.
遅れまして、誠に申し訳ありません。I'm awfully sorry that I was late.
彼は無礼にも私の誠意を疑った。He dared to doubt my sincerity.
ナンシーには誠実さが欠けているようだ。Nancy seems to lack sincerity.
彼は誠心誠意、彼女に尽くした。He devoted himself whole-heartedly to her.

君は聖書に手をのせて誓うべきだ。You should swear on the Bible.



結婚生活がうまく行っていない方は結婚式の時におごそかに神の前に誓った、夫婦の誓約を思い出してみましょう。And to the people whose married life is not going well, let's remember the marriage covenant sworn solemnly before God at the wedding ceremony.

遅刻しない事、うけあい。I assure you that I won't be late.私は彼の正直を請け合うことができない。I can't answer for his honesty.
彼はこのすべての仕事をただで請け負った。He has taken all this work for nothing.
私は市長に請願を出した。I addressed a petition to the mayor.
スミス氏は損害賠償を請求して彼らを告訴した。Mr Smith sued them for damages.
私は、その請求書を払う事に反対した。I objected to paying the bill.

ご尊父のご逝去に対し、謹んで哀悼の意を表します。Please accept my condolences on the death of your father.
信号が青に変わったわよ。The traffic light turned green.
なぜ空が青いか知っているか。Do you know why the sky is blue?その知らせを聞いたとたんに彼女は青くなった。The moment she heard the news, she turned pale.お前はまだ「青い」な。You're still green.
見慣れない青い鳥が屋根の上にみえる。I can see a strange blue bird on the roof.
久夫は死人のように青ざめた顔色をしていた。Hisao's face was as pale as that of a corpse.



彼は青筋を立てて怒った。He was so angry that his veins stood out.
今日は、雲ひとつない青空だ。Today the sky is a cloudless blue.


彼、今日、精彩がないね。青菜に塩だね。He seems really depressed and lifeless today. I wonder what took the wind out of his sails.



僕らは青春の真っ只中だ。We are in the heyday of youth.
青春期の若者はしばしば両親と衝突する。Adolescents often quarrel with their parents.
私には青少年の心理がわからない。I can not understand the psychology of adolescents.

私は青色が一番好きです。I like blue best of all colors.
青信号で道路を渡りましょう。Only cross the street on the green light.
青森県の経済はリンゴの栽培に大きく依存している。The economy of Aomori Prefecture depends heavily on apple growing.


貴殿の犬は青虫を持っています。犬にビタミンを与えましょう。Your dog has worms. Give him vitamins.
彼女が突然死んだという知らせが青天のへきれきのように訪れた。The news of her sudden death came like a bolt from the blue.


青天白日の身となった。He was completely cleared of the charge against him.


彼らは青銅で像を鋳造した。They cast bronze into a statue.


青二才のくせに何を言うか。That's big talk for an upstart like you.
あの長髪の青年は粗野だ。That long-haired youth is rude.
ジョンが戻ってきたとき、彼はまるで幽霊でもみたように青白い顔つきだった。When John came back, he looked pale as if he had seen a ghost.





キャプテンは静かにするように命じた。The captain commanded silence.
私の望むのは安らぎと静けさだけです。All I want is peace and quiet.

静穏は大きな宝物である。Quietness is a great treasure.

浅間山は今静止している。Mt. Asama is now dormant.

ディスプレイはモニタともいい、コンピュータなどの機器から出力される静止画または動画の映像信号を表示する機器である。A display, aka monitor, is an appliance that displays video signal of still images and moving pictures produced by a computer or similar device.

その幻は意識の中に宿り、静寂のなかで動かない。The vision that was planted in my senses still silently lingers.
議長は静粛を命じた。The chairperson ordered silence.





彼が叫ぶと、首の静脈がはっきりと浮き上がった。When he shouted, the veins in his neck stood out clearly.







その会社の税引き前利益は２億５０００万ドルだった。The company's profit amounted to $250 million before tax.


税関では長い列が出来ているだろう。There will be long lines at the Customs.
新しい税金がワインにかせられた。A new tax was imposed on wine.

国の財政は税収の落ち込みできわめて逼迫している。The government finances are severely constrained because of falling tax revenues.
国民は税制に関しては意見が一致しなかった。The people did not reach consensus on taxation.
政府は税制改革に着手した。The government started tax reform.
料金は、税別で一泊１００ドルです。The room charge is 100 USD a night plus tax.

新しい税法は抜け穴だらけです。The new tax law is full of loopholes.

税務署は控除を認めた。The tax agent allowed the deduction.
どこかにいい税理士はいないものだろうか。Where can I get hold of a good tax lawyer?
給与が増えるに比例して、所得税率もあがっていく。The income tax rate increases in proportion as your salary rises.
彼が作った模型飛行機はもろかった。His paper plane was fragile.彼女は情にもろい。She is accessible to pity.


この席を見ていてくれませんか。Can you save this seat for me?
いい席につけるように、早く劇場に行きましょう。Let's go to the theater early so that we can get good seats.
パーティーの席上にて政敵の一人が、大勢の招待客の前で彼を侮辱した。At the party, one of his political opponents humiliated him in the presence of many guests.
あなたほどの才能の持ち主が世間に知られずにいるのは惜しいことです。It is a pity that a man of your ability should remain unknown to the world.命は誰でも惜しい。Life is dear to everybody.これはまだ捨てるには惜しい。This is still too good to be thrown away.
ほとんど弁当を食べるひまも惜しんで勉強した。He studied hard, hardly taking time out for lunch.彼の死は惜しんでも余りあるものだ。We cannot grieve over his death too deeply.





ここは昔、畑だった。This place used to be a field.

戸籍上の縁は切れても、昔日の絆はそのままだ。Our connection may be cut on paper but the bonds of old remain as they were.

久しぶりに会ったんだから、酒でも飲みながら、昔話にでも花を咲かせるとするか。It's been so long since we last met up. Let's have a drink or two and talk about the good old days.
その子供は小さな石を拾い上げた。The child picked up a small stone.
あの大名は十万石を領している。That daimyo holds a fief yielding 100,000 koku of rice.





その家の周りに石垣があった。The house had a stone wall around it.

この本によれば、最初の人工橋梁は新石器時代にさかのぼるという。This book says the earliest man-made bridges date back to the New Stone Age.


ひげをそる前に石けんをつける。I lather my face before shaving.









石炭を石油の代わりに使いました。They substituted coal for oil.

俺はそんなこの町が好きだ。石段とかが多いのはネックだが・・・。I like this town as it is. Although, there being so many stone stairs is a bit of a pain...





その著名な哲学者に敬意を表して、巨大な石碑が建てられた。An immense monument was erected in honor of the eminent philosopher.




この国には石油が乏しい。Oil is scarce in this country.




私たちは荷物を車に積み込んだ。We loaded our baggage into the car.

そのバッグは彼の後に積み重ねられていた。The bags were piled up behind him.


一族が苦労して積み上げてきたものを、お前は一瞬で反故にするつもりか。Do you intend to throw away in one instant what our family has painstakingly built up?


流しの横にお皿を積んでおいてくだされば、後で私が洗います。If you stack the dishes up by the sink, I'll do them later.その船は武器をいっぱいに積んでいた。The ship was stowed with arms.彼は幅広い経験を積んでいる人だ。He is a man of wide experience.
私は来年留学するつもりです。I intend to study abroad next year.自分では、分かったつもりでいたけど、改めて考えると分かんなくなってきた。I was sure I understood it, but on thinking it over, I realized I didn't know at all.
塵も積もれば山となる。Many a little makes a mickle.


彼は生まれつき積極性に乏しかった。He was assertive by nature.
彼女は婦人解放運動で積極的に活躍した。She took an active part in the women's lib movement.











彼は生徒の質問責めに困っているところだ。He is being harassed by a flood of questions from his students.
あまり自分を責めないで。Don't be too hard on yourself.
これ以上彼を責め立ててもむだだ。It's fruitless to press him further.
けんかは両方に責任がある。It takes two to make a quarrel.
この部の責任者は誰か。Who's in charge of this section?



私はあなたが新しい責務をうまくこなせるよう願っています。I wish you good luck with your new responsibilities.
彼女は赤いスカートをはいていた。She was wearing a red skirt.

その赤ちゃんは歯が生えはじめている。The baby is cutting his teeth.
青白い彼の顔が興奮で赤らんだ。His pale face showed a flush of excitement.

彼は農園主の微笑んでいる赤ら顔をじっと見て、「はい」と答えました。He looked into the farmer's smiling red face, "Yes, sir." He said.
うちの赤ん坊は口をきくようになってきました。Our baby is learning to speak.












どのくらい莫大な赤字に国家は耐えられるのだろうか。How huge a deficit can the nation stand?


彼女は赤十字に寄付した。She contributed to the Red Cross.






船は今夜赤道を越すだろう。The ship will cross the equator tonight.


赤貧戸口に至らば、恋は窓より飛び去る。When poverty comes in at the door, love flies out the window.

私は赤帽にスーツケースを運んでもらった。I had the porter carry my suitcase.
その時自分がなんとばかであったかを考えると赤面する。I blush to think of what a fool I was then.君の行いには赤面する。I am ashamed of your conduct.




その女性の顔には悲しみの跡があった。The woman's face was marked with grief.ここは城の跡です。This is the site of a castle.虫に刺された跡を引っかかないようにした方がいいよ。You should try not to scratch insect bites.

金持ちの商人はその子を養子にして跡取りとした。The rich merchant adopted the boy and made him his heir.




田中くんは省内きっての馬鹿者だよ。Young Tanaka is the stupidest person in the department.

複写機の紙を切らしたよ。We've run out of paper for the photocopier.しびれを切らして借金の催促をした。He impatiently asked for repayment.

彼はそこに行ったきり２度と帰ってこなかった。He went there, never to return.彼は３８歳なのに両親に頼りきりです。Though 38, he is still dependent on his parents.
彼の野心にはきりがない。His ambition knows no bounds.彼のぐちにはきりがない。There is no end to his complaining.



我々は費用を切り下げなければならない。We must keep down expenses.






彼は、その封筒を切り開いた。He cut the envelope open.我々は森を切り開いて道を作った。We cleared a path through the woods.







私たちは、経費を切りつめなければならない。We must cut down our expenses.












彼は肉を切り刻んで重さを量った。He cut up the meat and weighed it.

その場しのぎの対策では麻薬中毒問題に切り込むことはできないでしょう。Stopgap measures won't make a dent in drug addiction.









彼は、ロープを２メートル切り取った。He cut off two meters of the rope.



時間が切れたので会見を早く切り上げなければならなかった。We ran out of time and had to cut short the interview.円は１９７１年１２月１８日、１ドル３６０円から３０８円に切上げられた。The yen was revalued upward against the U.S. dollar from a rate of 360 yen against the dollar to 308 yen on December 18, 1971.



彼女は家事を切り盛りするだけでなく学校の先生もしている。Not only does she keep house, but she teaches at school.















彼はおのでその木を切り倒した。He cut down the tree with an ax.



事業を継続しながら、事業が依拠している不動産を切り売りしていくことなど非現実的なのだ。It's ludicrous to continue business operations while selling off bit by bit the land on which your business depends.


彼女は本から一枚の絵を切り抜いた。She cut a picture out of the book.
我々はこの難局を何とかして切り抜けなければならない。We have to somehow come through this troublesome situation.



主人はお客に七面鳥の肉を切り分けた。The host cut the turkey for the guests.






彼は木の枝を何本か切り落とした。He cut some branches off the tree.
金と権力は、切り離せない。Power and money are inseparable.


その切り立った崖には近づかないで。Keep away from the vertical cliff!


切れはずたずたに切り裂かれた。The cloth was torn to shreds.
２．大根は拍子木に切る。2. Cut the daikon into long sticks.エアコンを切ってもかまいませんか。Do you mind if I turn off the AC?「スミスさんをお願いしたいのですが」「そのまま切らずにお待ちください」"May I speak to Mr Smith?" "Will you hold the line?"
切れはずたずたに切り裂かれた。The cloth was torn to shreds.昔のような身体の切れを取り戻したい。I wish I could get back the tone and nimbleness I once had.肉は何切れにしましょうか。How many slices of meat would you like?

二人の子供は綱が切れるまで引っ張りあった。The two children pulled at the rope until it broke.ガソリンが切れかかっている。We're running out of gas.このはさみは良く切れない。These scissors don't cut well.

雲の切れ間から太陽が見えます。You can see the sun peeking through the clouds.




少女は生地の切れ端で人形を作った。The girl made a doll out of a piece of cloth.
そうやって俺のことを気にしつつ、しかし素直になりきれない、そのツンデレさが今若い男の間で大ブーム！That way you keep thinking about me but are unable to admit to your feelings, that hot and cold feel is a real boom among young men!





世界中の人々が平和を切願している。People all over the world are anxious for peace.



太っているのが私の切実な問題です。Being fat is a serious problem for me.
趣味は切手を集めることです。My hobby is collecting stamps.



強風のため電線が数箇所で切断された。The strong wind cut the electric wires in several places.



事態はかなり切迫している。The matter is really pressing.
この切符で二人入れるよ。The ticket admits two persons.




私はあなたの成功を切望しています。I am anxious for your success.


君の実力なら楽勝だとは思うが、それに驕らず、まずはクラスのみんなと切磋琢磨していって欲しい。I think you could easily win with your ability, but I want you to not be arrogant about it and work hard with everyone in your class first.








医者は彼の折れた足をついだ。The doctor set his broken leg.枝が伸び、実が成ることを想定して接ぐ場所を選びましょう。Select the graft point after imagining how the branches will extend and fruit grow.
このような接し方の変化は、他の変化もそうであるが、他の国においても起こっている。Like other changes, this change in attitude has occurred in other countries, too.もっと思いやりをもって接してやらないといけませんよ。You must treat them with more consideration.

飛行機はニューヨークに接近している。The plane is approaching New York.

今日、彼は容疑者に接見した。He interviewed the suspect today.
石の塊はセメントで接合された。The blocks of stone were jointed with cement.
スミスのアプローチは、接辞付加ということを考慮に入れない点でほかと非常に異なっている。Smith's approach differs greatly from others in that he did not take the affixation into consideration.



彼は私が誘拐犯人と接触出来るようにしてくれた。He put me in touch with the kidnappers.

レースはもつれた接戦となった。The race went down to the wire.
インターネットの接続が遮断された。My internet connection was cut off.


関係代名詞は「接続詞+代名詞」のはたらきをしています。Relative pronouns perform as 'conjunction + pronoun'.

彼が外人客の接待にあたっている。He is in charge of entertaining the foreign guests.



この流動体は接着剤の代用になります。This fluid can be substituted for glue.

あたりまえだが、人と人との接点は「ことば」である。その言葉によって、考えを共有し、議論している。It's obvious but the connection between people is "words". It is by those words that thoughts are shared and arguments carried out.





「―osity」という接尾辞がどういうものかを理解すれば良い。You just have to understand what sort of thing the suffix '-osity' is.
彼女は、激しく私に接吻をした。She kissed me like anything.
水は摂氏０度で凍る。Water freezes at 0 degrees Centigrade.
後に、高校生になると、僕はビタミン剤を常用するように化学を「摂取した」Later, in high school, I would take chemistry the way I took vitamin pills.






お暇の折にはぜひ遊びに来てください。Do come and see us when you are free.


ジョンは自分の問題と折り合いをつけた。つまり、その問題を受け入れたのである。John came to terms with his problem, which means he has accepted it.
彼らは組合の指導者たちと折り合った。They came to terms with the union leaders.彼らはあまりうまく折り合っていけないと思う。I am afraid they can't get along very well.



この折りたたみの傘を持って行きなさい。役に立つかもしれませんから。Take this folding umbrella with you. It might come in handy.

エミーはナプキンを半分に折りたたんだ。Emmy folded the napkin in half.
折り返し電話するよう伝えます。I'll tell him to call you back.

最後のわら一本がらくだの背骨を折る。The last straw breaks the camel's back.落馬の結果足を折った。The fall from the horse resulted in a broken leg.折ろうとしても指が弱くなりすぎていた。Her fingers were too weak to fold it.
医者は彼の折れた足をついだ。The doctor set his broken leg.ついにバス会社が折れた。At last, the bus company gave in.


地元住民と政府調査官の間に折衝がありました。There was a flare-up between local residents and state regulators.




イギリスは多くの植民地を設けた。Britain established many colonies.
リーダーはどこでテントを設営するか知っているべきだ。The leader should know where to set up the tent.
私の設計にしたがって、作ってもらいました。I had it made after my own plan.

これらの寸法は設計図に一致する。These measurements conform to the blueprints.
ようやく各店舗に監視カメラが設置されることになった。Eventually it was decided that the stores be equipped with surveillance cameras.
設定料金に労務費用は含みません。The stated price does not include labor charges.鍵のいらない暗証タイプには、お好きな番号を設定できるフリーダイヤル式と、あらかじめ番号が設定済みの固定式とがあります。For code-type locks that don't need a key, there are 'free dial' systems where you can set any number you like, and fixed types where the number is set in advance.
諸設備の費用は払っていただきます。You have to pay for utilities.

わが校は１９００年に設立されました。Our school was founded in 1990.

彼に窃盗の嫌疑がかかっている。He is under suspicion of theft.
この男は窃盗罪に問われた。This man was charged with theft.
その男は窃盗犯に問われた。The man was charged with theft.
こちらにお出での節は、どうぞお立ち寄りください。Please drop in when you come this way.最後の２節を省略して歌いましょうか。We'll sing that song, omitting the last two verses.

彼には加古川の人を軽蔑しているふしがある。He seems to hold people from Kakogawa in contempt.






彼らは経費を節減するだろう。They will cut down on their expenses.


夏には節水して下さい。Please conserve water in summer.
節制は最良の薬。Temperance is the best physic.




どんなに節度のある家庭でも事故は起こるもの。Accidents will happen in the best-regulated families.


この主要道路のお陰でずいぶん時間が節約できる。This highway saves us a lot of time.

あなたがなんと言おうと、私はやはりその説が正しいと思う。For all you say, I still believe in the truth of the theory.

あの男を説き伏せようとするのは、オオカミに道理を説いて聞かせるようなものだ。You might as well reason with the wolf as try to persuade that man.


あの男を説き伏せようとするのは、オオカミに道理を説いて聞かせるようなものだ。You might as well reason with the wolf as try to persuade that man.
彼女に説教しても無駄である。There is no use talking to her.
私は彼女に気楽にするようにと説得した。I persuaded her to make herself comfortable.
彼の説明は説得力に欠けている。His explanation is unconvincing.
私に規則を説明して下さい。Please explain the rule to me.
その説明書の意味がさっぱり分かりません。I can't make head or tail of those directions.


たぶん、明日は雪が降るだろう。Probably it will snow tomorrow.
私は雪だるまや雪の家を作ります。I build snowmen and snow huts.

この川は雪解けの後氾濫することがある。This river sometimes overflows after the thaw.




私たちは雪合戦をした。We had a snowball fight.
ジェーンは以前「雪国」を読んだことがある。Jane has read "Snow Country" before.
私達みんなが札幌雪祭りに行ったわけではありません。Not all of us went to the Sapporo Snow Festival.



君に雪辱のチャンスを与えよう。We'll give you your revenge.

雪男はヒマラヤの怪物だ。The Abominable Snowman is a Himalayan monster.

雪道で急ハンドルを切っちゃだめだよ。スリップしちゃうから。If you whip the steering wheel around like that on a snowy road, the car is going to go into a slide.
雪崩で道路がふさがった。The road was blocked by an avalanche.
彼らは絶えずけんかばかりしていた。They were constantly quarreling.
いまはもうこの種のちょうは絶えてしまっている。Butterflies of this species are now extinct.この習慣は絶えて久しい。This custom became extinct a long time ago.

雨は絶え間なく降っていた。It rained nonstop.

麻薬の密売は根こそぎ絶やさなければならない。We must eradicate the drug traffic, root and branch.
軟木の絶縁された部屋およびよいヒーターはサウナのための絶対必要である。An insulated soft-wood room and a good heater are the absolute necessities for a sauna.

彼女は私が悪いと絶叫した。She screamed that I was to blame.

彼は全ての親類と絶交した。He broke with all his relatives.
絶好の機会を逃した。I missed a golden opportunity.
我々は絶体絶命のピンチに追い込まれた。We were driven to the wall.
アーア、絶対うまくいくと思ったのになあ。Oh man! I was sure this was going to work out.





彼の援助は我々に絶対必要です。His help is indispensable to us.

天才とは従来、先天的に絶大な努力をなし得る能力を備えた者との定義が下されてきた。Genius has been defined as a supreme capacity for taking trouble.
その俳優は人気絶頂の時に死んだ。The actor died at the height of his popularity.
この本はかつてはベストセラーだったが、今は絶版になっている。This book, which was once a best seller, is now out of print.

私はしばしば絶望感に襲われた。I was often seized by despair.


絶滅は進化の一部である。Extinction is part of evolution.

コーヒーは舌が焼けるほど熱かった。The coffee was so hot that I nearly burned my tongue.

その夜我々は大エビに舌鼓を打った。We banqueted on lobster that night.

彼の発言が舌戦の火蓋をきったことになった。He opened up the verbal battle.
その子は舌足らずに話す。He speaks with a lisp.彼の説明、舌足らずでよく分からなかった。His explanation was too sketchy. I didn't understand it.
苦虫を噛みつぶしたような顔で、綾乃ちゃんは舌打ちした。Ayano tutted, making a sour face.
あみでせみを捕まえた。We captured cicadas with a net.











鉛筆の先が丸くなった。The point of the pencil has become dull.二人の男のうち、背の高い方が先に出ていった。The taller of the two men went out first.この電車は中野より先は各駅に停車する。This train stops at every station from Nakano on.
その少年は先週末、野球のボールで窓ガラスを割った。The boy broke the window with a baseball last weekend.
彼は出かけた先々で歓迎された。He was welcomed wherever he went.
まず第一に私はジムを訪ねなければならない。First of all, I have to call on Jim.あのチームは、あるとしても、まず優勝の望みはない。That team has little, if any, chance of winning.

彼の仕事はまずまずの出来だが、とても優秀とは言えなかった。His work was acceptable, but far from excellent.

私が先にそこへ着くよ。I'll get there before you will.その情報は発表するより先に新聞に漏れた。The information was given away to the newspaper prior to the announcement.




彼は遥かに時代を先んじていた。He was far in advance of his days.

最近ドル先安感が強まっているなかで、為替相場は米経済指標に対する反応はかなり限定的である。As expectation increases that the dollar will weaken, the foreign exchange market's reaction to US economic indicators has been fairly muted.
敵が攻撃しそうなところに先回りして手を打っておいた。We anticipated where the enemy would attack.


リンダの先学期の成績が非常に良かったので、私は彼女がヨーロッパに行けるよう段取りをした。Because of Linda's outstanding grades last semester, I have arranged for her to visit Europe.






先駆者達は一連の障害を克服してきた。The pioneers have overcome a series of obstacles.

君は煙草を吸うのをやめるのが先決だ。First, you have to stop smoking.

先月は、ほとんど雨が降らなかった。We had little rain last month.
彼は先見の明るい人だ。He is a man of vision.
ダ・ヴィンチは他の人よりも先見の明があった。Da Vinci could see farther than others.











稲光は雷の音に先行する。The flash of lightning precedes the sound of thunder.


先刻承知。I've known it all along.

















彼が何か言いかけたが先手を打ってやった。He started to say something, but I beat him to it.

この本は先週一番売れた。This was the best-selling book last week.

アメリカ先住民の祖先は、ベーリング海峡を経由してアジアから大陸へ渡った。The ancestors of Native Americans went to the continent from Asia by way of the Bering Strait.



発展途上諸国と先進諸国が協力すれば戦争の勃発を防ぐことができる。The developing world and the developed world can prevent a war from breaking out by helping each other.
日本はエレクトロニクスの分野では他の先進国より先んじている。Japan is ahead of other advanced countries in electronics.

彼は先人と同じ道を歩むことを名誉だと信じている。He believes it to be an honor to follow in his predecessor's footsteps.

先制の一撃をすれば半分勝ったようなものだ。The first blow is half the battle.
われわれの先生は真の意味で紳士です。Our teacher is a gentleman in the true sense of the word.ぼくはジョーンズ先生に作文を直してもらった。I had my composition corrected by Mr Jones.


ある出来事を記念したり先祖の伝説を伝えるために建てられたものであった。They were erected to commemorate a certain event or to tell an ancestral legend.
この先祖伝来の家宝は君の物だ。This heirloom shall be yours.





先だって彼にあったときには、彼はとても元気だった。Last I met him, he was very well.
ヨーロッパとアフリカの西海岸をとおりすぎ、アフリカ南部の先端までとびます。Past the west coasts of Europe and Africa to the tip of southern Africa.
６つの先端技術の会社がその県に支社を設立した。Six high-tech companies set up branch offices in that prefecture.




つい先ほど君のお父さんに会いました。I met your father just now.


その習慣は後天的で、先天的なものではない。That habit is acquired, not innate.






先頭打者がヒットで出塁した。The first batter up got a base hit.
そのパレードは軍楽隊に先導された。The parade was led by an army band.

先日小学校のクラス会に出席した。The other day I attended a class reunion of my elementary school.


そういうの、先入観っていうんだよっ！体験したこと無いのに、決め付けるのはよくないっ！That's what they call 'prejudice'! It's wrong to make your mind up on something you've never experienced!







私たちは彼をよき先輩として尊敬している。We respect him as a good senior.











私は先払いする。I pay the money in advance.





先方が電話にお出になりました。Your party is on the line.





申し訳ありませんが明日は先約があります。I'm sorry, but I have a previous appointment for tomorrow.

このミーティングの目的は、１月の商品企画会議に先立ち、新製品のプランを考えることです。The purpose of the meeting is to make a plan for a new product prior to the Product Development Meeting in January.おごりは破滅に先立つ。Pride comes before a fall.スミスさんは奥さんに先立たれた。Mr Smith was bereaved of his wife.


そんな先例はない。We have no such example.


飲み代として使った金額は総計７千ドルだった。The total bill for drinks came up to 7000 dollars.
その鶴は、禎子が折らなければならない千羽鶴の最初の一羽だった。It was the first of the one thousand cranes that Sadako had to make.
私は５千円だけしか持っていません。I have only five thousand yen.
千円札くずれますか。Can you break a 1000 yen bill?




一口に英会話教材といっても、千差万別だ。They all get lumped together as English texts. But in fact these books are extremely varied and wide-ranging.
いよいよ千載一遇のチャンスがめぐってきた。At last, a chance in a million arrived.









一歩誤るとせんじんの谷だ。One step further, and you will fall into an abyss.

1/4カットの白菜を太めの千切りにザクザク切る。Cut the quartered pak-choi into, slightly wide, strips.






















この国の人口は概算５千万に達する。The population of the country is roughly estimated at 50,000,000.





都合の悪いこと、そうそう隠しとおせるもんじゃないよ。悪事千里を行く、っていうだろう。You can't hide the fact that you're having a hard time. Bad news travels fast you know.






トランプ占いをしてあげましょう。Let me tell you your fortune with cards.


私は運勢を占ってもらった。I had my fortune told.


ある研究によれば、ガンによる女性の死亡数の中では肺がんが１７％を占めている。A study shows lung cancer accounts for 17% of women's cancer deaths.ギャンブルで味を占めるとなかなか止められない。Once you get the taste for gambling, it's hard to give it up.

反乱軍は放送局を占拠した。The rebels have captured the broadcasting station.










現実の占有は九分の勝ち目。Possession is nine-tenths of the law.

この机は場所を占領しすぎる。This desk takes up too much room.






その植民地は独立を宣言した。The colony declared independence.

裁判官は彼に死刑を宣告した。The judge condemned him to death.
彼は市長に宣誓就任した。He was sworn in as mayor.
その国は隣国に対し宣戦を布告した。The country declared war against its neighbor.
その商品はテレビで宣伝されている。The goods are advertised on TV.
その特権はもっぱらご婦人だけに限られている。The privilege is reserved exclusively for women.



私はフランス語を専攻するつもりです。I am going to major in French.

アンはその仕事に専心した。Ann bent her mind to the work.

特典の一つとして専属運転手がお客様に一人ずつ着きます。Special services include a personal driver for each guest.


まずは、自分の事に専念しなさい。Tend to your own affairs first.
これは当店の専売です。Our store has a monopoly on this item.
あの専務はまったくの面食いです。The executive director is a real pushover for looks.

それは専門家に任せたほうがいいよ。Leave that job to the experts!


英語を教えることが彼の専門的職業です。Teaching English is his profession.
ハーブの専門店を聞いたことがありませんか。Do you know a good specialty store dealing in herbs?


きつつきは、長く尖ったくちばしで、木の幹をつついて、中にいる虫を食べます。Woodpeckers peck tree trunks with their long pointed beaks and eat insects found there.
この棒は先がとがっている。This pole is sharp at the end.彼はとがった声を出した。He cried in an angry voice.彼女の物の言い方は私の神経をとがらせる。Her manner of speaking gets on my nerves.



この川はあの川の３倍長い。This river is three times longer than that one.信濃川と阿賀野川ではどちらが長いですか。Which is longer, the Shinano River or the Agano River?
そのビルは川沿いに建っている。The building stands on the river.
私たちは川下にある橋を渡って回り道をしなければならなかった。We had to make a detour across a bridge down the river from here.
川岸で数人の男が糸を垂れている。Several men are fishing from the riverbank.
ここから３キロほど川上に村が１つある。There is a village about three kilometers up the river from here.




彼女は声をおののかせて「助けて！」と叫んだ。In a quivering voice she cried "Help!"

若者は戦火というものを頭でしか知らない。Young people know the disasters of war only in the abstract.
若い人たちは戦禍というものを頭でしか知らない。Young people know the disasters of war only in the abstract.
戦艦ビスマルク号を海のもくずとするには、何発もの魚雷を命中させなければならなかった。It took many torpedo hits to send the battleship Bismarck to Davy Jones's locker.





その戦士はヤリに敏感である。The soldier worries about spears.
その兵士は戦死した。The soldier was killed in action.
戦時に起こったとしたなら、これは災難になるだろう。Happening in wartime, this would amount to disaster.
戦車や飛行機は軍隊を打ち破ることはできようが、国民を征服することはできない。Tanks and planes may defeat the troops but they cannot conquer the people.
あまりにも短時間に、あまりにもたくさんのことを盛り込むと、よい戦術は生れない。If there are too many irons in the fire in too short a time, good strategy cannot result.


戦勝を祝う祝賀会が開かれた。Ceremonies were held to celebrate victories.
彼は戦場で何度も死をうまく逃れた。He cheated death many times on the battlefield.

その部隊は戦線から撤退させられた。The troops were retired from the front lines.
戦前、ヨーロッパへ行きました。I went to Europe before the war.
その国は戦争で荒廃してしまった。The country was wasted by war.
戦争後、イギリスは多くの植民地を得た。After the war, Britain had many colonies.




軍隊は戦闘の配置で整列していた。The troops were in battle array.
わが戦闘機の延べ出撃機数は平均１日４３０機であった。Our fighters averaged 430 missions a day.










全員が戦後、連合軍によって投獄され、その後戦犯として死刑か長期の刑期を宣告された。All were imprisoned by the Allies after the war and later sentenced to death or given long prison terms for war crimes.





その会社の急速な成長はその独特な戦略によるものだった。The rapid growth of the firm was attributed to its unique strategy.





さらに、即戦力となる政策関連の科学的成果や手段の提供が必要であると強調した。Moreover, they underscored the need for providing policy relevant ready-to-use scientific results and methodology.


恐ろしい光景に彼は戦慄した。He shuddered at the terrible scene.


犬が腕時計と扇子を食った。The dog ate a watch and a Japanese fan.

土地の人々を扇動するためにスパイを送り込んだ。They sent agents to agitate the local people.
暑かったので扇風機をつけた。Feeling hot, I turned on the fan.

泉はおよそ１７０フィートの高さまで温水を吹き出す。The fountain sends hot water to a height of 170 feet.

この川はあそこで浅くなっている。This river becomes shallow at that point.


浅学な人ほど自分が正しいと思っている典型ですね。He's a classic case that the more ignorant people are the more sure they are that they are correct.
その黒っぽいコートは彼女の浅黒い肌には合わない。That dark coat does not match her dark skin.
トムが浅瀬をぽちゃぽちゃと歩いて行った。Tom went splashing through the shallows.


俺を洗い清めろ！俺を解放しろ！俺を自由にしろ！Cleanse me! Release me! Set me free!

お湯の中で一日の汗や汚れ、苦労を洗い落とすだけでなく、日々の生活のことについておしゃべりをするのを楽しんだのである。They not only washed off the sweat, dirt and cares of the day in the hot water, but also enjoyed gossiping about everyday affairs.

橋は大水で洗い流された。The bridge was washed away by the flood.
そのバッグを洗うときは洗濯機に入れないでください。When you wash the bag, please do not put it in the washing machine.
朝は洗顔はもちろん身だしなみを整えてからここに集まるんだ。Obviously wash your face, but you must also take care of your appearance before assembling here.
誤って洗剤を飲んでしまいました。He swallowed detergent by mistake.
私は父が洗車するのを手伝った。I helped my father wash his car.
包帯をする前に彼は傷を洗浄した。He cleansed the wound before putting on a bandage.
この綿のシャツは洗濯がよく効く。This cotton shirt washes well.
「その洗濯機の使い心地はどうですか」「まあまあです」"How do you find your washing-machine?" "Not so bad."

洗濯のりでののりづけの仕方を教えてください。Please tell me how to use laundry starch to starch things.
私の洗濯物はどこに入れればいいですか。Where should I put my laundry?

洗髪とセットの予約をしたいのですが。I'd like to make an appointment for a shampoo and a set.

洗面器の水がかちかちに凍った。The water in the basin has frozen solid.
洗面所の栓を抜くと、水がガバガバ流れ出した。When I unplugged the bathroom sink, the water gushed down the drain.
彼は洗礼を受けてカトリック教徒となった。He was baptized a Catholic.
ああいう洗練された人々の中で、自分はまったく場違いな気がした。I felt utterly out of place among those sophisticated people.
悪習に染まるのは簡単だ。It's easy to fall into bad habits.
しみをこすり落とすことができなかった。I couldn't scrub the stain out.
彼は一人ぼっちになって寒さが骨に染みた。He became alone in the world and was chilled to the bone.石けんが目にしみました。The soap hurt my eyes.
そんなふるまいをするとは彼も子供じみていた。It was childish of him to behave like that.
雨は服にしみ込んだ。The rain soaked through my clothes.
雨が私のレインコートの下までしみとおった。The rain penetrated my raincoat.
この織物を染めて欲しいのです。I'd like to have this fabric dyed.




ウールは染色しやすい。Wool takes a dye well.

考慮すべきもう一つのことは、カーペットの素材、織り方、染料の質である。Another thing to consider is the quality of the materials, knots, and dyes in the carpet.


潜りはできるが泳げないのは、私の知る限りでは彼だけだ。He is the only man I know who can dive but not swim.

ジムは家に着くとすぐにベッドにもぐり込んだ。Jim had hardly got home when he crept into bed.

教育は潜在する能力の開発をめざすものだ。Education aims to develop potential abilities.

この潜水時計は少し値段が高すぎます。This diver's watch is a little too expensive.
潜水艦は沈んで二度と浮上しなかった。The submarine sank, never to rise again.
潜水夫は危険なく真珠を集めることができる。The divers can gather pearls with no danger.
彼は農夫に身をやつして城下町に潜入した。Disguising himself as a peasant, he crept into the castle town.

容疑者は三週間山に潜伏していた。The suspect was hiding out in the mountains for three weeks.


このお茶は、１０分間煎じなさい。Let the tea draw for ten minutes.







彼はコーヒー豆をいっている。He is roasting coffee beans.





あらやだ、このお煎餅もう湿気ってる。Yecch. This rice cracker is soggy.



まず彼をおだてておいたほうがいいですよ。You had better try buttering him up first.
その会社は競争の激化のあおりを受けて、倒産した。Having fallen victim to increased competition, the company went bankrupt.

アメリカほど愛国心を煽る国はあるでしょうか。Does any other country fan the flames of patriotism as much as America?彼の言葉は私の闘争心をあおった。His words aroused my competitive spirit.
タカは空を旋回した。The hawk circled round in the sky.




彼女はきっと東京のファッション界に旋風を巻き起こすことでしょう。I'm sure she'll cause a stir in the Tokyo fashion world.

なんてつむじ曲がりなやつだ。What a crank he is!
聞える旋律は美しいが、聞えない旋律はさらに美しい。Heard melodies are sweet, but those unheard are sweeter.




この線の終点はどこですか。Where is the end of this line?









ポーターはしばしば線路を歩いて渡らなければならない。Porters often have to walk across the tracks.
マイクロファイバークロスは、髪の毛の１００分の１という細さの繊維で編みあげられたクロスです。Microfibre cloth is cloth woven from fibres as narrow as a hundredth of the width of a hair.



非常に繊細な問題だ。It's a very delicate question.
あなたがとても羨ましい。I envy you so much.
彼らは私たちの成功をうらやんでいる。They are jealous of our success.
彼は友人たちの羨望の的であった。He was the envy of his friends.


レインジャー隊は船員の救助に向かうことを決めた。The rangers decided to go to the sailor's rescue.
彼女が船室に入るやいなや明かりが消えた。She had hardly entered the cabin when the light went out.

ジブの裏帆とラダーを使って、バックしながら船首を進みたい方向に向けました。Using the rudder and the jib with the wind behind it we backed up, turning the bow to the direction we wanted to go.
彼らは船酔いしそうだ。They are likely to get seasick.


それで船長は彼の世話をしました。So the captain took care of him.

懐中電灯は、船舶同士とか、街の通りを走っている自動車に向けて合図を伝える。Flashing lights transmit messages between ships and to motorists along city streets.

この小包を船便で送ってください。Please send this parcel by surface mail.
船旅はとても楽しい。Traveling by sea is a lot of fun.
私生活を詮索しないでよ。Don't pry into my private life.

彼は重要なイデオムを選び出しました。He picked out some important idioms.
アンは友人を選り好みする。Ann is exclusive in her choice of friends.


その県知事は７月の選挙で勝利をおさめました。The prefectural governor got the upper hand in the July elections.
アメリカの女性には選挙権がなかった。American women didn't have the right to vote.

選挙戦はとうとう泥試合になってしまった。The political campaign has turned into a dirty fight at last.
彼女の選曲が妥当だったとは思わない。I do not consider her choice of music a happy one.
職員の選考に関する規則を次のように定める。Rules in connection with staff selection are set as follows.
アキラは上手なテニス選手です。Akira is a good tennis player.
明日の今ごろ、彼らは選手権を目指して戦っているところだろう。They will be fighting for the championship this time tomorrow.
私たちの選集にある劇は２つともとても好きだ。I like both plays in our anthology very much.
彼は国会へ選出された。He has been elected to Congress.
選択は全く君次第だ。The choice is all up to you.
私たちの高校では、フランス語が選択科目です。At our high school, French is an elective.


どちらの選択肢も慎重に検討した。We have given careful thought to both alternatives.


例文の選定がまずかったです。The choice of example sentence wasn't wise.

チアリーダーの選抜テストを受けたいのです。I hope to try out for cheerleader.
農民たちはよいリンゴと不良品を選別する。Farmers separate good apples from bad ones.







私は遠くに稲妻のひらめきを見た。I saw flashes of lightning in the distance.アジアの宗教から閃きを得て、彼は複数の素晴らしい彫刻を生み出した。Asian religions inspire him to create splendid sculptures.
素晴らしい考えがひらめいた。A wonderful idea just ran through my mind.
彼女は稲妻の閃光を見て悲鳴をあげた。She screamed at the flash of lightning.
月は鮮やかに輝いていた。The moon was shining brightly.


このイカは鮮度が落ちはじめた。This cuttlefish has started to lose its freshness.
原稿とコピーは容易に見分けがつく。前者は後者よりもずっと鮮明だからである。The original and the copy are easily distinguished since the one is much more vivid than the other.
空と山の対比が鮮烈だ。The contrast between the sky and the mountain is striking.
前学期は成績がよかった。I had a good report last term.田中前外相の更迭に続く政治混乱がその象徴である。The dismissal of foreign minister Tanaka is symbolic of the continuing political turmoil.
我が家の前には狭い庭があります。There is a small garden in front of my house.部屋に入る前に靴を脱ぎなさい。Take your shoes off before you come into the room.父は２年前に亡くなった。My father passed away two years ago.


駄目だよ。君、背が高いんだから前衛に来てくれないと。That's no good! You're tall so you've got to be in the forward defence.


独裁政権は人権侵害の前科について非難を受けました。The dictatorship came under fire for its human rights record.

彼は前回の好景気の間に財産を株取り引きのあてた。He amassed a fortune in stock trading during the last boom.






当期純利益は５０億円の見込みで、前期とほとんど変わりません。Net profit for the period is estimated at 5 billion yen, largely unchanged from the previous one.
前記参照。See above.












その政治家は前言を取り消して公に謝罪するはめになった。The politician had to take back his words and eat crow.

彼は首を前後に振りました。He shook his head back and forth.日本のＯＤＡは返済期間３０年、利率２％前後という条件の緩い円借款が大部分を占める。Japan's ODA largely consists of concessionary yen credit repayable in 30 years, carrying an interest rate of 2% or so.倒置法は言葉の前後を入れ替えることにより文章を強調する効果があります。Anastrophe, by switching around words, has the effect of emphasizing text.

車内の彼の周りでは、ほかの乗客たちが前後左右に揺れていた。Around him in the carriage, the other passengers rocked and swayed.
調子に乗って飲み過ぎて、前後不覚になってしまった。自分で何をしたのかまるで覚えていないんだ。I was drinking with total abandon and blacked out. I have no idea what I was doing.













いくつかの点で、前者は後者よりも劣っていると彼は指摘した。He pointed out that the former was inferior to the latter in some respects.



給料の前借りをお願いできますか。Can I get an advance on my salary?

















ツバメは夏の前触れだ。The swallow is a sign of summer.

彼の前身については何かご存じですか。Are you aware of anything concerning his past life?
軍隊は丘の上へ前進した。The army advanced up the hill.







「高い所って、あたしは好きだなぁ。あたしって、前世はきっと・・・飛行機だったのかな？」「普通、そこは鳥でしょうが」"I rather like heights. You know, in my last life I must have been ... an aeroplane?" "Usually that would be 'bird' there."







彼らは兵士として前線に行った。As soldiers they went to the front.

彼らは前奏曲を聞き漏らさないように早く来た。They came early so they wouldn't miss the prelude.




犯人を弁護してた弁護士が実は真犯人だったなんて、前代未聞だ。It's totally without precedent for the suspect's attorney to be the true culprit.




彼は前置きとして、すこし話した。He said a few words by way of preface.
この句では前置詞を省略できる。You can omit the preposition in this phrase.



その前提が妥当かどうかよく考えるべきだ。You ought to think over whether the premise is valid or not.私たちは結婚を前提として交際しています。We are dating with a view to marriage.



支配人は２週間分の給料を彼に前渡しした。The manager advanced him two weeks' wages.


君には前途がある。Life lies in front of you.
ケイトは天才で前途有望だと、みんな言っています。Everyone says that Kate is a genius and will have a successful future.


私はその前日彼にあった。I met him on the previous day.

私は前任者の方針を踏襲する考えです。I intend to follow my predecessor's policy.

年金の額は原則として前年の物価変動にスライドして算出される。As a general rule, the pension amount is based on price changes in the previous year.



前髪は短く切りすぎないでください。Don't cut it too short in the front.









トムはバスの前部のほうに座っていた。Tom was sitting in the front of the bus.


我々ははるか前方に他の船を見た。We saw another ship far ahead.






車の前面ガラスは砕けて粉々になった。The front windshield of a car was smashed to pieces.

まるで革命前夜のような騒ぎだった。It looked as if we were on the eve of a revolution.






前立腺肥大になりました。I had an enlarged prostate.

このような問題の前例はない。There is no precedent for such a case.
彼の前歴について私たちは調査した。We made inquiries into his past.
前列の席の料金は５ドルです。The charge for a front row seat is 5 dollars.



競争それ自体は善でも悪でもない。Competition is neither good nor evil in itself.

よかれあしかれ、この問題は彼に委せるほかはない。For better or worse, there is nothing for it but to leave the matter in his hands.


赤ん坊は善悪について何も知らない。A baby does not know good or evil.
公平に評すれば、彼は善意からやったのだと認めなければならない。To do him justice, we must admit that his intentions were good.






一つの善行はもう一つの善行に値する。One good turn deserves another.



善処いたします。I'll have to go and see what I can do.


善人必ずしも栄える者でない。Not all good men will prosper.

彼は自分の王国に善政を施した。He ruled his kingdom fairly.
絶望的な戦いの中、貴君の師団が善戦したことは高く評価されている。Your division was highly praised for fighting well in the midst of a hopeless conflict.







善良な市民は法律に従う。A good citizen obeys the laws.



「そっか」ウィリーはようやく納得した。"Well, OK," Willie finally agreed.９時２０分の汽車にようやく間に合った。I barely made the 9:20 train.９時２０分の電車にようやく間に合った。I barely made the 9:20 train.







そういうことは口にするな。Don't talk about such a thing.

笑いで誤魔化すと、亜美さんはさも不機嫌そうに眉を寄せた。Ami frowned in a very un-amused way as I brushed her off with a laugh.
急ぎなさい、さもないと遅れますよ。Hurry up, or you'll be late.
われに自由を与えよ。しからずんば死を与えよ。Give me liberty or give me death.
その製造業者は、避けられない危機を乗り切る手助けをしてくれる、金をもった、さる金融業者をみつけた。The industrialist found a wealthy financier to help him weather the storm which was inevitable.
彼は非常に誉められたがしかるに私は非常にしかられた。He was greatly praised, while I was as much scolded.
しかるべき時期にお支払いいたしました。I paid at the appropriate time.
ごく最近まで、先進国の人々は環境にさほど気にかけてはいなかった。Until quite recently, people in developed countries didn't care much about the environment.
全新聞がその事件を大きく取り上げた。All the papers featured the case.その辞書は全２巻です。The dictionary comes in two volumes.


彼の意見は我々の意見とはまったく違っている。His opinion is quite different from ours.「彼女はきれいだね」「まったくだ」"She is lovely." "So she is."



委員は全員出席している。The committee are all present.








御病気が全快なされるように。I hope you will be completely cured.

ファイルへの直リンだけはやめた方がいいです。 URLの最初だけ全角ｈｔｔｐにするとか、ちょっと工夫しよう。It's a good idea to stop using direct links to files. Use a trick like starting the URL with double-width "h t t p" or something.
なるべく早く、全額をご送金くださるようお願いします。May we ask you to remit the settlement in full at your earliest convenience?











この丘から市の全景がよく見える。The hill commands the panorama of the city.

長官は彼に全権を委任した。The governor invested him with full authority.





全校生徒がその提案に同意した。The whole school agreed to the proposal.




警察は犯人の全国的な捜索を開始した。The police have started a nationwide hunt for the criminal.

全国民がそのニュースを聞いて喜んだ。The entire nation was glad at the news.


全市に夜間外出禁止令が布かれた。A curfew was imposed on the city.
全市民はその地震におびえた。The city was alarmed by the earthquake.



コピー紙の節約運動が全社的に展開されている。A campaign is underway throughout the company to achieve economy in the use of copying paper.
この全集の５巻目が見当たらない。The fifth volume of this set is missing.




家は全焼した。The house was burned to the ground.

彼女は全身ずぶぬれだった。She was soaked from head to foot.








ある人物が不変の性質で全人生を貫くということは小説の中だけの話だ。Only in novels do you find individuals who live out their whole life with unvarying character.


全世界の人々が平和を切望している。The whole world hungers for peace.

教育は若い時代に限られてはならず、われわれの全生涯を通じて継続して行われるものでなければならない。Education must not be limited to our youth, but it must be a continuing process through our entire lives.
その歌手はその歌のときが全盛でした。The singer was at his best in that song.
どんな犬にも全盛期がある。Every dog has his day.
彼女にも全盛時代があった。She has seen better days.

掲示には「全席予約済み」とあった。"Fully booked" was on the notice.
私は全責任を負わされた。I am left with all the responsibility.
「長い１日だったのでお疲れでしょう」「いいえ、全然」"You must be tired after a long day." "No, not in the least."あなたの作文は全然だめだというわけではない。Your composition is not altogether bad.
全速前進。Full speed ahead!
彼の主治医は全速力でやって来た。His doctor came with all speed.
事故で車は全損って嘆いているけどさ、怪我がなくてなにより、命あっての物種だよ。I know you're upset about your car being totaled, but you weren't injured and you should be thankful to be alive.
私はその話の全体を知っている。I know the whole of the story.

彼らは全体としてよいグループだった。They were a good group as a whole.








それは翼の全長が約４インチある。It has a wingspan of about four inches.





米国全土では毎年膨大な数の若者が大学にはいる。Throughout the United State large numbers of young people enter college every year.













我がチームは全敗を喫した。Our team lost all its games.

そのことは人間全般に言える。That can be said of mankind at large.
アメリカにいる間、いろいろ大変なことがありましたが、全般に楽しかったです。I had many problems during my visit to the U.S., but overall, I had a good time.



全般的にみてまあまあの出来だった。He hasn't done badly, all in all.




かばん全部に荷札をつけなさい。Attach labels to all the bags.

彼らは指導者に全幅の信頼をおいている。They have full confidence in their leader.

私たちは彼の演説の全文を読んだ。We read the full text of his speech.

私はその本を全編残らず読んだ。I read the book from cover to cover.

犯罪の全貌はまだ明らかになっていない。We do not yet know everything about the crime.

その町の住人は全滅した。The population of the town was wiped out.





彼らは全面的に私を支持してくれた。They backed me up in everything.








私にできるのは全力を尽くすことだけです。All I can do is to do my best.

禅は私たちの心を鍛練するといわれる。They say Zen cultivates our mind.





母にこのセーターをつくろってもらった。I had my mother mend this sweater.猿たちは互いに毛繕いし合っている。The monkeys are grooming each other.世間体を繕う心配をするより他にやることがある。We have other things to do than worry about keeping up appearances.


彼は柔らかい粘土で小さな塑像を作った。He made a little statue out of soft clay.

手後れにならないうちに、必要な措置を取るべきです。We should take the necessary steps before it's too late.

彼女のねらいは教師になることである。She aims to become a teacher.



彼はその兵士をねらって矢を放った。He shot an arrow at the soldier.
新たなる狙撃が別の友を殺す。Another shooting and another friend's gone.

去る者は日々に疎しだな。お互いに離ればなれになると、自然と疎遠になるよね。Out of sight out of mind. When you're separated you lose touch.僕は最近の情勢に疎い。I know little of the recent situation.
学業をおろそかにするなんて、君はばかだ。It is silly of you to neglect your studies.


９月の海は、人がまばらだね。In September, there are just a few people here and there on the beach.

君はいつから家族と疎遠になっているのか。How long have you been alienated from your family?


彼は社会から疎外されていると感じた。He felt alienated from society.



テレビはしばしば家庭内の意思の疎通を妨げるという事実はすでによく知られている。The fact that television frequently limits communication within families is already well known.




この記念碑は祖国に命を捧げた兵士を祭っている。This monument is dedicated to the soldiers who gave their lives to their country.

私たちは祖先をうやまうべきだ。We should worship our ancestors.

我々は祖父の名前を息子に名付けた。We named my son after my grandfather.
サラは祖父母が昔話をくどくどとしゃべるのを聞くとうんざりする。Sarah gets very bored listening to her grandparents rambling on about old times.
私は祖母が大好きです。I love my grandmother very much.




彼女のドレスはきめの粗いウールでできていた。Her dress was made of coarse wool.








あの女はいつも人のあら探しばかりしている。She is always finding fault with other people.


粗品ですがお受け取りください。This is just a small gift, but please accept it.

デニスには粗暴なところがない。Dennis doesn't have rough manners.
道具を粗末に使うな。Don't handle these tools roughly.

あの長髪の青年は粗野だ。That long-haired youth is rude.





このことは、人間共通の宿命とさえいえる素因であって、なにも、ドイツ人に限ったことではない。This is a basic factor that can even be said to be the common lot of man; it certainly doesn't apply only to Germans.


彼は素行不良で１週間の停学を受けた。He was suspended from school for a week for bad conduct.
この素材は決してすり減ったりしない。This material never wears out.

私は優れた彼の妻になる素質がある。I make an excellent wife for him.
ある人が素手で掘っているのが見えた。One man was seen digging with his bare hands.
ジェーンはいつもとても金持ちのようなそぶりだった。Jane always made out that she was very rich.
あのシロウト歌手は文句なくタレントショーで一位となった。The amateur singer won first in the talent show hands down.

ぜんぜん素性の分からない人間を軽々しく信用してはならぬ。Don't trust a man whose past you know nothing about.
その日は実にすばらしい日だった。It was a really beautiful day.
悪い知らせはすばやく伝わる。Bad news travels fast.そのクモは素早い反撃をする。The spider responds with a swift attack.彼は素早くフランス語を習得した。He acquired French quickly.
熱い砂の上を素足では歩けない。We cannot walk on the hot sand with bare feet.

思っていることを素直に言うのは悪いことではありません。Saying what you think frankly is not a bad thing.
あなた達は本当に素敵なお客だ。You're such a lovely audience.



素朴な疑問なんだけど、・・・トラとライオンはどっちが強いの？This may be a silly question, but which is stronger - a tiger or a lion?


パパはラテン語の素養もあったのです。Papa had a classical education.


彼はその組の首席だ。He is at the head of the class.もうひと組の観光客が到着した。Another lot of tourists arrived.
彼らは腕を組み合って並木道を歩いた。They walked along the avenue, arm in arm.

この上着を何か少し派手な物と組み合わせられませんか。Can you match this coat with something a little more colorful?


モデムはコンピューターの中に組み込まれた。The modem was built into the computer.

足を温かくするために足を交互に組み替えなければならなかった。In order to keep our feet warm we had to shift from one foot to another and keep moving.
何とかそれを僕のきついスケジュールに組み入れよう。I'll work that into my tight schedule.



昨日、アンプを組み立てた。I built an amplifier yesterday.
私は彼らが腕を組んで歩いているのを見た。I saw them walking arm in arm.
組閣する事は難しい。Forming a cabinet is difficult.

組合は５％の賃上げを獲得した。The union won a 5% wage increase.
役員評議会が組織されて新提案を協議した。An executive council was formed to discuss the new proposal.もっとも重要なことは、脳にはこれらの解剖学的組織を結合する全体的な再入経路が必要である。Most important of all, the brain needs global reentry pathways connecting these anatomical structures.党幹部らは、党組織の欠陥問題に取り組んでいます。Party leaders are grappling with flaws in the party system.

リサーチ・イン・モーションが約２千人の従業員解雇と組織再編を発表した。Research in Motion announced the layoff of 2000 employees and a restructuring of the company.


暴力団の組長は団員全部に規則を守らせ、恐怖感によって、団員を掌握した。The gang leader made all the members toe the line, keeping control through fear.

この訴えを退けたくはない。I do not want to reject this claim.
その国は国連に援助してくれるよう訴えた。The country appealed to the United Nations for help.その患者はいつも頭が痛いと訴えている。The patient is always complaining of a headache.その中年の男は暴行のかどで訴えられた。The middle aged man was charged with assault.

その訴訟の判事は公平ではなかった。The judge in the case was not fair.





彼らは大きな川に前進を阻まれた。Their progress was stopped by a wide river.
それは彼の人格を阻害することになる。It runs against his character.
クーデター計画はぎりぎりのところで阻止されました。The coup attempt was foiled at the last moment.
鮭は川をさかのぼって砂に産卵する。Salmon go up the river and lay their eggs in the sand.その教会は１１７３年までさかのぼる。The church dates back to 1173.
猫がいなくなるとネズミたちが遊びだす。When the cat is away, the mice will play.
















その僧は子供たちの遊びに参加した。The priest participated in the children's game.




















彼は僧侶に近い禁欲生活をしている。He practices austerities almost like a monk.

相対性理論の創案者はアインシュタインであった。The theory of relativity originated with Einstein.
有能な大蔵大臣の創意になる処置は、行き詰まった国の財政から赤字をなくすのに役立った。The talented finance minister's ingenuity has helped his bankrupt nation to get out of the red.


日本創刊を果たしたイギリス発のホームレスの人だけが販売者となれるストリートペーパー「ビッグイシュー」について紹介しよう。I shall be introducing the street paper that is only sold by the homeless, "The Big Issue", started in England and has had its first Japanese issue.




城の創建は１１世紀にさかのぼると伝えられる。It is said that the castle dates back to the 11th century.



この画家は美しい絵画を創作する。This artist creates beautiful paintings.それは彼女の創作だろう。I think she made up that story.











彼らは新しい会社を創設するつもりだ。They will set up a new company.

神は自分の形に人を創造された。God created man in his own image.
神は創造者です。天も地も人も、神以外は全て被造物です。God is the creator. Heaven and Earth and people and everything apart from God are created.
その影響力は日毎にますます大きくなっているが、しかし創造性があるわけではなく、また、価値の判断もできない。Their influence becomes greater every day, but they are uncreative and can't make value judgements.

彼は創造的精神が欠けている。He is barren of creative spirit.
科学的心理は人間精神の創造物である。Scientific truth is a creation of the human mind.
テレビは創造力を鈍らせる力がある。Television can dull our creative power.

私たちの学校は創立して５０年だ。Our school is fifty years old.
そのホールは創立者を記念して立てられたものだ。The hall was built in memory of the founder.





まだ肉眼じゃ無理だよ。双眼鏡だと、ちょびっとだけ見えるかも・・・。It's still impossible with the naked eye. With binoculars you might be able to glimpse it....



その双子は全くよく似ている。The twins are very much alike.






肉体と精神とは双生児であり、神のみがどちらがどちらなのかを知っている。Body and spirit are twins: God only knows which is which.









乙が受託業務の実施により得た成果は、甲乙双方に帰属するものとする。Any result obtained through the execution of the Commissioned Business shall belong to each party hereto.








後にそれらを売って、私はＲ．バートンの「歴史叢書」を買うことができたのだった。I afterward sold them to enable me to buy R. Burton's Historical Collections.






その倉庫は麻薬密売者の隠れみのだった。The warehouse was a front for drug traffickers.















水不足は森林の喪失によって起こる。Water shortage is caused by the loss of forests.




スミス夫人は喪服を着ている。Mrs. Smith is in black.

王室の結婚式は大変な壮観だった。The royal wedding was a great spectacle.


壮行式は何時からですか。When is the pep rally?



壮大な眺めですね。It's a magnificent view, isn't it?

王は壮麗な宮殿で有名だった。The king was famous for his splendid palace.

もしも、音楽が愛の糧であるならば、奏で続けよ。If music be the food of love, play on.

オーボエ奏者なんかは自分にあうリードを探すより作った方が速いと、自分で作ってしまう人もいる。Heck, with oboe players there are those who, rather than search for a reed that suits them, find it faster to make their own.


オレンジジュースを飲んだら気分がさわやかになった。A glass of orange juice refreshed me.
私はプールでひと泳ぎした後、気分そう快だった。I felt refreshed after a swim in the pool.
洪水のあとに粘土の層が残った。The flood deposited a layer of mud.多くの会社が市場の金持ち層を獲得しようと競争している。Many firms are competing for the wealthier segment of the market.



この企画はもう一度想を練り直せ。You should rethink this program.

あなたには想像もつかない、でしょ？You can't imagine it, can you?

枝が伸び、実が成ることを想定して接ぐ場所を選びましょう。Select the graft point after imagining how the branches will extend and fruit grow.
私は適当な答えを探し求めた。I cast about for a suitable reply.

警察は事件の捜査をした。The police looked into that incident.


私たちは散開して森の中を捜索した。We spread out and began to search through the woods.






お前は床を掃きさえすればよい。You have only to sweep the floor.


あなたの部屋を掃除しましたか。Did you clean your room?

よし！掃討完了！Alright! They're all mopped up!
実も結ぶが、挿し木でも根付くらしい？It bears fruit, but it seems it may even set root from cuttings?
彼はボタンの穴に花を挿した。He stuck a flower in his buttonhole.
その作家の文体は挿入語句が多い。The writer has a parenthetic style.



水を加えてペースト状になるまでかき回しなさい。Add water and stir to a paste.


その子供はおもちゃをかき集めた。He gathered his toys together.



その教師は我々の興味をかき立てた。The teacher aroused our interest.
彼女は身体を折り曲げておなかをかきむしった。She doubled over, clutching her side.
蚊に刺されたところをかいちゃだめだよ。はれちゃうから。Don't scratch your mosquito bite. It'll get inflamed.先生の言葉でメアリーは冷や汗をかいた。The teacher's words put Mary in a cold sweat.



あの通訳は５か国語を自由に操る。That interpreter is a master of five languages.儲けようとする投機筋に操られているのです。It's being manipulated by investors trying to make it rich.
その工場は来月から操業を中止する。The factory will cease operations next month.


このコンピューターの操作は難しい。Operating this computer is tricky.私はこのＣＤプレイヤーの操作のしかたが分からない。I don't know how to operate this CD player.


ジェット機では不注意な操縦は許されない。A jet airliner does not admit of careless handling.






それが君の生活をよくするのに役立つなら、いくら早くとりかかっても早すぎることはないよ。If it is useful for improving your life, it cannot be done too soon.あなたが早くよくなるように祈っています。We are hoping for your quick recovery.
すみません。また早とちりをしてしまいました。Sorry, I've gone and jumped to conclusions again.
就職活動の時期は早まる傾向にあり、マスコミ各社の面接がその先頭にたっている。The job-seeking season is starting earlier each year and it's the mass media that are causing that trend by moving up their job interview schedule.早まって喜ぶな、最後に笑える者が勝ち。He laughs best who laughs last.心臓の鼓動が速まった。My heart quickened.

その事件の早期解決を期待する。We expect an early settlement of the affair.
私は早起きになれている。I'm used to getting up early.



アナウンサーは早口が出来る。The announcer can talk rapidly.

女の子は男の子より早熟だ。Girls mature faster than boys.


早足でついていく２匹の犬をすぐ後に従えて、彼は急いで歩き去った。He walked quickly away with two dogs trotting at his heels.
さっそく仕事にとりかかりましょう。I will set about my task at once.
今日は学校を早退してもいいでしょうか。May I leave school early today?
早朝に露がおりる。The dew falls in early morning.
早晩彼女は姿を現すだろう。Sooner or later, she will appear.
よい席をとることを目当てに早めに劇場にいった。We went to the theater early to get good seats.



ミツバチは、においのサンプルを巣に持ち帰ることによって食糧のありかを伝える。Bees communicate the location of food by carrying odor samples back to the hive.クモはいつも自分たちの巣を３次元に織る。Spiders always weave their webs in three dimensions.
嫉妬心くらい強く人間の心情に巣食う情熱はない。There is not a passion so strongly rooted in the human heart as envy.









彼は敵目がけて槍を投げつけた。He hurled a spear at his enemy.

一生懸命努力して、彼はとうとう契約にこぎつけた。After much effort, he ended up with a contract.
彼らは池でボートを漕いでいる。They are rowing a boat on the pond.彼は、自転車を一生懸命こいだ。He was pumping the pedals of the bicycle hard.

そんな些細なことで、鬼の首を取ったようにはしゃがなくてもいいじゃない。There's no sense acting all triumphant like a conquering hero over such a minor thing.
金銭のことで彼と争いになった。I had a quarrel with him over money.ポスト争いは厳しい。Competition for the position is very intense.





１０チームが賞を得ようと争った。Ten teams competed for the prize.その囚人達はまるで狂人のように互いに争った。The prisoners fought one another like so many mad people.


争議は円満に解決した。The dispute was settled peacefully.




私たちはその討論を争点となっている問題に限定すべきだ。We should confine the discussion to the question at issue.





骨と皮ばかりにやせこけたねこでした。It was a cat starved to skin and bones.

私はやせ衰えて骨と皮ばかりになった。I wasted away to skin and bone.
そんなにやせ我慢しなくても、はやくこっちに来れば良かったのに。You should have come here sooner instead of putting it off out of pride for so long.


両者の間には、あったとしても、相違はごくわずかである。There is little, if any, difference between the two.
この２つのエスニック・グループの態度の相違点を記述するだけでは十分ではない。It is not sufficient to describe the differences in attitude between these two ethnic groups.
収入相応の暮らしをしなさい。Try to live within your means.
君にふさわしいはずはないのだから。He couldn't be good for you.








男子学生同士が相合傘か、なかなかオツなシチュエーションだな。Two male school pupils sharing an umbrella? That's quite a queer situation.


私の計画は相次いで失敗した。My plan failed time after time.
相次ぐ不祥事にも関わらず、警察はオメオメ違反切符を切っている。Despite their own scandals, the police continue to make arrests as though nothing had happened at all.

あなたのダンスの相手はだれですか。Who is your dance partner?あいつは海千山千だから、取り引き相手としてはかなり手強いぞ。All those tricks he's got up his sleeve make him a formidable client.そのボクサーは第１ラウンドで相手を倒すつもりだと言った。The boxer said he would knock down his opponent in the first round.

相手方の要求は何ですか。What does the other party want?



そこ知らずの相場だ。The bottom has fallen out of the market.
相席させていただいてよろしいですか。May I share this table with you?
ジョンは莫大な財産を相続した。John inherited a large fortune.






アインシュタインという名から私達は相対性理論を連想する。We associate the name of Einstein with the theory of relativity.

「美しい」とか「醜い」といった言葉は相対的な用語である。The words 'beautiful' and 'ugly' are relative terms.


彼女は弁護士と相談した。She conferred with her lawyer.
かくかくしかじかで、と事情を説明したのだが、あんまり興味なさそうな相槌しか返ってこなかった。I explained the situation, as this, that and such and such, but they just nodded along without showing much interest.
「私もそう思うわ」と彼女は相づちを打った。"I think so, too," she chimed in.
その語に相当するようなフランス語を知っていますか。Do you know the French equivalent of the word?それを発明した教授は大学から相当の対価を受ける権利がある。The professor who invented it has the right to reasonable remuneration from the university.アメリカへの旅は彼女にとって２年間の給与に相当した。A trip to America was equivalent to a two-year salary for her.
彼は相当数の蔵書を集めた。He has accumulated quite a collection of books.

理論と実際は相伴うべきである。Theory and practice should go hand in hand.



君は相変わらず健康そうに見える。You look as healthy as ever.
この２つの子音は相補分布をなしていそうである。It is likely that these two consonants are in complementary distribution.


こいつ、さっきまで俺の相棒だったのに、もう寝返りやがった。This rat, up until just now he was my partner and now he's gone and turned on me.
ここでは私は議論を、なぜ相撲の好きな外国人が多いか、に限定したい。Here, I'll confine this discussion to why many foreigners enjoy sumo.

２５０キロというのは相撲取りとしても並外れた体重だ。Two hundred fifty kilograms is an extraordinary weight even for a sumo wrestler.
我々の利益は彼らの利益と相容れない。Our interests clash with theirs.
窓を開けっぱなしにしておいたの？Did you leave the window open?

トラベラーズチェックを現金に替えてくれるのはこの窓口ですか。Is this the right window for cashing travelers' checks?
窓際の席をお願いします。I'd like a table by the window.


彼らは窓枠を黄色く塗った。They painted the window frames yellow.
総入れ歯にする必要があります。You have to have a full denture.

１０月に総会を開催すべきだという提案があった。There was a suggestion that the general meeting should take place in October.

その総額は１０ドルになった。The total came to ten dollars.


飲み代として使った金額は総計７千ドルだった。The total bill for drinks came up to 7000 dollars.


彼も大人になって、物事を総合的な視野で見られるようになった。As he grew up, he learned to put things in perspective.
小泉が与党自民党の新総裁に選出された。Mr Koizumi was elected the new president of Japan's ruling Liberal Democratic Party.

私は内閣の総辞職があると思う。My guess is that there will be a resignation of the cabinet.
私の総収入は臨時収入を入れても月３０万円にはるか及ばない。My total income is far short of 300,000 yen a month, inclusive of extra earnings.

大男総身に知恵が回りかね。With a big man it's hard for the blood to get up to the brain.
日本の総人口を知っていますか。Do you know the total population of Japan?

上の例が不自然であることの証拠は、構成要素Ｘが現れた総数を比較することでわかる。Evidence that the above example is farfetched can be seen by comparing the total occurrences of component X.
集められた使用人さんたちは、総勢・・・ひゃ、百人近いよ。The servants gathered there totalled ... n-nearly one hundred!

総選挙がありそうだと言う噂が流れていた。A general election was in the air.











彼は総理のたっての要請を固辞した。He firmly refused the Premier's earnest request.
総理大臣が辞任した。The Prime Minister has resigned.








月には草が生えて無い。There is no grass on the moon.
堅実な草の根レベルの運動を築きあげることに集中しなければならない。We must focus on building a solid grass-roots movement.この企画にぴったりのライターを、草の根分けてでも探しだして欲しい。I want you to search high and low for a writer who's just right for this project. Leave no stone unturned.
草案を添付します。Attached is the draft compilation.
草花についてもっと知りたいと思いました。He wanted to know more about the flowers.


野生の動物たちが草原を歩き回っていた。Wild animals roamed across the plains.
私は演説の草稿を作った。I made a draft of my speech.
父は私に庭の草取りをやらせた。My father set me the task of weeding the garden.











神聖な儀式がその荘厳な寺院で執り行われた。A sacred ritual took place in the magnificent temple.

これがブレークの葬られている教会です。This is the church where Blake is buried.
君主はその葬儀に出席することになっている。The monarch is supposed to attend the funeral.

１月３０日、３１日は葬式のため休みます。I'm taking bereavement leave on Jan. 30 and 31.










彼女は女優風に装っていた。She was dressed after the fashion of an actress.時々周りで起きていることに無関心を装う。He sometimes affects indifference to what's happening around him.





その部屋は装飾を凝らしている。The room is richly ornamented.

この暖房装置は石油を燃料とする。This heating system burns oil.



その船にはレーダーが装備されていた。The boat was equipped with radar.

走りさえすれば、どんな車でもよいのです。Any car will do, as long as it runs.
彼女の多くの子犬たちは毎日庭で走り回る。Her many little dogs run about in the garden every day.
その車は全速力で走り去った。Away went the car at full speed.
彼女は走り高跳びの世界記録を樹立した。She set the world record for the high jump.
私は１匹の黒猫がその家へ走り込むのを見た。I saw a black cat run into the house.

おまえは嵐の中へ走り出した。You've run into a storm.
私は日記の裏表紙に彼の住所を走り書きした。I scribbled down his address in the back of my diary.


馬は野原を走り抜けた。The horse ran through the fields.
彼は走り幅跳びに専念するために競争をやめた。He has given up running in order to focus on the long jump.
あの走ってる少年をごらんなさい。Look at that boy running.この車は以前ほど快調に走らない。This car is running less smoothly than it used to.この列車は東京と大阪の間を走ります。This train runs between Tokyo and Osaka.
走行中の箱乗りはご遠慮下さい！Please don't lean out of the window when we're moving.

あと５００００マイルほど走行距離を出してみたかったのだが、高速道路で故障してしまった。修理となるとえらく金がかかってとても無理だろう。I had hoped to get another 50,000 miles out of my car, but it gave up the ghost on the expressway and it would cost too much to fix it.



決勝まで残った走者は５人だった。Five runners reached the finals.





土地の人々を扇動するためにスパイを送り込んだ。They sent agents to agitate the local people.
その学校は、多くの発明家を送り出している。The school has turned out many inventors.心臓の働きは血液を送り出す事である。The function of the heart is to pump blood.


彼はその手紙を開封しないで送り返した。He sent the letter back unopened.

この手紙を日本に送ってくれませんか。Could you send this letter to Japan?お宅までお送りしましょうか？May I escort you home?その夫婦は幸福な生活を送った。The couple led a happy life.

フランスへの送金の仕方を教えて欲しいんですが。I'd like to know how to send money to France.

グランドホテルまでの送迎バス乗り場はどこですか。Where's the bus stop for Grand Hotel?




どの記者も、自分の書いた記事をただちに送信した。Every reporter sent his stories with the least possible delay.

仮の議事内容を送付しました。Attached is the tentative agenda.
雪のため、鈴木氏の送別パーティーに出席できなかった。The storm prevented me from attending the farewell party in honor of Mr Suzuki.
スミスさんのために送別会が開かれた。A farewell party was held for Mr. Smith.
もしも無料でなければ、カタログの価格と日本までの送料をお教えください。If they are not free, please let me know how much the catalogue and the postage to Japan are.
私たちは多くの困難に遭遇した。We encountered many difficulties.
彼らは山で遭難した。They met with an accident in the mountains.

船長は無線通信士に遭難信号を打つように命令した。The ship's captain ordered the radio operator to send a distress signal.
今朝、地面は霜で覆われていた。The ground was covered with frost this morning.



日本の牛は広範囲に霜降りがある。In Japan beef has a high degree of marbled fat.

よく騒がしい部屋で働いたものだった。I used to work in a noisy room.

この騒ぎはどうしたの。What is all this bother about?
つまらないことで騒ぎ立てるな。Don't make a fuss about trifles.
彼は子供たちにそんなにさわがないようにと言った。He told his children not to make so much noise.
群衆が興奮してざわめいていた。The crowd buzzed with excitement.
その騒音には我慢できない。I can't put up with the noise.
その部屋は騒然としていた。The room was in disorder.
警察が騒動に介入した。The police intervened in the disturbance.


その像は型に入れられて作られた。The statue was cast in a mold.
その知らせで彼の不安が増した。The news added to his anxiety.


これ以上ここでもたついてると、後ろの第二関門からも増援が来て、挟撃されるかも知れねーんだぜ。If we hang around here any longer, there could be reinforcements coming from the second gate to take us in a pincer movement!
犯罪率は着実に増加している。The crime rate is rising steadily.


語彙力を増強したい。I want to build up my vocabulary.







新鮮な野菜は健康を増進する。Fresh vegetables promote health.
大部分の日本人が増税に反対した。Most Japanese opposed a tax increase.
メモリ増設しようかな。Maybe I ought to expand the memory.

貿易が国富を増大させた。Trade increased the country's wealth.
目下増築中である。An extension is currently under construction.






かわいさ余って憎さ百倍。The greatest hate springs from the greatest love.
恐いもの知らずのその男は憎しみと軽蔑の目でやくざをちらりと見た。The bold man glanced at the gangster with hatred and contempt.
憎まれっ子世に憚る。Ill weeds grow apace.

わざわざ憎まれ役を買って出るようだが、でも一つ聞きたいね。期待しているような客がもし一人もいなかったらどうすればいいんだ。I may be playing the devil's advocate, but I have to ask, what are we going to do if we don't get all the customers we expect?
自分を憎む者にも親切にしなさい。Do good to those who hate you.
彼はにくらしげに彼女をにらんだ。He stared at her with hatred.
彼は父を憎悪している。He has a hatred for his father.

外科医は私を説得して、臓器の移植手術を受けることに同意させた。The surgeon persuaded me to undergo an organ transplant operation.
外科医に説得されて、彼は臓器移植手術を受けることにした。The surgeon persuaded him to undergo an organ transplant.
料理する前にチキンの臓物を抜いてください。Draw a chicken before cooking.
これがごく最近私の蔵書に加わった本です。This is the latest acquisition to my library.



ドロシーは彼にすばらしい贈り物を贈った。Dorothy sent him a nice present.市長は彼に市の鍵を贈った。The mayor presented him with the key to the city.
彼は贈収賄を軽蔑した。He disdained bribery.
その女優は演じ終わると花束を贈呈された。The actress was presented a bouquet of flowers after the performance.



これはある国ではいわゆる「贈り物」で、他の国では「贈賄」である。This is what is called a 'present' in some countries and 'bribery' in others.
私の家の壁に本棚が作り付けになっている。The bookshelves are built into the walls of my room.










彼は彼女に注意して運転するようにと促した。He urged her to drive carefully.この曲は眠りを促してくれます。This music helps me to fall asleep.
拗音（ゃ　ゅ　ょ）と促音（っ）の出し方も、加えていただけると参考になるかもしれません。I think it might be useful if you could add how to output the diphthongs (with small ya/yu/yo) and geminate consonants (with small tsu).
彼は平和を促進するために尽力した。He worked hard to promote peace.



あの窓のそばの机は使うな。Don't use the desk by that window.





その独裁者は側近たち全員の絶対的な忠誠を受けた。The dictator had the absolute loyalty of all his aides.













鳥類の発声において真に驚異的な点は、鳴管の２つの側面が独立して動くことができるということである。The truly remarkable feature of sound production by birds is that the two sides of the syrinx can act independently.スポーツが人々に訴えるのは、その健康的側面によるだけでなく、チーム競技が養う協調精神、それに競争的側面そのものにもよるのである。It's not only the health aspects of sports that appeal to people, but the cooperative aspect that team sports teach, and the competitive aspect in itself.



利益追求に必死のブローカーは、必ずしもルールブックにのっとっているとは限らないのです。Brokers struggling to make a profit don't always play by the book.
彼の伝記は全くの事実に即して書かれたものだ。His biography is quite true to life.
彼は非常に知識のある人、すなわち生き字引である。He is a man of great knowledge, that is to say, a walking dictionary.田森は、１９４５年すなわち第二次世界大戦が終わった年に生まれた。Tamori was born in 1945, that is, when World War II ended.すなわち彼はそれをしたくないのだ。In other words, he doesn't want to do it.
エリザベス女王の即位５０年の記念に贈られたものみたいです。It seems it was a gift for the 50th anniversary of Queen Elizabeth's accession to the throne.
我々は予測される変化に即応して計画を立てることが必要である。It is important that we make plans in relation to anticipated changes.
結婚式のスピーチでくよくよすることはない。いざとなったら即興でもうまくいくもんだよ。Don't worry about giving a speech at the wedding; you can just wing it when you get there.

私はこれを即金で買った。I bought this outright.

かんかんに怒った社員は、即刻会社を辞めた。The outraged employee resigned at once.
「今、行動を起こせ」という、それが伝える実際的な意味に加えて、即座の行動がなぜ重要であるかという多くの理由をも、言外に示唆していたのであった。"Act now!" he said, and in addition to his obvious meaning, he hinted that there were number of other important reasons why immediate action was needed.
警官は強盗犯を即座に逮捕しました。The police arrested the burglar on the spot.
その犬は即死した。The dog was killed on the spot.
彼は即時断行を強調した。He put emphasis on the necessity for immediate action.


彼は即席に立派な演説をした。He made a splendid off-the-cuff speech.


彼は僕に即答をしつこく求めた。He pressed me for a prompt reply.
その法律は即日施行された。The law came into effect on the day it was proclaimed.

その商品は即売されるだろう。The goods will be sold on the spot.

おぼれかけた人は息を吹き返した。The man who nearly drowned began to breathe.彼らは息がぴたりと合っている。They are a perfect match for each other.
鼻で息をしていてください。Please breathe through your nose.
老婆はほっと息をついてにっこり笑った。The old woman smiled with a sigh of relief.
彼は息を殺して見守った。He watched it holding his breath.
ついに彼は息を吹き返した。At last he came to.


母親は息子にやかましく言って聞かせた。The mother whipped sense into her boy.
あなたの息子さんが何か悪いことをしても、それはあなたのせいではありません。息子さんはもう２５歳ですからね。It won't be your fault if your son does anything wrong: he is twenty-five now, isn't he?

５分と走らないうちに息切れしてしまった。I had not run five minutes when I got out of breath.今学期は本当に息切れした感じだわ。I seem to have run out of steam this term.
たまには旅行でもして息抜きしないと、毎日仕事仕事じゃやってられないよ。You need to take a trip every once in a while to relax, you can't just work all day every day.
そうしたら、茂みの下にいくつかの１０００ドル札の束を見つけ、それをバスケットの中に入れた。Then she found several stacks of thousand-dollar bills under a bush and put them in her basket.



がっかりしたことに、彼の勝利は、つかの間の勝利にすぎなかった。To my regret, his was nothing but a short-lived triumph.

私は一つの会社に束縛されたくない。I don't want to be tied to one company.





測定においては正確さは欠かせないものである。Precision in measurement is a necessity.

英国の測量法では４クオートは１ガロンだ。In the imperial measurement system, four quarts equals one gallon.



また足がしびれた。My foot's asleep again!ん〜、イマイチなんだよねえ。この脚のあたりの線とかさぁ。なんとかなんないの？This drawing is less than great. He needs to do something with the line here at the back of the leg.

足が遅い彼は、もちろんすでに2m差がついた。He, being slow-footed, was of course already lagging two meters.
強盗は遺留品の一つから足がついた。The burglar was traced by one of the things he had left on the scene.
これは本を買うための足しになった。This was an additional fund for buying books.
うちの息子はまだちゃんと足し算ができない。My boy can't do addition properly yet.
６０にするためには１７に何を足せばよいの。What do you have to add to 17 to get 60?もしコーヒーが濃すぎれば、いくらかお湯を足して下さい。If the coffee is too strong, add some more water.

足の指の感覚が全くない。There is no feeling in my toes at all.
彼はせいぜい１００ドル足らずしか持っていない。He has a hundred dollars at most.彼のビジネスプランは立派だけど、勘定あって銭足らず、という気もするけどね。His business plan looks good on paper but I get the feeling it would never work in practice.
これだけの量の食料で一週間のキャンプに足りるでしょうか。Will this much food do for a week's camping?
その計画には大いに飽き足らぬところがある。The plan is far from satisfactory.

ネコはその足音を聞いた。The cat listened to its steps.



彼は息子達と一緒に遠くまでハイキングに出かけた時、体調が思わしくなかったので、その翌日、足腰が痛くて思うように動けなかった。He was out of shape when he took a long hike with his sons, and he was stiff and sore the next day.

彼女の足取りは妖精のように軽やかだった。Her footsteps were as light as a fairy's.警察は容疑者の足取りがまだつかめていない。The police have found no trace of the suspect yet.
滑って足首を捻挫した。I slipped and twisted my ankle.




彼は頂上に足早に駆け登った。He rapidly ascended to the top.



兵士たちは足踏みをしていた。The soldiers were marking time.




あれは世界で最も速い電車です。That is the fastest train in the world.子供は成長が早い。Children grow very quickly.今年は春の訪れが早かった。Spring has come early this year.
エイズウイルスの拡散は恐るべき速さで進んでいる。The speed of the spread of AIDS is horrifyingly fast.
決定の後すみやかに実行に移して欲しい。I want quick action subsequent to the decision.
私は速記を習うことに決めた。I have decided to learn shorthand.

これを速達で出してください。Send this by special delivery.

その男は一定の速度で車を運転した。The man drove his car at a uniform speed.




ウチは俗に言うシングルマザーの家庭だ。父親の顔を僕は知らない。We're what they colloquially call a single mother family. I haven't seen my father's face.



















できることなら俗語は使わないようにしなさい。Don't use slang if you can help it.


彼は俗事をかえりみず研究に没頭した。He applied himself to his study, without thought for his normal life.




「愛と哀しみの果て」は俗受けしたけど何といっても映像のきれいな映画だった。Although it was a popular movie, Out of Africa was more of a coffee-table movie than anything else.










その老人は俗世界から超然としている。The old man stands aloof from this world.










私の息子は俗物ではない。My son is not a snob.










彼女はテニス部に属している。She belongs to the tennis club.
普通は、id属性とname属性に同じ値を割り当てます。（訳注：異なっていても構わないが便宜上同じ値を割り当てるという事）Usually the id and name attributes have the same value applied. (N.B. Not because it matters if they differ but just as a matter of convenience.)




６世紀にアングロ・サクソン族はローマ文字を採用した。In the 6th century, the Anglo-Saxons adopted Roman characters.
どれくらいこの寒い天気は続きますか。How long will this cold weather go on?延々と続く車の列があった。There was a continuous line of cars.このところ飛行機事故が続く。There have been a lot of airplane accidents recently.
ケンはその歌を歌い続けた。Ken kept on singing that song.
しかし我々は彼なしで続行した。But we carried on without him.



正直なところ、その当時の僕は血縁がどうとか、続柄がどうとか、そういう話はまるで理解出来ちゃいなかった。Truthfully, at that time, I didn't have the first idea about such talk: family links, blood relations or whatever.



彼は学校を卒業したあと、ロンドンへ行った。After he left school, he went to London.私はポップ・ミュージックはそろそろ卒業しようと思っているの。I feel I'm growing out of pop music.
彼は大学卒業後カメラマンになった。He became a cameraman after he graduated from college.
シンディは卒業試験の最中にうとうとしてしまった。Cindy dozed off in the middle of her graduation examinations.
卒業式は二ヶ月先だ。The graduation is two months ahead.
男子生徒はめいめい卒業証書を受け取った。Each boy has received his diploma.
その大学は去年５００名の卒業生を出した。The university graduated 500 students last year.




卒論のテーマは決めましたか。Have you decided on the subject of your thesis?
父は袖に長い裂け目を作った。Father made a long tear in his sleeve.

ドアをそのままにしておいてはいけません。The door must not be left open.
それでこそわが娘だ。That's what I expected of my daughter.
それでは私の立つ瀬がない。That would leave me in a fix.
雨が激しく降っていますそれでも私は行かなければならない。It's raining hard and yet I must go.
それならそうと言ってくれればいいのに。You should've said so earlier.
それゆえここにとどまらざるを得ないだろう。Hence, I shall have to stay here.
最終電車に乗り遅れてしまいました。そこで、家までずっと歩くはめになりました。I missed the last train, so I had to walk all the way home.列車は満員だった。そこで彼女は２等車で旅行せねばならなかったし、ずっと立っていなければならなかった。The train was full, so she was obliged to travel second-class, and had to stand all the way.
あのチームはつわものぞろいだ。That team has nothing but strong players.
この手袋は両方がそろっていない。Their gloves are not in pairs.この図書館には中国語の本がかなりそろっている。This library has a large collection of Chinese books.
そのアパートはビクトリア朝風の家具を揃えてあった。The apartment was furnished in the Victorian style.パーティーには食べ物や飲物が豊富に揃えて有った。There was food and drink in abundance at the party.その提案に口をそろえて反対を唱えた。We said in unison that we didn't agree to the suggestion.

いっこうに存じません。I know nothing about it.ご援助できないのが残念に存じます。I regret that I can't help you.
神は存在すると思いますか。Do you believe that God exists?



その地方ではその古い風俗がなお存続している。The old custom is still kept up in that district.

存分に楽しもう。Let's enjoy ourselves to our heart's content.

その後は、多くの者が老人ホームで暮らすが、そこには子供とか孫が訪ねていくことが出来る。After that, many live in special homes for the aged where their children and grandchildren can come to visit them.


「ここだわ。ちょうどここがいい」と孫娘はいいました。"There," said the granddaughter, "that's just the place."












あなたはだれからも尊敬されている。You're respected by everybody.
目上の人のすることについて話す時、尊敬語を使います。When speaking about your superiors' actions, you use respectful language.
すべての人々の権利を尊厳すべきだ。You should regard the rights of all.



私は君の判断を尊重する。I defer to your judgement.








その政治家は尊大な態度で話した。The politician spoke with an important air.




ご尊父のご逝去に対し、謹んで哀悼の意を表します。Please accept my condolences on the death of your father.





高望みをするとかえって損をする。You may go farther and fare worse.

僕の行為で彼は機嫌を損じた。My behavior put him out of humor.
彼は機嫌をそこねている。He is in an angry mood.君に会い損ねて地団駄を踏んだよ。I was chagrined at missing you.

その暴風雨は大損害をもたらした。The storm brought heavy losses.
一方で我々は大損害を被ったが、他方その経験から学んだものも大きかった。On the one hand we suffered a heavy loss, but on the other hand we learned a great deal from the experience.
私は彼に損害賠償を要求した。I claimed damages against him.

私は損失の埋め合わせをしなければならなかった。I had to make up for the loss.
私はその事故で右足を損傷した。My right leg was injured in that accident.
損得なしにしよう。Let's make it a fair trade.




町は村よりも大きい。Towns are larger than villages.
村人たちは、あの世があると思っていた。The villagers believed in life after death.
村の村長選挙は延期になった。The election of the village headman had been postponed.

村民たちは新道に賛成した。The villagers supported a new road.
味は日本のお米に比べて遜色はありません。It tastes every bit as good as Japanese rice.


他の物が漁夫の利を占める。Someone else profits from the situation.

彼はたわいない幻想に取り付かれているようだ。He seems to be possessed with idle fancies.



祖父は５年前に他界した。My grandfather died five years ago.







いかなる国も他国の内政に干渉してはならない。No country should interfere in another country's internal affairs.







この条件を受けていただけると、他社との競合が有利になります。This would enable us to compete more effectively with other agencies.
私たちはだれでも、他者との一体感を切望する何かをうちに秘めている。Each of us has something in us that longs for a sense of oneness with others.






そんな他人行儀な話し方はしないでくれよ。You don't have to stand on ceremony with me.






動詞には目的語をとらない自動詞と、目的語をとる他動詞があります。With verbs there are intransitive verbs that don't take an object, and transitive verbs that do take an object.







どちらかが他方よりいい、というのではない。One way is not better than the other.その仕事はあまりおもしろくなかったが、他方で報酬が良かった。That job was not very interesting, but on the other hand it was well paid.






他力本願じゃだめだよ。自分でなんとかしようという気持ちがなくちゃ。You shouldn't rely on others. It's important to want to help yourself.

２０代の若い女性の中には、夏休みに海外旅行にでたいと思う人も多い。Many young women in their 20s plan to go abroad during their summer holidays.
これは多くの場合に当てはまる。This is true in a large number of cases.




１０００ドルというのは、多額の金だ。A thousand dollars is a large sum.







真理は多言を要せず。Truth does not need many words.

家族のご多幸を祈ります。May you and your family be happy.




メニューにはいろいろ多彩な料理があった。There was a great variety of dishes on the menu.
ジムは多才な人といってもいいだろう。Jim can be said to be a man of many talents.





話題は多様多種だった。We talked about a variety of topics.
その会合に集まった人たちは多種多様だった。A variety of people gathered at the meeting.


あの男の人は多重債務者である。That man borrows money from many lenders.

今朝は空気が多少冷たい。The air feels somewhat cold this morning.スープに多少の塩が必要だと思う。I think the soup needs a bit of salt.




会議は出席者多数だった。The meeting was attended by many.多数が彼に賛成だった。The majority was for him.
多数決原理が民主主義の根本原則だ。Majority rule is a basic principle of democracy.
その干ばつの間に多勢の農民が死んだ。Many peasants died during the drought.

台風は多大の被害を与えた。The typhoon has done much harm.


多読は精読と同様重要である。Extensive reading is as important as intensive reading.
我々の前途は多難だ。We have many difficulties before us.
人々はこの習慣を多年の間続けてきた。They have practiced this custom for many years.


君にはたぶんみんなわかっていることでしょう。I expect you know all about it.



多弁の人は多く誤る。He that talks much, errs much.

たとえ多忙でも彼は来るだろう。Even if he is busy, he will come.




ここでは多様な民族的・経済的利害関係がみられる。We find diverse ethnic and economic interests here.

現行の法律は人種の多様性を考慮していない。Existing legislation does not take diversity of races into account.


その車は多量の燃料を消費する。The car consumes a lot of fuel.
彼は太い首をしている。He has a thick neck.



あまり太ったのでカラーの前が合わなかった。He got so stout that his collar did not meet.インシュリンを打つので彼女は太っていた。The insulin was making her fat.


人類は太古の昔から指を用いて食べ物を食してきたのである。People have eaten with their fingers from the beginning of history.

鉦や太鼓で探しあてた割には、あいつ期待はずれだったよな。He turned out to be a real disappointment after we went through hell and high water to find him.
太鼓判を押してくれた。He gave me his stamp of approval.





私たちは太平洋の上空を飛んでいます。We are flying over the Pacific.
マリーゴールドは太陽とともに起きる。The marigold rises with the sun.

１平方メートルの太陽光発電パネルの出力は約１ワットであり、今のところ大規模に太陽電力を利用するのは困難である。The output power of a one square meter solar panel is about one watt, so it is difficult to use solar power on a large scale at present.

吐いた唾は飲めぬ。A word, once out, flies everywhere.
唾液が多く出ます。My mouth forms a lot of saliva.



彼は道徳的に堕落した。He lapsed morally.


ついに父は妥協した。Finally, my father compromised.
激論の後、喫煙者に喫煙コーナーでの喫煙を許す妥協案が生まれた。The compromise which permits a smoker to smoke in the smoking corner was born after heated discussion.

彼女の選曲が妥当だったとは思わない。I do not consider her choice of music a happy one.
エメット理論の妥当性について再検討する必要があることを指摘しなければならない。I should point out that it is necessary to re-examine the validity of Emmet's theory.

高校時代からつきあっている彼氏はいるものの、つきあいが惰性になっていると感じ、不満をつのらせている。She has a boyfriend she's been going out with since high school but feels their relationship has become a matter of habit and is increasingly dissatisfied.



当時、とにかくケンブリッジでは、研究所生活はかなり打ち解けたものだった。In those days, or at any rate in Cambridge, laboratory life was rather informal.
彼らは箱をこなごなに打ち壊した。They knocked the box to pieces.


思いがけない事故で彼の成功への夢は打ち砕かれてしまった。The accident destroyed all his hopes for success.
その便せんには校章が打ち出しにされている。The note is embossed with the school emblem.
新進ボクサーがチャンピオンに打ち勝った。The new boxer outboxed the champion.私はその困難に打ち勝つことができた。I managed to overcome the difficulty.

湖の上に打ち上げるから。They shoot them off over the lake.

この交渉を打ち切りたい。We want to break off this negotiation.
戦車や飛行機は軍隊を打ち破ることはできようが、国民を征服することはできない。Tanks and planes may defeat the troops but they cannot conquer the people.


ジョンは派手にドラムを打ち鳴らしていた。John was beating the drums loudly.

彼はその仕事をするのにうってつけの人です。He is the very man for the job.
ぶっ飛ばしてやる！I'll punch your lights out!
階段から落ちて背中を強く打ちました。I fell down the stairs and hit my back very hard.８時をちょうど打ちましたね。It has just struck eight, hasn't it?雨が窓を打った。The rain whipped against the window.
ぶたれて耳鳴りがした。My ears were ringing from being beaten.
打つ手がないね。I'm all out of tricks.


われわれは局面の打開を図らなくてはならない。We must try to break the deadlock.

この何ヶ月かはひどい打撃を受けました。I took such a hammering over recent months.

あいつはとても打算的だ。He is very mercenary.
最初の打者はアウトになった。The first batter was caught out.
彼に打診して、賛成してくれるかどうか確かめてみなさい。Try sounding him out and see if he'll come around.


その過激派が政府打倒の陰謀を企てているという噂が立ってる。There is a rumor that the radicals are plotting against the government.
彼らはその悪習を打破した。They did away with the bad habit.

しかし彼に大きなけがはなく、軽い打撲傷で済んだ。However he wasn't seriously hurt and got away with light bruising.
彼の打率は３割４分３厘で、ホームランは５４本であった。He batted .343 with 54 home runs.





どうせ駄作だろうと思っていたのだけど、どっこいなかなかいい本だった。I was expecting it to be a bad book, but damn me if it wasn't quite good after all.


私の駄文を見ていただきありがとうございます。Thank you for looking at my poor scribblings.

ダベってないで仕事しろ。Stop shooting the breeze and get to work!

去年はジョギングシューズを２足駄目にした。I wore out two pairs of jogging shoes last year.もうだめだ。It's all over.夜遅くまで起きていては駄目だよ。Don't sit up late at night.
カメレオンは周りの色に合わせて体色を変えることができる。The chameleon can take on the colors of its background.あのころ、もっと一生懸命体を鍛えていたら、彼は今頃はもっと健康であろうに。If he had trained himself harder at that time, he would be healthier now.
彼は今までに９体の人型ロボットを製造していたが、その全てはデモンストレーションモデルだった。Up to now he had made nine humanoid robots but they were all demonstration models.
奥さんのがみがみ小言にフレッドさんは大弱りの体であった。Fred was very troubled by his wife's nagging.



体育は必修科目ですか。Is physical education a required course?
私たちは体育の日に好天を期待している。We are banking on fine weather for the sports day.

体育館でバスケットをしました。We played basketball in the gym.

看護婦が彼の体温を計った。The nurse took his temperature.

看護婦は体温計で彼の体温を計った。The nurse took his temperature with a thermometer.



そのスポーツ選手はがっしりした体格をしていた。The athlete had a strong build.



これは、お前の体躯、護衛能力を考慮した上でのプランなのだ。是が非でもやってもらう。This is a plan that takes into account your stature and your ability to guard. By all means do it for me.


彼らはその体系を大変な思索と労力を費やして仕上げた。They worked out the system with much thought and labor.

この本は、現代日本語の文法をできるだけわかりやすく、体系的に説明しようとする本です。This book aims to provide an explanation of modern Japanese grammar that is as systematic and as easily understood as possible.
彼は自分の体験を述べた。He described his own experience.
父が戦争の体験談を語ってくれた。My father told me about his experiences during the war.




彼女は彼の紳士らしい体裁にだまされてしまった。She was taken in by his gentlemanly appearance.



私のおいは卵に対してアレルギー体質だ。My nephew is allergic to eggs.

ジョギングでもして体重を減らすようにしなさい。Try to lose weight by jogging.
日本はガット自由貿易体制における最大の受益者の一つだったということができる。Japan has been one of the greatest beneficiaries of the free trade system under the GATT regime.共産主義はソ連で実践された体制である。Communism is the system practiced in the Soviet Union.
体積が大きいからといって常に重量も重いとは限らない。Great bulk does not always mean great weight.

朝食前にいつも体操をします。I always take some exercise before breakfast.

体中がいたんでいた。She was aching from head to foot.
最近あまり体調が良くないの。I have not felt well recently.


血液は体内を循環する。Blood circulates through the body.


世論の趨勢は体罰反対の方向である。The trend of public opinion is against corporal punishment.
スポーツをするにはほっそりとした体つきが必要である。Sports activities require a slender figure.

体面を保つために行った。For appearances sake, I went.





体力を維持するにはちゃんと食べなければいけません。You must eat properly to keep up your strength.



今日早稲田対慶応の試合がある。There is going to be a game between Waseda and Keio today.試合は6対6で引き分けに終わった。The match ended in a 6-6 draw.同社の昨年の対インド輸出は１億ドルに達した。The company's exports to India amounted to $100 million last year.
この国の王は人ではなく、はるか天空に居られるという三対の翼を持つ神獣なんだ。The king of this country isn't a person, but a divine beast with three pairs of wings said to be in far away in the sky.


その日本語に対応する英語はない。That Japanese word has no equivalent in English.われわれは教育の方法を時代に対応しなければならない。We have to bring our teaching methods up to date.私は敵意をもったまでも、冷ややかな対応を受けた。I met with a cool, not to say hostile, reception.


国務長官は対外関係を統括する。The Secretary of State administers foreign affairs.











経営側と労働者側との対決があるでしょう。There is going to be a show-down between management and labor.
彼は交差点で停止信号を見落としたので、対向車とぶつかった。He failed to see the stop sign at the intersection and hit an oncoming car.
ためらうことなく、その陰謀にたいする徹底した対抗処置をとった。Without a moment's hesitation, they took drastic action against the conspiracy.


その場しのぎの対策では麻薬中毒問題に切り込むことはできないでしょう。Stopgap measures won't make a dent in drug addiction.

彼は困難な事態に対処することが出来ない。He can't cope with difficult situations.
以下の説明は多くの異なる理論を比較的対照することによって得られたものである。The explanation below was achieved by comparing and contrasting a variety of different theories.

地球は赤道に関して対称ではない。The earth is not symmetrical about the equator.
建築のシンメトリーで、エメットは美的統一性をもった幾何学的な対称性を意味している。By architectural symmetry, Emmet means geometric symmetry combined with aesthetic uniformity.
この歴史書は高校生を対象に書かれている。This history book is written for high school students.





私はチャンピオンと対戦した。I played against the champion.



その上、ある大学教授と対談しなければならない。In addition, I have to interview a professor.

あなたは私と対等で私より下でも上でもない。You are my equal; not my inferior or superior.
空と山の対比が鮮烈だ。The contrast between the sky and the mountain is striking.


そのヤクザ達は対立するヤクザの親分を暗殺する計画の仲間に彼を入れた。The gangsters let him in on their plan to knock off a rival gang leader.
この例においては、その二人の詩人の対話に関する正確な記述がもたらされている。In this instance we are provided with an exact account of the conversation between the two poets.






耐震性の悪い建物に亀裂が生じることもある。Also cracks may form in buildings that aren't Earthquake proof.


彼女の着物と帯の取り合わせはおつだね。Her kimono and obi combination is smart, isn't it?

私は重大使命をおびている。I am charged with an important mission.この歌は哀調をおびている。This song sounds sad.




パーティーが待ち遠しくて仕方ない。I just can't wait for the party.
私は彼女の到着を待ちかねていた。I was impatient for her arrival.
私は最後のチャンスを待ち構えた。I watched for the last chance.
何時にどこで待ち合わせする？What time and where could we meet?
私たちはいつも学校へ行く途中で待ち合わせた。We used to meet on our way to school.
彼はポールがまちぼうけをくわせたのだと悟った。He realized Paul had stood him up.
どの進路を選んでも危険が待ち受けている。Whichever way we choose will involve danger.
彼らはその休暇を待ちこがれた。They all longed for the holiday.

彼を待ち伏せる一計を案じた。He has a plan to ambush him.
これを待ち望んでいました。This is what I was waiting for.
しばらく電話を切らずにお待ちください。Please hold the line a moment.
その実験を記録しようと、大勢の科学者が待機した。A group of scientists stood by, ready to record the experiment.
彼はいつも待遇が悪いと不平を言っている。He is always complaining of ill treatment.
彼は待合室に座っています。He's sitting in the waiting room.

残念ながら待望の試合は中止せざるを得なかった。To our regret, we were obliged to call off the game, which we had been looking forward to.
概して人間は怠ける傾向にある。As a rule, man is inclined to be lazy.彼は勉強を怠けている。He is lazy in his study.
彼は怠け者に対して点が辛い。He is very hard on lazy people.



あなたは「ありがとう」と言うことを怠った。You neglected to say "Thank you."

怠惰は悪徳のもと。Idle hands are the devil's tool.
彼は義務怠慢で非難された。He was blamed for neglect of duty.

そのピエロはわざと転んだ。The clown fell down on purpose.
５００人の警官が厳重な警備態勢おかれた。500 policemen were put on strict alert.
私は彼の態度が癪に障った。I was annoyed at his behavior.加盟国中数カ国は、Ｇ７の協定に従うことにあいまいな態度を見せています。Some member countries have been lax in abiding by G-7 agreements.


シャツの替えがない。I don't have a spare shirt.
警察が追っていたのは替え玉で、その間に真犯人を逃してしまった。The police followed a red herring while they let the true criminal escape.


彼はその知らせにも泰然としていた。He heard the news calmly.

滞りのない、優雅な仕草でグラスに水を注ぎ込んだ。She smoothly and elegantly poured the water into the glass.
あなたの部屋代は一月とどこおっています。You're a month behind in your rent.
いまおじの家に滞在しています。I'm now staying at my uncle's.
数日ならまだしも１０日も滞納している。A few days would have been excusable, but you are in arrears for 10 days.




胎動が激しいです。My baby kicks very hard.


転がる石には苔がつかない。A rolling stone gathers no moss.



建物は小麦の袋で一杯です。The buildings are filled with bags of wheat.それを持ち運べる袋が欲しい。I need a bag to carry it in.
迷っている間にも、どんどん袋小路に追いつめられていくみたい。Even while I was dithering it's like I was being backed further and further into a corner.


でも、これで１つ貸しだね。But you're going to owe me one.

本を貸し出すほかに、図書館は他のいろいろなサービスを提供する。Besides lending books, libraries offer various other services.

銀行に貸付を頼まねばならない。We must ask the bank for the loan.
鞄が必要です。貸してください。I need a bag. Will you lend me one?夏の間彼らは家を人に貸した。They rented their house for the summer.
これは貸家だ、売家ではない。This is a house to let, not to be sold.
貸し金庫はありますか。Do you have safety deposit boxes?
金の貸借は友情の破綻。Lend your money and lose your friend.


その貸付金は、８分の利益を生む。The loan bears an 8% interest.

くれるのではなく、貸与だそうです。Apparently they aren't given, but loaned.

彼の計画は退けられた。His plan was discarded.私はその抗議を退けた。I dismissed the protest.

警察は彼にのっぴきならない不利な証拠を見つけだした。The police discovered damning evidence against him.

彼女は１時間前に退院しました。She left the hospital an hour ago.



彼は十七歳で高校を退学した。He left high school at seventeen.
ジョーンズ教授は来年退官されます。Professor Jones retires next year.
彼らは退却するしかなかった。They had no alternative but to retreat.
この告訴を彼の国外退去につながることはおそらくないであろう。It is unlikely that this indictment will lead to his deportation.
彼女は大声で叫んで襲ってきた奴を退散させた。She managed to scare off her attacker by screaming loudly.
彼はありを退治しようと思った。He tried to get rid of the ants.
彼は怠惰で無責任だった。結局、彼は退社を命じられた。He was lazy and irresponsible. Thus, he was told to leave the company.あなたは何時に退社しますか。What time do you leave your work?
先生は生徒達に講義室を退出させなかった。The teacher did not permit the students to leave the lecture hall.
私は退職するつもりだときのう申し出た。I gave notice at work yesterday.
彼らは社長に退陣するよう求めた。They demanded that the president resign.



その男性はスパイとして逮捕された。The man was arrested as a spy.



救助隊員達が地震の被災者達に物資を分配するだろう。The rescue workers are going to hand out supplies to the victims of the earthquake.
隊長は部下に直ちに集合するように命令した。The captain ordered his men to gather at once.

海老で鯛を釣る。Throw a sprat to catch a whale.

何処へ行っても代わり映えはしないでしょう。Wherever you go, you will find the same thing.


建築デザインの立場からいうと、このアプローチにはもっと多くの代案が考えられる。From the standpoint of architectural design, there can be more alternatives to this approach.




勤勉は成功の代価だ。Hard work is the price of success.







ところで、平河代議士は、この件にどのていどタッチしているんでしょうか。By the way, I wonder how much of a hand Hiragawa MP plays in this matter?



日曜日に出社したので月曜日が代休だった。I worked on Sunday, so I had Monday off.
本の代金を小切手で払ってもいいですか。Can I pay for the book by check?
品物は代金引換でお送りいたします。The article will be sent cash on delivery.




彼が理事長の代行をしている。He is acting for the chief director.

君の代行者を見つけよう。I'll find someone to fill in for you.








彼女は親切の代償として何も受け取らなかった。She got nothing in reward for her kindness.こういう特典に対して私達はどんな代償を支払わなければならないのか。What price do we have to pay for these advantages?



代数の苦手な生徒が多い。Many pupils are poor at algebra.




彼はその試合に代打として出場した。He appeared as a pinch hitter in the game.











級友を代表してお礼の言葉を述べさしていただきます。On behalf of my classmates, let me say a few words of thanks to you.我々の代表は新税の計画に異論を唱えた。Our representative argued against the new tax plan.モネの芸術は印象派を代表している。Monet's art is representative of Impressionism.


この会に出席している他の代表者に直接話すのではなく、どうか議長に話して下さい。Kindly address yourself to the chairman, not directly to other representatives at this meeting.
代表団は貿易交渉を大きく前進させました。Representatives made a major breakthrough in the trade talks.
彼はその時代の代表的人物だった。He typified the times in which he lived.




私の靴は２度とはけないような代物だ。My shoes won't bear wearing twice.


彼女は家のない人々の代弁をした。She spoke for the homeless.
誰が代弁者になるか。Who will act as spokesman?


関係代名詞は「接続詞+代名詞」のはたらきをしています。Relative pronouns perform as 'conjunction + pronoun'.「クレオパトラ」は美人の代名詞になっている。The name Cleopatra has become a byword for a beautiful woman.
彼は父親の代役をした。He was substituted for his father.
この箱はテーブルの代用となる。This box will serve as a table.


バターの代用品としてマーガリンを使います。You can use margarine as a substitute for butter.
明日私は忙しいです。だから、私の代理をする人を手配しました。I'm engaged tomorrow, so I've arranged for someone else to take my place.私が不在の時は彼が私の代理です。He will be my deputy while I am away.






すぐにあなたの代理人に連絡を取りなさい。Get in touch with your agent right away.

ネットワーク誌１１月号に掲載されていたあなたのレポートを７０部コピーし、私どもの代理店に配ってよろしいですか。Is it possible to reproduce 70 copies of your report which appeared in the November issue of The Network and distribute them to our agents?






この台の上に花瓶を置いてはいけません。Please don't place a vase on this stand.２台のオートバイを比較するべきだ。You should compare the two motorcycles.



台座に心棒を立てて、各パーツをずらしながら重ねていきます。You stand the axis on the base and then proceed to stack up each part, staggering their position.



メアリーは階段をおりて台所へ行った。Mary went down to the kitchen.

あの店では台所用品を商っている。At this shop, they deal in kitchen utensils.




その台地は標高どのくらいですか。What is the altitude of the plateau?

ロシアはもう１つの超大国として台頭していた。Russia had emerged as a second superpower.


台本に目を通しておいてください。Please go over the script.
風やら雨やらで旅行は台無しだった。What with the wind and the rain, our trip was spoiled.
その女優はせりふを台なしにした。The actress murdered her lines.

果樹栽培者がリンゴの接ぎ穂を台木に接ぎ木しました。The orchardist grafted an apple bud onto the rootstock.



台湾料理はインド料理ほど辛くない。Taiwanese food is milder than Indian food.


彼は大々的にパーティーを催した。He gave a party on a large scale.
私は彼を大いに尊敬しています。I have a great regard for him.
アメリカ人の中には大きな借金を抱えている人がいる。Some Americans have grave debts.
その運河は150,000重量トンの大きさの船を収容できる。The canal can accommodate ships as large as 150,000 dead weight tons.
新しい靴買おうなんて思ったことあるかって？大きなお世話だよ。Have I ever thought of buying a new pair of shoes? Mind your own business.


大雑把に言えば、バスには３０名ほどの人達がいました。Roughly speaking, there were about 30 people in the bus.あの人って大ざっぱな性格だからね。He's the type who doesn't worry about details.
それはたいした問題ではない。That is not much of a problem.
この仕事はたいして骨が折れない。The work doesn't need much effort.
警察官はその少女に、いなくなった犬の大まかな絵を描くように求めた。The police asked the girl to make a rough sketch of her lost dog.




少佐は大尉の上官である。A major is above a captain.



昨日は大雨だった。We had a heavy rain yesterday.




その大家は以前は暮らし向きがよかったそうだ。They say the landlord used to be well off.
あの人は物理学の大家です。He is an authority on physics.
彼は大家族を養わなければならなかった。He had to feed his large family.
昨夜大火があった。There was a big fire last night.
彼か私のどちらかが大会に出席しなければならない。Either he or I have to attend the convention.あなたはシートベルトをちゃんと使用していたとして、カリフォルニア州交通安全大会において賞金５０００ドルを獲得されました。You have just won a prize of $5000 in a California state safety competition for proper use of your seatbelt.
おおみそかには電車は終夜運転します。On New Year's Eve, the trains will run all night.
そのボートは大海を漂っていた。The boat was drifting in the ocean.


彼は夜にはたいがい家にいる。He is generally at home in the evening.ディナーはたいがいコーヒーで終わる。Coffee finishes most dinners.
あなたは理科系の大学に進んだほうがいいよ。You should go on to a technical college.合格者の過半数は大学出身者であった。The majority of the successful candidates were university graduates.
大学院に進学するつもりです。I'm planning to go to graduate school.
私の兄は大学生です。My brother is a college student.

我々は大掛かりな大衆の抵抗に直面した。We came up against massive popular resistance.
その会社は大企業に吸収合併された。The company was absorbed into a big business.
そのショーで観客は大喜びだった。The audience was very much entertained by the show.
彼は大器晩成だ。He's a late bloomer.
大気が汚染されつつある。The atmosphere is being polluted.
委員会は、大気汚染を抑制するために互いに協力し合うよう各国に要請した。The committee called on all nations to work side-by-side to curb air pollution.
このことから、大規模な人口移動は経済変化の結果ではないという議論を導くことができる。From this we can derive the argument that major population shifts are not the result of economic change.


ロブソンの提案は、大義名分があるからといってテロリストを擁護するようなものである。Robson's proposal is tantamount to defending terrorists because they have a cause.


彼は大急ぎでオフィスを去った。He left the office in great haste.





その計画に大すじで賛成していただけませんか。Would you agree to the plan in principle?
そんな大金を払う余裕はありません。I cannot afford to pay so much.
私は世の中のどんなことをするよりも大空に飛びたい。I want to fly more than anything else in the world.
イナゴが大群をなしてやってきた。Locusts came in big swarms.
大型と小型の２台の飛行機が、ハンガー内で停止していました。Two airplanes, one large and one small, were at rest in the hangar.


その大型機は鋭い音を立ててほとんど直角に降下した。The giant plane screamed down in an almost vertical dive.



私は妥協が大嫌いだ。Compromise is abhorrent to me.




こちらはケンです。彼は自分の犬が大好きです。This is Ken. He really likes his dog.
大好きになるか大嫌いになるかどちらかなんですね。It's love-it-or-hate-it stuff.
カレーライスは、彼女の大好物です。Curry and rice is her favorite food.
私のおじいちゃんは大工です。My grandfather is a carpenter.

その小国は隣の大国に併合された。The small country was annexed to its larger neighbor.

大根は人参より高いかもしれない。Daikon might be more expensive than the carrots.
彼は２年前に、大佐の階級に昇進した。He was raised to the rank of colonel two years ago.
今日出かけても明日出かけても大差はないよ。It makes no difference whether you go today or tomorrow.
その地震は大災害をもたらした。The earthquake brought about disaster.






大使はワルシャワから召還された。The ambassador was recalled from Warsaw.
大使館は最高裁判所に隣接している。The embassy is located next to the Supreme Court.


少年よ、大志を抱け。Boys, be ambitious.
その木は大枝小枝が茂りすぎている。The tree has too many twigs and branches.
あなたの親切な言葉は大事に心に刻みつけておきます。I'll treasure your kind words.彼は私たちにとって大事な人だ。He is precious to us.

その大寺院の天井には宗教画が描かれていた。The cathedral had a religious painting on its ceiling.
大統領は大赦を行った。The president granted a general pardon.


どの大手のデパートも売上が落ちてきた。Sales have dropped off at every big department store.
カシの大樹も小さなドングリから育つ。Great oaks from little acorns grow.


その問題は大衆を当惑させた。The problem puzzled the public.




私たちのチームは大勝した。Our team gained a great victory.
道路上の大小の石に気をつけなさい。Watch out for big and small stones on the road!
私は彼女の冗談に大笑いした。I had a good laugh at her joke.

薫、今のところおまえが一番のリアクション、大賞だよ。Kaoru, yours is the best reaction so far - you win the grand prize.
彼女は今のところ大丈夫です。She is all right at the moment.いや、大丈夫だ。No, no, that's okay.
私は大臣自身と話した。I spoke to the minister himself.
大人だけこの映画が見える。Only adults can see this film.

牛は大きくて、おとなしく見えました。The cows looked big and docile.

橋は大水で洗い流された。The bridge was washed away by the flood.
そこには大勢の人がいた。There was a large crowd there.

パーティーは大成功だった。The party went off beautifully.




メイドは客を一人一人大声でとりついた。The maid announced each guest.
彼らは大西洋を横断した。They crossed the Atlantic Ocean.
リンドバーグの大西洋横断無着陸単独飛行はめざましい偉業であった。Lindbergh's solo nonstop transatlantic flight was a remarkable accomplishment.
人間は大昔に道具の使用を覚えた。Man learned early to use tools.
柔道では力より技のほうが大切である。In judo, technique is more important than strength.大切なものはここに置かないで下さい。Please don't leave valuable things here.私は古い本を大切に保存している。I keep old books with care.
広い地域にわたって大雪が降った。There was heavy snow over a large area.
あの家の繁栄は大戦中からのことだ。The prosperity of the family dates from the Great War.

これはたいそう快適な暖炉ですね。This is a very nice fireplace.
次の土曜日にオフィスの大掃除をしましょう。Let's clean the entire office next Saturday.

何でもないことに大騒ぎするのはやめなさい。Stop making a fuss over nothing.

大蔵省の役人は景気回復への信頼をより高めようとしました。Finance Ministry officials tried to boost confidence in recovery.
彼は大蔵大臣に任命された。He was appointed Minister of Finance.
バブルのときにあの土地を売っておけば大損しなかったのに。If only I'd sold that property during the economic bubble, I wouldn't have suffered such a big loss.
なぜその政治家は大多数の意見を抹殺しようとするのか。Why is the politician trying to kill off the opinions of the majority?
仕事はだいたい終わった。The work is mostly done.だいたいどのくらいの時間がかかりますか。About how long will it take?だいたいあんた、この寒いのにノースリーブで何いってんのよ。Anyway what are you on about? Going around sleeveless in this cold.


私達は彼の大胆な企てに舌を巻いた。We marveled at his bold attempt.
彼はリトル・ジョンと呼ばれる大男だった。He was a big man called Little John.
大地が揺れるのが感じられた。The earth was felt to tremble.

ニュースによるとギリシアに大地震があったようだ。The news says that there was a big earthquake in Greece.
大中小ありますがどれにしますか。We have large, medium, and small. What size do you want?

私は大通りをずっと一人で歩いた。I walked along the main street.
Ｘ記号は数学ではたいてい未知数を表す。The symbol "x" usually stands for an unknown quantity in mathematics.夜はたいていの人が寝る時である。Night is when most people go to bed.
ガンは人類の大敵である。Cancer is a great enemy of humanity.
全ての大都会は交通問題を抱えている。All big cities have traffic problems.
このバスは２つの大都市をつないでいる。This bus connects the two large cities.


大統領は強硬路線をとった。The President took a hard line.
ウォルター・モンデールは大統領選に出馬した。Walter Mondale ran for President.
彼は大統領選挙に出馬しないことに決めた。He chose not to run for the presidential election.

この二つは大同小異だ。There is not much difference between the two.





大波で彼らのボートは転覆した。The huge waves upset their boat.

大麦は我国の主産物である。Barley is our main product.
ここの学生は大半が真面目である。The students are for the most part diligent.
私はその計画に大反対だ。I am quite opposed to the plan.

私は仕事をたいぶためてしまった。I still have a lot of work to do.
石炭は大部分が炭素から成っている。Coal consists mostly of carbon.
彼の大風呂敷はいつものこと。He is always talking big.
この政策で物価は大幅に値上がりした。This policy resulted in a great rise in prices.

奈良は大仏で有名です。Nara is famous for Daibutsu.
スミスさんは自分のことを大物だと思っている。Mr Smith thinks that he's a big shot.
だいぶ痛みがなくなりました。The pain has mostly gone away.

アルファベットを大文字で書きなさい。Write the alphabet in capitals.

ある研究によれば、大柄な女性は双子を生む傾向がより強い。According to a study, big women are more prone to have twins.
これらは３つのタイプに大別される。These can be classified roughly into three types.
１日中歩き回って大変疲れた。I am dead tired from walking around all day.あえて言いますが、もし我々がそんなことをすれば大変な誤りを犯すことになると私は思います。At the risk of sticking my neck out, I think that if we do that, we're making a big, big mistake.もし期限切れになったら、大変なことになるよ。There will be hell to pay if I don't make this deadline.

実のところ、いかなるスピードで移動するにせよ、北極熊は他のおおかたの哺乳動物の２倍のエネルギーを消費する。In fact, to move at any speed the polar bear uses twice as much energy as do most other mammals.
大砲が偶然発射してしまった。The cannon went off by accident.
彼の大望は弁護士になることだ。His ambition is to be a lawyer.
父はおおよそ非芸術的な人だ。My father is far from artistic.

彼女は１日で大枚１００万ドルも手に入れた。She got a cool million dollars a day.
あの大名は十万石を領している。That daimyo holds a fief yielding 100,000 koku of rice.
大木の陰に避難した。We took refuge behind a big tree.
彼の経験不足は大目にみなくてはならない。You must make allowance for his inexperience.
主人に大目玉を食った。The boss bawled me out.
その巻末には修辞学と論理学の技法についての２編の短い大要があり、後者はソクラテス式論争方の見本で結ばれていた。The end of which there were two little sketches of rhetoric and logic, the latter finishing with a specimen of a dispute in the Socratic method.
彼は大理石を刻んで像を作った。He carved marble into a statue.
アフリカは大陸であるが、グリーンランドはそうではない。Africa is a continent; Greenland is not.


大粒の涙が頬を伝って流れ落ちた。A big tear rolled down my cheek.
日本は紙を大量に消費する。Japan consumes a lot of paper.
大量生産が多くの商品価格を下げた。Mass production reduced the price of many goods.





まず第１にこの仕事を終えなくてはいけない。I must finish this work first.
まず、第一に名前を書きなさい。Write your name, first of all.健康が第一だ。Nothing is more important than health.日本は天下第一の国である。Japan is the best country under the sun.
この歌はヒットチャートの第１位にランクされています。This song is No. 1 on the hit chart.
第一印象が大事である。First impressions are important.


第一章から始めましょう。Let's begin with the first chapter.


彼女は有能だったので第一人者となった。Her ability took her to the top.

自分自身の無知を認めることが、賢くなるための第一歩であるとソクラテスは言った。Socrates said that recognising your own ignorance is the first step towards wisdom.
第三者が解読を試みても、この暗号を解読することはできない。A potential third party would not be able to crack the code.

チューリッヒはロンドンに次ぐ世界第二位の金市場である。Zurich is the second largest gold market in the world after London.
彼らは第二次オイルショックで一儲けした。They cashed in on the second oil crisis.
この本は第二次大戦までしか扱っていない。This book only goes down to World War II.


彼女は第六感でそれが分かった。She knew it by a sixth sense.

「友情」という題で作文を書きなさい。Write an essay on "Friendship".先生は私達に宿題として１０題の問題を割り当てた。The teacher assigned us ten problems for homework.
殺し屋というのはテレビ映画では人気のある題材だ。Hit men are a popular subject for TV movies.
その小説は聖書から題名をとっている。The novel takes its title from the Bible.

その鳥は鷹の半分の大きさしかなかった。The bird was half the size of a hawk.
雨が滝のように降ってきた。Down came the rain in torrents.





ピカソは卓越した画家だ。Picasso is an eminent painter.

いくら年を取ってもまだ卓球をやる元気はある。No matter how old I get, I'll still have the energy to play ping-pong.












きつつきは、長く尖ったくちばしで、木の幹をつついて、中にいる虫を食べます。Woodpeckers peck tree trunks with their long pointed beaks and eat insects found there.
ワシントン市の友人宅に泊まります。I'm staying at my friend's house in Washington City.
あなたの衣類などは来月、宅急便で送ります。I'll send you your clothes and some other things next month by express delivery.


これはかさばるから宅配便で送ろう。This is bulky, so I'll send it by home delivery.






この沢庵は塩気が足りない。The pickled radish needs a touch of salt.
お父さんは煙草の煙でたくさん輪を作れる。Dad can blow many smoke rings.

愛国心にかこつけて多くの殺人が行われてきた。Many murders have been committed in the name of patriotism.
託児所のトイレのドアは閉まっていた。The nursery toilet door was shut.


水面から飛び立つ鳥は努めてあとを濁さぬようにする。A bird flying out of the water is careful not to cause turbulence.


川は泥で濁っていた。The river was cloudy with silt.




木の下にいくつかの野生のキノコを見つけた。I found some wild mushrooms under the log.
子供達は凧上げをしていた。The children were flying kites.

試合が始まれば、彼は初めからとばしていくだろうし、ルチアーノは簡単に叩きのめされてしまうだろう。When the bell rings, he'll start strong and Luciano will lose quickly.

大きな音で私は突然たたき起こされた。I was suddenly awakened by a loud noise.
この考えを学生達に叩き込もうと思う。I intend to hammer this idea into the students' heads.
彼女はプラスチックの玩具のバットで大きな蛇をたたき出した。She beat off a big snake with a plastic toy bat.



彼は茶碗を床にたたきつけた。He dashed the cup on the floor.


見知らぬ人が玄関のドアをしきりにたたいた。A stranger beat urgently at the front door.新聞は一斉にその政治家をたたきはじめた。The newspapers opened fire on the politician.
ただし、列をつくって並ばなくてはならないが・・・。However, you have to queue...

１０人の囚人たちが脱獄した。Ten prisoners broke out of jail.
水は彼の腰の所まで達した。The water came up to his waist.
彼はとても年をとっているけれどたっしゃだ。Although he is very old, he is strong.彼女はフランス語が達者だ。She has a good command of French.
彼は水泳の達人だ。He is adept in swimming.
アンは望んでいた目標を達成した。Ann has achieved her desired goal.




２人の男がナイフを奪い合っているのを見た。I saw two men struggling for the knife.
その男は彼女のかばんを奪い取った。The man robbed her of her bag.

その男が私の財布を奪った。The man robbed me of my purse.



マリガンは１４ヶ月前に逆転で王座を奪取して以来、まったくの負けしらずです。Mulligan has been riding high since he seized the crown in a come-from-behind victory 14 months ago.
少年は衣服を脱ぎ捨てた。The boy stripped off his clothes.
ここで靴を脱がなければなりませんか。Do I have to take off my shoes here?
いたずらっ子を追いかけているうちに彼女の靴が片方脱げた。While she was running after the naughty boy, one of her shoes came off.
あの会社は赤字を脱した。The company stopped losing money.

右腕の関節が脱臼したようです。I'm afraid I dislocated my right arm.
夫の会社人間からの脱却を始め、新しい夫婦関係を再構築し、ゆとりある家庭生活を形成することが理想であろう。It is high time we reconstructed new family relationships and formed a comfortable life.


彼が脱獄囚だなんて、私には思いもよらなかった。It never occurred to me that he might be an escaped prisoner.
脱脂綿をかんでいてください。Bite down on the cotton roll.
・テキストデータの誤字脱字を修正。・ Corrected mistaken/missing characters in the text data.

爺ちゃんはやっとのことで脱出した。The old man escaped, but with difficulty.


ジャックは脱税しようとした。Jack tried to evade paying his taxes.
脱線がどんどんエスカレートしていく。The digression is escalating more and more.
君は直ちにクラブを脱退したほうがよい。You may as well withdraw from the club right away.


蛇は脱皮した。The snake sheds its skin.

あなたの優れた御判断には脱帽です。I bow to your superior judgement.
頭に円形の脱毛があります。I have a round bald spot on my head.
彼は半分行った所でレースから脱落してしまった。He dropped out halfway into the race.



私達はついに頂上へたどり着いた。At last, we reached the summit.
森の中の小道を辿っていくのは楽しいことだ。It's fun to follow the path through the woods.猟師は熊の足跡をたどった。The hunter followed the bear's tracks.彼の人気は下降線をたどっている。His popularity is falling.
その本はいちばん上の棚に置いてください。Put the book on the top shelf.

その問題は当分棚上げだ。That problem has been shelved for the time being.
あの人たちの小屋は谷間にある。Their hut is situated in the valley.優美子には谷間を強調するブラジャーがある。Yumiko has a push-up bra.

私は谷底を見下ろした。I was looking downward to the bottom of the valley.




私たちはたらふく食べた。We played a good knife and fork.
あそこに立ってる女の人はだれですか。Who is the woman standing there?
「誰か車の中にいるのですか」「トムがいます」"Who is in the car?" "Tom is."
サムは彼の援助を求める人なら誰でも援助する。Sam helps whoever asks him to.
この頃は、誰もがお金に困っているようです。Everyone seems to be short of money these days.ほとんど誰も同じ授業に行くことはありません。Almost no one goes to the same classes.







丹精をこめてつくったこの美しい織物をごらんください。Take a look at this beautiful embroidery made with great effort.





この本は丹念に読まなければならない。This book should be read with diligence.

それは単なる偶然だと思う。I think it is a mere coincidence.
彼は単に好奇心からそれをしただけだ。He did it simply out of curiosity.
ここでは、魚はポンド単位で売られています。Fish is sold by the pound here.この科目は何単位ですか。How many credits is this course?





ねじ、てこ、くさび、滑車などは単一機械と呼ばれる。The screw, the lever, the wedge, the pulley, etc. are called simple machines.








単価１５ドルで１０本を至急送っていただけますか。Can you please send ten $15 flashlights immediately?











「おぅーい、どうした丹治」「前の学校で習ってない単元があって困っている」"Oy, what's up, Tanji?" "I'm having trouble because there's a unit I didn't take at my last school."
これらの単語を一つずつ覚えなさい。Learn these words, one by one.


















これこそ事故現場に乗り捨ててあった単車だ。This is the same motorcycle that was left at the scene of the accident.


彼の話は単純そのものだった。His story was simplicity itself.



















この話はちょっと単調だ。This story is rather monotonous.
もっと単刀直入に言ってくれないかな。隔靴掻痒の感なきにしもあらずだよ。You don't have to leave me hanging like this. Why don't you just come out and tell it to me straight?
不幸は決して単独では来ない。Misfortunes seldom come singly.








リンドバーグの大西洋横断無着陸単独飛行はめざましい偉業であった。Lindbergh's solo nonstop transatlantic flight was a remarkable accomplishment.


















彼女がこれほど自分勝手なのは嘆かわしい。It is deplorable that she is so selfish.
彼の死を嘆き悲しんだ。I felt deep sorrow at his death.
彼女は夫の死を嘆き悲しむばかりであった。She did nothing but grieve over her husband's death.
「財布を無くした」ジョンは嘆いた。"I lost my wallet," lamented John.
彼女は彼に邪魔しないようにと嘆願した。She pleaded with him not to disturb her.

深々と嘆息して、廊下へ向かう。He sighed deeply and headed to the corridor.

男は袋を肩に担いだ。The man threw a bag across his shoulder.また僕をかつごうとしているのかい、このいたずら小僧め。Are you going to play tricks on me again, you naughty boy?

ジョンは関東地区、そして太郎は関西地区を担当している。John covers the Kanto area and Taro covers the Kansai area.

合併その他の交渉のために同社は２５人の担当者を加えた。The firm has added 25 new associates to work on mergers and other deals.

彼女は担任のクラスをよく掌握している。She has good control over her class.彼は私たちのクラスの担任だ。He is in charge of our class.
家を担保にお金を借りよう。We'll use the house as collateral so we can borrow some money.
警察は泥棒を探し出した。The police found out the thief.彼はその謎を解く鍵を捜し出した。He turned up a key to the solution of the mystery.

警察は、その事件に関する事実を探り出した。The police dug out some facts about the matter.
鉦や太鼓で探しあてた割には、あいつ期待はずれだったよな。He turned out to be a real disappointment after we went through hell and high water to find him.
遠まわしに彼の意見を探った。I sounded him out about his views.
その問題はまだ十分に探求されていない。The subject has not yet been fully explored.

人間の真理の探究に対して不朽の貢献をした書物を、我々は偉大な書物と呼ぶのである。Those books which have made a lasting contribution to man's quest for truth, we call great books.
探検隊の糧食はすぐ尽きてしまった。The expedition's supplies soon gave out.



その島は隅々まで探索されている。Every part of the island has been explored.



彼女は彼を探偵だと言った。She described him as a detective.
探偵小説はおもしろい。Detective stories are amusing.

その醜い肉屋の旦那はあの想像上の怪物に似ている。That ugly butcher resembles that fictional monster.旦那も子供の引き取り権を望んでいた。Her husband also wanted custody of the children.
本気で似合うと思っていたらしいシャツは辞退し、淡いブルーのポロシャツをいただくことにした。The shirt she apparently seriously thought suited me I turned down and decided to accept a light blue polo shirt.



この装置により、簡単に海水を淡水に変えることが可能となった。This device made it possible to turn sea-water into fresh water easily.









複雑炭水化物って何か知ってますか。Do you know anything about complex carbohydrates?
石炭は大部分が炭素から成っている。Coal consists mostly of carbon.




日がだんだん短くなっている。The days are becoming shorter.あの犬はしっぽが短い。That dog has a short tail.彼は私に短い手紙をくれた。He sent me a brief note.

同様に、禁煙する最大の理由はたいてい、短期的な利点（例えば、以前より健康で魅力的になった気がするということなど）なのである。Similarly, the strongest reasons for stopping smoking are usually the short-term benefits (for example, feeling healthier and more attractive).


彼の短気は手に負えない。He has an uncontrollable temper.

短剣だけで武装して、彼は攻撃してきた５人を皆追い払った。Armed only with a short sword, he drove off all five of his attackers.

基本的に俺は短詩が好きだ。短詩の中では、この詩がトップだった。Basically I like short poems. Among them this poem was my favourite.
あまりにも短時間に、あまりにもたくさんのことを盛り込むと、よい戦術は生れない。If there are too many irons in the fire in too short a time, good strategy cannot result.

その橋のおかげで、私達は大いに時間が短縮できた。The bridge saved us a lot of time.
Ｄｏｃはｄｏｃｔｏｒの短縮形である。"Doc" is an abbreviation of "doctor".
すべての人は長所と短所を持っている。Everybody has his merits and demerits.





この本には短編小説がたくさん入っている。This book contains a lot of short stories.
内気な人は外向的な人より短命？Do introverts not live as long as extroverts?

彼女は短絡的な思考で、表面的な情報だけで判断してしまう。She ends up making decisions based on superficial information because of her simplistic thinking.






私は紙の端切れに彼の電話番号を書き留めた。I wrote down his phone number on a scrap of paper.

端的に言って、彼は首になったのだ。To make a long story short, he was fired.
コンピューター端末はずっと一列に並んでいた。The computer terminals were lined up in one long row.

これも後で言うつもりだったんだけどカタハネのキャラに端役というのは存在しないのよね。I planned to say this later on but in Katahane there is no such thing as a 'bit part'.

タンスで探していた物が見つかった。I found what I was looking for in the drawers.
彼女のドレスのへりはほころびていた。The border of her dress was torn.
したがって、あなたはお金を自由に使う楽しみにふけることはできない。Thus you cannot indulge in the pleasure of spending money freely.


週末に胆石が動いて、七転八倒の苦しみを味わったよ。I spent the weekend writhing in agony when my gallstone started to move.
胆のうの手術でしたら、この廊下をずっと行って右に曲がってください。For gall bladder surgery, go down this hall and take a right.
君は胆力を練る必要がある。You must build up your courage.

生命はいつ誕生したのですか。When did life come into being?
誕生祝いに１杯どうぞ！店のおごりですよ。Have a birthday drink! It's on the house.
４月の誕生石はダイヤモンドです。The birthstone of April is diamond.
今日は、妹の誕生日です。Today is my sister's birthday.
彼は鋼を鍛えて刀を作った。He forged the steel into a sword.若いうちに体を鍛えなさい。Build up your body while young.



成功は鍛練にある。Success consists of discipline.
オーケストラの団員たちはスミス氏を指揮者として尊敬した。The orchestra members respected Mr Smith as a conductor.

カシの大樹も小さなドングリから育つ。Great oaks from little acorns grow.
こういう流れになると結局、どんぐりの背比べになる。Once things start going this way, in the end they'll all be much of a muchness.

２つのグループが団結して１つの政党になった。Two groups united to form a party.
瞬くうちにテニスボール大の団子が消え去った。In the blink of an eye, the tennis-ball-sized dumpling had disappeared.
ちなみに、この部屋には冷房設備なんて物は何も無い。あるのはうちわだけ。Incidentally, this room doesn't have anything like an air conditioner. All it has is a hand-held paper fan.

学校から団体で行く人たちもいるが、ほとんどの人たちはばらばらに行く。Some go in groups organized by their schools, but most go in twos and threes.人権擁護団体は独裁的な政府に圧力をかけています。Human rights groups are putting pressure on authoritarian governments.

団体旅行より、一人旅のほうがおもしろい。It's more interesting to travel alone than to go on a group tour.





彼は私の顔を指先でぽんとはじいた。He flicked me in the face.このレインコートは水を完全にはじく。The raincoat sheds water perfectly.
誰かがピアノを弾いている。Somebody is playing the piano.
花火の弾ける音が止むと、急に辺りが静かになる。後に残った火薬の匂いが、なんだか俺をセンチメンタルな気分にさせた。As the popping sound of the fireworks stopped, it suddenly became quiet around me. The smell of gunpowder somehow put me in a sentimental mood.たまには酒にでも酔ってはじけて日頃の鬱憤晴らしたほうがいいんじゃないか。Isn't it better to get drunk and cut loose once in a while and blow off the tension of daily frustration?
ドル安は輸出にはずみをつけています。The cheap dollar is charging up exports.どういうはずみでここに来たのか自分でもわからない。I don't know what motivated me to come here.
ボールははずんで塀を飛び越えた。The ball bounced over the wall.彼の胸は期待に弾んだ。His heart bounded with expectation.
専制君主は人民を弾圧した。The tyrant kept the people down.


その犬は弾丸のように去った。The dog went away like a shot.









彼は断じて紳士などではない。He is anything but a gentleman.
あのグループとの関係は断ち切るべきだ。You should cut off your connections with that group.
彼女は彼のアドバイスを断りそうだ。なぜなら彼女は彼が好きではないからだ。She is likely to refuse to follow his advice, because she does not like him.なぜ彼の申し出を断ったのですか。Why did you turn down his offer?予め断りますが、今日のブログは面白くないよ〜。Just to warn you in advance, today's blog is no fun.
断崖のてっぺんに古い城が立っている。An old castle stands on top of the cliff.
私は彼が潔白だと断言した。I affirmed that he was innocent.
私は家にとどまるようにと彼らに懸命に言ったが、彼らは断固として私の意見に耳を傾けようとはしなかった。I tried hard to make them stay home, but they refused to listen to me.

彼は即時断行を強調した。He put emphasis on the necessity for immediate action.



断水しました。The water has been cut off.
その国は米国との外交関係を断絶した。That country broke off diplomatic relations with the United States.

彼女はクラスの中で、断然歌がいちばんうまかった。She was by far the best singer in the class.




今見ることからあわてて断定してはいけない。Don't draw a hasty conclusion from what you see now.
チャールズ１世は断頭台で処刑された。Charles I had his head cut off.
博文は天井にグラスファイバーの断熱材を入れた。Hirofumi installed fibreglass insulation in the ceiling.

そこで私は自分の計画を断念した。Accordingly I gave up my plans.結局、法案は提出断念に追い込まれたのだった。In the end the bill was forced into being withdrawn.
ハードが断片化を起こしてるみたい。It looks like your hard disk is fragmented.
そうです、異常音は空冷ファンの最後の断末魔だったのです。That's right, that strange sound was the final death scream of the cooling fan.




長期予報によると、暖冬だそうだ。The long-range forecast says we will have a mild winter.
うちにはちゃんとした暖房施設があります。We have a good heating system.
退社前に電灯や暖房器を消すことになっている。You are expected to put out lamps and heaters before you leave the office.
暖流が四国の沖を流れている。A warm current runs off the coast of Shikoku.

これはたいそう快適な暖炉ですね。This is a very nice fireplace.

学校を一歩出ると、住む家のない人々が段ボール箱を家代わりにして生活している様子が目にはいった。Outside the school, she saw people with no homes living in cardboard boxes.
彼のほうが私より段違いにうまい。He can do it far better than I can.
病気はまだ初期の段階です。The disease is still in the primary stage.

リンダの先学期の成績が非常に良かったので、私は彼女がヨーロッパに行けるよう段取りをした。Because of Linda's outstanding grades last semester, I have arranged for her to visit Europe.
別の段落で彼はコンマを１つ入れた。In another paragraph, he put in a comma.
彼は多分よい男であるかも知れない。He may be a good man for all I know.あんな男見ても胸くそが悪い。I can't bear the sight of him.

あのハンサムな男の子を見て。Look at that good-looking boy.
若い男の人がドアの前で歌っています。A young man is singing in front of the door.
その少年は男らしくして泣くまいとがんばった。The boy tried to be a man and not cry.


このクラスは女子が男子より多いです。There are more girls than boys in this class.そこらへんは、男子と女子とでは違うんだってば。Obviously that's different for men and women.



男女間に不均等が存在することは許されるべきではない。No inequality should be allowed to exist between men and women.




「一部屋に３人で泊まっていただけますか」と彼はたずねました。「ええ、かまいませんよ」と３人の男性は答えました。He asked the men, "Would you share a room?" "Certainly, we will," answered the three men.
男性用の衣類はゆったりしている。Men's clothing is loose fitting.
彼はなかなかの男前だ。He is very handsome.
ジェーンは男装していた。Jane was dressed as a man.



その若い男優はジェームス・ディーン張りの役者だ。That young actor is a James Dean.



彼らはコーヒーを飲みながら２時間以上も談笑した。They chatted over coffee for more than two hours.
夕食後の談話で彼らは政治について話し合った。In their discourse after dinner, they talked about politics.



彼女は値切るのがうまいんだ。She's good at bargaining the price down.

この車は修理するだけの値打ちはない。It isn't worth repairing this car.



彼は何でも、しったかぶりする。He pretends to know everything.
その悪い知らせは残念ながら本当だ。The bad news is unfortunately true.そのしらせでとてもうれしい。I am very pleased at the news.
彼女はそれをどのようにして知らせたのですか。How did she tell them?
しらない人のなかにいると、私はどうもくつろげない。I can never feel at ease among strangers.
夏は知らない間に過ぎていた。The summer had gone before I knew it.
彼女は私に知らん顔をして歩いていってしまった。She walked away without acknowledging me.彼女は知らん顔をした。She assumed an air of indifference.
いつ彼女と知り合ったのですか。When did you come to know her?
色々違った役割が開かれていることを、女性たちは今知り始めている。Women are finding out that many different roles are open to them.
あなたは１９９０年から彼女を知っているのですか？Have you known her since 1990?私は自分が感じたことを言えるのが必要であることを知った。I find it necessary to be able to say what I feel.
私の知る限りでは彼は正直です。As far as I know, he is honest.私の知る限りでは、彼は信頼できる。As far as I know, he is reliable.
杳として行方が知れない。Nothing whatever is known of him.
秘密はもうすっかり知れ渡っているよ。The cat is well out of the bag.
問題は、この必要な隔たりを埋めるのが知覚であるという点にある。The problem lies in the fact that the necessary gap is bridged by perception.

彼は知恵のある人だ。He is a man of wisdom.



古い知己というものは、忘れ去られ、また一度も心に思い出されなくともよいのであろうか。Should old acquaintance be forgot, And never brought to mind?
州知事は囚人達を自由の身にした。The governor set the prisoners free.
私のドイツ語の知識は貧弱です。My knowledge of German is poor.


もし私の家が大邸宅だったら私の誕生日のパーティーには知人をみんな招待するのだが。If my house were a mansion, I would invite everyone I know to my birthday party.
読書は知性を発展させることができる。Reading can develop your mind.

知的な会話が好きです。I enjoy intellectual conversations.


イルカは非常に知能の高い動物です。The dolphin is a very intelligent animal.
知名の文士たちの集まりが昨夜あった。Noted literary personalities gathered together last evening.


知力では誰も彼にはかなわない。No one equals him in intelligence.
どっちが最終的な安息の地となるんだろう。Which one will be our final resting place?これらの国々はヨーロッパ文明発祥の地である。European civilization had its birth in these lands.



高級車は地位の象徴である。An expensive car is a status symbol.彼は会社で高い地位にあります。He holds a high position at the company.

この地域は雨が続くでしょう。This area will continue to be rainy.



そして汚水を流すために地下に下水道を持っていた。The house has pipes under the ground to carry dirty water away.彼は地下活動の疑いをかけられた。He was suspected of underground action.



その植物には地下茎がある。The plant has an underground stem.
地下室は汚くて、暗くて、臭いの。The cellar is ugly, dark, and stinky.
地下鉄で行きたいのです。I want to get there by subway.
そしてオレは地下道に降りていった。And then I went down to the subway.

日本の地価は法外だ。Land prices are sky-high in Japan.


あの地滑り事故は多くの不幸を生んだ。That landslide produced a lot of misery.
汚染が地球を傷つけている。Pollution is damaging our earth.

これらのガスは地球規模の温暖化をもたらし得る。These gases can lead to global warming.


あなたはこの地区をよく知っていますか。Are you familiar with this area?
Boston Dynamicsのロボット「RHex」は、いろんな地形を走れるすごいやつです。Boston Dynamic's robot, RHex, is an amazing piece of work that can run over various terrains.


これらの商品の中には、地元では手に入らないものもあるかもしれない。These goods may not be available locally.その婦人の葬式は地元の教会で行われた。The lady's funeral was held at the local church.

彼は地元紙の本の批評家です。He is the book critic for the local newspaper.
魔王は言った。「俺が負けるわっきゃねーべ。審判は皆地獄にいるのだ」。"How can I lose?" answered Satan. "All the umpires are down here in Hell."そこはこの世の地獄となった。The place became a hell on earth.


地球は地軸を中心として回転している。The Earth rotates on its axis.
そうした決定は、今度は、丘そのものの地質的構造に影響される。That decision, in turn, was affected by the geological structure of the hill itself.

その地主は以前かなり裕福な暮らしをしていた。The landlord used to be quite well off.
旅に出たら地酒を飲まなきゃ。When you travel, you've got to try the local brew.
彼は田舎に地所を持っている。He has an estate in the country.
B2出口から地上に出てください。Go up to ground level at exit B2.


地震がその地域を襲った。The earthquake shook the area.







どこへ行けばヨーロッパの地図が手に入りますか。Where can I obtain a map of Europe?


これは永久に凍っている地層であり、それが何フィートの深さの所もある。This is a layer of soil that is permanently frozen, and in some places it's many feet deep.



ツンドラ地帯の気候は厳しい。The tundra has a harsh climate.

その湖はこの地点が深い。The lake is deep at this point.

悪銭身につかず、というじゃない。結局は地道に稼ぐしかないと思うよ。Ill-gotten gains are short-lived. The only way to make real money is to earn every penny.



月が地平線の上にあった。The moon was above the horizon.
彼は今年の夏、東北地方を旅行した。He traveled through the Tohoku district this summer.その地方は大規模に開発されるだろう。It seems the rural area will be developed on a large scale.



僕的にはもっと地味ってか渋い服が欲しいんですけどね。For my tastes, I'd prefer plainer, or rather, more tasteful clothing.彼女は地味な色を好む。She favors quiet colors.
その地名は伝説に由来する。The legend gave the name to the place.
１枚の枯れ葉が地面に落ちた。A dead leaf fell to the ground.
彼は地雷の上を運転して、彼のジープは爆裂した。He drove over a land mine and his jeep blew up.

私は地理より歴史が好きだ。I prefer history to geography.
彼の地理学の知識は乏しい。His knowledge of geography is poor.



辱を知れ。Bite your tongue!このようなスラム街は市の恥だ。These slums are a disgrace to the city.

私はそうしたのを恥じている。I am ashamed of having done so.

彼らははずかしくてうなだれた。They hung their heads in shame.
何も恥ずかしがる必要はありません。You have no need to be ashamed.
恥を忍んで生き永らえるよりむしろ死にたい。I would die before I live on in shame.




この前の夏にこの池は水がなくなりました。The pond dried up last summer.
地下鉄の痴漢には堪えられない。I can't stand dirty old men in the subway.









誰かにバッグを置き引きされました。Somebody swiped my bag.
戦争は私たちの幸せを奪い取って、代わりに恐怖で置きかえたのよ。War has taken away our happiness and replaced it with horror.

それをテーブルの上に置きなさい。Lay it on the table.あいにく私はカメラを家においてきた。As it happens, I have left the camera at home.彼女はいつも自分の部屋をきれいにしておく。She always keeps her room clean.



お取り寄せいたしましょうか。Would you like me to order it?



彼は致命傷を負った。He suffered a fatal wound.
そのスキャンダルは彼の政治的将来に致命的であった。The scandal was fatal to his political future.
大きな蜘蛛が巣を作っていた。A big spider was spinning a web.
彼女は走るのが遅い。She is a slow runner.ジムの父はいつも帰宅が遅い。Jim's father always comes home late.

遅くとも午前０時までには家に帰る。I'll be home by midnight at the latest.

歯医者に行くのをどうして遅らせているのか。Why have you delayed seeing the dentist?
私達は多少の遅れを考慮に入れなければいけません。We must allow for some delays.
僕は電車が遅延したので遅刻した。I was late as a result of the train delay.
遅刻するのではないかと心配した。I was afraid I might be late.





いつもお世話になっていますから、一旦緩急あれば、すぐさま馳せ参じます。You're always there for me, so if you're ever in dire straits, just let me know and I'll come running.

その男はおおきな財産を築き上げた。The man built up a large fortune.
彼は貿易で財産を築いた。He made his fortune from commerce.





畜生、パンクだ。Shit! I've got a flat.

林に竹が目立つ。Bamboo stands out in the woods.













彼と私は竹馬の友。He and I are bosom friends.

パンダは竹林にすんでいます。Pandas live in bamboo thickets.

蓄音機はエジソンの頭脳から生まれた。The gramophone was born of Edison's brain.




蓄膿症です。I have sinus trouble.
その事件の進展について逐一知らせてください。Please keep me informed of the development of the case.



自分が集めた事実をもとにして、科学者は、その事実に意味と秩序と価値を与える論理の模様すなわち理論を織りあげるのである。Around his facts the scientist weaves a logical pattern or theory which gives the facts meaning, order, and significance.
私達の吸っている空気は酸素と窒素からできている。The air we breathe consists of oxygen and nitrogen.
お菓子で赤ちゃんが窒息するところだった。The baby almost choked on a piece of candy.

もちを食べている時にのどに詰まらせて窒息死する老人がたくさんいる。Many old people choke to death while eating mochi.
茶はインドで広く栽培されている。Tea is widely grown in India.その猫の一方は黒で、もう一方は茶だ。One of the cats is black, the other is brown.













その犬は茶色で小さくて、やせています。The dog is brown, small and thin.


茶摘みの季節になった。This is the season to pick fresh tea.

エミリーは茶道と花道にたいへん興味を持っています。Emily is very interested in tea ceremony and flower arrangement.
あの赤い布は「袱紗」茶道具を清めるために使う必需品なの。That red cloth is a "fukusa"; it is a vital tool used to cleanse the tea equipment.


そんな茶飯事は聞いている暇がない。I have no time to listen to such everyday affairs.
だが、レーガン政権と最高裁判所に潰される前でさえ、ＯＳＨＡは茶番であった。Even before Reagan and the Supreme Court stifled it, OSHA was a farce.













あなたがロンドンに着く頃には晩秋となっているだろう。It will be late autumn when you get to London.各自席につきなさい。Go to your respective seats.
ケイトは人形に服を着せている。Kate is dressing her doll.
「あの赤い服を着るのはよしなさい」「なぜいけないの」"You had better not wear the red dress." "Why not?"その男は反逆者の汚名をきせられた。The man was branded as a traitor.

そのビルの建設は来年着工されます。The construction of the building will be started next year.
別に制服着込んだ外宇宙の使者が、伴侶を求めて徘徊してるわけでもなかろうに。It's not as if an emissary from outer space will have slipped into uniform and be loitering around seeking a partner.
ゆっくりでも着実にやってゆけば勝負には勝つ。Slow and steady wins the race.
彼はたくさんの仕事に着手した。He undertook a great deal of work.

アメリカ人は一般に着飾ることを好まない。Americans, in general, don't like to dress up.



着心地はいかがですか。How does it fit you?
どうぞご着席ください、みなさん。Please be seated, ladies and gentlemen.
ずば抜けた着想というのは、往々にして天啓のごとくヒラメクようだ。Sometimes the most inspired ideas seem to just come from out of the blue.

着替えをするために家に帰った。I went home to change my clothes.
私はもう着替えました。I have already changed my clothes.


彼がフランス本社から先月着任した新しいＣＥＯです。He's the new CEO from the parent company in France.

彼は公金を着服した。He embezzled public money.

これは、母が買ってくれたたった一枚の着物です。This is the only kimono that my mother bought me.彼女はその着物を着ると変に見える。She looks odd in those clothes.


男性の方は上着を着用してください。Jackets are requested for men.
その飛行機は申し分のない着陸をした。The plane made a perfect landing.


彼は自分のお金を全部箱の中に入れた。He put all his money in the box.これらの商品の中から１つ選びなさい。Choose one from among these products.身を切るような寒い中でわざわざ遊ばなくてもいいじゃない。You don't have to play outside in the biting wind.
なかには気難しい人がいる。Some people are difficult to please.









私たちはその部屋の中央に座った。We sat in the center of the room.
彼は中央アジアの旅行から戻ってきた。He's back from his travels in Central Asia.


５月１０日月曜日の午後３時に東京駅八重洲中央口で待ち合わせをしていただけませんか。Would you please meet me at Yaesu central gate of Tokyo Station on Monday, May 10th at 3:00 p.m.?



先週には、大きな力を持つ経団連が、規制解除のため中央政府を訪問した。Last week the powerful Keidanren called on Tokyo to lift the ban.




鍋にごま油を中火で熱し、にんにく、鶏肉を入れて炒め、色が変わったら中華スープと白菜を入れて煮る。Heat sesame oil in the pan on a medium flame, add the chicken meat, the garlic and fry, when the colour changes pour in the Chinese soup, add the Chinese cabbage and boil.



概して私は中華料理が好きだ。I like Chinese food in general.



中学・高校では陰湿ないじめが増える傾向にあるという。In junior high and high schools, they say insidious forms of bullying are on the rise.
この歌を聞くと私の中学校時代を思い出します。This song reminds me of my junior high school days.
私は中学生です。I'm a junior high school student.

厳しさと甘さの中間を見つける。Find a mean between harshness and indulgence.
















中休みをしようよ。Let's take a break, shall we?










ＡＢＣニュースによれば、もう一機のジェット旅客機が、中近東でハイジャックされたそうだ。According to the ABC news, another jet-liner was hi-jacked in the Middle East.

虫に食い荒らされて桃は中空になっていた。The insect ate the peach hollow.

今は彼らは小型車または中型車を好む。Now they like cars of small or middle size.











その中古の冷蔵庫はひどい代物だった。That used refrigerator was a real dog.
この中古車は新車同様である。This used car is as good as new.








中国やチベットの山に住んでいる白黒の熊はパンダと呼ばれている。The black and white bears living in the mountains of China and Tibet are called pandas.

ケイトは中国語をほとんど話せない。Kate can hardly speak Chinese.
紙は中国人によって発明された。Paper was invented by the Chinese.


４月の中頃には、たくさんの種類の花が咲く。Many kinds of flowers come out in the middle of April.

私はしばらく中座した。I excused myself for a minute.





暴風雨のため道路工事が中止された。Work on the road was suspended because of the storm.今日予定の会合は中止になりました。Today's meeting has been canceled.


去年、中耳炎をわずらいました。Last year I suffered from an inflammation of my middle ear.




予定日は１月の中旬頃です。I'm expecting my baby in the middle of January.
※基本的な禁止事項（誹謗・中傷の禁止等）は「はじめにお読み下さい」に記載してあります。必ずお読みください。* The basic prohibitions (No slander, libel, etc.) are noted in the "Read me first." Please be sure to read it.


中小企業は生き残るために、じっと耐えていかなければなりません。Small businesses will have to tighten their belts to survive.

その町の中心にすてきな公園がある。There is a nice park in the center of the town.



この道を行けば駅と市の中心地にでます。This road will lead you to the station and the city center.






東京は今や世界経済の中枢だ。Tokyo is now a center of the world economy.


この壮大な大聖堂の建立は中世にまでさかのぼる。This magnificent cathedral dates back to the Middle Ages.
私は中世史を専攻している。I specialize in medieval history.
リトマス紙で溶液の液性（酸性、中性、塩基性）を調べるときは、リトマス紙をすべて溶液に浸すのではなく、紙の先端の部分だけを浸します。When investigating the pH (acidic, neutral, alkaline) of a liquid, don't soak the litmus paper completely in the liquid but just put the end of the paper in it.



シカゴは、米国中西部の主要な都市である。Chicago is the principal city of the Midwest.





その無所属候補者は中絶問題を公約からはずしました。The independent candidate took the abortion issue off his platform.２年前中絶しました。I had an abortion two years ago.




彼らは、学校を中退した。They dropped out of their school.
この仕事はその砲兵中隊のだれにもできない。This job is not for any person in the battery.
病気のため休暇が中断した。Illness cut short his vacation.







中庭の席がありますか。Do you have a table in the patio?
バスの中ほどへ詰めて下さい。Move into the bus, please!



私たちは山の中途まで登った。We went halfway up the mountain.
彼は高校を中途退学した。He dropped out of high school.
仕事を中途半端にするな。Don't leave your work half done.


イスラエル側の心変わりのために、中東和平交渉の構成国に変更があるかもしれません。The makeup of Mideast peace talks may change due to a change of heart on the part of Israel.


中等教育には二つの面がある。Secondary education has two sides.


何事にも中道的な立場を取れ。Take a mean position in everything.

私はテレビ中毒です。I'm a TV addict.
じゃがいもは中南米高地が原産地である。The potato is native to the highlands of Central and South America.






彼女は中年の都会派プロフェッショナルでした。She was a middle-aged urban professional.



















その丘の中腹に家が一軒あった。There was a cottage on the side of the hill.


中米では森林が家畜の牧場に取って代わられている。In Central America, forests are replaced by cattle ranches.



都会と田舎の生活の中庸を見つけるのは難しい。It is difficult to find a happy medium between city and countryside.

その国は第二次世界大戦中は中立を保っていた。That country remained neutral throughout World War II.
スイスは中立国である。Switzerland is a neutral country.




彼は中流階級の出だ。He comes from the middle class.




アルカリは酸を中和する。Alkalis neutralize acids.



私は彼とは訪問し合う仲だ。I am on visiting terms with him.
私と彼は仲がいい。I am on good terms with him.私はあの男と仲がよかった。I was on close terms with him.
仲たがいをした原因は口げんかであった。A quarrel brought about the break.

ディール市内と近辺の家屋の売買を仲介しています。She arranges the buying and selling of houses in and around Deal.
この論文では交渉における仲介者の立場に関する困難点は何かという問題をとりあげる。In this paper I address the question, what is difficult about the intermediary's position in a negotiation?


田中さんは父のつり仲間の一人だ。Mr. Tanaka is one of my father's fishing companions.
仲間外れになるのが私の宿命みたいだ。It seems to be my lot to be an odd man out.
二人は伴侶三人は仲間割れ。Two is company, but three is none.

進路を開拓するという同じ目標を持った仲間同士が協力する。Companions with the same aim, to carve out their own future, cooperate with each other.
その僧は子供達の遊びに仲間入りした。The priest participated in the children's games.



彼が仲裁してその場は丸く収めた。He intervened and settled the matter peacefully for the time being.







彼と仲直りしたい。I want to come to terms with him.



不動産業者には独立した仲買人がたくさんいる。Real estate agencies have many independent brokers.




私たちはたちまち仲良くなった。We immediately became friends.彼らは仲良く一緒に暮らしている。They live together in unity.
トムとジョンは仲良しです。Tom and John are good friends.
宙返りするジェットコースターに乗ったら、気持ち悪くなっちゃった。I got sick riding the roller coaster with the loop-the-loop.


私は彼に煙草を吸うなと忠告した。I advised him against smoking.

君の忠誠を当てにしてもいいかい。Can I count on your loyalty?
樹皮からエキスを抽出する。Extract an essence from the bark of a tree.被験者は無作為に抽出された。The people for the experiment were chosen at random.

あなたの説明は私には抽象的すぎます。Your explanation is too abstract to me.



ケンは昼まで家にいるでしょう。Ken will be at home until noon.私は昼も夜も彼女のことを考えている。I think of her day and night.昼はホットドッグを食べたんだ。I ate a hot dog for lunch.

私はすぐに上京し、時刻は昼下がりであったが、叔父と会った。I travelled to Tokyo right away; it was past noon when I saw my uncle.
昼過ぎからはちょっと忙しくなるんだ。I have rather a busy afternoon in front of me.




彼は昼頃まで姿を見せなかった。He did not appear until about noon.


昼食会に１０人を招待した。We asked ten people to the luncheon.
私はよく日曜日に昼寝をしたものだった。I would often take naps on Sundays.
郵便は昼前に来る。The mail arrives before noon.


昼飯でもいっしょにどうですか。Why don't we have lunch together?
警察が墜落事故の原因を昼夜休むことなく調査している。The police are investigating the cause of the crash around the clock.

昼夜兼行で働くと身体を壊すよ。If you work day and night, you will lose your health.

この橋は１０本の柱で支えられている。The bridge is supported by 10 posts.海外向け食品の輸出は農業関連産業の柱の一つです。Overseas food exports are one of the mainstays of agribusiness.



注はページの下欄についている。The notes are at the bottom of the page.
健康にもっと注意を払うべきだ。You should pay more attention to your health.寝坊しないように注意しなさい。Take care not to oversleep.彼に遅れないように注意した。I cautioned him against being late.





流感の予防ワクチンの注射をした。I was vaccinated against the flu.
私は注射器を見るまでは平気だった。I was calm until I saw the syringe!
この情報は注釈ではなく本文で扱うべきだ。You should treat this information in the main body of the text, not in the notes.


この緊急な事態において、人事や制度を改革し、清新な雰囲気と新しい観念を、われわれの組織の中に注入する以外に方策はない。We have no other alternative but to swap horses midstream and inject a fresh atmosphere and new ideas into our organization.
あなたのためにデザートを注文した。I've ordered you some dessert.貴社のご提案に対し、私どもはこのご注文について５％の特別値引きをさせていただくことにします。In reply to your request, we offer you an extra discount of 5% on this order.
その品物は彼女の注文品として記入された。The goods were entered to her.
ご注目下さい。Please give me your attention.
彼女は虫が大嫌いだ。She has a strong dislike of insects.鳥は虫を探していた。The bird was looking for worms.彼は確かにハンサムで頭もいいかもしれないけど、どこか虫の好かないところがあるの。Certainly he is handsome and intelligent, but there is something about him that I can't like.
虫がよすぎる。You're taking a lot for granted.








「どうだった？」「急性虫垂炎だって」"How did it go?" "They said it was acute appendicitis."





人間は鋳型に入れて作るわけにはいかない。A man cannot be made in a mold.

その像はブロンズで鋳造されていた。The statue was cast in bronze.

鋳物が金型からすっぽりとれた。The casting came cleanly out of its mold.
彼はメキシコ駐在日本公使に任命された。He was appointed Japanese minister to Mexico.

彼にどこに駐車したのか聞いてください。Ask him where he parked his car.
その駐車場は無料だ。The parking lot is free of charge.




駐日英国大使はだれだか知っていますか。Do you know who the British Ambassador to Japan is?









科学は著しく進歩した。Science has made remarkable progress.
有名作家はまたベストセラー書を著した。The famous author created another best-selling book.
デネットの著作の中心的主張は、端的に言えば、内的精神状態の存在を否定するということである。The main point of Dennett's book, in short, is to deny the existence of inner mental states.
将棋の棋譜には著作権があるのか、といったことはいろいろなところで議論されています。The question "Do records of shogi games have copyright?" has been discussed in many places.
この本の著者は誰ですか。Who is the author of this book?
著述から収入を受けている。He derives his income from writing books.

これはミラー氏の最新の著書ですが、これが最後のものでないことを望みます。This is Mr Miller's latest book, and we hope it will not be his last.
スミス氏は著名なバイオリニストである。Mr Smith is an eminent violinist.
お金を使うも貯めるも自由にしなさい。You may spend or save at will.
彼女はお金をたくさん貯金している。She put aside a lot of money.
貯金通帳に残っていた金で利子がついた。Interest accrued from the money left in my savings account.
貯金箱にはお金は全く残っていなかった。None of the money was left in the money box.

その町は山の貯水池から水を供給されている。The town is supplied with water from a reservoir in the hills.







がまんするのが難しいのは彼の度を超した丁重さである。What is hard to put up with is his over-politeness.




私達はちょうど食事を終えた所です。We've just finished breakfast.
漢字を書くときは点やはらいに気をつけて、なるべく早くていねいに書きましょう。When drawing kanji be careful of dots and sweeps, write as carefully and quickly as possible.
ある意味では、丁寧語は気さくな雰囲気を壊す。Polite language, in a sense, spoils a casual atmosphere.




４０丁目で車を降りた。I got out of the car at 40th Street.



花は切られるとすぐにしぼむ。Flowers soon fade when they have been cut.



つい彼が病気だということをしゃべってしまった。I've just let slip that he is sick.

負債は帳消しにするしかなかった。We had to write off the debt.地上で空費される時間が飛行機の速さという有利な店を帳消しにしてしまう。Hours lost on the ground cancel out the advantage of speed in the air.


この帳簿には不明朗な点がたくさんある。There are many questionable points in this ledger.
この帳面にあなたの名前を書いてください。Please put down your name in this book.

「都庁舎でもらえますよ」と係員が付け加えた。"You can get it at the Metropolitan Government Office," the clerk added.















この弓は張りが強いです。This bow has a strong draw.彼の肌は青年の肌のように張りがある。His skin has the tone of a young man's.娘をなくして、すっかり心の張りがなくなりました。Losing my daughter has taken away my will to live.

都会の会社は有能な若者を採用しようと互いに張り合った。City firms vied with each other to hire the brightest young staff.



張り紙お断り。Post No Bills.

その木は広く枝を四方に張り出している。The tree thrusts its branches far and wide.彼は価格変更のビラをはり出した。He put up a notice about the change in price.

ボブはパーティーでいちばん声をはりあげて歌った。Bob sang loudest at the party.


彼女はその知らせを聞いて、胸が張り裂けんばかりに泣いた。Hearing the news, she cried her heart out.
あなたの願書に最近の写真を貼りなさい。Attach a recent photograph to your application form.クモがクモの巣を張るところを見たことがありますか。Have you ever seen a spider spinning its web?




彼は私に木の人形を彫ってくれた。He carved me a wooden doll.


その彫刻は非常に貴重である。The sculptures are of great value.
その彫刻家はルネサンス派に属する。The sculptor belongs to the Renaissance school.









トラファルガー広場にはネルソン提督の彫像がある。There is a statue of Admiral Nelson in Trafalgar Square.



辞任劇は来るべき徴兵事務にはさして影響はないであろう。The resignations would have little or no effect on upcoming indications.



彼は迫害者を懲らしめて人民たちのあだを討つだろう。He will avenge the people on their oppressor.

これで彼女も懲りるだろう。This will teach her a lesson.

シンガポールでは罪人を懲罰する方法としてむち打ちがある。In Singapore, one way to punish a criminal is to whip him or her.
彼は懲役十年で、女房には三年の刑が下った。He was given ten years and his wife three.
そのインディアンの群れは、ほんのちょっとでも怒らすと戦いを挑もうとした。The band of Indians were ready to go on the warpath at the slightest provocation.昨夜は結美のほうから挑んできたんだ。Last night it was Yumi who pushed for sex.
スカイダイビングに挑戦したいんです。I'd like to try out skydiving.
彼はこれまでいとも簡単にたくさんの挑戦者をリングに沈めてきた。He's mowed down a parade of challengers before.
このような障害が完全に取り除かれるまで、極めてささいな、ちょう発でさえ争いが起こる可能性がいつもある。Until such difficulties are ironed out completely, there is always a chance of fighting breaking out at the slightest provocation.

６月にしては寒い朝だ。It is a cold morning for June.

朝っぱらからご機嫌だね。You look happy, so bright and early.
私は朝シャンをしないからよ。I don't shampoo my hair in the morning.

今日の朝刊によればその死刑囚は自殺したようだ。According to today's morning paper, the condemned criminal committed suicide.

朝起きは三文の徳。The early bird catches the worm.


明日は、朝市に行こう。Tomorrow let's go to the morning bazaar.

私はまだ朝食を食べていません。I haven't eaten breakfast yet.

朝寝坊が癖になった。I took to sleeping late in the morning.
朝鮮は国際原子力委員会の査察を受け入れた。Korea allowed an inspection by the IAEA.
日本語は朝鮮語と共通点がある。Japanese has something in common with Korean.

朝鮮半島を訪れたことがありますか。Have you ever been to the Korean Peninsula?

朝早くに、鳥が歌う。Birds sing early in the morning.

昇る朝日は何と美しいのだろう。How beautiful the rising sun is!
コツさえ覚えれば、朝飯前ですよ。It's a snap once you get the hang of it.
朝晩はだんだん冷えてきました。It is getting colder and colder morning and evening.
彼の容態はどちらかと言うと朝方より悪くなっていた。His condition was, if anything, worse than in the morning.
遠くからだと富士山が朝霧の中にそびえているのが見えます。In the distance you can see Mt. Fuji through the morning mist.
朝夕は冷えるので服装などに注意したい。It gets cold in the mornings and evenings, so I want to take care how I dress.
朝立ちやしょんべんまでの命かな。A morning erection: Will it last only until I take a leak?
うちの上司ときたら、朝令暮改なんだから、仕事がちっとも進まないよ。When it comes to my supervisor, he's very inconsistent, so we never get any work done.



潮が急速に満ちてくる。The tide is rising fast.




どんなものにも潮時がある。There is a time for everything.




潮流がその船を外海へと漂流させた。The tide carried the boat out to sea.


私たちは町はずれの小さなホテルに泊まった。We put up at a small hotel just on the edge of the town.





町民は分厚いステーキを食べるのが好きだ。The townspeople like to eat thick steaks.
何時間も海を眺めた。I gazed at the sea for hours.



その子の聴覚は鋭い。The kid has a keen sense of hearing.
聴講切符を前もって入手しておかなければならない。You must get lecture tickets in advance.

彼の講演は聴衆を魅了した。His speech charmed the audience.
医者は患者の胸に聴診器を当てた。The doctor placed a stethoscope on the patient's chest.

聴聞会は報道関係者を閉め出して行われました。The hearing were made off-limits to the press.
目が見えない人の聴力は鋭敏な場合が多い。A blind person's hearing is often very acute.
腸の具合が悪い。I have trouble with my bowels.



私は美しい蝶を捕まえた。I caught a beautiful butterfly.


彼は門をちょうつがいで取り付けた。He hung the gate on hinges.
先生はわれわれの答案調べに忙しい。The teacher is busy looking over our tests.どこからかハープの流麗な調べが聞こえてきた。They could hear the elegant, flowing sound of a harp coming from somewhere.
ココの知能指数を調べるのは容易ではない。Testing Koko's IQ is not easy.

その条件は日本、ドイツ、イギリス、アメリカの間で調印された。Terms were signed between Japan, Germany, Great Britain and the United States.


すみませんがここではその処方薬は調合できません。Sorry, we can't fill this prescription here.
その調査は進行中です。The investigation is under way.



調剤できるまでどのくらい時間がかかりますか。How long do I have to wait to pick up the medicine?
あなたの新しい車は調子よく動いていますか。Is your new car behaving well?
調子にのって危険を冒すなよ。Don't push your luck.

シートを自分に合うように調整してください。Please adjust the seat to fit you.


このつまみを回すことでテレビの色を調節できます。You can adjust the color on the TV by turning this knob.
戦争の資金を調達するために公債が発行された。Bonds were issued to finance a war.
彼は両当事者の間を調停した。He mediated between the two parties.




卵はどのように調理いたしましょうか。How do you like your eggs done?

彼らの間に調和の精神が広がった。A harmony prevailed among them.
超高速がコンコルド機の特徴だ。Great speed is a feature of the Concorde.
彼は凡俗を超越している。He rises above the rest of mankind.



その飛行機は超音速で飛ぶことができる。The airplane is capable of supersonic speeds.
その車は制限速度を超過している。The car is exceeding the speed limit.





先輩は、嫌味なくらいの完璧超人でしたからね。だから逆にその「癖」は先輩の可愛げ・・・というか、チャームポイントでしたよ。You were always a perfect 'superhuman' to an infuriating extent, and so that 'habit' was actually one of your cute, or rather charming, attributes.


ロシアはもう１つの超大国として台頭していた。Russia had emerged as a second superpower.

超特急のぞみはひかりより速く走る。The superexpress Nozomi runs faster than the Hikari.








犬が跳ねるのをごらん。Look at the dog jump.
彼女は興奮して跳ね回った。She jumped about in excitement.
通過した車が私のコートに水をはねかけた。A passing car splashed my coat with water.

彼はあらゆる反対をはねのけた。He rejected all the objections.

彼女の意地悪な言葉は結局自分の身に跳ね返ってきた。Her unkind words boomeranged.
魚が水面から飛び上がった。A fish leaped out of the water.
飛行機は山の上を飛んだ。The plane flew over the mountain.君はどのくらい高く跳べますか。How high can you jump?彼女は良い知らせを持って学校から家にとんで帰ったあの秋の日のことを考えた。彼女はリレーチームの選手に選ばれたのだった。She thought of the fine autumn day when she had rushed home from school with the good news; she was chosen to be on the relay team.
いったん着地した怪物は、瞬間ふたたび跳躍して私の頭上にいた。Having once landed the monster immediately jumped again and was over my head.


チームの長として私は彼に有能な助力を得た。As head of the team I was ably assisted by him.
彼に長い手紙を書いた。I wrote a long letter to him.これは日本で２番目に長い川だ。This is the second longest river in Japan.株式市場は長い不振を続けている。The stock market is in a prolonged slump.
これは私が長い間欲しかったものだ。This is what I've long wanted.
ＡはＢの５倍の長さがある。A is 5 times as long as B.
ジョンは長いすに長々と寝そべっていた。John stretched out on the couch.


長官は彼に全権を委任した。The governor invested him with full authority.
残念な事に私の父は長患いから回復できなかった。To my regret, my father could not recover from his long illness.残念な事に私の父は長煩いから回復できなかった。To my regret, my father could not recover from his long illness.
こんなのどかな眺めは見たことがない。Never have I seen such a peaceful scene.
長期にわたる病気のあとでジェーンはカウチ・ポテトになった。After being ill for a long time, Jane turned into a couch potato.




経営陣は収益の短期的改善に気を取られすぎて、長期的な将来計画に気が回らない傾向があった。The management tended to be too concerned about short-term improvement of the bottom line to have any long-term design for the future.

今日は長居できないんだ。I can't stay long today.
この種は長距離移動の記録を持っています。This species holds the record for long-distance migration.




エンジンを空回りさせちゃいかん。長持ちさせたいからね。Don't race the car. We want to make it go as far as possible.
委員会の会議は長時間にわたった。The committee had a long session.


長寿とご幸福を祝して、乾杯。Here's to a long and happy life!
あなたの計画は実際的だという長所がある。Your plan has the virtue of being practical.
彼が一番愛しているのは彼女の長女です。It is her eldest daughter that he loves most.
青年期友情は長続きしないことが多いと言われる。It is said that adolescent friendships do not often last.
これらは長袖です。These blouses are long sleeved.

彼は私の長男の名付け親であった。He stood godfather to my first son.

彼は外国に長年住んでいた。He lived abroad for many years.
私は週末を長編小説を読んで過ごした。I spent the weekend reading a long novel.

この構成において、三角形の代わりに長方形を用いても類似の困難が生ずる。We encounter similar difficulties when we substitute rectangles for triangles in this configuration.

去年の夏に私が訪れた村は長野県の小さな村だった。The village which I visited last summer was a small one in Nagano Prefecture.

彼女は長旅に耐えられるか。Is she equal to a long journey?
彼はもちろん村の最長老だ。He is unquestionably the oldest man in the village.
私たちは彼の長話にうんざりしている。We are weary of his long talk.
今朝起きてみると、山の頂が雪におおわれていた。I awoke this morning to find the summit of the mountain covered with snow.

私達はついに頂上へたどり着いた。At last, we reached the summit.
市民の皆様の御意見をちょうだいする予定です。We plan to elicit opinions from the public.このバラちょうだい。I'll take these roses.いすで床をこすらないでちょうだい。Don't scrape your chair on the floor.
経済は今景気循環の頂点にある。The economy is at peak of a business cycle at present.
彼は森の中を歩いた。頭上では鳥が楽しくさえずっていた。He walked in the forest, with birds singing cheerfully above his head.鳥は料理人がほどよく焼いた。The fowls were well roasted by the cook.


鳥居と言うと、階段を上がったところにあった赤いオブジェ？By 'Torii' you mean that red objet d'art at the top of the steps?



鳥類の発声において真に驚異的な点は、鳴管の２つの側面が独立して動くことができるということである。The truly remarkable feature of sound production by birds is that the two sides of the syrinx can act independently.






















仕事は非常にはかどっている。The work is marching right along.



彼は警官を見るとすぐ、逃げた。As soon as he saw a policeman, he ran away.「雨がすぐあがるでしょうか」「あがらないと思うよ」"Will it stop raining soon?" "I'm afraid not."すぐわかるところにあるよ。It's in plain sight.
あなたはすぐに良くなるだろうと思います。I hope you'll soon get well.
すぐそばでかすかな音がした。I heard a faint sound nearby.
すぐさま彼の申し出にとびついた。I readily grasped at his proposal.
今自分を見つめ直し。Now is the time I got to speak out.

我々は直ちにこの問題に対処しなければならない。We should deal with this matter without delay.

あなたとじかに会ってじっくり話したいことがあるのです。I have something to talk over with you, face to face.
クリスマスがじきにまためぐってくる。Christmas will soon come around.





ほぼ赤道直下にあるシンガポールでは、雨季・乾季があまり明瞭ではない。In Singapore, practically right on the equator, the rainy and dry seasons aren't very clear cut.
原油価格の値下がりが続いている。The crude oil price is falling further.

これらの線は直角に交わる。These lines meet at right angles.




警官は彼が犯人だと直感した。The police spotted him at once as the offender.

台風１２号は九州地方を直撃するだろうか。Will Typhoon No. 12 hit the Kyushu district?


私自身も、当社に入社する前の会社では、２度ほどトップに直言した経験があります。I myself have, before becoming employed by this company, twice spoken bluntly to the people at the top.
きみが出かけた直後に彼が訪ねてきた。He came to see you right after you left.


私たちは町へ直行した。We took a direct road to town.

現実を直視すべきだ。You should face reality.











彼女に直接言ったらどうですか。Why don't you tell her directly?


その事故に直接関係のある人をつれてきなさい。You must bring the person who is immediately concerned with the accident.







直接税に反対する意見が支配的だった。Opinion against the direct tax was dominant.


君の質問は直接的すぎた。Your questions were too direct.





この２つの直線は直角に交わっている。These two lines are at right angles.

試合の直前にはいつもあがっています。I always get nervous just before a match.





私が直属の上司になります。She will report directly to me.




私達は大阪からロサンゼルスまで直通で飛んでいった。We flew nonstop from Osaka to Los Angeles.





直筆サイン入りボールを手に入れることができた。I was able to obtain a personally signed ball.



我々は一大危機に直面している。We are facing a violent crisis.
読者の方から意訳と直訳について質問されました。I have been asked by a reader about free and direct translations.








朕はおもしろうない。We are not amused.
まるで、沈む船から逃げるネズミみたいね。It's just like rats leaving a sinking ship.太陽が水平線の下に沈んだ。The sun sank below the horizon.
彼らは敵の船を１０せき沈めた。They sank ten enemy ships.彼はこれまでいとも簡単にたくさんの挑戦者をリングに沈めてきた。He's mowed down a parade of challengers before.



彼は善悪の問題について沈思黙考した。He meditated on the problem of good and evil.



沈着な彼女の言葉で我々の恐怖は消し飛んだ。Her calm words banished our fears.



彼らは沈没する船を見捨てた。They abandoned the sinking ship.
それから長い沈黙が続いた。There followed a long silence.


あの珍本をどうやって手に入れたのですか。How did you come by those rare books?
これは珍しい種類の魚です。This is a strange kind of fish.

珍客も３日いれば鼻につく。Even a rare guest wears out his welcome after three days.








フグは日本の珍味だ。Blowfish is a delicacy in Japan.

彼はわたしらに少ない賃金しかくれなかった。He has given us indecent wages.

我々はイタリア滞在中に車を１週間賃借りした。We hired a car for a week when we were in Italy.
組合は５％の賃上げを獲得した。The union won a 5% wage increase.
賃貸アパートをさがしています。I'm looking for an apartment to rent.
軍隊は暴動を簡単に鎮圧した。The troops easily put down the rebellion.
その火事はすぐに鎮火された。The fire was soon extinguished.






よって流通するマネーが減り、物価上昇は鎮静化する。Thus money in circulation drops, and price escalation quietens down.
医者に相談して鎮静剤を処方してもらうのはどうでしょうか。How about consulting a doctor and getting sedatives prescribed?
痛くなったら鎮痛剤を飲んでください。If you have pain, take a painkiller.



私はその陳述を真実と認める。I accept the statement as true.
村人たちは原発反対の陳情をした。The villagers petitioned against the nuclear power plant.

キャビネットは集めたものを陳列するための食器棚である。A cabinet is a cupboard used for displaying things.
津波で流されてしまったのです。It is carried away by tidal waves.

上へ昇れば昇るほど、それだけ墜落の程度は大きくなる。The higher you climb, the greater the fall.
椎茸を乾燥させて保存します。We keep shiitake mushrooms dry.

うさぎはかめに追い越された。The hare was outdistanced by the tortoise.

彼は追いつめられたシカを銃でねらった。He drew a bead on a stag at bay.
朝日が霧をおいやった。The rising sun dispersed the mist.これ以上の値引きは、私どもを赤字に追いやるでしょう。A further reduction would make us go into the red.

とうとう土壇場に追い込まれた。We have been completely cornered.僕は追い込まれると一番仕事をする。I work best under pressure.

台所からその猫を追い出してくれ。Chase the cat out of the kitchen.


警察は群衆を追い払った。The police turned away the crowd.
強面の変なセールスだったらすぐアタシを呼びなさいね、追い返してやるから。If it's an aggressive strange salesman, then call me right away. I'll chase him off.

その警官は泥棒を追っていた。The policeman was after the thief.エイズ調査の分野におけるすべての変化を追い続けることはできない。I can't keep track of all the changes taking place in the world of AIDS research.カウボーイが牛を牧草地へ追っていく。A cowboy is driving cattle to the pasture.




名簿に私の名前も追加してください。Please add my name to the list.
それには追加料金がかかるんでしょうか。Will there be an extra charge for that?
追及されて、つい、見え透いた嘘をついてしまった。I was pressed by their questioning and slipped into telling an obvious lie.
女性の権利を主張する団体はセクハラ問題を追求しています。Women's rights groups are going after sexual harassment.
彼らは宇宙のなぞを追究している。They are investigating the mystery of the universe thoroughly.

来週英語の追試験を受けなければならない。I have to take a make up test in English next week.
ある航空会社が運賃値下げ計画を発表すると、他社もすぐに追従した。As soon as one airline announced its plan for airfare reductions, the rest of the companies followed suit.
追伸愛してます。P. S. I love you.

その警官は泥棒を追跡した。The policeman chased the thief.







車で後ろから追突された時首がガクッとなりました。My neck snapped when my car was hit from behind.


支配者は打倒され国外に追放された。The ruler was overthrown and banished from the country.私達は国民から麻薬を追放しなければならない。We must rid the nation of drugs.
噛むと痛いですか。Does it hurt when you chew?
痛み止めの注射をします。I'll give you a painkilling injection.
あなたのご親切痛み入ります。Your kindness really touches me.
彼はいま歯が痛むのでよくかむことができない。He can't chew well, because he has a toothache now.傷むのを防ぐために、遠海で捕獲した魚は直ちに冷却される。To avoid spoiling, fish caught far out at sea are immediately cooled or even frozen.
彼は氷の上で転んで脚を傷めた。He fell down on the ice and hurt his leg.転んで手首を痛めました。I fell down and hurt my wrist.



あの事故を見て自然の力を痛感した。That accident brought home to me the power of nature.

彼の死は我が社にとって大きな痛手であった。His death was a great loss to our firm.
彼女は悲しさがあまりにも痛切で涙も出なかった。Her grief was too acute for tears.
彼女は痛風を病んでいる。She is affected with the gout.



コーヒー通の人達に結構評判がいいそうです。I hear that it has quite the reputation with coffee connoisseurs.ここにあなたあての手紙が何通かあります。Here are some letters for you.
６歳以上の子供は学校に通わなければならない。Children of six and above should attend school.

カタログを通じて郵便で買い物をすることによって、人々は幅広い商品を選ぶことが出来る。Shopping by mail through catalogs gives people a wide choice of merchandise.この国では年間を通じて気温の変動がほとんどない。This country has an even temperature throughout the year.
その道は駅に通じている。This road leads to the station.このドアは書斎に通じている。This door leads to the study.この辺にはガスが通じてますか。Is gas available in this neighborhood?
彼らは素敵なカップルである。いつもお互いに気持ちが通じあっている。They are a nice couple; they are always in sympathy with each other.人間は互いに言葉で意思を通じ合う。Human beings communicate with each other by means of language.
彼はトラックを通すために車を横に寄せた。He pulled aside to let a truck pass.彼はおばあさんに道を譲り、通してあげた。He gave way to the old lady and let her pass.銅はよく電気を通す。Copper conducts electricity well.
ちょっと！なに通せんぼやってんのよ。Hey! What are you doing blocking the way?
この通りに沿って行けば駅に着きます。If you follow this street, you will get to the station.この横町は人の通りが多い。This cross street is busy with pedestrian traffic.この煙突は通りが悪くなった。This chimney has begun to draw badly.
いまやブッシュ大統領が当選したのだから、業務は通常通りになるだろう。Now that Bush has been elected, it will be business as usual.１人の生徒がベイスン通りで車にひかれた。A student was run over by a car on Basin Street.
すると、たまたま少女のおばあちゃんが通りかかる。Along comes the grandmother and sees her granddaughter.
彼は通りすがりにお辞儀をした。He bowed to me as he passed by.
通り雨だからすぐ止むよ。This is a tropical storm. It'll be over soon.
うっかり降りるところを通り越した。I went past my stop absent-mindedly.
私はその暗い道を通り過ぎた。I passed over the dark street.
警官が通り道を空けて車を通した。Policemen cleared the way to let cars pass.
その車は門を通り抜けた。The car passed through a gate.

私は毎日その教会の前を通る。I go by that church every day.駅と飛行機の間は、バスが通っている。Buses run between the station and the airport.弾がヘルメットを通った。A bullet pierced the helmet.
しばらくあなたは通院する必要があります。You'll have to visit me regularly for a while.
欧州通貨はドルに対して弱くなった。European currencies weakened against the dollar.

通過する車に気をつけなさい。Watch out for passing cars.私達の乗った列車は長いトンネルを通過した。Our train went through a long tunnel.予算案は上院を通過した。The budget passed the Upper House.

いつもバス通学です。I usually go to school by bus.




私は１時間通勤する。I commute to work for an hour.

どの電車も通勤者でぎゅうぎゅう詰めだった。The trains were jammed with commuters.

ここは大型車の通行は禁止されている。There is no passage for big vehicles here.
この道路は工事中のため通行止めだ。This road is closed to traffic for construction work.
追い剥ぎが通行人から金を奪った。A highwayman robbed a foot passenger of his money.
次の会合の日取りをご通告下さい。Please advise me of the date for the next meeting.

わが国は米国で通商している。We do business with the United States.



彼は、通常バスで学校へ行きます。He usually goes to school by bus.




彼は、無電で通信を送った。He sent a message by wireless.

通信員は海外生活にすぐに順応しなくてはいけない。A correspondent must soon adjust himself to life abroad.
ロケットは通信衛星を軌道に乗せた。The rocket put a communications satellite into orbit.



通信販売がダイレクト・マーケティングの主な形態である。Mail order is the main form of direct marketing.






おって通知があるまで待て。Wait until further notice.

私は自分の通帳を見たが、幸運にも５０ドル余分に入っていた。I looked at my bank account book, and happily discovered that I had an extra $50!



すぐ警察に通報してください。You should notify the police at once.


彼は彼女を通訳として雇った。He engaged her as an interpreter.
彼は年の割に若く見えるので、大学生として通用します。He looks so young for his age that he passes for a college student.

通例、喫煙は許可していません。As a rule, we don't allow smoking.
これが海への通路だ。This is the passage to the sea.
通話の申し込みを取り消しましょうか。Should I cancel the call?

その男は私につかみかかった。The man made to grab at me.

だれかが私の腕をつかんだ。Somebody caught me by the arm.

少女はひざまで水に浸かった。The girl stood up to her knees in the water.
彼はスプーンをスープの中につけた。He dipped his spoon into the soup.




統計の数字を理論とつじつまの合うように変える。I accommodate statistics to theory.

家の横はつたで覆われていた。The side of the house was covered with ivy.
紙を綴じるのにホチキスはとても便利です。A stapler is very useful for attaching papers together.
その単語をどうつづるか私に教えてください。Tell me how to spell the word.靜子が季節の移ろいを詩に綴りました。Shizuko composed a poem about the change of the seasons.


お茶の木はツバキの一種です。The tea tree is a kind of camellia.
彼は私の帽子をぺちゃんこにつぶした。He squashed my hat flat.彼は平然と取引をつぶしました。He sank the deal without batting an eyelash.彼女は店を見てまわって１時間つぶした。She killed an hour looking around the stores.
雪の重さで家がつぶれた。The house collapsed under the weight of snow.父が亡くなって私の留学計画は完全につぶれた。My plan to study abroad went by the board when my father died.



これは彼が最も大切にしているつぼだ。This is the pot he treasures most of all.
私は夜には決して爪を切らない。I never cut my nails at night.


爪先が浮きたっちゃうよ。That keeps me on my toes.
私は赤ちゃんが目を覚まさないようにつま先で歩いた。I walked on tiptoes so as not to wake the baby.
彼はみんなにつまはじきされている。He's left out of everything.




彼は天井からランプをつるした。He hung a lamp from the ceiling.

彼は驚いてまゆをつりあげた。He arched his eyebrows in surprise.漁師は釣り上げた魚の大きさをおおげさにいった。The fisherman exaggerated the size of the fish he had caught.くず社債のディーラーは市場をつり上げてバブル状態にしました。Junk bond dealers left the market riding on a pillow of air.

私は吊し上げを食った。I was tried in a kangaroo court.
あなたは釣りに行きたがっている。You are dying to go fishing.つりは要らんよ。Keep the change!
仕事の量と賃金が釣り合っていない。The amount of work and the pay are not balanced.





私は昨日大きな魚を釣った。I caught a big fish yesterday.
ツルは大きくて美しい鳥だ。Cranes are big beautiful birds.


あの家は女房が亭主をしりに敷いている。She wears the trousers in that house.

この机は私にはちょっと低い。This desk is a little low for me.






たしかに出生率の低下で子供の数が減り、学校でも生徒の数が少なくなっているのは事実ですが、しかし、これはまったくもってけっこうなことです。It's true that there are fewer children due to the falling birthrate, and there are fewer children in the school, but that is all to the good.







これらの船は数日間低気圧の中にいることができるくらい速く走れる。These sea boats are fast enough to stay in a depression for several days.

一生懸命磨きました。困ったのは、意外と低級宝石のストックがないことです。I polished for all I was worth. The trouble is that my stock of low-grade gems was surprisingly low.

低金利で企業の金融機関からの借入は増えている。Corporate borrowing from financial institutions is rising due to the low interest rate.

かもめが低空を飛んでいる。The sea gulls are flying low.
住民は低空飛行訓練に抗議を行った。The people protested against the low altitude flight training.
彼女は、低血圧だ。She suffers from low blood pressure.
産婦人科医が減っているのは出生数の減少で医療ニーズが低減したのを反映している。The reduction in obstetricians and gynecologists is a reflection of the decrease in births, thus reducing need for medical care.













私達は道すがらずっと低速で運転しなければならなかった。We had to drive slowly all the way.




今の太陽の活動は低調ですが、それでも時々大きな黒点が現れます。The sun is currently in a period of low activity but even so large sunspots occasionally appear.
会社は従業員を低賃金で不当に利用した。The company exploited its workers through low wages.










昨日の株価下落に伴い、今日の取引は低迷だった。Trading was slow today after yesterday's market decline.



ドルの価値は最近低落した。The value of the dollar has fallen recently.










彼は素行不良で１週間の停学を受けた。He was suspended from school for a week for bad conduct.
列車は滑らかに停止した。The train came to a smooth stop.コンピューター・システムは午後８時に自動的に停止する。The computer system shuts down automatically at 8pm.大統領は憲法を停止し、戒厳令をしきました。The President suspended the constitution and imposed martial law.



この列車は各駅に停車する。This train stops at every station.

この停戦が世界平和に役立つことを私達はみな望んでいる。We all hope that this cease-fire will make for world peace.


その船は海岸を少し離れて停滞していた。The ship stopped a little way off the shore.
台風の余波で２日間停電した。There was no electricity for two days in the aftermath of the typhoon.

その船は港に停泊している。The ship is at anchor in the harbor.

バスの停留所まで競争しよう。I'll race you to the bus stop.





















子供たちは堤防をすべりおりた。The children slid down the bank.
船田氏が新党に加わるかどうかは、定かでは、ない。It is not certain if Mr Funada will join the new party.
やっと天候が定まった。The weather has settled at last.
ヘーゲルと同様に、パノフスキーの弁論方の概念は歴史があらかじめ定められた道程をたどるようにさせている。In the same way as Hegel, Panovsky's notion of the dialectic makes history follow a predetermined course.職員の選考に関する規則を次のように定める。Rules in connection with staff selection are set as follows.

このエレベーターの定員は１０人だ。This elevator's capacity is ten people.
これはバーゲン商品なので定価よりやすくなっているんじゃないですか。Aren't you selling this at a discount price?





ついに我がデジタルグルーヴクラブの定款が完成しました。The articles of incorporation have finally been completed for our Digital Groove Club.
今年も、アマチュア音楽家の定期演奏会が頻繁に開催される。This year too there are many regular concerts for amateur musicians being held.汽車の中で眠っている間に、財布と定期を盗まれてしまった。I had my purse and commuter ticket stolen while I was sleeping in the train.
外国の書籍や定期刊行物を販売している店がいくつかある。There are a number of shops selling foreign books and periodicals.
スミス氏は定期券を持っていくのを忘れた。Mr Smith forgot to take his commuter ticket.
私は本を買い、彼は定規を買った。I bought a book and he a ruler.
定義するのが難しい語もある。Some words are hard to define.
本日定休日。Today is our regular closing day.



劇はちょうど定刻に始まった。The play began exactly on time.
あの飛行機は定時に出発できなかった。That airplane was not able to depart at the regular time.
彼は昼間の仕事のほかに、毎晩定時制高校に通っている。He goes to a part-time high school every evening in addition to the work he does during the day.

その年彼らはバージニアに定住することを決めた。They decided to settle down in Virginia that year.

定職を探している。I'm looking for some regular work.
日替わり定食にしませんか。How about getting the special of the day?
これらの２つの定数の関係に介入するほかの要素があるかもしれない。There may be other factors that intervene in the relation between these two constants.


それは定石通りというだけで、手を抜いたわけではないのです。That's just standard practise, it's not like they're cutting corners.



この習慣は日本人の間にすっかり定着した。This custom has become firmly established among the Japanese.
私の会社では６０歳が定年である。At our company, the retirement age is 60.

彼は金融アナリストで経済動向の分析には定評がある。He's a financial analyst with a pretty good reputation for his analysis of economic trends.







株でやられるまで彼は証券市場の帝王でしたよ。He was a stock-market tycoon until the bears got him.


帝王切開にしてください。I'd like to have a Caesarian operation.




イギリス式の朝食はイギリス帝国の建設者たちによって流行らせたものだ。The English breakfast was made popular by the architects of the British Empire.












靴の底がすり減ってしまった。The soles of my shoes are worn.



彼は底抜けの馬鹿だ。He's an absolute fool.


彼の声には底力がある。He has a deep voice.
私たちの庭には２本の桜の木があります。Our garden has two cherry trees.
この門から庭園に入れます。The gate admits to the garden.

雨で彼女は庭仕事ができなかった。The rainy weather prevented her from working in the garden.

彼は庭木を一本切り倒した。He cut down a tree in his garden.







無駄な抵抗はやめなさい。It's useless to try and resist.

これらのストラテジーがエメット理論と抵触するかもしれないというのが、彼らの仮説である。Their hypothesis is that these strategies may come into conflict with Emmet's theory.
銀行は彼のビルを抵当に取っている。The bank holds a mortgage on his building.

その男は腰に拳銃をさげていた。The man wore a gun on his hip.
私の提案を承認していただけますか。Could you approve my proposal?

新たな議論が提起された。A new argument was presented.
この提議を支持される方は賛成とおっしゃって下さい。All in favor of this proposition will please say Aye.
Microsoftがβ版をランチするのは「NetShow streaming server」で動画や音声をオンデマンドで提供する。What Microsoft is launching is a beta version of its "NetShow streaming server"; it supplies video and audio on demand.

うちの会社はあの合弁会社と提携している。We are affiliated with the new joint venture company.
君の提言が会合の席で話題にのぼったよ。Your suggestion came up at the meeting.
下記に対して価格を提示してください。I'd like a quote for the following.
あなたに考慮していただくためにこの計画を提出します。I submit this plan for your consideration.
トムは別の案を委員会に提唱した。Tom suggested another plan to the committee.



トラファルガー広場にはネルソン提督の彫像がある。There is a statue of Admiral Nelson in Trafalgar Square.




スージーほど上手にピアノをひけるとよいのだが。I wish I could play the piano as well as Susie.２０ほどの問題で意見の一致をみている。Some 20 issues have been agreed on.「小川さんはいつ来たか」「１０分ほど前だ」"When did Mr Ogawa arrive?" "Ten minutes ago."
彼女はほどなくやってきた。It was not long before she came.
私の家からほど近い場所にある何軒かのホテルの名前と料金設定を同封しました。I have included the names and prices of a couple of hotels which are reasonably close to where I live.
この程度のお金じゃ長くは持たないだろう。This sum of money won't go far.
彼はお金についてはたいへん締まり屋だ。He is very close with his money.
あいにく店は閉まっていた。Unfortunately, the store was closed.ドアが閉まっていたので、入ることが出来なかった。The door was locked, so I couldn't get in.
離陸の際は、シートベルトを締めなくてはならない。You must fasten your seat belts during take-off.


トムはスピーチの最後を美しい歌で締めくくった。Tom closed his speech with a beautiful song.



ここが締めつけられるように痛みます。I have a gripping pain here.
幾多の紆余曲折を経て条約は締結されるに至った。The treaty has been concluded after many twists and turns.


私たちのボートは２艇身の差で勝った。Our boat won by two lengths.
艇長はボートレースの最後のラップで、乗組員をおだてて、レースを勝ち取るため、スパートをかけた。The coxswain egged his crewmen on, and made a winning spurt at the last lap of the regatta.
間違っていれば私のつづりを訂正してください。Correct my spelling if it's wrong.
サムはあきらめのいいほうだろう？Sam is a philosopher, isn't he?
その少年は死んだものとしてあきらめられた。The boy was given up for dead.








彼女はちょっとした邸宅に住んでいる。She lives in quite a big mansion.

その板に釘を打ってください。Drive the nail into the board.




川は泥で濁っていた。The river was cloudy with silt.

泥をかぶってでもやろうという気持ちはありませんね。I have no intention of getting wet.
子供たちは泥んこの中で遊んでいた。The children were playing in the dirt.

私たちは書類事務の泥沼に陥っていた。We were bogged down in a morass of paperwork.

車が通った時に泥水をかぶった。The passing car splashed muddy water on me.
ゆうべ、泥酔のみずきは湖のほとりを歩いていて、水の中に落ちてしまった。Last night Mizuki, very drunk, fell into the water while walking along the lakeside.



ぬかるみに足を取られた。I lost my balance on the muddy road.
このつまみを回すことでテレビの色を調節できます。You can adjust the color on the TV by turning this knob.ビールの摘まみがほしい。I would like to have something to munch on with my beer.


キャシーは花を摘むのをやめました。Cathy stopped picking flowers.
外科医は患者の盲腸を摘出した。The surgeon took out his patient's appendix.
捜査員らは暗殺計画を摘発しました。Investigators uncovered an assassination plot.

敵意に代わって愛情が生まれた。Hostility was replaced by love.
敵軍が攻撃を開始した。The hostile army began to attack.



皆が不法外国人に対して敵対的な態度を取った。Everybody took a hostile attitude toward illegal aliens.



濡れたタオルから滴が垂れている。Water is dripping from the wet towel.


インキ補充瓶のキャップを外し、スポイトでインキを吸い上げ、マーカーの吸収体へ適量、滴下してください。Remove the cap from the ink refill bottle, fill the dropper with ink, and drip an appropriate amount onto the marker's core.

その女性は非常に協力的である。The women are very supportive.
私は矢を的に当てた。I hit the mark with the arrow.
禁酒法のしかれていた時代に、酒類密輸入の悪どい商売を腕ずくで自分の支配下におくために、てき屋たちは、おたがいに殺しあっていた。During prohibition days, racketeers used to rub each other out to get control of the rum-running racket.
間髪を入れず、迅速かつ的確な応対、畏れ入ります。Such an accurate, lightning-quick reply. What can I say?
彼の予言は、ひょっとしたら的中するかもしれない。His prediction might come true.
ゲームの開始には笛が吹かれる。A whistle is blown at the start of a game.
笛吹きに金を払う者が曲を注文する。He who pays the piper calls the tune.
その肉は全く食用に適さなかった。None of the meat was fit to eat.
この規則はすべてのケースに適応する。This rule applies to all cases.


全角文字を含むファイル名の場合、一部のＯＳでは文字化けが生じることがありますので、ダウンロードの際に適宜ファイル名を変更してください。On some OS's you get gibberish for filenames with full-width characters so when downloading please change to a suitable filename.
私は都会の生活には適合できないだろう。I will not be able to fit in with the city life.
適材適所。あいつはコンピューターをいじくっていた方が生き生きしているよな。He's definitely the right guy for the job. Let him fiddle with a computer and he perks right up.
天才とは忍耐に堪え得る偉大な適性に外ならぬ。Genius is nothing but a great aptitude for patience.

「行った」というのが適切な言葉だ。"Performed" is the right word.
健康は適切な食事と適度な運動にある。Good health consists of proper eating and moderate exercise.
ＩＮＦ社の誰か最も適当な人を教えてください。Can you please let me know the most suitable person in INF Co., Ltd?
大統領には彼が適任だ。He's eligible for the presidency.
彼こそその仕事の適任者だ。He is the very man for the job.


この法律はすべての人に適用される。This law applies to everybody.


インキ補充瓶のキャップを外し、スポイトでインキを吸い上げ、マーカーの吸収体へ適量、滴下してください。Remove the cap from the ink refill bottle, fill the dropper with ink, and drip an appropriate amount onto the marker's core.


あなたが助けてくれなかったら私はおぼれていたことでしょう。If it had not been for your help, I should have drowned.私の父は毎日酒におぼれている。My father drinks daily.


餓死するくらいなら溺死したほうがましだ。I might as well drown as starve.

その学生は哲学を専攻している。The student majors in philosophy.
あごひげがあるだけでは哲学者にはなれぬ。The beard does not make the philosopher.
これはスティーブン・エメットに関する哲学的研究ではない。This is a socio-linguistic study on Steven Emmet.



生産性はオートメーションの徹底によって向上する。Production improves by becoming more automatic.
あの男は徹底的なエゴイストだ。That man is an egotist through and through.
私は徹頭徹尾あなたを支持してきました。I have supported you throughout.
私はよく徹夜する。I often stay up all night.
自民党は増税の法案を提出したが、猛烈な反対にあって撤回した。The LDP brought out a bill to raise taxes, but they met with such violent opposition that they backed down.
彼は自転車を撤去することを提案した。He proposed that bicycles be taken away.

ソ連軍はアフガニスタンからの撤退を開始した。The Soviet troops started to withdraw from Afghanistan.
彼女は女性差別撤廃を主張した。She advocated equal rights for women.


鉄は最も有用な金属です。Iron is the most useful metal.



その川には鉄橋がすでに建設中だ。A railway bridge is already being built over the river.

ここでは決して、レンガは鉄筋コンクリートの代わりになりません。Bricks never take the place of ferro-concrete here.

そこは鉄鉱に富む。Iron ore occurs there in abundance.

鉄鋼は基幹産業である。Steel is a key industry.



この橋は鉄製です。This bridge is made of iron.



我々は鉄道施設の契約をした。We were contracted to build a railway.



グリーンピースは鉄分が豊富で爪の色がよくなる成分が含まれている。Green peas are high in iron and contain nutrients that improve the colour of fingernails.
合衆国では２億１６００万丁もの鉄砲類が、民間の手にあるという。In the U.S., as many as 216 million firearms are said to be in private hands.

体操競技の中では、鉄棒の大車輪が好きです。I like to see a gymnast do the giant swing on the high bar.




彼女はあらゆる婦徳の典型である。She incarnates all womanly virtues.
それは典型的なゴシック式教会です。It is a typical Gothic church.











彼は天を仰いだ。He looked up at the sky.縁組は天でなされる。Marriage is made in heaven.












ハエは天井を歩くことができる。A fly can walk on the ceiling.

物価が天井知らずに上がる。Prices keep on soaring.









日本は天下第一の国である。Japan is the best country under the sun.


これは天下一品だ。This is the best thing on earth.

今日の試合は天下分け目の戦いだ。Today's game will be a crucial battle; the result will be decisive.
















彼は天気のよい日を利用して壁を塗った。He took advantage of the fine weather to paint the wall.今日が天気ならいいのに。I wish it were fine today.








天気予報が当たったよ。The weather forecast was right.










この国の王は人ではなく、はるか天空に居られるという三対の翼を持つ神獣なんだ。The king of this country isn't a person, but a divine beast with three pairs of wings said to be in far away in the sky.




ずば抜けた着想というのは、往々にして天啓のごとくヒラメクようだ。Sometimes the most inspired ideas seem to just come from out of the blue.



それはすべて天候に依存している。It all depends on the weather.






天皇誕生日が日曜日と重なった。The Emperor's Birthday fell on Sunday.


結婚生活は夫婦仲が良ければ天国であり、夫婦仲が悪ければこの世の地獄である。Marriage, in peace, is this world's paradise; in strife, this life's purgatory.
私たちは彼を天才だと思った。We thought of him as a genius.

地震や洪水は天災です。Earthquakes and floods are natural disasters.




黒い天使は、その漆黒の翼を大きく広げて、空へと舞い上がる。The black angel spread those jet-black wings wide and flew up into the sky.
















彼は天寿を全うした。He lived to a ripe old age.





結婚は天上において行われ、床入りは地上において行われる。Marriages are made in heaven and consummated on earth.



彼は教えることが彼の天職であることに気づいた。He found that teaching was his calling.



天真爛漫なところが彼の唯一の取り柄だな。Naivete is his only merit.



彼女は天性の音楽家だ。She is a natural musician.


「あっぱれ！」天使はそういうと、稲妻が走るもやもやの煙の中へ消えていった。"Done!" says the angel, and disappears in a cloud of smoke and a bolt of lightning.


この車は天然ガスで動く。This car runs on natural gas.




その国は天然資源がある。That country has natural resources.



今ではみんな天然痘には免疫になっている。Everybody is immune to smallpox nowadays.

天窓のある部屋がいいです。A room with a skylight would be fine.




地球以外の天体に生物はいますか。Is there life on other worlds?









天地神明に誓って嘘ではありません。I'm not lying. I swear to God!

















鳥は昆虫の天敵です。Birds are natural enemies of insects.





果実は天日で乾燥させます。The fruits are dried in the sun.







天罰は遅くとも必ず来る。Heaven's vengeance is slow but sure.
天網恢恢疎にして漏らさずの言葉通り、天罰覿面だ。They say fate will catch up with you. That was God's way of punishing him.


彼には天賦の才がある。He has natural gifts.


彼は画家になって芸術的な天分を生かした。He turned his artistic gifts to good account by becoming a painter.
彼は天文学、即ち天文の学問の偉大な権威であった。He was a great authority on astronomy, or the science of the heavenly bodies.

マヤの聖職者たちは天文学をよく身につけていた。Maya priests learned much about astronomy.
天文学者が局部超銀河団の存在を推定しました。Astronomers inferred the existence of a local supercluster.
その天文台はよい位置にある。That observatory stands in a good location.



私たちは大阪タワーのてっぺんに上がった。We got to the top of Osaka Tower.





人事を尽くして天命を待つ。Man proposes, God disposes.



その少女の踊りには天与の才能が感じられた。There was genius in the way the girl danced.





「天路歴程」が気に入ったので、私が最初に集めたのは小さい分冊本のジョン・バニヤン著作集だった。Pleased with The Pilgrim's Progress, my first collection was of John Bunyan's works in separate little volumes.






私は寿司を注文し、ジョンはてんぷらを注文した。I ordered sushi, and John tempura.
その事件の展開について引き続きお知らせ下さい。Please keep me informed of the development of the case.与党は野党非難のキャンペーンを展開しています。The ruling party is running a smear campaign against the opposition.
その店のウインドウには最新のファッションが展示してある。The shop windows display the latest fashion.
展示会へのご招待、本日ありがたく承りました。Today, we received your invitation to the exhibition with pleasure.

あのビルの屋上からの展望はすばらしかった。The view from the top of that building was magnificent.

私たちは毎年展覧会を開く。We hold an exhibition every year.
店員はその荷物にラベルをつけた。The clerk labeled the baggage.

彼は店じまいのため商品を投げ売りした。He sold his goods at a loss to wind up his business.

店主は私にそれを買うようしきりに勧めた。The shopkeeper urged me to buy it.
車のギアを入れずにリバースを入れたので店先に多大な損害を与えた。Instead of putting the car into gear, she put it into reverse, causing a great deal of damage to the store-front.
この店の店長はひげが生えています。The manager of this store is growing a beard.
東京株式市場では４５０社以上の株が店頭で取り引きされている。In the Tokyo stock market, stocks of about 450 companies are traded over the counter.



いいか。店内では大人しくしてるんだぞ。OK, you keep quiet while we're in the store.

私は店舗の二階に住んでいる。I live in a flat above a shop.




彼は試験答案の添削をするのに忙しい。He is busy correcting test papers.


当社への地図を添付します。Attached is a map to our office.
そのスカートは彼女の脚にぴったりまといついている。The skirt clings tight to her legs.
その未亡人は黒衣をまとっていた。The widow was dressed in black.
この組織はまとまりに欠けている。This organization lacks unity.

データはまだまとめていません。The data hasn't been compiled yet.



子供たちが大きな雪の玉を転がしていた。The children were rolling a big snowball.
硬貨が机の下に転がり込んだ。A coin rolled under the desk.思いがけない大きな財産がころがりこんでくると信じることは、根も葉もないことだ。To believe that an unexpected big fortune will come your way is to build a castle in Spain.
車輪はゆっくり転がり始めた。The wheel began to roll slowly.
彼は丘を転げるようにやってきた。He came tumbling down the hill.

子供は階段を転げ落ちた。The child tumbled down the stairs.
災いを転じて福としなさい。Turn your misfortune to account.

ジョンは責任を他人に転嫁する。John casts the blame on others.

工場は石炭から、より清潔な燃料への転換を強く要求されている。Factories have been urged to switch from coal to a cleaner fuel.



ニュージーランドへ転勤になります。She will be relocated to New Zealand.
コンピューターの仕事から金融、会計などの仕事に転向することは可能である。It's possible to branch out from computing to jobs in banking, accountancy and so on.
転校したそうですね。You say you changed schools.
転校生は先生の鉛筆を削って機嫌をとった。The new boy made up to his teacher by sharpening her pencils.
この記事を転載することは可能でしょうか。Is it possible to reprint this article?




転職後、彼の収入は減った。His income has been reduced after he changed his job.


データは、メインコンピューターから自分のものに転送できるし、またその逆もできる。Data can be transmitted from the main computer to yours, and vice versa.



小学５年の息子が静岡から名古屋の小学校に転入しました。My fifth-year junior school son has transferred into a school in Nagoya from Shizuoka.



積荷のバランスが取れなくて船は転覆した。Due to a lack of balance the ship turned over.

本サイト内の記述、画像、写真の無断転載・転用を禁止します。Reproduction or appropriation of HTML, images and photographs from within this site is prohibited.
阪神三日天下。あっと言う間に首位から転落しちゃったよ。Hanshin's moment of glory didn't last. They fell out of first place in a hurry.

どんな小さな点でも見ることができる。I can see the tiniest spot.合格した生徒の名前の前に点をつけて下さい。Will you put a dot before the names of the successful students?我々のチームが２点リードしている。Our team is two points ahead.
木造建築物は火がつきやすい。Wooden buildings catch fire easily.灯りが一晩中ついている。The lights have been burning all night.












緩い結び目をすべて点検してしっかりしめなさい。Check all the loose knots and fasten them tight.



谷には農家が点在していた。The valley was dotted with farm houses.







彼女は英語の点数がよい。She gets good marks in English.




点滴石を穿つ。Constant dripping wears away a stone.私は病院で点滴を受けた。I had an intravenous drip in hospital.

パリは灯の都と呼ばれています。多くの美しい建物が夜になると点灯されます。Paris is called the City of Lights. Many beautiful buildings are lit at night.




バックミラーに赤いランプが点滅しているのが見えた時は、ガックリきたね。I saw flashing red lights in my rear-view mirror and my heart sank.





涙が彼女の頬を伝って流れた。Tears trickled down her cheeks.

奥様によろしくお伝えください。Please say hello to your wife.


この歌は１０世紀から今日まで伝わったものだ。This song comes down to us from the tenth century.お茶は中国から伝わった。Tea was introduced from China.あなたの議論は良く相手に伝わった。Your argument came across well.

伝家の宝刀をぬく。Play one's trump card.

その小説家は何冊かの伝奇小説を書いた。The novelist wrote several romances.

彼の伝記は全くの事実に即して書かれたものだ。His biography is quite true to life.






文字、伝書鳩、電信、その他多くの方法で、情報はますます速く人から人へと伝えられるようになった。Written words, carrier pigeons, the telegraph, and many other devices carried ideas faster and faster from man to man.





その歌は伝説に由来する物だった。The song descended from a legend.
我々は病気の伝染をくいとめなければならない。We should check the spread of the disease.

伝染病が発生した。An epidemic disease broke out.
ナイロンストッキングはすぐ伝線する。Nylon stockings often run.









意思伝達は色々な形をとる。Communication takes many forms.

古い伝統が消滅しつつある。Old traditions are crumbling away.
能は伝統的な日本の芸術である。Noh is a traditional Japanese art.
そして、何年か後に慈善伝導団を組織した際にマザー・テレサとなった。She became Mother Teresa years later when she founded the Missionaries of Charity.



彼女はアフリカでの伝道の仕事に身をささげた。She devoted herself to mission work in Africa.








この商品管理伝票をこのタイムスタンプに差し込むと日付と時刻が打刻されます。Place this merchandise slip into the time stamp, and the date and time will be impressed.



私達の生活様式はヨーロッパ文明の伝来以来変化してきた。Our mode of life has changed since the introduction of European civilization.


















こちらの殿方にビールを差し上げてください。Please bring this gentleman a glass of beer.









都市化が田園生活をどんどん侵食しています。Urbanization is encroaching on rural life.
１週間田舎にいてすっかり元気になったような気がする。I feel completely restored after a week in the country.去年の夏、父の田舎に行きました。I visited my father's hometown last summer.
彼は都会人の作法を身につけているけれども根は田舎育ちだ。For all his city ways, he is a country boy at heart.
この田舎者めが。You clown you.
スミスさんは自分のマイペースな馬を田舎道で走らせた。Mr. Smith ran his sluggish horse along the country roads.
ウッド夫人が作ってくれるおいしい田舎風の料理を食べたし、ミルクをたくさん飲みました。He ate Mrs Wood's good country food, and drank a lot of milk.




この辺りは昔、田んぼだったんだよ。There used to be rice fields around here.













電器設備に近づかないように。Keep away from the electrical equipment.

このエアコンは電気を多量に消費する。This air conditioner consumes a lot of electricity.電気を消すのを忘れないで。Don't forget to turn the light off.







いろいろな電気製品のおかげで家事が楽になった。Electrical appliances have made housework easier.

この電気かみそりは買う前に試してみるべきだった。I should have tried out this electric shaver before buying it.




電球が切れた。The light bulb has burned out.




回路を調べる前に、電源のスイッチを切りなさい。You must switch off the power before checking the circuit.
携帯電話の電源を切るべきである。You should turn off the mobile phone.
ノートパソコンの電源を入れ、ブラウザを立ち上げて、もう覚えてしまったアドレスを打ち込む。I switch on my laptop, start up the browser, and type in the address I've already learnt by heart.


彼はそれを電光石火の早さで仕上げた。He finished it as quick as lightning.


電算機は経営者に詳しい最新の情報を与えてくれる。They would arm administrators with so much detailed and up to date information.
電子タイプライターはありますか。Do you have an electronic typewriter?


電子メールで連絡を取り合いましょう。Let's keep in touch by e-mail.
もう電子レンジは買い換えてもいい頃です。It is about time we bought a new microwave oven.



電子計算機は人間の頭脳が計算するのとちょうど同じように計算する事が出来る。The computer can figure just as the human brain does.
クライブは電子工学の技術者になりたい。Clive wants to be an electronic engineer.

この電子辞書は携帯しやすいところが味噌です。The good thing about this electronic dictionary is that it's easy to carry.






あなたは始発電車に間にあいましたか。Did you catch the first train?

この式によって電場を計算してやると、結果は次のようになる。If you calculate the electric field using this equation, the result comes out like the following.
電信を発明したのは誰だか知っていますか。Do you know who invented the telegraph?
電流が流れる電線にコイルを近づけると、コイルにも電気が流れます。When a coil is moved near to a wire with current flowing in it current flows in the coil as well.

テーブルの上の電卓は私のですよ。The calculator on the table is mine.

このおもちゃの自動車は電池で動く。This toy car runs on batteries.
彼は車を電柱にぶつけた。He ran the car into a lamppost.


ルーシーは電灯のスイッチをつけた。Lucy turned on the light switch.
彼は電動タイプライターが欲しかったが、友人は彼を説き伏せてワープロを買わせた。He wanted to buy an electric typewriter but his friend talked him into buying a word processor.




彼の携帯電話は他の電話を妨害する電波を出した。His mobile phone produced radio emissions that interfered with other phones.



私は、彼女から電報を受け取った。I received a telegram from her.


電流が流れる電線にコイルを近づけると、コイルにも電気が流れます。When a coil is moved near to a wire with current flowing in it current flows in the coil as well.

うちの大学はあまりにも大量の電力を消費している。Our college uses far too much electricity.


電話は繰り返し鳴っていた。The telephone rang repeatedly.
しばらく電話を切らずにお待ちください。Please hold the line a moment.

電話機が壊れているかどうか調べて下さい。Can you check if the phone is out of order?


電話線が切れてしまったんだ。The storm has broken the line.
電話中に切れてしまいました。I was cut off while I was speaking.
電話帳で番号をしらべよ。Look up the number in the telephone book.

電話番号を教えて。Give me your phone number.この電話番号に電話する方法を教えてください。Could you tell me how to call this number?

日本の電話網は非常に能率的にできている。The Japanese telephone system is highly efficient.
私はウサギの世話をしなければならない。I must look after the rabbits.
彼はかなりしぶっていたのだが、とにもかくにも彼の弟が申し出を受けてしまったのだ。He was rather reluctant, but his brother accepted the offer anyway.
とにかく、試験が終わってほっとしたよ。Anyhow, I'm relieved the test is over.

ともかく合格してうれしい。I'm glad to have passed at all.顔はともかく、気立てはとてもいい子だよ。Looks aside, she is very good-natured.

ともあれ彼は試験に受かった。After all, he succeeded in passing the exam.
私個人の生活についてとやかくうるさくいうのはやめてください。Get off my back about my personal life!
あの人にはとかくのうわさがあった。There were some unsavory rumors about him.運動が健康の鍵であるのを私たちはとかく忘れがちだ。We tend to forget that exercise is a key to good health.






なんだかめまいと吐き気がします。I feel sort of dizzy and I feel like throwing up.

つばを吐き出してください。Please spit.アイスランドには大量の煙を吐き出している火山があります。There's a volcano emitting masses of smoke in Iceland.彼女は怒って吐き出すように答えた。She spit out an angry reply.
息を深く吸ったり吐いたりしてください。Take a deep breath in and out, please.そんな言葉を吐いたことを君は後悔するだろう。You'll regret having said those words.３回吐きました。I threw up three times.
ひんぱんに吐血する場合は、救急車を呼ぶか、近くの内科医に往診してもらう。If you frequently spit-up blood you should call an ambulance or have a nearby physician make a house call.
魂の吐息を感じ始めた。I'm feeling the breath of life.




橋は塗り替え中である。The bridge is being repainted.


君が座っている腰掛けのペンキはまだ塗り立てだよ。The paint on the seat on which you are sitting is still wet.
ジョンがドアにペンキを塗っていた。John has been painting the door.
ナイフは血に塗れていた。The knife was covered in blood.
彼らのボートは塗装する必要がある。Their boat needs painting.


すみませんが娘の歯にフッソ塗布をしてください。Please give her a fluoride treatment.


この若人に対してねたましく思う気持ちを、君はやむを得ないものと受け入れなければならない。You need to come to terms with your jealousy of this young man.
彼女らの妬みは彼女の美しさに向けられた。Their envy was directed toward her beauty.
彼は君の成功をねたんでいる。He begrudges you your success.

子羊たちは屠殺され市場に出された。The lambs were slaughtered for market.









ジョンは彼のオフィスへ徒歩で行きます。John goes to his office on foot.



トニーは人を雇い、もっと客を掴み、仕事をより早くずさんにやれば、もっと金もうけができると思ったのだ。Tony realized that if he hired another crew, got more customers and did the job quicker and sloppier, he could make more money.




走者がリレーでバトンを渡さなければなりません。A runner must pass the baton in a relay race.わたしを向こう側へわたしてください。Please take me over to the other side.それじゃあこのメモを渡してください。緊急です。Then, please give him this note. This is urgent.

私と互角で渡り合える女の子でなければだめだ。The girl has to match me in skill.




橋は安全です。車でわたれます。The bridge is safe; you can drive across.この儀式は幾世代にもわたって伝わってきた。This ceremony has been handed down from generation to generation.



その事件が彼の渡米を妨げた。The incident prevented him from going to America.
仏教は５３８年に日本に渡来した。Buddhism was introduced into Japan in 538.
この家は私の名前で登記してある。This house is registered in my name.
私たちはみな、制服を着て登校する。We all wear uniforms to school.

その靴は登山には向かないよ。Those shoes won't do for climbing.

その女優は舞台に３度登場した。That actress made three entrances onto the stage.「西遊記」の中には錬金術の話が数多く登場します。Many tales of alchemy show up in "Journey to the West".
今登録されれば、１年間無料です。Join now and pay nothing for a whole year.


私はその馬に５ポンド賭けた。I bet five pounds on the horse.
あなたは賭事が好きではないのですね。You don't like gambling, do you?

彼の車は会社への途上で、故障した。His car broke down on the way to work.その国は、民主国家への途上にある。The country is on the way to becoming a democratic nation.
途上国では優れた技術者が不足してる。Good technicians are in short supply in the developing countries.

その飛行機からの通信が突然とだえた。All communication with that airplane was suddenly cut off.
その知らせを聞いた途端に、彼は青ざめた。On hearing the news, he turned pale.
この切符は途中下車できます。This ticket allows you to stop over at any station.

そんな途方もない話は聞いたことがない。That's the damnedest story I ever heard.
ロンドンはもはや霧の都ではない。London is no longer a city of fog.

あの人達は都会の生活にあこがれている。They are longing for city life.
何時がご都合よいでしょうか。What time will be right for you?
この都市の面積はどれくらいか。What is the area of this city?
彼はその商売を都心に集中した。He centered his business on the metropolitan area.
東京都庁ビルの高さはどのくらいありますか。How high is the Tokyo Metropolitan Government Office Building?




私も都民の１人だ。I am also a citizen of Tokyo.




水面から飛び立つ鳥は努めてあとを濁さぬようにする。A bird flying out of the water is careful not to cause turbulence.
俺はベストを尽くそうと努力している。I gotta try to do my best.
ジョンは天才というより努力家だ。John is not so much a genius as a hard worker.
彼は東京へ来るたび私を訪ねてきた。He visited me every time he came up to Tokyo.
水は摂氏０度で凍る。Water freezes at 0 degrees Centigrade.彼女は２度のフライングで失格した。She was disqualified from the race for two false starts.
度を越して酒を飲むと健康を害しますよ。You will ruin your health if you drink without measure.
彼は冗談の度を過ごしてしまった。He carried a joke too far.
あいつの度胸を試してみよう。I'll put his courage to the test.

ＮＴＴは３００度数以上のテレホンカードを廃止した。NTT cancelled telephone cards with over 300 units.






農家の人達は鋤で土を耕す。Farmers turn up the soil with plows.






雨が土砂降りになった。The rain came down in buckets.

これは友人への土産です。These are gifts for my friends.
花々が土手に咲いた。Blossoms have come out on the embankment.
植物は土壌で育つ。Plants are nourished by earth.



なぜ、ムスリムの人たちは、土葬にこだわるのか。Why do Muslims place such importance on burial?


この家は土台がしっかりしている。This house has a solid foundation.
これは彼の土壇場だ。This is his eleventh hour.
この土地は池田氏の所有だ。This land belongs to Mr Ikeda.


我々はその山脈で土着のガイドを雇った。We had native guides on our trip to the mountain.







土曜に学校がありますか。Do you go to school on Saturday?
私は土曜日からここにいます。I've been here since Saturday.


寝具も土埃で汚してしまいました。Also my bedding got dirt on it.

欠点はあるけれども、彼はいい奴だ。For all his faults, he is a good fellow.新しいバイクは買えないのでこの古いやつでなんとか間に合わせなくてはならないだろう。I can't afford to buy a new bike, so I'll have to manage with this old one.やつは僕を裏切ったんだ！He stabbed me in the back!
課長は私を奴隷のように働かせた。The section chief made me work like a slave.
その猫を怒らすとひっかくよ。The cat will scratch you if you provoke it.
私の誤りは彼の怒りを招いた。My mistake incurred his anger.
その子は留守番をしなければならないと言って怒っていた。The boy was cross at having to stay at home.それをそのままにしておきなさい。そうしないと怒られますよ。Leave it as it is, or you will be scolded.
彼は怒気を顔に表した。He looked black with anger.


この人、あたしをどなりつけるんですよ！This man's shouting at me!
泣いている子を怒鳴るな。火に油だから。Don't shout at the crying child. It only adds fuel to the fire.

シート横にあるノブを前に動かし、シートを倒します。Move the knob at the side of the seat forwards, collapse the seat.そのボクサーは第１ラウンドで相手を倒すつもりだと言った。The boxer said he would knock down his opponent in the first round.

彼は横にばったり倒れた。He fell flat on the floor.彼は過労で倒れた。My father fell ill because he worked too hard.彼はいまを盛りにと言う時に倒れた。He was cut down in his prime.







「好色と倒錯の違いとは？」「好色なら羽を使うが、倒錯なら鶏をまるごと使う」"What's the difference between erotic and kinky?" "Erotic is when you use a feather and kinky is when you use a whole chicken."
その会社はまもなく倒産するだろう。The company will soon go bankrupt.




倒置法は言葉の前後を入れ替えることにより文章を強調する効果があります。Anastrophe, by switching around words, has the effect of emphasizing text.



彼女はその党の指導的任務につくことを承認した。She has consented to take the leadership of the party.彼女は根っからのコーヒー党です。She's die-hard coffee drinker.
地方の党員たちは自党に有利な形の選挙区割りをもくろんでいます。Local party members are trying to gerrymander the district.
我が党の党首は他の党首達と会見し、その問題について話をした。The leader of our party met with the other leaders and talked about the problem.


党派は二つに分裂した。The party was split up into two.



まもなく冬だ。It will be winter before long.
冬季のフロリダの気候はアイオワより穏和だ。The climate of Florida in the wintertime is milder than that of Iowa.
やがて冬休みも終わるだろう。It will not be long before the winter vacation ends.


私は前もって十分な準備もせずに冬山に登るようなばかではない。I know better than to climb mountains in winter without making all necessary preparations beforehand.

私は新しい冬物のコートを買わねばなりません。I must buy a new winter coat.


この部屋は凍えるよ、シンディー。この寒さはたえられないよ。It's freezing in this room, Cindy. I can't put up with this cold.



車が凍てついた路面を滑った時は「ひやっ」とした。It was frightful when my car skidded on the ice.



板は地面に凍りついた。The plank froze to the ground.



水は凍結すると固くなる。Water becomes solid when it freezes.私は建築を凍結した音楽と称する。I call architecture frozen music.



我々はあやうく凍死するところだった。We were nearly frozen to death.

耳が凍傷にかかりました。My ears are frostbitten.
耳がしもやけになったんだ。My ears are frostbitten.





「刀の投擲の練習？」「すっぽ抜けただけです」"Practising sword throwing?" "It just slipped out of my hands."












この包丁・・・有名な刀匠が作ったものなんです。This carving knife ... it's one made by a famous swordsmith.










とうがらしで舌がひりひりした。The chili burnt my tongue.


唐突な質問に彼は泡を食った。He was confused by a sudden question.

家からその塔が見える。I see the tower from my house.

その王は島を治めた。The king reigned over the island.


漁火が島影に瞬く。A fishing light wavers under the lee of an island.








教会が島中に建てられた。Churches were erected all over the island.







彼は大逆罪で島流しにされた。He was banished to an island for high treason.

人々は彼の突然の死を深く悼んだ。People regretted his sudden death deeply.

その子は犬に石を投げた。That child threw a stone at the dog.
月は優しい光を投げかけた。The moon cast a gentle light.
ロープが水中に投げ込まれた。A rope was thrown into the water.
この施設内でゴミの投げ捨てをすると、最高５００ドルの罰金を課せられることがあります。Littering in this facility is subject to a maximum fine of $500.
運転手は運転台からもんどり打って投げ出された。The driver was thrown from his seat head over heels.

彼は湖に石を投げ入れた。He threw a stone into the lake.



圧倒的多数がその残酷な刑罰を廃止することに票を投じた。An overwhelming majority voted to abolish the brutal punishment.

彼は投機に手を出して財産の大半を失った。He lost the greater part of his fortune in speculation.
彼の投球を見せたかったよ。I wish you could have seen him pitch.



忘れないでこの手紙を投稿しなさい。Don't forget to post this letter.



その男は殺人の疑いで投獄された。The man was imprisoned for murder.
彼は自分のお金を株に投資した。He invested his money in stocks.


その救助投手でエースの代わりはとても務まらなかった。The relief pitcher was no substitute for the ace.



敵は新兵力を投入した。The enemy flung fresh troops into the battle.
この手紙を必ず投函して下さい。Don't fail to mail this letter.
２０歳になっていれば、投票できるのに。If I were twenty, I could vote.
投票結果はもうすぐわかるだろう。The result of the poll will be known soon.
すべての人は投票権を行使すべきだ。Everyone should exercise their right to vote.
少年はその犬めがけて石を投げつけた。The boy slung a stone at the dog.

医者は患者に投薬した。The doctor administered medicine to the patient.

大容量のＲＡＭが搭載されていると、メモリ不足を示すエラーメッセージが表示される。If a very large amount of memory is installed, an 'insufficient memory' error message is displayed.
ご搭乗は６時４０分になる予定です。Boarding will be at six-forty.
出発２０分前になったら、搭乗案内のアナウンスがかかるって。They said they'd make the boarding announcement 20 minutes before takeoff.
ご搭乗のみなさんは搭乗券をご用意ください。Please have your boarding pass ready. Thank you.

名古屋は京都の東の方にある。Nagoya is to the east of Kyoto.

東アジアの経済はエネルギー価格の上昇で大きな打撃を受けた。The economies were hit hard by energy price increases.













その市はハドソン川の東岸にある。The city is on the eastern bank of the Hudson.




あなたは東京タワーを訪れましたか。Did you visit the Tokyo Tower?
東京株式市場では４５０社以上の株が店頭で取り引きされている。In the Tokyo stock market, stocks of about 450 companies are traded over the counter.
この列車は東京行きです。This train is bound for Tokyo.


東京発の００１便で来ました。I was on Flight 001 from Tokyo.


日本の子午線は東経１３５度です。Japan is on the 135th meridian East.

私の部屋は東向きです。My room faces east.








この国では東西の文化が交じり合っている。Cultures of the East and the West are mixed in this country.











ＡＳＥＡＮという文字は東南アジア諸国連合を表します。The letters ASEAN stand for the Association of Southeast Asian Nations.



我々は東部市場を開拓しようと言う気持ちが欠けている。We lack an incentive for pursuing the eastern market.
日本は中国の東方にある。Japan is to the east of China.



台風は東北地方を横断するかもしれない。The typhoon may cross the Tohoku district.

今日は借金の工面で東奔西走した。I was on the go all day today looking for a loan.


東洋の陶器に興味があります。I have an interest in oriental ceramics.

東洋人はものの見方が我々とは違う。People from the East do not look at things the same as we do.



虫に食い荒らされて桃は中空になっていた。The insect ate the peach hollow.



彼女のほおは薄く桃色に染まっていた。Her cheeks were tinged with pink.




彼は将来国家の棟梁たるべき器だ。He has the capacity to be a future leader of the nation.
盗人は今朝あげられた。The robber was nabbed this morning.
その少年は盗みをしかねない。The boy is capable of robbery.
彼はその少女を盗み見た。He stole a glance at the girl.


何冊かの本が盗まれた。A number of books were stolen.

ここでは盗賊にご用心。Watch out for thieves around here.
国会は、盗聴法案を巡ってまさに侃々諤々の体であった。Parliament members had a raucous argument over the Wiretapping Law.
ニクソンはオフィスに盗聴器をしかけておきながらシラを切ったので見付かった。Nixon was caught lying because he bugged his own office.
盗難の届をだしたいのですけど。I would like to report a theft.


泥棒は警官の裏をかいて盗品を持って逃げた。The thief outwitted the police and got away with his loot.


その走者は３塁に盗塁した。The runner stole third base.

砂糖は湯に入れると溶ける。Sugar dissolves in hot water.

薬缶から湯気が立っている。The kettle is steaming.









遠い灯台のかすかな光を見た。We saw the gleam of a distant lighthouse.


雪の多いところでは、灯油は必需品です。In places where it snows a lot, kerosene is an indispensable item.
何回か当たりはあったが針にはかからなかった。I got several bites, but could not hook a fish.その現在建設中の工場は、一日当たり3000台のビデオデッキを組み立てられる。The factory now under construction will assemble 3,000 VCR units per day.
彼は部下に当たり散らした。He damned his men right and left.
我々は彼が成功したのは当たり前だと思った。We took his success for granted.この問題はあたりまえのやり方では解決しない。You cannot solve this problem in an ordinary way.
私は顔に冷たい風が当たるのを感じた。I felt a cold wind on my face.彼は発砲したが当たらなかった。He fired but missed.日本の桜はまさにイギリスのバラにあたる。The cherry blossom is to Japan what the rose is to England.
あの人達の助力はあてにできないよ。You can't count on their help.その手紙は私宛に来た。The letter is for me.ここにあなたあての手紙が何通かあります。Here are some letters for you.


かろうじて車に当てられずにすんだ。I narrowly escaped being hit by a car.この薬品は日光に当てないようにしなさい。Don't expose this chemical to direct sunlight.その金は体育館の建設に当てられた。The money was appropriated for building the gymnasium.
彼は戦争が早々と終わるとあてこんでいた。He gambled on the war coming to an early end.
彼の当てこすりはかんにさわる。His sarcasm galls me.




この規則は１年生には当てはまらない。This rule doesn't apply to first-year students.
当のその少年は今日学校に来なかった。The boy in question did not come to school today.
どんな質問が飛び出すか分からないから、僕としては当意即妙で発表するしかないな。Since I don't know what questions I'll be asked, I'll have to wing it at my presentation.






こんにちは。ようこそ当機へいらっしゃいませ。ごきげんいかがですか。Hi! Thanks for flying with us. How are you today?
この建物に入るには当局の許可を得る必要がある。It is necessary to obtain the sanction of the authorities to enter this building.

当座のところ、僕は叔父の家に泊めてもらっているが、将来小さなアパートに移るつもりだ。I am staying with my uncle for the time being, but later I will move to a small apartment.この小切手を銀行の当座に入れなさい。Deposit this check in my checking account.


彼は両当事者の間を調停した。He mediated between the two parties.
我々はその当時よく放課後に野球をしたものだった。We would play baseball after school in those days.
当社には貴社のシステムに対するニーズがありません。Your system isn't suited to our company's needs.
その会合は当初の予定どおりに開催された。The meeting was held as intended at the outset.当初抗議する人はほんのわずかだったが、今やそこらじゅうから湧き起こっている。At first only a few people protested, but now they're all coming out of the woodwork.
当人のいないところで悪口を言うべきでない。You shouldn't speak ill of a man behind his back.





私が投票した候補者は当選した。The candidate whom I cast a vote for was elected.
彼が息子の自慢をするのは当然だ。It is only natural that he be proud of his son.ボルボ衝突したので、うちの車の方が当然ひどい目にあった。In the collision with a Volvo, our car naturally got the worst of it.
当店にはいろいろな種類の本がございます。We have a wide choice of books.
彼は当日借り着をした。He rented the garment for the day.
先月の日直当番全部私に押し付けた形でエスケープした野郎だ。He's the pest that, on last month's class-help day, escaped leaving me with all the work.
これで当分は間に合うでしょう。This will do for the time being.
お尋ねの権利は、当方には属しておりません。The rights you requested do not belong to us.
そのプロジェクトはよく計画されていて興味深いが、当面の利益には大した結果をもたらさないと見られている。The project is well-planned and interesting, but its immediate impact on the bottom line is not considered substantial.現在我々が当面している問題は新しいものではない。The problem before us today is not a new one.当面は彼に調子を合わせておいたほうがいいぞ。You should play along with him for the time being.


その問題は大衆を当惑させた。The problem puzzled the public.



１ヤードは３フィートに等しい。A yard is equal to three feet.彼の依頼は命令に等しかった。His request was equivalent to an order.






１ドルは現在１１０円と等価である。One dollar is equivalent to 110 yen.










この線を２０等分せよ。Divide this line into twenty equal parts.

キャロルは拒絶した。言い換えると、彼女の答えは「ノー」だった。Carol refused; in other words her answer was "no."彼女の答えは間違っていた。Her answer was incorrect.
「はい、ありません」とジョーダンさんは答えた。"No, I don't," said Mr Jordan.
時間です。答案を出して下さい。Time is up. Hand in your papers.
陪審員は有罪の判決を答申した。The jury has returned a verdict of guilty.
首相の答弁は玉虫色だった。The prime minister's answer was equivocal.



今まで、一度、糖が出たことがありますが、今回は蛋白のみでした。Until now sugar had been detected in my urine once, however this time there is only albumin.


彼は糖尿病のどんな兆しにも注意していた。He was watchful for any sign of diabetes.
私は、糖分のあるものは食べてはいけないのです。I shouldn't eat food that has sugar in it.

スコットランドとイングランドの統一は１７０６年に行われた。The union of Scotland and England took place in 1706.
国務長官は対外関係を統括する。The Secretary of State administers foreign affairs.

中国のＧＤＰ統計はオオカミ少年か。Are the Chinese GDP figures a case of the boy crying wolf?
統計学は事実を表す数を取り扱うものである。Statistics deals with collected numbers representing facts.
この種の事例は統計的処理が適応できる。This kind of case is amenable to statistical treatment.


天皇は国民の統合の象徴である。The Emperor is the symbol of the unity of the people.この驚くほどの増加は、同じ期間の間に起こった急速な経済面での統合によって可能となった。This extraordinary increase is explained by the speedy economic unification which took place during the same period.


かつてサルタンが今日のトルコを統治していた。Once the Sultan ruled over what today is Turkey.

その国では政府が物価を統制している。In that country the government controls prices.

船長は船と乗組員を統率する。A captain controls his ship and its crew.
彼は目標に到達しようと努力している。He endeavors to attain his goal.
その列車は予定どおりに到着した。The train arrived on schedule.
あなたの話は到底真実だと思えない。I can't possibly think your story is true.
とうとう、良い考えが浮かんだ。At last a good idea struck me.
黒雲は雷雨の到来を告げていた。Black clouds announced the coming thunderstorm.




その問題が彼らによって討議されています。They are discussing the problem.

私たちはとても活発な討論をした。We had a very vigorous debate.




飲む分だけ豆をローストして、ミルで挽くんです。We roast just enough beans for the amount we're going to drink, and grind them in the coffee mill.

突然の昇進の発表で、彼、鳩が豆鉄砲を食らったような顔をしていたよ。He looked blank when he heard the announcement of his promotion.

悪いけどお豆腐買ってきてくれない？I really shouldn't ask, but could you go get some tofu for me?


ビタミンＥを豊富に含む食物には、濃い緑色をした菜っ葉類・豆類・ナッツ類・全粒穀類がある。Foods rich in vitamin E include dark-green, leafy vegetables, beans, nuts and whole-grain cereals.
この段階を踏まえ、抑圧という概念をさらに詳細に検証していくことになります。From this point we go on to an even more detailed examination of the concept of repression.
彼のしたことはひとの道を踏み外したものだ。What he did was against humanity.
それで雪を踏み固めてブロックを作り、それを積むような方法が適しているんですね。And so the method that works is treading down the snow to harden it, making blocks and piling them up.
いたずらっ子にすっかり花壇を踏み荒らした。My flower garden was trampled by urchins.
君子が恐れて踏み込まぬ所へも愚者は突入する。Fools rush in where angels fear to tread.詳しいことが全部わかるまでは、あわててその場にふみこむな。見当がつくまでは、慎重にかまえておれ。Don't rush into the situation until you have all the details; hold your horses until you know where you are going.

一歩踏み出せば半分終わったも同じ。The first step is as good as half over.
彼は火を踏み消した。He stamped out a fire.
彼は多くの希望と不安を抱いて結婚にふみきった。He embarked on his marriage with many hopes and fears.


伝説によれば、その森には幽霊が出たので、誰も足を踏み入れようとしなかったそうだ。According to legend, ghosts would appear in that forest, so people would not set foot there.

彼は床を踏みぬいた。He put his foot through the floor.

その条約が踏みにじられて戦争が起こった。War broke out when the treaty was ignored.
その男は私の足を踏んだのにわびることさえしなかった。The man did not so much as apologize for stepping on my foot.彼女が初舞台を踏んだのは1969年であった。Her first appearance on the stage was in 1969.何をするにも順序を踏んでやりなさい。No matter what you do, you must follow the correct order.
群衆に押されないよう力を入れて踏ん張った。I braced myself against the crowd.土壇場で踏ん張ってその契約を勝ち取らない限り、我々は破産も同然だ。If we don't make a last ditch stand at winning that contract, we may very well go under.
どうせまたふんぞり返って威張っているだけなのだから。As he's just up on his high horse again.

こんなにすばらしい機会を逃がしてはいけない。You mustn't miss such a good opportunity.
囚人が牢獄から逃げた。A convict has escaped from prison.警官を見て泥棒たちは逃げた。At the sight of the policemen the thieves ran away.現実から逃げることはできない。You can't escape from reality.


彼らは銃でねらわれ豚のように逃げ回る。They run like pigs from a gun.
その猫は部屋の中へ逃げ込んだ。The cat ran away into the room.

その男は町から逃げ出した。The man got away from the city.



この好機を逃すな。Don't let this chance slip by.
人間は死をのがれられない。Man is unable to escape death.
少年がいくらかお金を持って逃走した。A boy made off with some money.
前のやっていることは現実からの逃避に過ぎない。All you're doing is trying to escape reality.
その少年たちは逃亡を試みたが失敗した。The boy attempted an escape, but failed.
警察は、逃亡者を追跡している。The police are in pursuit of the runaway.

煉瓦の壁は透かして見ることはできない。One can't see through a brick wall.


レースのカーテンから透けて見えた世界は暗かった。The world seen through the lace curtain was dark.





この透明な液体には毒が含まれている。This transparent liquid contains poison.

陶器は火で焼かれた。The pottery was baked by fire.
土曜日、去年から通い始めた陶芸教室。Saturday is the pottery class I've been attending since last year.
その陶芸家は腕が落ちた。The potter's lost his cunning.


その陶磁器は特別な棚に陳列されていた。The china was displayed in a special cabinet.


鹿は１頭だけで走っていた。The deer was running by itself.
あの老人は頭がおかしいにちがいない。That old man must be off his rock.

これは頭にくる。This is making me really angry.




頭韻の例を収集するために、シェークスピア・コンコーダンスを調べた。We studied the Concordance to Shakespeare to accumulate examples of alliteration.
調べを進めるうちに、頭蓋骨が、何か重い一撃を受けて打ち砕かれているのが明らかになった。Closer examination revealed that the skull had been crushed by some heavy blow.

その会社はコンピューター業界で頭角を現した。The company has cut a figure in the computer industry.


修道士のように頭巾をかぶった雲は、ポツリポツリと落ちる雨を数珠のようにつまぐっている。The hooded clouds, like friars, tell their beads in drops of rain.
お金を貯めて頭金を作れますか。Can you save enough money for the down payment?

彼は銀行の頭取だ。He's the president of the bank.
飛行機が、頭上を飛んでいる。An airplane is flying overhead.

今日は少し頭痛がする。I have a slight headache today.
二人の頭脳は一人の頭脳に勝る。Two heads are better than one.
ぐはっ！？俺の貴重な頭髪を、むしるな！O-oi!? Don't rip off my precious hair!
頭皮がかゆいのです。My scalp is very itchy.
その首と頭部はとてもやわらかかった。Its neck and head were very soft.
頭文字のＮＴＴは何を表していますか。What do the initials NTT stand for?「あなたはたしか・・・えーと、えーと・・・も」「頭文字から間違っとるわい！！」"Let's see, you're ... er, um ... M-" "You're wrong from the first letter!!"






彼は闘牛を見たかったが、父はどうしても彼を行かせようとはしなかった。He wanted to see a bullfight, but his father wouldn't let him go.
彼は闘争本能が強い。He is possessed of a strong fighting instinct.闘争は満足の行ったことに和解に終わった。The struggle ended in a satisfactory settlement.
あなたの働きに応じて賃金が支払われる。You will be paid according to your work.心臓の働きは血液を送り出す事である。The function of the heart is to pump blood.
ケイトから見ると、彼は働き過ぎである。From Kate's point of view, he works too much.
彼の気持ちを変えさせるよう、彼に働きかけねばならない。He must be worked upon so that his feeling may be made to change.
コンピューター産業ではいろいろな働き口がある。There are many jobs available in the computer industry.
若いときは、彼は働き者であった。He was a hard worker in his youth.
彼の働き振りに満足されると思います。You will be very pleased by how he performs.

彼は働き盛りだ。He is in the prime of life.



彼は５時間以上もぶっ続けで働いた。He worked more than five hours on end.スイッチは時間通りに働かなかった。The switch didn't work on time.
私たちはスペリオル湖まで景色のよい自動車動をドライブした。We went for a scenic drive as far as Lake Superior.
ここからあそこへこの石を動かして下さい。Please move this stone from here to there.音楽は気持ちを動かします。Music moves the feelings.私たちがエンジンを動かせるかどうかは疑わしい。It is doubtful if we can get the engine working.
愛の動きは不可解。Love moves in mysterious ways.
ウェイトレスは客たちに給仕するのにせわしく動き回った。The waitress bustled about serving the customers.
私は家の中で何かが動くのを感じた。I felt something move in the house.まだ動くうちに売ってしまわなきゃ。I should sell it while it still runs.
彼女は常に批判に動じない。She is always immune to criticism.








あの人の動機が信用できなかった。I was distrustful of his motives.
この動議に賛成ですか。Are you in favor of this motion?
彼は金融アナリストで経済動向の分析には定評がある。He's a financial analyst with a pretty good reputation for his analysis of economic trends.

彼は動作がぎこちない。He is awkward in his movements.福祉予算を犠牲にして打ち上げられた人工衛星は、正常に動作しなかった。The artificial satellite launched at the cost of the welfare budget did not work properly.


この動詞の変化を言えますか。Can you conjugate this verb?


破壊の結果、毎日５０種類もの野生の動植物が消滅していると見積もられている。It has been estimated that, as a result of the destruction, fifty species of wildlife are disappearing from the earth each day.




その出来事が彼を動転させた。The incident upset him.
私はその動物の名前を知っている。I know the name of this animal.

コンドルは動物園では決して育たない。Condors have never bred in zoos.

天候は、世界の至る所で、植物界と下等動物界の間の複雑な調和状態に影響を与えている。To this extent, it has the characteristics of a great complicated balance between plant life and lower forms of animal life.
動物学は動物の研究を扱う。Zoology deals with the study of animal life.










このニュースを聞いて非常に動揺した。I was profoundly disturbed by this news.


そのボートは動力にモーターを使用している。The boat uses a motor for the power.






英語はドイツ語と同語族である。The English language is cognate to the German language.
君と僕とは同い年だ。You and I are the same age.
ジャズが使う音符は、バッハが使ったのと同じだJazz uses the same notes that Bach used.
私は空を飛べないのと同じく泳ぐこともできない。I can no more swim than I can fly.
彼女はあなたが持っているのと同じようなかばんを持っている。She has the same bag as you have.

君と僕とは同じ年だ。You and I are the same age.




ボブはその計画に同意しなかった。Bob did not agree to the plan.

あなたも同意見だと推測します。I gather you'll agree with me.
「車」は「自動車」の同意語です。"Car" is a synonym of "automobile".

これは私が先日なくしたのと同一の鉛筆である。This is the same pencil that I lost the other day.
ナショナリズムをファシズムと同一視してはいけない。You can't equate nationalism with fascism.


air と heir は同音異義語である。"Air" and "heir" are homophones.

ある程度は新しい環境に同化しなくてはなりません。You must assimilate into new surroundings.




マイクは高校二年生でアンも同学年だ。Mike is in the second year of high school and Ann is too.
全く同感です。I couldn't agree with you more.
同期の人間の売上があがってきたから、俺もウカウカしてられないな。When one of my coworkers starts racking up good sales figures I can't let down my guard.








私たちは当時は同級生だった。We were in the same class then.
キムはケンと同居している。Kim is living with Ken.


同業他社に比べて業績がずっと良かった。Business results of the company were much better than other companies in the industry.
なぜ、ライバルの同業者にまでも公開しているのか。Why do you make it open even to rivals in the same trade?






１月の輸出は１００億ドルと、同月としては最高記録になった。Exports in January totalled $10 billion, a record for the month.
彼は私の同権についての発言を問題にした。He took me up on my remarks about equal rights.








娘は母親に同行して欲しいと頼んだ。The girl begged her mother to accompany her.

あと数社の企業が同国の利益の高いペットフード市場に参入をねらっている。Several more companies are moving to enter the lucrative pet food market of the country.



１０代の友だち同士が徹夜でおしゃべりした。The teenage friends stayed up talking all night.
彼らは同志である。They are in the same camp.









二人の走者は同時に決勝線に着いた。The two runners reached the finish line at the same time.駅に着くと同時に彼女は母に電話した。The moment she arrived at the station, she phoned her mother.スポーツの逆説はスポーツが人を分けると同時に結びつけることだ。The paradox of sport is that it bonds as it divides.
スコットはバイロンと同時代の人であった。Scott was a contemporary of Byron.






気候の違いのため、同種の穀物が国の北部、東部においては収穫されていない。Because of the difference in climate, the same grains are not cultivated in both the northern and the eastern parts of the country.






同書を一部ご寄贈いただければ幸いに存じます。I would very much appreciate receiving a copy of the book.



彼のことを同情せずにはいられない。I cannot but feel sorry for him.

その男には同情心といった人間的感情はなかった。The man was devoid of such human feelings as sympathy.









そのクラスは１５人の男子と同数の女子から構成されていた。The class was made up of 15 boys and as many girls.


彼女は同性の間では評判がよい。She is well spoken of among her own sex.

二人は結婚する前に二年間同棲した。They lived together for two years before they got married.
彼とは夕食会で同席した。I once sat at the same table with him at a dinner party.



彼の助言は命令も同然だ。His advice amounts to an order.あいつは盗人も同然だ。He is no better than a thief.




同窓会の日取りを決めた。We fixed the date for our class reunion.
私たちは同窓生です。We were at school together.
ウサギはビーバーやリスと同族です。Rabbits are related to beavers and squirrels.









その計画では彼に同調できました。We went with him on that plan.


私は知力では彼と同程度だ。I'm on a par with him in mental faculties.



１メートルは１ヤードとは完全に同等ではない。A meter is not quite equivalent to a yard.
それでは、みなさまも呼んでくるように言いつかってありますのでご同道くださいませ。In which case, I was also requested to invite all of you so if you would please accompany me...
同日にアポロ１１号が月面着陸に成功した。On the same day, Apollo 11 succeeded in landing on the moon's surface.
ウエスト教授は私の父とほとんど同年です。Professor West is almost as old as my father.


彼は同輩に相当受けがよい。He enjoys considerable standing among his peers.
彼は妻を同伴していた。He was accompanied by his wife.






彼女は小切手を同封して私に送ってくれた。She sent me the enclosed check.










彼と私は同名異人です。He is my namesake, but no relation.

同盟軍はバグダッドの検問所で彼女の車を襲撃した。The coalition force fired at her car at the checkpoint in Baghdad.
ドイツはかつてイタリアと同盟国であった。Germany was once allied with Italy.






この車は新車同様だ。This car is like new.
あなたと同様に彼も大変親切だ。You and he are both very kind.

私の同僚は報告書を改ざんした。My colleague doctored the report.
石炭は化学的にダイヤと同類である。Coal is chemically allied to diamonds.



まず最初の議題は今朝の同衾騒動の件について。Starting off, first on the agenda is about this morning's two-in-a-bed ruckus.

彼の踊りは堂に入ってる。His dance is excellent.

この実験の結果、要素Ｔが構造全体を決定しているという推定が導き出される。The result of this experiment leads to our presumption that element T determines the entire structure.
彼女は老人を部屋に導いた。She led the old man into the room.このことから、大規模な人口移動は経済変化の結果ではないという議論を導くことができる。From this we can derive the argument that major population shifts are not the result of economic change.
導火線はすぐ火がついた。The fuse lit at once.









いまだにインターネットの導入を検討している会社がある。Some companies are still debating whether to get Internet access.
彼は彼女の恵まれた才能にあこがれを抱いた。He longed for her talented skills.
あの人達は都会の生活にあこがれている。They are longing for city life.




これは私が洞窟の中で見つけたものです。This is what I found in the cave.
その洞穴はその少年たちによって発見されたのですか。Was the cave found by the boys?
この詩は読者の大いなる洞察を必要としている。This poem calls for great insight from the reader.
瞳は日のあたる所では収縮する。The pupils of the eyes contract in sunlight.あなたの瞳に、吸い込まれそう！I feel like I'm being drawn into your eyes.






童心にかえってもう一度やり直しましょう。I will mentally return to childhood and do it all over again.
どーお？童貞卒業した翌朝は気分爽快？So? Feeling refreshed, the morning after graduating from virginity?
あなたは童謡のレコードのセットをさがしているそうですね。I understand you're looking for a record album of nursery rhymes.
あなたはこの童話を一人で書いたのですか。Did you write this fairy tale by yourself?
ダックスフントは、非常に長い胴と短い足をしたドイツ犬である。A dachshund is a dog from Germany with a very long body and short legs.



それは女性の頭、ライオンの胴体、鳥の翼とヘビの尾を持っていた。It had the head of a woman, the body of a lion, the wings of a bird, and the tail of a serpent.

道は急斜面をジグザグにのぼっていた。The path zigzagged up the steep slope.人生は重い荷を背負って遠い道を行くようなものだ。One's life is like going far with a burden on one's back.


そこまでだいぶ道のりがあります。You have to walk a long way to get there.近代医学の進歩は長い道程を歩んだ。The advancement of modern medicine was a long process.
道化の妙技は少年達にとってとても楽しかった。The clown's stunts were highly amusing to the boys.

研究というほどでも・・・素人の道楽ですよ、おはずかしい。It can hardly be called research... just an amateur's hobby, I'm ashamed to say.
医師が患者の秘密を漏らすのは道義にもとる。It is not ethical for a doctor to reveal confidences.

鉄道の道筋を決めるのは一体何だろうか。What is it that determines the route a railway takes?
この道具はなんの役にもたたない。This tool is good for nothing.




偶然、私は道端で彼女に会った。By chance, I met her in the street.
この学校は生徒達に高度な道徳水準を課する。This school sets high moral standards for pupils.

どうしてお前は道理に従おうとしないのか。Why will you not listen to reason?
道理で、君が喜ぶわけだ。No wonder you are so happy.
彼らは旅の道連れだった。They were companions on the journey.
その崖は道路の上に突き出ている。The cliff hangs over the road.
大規模な道路工事が始まった。Large-scale road construction began.



オリンピックでは金メダルが１位、銀メダルが２位、銅メダルが３位だ。In Olympic competitions, a gold medal is for first place, a silver medal for second, and a bronze medal is for third place.
ここの数枚の銅貨がある。Here are a few coppers.


その銅像を遠くから見るとかなり素敵に見えます。The bronze statue looks quite nice from a distance.


食事のドラが鳴ると部屋はからになった。The room emptied when the gong for dinner sounded.
私達が峠にさしかかる頃に雨になった。It began to rain as we came near the pass.
ブームは峠を越した。The boom has peaked out.


彼は友人を警察からかくまった。He hid his friend from the police.
彼は匿名で赤十字に多額のお金を寄付した。He anonymously donated a large sum of money to the Red Cross.

礼儀正しくすると得である。It pays to be polite.
１５年間は満足しうる取り決めであった。It was a satisfactory arrangement for fifteen years.彼との交際で得るところが多かった。I benefited much from my association with him.
彼は彼の洞察力を得意に思っている。He congratulates himself on his foresight.あなたは数学が得意ですか。Are you good at mathematics?
彼女は宝石を得意げに見せびらかした。She proudly displayed her jewels.
その会社は将来お得意先になりそうな人々をパーティーに招待した。The company invited their prospective customers to the party.
彼が行くのが得策だ。It is advisable for him to go.
誰にでも得手不得手がある。Everyone has their own strong and weak points.



ハーフタイムでの得点はどうでしたか。What was the score at halftime?
いまどき良い仕事はなかなか得がたいのを忘れないでね。Don't forget that good jobs are very hard to come by these days.






私は音楽、特にロックが大好きだ。I love music, especially rock.

マイヤーとその同僚の研究は特異なものだった。The study by Meyer and his colleagues was unusual.





時計がおくれていたので、私は特急にのりそこねた。As my watch was slow, I missed the special express.

彼らはりんごを大きさで特級別にした。They graded apples according to their size.


特許権は重要な財産権である。A patent right is an important property right.





彼は特権を乱用したに違いない。He must have abused the privilege.







笑いは人間だけの特質なのか。Is laughter a quality of man only?










次号では離婚について特集します。The next issue will feature articles on divorce.

日本には多くのはっきりとした特色がある。Japan has many distinctive traits.
ブタはある特性を人間と共有している。Pigs share certain characteristics with human beings.
私の特製うさぎシチューです。It's my special recipe, rabbit stew.

試験に通ったよ。それで、特待生になるんだ。I passed the examination, and I'm going to be an honor student.
特大のサイズはあるんですが、その色のは切らしております。We have the extra-large size, but not in that color.

毛深いまゆ毛が彼の顔の特徴だった。His bushy brows accented his face.


燃料の節約がこの自動車の大きな特長だ。Fuel economy is a big advantage of this car.
別に特定の人をさして言っているのではない。I am not alluding to any person in particular.鑑識班は今日の火事の原因を特定しようとしている。Investigators are trying to pin down the cause of today's fire.
こういう特典に対して私達はどんな代償を支払わなければならないのか。What price do we have to pay for these advantages?

その特派員はモスクワから記事を送った。The correspondent filed a report from Moscow.
きのうは和牛が特売だった。Japanese beef was on sale yesterday.


特別価格の見積りです。We have quoted special prices.








この習慣は日本に特有のものである。This custom is peculiar to Japan.




彼はとても若くして頭がはげ始めた。He started going bald quite young.
ハゲタカが突っつく死んだ鹿とか、他の動物の食べ残しとか、 そういう腐った肉を死肉と書きました。A dead deer being pecked by vultures, remains partly eaten by other animals, that sort of rotten meat is called 'carrion'.




この魚は毒がない。This fish is free from poison.



彼は妻を毒殺したと言われている。He is alleged to have poisoned his wife.

それは毒性のある化学物質が含まれていた。It contained harmful chemicals.
彼は私に毒舌を浴びせた。He showered abuse on me.



泥棒が見つかって警官に毒づいた。The thief cursed the police for finding him.
正しく使用されると、ある毒物は有用だとわかるだろう。Properly used, certain poisons will prove beneficial.

ろうそくはひとりでに消えた。The candle went out of itself.
私は彼がぶつぶつ独り言をいうのを聞いた。I heard him mumble to himself.


もう独り立ちすべき時だよ。It's time you stood on your own two feet.

父の死後彼は独学しなければならなかった。After his father died, he had to study by himself.
こまはぐるぐる回転した。The top went around and around.







どの民族も独自の神話を持っている。Every nation has its own myths.

私はギターの弾き方を独習した。I've taught myself to play the guitar.

彼は一生独身で過ごした。He remained single all his life.

彼は独占に反対していた。He was opposed to monopolies.女の子が父親の愛情を独占したいと思い、母親を競争者とみなしがちであった。The girl wanted to monopolize her father's affection and tended to view her mother as a competitor.





ノスタルジックな感じがたまらなく好きな人もいるし、独創性を愛する人もいる。There are people who go mad for the nostalgic feel and also those who love originality.

彼は独創的な考えをたくさん持っています。He has a lot of original ideas.
私はいま彼の独奏をきいている。I am listening to his recital.

ヤンキースは優勝へ独走態勢を整えている。The Yankees are running away with the pennant race.

ナチズムはドイツ独特のものでしたか。Was Nazism peculiar to Germany?
囚人は今日は独房の中で静かにしている。The prisoner is being quiet in the cell today.

彼女は両親から独立している。She is independent of her parents.インドは英国から１９４７年に独立した。India gained independence from Britain in 1947.頑固になればなるほど独立するよ。The more stubborn you are, the more isolated you become.

私は独立記念日にはいつもここに来るの。I come here every Fourth of July.






この厚い本は１週間では読み終えられない。I cannot finish reading this thick book in a week.





ページが読み込まれたら更新情報をページ内に流し込む　prototype.jsprototype.js - inserts update information into the page when the page is loaded.
言外の意味を読み取るならば、この手紙はお金の無心です。If you read between the lines, this letter is a request for money.

部屋に入るとすぐに彼女は手紙を読み出した。On entering her room, she began to read the letter.
全ての少年少女は読み書きを教えられる。Every boy and girl is taught to read and write.
私は彼らに向かってそれを読み上げる以外に仕方がなかった。I had no choice but to read it out to them.
彼は読み切れないほどたくさん本を持っている。He has more books than he can read.

答案を提出する前にもう一度読み直しなさい。Read your paper over again before you hand it in.

彼女はその手紙を何度も何度も読み返した。She read the letter over and over again.
私は彼の名前の読み方がわからない。I don't know how to pronounce his name.私たちは英語の読み方を学びました。We learned how to read English.我々の先祖は星の読み方を知っていた。Our ancestors knew how to read the stars.
私は１行読み落としていた。I have left out one line in reading.

ミルトンの作品を読んだことがありますか。Have you ever read Milton's works?彼女の心の動きを読むことさえできなかった。I could not even make a guess at the working of her mind.私の頭は楽譜を読むようにはよく慣らされて居りますが、どうも暗号を読むには適しません。My mind is quite accustomed to reading music, but deciphering secret codes is not its forte.



あの本の読者たちは自分のことをインテリだと思っている。The readers of that book think themselves sophisticated.

読書の暇がない。I have no leisure for reading.



その本を読破しようとしたが、不可能だとわかった。I tried to read through the book, which I found impossible.


















彼はミートボールにフォークを突き刺した。He stuck a meatball with his fork.
バレーボールをしていて突き指をしました。I sprained my finger while playing volleyball.
ホームページに住所を書いたら、その気になれば誰でもあなたの居所を突き止められる。If you write your address on a web-page, anybody can find out where you live if the whim takes them.
そこでは岬が海に突き出している。There a cape pushes out into the sea.

その崖は道路の上に突き出ている。The cliff hangs over the road.

その手を空へ突き上げろ。Raise your hand to the sky.
我々はしゃにむに突き進んだ。We pressed on, regardless.



次の通りのつきあたりに私達の家があります。You'll find our house at the end of the next street.
急いだあまり私はだれか人に突き当たった。In my hurry I bumped into someone.

群衆は統制が効かなくなってフェンスを突き破った。The crowd got out of control and broke through the fence.

そのくぎは壁を突きぬけていた。The nail went through the wall.

その泥棒は少年にナイフを突きつけようとした。The robber tried to plunge the knife into the boy.

彼女は幸福の絶頂から不幸のどん底へ突き落とされた。She was dropped from the height of happiness into the depth of misery.

針で親指を突いてしまった。I pricked my thumb with a needle.テーブルにひじを突くのはやめなさい。Stop resting your elbows on the table.
藪をつついてヘビを出す。It's not good to wake a sleeping snake.きつつきは、長く尖ったくちばしで、木の幹をつついて、中にいる虫を食べます。Woodpeckers peck tree trunks with their long pointed beaks and eat insects found there.

下駄を突っかけて表に飛び出した。I slipped on my geta and dashed outside.

１人少年が両手をポケットにつっこんで歩いていた。A boy was walking with his hands in his pockets.私たちはそのまま洞窟の口にボートで突っ込んで行きました。We plunged into the cave opening on our boat and continued on.彼は古代史の分野で突っ込んだ研究をしている。He's doing in-depth research on ancient history.
違反のスピードを出して、突っ走っていた車がブレーキをかけたが、空回りして、運転手があっというまもなく、トラックの背後に、もろにぶつかった。The speeding vehicle skidded and crashed head-on into the rear-end of a truck before the driver could say Jack Robinson.
ハゲタカが突っつく死んだ鹿とか、他の動物の食べ残しとか、 そういう腐った肉を死肉と書きました。A dead deer being pecked by vultures, remains partly eaten by other animals, that sort of rotten meat is called 'carrion'.






彼らは母親めがけて突進した。They rushed towards their mother.
すべて突然起こった。Everything happened all at once.
私は突然死んだ母を思い出した。I remembered my mother, who died suddenly.


警察がバーに突入した。The police charged into the bar.
トムの怒りは突如燃え上がった。Tom's anger blazed out suddenly.
アメリカの対外債務は５０００億ドルを突破しましたよ。America's foreign debt shot past $500 billion.

その突発について不必要に心配する必要はない。There is no need to be unnecessarily anxious about the outbreak.

君の行動は突飛すぎるよ。Your behavior is too extraordinary.




彼女の声は騒音でよく届かなかった。Her voice did not carry well over the noise.姉の髪は肩まで届きます。My sister's hair reaches to her shoulders.私あての手紙は届いていますか？Have any letters arrived for me?
家に届けていただけますか。Can you deliver it to my house?私は車が盗まれたことを警察に届けた。I reported the theft of my car to the police.


届け出なしに路上に出店してはならない。You may not set up a roadside stall without prior notice.







この橋は重さ１０トンしか支えられません。This bridge bears only ten tons.






豚に真珠とはまさにこのことだ。This is like casting pearls before swine.

この部屋はまるで豚小屋だな。This room looks like a pigsty.

そんなわけでダチョウの肉は牛肉や豚肉の２倍以上の値段となる。That's why ostrich meat costs more than twice as much as beef and pork.




私の祖父は耳が遠いので、よくトンチンカンな返事をする。My grandfather, being hard of hearing, often makes an irrelevant answer.





突然、空が曇ってきた。All of a sudden, it became cloudy.今日は曇っている。It is cloudy today.蒸気でメガネが曇ってしまった。The steam has fogged my glasses.
曇天の日は晴天のときより音がよく聞こえるのです。On cloudy days, you can hear distant sounds better than in clear weather.


概してエリート達は批判に対して鈍感である。On the whole, the elite are not sensitive to criticism.





ここに鈍痛があります。I have a dull ache here.


奈落の底には抜け道はなく。I feel there is just no way out.



エイズが私が生きているうちに治ることを願っているよ。I have a dream that AIDS will be cured in my lifetime.あの少年は店から店を歩いているうちに盗み癖がでてしまった。The young boy got sticky fingers when he walked into stores.私の息子二人のうち、一人は教師で、もう一人は医者です。One of my sons is a teacher, and the other is a doctor.
今後は、新事業創造による経済の活性化という観点から、国民のコンセンサスに基づいた早急な内圧型規制緩和が推進されなければなるまい。Therefore, they cannot catalyze deregulation without "external pressure".








内科はどこですか。Where is the Internal Medicine Department?
この薬を飲む前には内科医の意見を聞くべきだ。You should ask a physician for his advice before taking this medicine.






内閣は辞職するそうだ。They say the Cabinet will resign.


安倍内閣は、第９０代の内閣総理大臣に指名された安倍晋三が２００６年９月２６日に発足させた内閣である。The Abe Cabinet is the Cabinet inaugurated on September 26, 2006 by Shinzo Abe, who was appointed as Japan's 90th Prime Minister.







その内気な少年はぼそぼそと自分の名前をつぶやいた。The shy boy murmured his name.






５０＄の内金をお願いします。We'd like a deposit of $50.

















言葉の世界では想像力は自然に内在する力の一つである。In the world of words, the imagination is one of the forces of nature.




アブミ骨は内耳の前庭窓に接している。The stirrup rests on the oval window of the inner ear.











内出血している気がするのですが。I'm afraid I have internal bleeding.
みんなで何内緒話してるのよ。私も仲間に入れて。Hey, what's the big secret? Come on; let me in on it.



彼女は内緒で私にその話をした。She told me the story in confidence.


政治家は決して内心を見せない。Politicians never tell us their inner thoughts.
サボったりしたら・・・、内申に響いてもおかしくないと思いませんか？If you cut class or something...it wouldn't surprise you if it showed up on your report card, would it?



その省は内政問題の行政をつかさどる。The ministry administers the internal affairs.
その国はわが国に内政干渉をした。That country intervened in the internal affairs of our nation.


多くの国々で内戦が起きている。Civil wars are occurring in many countries.
内線２１４に出る人なら誰でも構いません。I'll speak to anyone at extension 214.







家の内装をして休日を過ごした。I spent the holidays decorating the house.
胃は内臓の一つである。The stomach is one of the internal organs.


ドアは内側から鍵がかかっていた。The door was locked from within.














その会社に就職が内定した。It has been unofficially decided that I will be employed by the company.

内弟子とは師と寝食をともにし、あらゆる武術のノウハウと秘伝を伝える制度だ。Apprenticeship is a system where you eat, sleep and live with your master and are taught various martial arts know-how and secrets.
デネットの著作の中心的主張は、端的に言えば、内的精神状態の存在を否定するということである。The main point of Dennett's book, in short, is to deny the existence of inner mental states.







この図解は地球の深い内部を示している。The illustration shows the deep interior.




外用のみに使用し、内服しないで下さい。For external use only, do not ingest.







内弁慶は誰でもできる。Every cock crows on his own dunghill.





子宮内膜炎は、細菌が子宮内に入り、内膜に炎症を起す病気である。Endometritis is a disease where bacteria enter the uterus and cause inflammation of the inner membrane.
この情報は内密にしてください。Keep this information under your hat.





内面の欠点はきっと外面に現れるものだ。The inside defects never fail to express themselves outwardly.






内訳はどのようにしましょう？How would you like these items?



仮の議事内容を送付しました。Attached is the tentative agenda.





イングランドはかつて内乱で分裂したことがあった。England was once torn by civil war.







その浮気は内輪の秘密だ。That love affair is a family secret.
彼らは内輪げんかを始めた。They began to quarrel among themselves.








彼女は身振りを交えながら演説した。She accompanied her speech with gestures.あれほど金を持ちながら彼は幸福でない。For all his wealth, he is not happy.
嵐の後には凪が来る。After a storm comes a calm.
風が凪いだ。The wind has fallen.
あらしでその村はなぎ倒された。The storm laid the village flat.

このなぞの答えを考えつきますか。Can you guess this riddle?


ここに手のないナベがある。Here is a pan without handles.
この鍋物はえぐいよ。This stew tastes acrid.



彼は私の妻になれなれしすぎだ。He is getting far too familiar with my wife.

あの人はこの店の長年の馴染み客です。He's been a patron of this store for many years.
彼は新しい学校での生活になかなかなじめなかった。He found it very difficult to adjust himself to life in the new school.
彼は縄で木に縛り付けられた。He was tied to the tree with a rope.
アメリカでは女の子にはなわとびが人気がある。In the United States it is popular for girls to learn to skip rope.

フランスは英国の南にある。France is to the south of England.

南アフリカのズールー族は独自の言語を持っている。The Zulu tribe in South Africa has its own language.







私の家はテムズ川の南岸にある。My house is on the south bank of the Thames.













たとえ私たちが即座に使用をやめても、南極のオゾンホールが元に戻るのにはさらに後６０年かかります。Even if we do this, it will be another sixty years before the Antarctic ozone hole is repaired.





さまざまな艱難辛苦を乗り越え、彼は南極大陸単独横断を成し遂げた。He overcame all sorts of hardship and setbacks to succeed in a solo crossing of Antarctica.




この窓は南向きです。These windows look to the south.







南十字星は日本では見ることができない。The Southern Cross can't be seen from Japan.




その祭りは南太平洋の島から来たものだと信じられている。It is believed that the festival comes from the South Pacific islands.









南部の州へ冬期に旅行すると、今旅行するよりも料金が高くなります。Traveling to the southern states during the winter will be costlier than it is now.


私は清水の舞台から飛び降りる気持ちで南米に渡ります。I am going to take a big chance by migrating to South America.
私の故郷の町はニューヨークの南方１０マイルのところにある。My home town lies 10 miles south of New York.

日本は南北に長い国です。Japan is a very long country from north to south.
アメリカの高校生で、南北戦争が１８６１年から１８６５年までの間に起こったことをしらないものが多い。Many American high-school students do not know that the Civil War took place between 1861 and 1865.







４月１日、南洋フーズ株式会社は横浜の新社屋に移転します。On April 1, Nanyo Foods Co. Ltd. will move to its new building in Yokohama.



彼女は背の高いほっそりした少女で、長いやわらかな茶色の髪をしていました。She was a tall, thin girl with long, soft brown hair.彼女は柔らかな口調で話しました。She spoke in soft tones.


椎間板ヘルニアは背骨の間にある椎間板という軟骨が飛び出すものです。Disk herniation is when cartilage, called 'intervertebral disk' and found between each vertebra, slips out.








私は彼女に難しい質問をした。I asked her a difficult question.あの老人は食べ物に難しい。That old man is a fussy eater.



現代詩はしばしばきわめて難解だ。Modern poetry is often most obscure.
初めの一歩が唯一の難関。The first step is the hardest.
戦争中、人々は多くの難儀を経験した。During the war, people went through many hardships.

あなたの助けがなければ、私はその難局を乗り越えることができなかったでしょう。But for your help I could not have got over the hardship.



先回は難産でした。I had a difficult delivery last time.


彼はまゆを上げて難色を示した。He showed his disapproval by raising an eyebrow.

君はそれらの難題に対処しなくてはならない。You have to cope with those difficult problems.

あそこの食べ物はうまいし値段も安いが、地の利が悪いのが難点だね。That place's food is great, and their prices are good, but the fly in the ointment is their terrible location.ただし押し込む瞬間気圧の変化のせいでしょうか、耳がツンとするのが難点です。However, maybe from the sudden change in pressure when you push them in, having your ears pop is a problem.

船は岩にぶつかって難破した。The ship was wrecked on the rocks.
ダイバー達は海底に難破船を見つけた。The divers found a wreck on the sea-bed.


下手な職人は道具に難癖をつける。It's a poor workman who blames his tools.
難民は食べるものをくれと要求した。The boat people asked for food.

彼は難問を解決した。He solved the difficult problem.
その穴は直径二メートルです。The hole is two meters across.
２つの質問をしてもよいですか。May I ask a couple of questions?

私たちの選集にある劇は２つともとても好きだ。I like both plays in our anthology very much.







こーゆーのは、買うのが楽しいのよ。使うか使わないかなんてのは、二の次なんだって。This sort of thing, it's buying stuff that's fun. Whether you use it or not is secondary.


彼は二の足を踏んでいる。He is thinking it over.

これではこの前の二の舞だぞ。You'll make the same mistake if things continue in this way.

この会社は石油業界で２位に位している。This firm ranks second in the oil trade.




彼の答案には見落としが２カ所あった。There were two careless mistakes on his paper.
私は「スターウォーズ」を２回見たことがあります。I have seen "Star Wars" twice.
私は店舗の二階に住んでいる。I live in a flat above a shop.

彼は一年飛び級をした。He skipped a grade.

その銀行は二割増配ですよ。The bank has raised its dividend by 20%.

日本語検定の二級に受かった。I passed the second level of the Japanese language examination.




２桁のＩＱがある人間なら誰でも、この選択が政治的に偏ったものだって分かってるよ。Anybody with at least a two-digit IQ knows this was a politically biased choice.

生年月日は１９６０年２月１４日です。I was born on February 14, 1960.


















２国間の貿易上のアンバランスを改善しなければならない。The trade imbalance between two nations should be improved.

二三日事実を隠しておこうよ。Let's hold fire for a few days.


樹木は酸素を排出し、二酸化炭素を吸収する。Trees give off oxygen and absorb carbon dioxide.




この本は主に二次喫煙の影響について書いてある。This book is chiefly concerned with the effects of secondhand smoking.



社会的な関わり合いは、この仕事には二次的なのです。Social relationships are secondary to this business.



彼は二者択一を選ぶことでしょう。武術か死か。Which will he choose, I wonder, martial arts or death?
決めること決めちゃって、その後は二手に分かれるよ？Let's decide what needs to be decided, then let's split into two teams, OK?

あと１、２週間も休めば、すっかりよくなりますよ。Just stay off your feet for the next couple of weeks, and you'll be just fine.
二十人以上の少年がそこに行った。More than twenty boys went there.



２０世紀の間に、こうしたことすべてが変わった。In the course of the twentieth century all this changed.

ハツカネズミとドブネズミは異なる。Mice are distinct from rats.

歳月は距離同様二重の魅力を添える。Age, like distance, lends a double charm.












アーノルドは二重人格の事例を扱っている。Arnold is concerned with cases of dual personality.








このような形を二重否定といいますが、結果として肯定を表すこととなります。This sort of structure is called a double negative, but in effect it shows affirmation.




五の二乗は２５である。The square of 5 is 25.





その会社は大変な負債のためにっちもさっちもいかない状態だ。That company is on the rocks because of bad debts.



私たちは２人とも同じクラスです。We are both in the same class.

いやでもおうでも、これからは君と二人三脚で仕事をするしかないのかね。Like it or not, we're in this together. All we can do is work as closely as if we were joined at the hip.


この食事は二人分ある。This meal is adequate for two.


ついに１３１４年には、この競技はとても乱暴で危険なものとなっていたので、エドワード二世は法律を制定したのです。Finally, in 1314, these games had become so violent and dangerous that King Edward II made a law.







私は今年靴を二足履きつぶした。I've worn out two pairs of shoes this year.
二足のわらじをはこうとして失敗した。He tried to play two roles at the same time and failed.






あと２通手紙を書かなくてはならない。I have another two letters to write.
この文は二通りに解釈することができる。This sentence can be interpreted in two ways.
１度や２度の失敗はだれにでもある。Everybody fails once or twice.フロントローラーのスラスト角は２度、多分レース時にはもう少し角度を強める予定です。The front-roller thrust angle is 2 degrees, probably there were plans to strengthen that angle a little when racing.




ボストンまでの２等の切符を２枚ください。Two second-class tickets to Boston, please.

最悪の場合でも彼女は２等賞を取れるだろう。She can get the second prize at worst.









それは１週間前、すなわち４月２日に行われた。It was due a week ago, namely on April second.２日で３つの州を走破した。We covered three states in two days.

社長は私の歳の２倍です。My boss is twice as old as I am.


２番通路です。They're in aisle two.






２番目の議論は日本の外国人労働者の帰化に関するものである。The second argument deals with the naturalization of foreign workers in Japan.


この書類をそれぞれ２部ずつコピーしてほしいんだが。I'd like two copies of each of these documents.




中絶問題で議論が二分しています。People are taking sides on the abortion issue.









お前は二枚舌を使っている。You are lying to me.
彼は若いし、おまけに、二枚目だ。He is young and, what is more, handsome.


その劇で彼女は女中と女店員との二役を努めた。In the play she doubled the parts of a maid and shop girl.



それはせいぜい二流のホテルだ。It is at best a second-rate hotel.

二輪車が倒れずに走行するのには前輪が大きな役割を演じています。The front wheel plays an important role in two-wheeled vehicles moving without falling over.










尼僧はお祈りをして十字を切った。The nun prayed and crossed herself.



彼女はその本の中で自分の職業をにおわすようなことはかいていない。She makes no allusion in the book to her profession.

私の家はにぎやかな通りに面しています。My house faces a busy street.幕が上がってにぎやかなカクテルパーティーの場面となる。The curtain raised on a noisy cocktail party.

今夜の初日はきっと大にぎわいになりますよ。I guarantee a huge audience for tonight's premiere.
この町は以前ほどにぎわっていない。This city is not so busy as it used to be.
政治学とは何か。「セイジ」から、人々は、まず、ジャーナリズムを賑わす政治的事件を連想するでしょう。What is political science? From the "political," people will probably first associate it with the political incidents that enliven journalism.
その動物は肉を常食としている。That animal feeds on flesh.その魚と肉を冷凍してください。Please freeze the fish and meat.肉によって生まれたものは肉です。御霊によって生まれたものは霊です。Flesh gives birth to flesh, Spirit gives birth to Spirit.

彼女はそれを肉屋で買った。She bought it at the butcher's.

それらの星は肉眼で見える、まして望遠鏡ならなおさらである。You can see the stars with your naked eye, and even better through a telescope.


彼女は左手の指にまめができてしまった。A blister rose on one of her left fingers.



私は肉食をやめた。I've given up eating meat.
人々は行方不明の肉親の知らせを気にかけていた。People were anxious for news of missing relatives.
肉体は滅んでいく。The flesh is mortal.


これは良の肉筆の手紙だ。This is a letter of Ryo's in his own handwriting.

肉料理には何がありますか。What kinds of meat dishes do you serve?
野菜でも肉類でも、よく噛んで食べることが何よりも大切である。It is most important to chew your food, whether vegetable or meat, before you swallow it.


虹は自然現象である。A rainbow is a natural phenomenon.


この服は寒い冬の日には向かない。These clothes are not appropriate for a cold winter day.この部屋はあまり日が当たらない。This room does not get much sun.冬が近づくにつれて日が短くなる。The days grow shorter as winter approaches.
その日、日の丸の旗がはためいていた。On that day, Japanese flags were flying.
なんと美しい日の出でしょう。How beautiful a sunrise is!
こんなに美しい日の入りを見たことがありますか。Have you ever seen such a beautiful sunset?


日陰で一休みしよう。Let's take a rest in the shade.
朝食前に新聞を読むのが私の日課です。My routine is to read the newspaper before breakfast.

その話は、全ての日刊紙に載っていた。The story was in all daily newspapers.
これは日刊新聞です。This is a daily newspaper.
彼は日帰り旅行に行った。He went on a one-day trip.
彼女はそのことを日記に書いた。She wrote about it in her diary.

日銀は推定１０億ドルのドル買い支えを東京市場で行ったものと考えられている。The Bank of Japan is considered to have conducted a support buying of an estimated $1 billion on the Tokyo foreign exchange market.

彼は日系人だ。He is of Japanese ancestry.

日経指数は大引け間際に大きく跳ね上がりました。The Nikkei index jumped dramatically just before closing.

この部屋はあまり日光が当たらない。This room gets little sunshine.
彼女はそのとき日光浴をしていました。At that time, she was bathing in the sun.
その子供は、ひなたで横になって眠っていた。He was lying asleep in the sun.

日頃のご愛顧にお礼申し上げます。We really thank you for your patronage.たまには酒にでも酔ってはじけて日頃の鬱憤晴らしたほうがいいんじゃないか。Isn't it better to get drunk and cut loose once in a while and blow off the tension of daily frustration?



あなたの都合のいい日時にミーティングを組み直してくださいませんか。Could you please re-schedule the meeting at your convenience?


彼らは結婚式の日取りを繰り上げた。They advanced the wedding date.

日照り続きでその池は干上がった。The pond dried up in hot weather.

日常の運動はあなたのためになる。Moderate exercise is good for you.
せめて日常会話ができるくらいになりたい。At the very least, I'd like to be able to have everyday conversations.
君の日常生活について話してください。Tell me about your daily life.
こんな出来事は日常茶飯である。This is a daily occurrence.
日食はまれにしか起こらない。An eclipse of the sun is a rare appearance.
インターネットのテクノロジーは日進月歩、いや、秒進分歩で進歩している。Day by day and month by month, Internet technology is growing. Actually, make that second by second and minute by minute.

彼の叔母が日中彼の犬の世話をしている。His aunt takes care of his dog during the day.会社が日中合弁で経営しています。The company is operating under joint Sino-Japanese management.



あす雨の場合は別の日程を組まなくちゃ。In case it rains tomorrow, we should make another arrangement.



その手紙の日付はいつですか。What's the date of the letter?
今、日付変更線越えたって。He said we just crossed the International Date Line.
我々は日米間の友好関係を維持しなければならない。We must maintain the amicable relations between Japan and the U.S.



日暮れ前にキャンプに戻った。We came back to camp before dark.
今日は日報を書いてよ。Write up the daily report today!
私達は美しい日没に見とれた。We admired the beautiful sunset.
その広間は日本画で飾られていた。The hall was decorated with Japanese paintings.
その川は日本海に流れている。The river flows into the Sea of Japan.



私は日本語で苦労している。I have difficulty in Japanese.






ジョンは日本史に関する本を探している。John is looking for a book on Japanese history.

その庭園は日本式に設定されている。The garden is laid out in the Japanese style.
日本車は海外でよく売れる。Japanese cars sell well overseas.
うっ！日本酒が効いてきた。視点があわなくてまっすぐ歩けない。Whoo! I'm feeling that sake. I'm getting blurred vision and I can't walk straight.

日本食にはすぐに慣れますよ。You will soon get used to eating Japanese food.
あなたが日本人だと私は思っていた。I thought you were Japanese.




彼女は若い頃は日本茶よりもコーヒーが好きだった。When she was young, she preferred coffee to Japanese tea.
そのニュースは日本中に広まった。The news spread all over Japan.




彼は日本文学の研究者だ。He's a student of Japanese literature.

日ごとにだんだん暖かくなってきた。It is getting warmer every day.
看護婦たちは、日夜患者の世話をしている。The nurses attend to the patient day and night.
銀行は日曜にはやってません。The bank isn't open on Sundays.
彼は日曜大工で犬小屋を作った。As a do-it-yourselfer, he made a doghouse.
その店は日曜日は閉まっている。The shop is closed on Sundays.
あのスーパーに行けば、たいていの日用品は間に合います。If you go to that supermarket, you can buy most things you use in your daily life.



ひより見をする。See which way the cat jumps.

うちの牛は全く乳が出ない。Our cow doesn't give us any milk.




乳癌の検査をしていただきたいのです。I'd like to have a test for breast cancer.










息子の乳歯が永久歯に変わりました。All my son's adult teeth are in.











東アフリカの種族の中には、乳製品を主食にしているのがあるそうだ。I hear some tribes in eastern Africa live on milk products.








乳母車で眠っている赤ちゃんは天使のようにかわいい。The baby sleeping in the baby carriage is as cute as an angel.

乳幼児に対する医療がもっと必要である。We need more medical care for infants.



船は改装のため目下ドック入りしている。The ship is now in dock for a refit.今日は客の入りが悪い。There is only a small audience today.１箱は２０本入りである。Each package contains a score of cigarettes.



その猟師は森の中深く入り込み、二度と帰らなかった。The hunter went deep into the forest, never to return.

親が仕事で忙しいのをいいことに子供が友達の家に入り浸ってしまっている。Since her parents were busy at work all the time, she spent a lot of her time at her friend's house.
植物の生長と生産性は、気温と湿度が作り出す入り組んだ関係に敏感に反応する。Plant growth and productivity react sharply to a complex combination of temperature and moisture.





何かご入り用でしたらお知らせ下さい。Let me know if you are in need of anything.
愛も悲しみも入り乱れた胸の鼓動が聞こえてくる。All love and sadness melt in my heart.

日本の家に入るときには靴を脱がなくてはなりません。You must remove your shoes when you enter a Japanese house.目に砂が入りました。I got some sand in my eye.彼は大学へ進まず実業界に入った。He entered the business world instead of going on to college.
現金入れの箱にはほとんどお金が残っていないことがわかった。We found there was scarcely any money left in the cash-box.
それは引き出しに入れておきました。I put it in the drawer.留学生も入れるのかしら。Can foreign students be in the club?あなたは、私にコーヒーをいれてもらいたいですか。Do you want me to make coffee?
さっき入れ違いで亜美さんが出て行ったところです。You just missed Ami as she went out.


広告代理店はこの仕事にかなり入れこんでいます。The ad agency has a lot riding on this account.






入院の受付窓口はどこですか。Where is the admission's office?
入院患者は医者に麻酔を注射されてすぐに眠りに落ちた。The hospital patient dropped off shortly after the doctor injected him with anesthesia.

おい、クレオ。あんまりうろちょろするなー？まだ入園したばっかりなんだぞ。Hey, Cleo. Don't wander around too much, OK? We've only just entered the park.

新しく入荷したドレスはパリからのものです。The new line of dresses is from Paris.
私はそのクラブへの入会を許された。I gained admission to the club.





私の息子は、高校に入学した。My son entered high school.
入学願書は直接学校の事務室に送って下さい。Mail your application for admission directly to the school office.



あの大学はマークシート方式で入学試験を行っている。That university conducts its entrance examinations using a computer scored answer sheet.
入学式は十時から行います。The entrance ceremony will be held at 10 o'clock.












生じた利息は貯金口座に入金されます。Accrued interest will be paid into your account.





船は明朝入港する予定です。The ship is arriving in harbor tomorrow morning.


入国の目的は何ですか。What's the purpose of your visit?




橋の建設の入札が募られた。Bids were solicited for the building of the bridge.

入試制度の改革、カリキュラムの改革は着々と進んでいるが、歩みは遅い。The reform of both entrance examination system and curriculum makes slow progress.
職員以外入室禁止。Admittance to staff members only.




彼は高校卒業直後に入社した。He joined the company right after he got through high school.


これらの品目は入手がかなり困難だ。These items are rather hard to obtain.



その少女はリサイタルでのすばらしい踊りで、入賞した。The girl took the cake for her wonderful dancing at the recital.

官軍に入城を許すとはどういう了見だ。What do you think you're doing letting the loyalists into the castle?
この切符で２名入場できます。This ticket admits two persons.

私はその試合の入場券を２枚持っている。I have two passes to the game.




５歳未満の小人は、入場料は要りません。There is no admission fee for children under five.
学者の中には、アメリカ入植を西ヨーロッパの社会不安のせいにする者もいる。Some scholars ascribe the settlement of America to social unrest in Western Europe.
どうして彼らはそんな宗教に入信したのだろうか。Why did they come to believe in such a religion?


彼の絵は二科展に入選した。His picture was accepted for the Nika Exhibition.



サムは１８才で入隊した。Sam joined the army when he was eighteen.







多くの入党者があった。There have been many accessions to the party.






彼は入念に書類を見た。He had a good look at the papers.
もうすぐ梅雨入りだ。The rainy season is near at hand.











ご入用でしたらさしあげます。You may have it for the asking.
私は１日おきに入浴する。I take a bath every other day.


大量の文書を入力しなきゃならない。I have to type in a really big document.





彼は脱兎のごとく逃げた。He ran like a scared rabbit.
過ぎたるはなお及ばざるがごとし。Too much of a good thing.
そのニュースはどうして漏れたのだろう。How did the news get out?どうしてあなたにお詫びする理由があるのですか。Why should I apologize to you?
彼女はどうしても自分の思い通りにしようとする。She will have her own way.残念ですが、あなたの名前をどうしても覚えられない。I'm sorry to say I don't remember your name.その計画を成功させるためには君の援助がどうしても必要だ。Your help is indispensable for the success of the scheme.
いかなる動物も、植物なしでは生存できない。No animal can exist without plants.
環境汚染にいかに取り組むかは深刻な問題である。How to deal with environmental pollution is a serious matter.私は教育がいかに重要であるかを痛感しました。It was brought home to me how important education is.施設は、その使命がいかに崇高なものでも、家庭のかわりにはなり得なかった。Institutions, however noble their missions, have failed to replace the family.

何回もいかさまにだまされましたよ。I got sucked in on a lot of phony deals.



いつもより尿の回数が多いです。I urinate more often than usual.







両親はジェーンがその学校の教師に任じられて喜んだ。Jane's parents were pleased about her appointment as a teacher at the school.
彼は重大な使命を任された。He was given an important mission.
彼をその職に任ずる必要はない。We have no call to appoint him to the post.
最終決定は彼に任せた。We left the final decision to him.ご想像にお任せします。I'll leave it up to your imagination.



ジョンケネディが暗殺された時、リンデルジョンソンが大統領の任期を引き継いだ。Lyndon Johnson took over presidency when John Kennedy was assassinated.




大使はまもなく現在の任地から召還されるだろう。The ambassador will be recalled from his present post soon.
彼女はその党の指導的任務につくことを承認した。She has consented to take the leadership of the party.

私たちはウッド氏を議長に任命した。We appointed Mr Wood chairman.





妊娠検査を受けたいのです。I'd like to get a pregnancy test.
これは妊娠中絶に関する社会学的研究である。This is a sociological study on abortion.
妊婦妻がいるのに結婚指輪外して合コンに参加してもいいですか？Is it OK for me to remove my wedding ring and go to a dating party when I have a pregnant wife?



老齢は気づかぬうちに我々に忍び寄る。Old age creeps upon us unnoticed.

彼が部屋に忍び込むのに気がついた。I noticed him sneak into the room.
私は忍び足で寝室にいった。I went up to my bedroom on tiptoe.
太郎は屈辱を忍んで謝罪し辞職した。Taro had to eat dirt and resigned.

忍者ごっこをしよう。Let's make believe we're ninjas.


彼の忍耐強さには驚いた。I wondered at his perseverance.

彼は遺書をしたためた。He has drawn up a will.
我々は彼の才能を認めている。We appreciate his talent.ｘ線写真で異状が認められます。We have detected an abnormality on your x-ray.このお願いをお認めいただけましたら幸いです。I would be grateful for your approval of this request.
この計画はまだ委員会から認可されていない。This plan has not yet been cleared by the committee.
公僕も人間であること、また、人間である以上過ちを犯す可能性があることを、彼は認識している。He realizes that public officials are human, and that as human beings they are capable of misjudgement.
管理人によってアカウントの認証が行われたあと、あなたに確認のメールが送られます。You will receive a confirmation email after your account has been activated by an administrator.


米消費者団体がRealPlayerを「バッドウェア」と認定。American consumer group identifies RealPlayer as 'badware'.

彼はタオルを水で濡らした。He wetted his towel with water.
ぬれた衣装が彼女の体にくっついていた。Wet clothes clung to her body.
ネギをベランダに起きっぱなしにしていたら、カスカスになった。I left some scallions out on the veranda for too long and they dried out.
あなたのサイトは、猫に興味のある人達にとって魅力的です。Your site appeals to people who are interested in cats.
君のせっかくの名講義は猫に小判だったね。Your wonderful lecture was pearls before swine.

私はとても猫舌なんです。I can't eat or drink very hot things.
僕は猫背だ。I am round shouldered.
猫かぶりしてもお前の正体は分かっているよ。You are a wolf in sheep's clothing.

熱によって氷は水に変わる。Heat turns ice into water.１０２゜Ｆの熱があります。I have a fever of 102 degrees.彼は学生運動熱に浮かされている。He is being carried away by a student movement.
スープは熱いうちに召し上がって下さい。Eat your soup while it is hot.
水は熱せられると蒸気になる。Water changes into vapor when it is heated.
父は母に劣らず私を熱愛した。My father loved me no less passionately than my mother.

彼女は自分の仕事にぜんぜん熱意を示さない。She shows no zeal for her work.




その部屋は参加者の熱気でムンムンしていた。The air in that room was thick with the enthusiasm of the participants.
宇宙飛行士達は熱狂した人々の励ましと喝采に迎えられた。The astronauts were greeted with cheers and applause of an enthusiastic crowd.







熱情が彼女の特徴の一つだ。Passion is one of her characteristics.
この本は彼の熱心な研究の成果である。This book is a result of his enthusiastic research.

あの島は熱帯性気候です。That island has a tropical climate.
彼らは熱帯魚に興味があるらしかった。It seemed that they were interested in tropical fish.
この頃は彼女はテニスに熱中している。Nowadays she is lost in tennis.
ポットに熱湯をいっぱい入れてください。Please fill the teapot with boiling water.


我々は世界平和を熱望している。We are anxious for world peace.


熱力学の背後には、第１巻で学んだ力学の法則にしたがう原子や分子の運動があります。Behind thermodynamics lie the movements of atoms and molecules following the laws of motion learned in the first volume.

彼は彼女の熱烈な願いに負けた。He yielded to her ardent wishes.

一月は年の一番目の月です。January is the first month of the year.お年をお聞きしてよろしいでしょうか。Might I ask your age?




亀の甲より年の功。Experience without learning is better than learning without experience.




３０年ぶりにクラス会があった。There was a class reunion after 30 years.


学ぶのに年を取りすぎているということはない。You're never too old to learn.



ジョンは私より２つ年下だ。John is my junior by two years.

もう年賀状を全部書いてしまったのですか。Have you written all the New Year's cards already?



年会費はいくらですか。How much is the annual membership fee?



彼のバイオリンの保険料は年額２００ドルだ。The insurance on his violin costs $200 a year.



この年鑑には美しい写真がたくさん載っている。This yearbook is illustrated with a lot of beautiful photographs.
私はここで１０年間働いている。I've worked here for ten years.














彼女は年金で生計を立てなければならない。She has to live on the pension.

教育の年限を今より延ばすべきだ。Education should be carried further than it is now.
３年後に戦争が始まった。The war began three years later.


日本では給料は大体年功序列による。In Japan wages are usually in proportion to seniority.





大体君と同じ年頃の若い娘だった。She was a young girl about your age.もっと分別があってもいい年頃だよ。You're old enough to know better.








妹の咲子です。俺と年子で、今受験生です。This is my little sister Sakiko. She was born the same year as me and is now studying for her exams.
その代表者は年次会議を欠席した。The representative was absent from the annual conference.１年次開講の『大学生のための表現法』と２年次開講の『食品化学』の２科目を担当しています。I'm teaching two courses, year one's "Self-expression for University Students" and year two's "Food Chemistry".




「わたしは、年とっていて遊べないね」男の子は言いました。"I am too old and sad to play," said the boy.
夫の年収は１０万ドルだ。My husband earns $100,000 a year.

テレビは暴力行為を見せて、それがとりわけ年少の者たちに影響を及ぼす。Television shows violence, which influences, above all, younger people.

トムは私より２つ年上である。Tom is two years senior to me.


これらの数字が示すのは、大学１年生の５人中３人が政治に無関心だということだ。These figures indicate three in five college first-year students are indifferent to politics.




１９９０年代は湾岸戦争で始まった。The 1990s began with the Gulf War.




私は１年中テニスをします。I play tennis all the year around.


年長の息子たちは今は父親からまったく独立している。The elder sons are now quite independent of their father.
子供はよく年長者の真似をしようとする。Children often try to imitate their elders.
零細小売店などは新年度には利益を上げるでしょう。Mom-and-pop stores will turn a profit in the new fiscal year.
この仕事は２年内に終わらせなければならない。This work must be finished within two years.

寄る年波には勝てないんだよ。No one can turn the clock back.
彼女はもっと分別があってよい年配だ。She is old enough to know better.スミス夫人は年配の女性です。Mrs. Smith is an elderly lady.










オリンピックは４年ごとに開かれる。The Olympic Games are held every four years.
来年末までで、ここで働き始めてどれくらいの期間になりますか。How long will you have been working here by the end of next year?
年明けに子供が産まれる予定です♪I'm expecting a baby in the new year!

彼とは１０年来の知り合いだ。I have known him for ten years.



彼らの年齢差は六歳です。The difference in their ages is six years.
しかし、その利点は、あらゆる年齢層で大きな意味を持っているのである。But the benefits are significant at all ages.
誰も学べないほど年老いているということはない。No man is so old he cannot learn.
その光景を見て私は驚異の念にうたれた。The sight struck me with wonder.


念のためにもう一度申しますが、締め切りは３月３１日です。Let me remind you again that March 31st is the due date.念のためＸ線写真をとりましょう。Let's take an X-ray just in case.

私達は君の成功を念願している。We hope that you will succeed.




彼女はあまり夢中になっていて周囲のことなど念頭になかった。She was so preoccupied that she was oblivious of her surroundings.
ジョンは、念入りにその事故を調査した。John investigated the accident thoroughly.







私は石につまずいて、足首をひねってしまった。I tripped on a stone, twisting my ankle.
滑って足首を捻挫した。I slipped and twisted my ankle.
二人はローンの頭金を捻出できなかった。The couple wasn't able to produce the down payment for the loan.

火がぼんぼん燃えている。The fire is burning furiously.
火がめらめらと隣家に燃え移っていった。The fire spread and licked the neighboring house.

レース中にその車はぱっと燃え上がった。The car burned up in the race.
トムは、野球選手として燃え尽きた。Tom burned himself out as a baseball player.

間の垣根が恋をいっそう燃え立たせる。A fence between makes love more keen.
この種の汚染物質は主として自動車エンジンの燃焼から生まれる。Pollutants like this derive mainly from the combustion of fuel in car engines.
あなたの車は本当に燃費が悪いんですね。This car of yours is a real gas guzzler.
この暖房装置は石油を燃料とする。This heating system burns oil.
次には、これらのやの上に絹の糸をさらに張り、巣の中央に滑らかで、粘りのない部分を残す。Then it draws more silky lines across these spokes, leaving a smooth, non-sticky patch in the middle of the web.

彼は粘り強い精神の持ち主だ。He has a spirit of tenacity.





「ちょっとカタいかな〜」「カタい？」「粘度が高すぎるってことさ」"Might be a bit stiff..." "Stiff?" "I mean the viscosity is too high."
彼は粘土で像を形作った。He shaped the statue from clay.

ストレスが胃の粘膜を荒らす原因のひとつは次のように考えられています。The following is thought to be one of the reasons stress damages the stomach's mucous membrane.

私のウェブページに来て私のことをもっと知ってください。Visit my webpage and find out more about me.時が経つのにつれて、フットボールの試合をより安全な競技にするために規則が付け加えられていったのです。As time went on, rules were added to the game to make it safer.１００人近くの人がいたが、ほとんど会ったことのない人たちだった。There were almost 100 people, few of whom I had seen before.
北アメリカでは１つの家に１つないし２つの車庫があるのはよくあることだ。It is quite common in North America for homes to have a one or two-car garage.バドミントン部はまともな部員が極端に少ないため、ほとんど廃部ないし休部状態だった。There were so few proper members in the badminton club that it was half-way between dead and 'on break'.

彼女は悩ましい目つきで僕を見た。She looked at me seductively.
そんなささいなことで私を悩まさないでくれ。Don't bother me with such trifles.
それはぜいたくな悩みだよ。Gee, I wish I had that problem.
悩んでも何の利益にもならない。There is no profit in worrying.

そのピアノは美しい、濃い褐色の木で作られていました。The piano was made of beautiful, dark brown wood.コーヒーはどんなふうにしましょうか。濃いブラックがいいですか。How do you like your coffee? Strong and black?血は水よりも濃し。Blood is thicker than water.

味も濃厚で、炒め物、スープなど中華料理に深みを与えます。It also has a strong flavour, and adds depth to Chinese food such as soups and stir-fries.インサイダー取引に当たる疑いが濃厚になってきた。Suspicion that this amounts to insider trading has strengthened.「学園の廊下で、濃厚なキスシーン・・・聞いたぞ聞いたぞ」「濃厚じゃなーい！話に尾ひれ付いてるって・・・」"A passionate kiss scene in a school corridor ... I've heard all about it!" "It wasn't passionate! That's an exaggeration..."
ニューヨーク市の警官は濃紺の制服を着ている。New York City policemen wear dark blue uniforms.






濃霧に加えてうねりも高かった。In addition to a thick fog, there was a heavy swell.

干し草を納屋に蓄えた。We stored the hay in the barn.


最低価格と一番早い納期を見積もってくださるようお願いいたします。Please estimate your best price and the earliest delivery date.

あなたはオクラと納豆はどちらがよりねばねばしているかわかりますか。Do you know which of okra and natto is more gooey?
「そっか」ウィリーはようやく納得した。"Well, OK," Willie finally agreed.

注文書の発行から３０日以内に製品を納品します。We will deliver the products within 30 days after the date of Purchase Order.
授業料は本月２５日限り納付の事。Tuition fees must be paid not later than the 25th of this month.
能は伝統的な日本の芸術である。Noh is a traditional Japanese art.

私は能楽が歌舞伎より好きだが、それは前者が後者よりも優雅に思えるからである。I prefer Noh to Kabuki, because the former looks more elegant to me than the latter.




彼、能書きばかり立派だけど、言うは易く行うは難し、ってこと分かってんのかなあ。His boosterism makes it sound wonderful but I wonder if he understands how hard it's going to be to actually carry out.













そうすれば能率が上がりますよ。That makes for efficiency.


日本の電話網は非常に能率的にできている。The Japanese telephone system is highly efficient.
彼はすぐれた能力をもっていた。His talent was of a high order.
その男は自分の脳を撃ち抜いた。The man blew out his own brains.






しかし、もしその人が脳死状態であれば、二度と考えたり、しゃべったり、聞いたりすることは絶対にありません。However, if he is brain-dead, he will never think, speak, or hear again.



去年脳卒中を起こしました。I had a stroke last year.

REM睡眠中の脳波は起きている時と同じ脳波であり、夢を見るステージです。The brain waves during REM sleep are the same as when awake, and it's the stage when you have dreams.脳波をとります。I'll take your EEG.

もう少し脳みそをしぼって考えろ。Rack your brains a little harder.

危険だという考えはその時、私の脳裏を横切らなかった。No idea of danger crossed my mind then.
右耳からうみが出ます。Pus is coming out of my right ear.




彼は農園を売って大金をにぎった。He realized a large sum by the sale of the plantation.
農家の子になりたいかね。Would you like to be a farm boy?



海外向け食品の輸出は農業関連産業の柱の一つです。Overseas food exports are one of the mainstays of agribusiness.




わが国の主な農産物は米である。The chief crop of our country is rice.
大勢の人々がこの農場で働いている。A lot of people work on farms.

河川の盆地には普通肥沃な農地がある。The basin of a river usually has rich farmland.

農夫は春になると種をまく。Farmers sow seeds in the spring.
私は貧しい農民に過ぎない。I am nothing but a poor peasant.
彼らは果樹に農薬を散布している。They are spraying the fruit trees.



彼女は覗き見したかったが、そんなことはできなかった。She would have liked to peep in, but could not do such a thing.
その少年は窓から覗き込んだ。The boy peeped in at the window.
私は壁の裂け目から外を覗いた。I peeped out through a crack in the wall.私はメアリーが店のウインドーをのぞいているのを見ました。I saw Mary looking into a show window.その箱をのぞいてはいけない。Don't look into the box.






そのスピーチの要点は把握できた。I was able to grasp the main points of the speech.


ホントにどうしたんですか？いつもの覇気がないですよ。Really - what's up? Where's your go-for-it attitude?
この地域に覇権を主張した国家がなかったという事実に注意を払わねばならない。We must pay attention to the fact that no nation claimed sovereignty over this region.

くだける波が泡を作った。The breaking waves formed foam.


そのボートは波止場につながれていた。The boat was alongside the quay.



彼女は胸を波打たせた。She heaved her chest.

ジャンスキーが観測したのは銀河系の中心核からの波長14.6mの電波であった。What Jansky had observed was the 14.6m wavelength radio wave from the Milky Way's core.


石が池に波紋を描いた。The stone started ripples in the pond.

彼の一生は波瀾万丈であった。His life was full of ups and downs.
私はネコ派です。I am a cat person.彼は福田派に属していました。He once belonged to the Fukuda faction.その彫刻家はルネサンス派に属する。The sculptor belongs to the Renaissance school.
１９５１年にシスター・テレサは当時インド最大の都市であったカルカッタに派遣された。In 1951, Sister Teresa was sent to Calcutta, then the largest city in India.
このネクタイは派手すぎますよ。I'm afraid this tie is too loud.
改良された医療技術は、宇宙開発計画の副産物として派生したものの一つである。Improved medical technology has been one of the spin-offs of the space program.


２つの派閥が手をむすんだ。The two factions gang up with each other.
だれがこの封筒を破って開けたのか。Who has torn the envelope open?約束を破らないでよ。Don't go back on your promise.
バスに遅れて、会社に遅れて、ストッキングも破れた。I was late for the bus, late for work, and got a run in my stocking.



その台風は多くの家を破壊した。The typhoon destroyed many houses.

小さな子どもがとても破壊的になる事がある。Small children can be very destructive.


これらの書類に関しては破棄することが一番いいと思う。With respect to these documents, I think the best thing is to destroy them.彼らは婚約を破棄した。They called off their engagement.
そのような情緒と行動の分離に比べれば、破局的結果の方がまだましである。Even disaster is better than such a divorce between emotion and action.

かけごとのために彼は破産した。Gambling brought about his ruin.


予定日の夕方に破水しました。My water broke on the evening of the predicted birth date.

屋根が破損した家は今では修理が完了している。The house with the damaged roof has been repaired.
彼らの結婚生活は去年破たんした。Their marriage broke up last year.


彼はその破片をくっつけ合わした。He stuck the broken pieces together.
遅かれ早かれ彼は破滅する。He will eventually ruin himself.



水道管が凍って破裂したんです。The water pipes froze and then burst.

破廉恥な人間は自分の母さえも裏切るだろう。An unscrupulous person would sell even his own mother down the river.


彼女はさんざん私の事をののしった。She called me many terrible things.

私はそれまでにこれほど罵倒にみちた手紙を受け取ったことはなかった。I had never received such an abusive letter before.

馬に乗ることができますか？Can you ride a horse?

彼に忠告したところで、馬の耳に念仏だよ。Giving advice to him is like talking to a brick wall.



彼は私の言うことにはまったく馬耳東風だ。He turns a deaf ear to me.
バレンタインデーにキリスト教徒でない人がチョコレートを送ることはばかげた習慣である。It is a silly practice for non-Christians to send chocolates on St. Valentine's Day.
私はばかにされていた。They were making a fool of me.



正直者が馬鹿を見る。Honesty doesn't pay.
私をばか者だと思いますか。Do you take me for a fool?


ばかばかしいとしか言いようがない。It is neither more nor less than absurd.
俺は人事課の馬鹿野郎にあごで指図されるつもりはない。I will not be dictated to by some idiot in the personnel department.


自動車が馬車に取って変わった。Automobiles replaced carriages.
馬術競技は男女混合で行われる唯一のオリンピック競技です。Equestrian is the only mixed-gender Olympic event.
この馬小屋にはしきりが１２ある。This stable contains twelve stalls.






私の車は馬力が足らない。My car is deficient in horsepower.

これは芭蕉の非常に有名な俳句です。This is a very famous haiku by Basho.



サトヤマ先生の作品が俳壇に強烈なパンチを与えた。Mr. Satoyama's work made a big impression in the world of haiku.


彼は俳優になるべきだった。He ought to have been an actor.




その風習はすたれつつある。That custom is on the decrease.
もう一つの面白いエネルギー源は、放射能の廃棄物質から取り出せる熱である。Another interesting source of energy is the heat that can be recovered from radioactive waste material.
第二が周辺環境との親和性であり、最小の廃棄物、自然エネルギーの利用等、周辺の生態と調和した住空間を形成することである。The second is the affinity with environment. By utilizing natural energy and reducing wastes, we have to make houses which harmonize with ecology.
その塔は廃墟の中に立っていた。The tower stood amid the ruins.
同社は何年間も利益が減りつづけた後、廃業した。The company went out of business after many years of declining profits.



アメリカは奴隷制を廃止した。America did away with slavery.



私達は核兵器の廃絶を願っている。All of us would like to get rid of nuclear weapons.






その不届きな野郎の顔を、拝ませてもらうか。Let's have a gander at this insolent man.
そのニュースキャスターは国王に拝謁した。The anchorman had an audience with the king.


パスポートを拝見できますか。May I see your passport, please?
ちょっとお知恵を拝借願えませんか？Could you give me some advice?

英語のコミュニティでお名前とコメントを拝見し、プロフィールを拝読しました。I saw your name and posts in an English forum and took the liberty of reading your profile.


大気が排気ガスで汚染された。The air was polluted by exhaust gas.


炭素排出量の変動が、以下のグラフに描かれている。The differing volumes of carbon emissions are plotted in the graph below.
これらの人々がコミュニティから排除されたのだと考えることは非合理的だとは言えない。It is not unreasonable to think that these people were excluded from the community.
学校はプールの水を月一回排水する。The school drains the pool once a month.

その国では日本製品を排斥する運動が起こっている。There is a movement against Japanese goods in that country.





排尿の終わり頃に痛みがあります。I have pain toward the end of urination.
排便の際出血します。I bleed when I have bowel movements.
排卵の有無を調べる方法はありますか？Is there some way to check for ovulation?

ナポレオンの軍隊は１８１５年にワーテルローの戦いに敗れた。Napoleon's army lost the battle of Waterloo in 1815.
彼は自分の敗因を私のせいだと責めた。He accused me of his defeat.

敗者たちも「賞」を受けたのです。つまり、勝ったチームにたたきのめされたのでした。The losers received a "prize" too: They were beaten up by the winning team!

敗戦のうわさが広まった。Rumors of defeat were abroad.
戦勝国は敗戦国に講和条件を指令した。The victorious country dictated the terms of peace to the defeated country.
結局私の敗訴となった。I have lost the case after all.
ドイツ軍は敗走した。The Germans took to flight.
ヒンギスが一回戦敗退の大番狂わせ。It was a big upset when Hingis was eliminated in the first round.
彼は、自分のお気に入りのコーラス・ガールが、ほかの男と結婚した時、敗北を認めた。He threw in the towel in defeat when his favorite chorus girl married another man.


麻雀牌はとってもきれいなものです。Mahjong tiles are very beautiful.

ジョンの方が二人のうちで背が高い。John is the taller of the two.
私の姉は君より背が低い。My sister is shorter than you.
それは私の期待にそむいた。It fell short of my expectation.

どんなに練習しても、私は背泳ぎができませんでした。No matter how hard I practiced, I wasn't able to do the backstroke.

彼は経済的背景がしっかりしている。His economical backing is secure.
「びっくりさせないでよ」と彼女は彼が背後に近づいた時言った。"Don't scare me!" she screamed as he came up behind her.
私は新しい背広を買った。I bought a new suit of clothes.
私の背骨の痛みはひどくなっています。The pain in my back is getting worse.
彼は平均的な背丈だ。He was a man of average height.
彼は背伸びをして失敗した。He bit off more than he could chew.
この報告は彼の背信を裏付けしている。This report confirms his betrayal.





某連盟元会長が背任の容疑で逮捕されました。The former president of a certain association has been arrested on suspicion of breach of trust.
背番号７番が彼の弟です。Uniform number No. 7 is his younger brother.
彼女は背中にリュックサックを背おっている。She is carrying a backpack on her back.
喫煙が彼の肺を冒した。Smoking has affected his lungs.
スイスを訪れている間、彼は肺炎にかかってしまった。While visiting Switzerland, he became ill with pneumonia.


最近、肺結核を患う人はほとんどいない。These days few people suffer from tuberculosis.








サーカスで、商品としておもちゃを配っている。Circuses offer toys for prizes.



『極道の妻たち』は、1986年、東映配給網により公開されたヤクザ映画。"Gang Wives" is a Yakuza movie released in 1986 by Toei Distribution Network.戦時中政府は肉を配給にした。The government rationed meat during the war.


彼女は彼が貧しいときも彼を支えるすばらしい配偶者だった。She was an excellent spouse who stood by him through poverty.




配線を間違えないように注意してキットを組み立てた。I built the kit taking care not to make mistakes in the wiring.
１０個ではなく５個だけが配送されました。Only five instead of ten units were delivered.
営業マンだって、リストラ予備軍に配属されないように必死な訳です。After all, even salesmen are desperate to avoid being targeted for downsizing.
どれくらいで配達してもらえますか。How soon can they be delivered?
軍隊は戦闘の配置で整列していた。The troops were in battle array.

その会社の株は高配当だ。The company shares give a high yield.

先生はチラシを配布した。The teacher distributed the leaflets.
医療品は被災者たちに配分された。The medical supplies were allocated to the victims of the disaster.
看護婦は患者の快適さに配慮しなくてはいけない。The nurses must see to the comfort of their patients.

彼は私の倍食べた。He ate twice as much as I did.あの山はこの山の５倍の高さである。That mountain is five times as high as this one.



私はその古本に倍額を払った。I paid double the price for the secondhand book.



今年の売り上げは倍増と見込んでいます。Sales should double this year.



友情を培うのにスポーツは効果的だ。Sports are effective to cultivate friendship.


マラリアは蚊が媒介する。Malaria is carried by mosquitoes.





空気は音の媒体だ。The air is a medium for sound.

梅の花は今週が見頃です。The plum blossoms are at their best this week.
うっとうしい梅雨期に、すっきりしない話で恐縮ですが、少しの間お付き合いください。I'm ashamed to tell such a muddled story in this dreary, rainy season, but please bear with me for a while.






彼女の顔はすすだらけ。Her face was sooty.






彼はたくさんの小麦粉と油を買い込んだ。He bought a lot of flour and oil.

その家は買い取られた。The house has been bought.







彼女は私の能力を買いかぶってはいない。She has no illusion about my ability.
それを買い戻すのに５ポンドかかった。It cost him five pounds to buy it back.
車を買うために貯金をしている。I'm saving money for a car.彼のスキーヤーとしての優秀性は十分に買っています。We fully appreciate his excellence as a skier.彼が絶えず侮辱したので私の怒りをかった。His constant insults aroused my anger.


ＧＥはレイク（株）を３０００万ドルで買収したと発表した。GE announced the acquisition of the Lake company for $30 million.彼らはその証人を買収しようとしたがだめだった。They attempted in vain to bribe the witness.
買い物袋をどすんとテーブルの上に置いた。I put the shopping bag on the table with a thud.


これは貸家だ、売家ではない。This is a house to let, not to be sold.


彼は自分の新しいアイデアを上役に売り込もうとした。He tried to sell the boss the new idea.
クリスマスは新しいおもちゃを売り出すいい機会だ。Christmas is a good time to market new toys.

そのケーキはすぐに売り切れるでしょう。The cakes may be sold out soon.
財産目当てに結婚するものは自由を売り渡すものである。He that marries for wealth sells his liberty.

セールスマンはその品物を法外な値段で売りつけた。The salesman sold the article at an unreasonable price.
他の方法でお金がつくれなければ最後の手段として車を売り払えばよい。If we can't get the money in any other way, we can, as a last resort, sell the car.
その犬が欲しければ買えますよ。それは売り物ですから。You can buy that dog if you want to. It is for sale.

ガソリンはリットル単位で売られる。Gasoline is sold by the liter.
この型の携帯電話はよく売れています。This type of mobile phone sells well.

一体全体、どうして建てたばかりの家を売却してしまったんだい。Why on earth did you sell your newly built house?





アイスクリーム売りが外の売店で客にアイスクリームを売っている。The ice cream vendor is waiting on customers at his outdoor stand.
彼は革製品の売買をしている。He buys and sells leather goods.


それは売名行為だ。That's just a cheap publicity stunt.


彼は怪我の賠償として多額の金を受け取った。He received a large sum of money in compensation for his injury.



今朝、陪審の件で呼ばれて陪審員をやることになったんだ。I was called in for jury this morning, and I actually have to serve on a case.
彼女は法廷に判事と陪審員の前にたった。She stood in the court before judge and jury.


その赤ちゃんははいはいをはじめた。The baby began to crawl.
赤ん坊は歩く前にはう。Babies crawl before they walk.
群衆がまるでハエのようにその車の周りに集まった。The mob gathered round the car like so many flies.
このはかりであなたの荷物を量っていいですよ。You can weigh your baggage in this balance.





実力が伯仲したチーム同士の対戦なので面白い試合になりそうだ。Both teams are well matched. The game will be an interesting one.
彼もとうとうメッキがはがれた。He has finally shown his true colors.

ライオンはさらに牙をむき出した。The lion bared its teeth even further.

このなしの皮をむくナイフを貸して下さい。Lend me a knife with which to peel this pear.

壁からペンキが剥げ始めていた。The paint was coming off the wall.



この日曜日にすき焼きパーティーをする事になっている。We're having a sukiyaki party this Sunday.




ケネス・スターがまたしても権力を濫用し、私がインターネットを使う権利を剥奪したのです。Kenneth Starr abused his power again and took away my right to get on-line.








彼は私たちの地域社会では博学の人で通っている。He passes for a learned man in our community.





彼女は博士号を取得した。She received a doctor's degree.
博識の点で彼に及ぶものはいない。No one can approach him in wideness of knowledge.




あの博物館はくるに値する。That museum is worth visiting.


委員長は博覧会の会場を見つけた。The committee picked the site for the exhibition.


２．大根は拍子木に切る。2. Cut the daikon into long sticks.
教育にもっとお金をかければ、経済成長に拍車がかかるだろう。More money for education will spur economic growth.
円高がその会社の経営不振に拍車をかけた。The yen's appreciation accelerated the decline of that company.
その公演は万雷の拍手を受けた。The performance was received with applause.


まだ住所は決まっていませんので、友達の家にしばらく泊まります。I don't know my address yet. I'm going to stay with my friend for a while.
一晩泊めてあげよう。I'll put you up for the night.




ケンは自転車を白く塗りました。Ken painted his bicycle white.
今日の若い世代はしらけている。It is said that the younger generation today is apathetic.

東の空が白み始めていた。The eastern sky was getting light.




看護婦は白衣を着ている。The nurse is dressed in white.








彼はシロアリを退治する計画を考案しようとした。He tried to devise a plan for getting rid of termites.






中国やチベットの山に住んでいる白黒の熊はパンダと呼ばれている。The black and white bears living in the mountains of China and Tibet are called pandas.ジェーンは、白黒をはっきりさせる人です。Jane calls a spade a spade.



私に白紙を一枚ください。Give me a blank sheet of paper.

キングの研究に引用されているデータはユネスコの１９７０年世界人口白書から取られたものである。The data cited in King's research is taken from UNESCO's 1970 white paper on world population.
彼は過ちをあからさまに白状した。He openly confessed his faults.
私は卵の白身が好きです。I like the white of an egg.
１９世紀は白人文明の時代だった。The nineteenth century was the age of the white man's civilization.

グラウンドは白線で３つに区切られている。The playground is divided into three areas by white lines.



３人組が白昼その銀行を襲った。A gang of three robbed the bank in broad daylight.
白鳥は当地からフロリダに移動する。The swans migrate from here to Florida.

その雑誌の記事で彼の悪業は白日の下にさらされましたね。That magazine article exposed his devilish acts to the full light of day.
それは白熱した試合だった。誰もが興奮していた。That was an exciting game. Everybody was excited.






舶来品は何でも国産品より優れていると思っている人が少なくない。Not a few people think that all foreign-made articles are superior to ones made in this country.

肉を薄く切りなさい。Cut the meat into thin slices.彼はうすい青色のネクタイをしていた。He wore a light blue tie.薄い砂糖水を作った。I prepared a weak solution of sugar and water.
私は彼の薄っぺらな性格が嫌だ。I don't like his shallow personality.

時が経つにつれて、悲しみは薄らぐ。As time goes on, grief fades away.
時がたつにつれ彼女の悲しみは薄れていった。She felt less sad as time passed.
薄暗い光の中で彼の顔を見た。I saw his face in the dim light.
薄汚い生まれた故郷の街に戻ってきた。Back into the hole where I was born.





彼女はいつも薄情だ。She is always cold-hearted.

そんな薄着ではかぜをひきますよ。You'll catch cold in such thin clothing.








時間が刻々と迫っている。Time is pressing every moment.
ローマ人はキリスト教徒を迫害した。The Romans persecuted Christians.






ロンドンは数回爆撃を受けた。London was bombed several times.



クラス全体が先生のジョークに爆笑しました。The whole class burst into laughter at the teacher's joke.

この爆弾はたくさんの人を殺すことができる。This bomb can kill many people.


作業員が岩を爆破しているのを見た。We saw laborers blasting rocks.
屋根は爆発で吹き飛ばされた。The roof was blown off by the explosion.そのニュースは彼の怒りを爆発させた。The news caused him to explode with anger.


九月までには爆発的消費は下り坂になるように見えた。By September the burst in spending seemed to be tapering off.



爆薬製造犯はしばしば世間の注目を集めたいという動機を持っている。Bomb-making criminals frequently have the motive of wanting public attention.

彼は地雷の上を運転して、彼のジープは爆裂した。He drove over a land mine and his jeep blew up.


少女たちは縛り上げられて地下室に放置された。The girls were trussed up and left in a cellar.
彼らは泥棒を木に縛り付けた。They bound the thief to a tree.
どろぼうは手足を縛られた。The thief was bound hand and foot.
ジョンは莫大な財産を相続した。John inherited a large fortune.

その農民は畑に麦の種をまいた。The farmer sowed his field with wheat.



ビールは麦芽から醸造される。Beer is brewed from malt.








競争の後に、ジェーンは麦茶を２杯のみました。Having run the race, Jane had two glasses of barley tea.




青い麦畑には暖かい陽光が満ちている。The warm sunlight is full upon the green wheat field.







母が箱詰めのぶどうを送ってくれました。Mother sent us grapes packed in a box.

私達はじっと押し黙っておはしを使って食事をした。We ate with chopsticks in restrained silence.

その飛行機は今ごろは関西空港に当然着いているはずだ。The plane should have arrived at Kansai Airport by now.
刺激を受け続けると肌の保護作用により角質が肥厚して、ゴワゴワしたり硬くなって、毛穴が目立ってきます。If it continues to be stimulated the skin's protective function causes thickening and it becomes stiff and hard with pores that stand out.中国の音楽はどうも僕の肌に合わない。I don't have the feeling for Chinese music in my body.




彼は肌着を裏返しに着た。He put on his undershirt inside out.
彼女のドレスはきめの粗いウールでできていた。Her dress was made of coarse wool.
春になると畑をほりかえして種をまきます。When spring comes, they dig up the fields and plant seeds.彼は教育畑で育った。He has had a long teaching career.
畑違いの事はしない方がいい。It is better not to go out of your field.







彼はいつも人にやつあたりをします。He really has it out for people.


止まれの標識は日本では３角形だが、アメリカでは８角形だ。A stop sign in Japan has 3 sides, whereas a stop sign in the U.S. has 8 sides.






８月には授業がない。There is no school during August.


















学校は４月８日から始まります。School begins on April 8.


その八百屋は客にとても親切だ。The greengrocer is very kind to his customers.
あのレースは八百長だった。The race was fixed.







必死で考えた企画は却下、一生懸命作った本は売れない。山下さんは八方塞がりの状態に陥っている。Yamashita is stuck with no way out. His well-thought-out project was rejected and the books he worked really hard on aren't selling.
ジムは八方美人だから、彼の言うことは当てにならない。You cannot rely upon Jim's words since he tries to please everybody.



はちには砂糖が全然ない。There is no sugar in the bowl.
校門のところで、女子寮の方から登校してきた美留と鉢合わせした。I bumped into Miru at the school gates, just as she was arriving from the girls' dormitory.
冬の間は苗を鉢植えにする。The young plants are potted during the winter.
６時発のニューヨーク行きの列車に乗りたいのです。I want to catch the six o'clock train to New York.彼は３発撃った。He fired three shots.
そのバラは甘い匂いを発する。The rose gives off a sweet odor.
赤ん坊は正常な発育を示した。The baby showed a normal development.


あなたのお名前はどのように発音するのですか。How do you pronounce your name?


あの政治家はいわゆるリクルート・スキャンダルが発覚して以来落ち目になってしまった。That politician has come down in the world since the so-called "Recruit scandal" was publicized.
君の本、いつ発刊される予定？When will your book be published?
暖かい天候の時は、発汗作用が体温の調節をする上で役立つ。During warm weather, sweating helps man regulate his body temperature.

しかしながら、これらの溶剤は発がん性が指摘された。However, these solvents were identified as carcinogenic.
この作家が本領を発揮しているのは短編小説だ。This writer is at his best in his short stories.
その詩人はとうとう発狂した。The poet went mad in the end.


新しい遺跡で未発掘はいくつだったのですか。How many new sites were uncovered?

これは驚くべき発見だ。This is a surprising discovery.



ジムはよけいな発言をした。Jim made a superfluous remark.



この地方新聞は週に１回発行される。This local newspaper is published once a week.新しい切手が来週発行される。New stamps will be issued next month.


その編集者と発行者はふたりとも私のいとこです。The editor and the publisher are both my cousins.

この雑誌の発行部数はどのくらいですか。How many subscribers does this magazine have?
イーストはビールを発酵させる。Yeast makes beer ferment.

狭心症の発作が起きました。I had an angina attack.
そのバラはよい香りを発散した。The roses gave off a nice smell.
大砲が偶然発射してしまった。The cannon went off by accident.
バスは五分後に発車します。The bus leaves in five minutes.

これらの国々はヨーロッパ文明発祥の地である。European civilization had its birth in these lands.
中東は文明の発祥地である。The Middle East is the cradle of civilization.






発疹が出ました。I have a skin eruption.
ときどき、とても寒いときは、私は車を発進させることができない。Sometimes when it's very cold, I can't get my car to start.
一酸化炭素とは炭素化合物の不完全燃焼で発生する有害物質です。Carbon monoxide is a poisonous substance formed by the incomplete combustion of carbon compounds.

この町における犯罪の発生率は高い。The frequency of crime in the town is high.
まず発声練習から始めましょう。Let's begin practicing voice projection.
その人達は大胆な発想をすべきだ。They should have bold ideas.
いつ発送してもらえるのか知りたいのですが。I'd like to know when you can send it out.
水泳は筋肉を発達させる。Swimming develops our muscles.
すべての発端は、１９５５年１２月１日、アラバマ州モントゴメリーで起こった事件であった。It all started in Montgomery, Alabama, on December 1, 1955.

それの価格を５％値引きしていただけるのでしたら、発注しようと思います。We will only consider placing an order if you reduce the price by 5%.
彼らは町の発展に大いに貢献してくれるだろう。They will contribute greatly to the growth of the town.私達の関係が発展することを希望しています。I hope to see our relationship expand.

発展途上国では優れた技術者が不足している。Good technicians are in short supply in the developing countries.
原子力が発電に使われている。Nuclear power is used to generate electricity.
米航空宇宙局によれば、ガリレオ搭載のものと類似した発電機を搭載して行った宇宙飛行２２回のうち、３回の飛行で事故が発生したとのことです。NASA says three of 22 space missions that carried generators similar to Galileo's ended in accidents.
この発電所だけで数個の市に電力を供給している。This power station alone provides several cities with electricity.
春機が発動して、ソレをナニしたい盛りなのは理解するけど、・・・まあ、そこにお座りなさい。I know you're at an age where sexual desire flourishes and you want to do 'you-know-what' with 'that' but... well, sit down there.


ジョンテル社はチップ・セットの発売を８月まで延期する見込みだ。John Tel is expected to delay the release of its chip set until August.
コンサートチケットは当所で発売中です。Concert tickets are on sale at this office.

彼は思いきって意見を発表しない。He dare not express his opinion.
その会社はニューモデルの発表会を明日行う。The company will hold a presentation of the new model tomorrow.




ウィリーは誤って父親の猟銃を発砲し、壁に穴を開けた。Willie accidentally let off his father's shotgun and made a hole in the wall.
エジソンが電球を発明した。Edison invented the light bulb.


その洋服は彼女の赤い髪に合う。That dress matches her red hair.
どこで髪の毛を切ったの。Where did you get your hair cut?







犯罪にはすべて罰が必要である。Every crime calls for punishment.
今にバチがあたるぞ。You'll get it someday.
どうしてあなたは彼らを罰しているのですか。What are you punishing them for?
駐車違反の罰金は高い。Parking fines are very costly.
この犯罪に対して法律はある罰則が規定されている。The law prescribes certain penalties for this offence.

どうして試験で最初の問題を抜かしたの？Why did you leave out the first question in the exam?は？グダグダ抜かすんじゃねぇ。それでもオトコか。Huh? Don't be so whiny! And you call yourself a man!

彼女が他の人よりも抜きん出ていることを私は認めている。I admit her superiority to others.

彼らは最もよい作品二つを抜き出した。They picked out the best two works.
当然よ、抜き打ちなんだもの。Why of course, that's what the "surprise" means.

歯医者に行ってその歯を抜いてもらった方がよいですね。You had better go to the dentist to have that tooth pulled out.たまに朝飯を抜いたって、別に悪いことじゃないよ。It's no crime to skip breakfast once in a while.最後まで戦い抜こう。Let's fight to the last.
歯が１本抜けた。One of my teeth came out.森を抜けて湖に出た。We went through the woods and came to a lake.

あ、みんなには内緒だよ？寮を夜中に抜け出すのは厳罰だからね？Oh, that's a secret, OK? Because slipping out of the dorm in the night is severely punished.

重い金庫の重量で床がぬけ落ちた。The floor gave in under the weight of the heavy safe.
あなたはユーモアのセンスが抜群です。You've got a great sense of humor.

抜歯しなければなりませんか。Should I have my tooth extracted?
彼女はその職に特別に抜擢された。She was especially selected for the post.

システム全体を抜本的に変えなければ、この欠点を克服することは困難である。It is difficult to overcome this shortcoming without drastically changing the whole system.


ハトは平和のシンボルである。The dove is a symbol of peace.



戦争には悲惨と悲しみが伴う。Misery and sorrow accompany war.


彼女は私にピアノの伴奏をしてくれた。She accompanied me on the piano.

二人は伴侶三人は仲間割れ。Two is company, but three is none.





彼に不利な判決がでた。The judgement went against him.



君はあの判事を買収できない。You cannot buy that judge.



どちらが望んだのか判然とはしない。It isn't clear which of them wanted that.
私は君の判断を尊重する。I defer to your judgement.

彼は年のわりには立派な判断力がある。He has good judgement for his age.
審判の判定は絶対だ。The judge's decision is final.

私はその筆跡を判読できなかった。I couldn't make out the writing.




その秘書はスパイだと判明した。The secretary proved to be a spy.

半時間したら彼はここに来るでしょう。He will be here in half an hour.


このボートのエンジンがハワイへの航路のなかばで駄目にならなければよいね。Let's hope this boat engine doesn't give up the ghost when we're halfway to Hawaii.彼女は４０代半ばで再婚した。She married again in her mid-forties.人生とは何であるかを知ったとき、すでに生涯の半ばは過ぎている。Life is half spent before we know what it is.























回答にはアンカーを必ずつけて下さい。半角で ">>"＋数字（例: >>1）です。Please ensure you always include a link-back in your replies. ">>" in plain ASCII + number (e.g. >>1).

私はその品物を半額で購入した。I purchased the goods for half price.











赤道は地球を二つの半球に分ける。The equator divides the globe into two hemispheres.







彼の収入は退職後半減した。His income was diminished by half after retirement.





悪い結婚をするぐらいなら、半殺しにされた方がまだましだ。Better be half hanged than ill wed.

彼女は半死半生だった。She was only half alive.










ああ、オレも実際、こうして目の当たりにするまでは半信半疑だったが・・・。Yes, truthfully, until it was right in front of me like this, I half-doubted it ...



彼は半身不随です。He is paralyzed down one side.


学生の半数が休んでいた。Half the students were absent.


古賀、あんたの半生で一体何があったの？Koga, what on earth happened in your youth?




男性たちは半袖のシャツを着ている。The men are wearing short sleeves.

半端な時間に自転車に乗るだけだ。I only ride a bicycle at odd times.
その人は私たちの半値の大安売りの申し出にとびついた。The man jumped at our offer of a half-price bargain sale.










湿気の多い気候はその半島の特色です。A humid climate is characteristic of the peninsula.











エミーはナプキンを半分に折りたたんだ。Emmy folded the napkin in half.
















それは反道徳的だ。It is still immoral.
お金を借りる事は私の主義に反する。It is against my principles to borrow money.

仕事から気をそらせてはいけません。Do not take your mind off work.




彼はペンを置いて椅子に座ってそり返った。He laid down his pen and leaned back in his chair.

喜びの反意語は悲しみです。Delight is the opposite of sorrow.


彼はそのニュースにどのような反応をしましたか。How did he respond to the news?ツベルクリン反応は疑陽性でした。The tuberculin reaction was pseudopositive.５．反応が終わったら、濡れ雑巾の上に試験管をおく。5. When the reaction is over, place the test-tube on a damp cloth.


反核エネルギー運動は多くの組織によって行われている。The anti-nuclear energy movement is being led by a number of organizations.

私は話し手に対して反感を持った。I experienced a feeling of antipathy towards the speaker.

その男は反逆者の汚名をきせられた。The man was branded as a traitor.


その部屋に彼の声が反響した。The room echoes with his voice.


そのクモは素早い反撃をする。The spider responds with a swift attack.

一族が苦労して積み上げてきたものを、お前は一瞬で反故にするつもりか。Do you intend to throw away in one instant what our family has painstakingly built up?

彼らは王様の作った法律に反抗した。They defied the laws of the king.


目が部屋の明かりを反射したときに彼女の目は輝いた。Her eyes shone as they reflected the light of the room.











彼は自分自身の考えを反省した。He reflected on his own thoughts.彼女は重大な過ちを後悔した、反省した。She showed her regret over the serious mistake.
芳男は反証があるにもかかわらず、そう信じ続けた。Yoshio persisted in believing that in spite of the evidence.



彼は絶対にその謀議に加担していなかった。反政府の悪だくみがあったのは、彼ではなくて、その兄だった。He has had absolutely no part in the conspiracy; it was not he, but his brother, who had an axe to grind against the government.
首都キガリで戦闘が続く中、ルワンダの反政府勢力は南に向かって攻勢を強めています。Rwandan rebels are pushing their offensive south as fighting continues in the capital Kigali.

彼はその反戦デモに参加した。He took part in the anti-war demonstration.



反体制派はすべて旧体制のもとで粛清されました。All political dissidents were purged under the former regime.
私は、その請求書を払う事に反対した。I objected to paying the bill.
例えば、「喜び」の反対語は「悲しみ」です。For instance, "delight" is the opposite of "sorrow."


彼女は３０分で反対側についた。She was across in thirty minutes.
反対党議員はその法案に激怒した。The members of the opposition party were enraged against the bill.



敵は機首を反転して我々の方向に向けた。The enemy's plane suddenly turned toward us.この先ネタバレ♪大丈夫な方はドラッグ（反転）して読んでね♪Spoilers ahead! If you don't mind that then read after highlighting (colour inverting).











若者達は本来、親の考えに対して反発するものだ。It is quite natural for young people to rebel against their parents.










彼の顔は怖そうに見える反面、声は優しくおだやかだった。In contrast to his frightening looks, his voice was kind and calm.その仕事は十分にお金になるが、その反面１日に12時間働かなくてはならない。The job pays well, but on the other hand I have to work twelve hours a day.
憂いの反面には喜びがあるものだ。Every cloud has a silver lining.


二人の反目の原因は金だ。Money set them against each other.
この事で私は反問した。This weighed heavily on my mind.



軍隊は簡単に反乱を鎮圧した。The troops easily put down the rebellion.
反乱軍は放送局を占拠した。The rebels have captured the broadcasting station.


彼には彼女に反論する立派な言い分がある。He has a good case against her.


改めて反芻してると、何だか恥ずかしいぞ。Now that I think over it, it's somewhat embarrassing.





向かい風が帆に吹きつけた。The headwind blew against the sail.
船を帆走させると私達は楽しくなる。Sailing a boat makes us happy.
君は港内に林立する帆柱を見るであろう。You will see a forest of masts in the harbor.



光ファイバーケーブルは膨大な量の情報を搬送できる。Fibre-optic cables can carry huge amounts of information.この後、ミキは病院へ搬送された。After this, Miki was taken to the hospital.

椅子とかテーブルとかの搬入はどうするの？What will we do about getting tables, chairs and such?

豹はその斑点を変えることはできない。A leopard cannot change his spots.
矢が厚い板を貫通した。The arrow pierced the thick board.この鉄の板はすずでメッキしてある。This iron sheet is coated with tin.






川が氾濫して広い地域が水浸しになった。The river flooded a large area.




この辞書は簡約版だ。This dictionary is an abridged edition.



この本はまだ版権が生きている。This book is still copyrighted.


ビルはその罪を犯していなかった。Bill did not commit the crime.

彼は犯行に及んだと信じられていた。He was believed to have committed the crime.

戦争は人類に対する犯罪だ。War is a crime against humanity.

ベンは犯罪者だと信じられていた。Ben was believed to be a criminal.

その犯人はまだつかまっていない。The criminal is still at large.
サマーキャンプでは、彼女が私の班の責任者になった。At the summer camp, she was in charge of the group I belonged to.
ジャスティン班長、亜空間レーダーに反応出ました！Squad Leader Justin, a blip's appeared on the hyperspace radar!
ほっそい道にほとんどスピードを落とさず、走りこんだ。「近道なんですよ」「ってここ、あぜ道〜〜〜っ！」We sped into the narrow track, hardly dropping any speed. "It's a short cut!" "Oi! It's a footpath!!"
繁栄は勤勉にかかっている。Prosperity depends on hard work.

私は日曜日にはよく繁華街に出かける。I often go downtown on Sunday.
８月下旬に彼らは繁殖のために長い旅に出発します。In late August, they set off on a long journey for breeding.
今あまり繁盛していません。My business is slow right now.








その新米のセールスマンが、トップの販売実績をあげたやり方は指導員の目を見はらせた。The manner in which the new salesman made top sales level was an eye-opener to his supervisor.
この販売機は百円硬貨しか使えない。This vending machine takes only hundred-yen coins.

日本創刊を果たしたイギリス発のホームレスの人だけが販売者となれるストリートペーパー「ビッグイシュー」について紹介しよう。I shall be introducing the street paper that is only sold by the homeless, "The Big Issue", started in England and has had its first Japanese issue.

日本に販売代理店をお持ちですか。Do you have any sales distributors in Japan?


これらの製品の新たなる販路を開拓せねばならない。We have to find a new market for these products.
自分の収入の範囲で生活するようにしなさい。Try to live within your income.

あなたは充分可愛い女の子の範疇に入ると思います。部長のおめがねには余裕でかなってしまうでしょう。I think you fall well within 'cute girl'. You'd easily go and pass in his judgement.
隣の部屋がうるさいのです。It's noisy next door.あの子はなんてうるさい子だろう。What a nuisance that child is!彼女は服装にうるさい。She is particular about what she wears.
あ、とりあえず包帯しているけど、もし煩わしかったら、家に帰ってからカットバンに代えても大丈夫よ。Ah, well I've bandaged it for the meantime but if that's awkward then it's fine to replace it with a plaster when you get home.
私はそんな小さなことにわずらわされるヒマはない。I don't have time to be bothered by such small things.
マウスとキーボードを行ったりきたりするのが煩雑なので、キーボードのみで操作できるようショートカットキーはないのでしょうか？It's a fiddle going to and fro between the keyboard and mouse so are there shortcuts to allow operation using only the keyboard?
「百八といえば煩悩の数だ」「お兄ちゃんはどんな煩悩があるの？」「言ってもいいが、検閲削除になるぞ」"Talking about 108, that's the number of worldly passions." "What worldly passions have you got then?" "I could say, but it'll get censored out."

ＧＰＬのルールに従い頒布可能です。May be distributed in accordance with the GPL.
とにかくメシ・・・といきたいところだが、その前に用を足すことにした。Anyhow, lunch ... is where I wanted to go but I decided to go to the toilet first.

私たちは公園でよくままごとをしたものだ。We often played house in the park.



マメちゃんがコーヒー豆を挽く為にコーヒーミルを使います。Mame uses a coffee mill to grind coffee beans.


グロリアは断然その晩のピカ一の歌手であった。Gloria was easily the best singer of that evening.


彼は晩学だ。He acquired education late in his life.
晩婚化傾向は今後もますます進みそうだ。The trend towards late marriage is going to increase more and more.
大抵の晩餐は１１時頃に終わります。Most dinner parties break up about eleven o'clock.
我々は彼を晩餐会に紹介した。We invited him to the dinner party.

スコットランドの晩秋はかなり寒い。Late autumn in Scotland is rather cold.



この金時計は私にとって非常に大切なものだ。母が晩年に形見として私にくれたものだから。This gold watch is the apple of my eye. Mother gave it to me as a keep-sake in her later years.
そんなの忘れてちょっくら晩飯でも食いにこいや。Forget your troubles for a while and come and have dinner with us.

その犬は泥棒の番をするように訓練されている。The dog is trained to watch for thieves.

うちの番犬はどんな小さな音や動きにも油断がない。My watchdog is alert to the slightest sound and movement.
ええ、じゃあ私の電話番号教えるね。OK. Let me give you my number.


中央銀行に物価の番人だけさせておくのはもったいない。It's a waste to just have the central banks watching over commodity prices.
ケンブリッジ行きの列車は５番線から出発します。The train for Cambridge leaves from Platform 5.
今晩どんな番組がありますか。What's on the air this evening?

彼女はラッセルスクエア５６番地に住んでいた。She lived at 56 Russell Square.
物には時節、番茶も出花。There is a time for all things.


３番目の星はある王様の物でした。The third star belonged to a certain king.
チェッカー盤の黒と白の枡は交互に並んでいる。The black and white squares on a checker board are arranged alternately.




















卑しいことは絶対にしない。He is above all meanness.



卑下も自慢のうち。Too much humility is pride.
そんなふうに言うなんて卑怯だ。It's mean of you to talk that way.


彼らはなぜあんなに卑屈に彼に仕えたのか。Why did they wait upon him so servilely?






新聞のさまざまな虚偽や卑俗さにも関わらず。Reject all its lies and vulgarity.






あなたは否でも応でも行かなければならない。You must go, like it or lump it.
いやというほど見てきたから分かる。I've seen it a million times.
彼は告白して否まず。He did not fail to confess.






議案はたぶん否決されるだろう。The chances are that the bill will be rejected.
そのニュースが彼女に大きなショックを与えた事は否定しようもない。It is not to be denied but that the news was a great shock to her.


彼女は人生に対して否定的な態度をとっている。She has a negative attitude toward life.

彼はその事故と関係していたことを否認した。He denied having been involved in the affair.

世間の非難から僕をかばってくれませんか。Will you screen me from public censure?
彼のスイングは実に見事だ。He has a perfect swing.毎朝朝食をとっている間、彼の犬は彼をじっと見つめていた。His dog stared at him every morning while he had his breakfast.私の前の彼はポルトガル育ちでした。My ex-boyfriend was brought up in Portugal.
間もなく彼らは結婚します。It won't be long before they get married.
暑さ寒さも彼岸まで。No heat or cold lasts beyond the equinox.


ただの男友達っていう立場から彼氏に昇格させてくれるかい？How about giving me a promotion from just-a-friend to boyfriend?
「あの音で考え事ができないわ」と、彼女はタイプライターを見つめながら言った。"I can't think with that noise," she said, staring at the typewriter.僕の彼女はカナダへいってしまった。My girlfriend has gone to Canada.
あいつには二度と会いたくない。I never want to see that guy again.
船は、水平線の彼方に消えた。The ship disappeared beyond the horizon.
あちらに着いたら手紙をください。Please write to me when you get there.こちらはあちらに比べれば全く原始的だった。This was quite primitive compared to that.あちらが私の待っていた人です。That's the person I've been waiting for.
そんな悲しい目で見ないで。Don't give me such a sad look.
悲しんでいる彼女をそっとしておきなさい。Do not obtrude upon her sorrow.
知識を増す者は悲哀を増す。He that increases knowledge increases sorrows.


彼女は悲観する傾向がある。She has a tendency to look on the dark side of things.
あんな悲観的な経済学者たちの言うことなんか、全然当てにならないよ。Those gloom and doom economists aren't worth their salt.
日本シンクロ界の悲願である金には、あと一歩で届かなかった。The 'gold' yearned for by the Japanese synchronized swimming world was not quite reached.
私の胸中は悲喜こもごもだ。Joy and grief alternate in my breast.
すべての悲劇は死で終わる。All tragedies end with a death.
戦争には悲惨と悲しみが伴う。Misery and sorrow accompany war.

メアリーは悲嘆の中で夫に助けを頼った。In her misery, Mary looked to her husband for help.


その悲報に打たれて彼の母は気が狂った。The tragic news drove his mother mad.
蛇をみたとき、彼女は悲鳴をあげた。She screamed when she saw a snake.


その扉は永久に閉ざされた。The door was closed for good.


彼はその男性が盗みを働いたことを非難した。He blamed the man for stealing.
彼の批判は非常に厳しかった。His criticisms were very severe.
この記事はその問題についての調査のやり方に批判的である。This article is critical of the way investigations are being made into the matter.
音楽家は一般に批評に敏感である。Musicians are usually sensitive to criticism.
ある批評家が、バレーを描いた私の絵を見たら、生のバレー公演を見に行く必要がないと言ったことがあります。A critic once said that if you saw my ballet paintings, you didn't have to go to a live performance.



彼らは娘の結婚をひろうした。They announced the engagement of their daughter.
結婚式の後で盛大な披露宴が催された。There was a big reception after the wedding.

指標は前月比４％上昇した。The index rose 4% from the preceding month.

周りの人達と比べると彼は本当に幸せそうだった。He looked quite happy in contrast with those around him.

あなたの答えとトムの答えと比較しなさい。Compare your answer with Tom's.


春と秋とを比較対照してみよう。Let's contrast spring with fall.
以下の説明は多くの異なる理論を比較的対照することによって得られたものである。The explanation below was achieved by comparing and contrasting a variety of different theories.

少なくとも、だれもマラドーナと比肩する存在になってはいない。In any case, there's no one that can compare with Maradona.



親に対する子どもの比率が大きくなればなるほど子どもを育てるのは難しくなる。The higher the ratio of children to parents, the harder it is to bring up the children.

給与が増えるに比例して、所得税率もあがっていく。The income tax rate increases in proportion as your salary rises.



そのとき、彼らは、ブラックベリーの林の周りをつかれて、のどがかわくまで競争して遊んでいました。Then they played "ring-a-ring-a-rosy" until they were tired and thirsty.

彼は家に帰った時には疲れ果てていた。He was worn out when he got home.

疲労が彼の健康をむしばんでいる。Fatigue is undermining his health.
つまり疲労困憊、心も体もクタクタです。That is, total exhaustion. Body and soul completely knackered.
動物の皮は毛でおおわれている。The skin of animals is covered with hair.私は林檎の皮をむくことができる。I can peel an apple.ぎょうざの具のあまりは？餃子を家で作りましたが、皮が少なかったせいか、具が少し余ってしまいました。Gyoza stuffing? I made some gyoza at home but, possibly because I didn't have enough dough, I had some of the filling left over.
くつは革でつくられている。The shoes are made of leather.




人造皮革は本物の皮にかなわない。Artificial leather can't compare with the real thing.

それを皮切りとして欧州の詩や文学を多数紹介するようになりました。With that as a start many European poems and much literature came to be introduced.

私はあなたの皮肉な言葉は聞き捨てにはできません。I resent your cynical remarks.

日光は皮膚に作用する。The sunbeam acts upon the skin.


この薬を飲めばあなたの皮膚病は治るでしょう。This medicine will cure you of your skin disease.


彼女はその秘密を自分の胸ひとつに秘めておいた。She kept the secret to herself.





おいしいジャムを作る秘訣を教えてください。Please tell me the secret to making good jam.

社長はブザーで秘書を呼んだ。The boss buzzed his secretary.



内弟子とは師と寝食をともにし、あらゆる武術のノウハウと秘伝を伝える制度だ。Apprenticeship is a system where you eat, sleep and live with your master and are taught various martial arts know-how and secrets.


いえ、これは秘宝ですから。わたくしたちもこの度、初めて見たのです。No, it's a national treasure, you see. This is the first time we've seen it as well.

私は彼女に取り入ってうまく秘密を聞き出した。I charmed a secret out of her.








このスキャンダルで一部の高官が罷免される可能性がある。The scandal could lead to the firing of some senior officials.

肥えた鶏は卵を産まない。Fat hens lay few eggs.農業には肥えた土地が不可欠だ。Fertile soil is indispensable for agriculture.


前立腺肥大になりました。I had an enlarged prostate.
運動を全然しないことやら肥満やらで、彼は心臓発作を起こした。What with having no exercise and being overweight, he had a heart attack.

彼は車にカバーを被せた。He put a cover over his car.新しいクラウンをかぶせる必要があります。You have to have a new crown.
「白い帽子をかぶっている男の人は誰ですか」と私は彼女に言った。I asked her who the man wearing the white hat was.その機械はほこりをかぶっていた。The machine was coated with dust.避難民は食料や水、薬などその他いろいろ不足を被るものだ。Refugees will suffer lack of food, water, medicine and all that.
彼は仕事で蒙った莫大な損失から立ち直れないだろう。He will never get over his huge business losses.
台風は多大の被害を与えた。The typhoon has done much harm.
屋根は嵐の被害を受けました。The roof was damaged by the storm.
我々は水害の被害者に食物と衣類を支給した。We provided the flood victims with food and clothing.

その実験の結果をコントロールするのは被験者の態度である。It is the attitude of the subjects that controls the outcome of the experiment.

被告は無罪になった。The accused was found not guilty.
被告人は容疑のうち２つについては無罪となった。The accused was acquitted on two of the charges.


ハリケーンの被災者たちは、もう三日も食べ物を口にしていない。The victims of the hurricane have not tasted food for three days.
被災地に救援物資が急送された。Relief supplies were raced to the disaster area.
被写体に気づかれないようにそぉっとカメラを取り出し、ファインダーを覗く。I quietly take out my camera, so as not to be noticed by my photographic subject, and peek through the finder.










※基本的な禁止事項（誹謗・中傷の禁止等）は「はじめにお読み下さい」に記載してあります。必ずお読みください。* The basic prohibitions (No slander, libel, etc.) are noted in the "Read me first." Please be sure to read it.
製造費は予算の３６パーセントと見積もっている。I estimate the production costs to be 36 percent of the budget.
多額の金がその橋に費やされた。A large amount of money was spent on the bridge.つまらないことに時間を費やすな。Don't waste your time on trifles.

諸設備の費用は払っていただきます。You have to pay for utilities.


軽井沢は避暑地として有名である。Karuizawa is famous as a summer resort.
彼は雨を避ける避難場所を捜した。He sought shelter from the rain.


避妊はちゃんとコンドームつけてたのよね？You used a condom for birth control, right?

彼は自分の非を認めましたか。Did he admit that he was wrong?







喫煙者の病欠日数は非喫煙者の２倍です。Smokers take twice as many days off sick as non-smokers.



いつものごとく、彼の考えはあまりに非現実的だった。As usual, his thoughts were extremely academic.

ウーマン・リブは底辺は広いが、非公式な民衆の運動である。Women's Liberation is a broad-based but informal popular movement.

学校をさぼるのは非行の第一段階である。Cutting school is the first stage of delinquency.

奴隷制度が非合法となってから１世紀以上になる。It is over a century since slavery was made illegal.


非常の場合は警察を呼びなさい。Call the police in an emergency.叔母は非常なお金持ちだからといって、それだけ幸せというわけではない。My aunt is none the happier for her great wealth.
その頃、私は非常に貧乏だった。I was very poor in those days.

その建物には非常口がない。The building has no fire exit.
アメリカ政府は非常事態宣言を行った。The American government declared a state of emergency.
あんなことを彼女に言うなんて非常識も甚だしい。It's quite absurd of you to tell her that sort of thing.



これらの気の毒な人々は非情な独裁者のなすがままになっていた。These poor people were at the mercy of the cruel dictator.



現在の回復状況に関してそれは非生産的と思います。I believe it would be unproductive with regard to the present recovery.






これらの品物は非売品です。These articles are not for sale.

彼女は非凡な音楽の才能を持っている。She has an extraordinary ability in music.



私は自分の非礼さに恥ずかしさでいっぱいだった。I was full of shame at my rudeness.

私たちはその鳥を飛ばした。We let the bird fly.その俳優はせりふを１行とばした。The actor missed a line.私たちは彼の順番をわざと飛ばした。We skipped his turn on purpose.

犬は囲いを跳び越えて庭に入ってきた。The dog jumped over the fence into the garden.ボールははずんで塀を飛び越えた。The ball bounced over the wall.
そのとき私だけが小川を跳び越すことができた。Only I was able to jump across the stream then.
鳥がとびまわっています。The birds are flying around.社長はいつも忙しく飛び回っている。The boss of our company is always on the go.
どう猛な犬が女の子に飛びかかった。A fierce dog attacked the girl.
ベルが鳴るとジョンはすぐさま飛び起きた。John jumped to his feet the moment the bell rang.
赤貧戸口に至らば、恋は窓より飛び去る。When poverty comes in at the door, love flies out the window.
侃侃諤諤の議論が飛び交うような会議、といったことは最近はやらないのかね。I wonder if they don't have meetings anymore where strong words fly and everyone goes at each other tooth and nail.
ケンが飛び込み台に立っている。Ken stands on the diving board.


猫が部屋から飛び出した。A cat dashed out of the room.彼が家を飛び出したのは父親が厳しかったせいだ。His running away from home is due to his father's severity.どんな質問が飛び出すか分からないから、僕としては当意即妙で発表するしかないな。Since I don't know what questions I'll be asked, I'll have to wing it at my presentation.

動いている電車に飛び乗るのは危険である。It is dangerous to jump into a moving train.
その音で私はおもわずとびのいた。The noise caused me to jump back.
猫は鳥めがけて飛び跳ねた。The cat sprang at the bird.
すぐさま彼の申し出にとびついた。I readily grasped at his proposal.


彼らの飛行機はまもなく飛び立つ。Their plane will soon take off.
彼女は初めての飛行にたいへん神経質になっていた。She was quite nervous about her first flight.

あなたは飛行機で旅行したことがありますか。Have you ever traveled by air?



飛行時間はどのくらいですか。How long will the flight time be?
その島の飛行場は、今では草がぼうぼうだ。The airfield on the island is now covered with weeds.
飛行船ってどんなかっこうしているの。What does an airship look like?
カーペットには埃を吸収するダストポケット効果があり、埃の飛散を防ぐ特長があるのだが、それが仇になった結果といえる。Carpets have the effect of a dust pocket, with merit of sucking up dust and stopping it flying around, but you can say that effect backfires.

彼の言うことには理論の飛躍がありすぎる。There is a leap of logic in what he says.
会社の収益は飛躍的に増加した。The company's profits soared.





このお金は、もしものときの備えです。This money is for a rainy day.
その船はレーダーを備え付けていない。The ship is not equipped with radar.







研究所用備品は３月１５日までに間違いなく配達できます。I'm certain we can deliver the laboratory equipment by March 15th.



雄のくじゃくは尾の羽毛が色彩豊かである。The male peacock has colorful tail feathers.













キャンバスのオイルはとても微細な花びらを描けない。Oil on canvas can never paint a petal so delicate.





彼は私を見て皮肉な微笑を浮かべた。He smiled a cynical smile at me.
あの幸福な老夫婦の姿はほほえましい。It's heart-warming to see that happy old couple.
怪物は残酷な微笑みを浮かべた。The monster's smile was cruel.
彼は振り返って私に微笑みかけた。He looked back and smiled at me.
私は赤ちゃんを見ると微笑まずにはいられない。I cannot help smiling at babies.

彼には親切心などみじんもない。He doesn't have a particle of kindness in his heart.


どうやら、俺は微睡んでいたらしい・・・。It looks like I must have dozed off.

微生物学の基本から最新の情報までを網羅する。It covers everything from the fundamentals of microbiology to the latest news.


微熱があります。I have a slight fever.



その２つの絵には微妙な違いがある。There are subtle differences between the two pictures.その顧客の苦情は微妙な問題に関わるものだった。The customer's complaint was about a sensitive issue.トムが次のオリンピックに出場できるかどうかは微妙だ。There are doubts as to whether or not Tom will be able to participate in the next Olympics.
微粒子は肉眼ではほとんど見えない。Minute particles are hardly visible to the naked eye.







妻の死の知らせを聞いてもまゆ一つ動かさなかった。He did not even raise an eyebrow at the news of his wife's death.




彼のあの話はまゆつばものだ。That story of his sounds very unlikely.
毛深いまゆ毛が彼の顔の特徴だった。His bushy brows accented his face.

私は美を愛する人間である。I am a lover of the beautiful.
あなたは美しい蝶々です。You are a beautiful butterfly.

親切は１つの美学である。Kindness is a virtue.
その美観は筆では書き表せない。The beauty of the sight is beyond description.


そんなに美辞麗句を並べられると、かえって嘘に聞こえるよね。When someone speaks with such rhetorical flourish, it starts to sound like they're lying.

トムは現代美術を見る目がある。Tom has an eye for modern art.
彼は絵画と彫刻を学ぶために美術学校へ通った。He went to art school to study painting and sculpture.
このバスは美術館まで行きますか。Does this bus go to the museum?

世界的な美術品窃盗という疫病が美術館をからにしてしまった。A worldwide plague of theft emptied museums.
勇者にあらずんば美女を得ず。None but the brave deserve the fair.
ビキニスタイルの美少女は浜辺では目を見張らすものだった。The pretty girl in the bikini was an eye-opener on the beach.


スミス夫人は美人で有名だった。Mrs. Smith was a famous beauty.


彼は善良な少年だ。そして、さらによいことには、非常に美男だ。He is a good boy, and what is better, very handsome.
彼女は美的感覚に欠けている。She is lacking in sense of beauty.


きれい好きは敬神に次ぐ美徳。Cleanliness is next to godliness.


ベスは美貌を保っている。Beth has preserved her good looks.

おいしい食事をありがとう。Thanks for the delicious meal.

間食は美容に悪い。Eating between meals is bad for the figure.
この辺によい美容院があったら教えてくれませんか。Could you suggest a good beauty parlor near here?
どの美容師をご指名ですか。Which beautician would you like?


鼻が出ているよ。かみなさい。Your nose is running. Blow it.
２人とも今日は大活躍だったみたいね。先生も鼻が高いわ。You've both been very impressive today. I'm proud of you.





この新しいブーツでみんなの鼻を明かしてやりたいんだ。With these new boots of mine, I hope to knock them dead.




恭子は鼻歌を歌いながら行ってしまった。Kyoko went away, humming a song.



















この薬は鼻水に不思議なほどよく効く。This medicine will do wonders for a runny nose.
彼は私の鼻先でドアをぱたんとしめた。He slammed the door right in my face.

















あなたは知力で彼に匹敵している。You are equal to him in intelligence.





新しい髭剃りを買いました。I bought a new shaver.
水は私のひざの高さだった。The water came up to my knees.



彼女の左の膝頭に小さなバンドエイドが見えた。He saw a small Band-Aid on her left knee.

彼女は私の肘をちょっと押した。She gave my elbow a little jog.

あの歌は必ずヒットするよ。That song's bound to be a hit.
金持ちが必ずしも幸福とは限らない。The rich are not always happy.
その計画は必ずや実行しなければならない。The plan should be carried through.
TOEICの学習に限らず、英語を学ぶのであれば英和辞典は必携の書の一つでしょう。An English-Japanese dictionary is surely a must have book, not just for those taking TOEIC, but for all studying English.





カメラは私の必需品でした。The camera was essential for me.
体育の授業は全員が必修です。The physical fitness courses are required for everyone.
体育は必修科目ですか。Is physical education a required course?

堪能な英語力は必須です。Fluency in English is a must.




それは必然的に延期しなければならない。It must, of necessity, be postponed.





私達が生きていくためには衣食住が必要です。We need food, clothes and a home in order to live.歯医者に行く必要はないですよ。You don't need to go to the dentist's.





この仕事はわれわれの必要条件を満たしていない。This work does not meet our requirements.
今日の世界は食料生産を促進する必要性がある。The world today needs to advance its production of food.



仕上げの筆を少し加える。I add a few finishing touches.


この前の娘は口述内容を筆記するのも無理だった。速記なんて論外さ。That girl couldn't take things down in longhand, let alone shorthand.


あなたは筆者が言っていることを理解できますか。Can you make sense of what the writer is saying?

私はその筆跡を判読できなかった。I couldn't make out the writing.



彼女は筆不精だ。She is a poor correspondent.



国家財政は厳しく逼迫している。The government finances are severely squeezed.
姫君は皇帝に寛恕を請いました。The princess begged forgiveness from the emperor.
誰がお姫様の役を演じるの。Who will play the role of the princess?
何かを記録するために、彼らはラマかアルパカの毛糸でできた、結び目のついたひもを使った。To record something, they used knotted cords made of the wool of the llama or alpaca.


彼は口座から百ドル下ろした。He drew $100 from his account.




プレステ２発売後、ゲームソフト売り場は百花撩乱状態だ。Since the release of the PlayStation 2, game store shelves have blossomed with a variety of new titles.



たいていの物は百貨店で買います。I get most things at the stores.
たばこは百害あって一利なし。Smoking does much harm but no good.





ユリの香りが部屋に満ちていた。A smell of lilies filled the room.



ライオンは百獣の王です。The lion is the king of beasts.




お百姓さんはそれを聞いて喜ぶに違いない。The farmers must be happy to hear that.














かわいさ余って憎さ百倍。The greatest hate springs from the greatest love.









太陽は地球の約百万倍の大きさがある。The sun is about 1,000,000 times as large as the earth.
トンプソン夫人は自分が百万長者である事を隠しておきたいと思っている。Mrs. Thompson wants to conceal the fact that she is a millionaire.





笑いは百薬の長。Laughter is the best medicine.











その台地は標高どのくらいですか。What is the altitude of the plateau?
彼らはその標識を壁に取り付けた。They fixed the sign to the wall.
私は標準英語を勉強したい。I want to learn standard English.彼の仕事は標準以下だ。His work is below average.








彼女の成功は彼女を嫉妬の標的にした。Her success made her the target of jealousy.
これらの標本はいくつかの種類に分類される。These specimens are divided into several categories.

その氷は薄過ぎてあなたの体重に耐えられない。The ice is too thin to bear your weight.



その氷河はゆっくりではあるが動いている。The glacier moves but by inches.

剣歯虎が絶滅したのは氷河時代であった。It was during the ice age that the saber-toothed tiger became extinct.


疑問が氷解しました！My doubts have been cleared up.この氷結と氷解のパターンが、北極熊の主な獲物であるアザラシの分布と数に影響を与えるのだ。Patterns of freeze-up and breakup influence the distribution and number of seals, the polar bear's main prey.






この氷結と氷解のパターンが、北極熊の主な獲物であるアザラシの分布と数に影響を与えるのだ。Patterns of freeze-up and breakup influence the distribution and number of seals, the polar bear's main prey.
北極熊は極地の氷原に住んでいるのだが、生息地を失い、絶滅するであろう。The polar bear, which lives on the polar ice-cap, will lose its home and die out.

水面に現れてるのは氷山の先端にすぎない。What you see above the water is just the tip of the iceberg.













今朝は気温が氷点下に下がっている。The temperature has fallen below zero this morning.






この無限の空間に漂う永遠の沈黙が私を恐怖に陥れる。The eternal silence of these infinite spaces terrifies me.





その船は海を漂流した。The boat drifted about on the sea.

議案は１０票の小差で通過した。The bill passed by a small majority of 10 votes.
彼の票決記録をたどると矛盾だらけです。His voting record is riddled with contradictions.
この紙はどちらが表だか見分けがつかない。I cannot tell which is the right side of this paper.私はその問題がわかっていない。裏と表の区別もついていない。I don't understand the problem; I could make neither head nor tail of it.一体何が今晩表であんなひどい音をたてているのか見当もつきません。I don't know what kind of creature is making such a terrible noise outside tonight.
この表から食べたいものを選べます。You may choose what to eat from this list.
その著名な哲学者に敬意を表して、巨大な石碑が建てられた。An immense monument was erected in honor of the eminent philosopher.




日本語の難しい点は文字を使った表記の仕方です。What is difficult about Japanese is how characters are used in its writing system.
ＵＭＬのセマンティクスと表記法の詳細については、ＵＭＬドキュメントを参照してください。Please refer to the UML documentation for the detailed information about UML semantics and notation.







「潮時というものがある」という表現は実はシェイクスピアの「ジュリアス・シーザー」にある表現である。"There is a tide" is, in fact, from a passage in Shakespeare's Julius Caesar.
写真は今芸術の新しい表現形式と考えられている。Photography is now considered a new form of art.

「ここまでは表向きの話なんです。キリカさんも知っていることですね」「ってことは、裏向きもあるんですか？」"Up to this point has been the official story, which Kirika also knows." "By which you mean there is also an unofficial?"


できるというならそれを表沙汰にするがよい。I defy you to make it public.


彼は手を伸ばして小さな皮表紙の本をとった。He reached out and took down a small leather bound book.
ディスプレイはモニタともいい、コンピュータなどの機器から出力される静止画または動画の映像信号を表示する機器である。A display, aka monitor, is an appliance that displays video signal of still images and moving pictures produced by a computer or similar device.







私たち人間の頭は経験を表象に変える。Our minds transform experiences into symbols.
彼の頭がさっと怒りの表情に変わるのを見た。I saw his face switch to anger.



えりはまず裏側にアイロンをかけ次に表側をかけなさい。Iron the inside of collars first, and then the outside.





たくさんの人達が表通りを通り過ぎた。A lot of people went by on the main street.






あなたがこの町にしてくれた事に対して心からの感謝を表明します。I express my cordial thanks for what you have done for this city.
突然の風で池の表面が波立った。A sudden wind agitated the surface of the pond.

表面上、本書の大部分は一連の事例の変遷を記録したものである。On the surface the book consists mostly of a series of case histories.

それらの間には表面的な相違はない。There is no surface difference between them.

ベストを裏返さなくちゃ。表裏逆ですよ。You need to reverse your vest. It's inside-out!彼の言葉には表裏がない。He is sincere in what he says.





公平に評すれば、彼は善意からやったのだと認めなければならない。To do him justice, we must admit that his intentions were good.
あなたはどのようにして学生を評価しますか。How do you assess your students?母親は評価してもらえないことがよくある。Mothers are often not appreciated.
革命評議委員会は戦略の計画を立てるために集まった。The revolutionary council met to plan strategy.

環境問題が学生評議会活動の中心だった。The environment was the focus of student council activities.
これらの議論で問題になっている評決は、１９９４年のランダー裁判で下されたものである。The verdict at issue in these discussions is the one brought in the Lander's trial in 1994.

スキャンダルで会社の評判が落ちた。The scandal hurt the company's reputation.そのニュースは大評判を巻き起こした。The news caused a great sensation.この本で、君はかなり評判になるよ。You're going to get much publicity with this book.
芸術家は時には評論を軽蔑することがある。Some artists are contemptuous of criticism.
あらゆる芸術評論家達は無能であり危険な存在である。Regard all art critics as useless and dangerous.
君子は豹変する。A wise man changes his mind, a fool never.



その美しさを言葉では描写できない。Words cannot describe the beauty.

ジョンのおばあさんは長い間病に伏せていたが、亡くなった。John's grandmother passed away after a long illness.
この料理は病み上がりの人にぴったりです。This food is perfect for a convalescent.


彼女は痛風を病んでいる。She is affected with the gout.
この近くに病院はありますか。Is there a hospital near here?
あなたの病気がよくなることを願っています。I hope you'll get well soon.





その老婦人は病後かなり体力が弱っている。The old lady has been rather feeble since her illness.

看護婦は、患者が危篤状態なので、病室に入らないようにと私たちに言った。The nurse told us not to enter the room because the patient was in a critical condition.
彼は病弱というハンデを負わされている。He is handicapped by poor health.
彼女は急いで彼の病床へ駆けつけた。She came hurrying to his bedside.

その患者は日ごとに病状が悪化している。The patient is getting worse and worse day by day.
その看護婦は病人の世話をした。The nurse attended the patient.




医者は患者に病名を通知した。The doctor informed his patient of the name of his disease.

私の時計は１日に５秒進みます。My watch gains five seconds a day.

光の速度は秒速およそ186,000マイルである。The velocity of light is about 186,000 miles per second.
ついに彼らは用心しながら秒読みを開始した。At last, they began to count down cautiously.
彼は種からトマトの苗を育てた。He raised tomato plants from seed.








品詞を理解することは、正しい語順感覚を身につけるうえで非常に大切なことです。Understanding parts-of-speech is extremely important for getting the feel of word order.
もっと品質の良いものはありますか。Do you have better quality ones?
貴社の品質管理のやり方には感心しました。I'm very impressed with your quality control.


除草剤耐性品種でなぜ収量が増えるのか？Why do yields increase with herbicide-resistant varieties?

あいにく品切れになってしまったんですが。I'm afraid we don't have any left.
道具としての実需がないから品揃えに深みがでない。There's no demand for them as tools, so the product line-up is poor.

これらの品物は非売品です。These articles are not for sale.

これらの品目は入手がかなり困難だ。These items are rather hard to obtain.
私たちは浜へ泳ぎに行った。We went swimming at the beach.
ボートが浜辺に引き上げられている。The boats are abandoned on shore.
３人の看護婦が四六時中瀕死の大臣の看護に当たった。Three nurses attended the dying minister night and day.
われわれは貧しい人あざ笑ってはいけない。We must not laugh at the poor.


大統領は国民に貧窮や病気との戦いで団結するように呼びかけた。The president called on the people to unite in fighting poverty and disease.


医者は貧血の検査をするためサンプルを分析した。The doctor analyzed the blood sample for anemia.


人々は貧困に苦しんだ。People were ground down by poverty.
貧者を見下してはいけない。Don't look down on the poor.
私のドイツ語の知識は貧弱です。My knowledge of German is poor.
貧相な身なりをしているからといって、人を軽べつしてはいけない。You must not despise a man because he is poorly dressed.


我々は貧富に応じて物事を見る。We see things differently, according to whether we are rich or poor.
その頃、私は非常に貧乏だった。I was very poor in those days.


子供は貧乏人の宝である。Children are poor men's riches.




その老人は貧民救済に多額の金を寄付した。The old man contributed a large sum of money to the poor.



「Kanji list」という機能に新聞記事頻度を追加しました。I added newspaper article frequency data to the 'Kanji list' function.

電車はバスより頻繁に来ます。Trains come more often than buses.

私は寒さに敏感だ。I am very sensitive to the cold.
彼は動きがびんしょうだ。He moves quickly.
彼らは合意の上で敏速な行動をとった。They acted immediately by agreement.
彼は若かったが、敏腕だった。Young as he was, he was a man of ability.

使用する前に瓶を振ってください。Shake the bottle before using.
しかし、国産ワインといっても、国内で瓶詰めされたものは全て国産ワインとなります。Having said 'domestic wine', anything bottled domestically is deemed to be domestic wine.
その知らせで彼の不安が増した。The news added to his anxiety.



日本人からが、アメリカ人は不安定で、自由奔放に見える。Americans appear unsettled and uncontrolled to Japanese.
私はこの辺りに不案内だ。I'm a stranger in these parts.
砦は不意に攻撃された。The fort was attacked by surprise.





議長は意見が不一致に終る可能性を排除しなかった。The chairman did not rule out the possibility of a disagreement.

彼は身の不運を嘆き悲しんだ。He wept over his misfortunes.


軍部に不穏な動きが見られる。There seem to be dangerous developments in the military.



それは可でもなく不可でもなしというところだ。It is neither good nor bad.
愛の動きは不可解。Love moves in mysterious ways.

自由こそ不可欠なものだ。Freedom is the breath of life.











回復はほとんど不可能だった。Recovery was almost impossible.


健康は運動と節制と不可分の関係にある。Good health is inseparable from exercise and moderation.

その腐った肉はひどく不快な匂いがした。The spoiled meat had a nasty smell.

あの飛行機は大変不格好だ。That plane is so ugly.
結果はまだ不確かである。The result is still in doubt.
ネット上の不確実な情報を鵜呑みにしてはならない。You mustn't swallow unreliable information that's on the Web.








彼の計画はまだ不完全な点が多い。His plan leaves much to be desired.


不感症のようです。I'm afraid I'm frigid.
私は人前で話をするのに不慣れだ。I'm not used to speaking in public.






いつも彼女が遅れて来るので彼は不機嫌である。He is cross because she always comes late.
急に笑い出さないでよ。不気味だから。Don't burst out laughing like that. It's creepy.
生理が不規則です。My menstrual cycle is irregular.
英語を学習する上で不可欠な、不規則動詞の活用。Conjugation of irregular verbs - essential for those learning English.





１３日の金曜日は不吉な日だと言われている。It is said that Friday the 13th is an unlucky day.

この数年間に彼は不朽の名詩を書いた。During these years he wrote immortal poems.

好況と不況は交互に来る。Good times alternate with bad.

貿易不均衡が大きな問題であるように思える。The trade imbalance bulks large in our minds.


男女間に不均等が存在することは許されるべきではない。No inequality should be allowed to exist between men and women.

不倶戴天の敵と言われるほど、どうしてそんなに嫌われたかなあ。He said I was his archenemy. How did we arrive at a situation like this?

「不具者」という言葉は侮辱かもしれませんね。The word fugusha ("disabled") might be insulting.


彼女はわが身の不遇にじっと耐えねばならなかった。She had to smile at her misfortune.
彼らは不屈の抵抗をした。They made a stubborn resistance.
彼の不敬な発言は不愉快だ。His irreligious statements are offensive.


不景気になってきているみたいね。We're in store for a recession.



レストランの不潔な皿に私達は吐き気を催させられた。The dirty plates in the restaurant disgusted us.

私達は彼の不健康を考慮しなければならない。We must allow for his poor health.
リーダーたちの不和が不健全なセクショナリズムをもたらした。The conflicts among leaders resulted in unhealthy sectionalism.




不言実行が俺のやり方。My way is action not words.



もし私たちが彼をそんなにひどく扱うなら、それは不公平だろう。It would be unfair if we treated him so badly.

彼女はその仕事に不向きだ。She isn't adequate to the task.


それで余計に彼は不幸になった。That added to his unhappiness.




５０人の応募者のうち２０人が不合格となった。There were 20 failures among 50 applicants.
間違いを一度も認めないというのは不合理である。It's absurd never to admit your mistakes.



私は彼女が不在なので失望した。I was disappointed at her absence.



洪水のため米は不作だった。The rice crop was poor, owing to the floods.



僕は君の意見に不賛成だがそれを述べる君の権利は最後まで護ってやろう。I disapprove of what you say, but I will defend to the death your right to say it.

この刀には不思議ないわれがある。This sword has a strange history.

アキレスはかかとを除いては不死身だった。Apart from his heel, Achilles was invulnerable.

この大きなソファーは小さな部屋には不似合いだろう。This large sofa would be out of place in a small room.
不時にそなえなくてはいけない。You should be prepared for emergencies.



我々二人がここにいるのは不自然だ。The two of us don't belong here.
大変ご不自由をおかけして申し訳ございません。I'm sorry to have caused you such inconvenience.彼らは何一つ不自由なものはなかった。They lacked for nothing.耳の不自由な人は手話で会話が出きる。Deaf people can talk in sign language.

彼は彼女の不実をたしなめた。He chided her for her unfaithfulness.


君の不首尾は承知している。I'm aware that you failed.
これらの２つの分子が異なったスピードで動いていることを示すだけでは不十分である。It is not enough to show that these two particles are moving at different speeds.
なぜあなたは上司に対して不従順なのですか。Why are you so insubordinate to your boss?



不純な飲料水は病気の媒体となりうる。Impure drinking water can be a carrier of diseases.

今年は天候不順だった。The weather has been unusual this year.






首を横に振ることで不承認を与える。They communicate disapproval by shaking their heads.




相次ぐ不祥事にも関わらず、警察はオメオメ違反切符を切っている。Despite their own scandals, the police continue to make arrests as though nothing had happened at all.






花子は不信に思って本当かどうか問いただした。Hanako questioned his sincerity.










警官が不審な歩行者をじっと見つめていた。A policeman was gazing at a suspicious pedestrian.





彼は金持ちだけれども、不親切だ。Though he is rich, he is unkind.





彼はそれを見るとふと魔がさして盗んだ。The sight tempted him to steal.





成功不成功は気質に左右されることが多い。Success often depends on one's temperament.




不整脈があります。I have an irregular pulse.
不正には抗議せざるをえない。You must speak out against injustice.
我々の実験の結果、彼の報告は不正確なことがわかった。Our experiment has revealed that his report was inaccurate.



あきれたことに、彼は試験中に不正行為をしていて見つけられた。To my dismay, he was caught cheating in the examination.
彼の収賄や不正事件や愛人などの噂は、じきにみな消え去った。All the rumors of his bribes, scandals and lovers soon blew over.

彼は私を不正直だと非難した。He charged me with dishonesty.





彼女は私を不誠実だと非難した。She charged me with dishonesty.

彼は僕に不摂生にならないようにと警告した。He cautioned me against being careless of my health.
彼の病気は不節制からきている。His illness stems from his intemperance.






システムのこの予測されなかった機能不全は不適切な配線系統によって引き起こされた。This unexpected malfunctioning of the system was caused by improper wiring.
彼女は買い物に出かけると、結局不相応な買い物をしてしまう。Whenever she goes shopping, she ends up buying more than she can afford.



不束者ですがよろしくお願いします。I'm not much good at anything, but please be kind to me.

食糧が不足している。Food has been in short supply.







小脳は血液の不断の供給を必要とする。The brain needs a continuous supply of blood.




そんな不注意な間違いをしてはいけません。Don't make such careless mistakes.
商売は先月ちょっと不調だった。Business was a little slow last month.

電話は不通なの。The phones aren't working.





needless to sayは不定詞の慣用表現として紹介されることが多いです。'Needless to say' is often used as an idiomatic expression in the infinitive.



その計画はいくつかの点で不適切なものであると思う。I find the plan to be unsatisfactory in several ways.
その水は飲むのに不適当だ。The water is not fit to drink.


この小切手は不渡りになりました。This check was not honored.


その男には別に不都合なところはなかったが、彼は何か邪悪なものを感じとった。He knew nothing bad about him, but he felt something evil.







その女性は不当に私を責めた。That woman has wrongly accused me.








彼が引き受けるべきだという私の考えは不動だ。I am adamant that he undertake it.
金儲けのことを除けば、私は不動産のことには興味はない。Apart from earning money, I have no interest in real estate.
その不動産屋はその夫婦に嘘をついた。The real estate man told lies to the couple.
不動産業者には独立した仲買人がたくさんいる。Real estate agencies have many independent brokers.







軍備競争の狂気と不道徳に終止符を打つ時が、人類にやってきた。The time has come for mankind to put an end to the madness and immorality of the arms race.

概して、日本の人々は外国語が不得意だ。As a rule, Japanese people are not good at foreign languages.

誰にでも得手不得手がある。Everyone has their own strong and weak points.





その不届きな野郎の顔を、拝ませてもらうか。Let's have a gander at this insolent man.



女性ホルモン分泌の乱れが不妊症の大きな原因です。Female hormone imbalance is a major cause of infertility.






説得不能を感知してか、黒崎先生はため息をついて席に着いた。Perhaps having realized it was impossible to persuade her, Ms. Kurosaki sighed and sat down in her seat.不能になりました。I've become impotent.




不発弾の危険性もあることから警察に通報し、現場にテープを張って立ち入りを防いでいる。There's also the danger of unexploded bombs, so they reported it to the police and the area was taped off to keep people out.


あなたは不必要な語は消したほうがよい。You should cross out any word you don't need.

国会は多分この不評の法律を改正するだろう。The Diet is likely to amend this unpopular law.

彼女は彼の不品行にそれとなくふれた。She made an allusion to his misconduct.



彼は不服そうに口をとがらせた。He pouted with dissatisfaction.
不服従でとがめられた。I was condemned for my disobedience.






君はいつも不平を言っている。You are always complaining.

君の不平不満にはうんざりだよ。I'm tired of your complaints.

不偏不党の精神で、などとかっこ付けているけど、結局のところ自分の意見を持っていないだけじゃないの。He puts on a show of being impartial and unbiased, but I think he's just a guy with no opinion of his own.
これ不変の真理なり。This is an immutable truth.

ここは公共の乗り物が不便だ。This place isn't convenient to public transportation.

皆が不法外国人に対して敵対的な態度を取った。Everybody took a hostile attitude toward illegal aliens.




政府は取締の一環として不法入国外国人を追放しています。The government is expelling illegal aliens as part of a crackdown.
彼女は不本意ながらもそうした。She did it against her will.


何がそんなに不満ですか。What made you so dissatisfied?
あなたは満足していますか、それとも不満足ですか。Are you satisfied or dissatisfied?

すき腹にまずいものなし。Hunger is the best sauce.彼の筆跡は大変まずい。なにがなんだかわからない。His handwriting is very poor, I cannot make head or tail of it.あ！まずい！ガソリンが切れてきた。Oh, no! We're running out of gas.
過労やら不眠やらで、彼はとうとう病気になってしまった。What with fatigue and lack of sleep, he has fallen ill at last.
彼女は不眠症から解放された。She was relieved from insomnia.
父は不眠不休で働いた。My father worked hard night and day.

君の不正行為は我が校の不名誉だ。Your wrongdoing is a disgrace to our school.
良い新聞記者は、どんなニュース源からも、つまり、出所不明型のニュース源からも、学びとれるものはなんでも利用する。A good newspaper reporter takes advantage of what he learns from any source, even the "little bird told him so" type of source.
それらの範囲や形は不明確である。Their scope and shape is unclear.
式に余分の変数を加えたことによって、この実験結果は不明瞭なものになっている。The result of this experiment is obscured by the extra variables added in the formula.
この帳簿には不明朗な点がたくさんある。There are many questionable points in this ledger.
魂は不滅だとプラトンは考えた。Plato held that the soul is immortal.





私は非常に不愉快だ。I'm really unhappy about this.

彼の不注意さは不用意だった。No attention was paid to his warning.
不用品を送っていただいた方にもれなくプレゼントいたします。Those who send in old junk they don't use anymore will, without exception, receive a present.
あの先生タバコで肺がんになったんだって。医者の不養生、そのものだね。For him a doctor to get lung cancer from smoking - it's a typical case of 'Do as I say not as I do.'

この証拠は彼にとって不利だった。This evidence was against him.





彼は不慮の死を遂げた。He died an unnatural death.
彼は不良仲間とぐるになっていた。He fell into bad company.不良たちは彼を殴り倒して財布を奪った。The delinquents knocked him down and stole his wallet.

その不良少年は自転車を盗んだことで告発された。The delinquent boy was arraigned for stealing a bicycle.



私に言わせれば君は不良品をつかまされたのだよ。I think they sold you a bad article if ask me.

隣の人が若い女の人と不倫しているらしいよ。Did you hear that our neighbor was fooling around with a younger woman?








２人の少年は口論がもとで不和になった。A quarrel estranged one boy from the other.






彼のぶしつけな質問に少女は当惑した様子だった。The girl looked embarrassed at his rude question.


真相は絶対秘密に付されている。The truth of the matter is kept absolutely secret.
我々は時勢に遅れずに付いて行かなければならない。We must keep up with the times.





彼とは仕事の上だけのつきあいだ。He's just a business associate.



場所の確認：見合いの場所を本人か付き添い人が下見をしておきましょう。Location check: The parties involved themselves or their attendants should look over the place for the miai meeting in advance.

彼は叔母に付き添われていた。He was accompanied by his aunt.
あの事故には何かなぞめいたものがつきまとっている。There is something mysterious about the accident.悲しい思い出がいつもその子につきまとっている。Sad memories always haunt the child.

人生には浮き沈みがつきものだ。Life is full of ups and downs.
ボイラは湯あかがびっしりついた。The boiler was heavily scaled.それらの牛には焼き印がついている。The cattle are marked with brands.彼は妻が死んで以来酒を飲む癖がついた。He has taken to drinking since the death of his wife.
つけでお願いします。I want to put this on house charge.
１月７日付けのお手紙、ありがとうございました。Thank you very much for your letter of January 7th.
おまえの上着は私の勘定につけておきなさい。Put your coat on my account.自宅を改築する際に、この部屋にだけ防音設備と内鍵を付けたんだ。When my home had an extension built I only had this room fitted with soundproofing and an internal lock.鎧をつけている人は、転ぶと大きな音がする。He who wears armor falls with a big crash!

リストに彼の名前をつけ加えた。I added his name to the list.










彼は私の年の若い事に付け込んだ。He took advantage of my youth.
彼女は耳のつけ根まで赤くなった。She colored up to her temples.







「すぐ帰ってくるから」と彼は付け足した。"I'll be back in a minute," he added.





彼女はその男の弱点につけいった。She presumed on his weakness.











スミスのアプローチは、接辞付加ということを考慮に入れない点でほかと非常に異なっている。Smith's approach differs greatly from others in that he did not take the affixation into consideration.






この付近はモダンな建物が多い。There are many modern buildings around here.








エアコンはオプションの付属品です。An air conditioner is available as an optional extra.






海の植物は海底に付着して育つ。Marine plants grow on the sea bed.


この社会が若さということにそのような感情的特権を付与するというのは誤解を引き起こしやすいと思う。I find it apt to cause misunderstanding that society confers such emotional privileges upon youth.


コピーするページに付箋をつけておいてください。Put a tag on the pages you want copied.
ジムは埠頭へ釣りに行った。Jim went fishing from the pier.
妻は夫より長生きするものだ。Wives usually outlive husbands.



ジョーンズ夫妻は娘を愛している。The Joneses love their daughter.

ヤング夫人は、私が突然訪ねても気にしないでしょう。Mrs. Young wouldn't mind my dropping in on her unexpectedly.

夫婦喧嘩したがすぐ仲直りした。The couple quarreled, but soon made up.
妻の思いがけない死は、５０年以上にわたる、幸福な夫婦生活に終止符をうった。The untimely death of my wife has brought down the curtain on over 50 years of happily married life.
結婚生活は夫婦仲が良ければ天国であり、夫婦仲が悪ければこの世の地獄である。Marriage, in peace, is this world's paradise; in strife, this life's purgatory.






あなたに面会したいという婦人がいます。There's a lady asking for you.
産科・婦人科の計６１床も満床で、受け入れは不可能と答えたという。They replied that because all 61 beds in the obstetrics/gynaecology department were full, no admissions were possible.



婦長と話したいのですが。Can I speak to the head nurse?
神は私に富をお恵みくださった。God has blessed me with riches.
その土壌は腐植に富んでいます。That soil is rich in humus.どんなに富んでも彼は決して満足しない。No matter how rich he may be, he is never contented.



その大富豪は貧しい少年として生涯を始めた。The millionaire began life as a poor boy.

ここから富士山が見えるよ。Mt Fuji can be seen from here.
早寝、早起きは人を健康に、富裕に、賢明にする。Early to bed and early to rise, makes a man healthy, wealthy and wise.

この布は裂けやすい。This cloth tears easily.
マユコはふきんでテーブルをふいた。Mayuko wiped a table with a cloth.
その国は隣国に対し宣戦を布告した。The country declared war against its neighbor.

１発目のローキックはこの布石か！？The first low kick was the set-up for this!?
朝になると布団を片づけます。In the morning, we put away our futons.
府県はフランスや日本の行政区域である。Prefectures are governmental divisions of France and Japan.


彼女はヘビをとてもこわがっている。She has a great fear of snakes.
盲ヘビに怖じず。Fools rush in where angels fear to tread.



あなたには扶養しなければならない大きな家族がある。だが危険をおかしてまで大きな利益を得ようとするな。You have a large family to support; don't play for high stakes.


私は、ポーチに敷く木製のデッキパネルを購入したいと思います。I would like to purchase a wooden deck panel that can be laid on the porch.禁酒法のしかれていた時代に、酒類密輸入の悪どい商売を腕ずくで自分の支配下におくために、てき屋たちは、おたがいに殺しあっていた。During prohibition days, racketeers used to rub each other out to get control of the rum-running racket.
もう二度とこの家の敷居はまたがない。I'll never set foot in this house again.
敷金は必要ですか。Do you require a security deposit?
鉄道がこの街に敷設された。A railroad was constructed in this town.
その敷地は軍事上の目的で利用されている。The site is used for military purposes.

彼はおのでその木を切り倒した。He cut down the tree with an ax.

テレビの普及によって我々の読書の時間がかなり奪われている。The spread of television has considerably deprived us of our time for reading.






私は普段バスで通学しています。I usually go to school by bus.
日曜日は私にとって普通の日ではない。Sunday is not an ordinary day to me.幸福を願うのはごく普通のことだ。It is only normal to want to be happy.彼女は普通９時に寝る。She usually goes to bed at nine.









これは普通列車ですか。Is this a local train?





その木は空にくっきりと浮かび上がっていた。The tree was clearly defined against the sky.
彼は小さな船を水に浮かべている。He is sailing a little boat on the water.怪物は残酷な微笑みを浮かべた。The monster's smile was cruel.
パーティーでみんな浮かれている。The party puts everyone in high spirits.

彼が叫ぶと、首の静脈がはっきりと浮き上がった。When he shouted, the veins in his neck stood out clearly.
サッカーチーム全体が優勝して浮き浮きしてた。The whole soccer team was on cloud nine after winning the championship.
爪先が浮きたっちゃうよ。That keeps me on my toes.
それから彼女はあおむけに浮いていた。Then she was floating on her back.若者ばかりのそのコンサート会場で、おじさんの私はすっかり周りから浮いていた。Being at the concert hall full of young kids made an old duffer like me feel out of tune.
１枚の落ち葉が水面に浮かんでいた。A fallen leaf floated on the surface of the water.浮かんだと思うとまた沈む。Now it rises, now it sinks.２週間新しいプロジェクトについて考えていましたが、よい考えが浮かびませんでした。I had been thinking about our new project for two weeks, but I couldn't come up with a good idea.

彼は決して浮気をしなかった。He was always faithful to his wife.彼女は浮気な女で本当に誰でも相手にする。She is a loose woman and will honestly go with anyone.



手足がむくんでいます。My hands and legs are swollen.
潜水艦は沈んで二度と浮上しなかった。The submarine sank, never to rise again.






塩水の方が淡水よりも浮力が大きい。Salt water is more buoyant than fresh water.

浮浪者は教会での感謝祭の夕食をがつがつ食べた。The tramp gobbled down the Thanksgiving dinner served at the church.
私の父は大の旅行好きです。My father is a great traveler.彼は現代人類学の父として熱烈な支持を受けている。He is hailed as the father of modern anthropology.彼らはチョーサーを英詩の父と呼んだ。They referred to Chaucer as the father of English poetry.





あなたのお父上にお会いするのを楽しみにしています。I'm looking forward to seeing your father.
その少年は父親に似ている。The boy takes after his father.
ケンは父母がけんかしたときはいつも母の味方をする。Ken always stands up for his mom when his parents quarrel.





その記事は事実と符合しない。This account does not agree with the facts.




これらのオレンジは腐っている。These oranges have gone bad.

腐れ縁と思ってあきらめる。Make the best of one's lot with fatal resignation.

その神社の腐食の原因の一つは酸性雨である。The decay of the shrine is due, in part, to acid rain.ほら、錆で金属がどんどん腐食しているよ。Hey, rust is eating away the metal.


食品包装は腐敗を減らす。Food packaging reduces spoilage.


あ、あれ？なんか・・・すっごい負のオーラを感じますよ？E-eh? I somehow seem to feel a very threatening aura...
負うた子に教えられて浅瀬を渡る。A child on your back may guide you across a ford.これについては私がすべて責任を負います。I will accept full responsibility for this.彼は致命傷を負った。He suffered a fatal wound.
あんなやつを負かすのはお茶の子さいさいだ。I can beat him hands down.
どっちに転んでも君の負けだよ。Either way, you lose.

３対０で彼には負けています。He's beating me, three to zip.


負け犬になるわけにはいかない。I can't stand getting beaten.
日本の市場が閉鎖的だという非難は、負け惜しみにすぎません。Criticisms that Japan's market is closed are just sour grapes.

彼女は赤ん坊をおんぶしていた。She carried a baby on her back.
あの若夫婦は今でも親におんぶに抱っこだ。That young couple are still tied to their parent's apron strings.
部分一致検索はサーバーに負荷がかかるから、やめたほうがいいね。You shouldn't do partial-word searches, since they put a lot of strain on the server.

その金は負債の支払いに充当することになっている。The money is to be applied to the debt.

彼はその事故で負傷した。He was injured in the accident.
負傷者たちは快方に向かっている。The wounded are getting better.

彼は、両親の負担になった。He was a burden to his parents.





決心がつきかねたので、私は感情のおもむくままに行動した。I couldn't decide what to do, so I just followed my heart.




上司を侮辱するような危険をおかすな。Don't risk insulting your boss.
家では赤味がかった髪とそばかすのせいで、母が侮蔑を込めて「にんじん」と名付け、皆にもそう呼ばせています。At home, because of his reddish hair and freckles, his mother scornfully named him "carrot" and had everybody else call him that.

母はため息をつきながら、高校一年生にもなった息子の頭をがしがしと撫でた。Mom sighed, and tousled the hair of her first-year high school son's head.




髪の毛を後ろになでつけた。He combed back his hair.











その軍隊は十分な武器を持っていた。The troops had plenty of arms.





















彼は二者択一を選ぶことでしょう。武術か死か。Which will he choose, I wonder, martial arts or death?




彼らは銃で武装した。They armed themselves with guns.

























国際紛争解決のために武力に訴えてはならない。We should not resort to arms to settle international disputes.







煙は空中へと舞い上がった。The smoke ascended into the air.

ヒラヒラと桜の花が舞っている。もうお花見の季節も終わりだな。It looks like cherry blossom-viewing season is at an end. You can see the petals fluttering down.




踊り手たちは舞台を横切って軽々と踊っていった。The dancers tripped lightly across the stage.最高の舞台だった。The performance was excellent.その物語の舞台は明治末期の日本である。The setting of the story is Japan in the late Meiji period.


机の上に舞踏についての本がある。There is a book on dancing on the desk.
彼は舞踏会を催した。He gave a ball.


舞踊がみたいのですが情報をください。I'd like to see some dancing. Do you have any information?
このワインは葡萄から作られています。This wine is made from grapes.
ここで造られたぶどう酒はすごく有名です。Wine made here is very famous.


ニンジンやカブは食用根菜です。Carrots and turnips are edible roots.
新サービスの料金設定はマーケティング部が行う。The marketing department is responsible for pricing new service.バドミントン部はまともな部員が極端に少ないため、ほとんど廃部ないし休部状態だった。There were so few proper members in the badminton club that it was half-way between dead and 'on break'.

ビルは編集部員です。Bill is on the editorial staff.
マユコは部屋に入った。Mayuko entered the room.私の部屋は４階にあります。My apartment is on the fourth floor.
あなたの部屋代は一月とどこおっています。You're a month behind in your rent.
彼はパジャマの上に部屋着を着ていた。He wore a robe over his pajamas.
主任は部下を意のままに支配している。The boss controls his men at will.

私はいわば部外者だった。I was an outsider, so to speak.



その新聞は発行部数が多い。The newspaper has a large circulation.
その部族は祖先を崇拝している。That tribe worships its ancestors.
その大尉はうまく部隊を指揮している。That captain handles his troops well.


ＡＢソフトウエアの海外営業部長をご紹介いただけませんか。Would you please put me in touch with the General Manager of Overseas Sales of AB Software Ltd?あなたは充分可愛い女の子の範疇に入ると思います。部長のおめがねには余裕でかなってしまうでしょう。I think you fall well within 'cute girl'. You'd easily go and pass in his judgement.

この車の予備の部品を買うことができない。I cannot buy spare parts for this car.
オレの醜い部分がオレを引き裂く。The ugly side of myself tears me up.

それは部分的な成功でしかなかった。It was only a partial success.


歴史学は人文科学の一部門である。History is a branch of the humanities.
移住者の部落が野蛮人によって征服され、移住者の希望も生活も土壇場にきた時、長い歳月をかけての不幸とのたたかいに終止符がうたれた。Years of resistance to misfortune ended when the settlers' village was overcome by the savages and their hopes and lives came to the bitter end.


いったん封を切るとそのテープは返品できません。Once you break the seal, you can't return the tape.
人間の心は昔から数々の宝を隠し持っており、それは秘かに保持され、沈黙のうちに封じ込まれている。The human heart has hidden treasures, in secret kept, in silence sealed.
原子核には大量のエネルギーが封じ込められている。A great deal of energy is locked up in the nucleus.

前世紀の中頃まで日本が封建国家であったことは、よくしられている。It is well known that up to the middle of the last century Japan was a feudal state.
日本の封建時代には、最大の土地を所有した領主は「大名」と呼ばれた。In feudal Japan, the lord with the largest land holdings was called a "daimyo."

この港は封鎖されうる。The harbor can be blocked.


その映画は何時封切りになりますか。When will the film be released?
だれがこの封筒を破って開けたのか。Who has torn the envelope open?


カーテンが風になびいた。The curtains blew in the wind.
それをどんな風に実行したらいいかが問題だ。The question is how to carry it out.あなたのサロン風のスカートが好きです。I like your sarong style skirt.
風雨をもろともせず駅まで歩いた。We braved the elements to walk to the station.


岩が風化して奇異な形になる。The rocks are weathered into fantastic forms.

そのレストランは独特の風格がありますね。The restaurant goes its own way.
この町の風紀は乱れている。Public morals have been corrupted in this town.


とても美しい風景がいくつかありました。I saw some very beautiful scenes.

風向きが悪くなってきた。The situation is becoming unfavorable.
その劇は政界を風刺したものだ。The play is a satire on the political world.

ジョンは先週ひどい風邪をひいた。John had a bad cold last week.
その風習はすたれつつある。That custom is on the decrease.




風船が空に上がっていった。The balloon went up in the sky.
風速冷却指数を考慮に入れると、気温は零下３０度以下であったに違いない。When we take the wind-chill factor into account, the temperature must have been lower than thirty degrees below zero centigrade.
その地方ではその古い風俗がなお存続している。The old custom is still kept up in that district.



少しは世間の風潮に合わせるほうが賢明かもしれない。It might be discreet of you to bend a little to the prevailing wind.
この部屋は風通しがよい。This room has fine ventilation.
スポロアウト先生が植物を新しい風土に馴染ませた。Professor Sprout acclimated the plant to a new environment.
風土病に対する予防接種を受けていたのは１００人中１人にも満たないということが見出された。It was discovered that less than one child in a hundred had been inoculated against endemic disease.
かなり大勢の学生がアメリカの風物に興味をもっている。A good many people have an interest in things American.




インカ人はヨーロッパ人よりも多く風呂へ入った。The Inca took baths more often than Europeans.
火事は風呂屋からでた。The fire started in the bathhouse.
月曜日にエヴァンス夫人はブリキの風呂桶で全員の衣類を洗いました。Every Monday Mrs. Evans washed all the family's clothes in the tin bath.

母は私に風呂場の掃除をさせた。Mother made me clean the bathroom.
彼は風呂敷を十分に活用した。He took full advantage of the wrapper.






私は頭痛で臥せっていました。I've been down with a headache.床に伏せろ！Get down!この言葉は、名前は伏せておくがある人が言ったものだ。These words were spoken by someone who shall be nameless.











容姿端麗、頭脳明晰、運動神経抜群、家は金持ちで、ついでに学生会の副会長をしてたりもする、いわゆるパーフェクトな奴だ。Looks, brains, reflexes, rich family and, for good measure, vice president of the student committee - in other words he's 'perfect'.

農民はしばしば収入を補うために副業をします。Farmers often moonlight to supplement their incomes.

この薬に副作用はありません。This medicine has no side effects.
改良された医療技術は、宇宙開発計画の副産物として派生したものの一つである。Improved medical technology has been one of the spin-offs of the space program.


英語の副詞の中には形容詞の役目をするものがある。Some English adverbs function as adjectives.

社長は来ないで代わりに副社長をよこした。The president did not come, but sent the vice-president in his stead.













副大統領はメッセージをラジオで伝えた。The Vice-President transmitted the message by radio.








３０年前のファッションが復活した。Fashions of thirty years ago have come back in style.いわば彼は死から復活したのだ。He rose from the dead, so to speak.

二年後にその歌手は復帰した。Two years later, the singer came back.

現在、通常のサービスの早急な復旧に努めています。We are currently working to restore normal service as soon as possible.
それはさらにいっそうの活力で復興した。It revived with even greater vigor.

その塔を復元してはどうかと提案された。It was suggested that the tower be restored.


その課の復習をしましたか。Have you gone over the lesson?
大波がその男をボートからさらっていった。A big wave swept the man off the boat.


これは、あの殺人的な公爵に復讐しようという彼の願いを強めただけだ。This only increased his desire to be revenged on the murderous duke.
全国教育情報センターによれば、退職した教員が復職しているおかげで、予測された教員不足は起こらないだろう、ということです。The National Center for Education Information says a predicted teacher shortage won't pan out because teachers who left the profession are returning.




幅の広い川はゆっくりと流れる。The broad river flows slowly.
あのドレスには幅広の革のベルトが似合うでしょう。A wide leather belt would look good with that dress.
彼は幅広い経験を積んでいる人だ。He is a man of wide experience.
カール・ランジの記録破りの幅跳びに、観衆は息を呑んだ。Karl Lange's record breaking long jump took the crowd's breath away.
彼は濡れた服を火にあぶってかわかした。He dried his wet clothes by the fire.
これ以上あなたに服従するのはお断りする。I refuse to obey you any longer.

あなたは服装の趣味がいい。You have good taste in clothes.
私が驚いたことには、彼は服毒自殺した。To my shock, he killed himself by taking poison.
彼の息子は服役中である。His son is serving his sentence.

食後にこの薬を服用しなさい。Take this medicine after meals.
災いを転じて福としなさい。Turn your misfortune to account.


彼らはキリストの福音を全世界に広めた。They spread the Gospel all over the world.
彼の福祉の概念はかなり観念的だ。His notion of welfare is pretty abstract.


只見町は福島県南会津地方にあり、急峻な山を隔てて新潟との県境に位置しています。Tadami is in Minamiaizu in Fukushima; cut off by steep mountains and located on the prefecture border with Niigata.
国民の福利は政府の責任だ。The well being of the nation is the government's responsibility.
カンガルーの雌は子供を腹の袋に入れて動く。A female kangaroo carries its young in the pouch.あの人は口と腹が反対だ。He says one thing and means another.




おまえの腹黒い魂は、中まで腐ってる。Your black soul, rotten to the core.



彼は私の主人の腹心の友。He is my boss's friend and confidant.

この腹痛には耐えられません。I can't stand this stomach-ache.
その男の子はテレビを見ながら腹這いに寝そべっていた。The boy was lying on his stomach watching TV.
その一撃は彼の腹部をとらえた。The blow caught him in the stomach.


彼は腹立たしげに彼女を見た。He looked at her angrily.
彼は腹立ちまぎれにテーブルをたたいた。He pounded the table in a fit of anger.





あれはとても複雑な機械だ。That is a very complex machine.

現代の社会問題はますます複雑化する傾向がある。The social problems of the day tend to be more and more complicated.

エジソンは複写の装置を発明した。Edison invented a device for duplication.



君が見ている絵はピカソの複製だ。The picture you are looking at is a copy of a Picasso.




最高裁は原判決をくつがえしました。The Supreme Court overturned a previous decision.

諺に、覆水盆に返らずと言う。The proverb says that what is done cannot be undone.
覆面をした男達が旅客を襲って金を奪った。Masked men held up the passengers and robbed them of their money.



月に１万円づつ銀行に払い込んだ。I put ten thousand yen into the bank every month.
彼は不安を払いのけようとした。He tried to banish his anxiety.

サラは払い戻してもらう事を要求した。Sarah demanded that she be given a refund.
払えるかどうか分からないざます。I'm not sure I can afford it.ジャックはブラシで上着のほこりを払った。Jack brushed the dust off his coat.



ジェシーはコーヒーを入れる為にお湯を沸かしている。Jessie is boiling water to make coffee.相手チームがあまり闘志をわかしていなかったので、我々は楽勝した。The opposing team did not put up much of a fight, so we won hands down.

彼は胸中に愛国心が湧き上がるのを感じた。He felt patriotism rise in his breast.
彼女の勇敢な行為に国中がわきかえった。Tales of her courageous deeds rang through the country.
広場は興奮でわきたった。The square buzzed with excitement.

水は摂氏100度で沸騰する。Water boils at 100 degrees Celsius.水は充分に加熱すると沸騰する。Water will boil if heated enough.国内は防衛問題で沸騰した。The country seethed over the issue of national defense.



あの人は仏のような人だ。He is a saint of a man.









京都は神社や仏閣で有名だ。Kyoto is famous for its shrines and temples.






仏教はインドに起源を発した。Buddhism had its beginnings in India.



ジムは仏語と独語が自由に使える。Jim mastered French and German.




















この仏像の年代は正確に推定することができない。This Buddhist image cannot be dated exactly.



















遠まわしに物を言うな。Don't beat around the bush.ロバートは週末は店でよく父を手伝ったものだった。Robert used to help his father in the store on weekends.あなたの妹さんに会いたいものです。I'd like to see your sister.


少年は物音に震えた。The boy quivered at the sound.
物価はまもなく下がるはずだ。Prices ought to come down soon.

その作品が画壇に大いに物議をかもした。This artwork excited much controversy in the world of art.

もっとしっかり仕事をしてよ。今回は物見遊山の旅じゃないんだから。Buckle down and get to work. Do you think we're on a Sunday picnic here?
これは、ある猫についての物語です。This is a story about a cat.
この話はアメリカに起こっていることについて多くを物語っている。This story says a lot about what has happened to America.子供が健康だということは母親の育て方が立派であるということを物語る。The child's good health says a great deal for maternal care.

丁寧な物腰は日本人に特徴的だ。A polite manner is characteristic of Japanese people.
共立物産に、貴社にご助力をお願いするよう提案しました。We suggested Kyoritsu Bussan approach you for assistance.
ものさしでその棒の長さを測りなさい。Measure the length of the stick with a ruler.
お金は物資を売買したり、価値を測ったり、富を蓄えたりするのに使われる。Money is used for buying or selling goods, measuring value and storing wealth.
あるがままに物事を見るようにしなさい。Try to see things as they are.
その物質は酸で処理しなければならない。The substance must be treated with acid.



コンピューターを物色して歩いたあげく、デイヴィドより２００ドル安い値段で手に入れた。I shopped around for my computer and ended up paying $200 less than David.

試してみると、アレックスは単に物まねをしているのではないことがわかった。Tests showed that Alex wasn't just mimicking.
彼女はものすごい食欲がある。She has a gigantic appetite.ものすごい叫び声に彼はぞっとした。The sound of an awful scream made him shudder.
地震の後、この辺りは物騒だ。After the earthquake the neighbourhood felt insecure.
このドラマは単純な勧善懲悪もので、今一つ深みに欠けて物足りない。This drama is missing something. All it is is a simple cautionary tale with no real depth.


例えば、ペパーバーグは緑色のもくせいの留めくぎと赤色の紙の三角形のような物体を見せる。For example, Pepperberg would show Alex an object, such as a green wooden peg or a red paper triangle.
物置に鍵をかけるのを忘れちゃった。I forgot to lock the storeroom.
町の人達は物珍しそうに私を見た。The townspeople looked curiously at me.


この価格には、物品税は含まれていません。Commodity tax is not included in the price.
彼は物わかりのいい人だと思います。I account him to be a man of sense.

そして、どうすることも出来ない物憂さに、ふっとため息をつく。And then I breathe a sigh from melancholy in being unable to do anything about it.
人間の物欲はその収入が増すにつれて大きくなる。Men's wants become greater in proportion to the increase in their income.

物理は私の好きな科目だ。Physics is my favorite subject.
あの人は物理学の大家です。He is an authority on physics.
この理論は28才の物理学者が初めて提唱した。This theory originated with a twenty-eight-year-old physicist.
この現象に関してはまだ物理的な説明がなされていない。There is not a physical explanation for this phenomenon yet.

１０時４０分から１１時まで休み時間です。We have a break from 10:40 to 11:00.
その貸付金は、８分の利益を生む。The loan bears an 8% interest.彼のほうに分がある。The odds are in his favor.
これが君の分のケーキだよ。Here is your share of the cake.この品の税金分はむこうでお支払い下さい。Please pay the tax on the items over there.あなたは家賃の三ヶ月分を資金として払わなければならない。You are required to provide three months' rent in deposit.


我々はお互いに喜びをわかちあった。We partook in each other's joy.





その事実はだれにでもわかりきったことだ。The fact is apparent to everybody.



彼らは財産分けのことでもめている。They are arguing about their share of the property.
彼は自分の本を５分野に分けた。He grouped his books into five categories.ケーキをあなた方２人で分けなさい。Divide the cake between you two.母は子供たちに金をわけてやった。The mother divided the money among her children.
我々はその利益を分け合った。We shared the benefit together.





私はめいめいの子供にキャンディーを３つずつ分け与えた。I dealt out three candies to each child.





ウチも分煙しなきゃいけないよねぇ。We'll also have to create a separate smoking section, won't we?

暇なら分家の仕事を手伝って来い。If you've got the time help out with our relative's work.

マーケティング分科会の実際のミーティングは、１９９９年１月２７日の午後、カリフォルニア州サンフランシスコ・エアポートマリオットで行います。There will be an in-person meeting of the marketing subcommittee on Tuesday afternoon of Jan 27, 1999 at the San Francisco CA Airport Marriott.


時計を分解するのは組み立てるより簡単だ。Taking a watch apart is easier than putting it together.水は酸素と水素に分解できる。Water can be decomposed into oxygen and hydrogen.






クラスが大きすぎるので二つのより小さなグループに分割した。The class was too big so we split up into two smaller groups.

私は分割払いより一括払いの方がいい。I prefer payment in full to payment in part.



川は町の３キロ下流で分岐する。The river branches three kilometers below the town.
















町民は分厚いステーキを食べるのが好きだ。The townspeople like to eat thick steaks.

大学本部はニューヨークに分校を設立することを決定した。The University Administration decided to set up a branch campus in New York.



この百科事典は毎月分冊で発行されている。This encyclopedia is issued in monthly parts.





水分子は、２個の水素原子と１個の酸素原子からなる。A water molecule has two hydrogen atoms and one oxygen atom.これらの２つの分子が異なったスピードで動いていることを示すだけでは不十分である。It is not enough to show that these two particles are moving at different speeds.



文法屋に聞きたいんですが、「be+分詞」はV Cなどのように考えることはできないんですか？I'd like to ask a grammarian, isn't it possible to think of 'be + participle' like you do V C and such?







彼の考えは私たちが２台の車に分乗して行こうというものです。His idea is for us to go in two different cars.





時計には針が２本ある。時針と分針がそれだ。The clock has two hands, an hour hand and a minute hand.





彼は金融アナリストで経済動向の分析には定評がある。He's a financial analyst with a pretty good reputation for his analysis of economic trends.







私達は、家事を分担することで合意した。We agreed to share the housework.













彼らは利益を公平に分配した。They allotted the profits fairly.



乳首から分泌液が出ます。I have a discharge from my nipple.


この種の昆虫は日本に広く分布している。These insects are widely distributed throughout Japan.


彼はとびぬけて分別のある人だ。He is by far the most sensible.



私の娘は分娩中だ。My daughter is in labor.









彼はこの分野では草分けだ。He is a trailblazer in this field.
彼は息子達に財産を分与した。He settled his property on his sons.


マヨネーズの油は分離することがある。The oil in mayonnaise sometimes separates from the other ingredients.




その作り方の分量は六人分です。The recipe serves six people.


彼は書類の分類を終えた。He finished sorting the papers.




党派は二つに分裂した。The party was split up into two.



その火山は今年２度噴火した。The volcano has erupted twice this year.


超高圧水の噴射により、ほとんどの詰まりが排除される。By means of a super high-pressure water spray practically all the sediment is removed.
その煙突は真っ黒い煙を噴出している。The chimney is belching black smoke.
駅の前に噴水があります。There is a fountain in front of the station.

全地球は有名人の墳墓である。The whole earth is the sepulchre of famous men.

彼は友人の行動に憤慨した。He resented his friend's action.


僕たちはたき火の周りを踊って回った。We danced about the fire.
このスローガンは国民を奮い立たせる意図で作られた。The slogan was designed to rouse the people.

重役会議で、彼は勇気を奮って口火を切った。He got up enough guts to break the ice at the board meeting.



人々は貧困に向かって奮闘した。People struggled against poverty.
彼は奮発して新車を買った。He treated himself to a new car.
この小麦は粉にされる。This wheat is made into flour.


何か重い兇器でやられたらしく、頭蓋骨は粉砕された。His head had been shattered by a savage blow from some heavy weapon.







アルミニウム、マグネシウム、シリコンなどの粉末が爆発する。Powders of aluminium, magnesium, silicon, etc. explode.
この粉薬は毎食後飲んでください。You have to take this powder after each meal.
お前の鼻をクソに擦りつけてやった。I sure rubbed your nose in shit.四天王も倒した、クソ長い地下迷宮もクリアした。I'd defeated the four sub-bosses and got through the damn long underground labyrinth.





ころんでこえだめに落ち、頭からどっぷりと浸かってしまった。He fell into the cesspool and got covered from head to toe.
長い旅行の退屈をミステリーを読んで紛らした。I distracted myself from the boredom of my long journey by reading mysteries.

彼女は様々の不安から気を紛らわせることができた。She could divert herself from the anxieties.
私の手紙は郵送中にどこかに紛れてしまったに違いない。My letter must have gone astray in the mail.
泥棒は人ごみに紛れ込んだ。The thief whipped out into the crowd.


あなたのために紛失した指輪を探してあげましょう。I will find you your lost ring.
紛争のない人間社会はありえない。There can be no human society without conflict.
そのホテルは贅沢な雰囲気がある。The hotel has an air of luxury.

私の後について各文を復唱しなさい。Repeat each sentence after me.文は武に勝る。The pen is mightier than the sword.


両地域は宗教と文化が違っている。The two regions differ in religion and culture.
今年の文化の日は月曜にあたる。Culture Day falls on Monday this year.
次の文化祭で初めて主役を演じることになっています。He will play the leading role for the first time in the next school festival.

その家族の文化的背景を考察することが非常に重要である。It is very important to consider the cultural background of the family.


彼女はフランス文学を専攻している。She majors in French literature.
新聞に今年の文学作品に対する論評が載っている。A criticism of literary works this year is in the paper.





そんなことは君が文句を言う理由にはならないよ。That doesn't give you grounds for complaining.その文句は、人を侮辱するためのものだ。The phrase is meant to insult people.
これらの文型は文の作り方を示している。These patterns show you how to make sentences.





その事実は古い文献のいくつかに見出される。The facts are buried in a few old books.
それらの書物で立派な文庫ができるだろう。Those books will make a fine library.
とある映画を文庫化した―いや、映画の為に書かれたシナリオを小説として加筆修正し、日本語にローカライズしたものだ。A certain movie was novelized - rather it was a scenario written for a movie that was expanded as a novel and localized to Japanese.
文庫本にカバーをかけた方がいいです。It's best to put covers on paperbacks.


へー、キーボード見ないで文字打てるんだ。スゴイわねー。Oh? You can type without looking at the keyboard. That's cool!
全角文字を含むファイル名の場合、一部のＯＳでは文字化けが生じることがありますので、ダウンロードの際に適宜ファイル名を変更してください。On some OS's you get gibberish for filenames with full-width characters so when downloading please change to a suitable filename.

私はおろかにもその慣用語句を文字通りの意味で解釈してしまった。I foolishly interpreted the idiom according to its literal sense.かわいそうにその犬は文字通りライオンに引き裂かれてしまった。The poor dog was literally torn apart by the lion.




彼の文章はとても主観的だ。His writing is very subjective.次の文章を日本語に直しなさい。Put the following sentences into Japanese.



あの作家の文体は優れている。The writer has an excellent style.



私には文通する友人がいる。I have a friend I correspond with.
彼女は文筆で生活を立てている。She lives by her pen.

スピーチコンテストは文部省後援のもとに開催された。The speech contest was held under the auspices of the Ministry of Education.

文法屋に聞きたいんですが、「be+分詞」はV Cなどのように考えることはできないんですか？I'd like to ask a grammarian, isn't it possible to think of 'be + participle' like you do V C and such?
この文は文法的に正しい。This sentence is grammatically correct.
私はこのペンを近所の文房具店で買った。I bought this pen at the stationer's around the corner.
言葉の意味は文脈によって変わりうる。The meaning of words can change according to their context.

１９世紀は白人文明の時代だった。The nineteenth century was the age of the white man's civilization.
われわれは文明社会に生きている。We live in a civilized society.
手紙の文面は次の通り。The letter runs as follows.
その国の人口の３分の１は文盲である。One third of the population of that country cannot read.

そのことについてできるだけ話を聞かしてください。Tell me as much about that as possible.
助けを求めている私の声を彼に聞かせるのに苦労した。I had trouble making him hear me calling for help.あの男を説き伏せようとするのは、オオカミに道理を説いて聞かせるようなものだ。You might as well reason with the wolf as try to persuade that man.




みんなは彼女の歌に聞きほれた。They were all charmed by her song.


あなたの姓が聞き取れませんでした。I didn't catch your last name.

警察はその女から何も聞き出せなかった。The police were unable to get anything out of the woman.



そのうちペンが手から滑り落ちてしまい、ただ聞き入るだけでした。Then the pen fell from my hand and I just listened.
市長は私達の願いを聞き入れてくれた。The mayor granted our request.彼らが君の助言を聞き入れなかったのは愚かな事だった。They were stupid not to follow your advice.
私の声を聞きつけて、私の犬は耳をそばだてた。At the sound of my voice, my dog pricked up his ears.


小鳥の声を聞き分けることが出来ますか。Can you tell one bird from another by hearing them?
私たちは一言も聞き漏らさないように注意深く聞いていた。We listened carefully in order not to miss a single word.



しかし、たいへん息子を欲しがっていました。But he wanted a son very much.
お金はほとんどない。しかしながら、私はあなたといれば幸せだ。I have little money. However, I feel happy with you.



彼はそれをした、しかも彼女のいる前で。He did it, and in her presence.




その帝国はすべての小国を併合した。The empire absorbed all the small states.







金銭的に余裕があるのなら併用しても構わないが催眠だけで、十分に効果がある。If you have the money, then you may use it with other treatments, but the results from hypnotism alone should be plenty.
彼は常に強者に対抗して弱者を味方にした。He was always on the side of the weak against the strong.

それは五千人の兵員を擁する大部隊なのです。That is a large force with 5,000 soldiers.








核兵器を全面的に禁止して初めて、兵器競争を止めさせることができる。Only by prohibiting nuclear weapons altogether can we stop the arms race.







兵庫県の人口はどれぐらいですか。What is the population of Hyogo prefecture?

兵士たちは足踏みをしていた。The soldiers were marking time.
















その市はやがて兵隊によって占領された。The city was soon occupied by the soldiers.











しかし人々は政府に対して５年間の兵役を努めなければならなかった。But every man had to give five years of service to the government.






敵は新兵力を投入した。The enemy flung fresh troops into the battle.








塀に登るな。Don't climb up the wall.家の周りに塀が立っている。A fence runs around the house.

人は昔地球は平だと思っていた。People once held that the world was flat.他の役職なんて残ってないし。あとは平部員だけだよ。Well there aren't any other positions left. After that, all that is left is basic member.
古代人たちは地球は平たいと信じていた。The ancients believed the earth was flat.

どうかひらにご容赦ください。Please accept my humble apologies.
あの山の頂上は平らだ。The top of that mountain is flat.


彼はごちそうをすっかり平らげた。He ate every bit of his dinner.




これは平易な英語でかかれた書物です。This is a story written in easy English.


平泳ぎは出来るが、背泳ぎは出来ない。I can swim on my front but not on my back.


その市は一週間後に平穏に復した。The city was restored to tranquility after a week.
だれしも、楽しい青春を平穏無事な時期として想い起こす。Everyone remembers the happy days of his youth as his halcyon days.



驕る平家は久しからず。Pride will have a fall.





彼は平気でうそをつく。He has no scruples about lying.

最近の研究によれば、日本人の平均寿命はまだ伸びているそうだ。According to a recent study, the average life span of the Japanese is still increasing.
周波数の平均値は振幅の増大にしたがって減じる。The mean value of the frequency decreases with increasing amplitude.
最悪でも平均点は取れるだろう。At worst, I will get an average mark.



初秋の頃のほど、その平原が美しく見えるときはない。At no time does the plain look so perfect as in early autumn.



その少女は平行棒の練習をした。The girl exercised on the parallel bars.
彼は体の平衡を失って、ひっくり返った。He lost his balance and fell down.





私はその人に平謝りに謝った。I showed him my deepest regret.
昔は、悪いことをすると、学校の先生から平手をくらったり拳固をもらうことが当たり前だった。In the past it was perfectly normal to get the back of a teacher's hand or fist as punishment.
その子はお行儀悪くして母親に平手打ちされた。That kid got a slap from his mother for being rude.



社屋や従業員に被害はなく、平常通り営業している。There was no damage to the office, or workers, and we're in business as usual.








彼はやがて平静に戻った。He soon recovered his composure.
その政治家は平然と賄賂を受け取り、全ての契約の５％が濡れ手に粟で彼の懐に入った。The politician had sticky fingers, and 5% of every contract ended in his pocket.
平素からの当店に対するご愛顧に感謝しております。Thank you very much for patronizing our store for a long time.


平和への道は決して平坦ではない。The road to peace is never smooth.






すべての人間が平等に創られているわけではない。Not all men are created equal.


死は偉大な平等主義者である。Death is the great leveler.
平なべを火からおろしなさい。Take the pan off the fire.
平日料金と休日料金で、１万円も違うんだ。You have to pay 10,000 yen extra on holidays.
体温を計ってみましたが、平熱でした。I took my temperature, but it was normal.


農作物は平年並みだ。The crops are up to the average.




全国民は恐怖からこの独裁者の前にひれ伏した。The whole nation cringed before this dictator in fear.

どうか平服でおいで下さい。Please come in an ordinary dress.

縦横８フィートの部屋の面積は６４平方フィートである。The area of an 8-foot square room is 64 square feet.

この床の面積は６００平方メートルある。The area of this floor is 600 square meters.

僕らは９の平方根は３だと学校で習った。We learned at school that the square root of nine is three.

その模様の色は実に平凡なものである。The colors of the pattern are very ordinary.











私たちは山の上から平野を見下ろした。We looked down on the plain from the hilltop.



ハトは平和のシンボルである。The dove is a symbol of peace.


戦闘後、平和維持軍が平穏を取り戻すために活動しました。Peace-keeping troops moved in to restore calm after the battle.










１９７８年に日本と中国との間に平和条約が結ばれた。In 1978 a peace treaty was concluded between Japan and China.
マーティン・ルーサー・キング牧師の支持者の中には、平和的に抗議するという彼の信念に疑いの念を持つ物も現れ始めた。Some of Martin Luther King's supporters began to question his belief in peaceful protests.
国連は紛争の当事国に対し、対話による平和的解決を求めた。The United Nations called on the parties to the conflict to seek a peaceful resolution through dialogue.

脚韻と平仄が漢詩の基本的ルールとなっています。Rhyme and meter form the essential rules of Chinese poetry.

喫煙は体に弊害である。Smoking has an ill effect upon health.
弊社のエンジニアが日本国内で販売されている同様の製品と仕様を比較した結果、非常に競合力があると判断いたしました。Our engineers compared this information with similar products being sold in Japan and concluded that they might compete very well.

この赤色で柄全体がだいなしだ。The red kills the whole pattern.


席を確保するには列に並びさえすればいい。All you have to do to secure a seat is to wait in line.



列に並んで長い間待たされた後、身分証明として正式な出生証明書が必要だといわれた。After a long wait in line, she was told she should get a certified copy of her birth certificate as identification.彼は古今に並ぶ者のない偉大な政治家である。He is the greatest statesman that ever lived.
メイドはテーブルにナイフとフォークを並べた。The maid arranged the knives and forks on the table.屁理屈ばかり並べて、お前の言ってること全然筋が通ってないよ。All you do is string together a bunch of farfetched ideas. I can't understand a word of it.

家主は、この３日間暖房がきかなかった理由をあれこれ並べ立てたが、どうせ見え透いたウソだった。The landlord told me a cock and bull story about why we didn't have heat for three days.



このような苦しい時には、並たいていのことでは、会社の赤字をなくすことはできない。In hard times like this, no ordinary effort can get our company out of the red.







日本の米市場は輸入に対し閉ざされている。Japan's rice market is closed to imports.湖は氷に閉ざされた。The lake was bound in ice.

その子は猫をボール箱の中へ閉じ込めた。That child shut up a cat in the carton.
一日中閉じこもってるつもり？You can't stay in here all day.
どうかドアを閉めてくれませんか。Will you please shut the door?
国会は閉会して夏休みに入った。The Diet rose for summer recess.





彼はその問題で閉口していた。He was stumped by the problem.君のわがままには閉口する。I'm annoyed at your selfishness.
彼らはその学校の閉鎖について討論した。They debated closing the school.




この店はいつも８時に閉店する。This store always closes at eight.


わが国の主な農産物は米である。The chief crop of our country is rice.

日本の通貨は米ドルに対しこの１年で２５％強くなった。The Japanese currency has appreciated against the U.S. dollar by more than 25% over the past year.
※誤字直しました。ご指摘サンクスです。NOTE: Typo corrected. Thanks for pointing it out.
お米屋さんは、言わずと知れた斜陽産業。Needless to say, dealing in rice is a declining industry.
米価は政府によって統制されている。Rice prices are regulated by the government.






米航空宇宙局によれば、ガリレオ搭載のものと類似した発電機を搭載して行った宇宙飛行２２回のうち、３回の飛行で事故が発生したとのことです。NASA says three of 22 space missions that carried generators similar to Galileo's ended in accidents.
日本は米国と多額の貿易を行っている。Japan has much trade with the USA.
そういう習慣は米国人独特ではない。Such a custom is not peculiar to the Americans.
大統領や知事が立派に合法的に行動した場合には、米国民は彼らを再選し、彼らが属する政党に指示を送ることによって承認を表明する。When a president or a governor acts wisely and lawfully, Americans express their approval by reelecting him and by supporting his political party.

米作は今年豊作だ。The rice crop is large this year.































男はビンを壁に叩きつけた。The man dashed the bottle against the wall.

この壁画からは古代人の生活の片鱗をうかがうことができる。We can get a glimpse of the lifestyle of ancient people from this wall painting.

デスクトップの壁紙を犬の写真にした。I used a photo of my dog for my desktop wallpaper.
ダニに「さん」づけするのか。面白いコだな。"Mister"ing a tick? You're a funny kid.
その子は悪い癖が直った。He was cured of his bad habits.
朝寝坊が癖になった。I took to sleeping late in the morning.彼はポケットに手を入れるのが癖になっている。He has fallen into the habit of putting his hands into his pockets.






また別のときにチェスをしましょう。Let's play chess another time.これらの本を主題別に分類してください。Please classify these books by subject.
みんな手があり、足があり、頭があるんだし、みんな歩きもするし、話もするんだもの。でも、今や、これらの人たちを分け隔てようとする何かがあるわ。They all have arms, legs, and heads, and they walk and talk, but now there's SOMETHING that wants to make them different.


たまにまる一日ぼけっとしていても別に悪い事じゃない。It's no crime to just idle the whole day once in a while.ソースを別にください。I'd like the sauce on the side.
会うは別れの始め。To meet is to part.







コックとして彼は別格だ。As a cook he is in a class by himself.



別館は本館の北側にある。The annex is on the north of the original building.


彼は両親と別居している。He lives apart from his parents.





その二つの考えはまったく別個のものだ。Those two ideas are quite distinct.










別紙の注文書の通り注文いたします。I have enclosed your order form.













その別荘は清潔で整然としていた。The cottage was clean and tidy.

















学識と常識は別物だ。Learning is one thing, and common sense another.



彼は会社のために昼夜の別なく働いた。He worked day and night in the interest of his firm.
言うこととすることとは別問題だ。Saying is quite different from doing.



中世の教会は肉体をさげすみ霊をたたえた。The medieval church despised the body and exalted the spirit.

目下の者をないがしろにするな。Don't ignore your subordinates.



今日の私は、ひとえに両親のおかげです。I owe what I am today to my parents.





彼女は科学における性的偏見について書いた。She wrote on gender bias in science.










インフレを抑制しようとして金融政策に偏重すると、金融、したがって景気を必要以上に締め付けることになりかねない。Excessive reliance on monetary policy in an attempt to curb inflation could unnecessarily constrain credit and hence business.











そのオレンジは後味が変だった。The orange left a strange taste in my mouth.
なんで彼は考えを変えたのか。What made him change his mind?



何か変わったことが起こったの？Has anything strange happened?



ここでは天気は変わりやすい。The weather is changeable here.

あいつはなんて変わり者だ。What an oddball he is!

世紀の変わり目に子供たちはまだ工場で働いていた。At the turn of the century, children still worked in factories.
私のE-mailアドレスが変わりました。My e-mail address has been changed.彼は給料の良い会社に変わった。He moved to a good company that offered a good salary.最近変わった海洋生物が発見された。A strange marine creature was found recently.








より信頼できる仮説は、変域Ｔにおける要素の数を制限するものである。The most credible hypothesis is the one that limits the number of elements in the domain T.
このような接し方の変化は、他の変化もそうであるが、他の国においても起こっている。Like other changes, this change in attitude has occurred in other countries, too.この辺の山々は変化に富んでいる。The mountains in this part of the country are full of variety.この動詞の変化を言えますか。Can you conjugate this verb?




大統領の演説はアメリカ国民に変革をもたらした。The President's speech brought about a change in the American people.
このファイルをウインドウズ９５対応のファイルに変換して再送してくれますか。Could you convert this file into a Windows 95 compatible file and re-send it?


私の議論はある意味では、『孤独な群集』でデビュド・リースマンが行った議論を変形したものである。In a sense, I am turning around the argument made by David Riesman in The Lonely Crowd.





その規則は絶対変更できない。The rule is utterly inflexible.











この布は変色しません。This cloth will not turn color.
僕は彼女の突然の変心にとても驚いた。I was very much surprised by her sudden change of mind.
「そっかぁ、アルクさんはワーウルフなんですね」「俺は混血だから変身したりはしねーよ」"Oh, right, you're a werewolf, aren't you?" "I'm mixed blood, so I don't transform or anything."
多くの科学者は世間に変人呼ばわりされている。Many scientists have the reputation of being eccentric.
式に余分の変数を加えたことによって、この実験結果は不明瞭なものになっている。The result of this experiment is obscured by the extra variables added in the formula.





表面上、本書の大部分は一連の事例の変遷を記録したものである。On the surface the book consists mostly of a series of case histories.

変装していた彼に気づかなかった人も多かった。There were many who couldn't recognize him in that disguise.
















人口は変動しないでいる。The population remains stationary.




日本は工業化の結果急激な変貌を遂げた。Japan has undergone a drastic change as a result of industrialization.








火事のさなかに靴を片一方なくしてしまいました。I lost my shoe in the fire.

その学校は、中・高一貫校だということを頭の片隅にでも入れておいて下さい。Bear in mind that that school is an integrated junior high and high school.

そのアメリカ人の男の子は片言の日本語を話した。The American boy spoke broken Japanese.


私はボールを片手で受けた。I caught the ball with one hand.


おまわりさんに車を片側に寄せるように合図された。The patrolman motioned me to pull over.

彼は板の片端を持ち上げた。He upped one end of the plank.

運賃は片道1ドルです。The fare is one dollar each way.
ごたごたが片付いてさばさばした。I felt relieved when all the troubles were taken care of.私の仕事は大概片付いた。My work is almost finished.
まもなく例のウエーターが皿を片付けに戻ってきた。Soon the same waiter came back to pick up the dishes.
おもちゃを片づけなさい。Put away your toys.あなたはその技術的な問題をいつ片づけたのですか。When did you get through with your engineering problem?あすの朝まっさきにそれを片付けます。I'll do that first thing in the morning.
あいつが演説するなんて片腹痛い。The idea that he is going to make a speech is laughable.
この靴下の片方はどこだ。Where is the mate to this sock?

彼はあやうく片目を失明するところだった。He came close to losing an eye.
この壁画からは古代人の生活の片鱗をうかがうことができる。We can get a glimpse of the lifestyle of ancient people from this wall painting.
テロリストが手榴弾を投げる前に爆発してしまい、片腕を吹き飛ばされてしまった。The grenade blew up before the terrorist could throw it, and his arm was blown off!
彼は一ヶ月の間に３編の詩を書いた。He composed three poems in a month.



彼は新しい方式を編み出した。He worked out a new formula.



彼女は自分で編んだセーターを着ていた。She wore a sweater that she'd knitted herself.

彼はそのピアノ曲をバイオリン向きに編曲した。He arranged that piano music for the violin.
辞書を編さんするには膨大な時間を要する。Compiling a dictionary demands an enormous amount of time.


この雑誌の編集者兼出版社が一部の読者から批判された。The editor and publisher of this magazine was criticized by some readers.

この列車は七両編成です。This train is made up of seven cars.


正方形には四つの辺がある。A square has four sides.
彼の家は４番街のあたりにある。His house is somewhere about Fourth Street.若い男の肩に頭をつけていた女子学生は、驚いてあたりを見まわした。The girl, who had her head on the boy's shoulder, looked around in surprise.空模様からすると、今夜あたり雪になるかもしれない。From the look of the sky, it may begin to snow tonight.
多くの家族が新生活を築くために辺境地方に移住した。Many families left to make a new life on the frontier.

なにぶんこんな辺ぴな村に住んでいるので、めったに客は来ない。Living as I do in a remote village, I seldom have visitors.
お金は明日返すよ。I'll give you back the money tomorrow.お前は恩を仇で返したな。You bit the hand that fed you.
彼は舞台に返り咲いた。He has made a fine comeback on the stage.
のろいはのろい主に返る。Curses, like chickens, come home to roost.


その本を図書館へ返却しましたか。Did you take the book back to the library?

レシートはなくしてしまったのですが、返金できますか。I lost my receipt. Can I still get a refund?
我々の借金は我々の返済能力を超えている。Our debt is more than we can pay.
すぐ返事をしてもらいたいと思っています。I hope you will answer me soon.
私は家族のために休日を返上することに同意した。I agreed to give up my vacation for my family.
これを受け取ったらすぐに返信してください。Please send me a reply as soon as you receive this mail.



イニシャルをサインしてご返送ください。Please initial and send back to us.
彼の返答は拒絶も同然だ。His answer amounts to a refusal.
返品お断り。No merchandise can be returned.

私は彼の好意の返礼に贈り物をした。I gave him a present in return for his favor.


お遍路さんの一行は四国に向かった。The party of pilgrims started for Shikoku.
ちょっとした事故が原因で、２、３便に遅れが出た。A couple of flights were delayed on account of a minor accident.
先日便に回虫が出ました。He had a roundworm in his stool the other day.


それ以来、彼からは何の便りもありません。I have never heard from him since.



再開発によって地域に便益が生ずる。Benefits accrue to the community from reconstruction.


テレビはスポーツファンに一層大きな便宜を与える、という長所を持っている。Television has the advantage of providing sports fans with greater convenience.

普通は、id属性とname属性に同じ値を割り当てます。（訳注：異なっていても構わないが便宜上同じ値を割り当てるという事）Usually the id and name attributes have the same value applied. (N.B. Not because it matters if they differ but just as a matter of convenience.)
便座におしっこしちゃったら、ちゃんと拭くのよ！If you piss on the toilet seat, wipe it off!
生徒はこの便所を使ってはならない。Students must not use this toilet.
韓流ドラマブームに便乗して、韓国の製品を売る業者が増えた。Taking advantage of the popular boom in Korean drama, workers selling Korean goods have increased.



１週間便通がない。I have not had a bowel movement for a week.
３日間便秘しています。I have been constipated for three days.


電話は便利なものである。The telephone is a convenience.
駅の傍に住む便利さに対してあなたはお金を払っているのです。You pay for the convenience of living near a station.


その便せんには校章が打ち出しにされている。The note is embossed with the school emblem.
学生は多くの時間を勉学に費やす。A student spends a lot of time studying.
学校ではどんな科目を勉強しますか。What subjects do you study at school?
彼は誰にも負けない勉強家だ。He is as hardworking as any.
音を立てないで。勉強中だから。Don't make any noise, I'm studying.


私たちが意識してほかの礼儀正しさの形をわきまえることが大切である。Therefore it is important for us to be aware of other forms of politeness.身分をわきまえなさい。Remember your station in life.



その失策には弁解の余地がない。This fault admits of no excuse.






まことにすみませんが、私のために弁護していただけませんか。Would you be kind enough to put in a word for me?
良い弁護士は弁護依頼人を守るために、あらゆる手をつくすだろう。A good lawyer would leave no stone unturned in his efforts to defend his client.
その弁護士への謝礼はとても高かった。The lawyer's fee was very high.


ホワイト氏が彼の弁護人として出廷した。Mr White appeared for him in court.







彼らは、弁士を大いにほめた。They paid a high compliment to the speaker.

弁償代きっちり耳そろえて払わんかい。Aren't you paying for the damages in full?





弁舌は銀、沈黙は金。Speech is silver, silence is golden.

私たちは学校で早めに弁当を食べた。We had an early lunch at school.
彼は今日、お弁当を持って来た。He brought his lunch today.
弁当屋さんを始めたってむだだよ。ざらにあるからね。There's no point starting a shop selling take-away lunches; there are already plenty.
今やノート型コンピューターは弁当箱と同じくらいが一般的だ。Now notebook computers are as common as lunch boxes.





君は自分の不始末をどう弁明するのか。What account can you give of your misbehavior?


その学生は、自分の弁論に対して審査員が批判的に述べたことをひどく気にした。The student took to heart the judge's critical comments on his speech.
エミリーは弁論大会で１等賞をとった。Emily won first prize in the speech contest.




体面を保つために行った。For appearances sake, I went.




しげみちゃんを保育園に迎えに行ってもらえる？Could you please pick Shigemi up for me at the day-care center?

領収書は必ず保管してください。Make sure you save the receipt.








ＷＨＯとは世界保健機構を表す。WHO stands for World Health Organization.


この保険は何もかもカバーする。This insurance covers everything.


その損害は保険金で償われた。The damage was covered by insurance.

保険証を出してください。Let me see your health insurance certificate.

見積書には配送料と保険料についての記載がありませんでした。We found that there is no information about freight or insurance in your quote.

その子はおじの保護を受けている。He is in custody of his uncle.人類が環境を保護しなければ環境から人類は締め出されるだろう。If mankind doesn't take care of the environment, the environment may eliminate mankind.









ジョンはヘレンの保護者のようにふるまっている。John acts like Helen's guardian.




評論家たちは、保護貿易主義について人騒がせのうそを言っています。Critics are just crying wolf about protectionism.

あそこの会社から技術情報をもらうには、まず機密保持契約を結ばなければいけない。To get technical information from that company, we first have to sign a non-disclosure agreement.




彼は保守寄りだ。He is conservative to a degree.

保守主義の人が必ずしも反動主義者とは限らない。A conservative is not always a reactionary.

１９９２年の選挙では保守党が勝利を収めた。The Conservative Party won the election in 1992.


父が私の借金の保証人になった。My father stood guarantee for my debts.
この時計は、一年間の保証付です。They guarantee this clock for a year.

最大限に首相という権力を利用し、自己の保身の為に利用するキツネのようにずる賢い首相に見えてくる。He has come to look like a sly-as-a-fox Premier who uses his position's powers to the fullest extent, to his own advantage.





この地域は保全地域に指定されています。This has been designated a conservation area.


私達は田舎の美しさを保存するべきだ。We should preserve the beauties of the countryside.外付けのハードディスクに保存しといて。Save it on the external hard drive.


その会社はアメリカ資本が５１％保有している。The company is 51% owned by American capital.




軽井沢保養地でくつろぎの一日をお過ごし下さい。Enjoy the experience of a relaxing day at Karuizawa.
その件は保留にしておこう。Let's put that on hold.



その通りはアスファルトで舗装されている。The street is paved with asphalt.


彼らは舗道から雪を取り除いた。They cleared the pavement of snow.
つり革につかまりなさい。電車がすぐ動き出すだろうから。Hold on to the strap. The train will start to move soon.私は彼の手にしっかりとつかまった。I held fast to his hand.


きのう魚を３匹捕った。I caught three fish yesterday.

私たちは、昨日、森に行き、２頭の鹿を捕獲した。We went hunting in the forest and caught two deer yesterday.

国際的批判に直面して捕鯨をやめた国がいくつかある。Some countries have stopped whaling in the face of international criticism.


例えばベルベットモンキーは、輪を描いて飛ぶワシがいるとある種の呼びかけを用いるようになる。ワシはサルを捕食するのだ。For example, vervet monkeys learn to use a certain call in the presence of circling eagles, who prey on the monkeys.


警察は密輸のかどで彼を捕縛した。The police arrested him for smuggling.
その捕虜には威厳があった。The prisoner of war bore himself with great dignity.



彼女に追いつくために私は歩を速めた。I quickened my steps to catch up with her.３歩歩いてジャンプしなさい。Take three steps and jump.
私は野原を歩き回るのが好きだ。I like to roam about the fields.
歩いて行きますか？それともバスで行きますか？Will you go on foot or by bus?
何て歩みののろいやつだろう。How slow you are!入試制度の改革、カリキュラムの改革は着々と進んでいるが、歩みは遅い。The reform of both entrance examination system and curriculum makes slow progress.
お互い歩み寄って問題を解決した。We solved the problem by mutual concessions.

ビルはあの会社の社長になるまで成功への道を歩み続けた。Bill climbed the ladder of success until he became the president of the company.
この患者さんたちは歩行が困難です。These patients have trouble walking.
警官が不審な歩行者をじっと見つめていた。A policeman was gazing at a suspicious pedestrian.


そんな速く歩かないでください。あなたと歩調をそろえることはできません。Please don't walk so fast. I can't keep pace with you.
歩道にお金が落ちていた。I found a coin on the sidewalk.
旅客は歩道橋を使って路線を渡ってください。Passengers must take the footbridge to cross the railroad tracks.
戦争の際には歩兵は取るに足らないものだ。The infantry soldier is only a pawn in the game of war.

あなたの食事にはビタミンを補うほうがよい。You had better supplement your diet with vitamins.


テレビと新聞は互いの機能を補完しあっている。Television and newspapers play complementary roles.

この薬は活力を補給してくれます。This medicine renews your strength.

コンクリートは中に鋼鉄の棒を入れる事で補強される。Concrete can be reinforced by putting steel bars inside it.

英語の文構造は大抵、主語、動詞、目的語／補語だ。In English, the usual sentence structure is Subject - Verb - Object/Complement.
戦後国道のほとんどが補修を緊急に必要とされた。After the war most of the highways were in urgent need of repair.

空所を補充せよ。Fill in the blanks.インキ補充瓶のキャップを外し、スポイトでインキを吸い上げ、マーカーの吸収体へ適量、滴下してください。Remove the cap from the ink refill bottle, fill the dropper with ink, and drip an appropriate amount onto the marker's core.
その飛行機は補助ロケットを使って離陸した。The airplane used a rocket motor to assist with takeoff.あなたの寄附は小児病院を建設する補助として、大いに役立つでしょう。Your gift will go far towards helping to build the children's hospital.



授業料の補助金が交付された。I got a grant for my tuition.

政府は損害を補償しなければならなかった。The government had to make up for the loss.




彼の説明に何か補足することがありますか。Do you have anything to add to his explanation?

私はこの補聴器に２万円支払った。I paid twenty thousand yen for this hearing aid.






世界の航空産業は墜落事故についての懸念を募らせている。The world's aviation industry is growing increasingly worried about crashes.会社は退職者を募った。The company appealed for people to take voluntary resignation.
彼女は盲人のために募金をしている。She is collecting on behalf of the blind.

うちのバスケット部は背の高い男子を募集している。Our basketball team is recruiting tall boys.
私は彼の墓を立ち去り難かった。I hesitated to leave his grave.
彼は自ら墓穴を掘ってるね。He is digging his own grave.


港を見下ろす墓に墓碑を立てた。They set up a tombstone over the grave overlooking the harbor.


少女は叔母をとても慕っている。The girl is deeply attached to her aunt.

もっと良い暮らしができますように。May God show us a better life!
１日１ドルでアメリカで暮らしていけると思いますか。Do you think you can live on a dollar a day in America?

冬の日は速く暮れる。The night falls fast in winter.


でもさ、母を連れて行かなくてはいけないんだ。But, I have to take my mother.
数年前の母の日に、義母にロケットをプレゼントしました。A few years ago, on Mother's Day, I gave my stepmother a locket as a present.

この母音変化はそれぞれの単語に指定される全体のアクセントパターンと大いに関係している。This vowel change has much to do with the overall accent pattern assigned to each word.
フランス語が彼らの母語です。French is their mother tongue.
私たちは母校を訪れた。We visited our old school.
船はやっと母港についた。The ship at length reached the home port.
彼は母国を追放された。He was exiled from his country.
英語は私の母国語です。English is my mother tongue.

母子ともに健全です。Mother and child are both doing well.


その女の子は彼女の母親と似ている。The girl resembles her mother.

その光景は彼女に母性愛を呼び起こした。The scene brought out the mother in her.

フランス語はラテン語を母体として発達した。French developed from Latin.


その母親は赤ちゃんを育てるのに母乳を使った。The mother used her own milk to nourish the baby.

私には母方のいとこが３人います。I have three cousins on my mother's side.

長年の練習のおかげで、私は簡単に簿記ができるようになった。Years of practice has enabled me to keep accounts without difficulty.






彼は包みを小脇に抱えていた。He held a package under his arm.行商人は大きな包みを背負って運んだ。The peddler carried a big bundle on his back.


政治家が、インサイダー取引を包み隠そうとした。The politician tried to cover up the insider trading.
炎が森を包み込んだ。Fire devoured the forest.





警察はその建物を包囲した。The police have surrounded the building.
日本は開発途上国に対し、２０億円の包括援助を保証しました。Japan guaranteed a 2 billion yen aid package to developing countries.

これらの要素をすべて包含するような最良の公式はこれまでのところ提案されていない。The optimal formula which would encompass all these factors has not been proposed.



食品包装は腐敗を減らす。Food packaging reduces spoilage.

子供に包丁をいたずらさせてはダメだよ。Don't let your boy play with a knife.


彼の魅力って、包容力があるところよね。He has a huge capacity for accepting other people. That's what makes him special.
君の厚かましいのには呆れたよ。I am amazed at your audacity.
私は呆気にとられた。When I heard it, I was dumbfounded.
休暇はいつもあっけなく終わる。The holidays always end all too soon.
その恐ろしい光景に呆然としている。Stand aghast at the terrible sight.
国民全体は国王死去の報を聞いて悲しんだ。The whole nation was sad to hear that their king died.
結局は誠実さは報いられる。Honesty will pay in the long run.

その俳優の死は各紙で大見出しで報じられた。The actor's death made big headlines in all the papers.

彼の報告は本当には思えない。His report does not sound true.
報告者は自分の研究方法について詳しく述べた。The reporter elaborated on the method of his investigation.
この報告書は要領をえていない。This report isn't to the point.
その弁護士への報酬はとても高かった。The lawyer's fee was very high.


人々はこの報道を真実だと思っている。People believe this report to be true.

報道機関は現職議員についてはいつもマル秘情報をつかんでいます。The press always has something on the incumbent.
私は彼に報復するつもりだ。I will take my revenge on him.













彼は息子を仕立屋に奉公に出した。He bound his son to a tailor.

私の兄は、未婚なので、所帯を持たず、奉公人と一緒によその家で食事をしていた。My brother, being yet unmarried, did not keep house, but boarded with his apprentices at the home of another family.


その職業の主要な目的は社会に奉仕することである。The prime purpose of the profession is the rendering of a public service.













知事は戦死した兵士たちに記念碑を奉納した。The governor dedicated the memorial to the soldiers who died in the war.





富は一生の宝、知は万代の宝。Wisdom is better than gold or silver.
つきがいいほうではないのでパチンコもしないし宝くじも買いません。I don't have good luck, so I don't play pachinko or buy lottery tickets.

インターネットはこの上なく貴重な情報の宝庫だ。The Internet is an invaluable source of information.

彼は鍵をかけて宝石を金庫にしまいこんだ。He locked up his jewels in the safe.


その峰は雲の上にそびえている。The peak rises above the clouds.
１０００円札をくずしていただけませんか。Could you break a 1,000 yen note?キャベツは生産過剰で値をくずした。The price of cabbage fell because of overproduction.
本の山は今にも崩れそうに見える。Those books look as if they're going to topple over any minute.そのバス停で人々は整列して待っていたが、バスが止まるとすぐにその列は崩れた。At the bus stop, people waited in orderly lines, but as soon as the bus pulled up, the line broke up.千円札くずれますか。Can you break a 1000 yen bill?
チューダー朝は１６０３年に崩壊した。The Tudor Dynasty fell in the year 1603.


あわてて荷物をかかえて家に帰ってみたら。You should grab your bag and hurry home.ここ数年南ア連邦は人種問題をかかえてきた。The Union of South Africa has had racial problems in recent years.彼はあのように若いのに、養わなければならない大家族を抱えている。Young as he is, he has a large family to support.
その女性は赤ちゃんを抱きしめた。The woman pressed the baby to her.

別れるときになっても二人は抱き合っていた。It was time to part, but still the couple clung together.

彼が私を簡単に抱き上げたので私は驚いた。I was surprised because he lifted me up with ease.
デブっている彼女は、猿を抱きかかえていた。The fat woman was holding a monkey.


彼女の抱負は室内装飾家になることです。She has aspirations to become an interior decorator.
彼は平和のために一生を捧げた。He dedicated his life to peace.


その犬はボールを放そうとしなかった。The dog wouldn't let go of the ball.
いいから社長の言うことなどほっとけよ。Don't pay any attention to the boss.
彼はその兵士をねらって矢を放った。He shot an arrow at the soldier.それは虎を野に放つようなものだ。It is like letting a tiger run loose.そのごみ箱は悪臭を放っていた。The garbage-can gave off a bad smell.
口いっぱいに物を放り込んで話をするのは無作法だ。It is rude to talk when your mouth is full.
彼は家から放り出された。He got thrown out of the house.
農夫は荷馬車の上へ干し草を放り上げた。The farmer pitched the hay onto the wagon.
いい球を放るようになったな、恵一君。You throw a good ball nowadays, Keiichi.その車は何週間も放ってある。The car has been kicking around the roadside for weeks.

何らかの技術的問題により、予告された番組の代わりに映画が放映された。Because of some technical problem, a movie was shown in place of the announced program.
誰かがその家に放火した。Someone set fire to the house.
私は放課後にギターを弾きます。I play the guitar after school.
日本国民は戦争を放棄している。The Japanese people have renounced war.

ドップラー効果はまた、一般に光と放射エネルギーにおいても見られる。The Doppler effect is also observed with light and with radiant energy in general.


その幼児は放射線にさらされていた。The infant has been exposed to radioactive rays.





もう一つの面白いエネルギー源は、放射能の廃棄物質から取り出せる熱である。Another interesting source of energy is the heat that can be recovered from radioactive waste material.
自由と放縦の間には大きな違いがある。There is a great difference between liberty and license.
例えばジャック・パインの松かさは、高温により影響を受けるまでは自ら開いて種子を放出しない。The cones of the jack pine, for example, do not readily open to release their seeds until they have been subjected to great heat.
彼は放心した顔つきをしていた。He had an absent look on his face.
彼は焼けているホテルに放水した。He played a hose on the burning hotel.

ニュースは毎時放送しています。We broadcast news on the hour.
反乱軍は放送局を占拠した。The rebels have captured the broadcasting station.
部屋は散らかり放題だった。The room was in total disorder.
雨の中に放置しておくと自転車はさびるでしょう。A bicycle will rust if you leave it in the rain.




自由と放任を取り違えてはならない。You must not confuse liberty with license.




馬や羊が放牧されてて、牧羊犬もいるわ。一度訪ねてみてはどうかしら？Sheep and horses are set out to pasture, there are sheepdogs too. How about giving it a visit once?
警官は注意して彼を放免した。The policeman let him off with a warning.

放浪者は、金持ちならば観光客と称せられる。The vagabond, when rich, is called a tourist.

グリーン夫人は、私の子供たちが歌を習っている方ですが、今度の日曜に独唱会を開く予定です。Mrs. Green, from whom my children have lessons in singing, is to have a recital next Sunday.その少年はカーブの投げ方を知っている。The boy knows how to throw a curve.
ジョンの方が二人のうちで背が高い。John is the taller of the two.

その物体は光を放ちながら南の方角へ飛んで行った。The object flew away to the south, giving out flashes of light.


いわゆる「標準英語」とは世界中で話されている数多い方言のうちの１つにすぎない。What we call 'Standard English' is only one of the many dialects spoken all over the world.
チーズの棚はどちらの方向にありますか。Which way is the cheese shelf?
方向音痴なんだね。You have no sense of direction.

政府は国内産業振興の方策を講じた。The government has taken measures to promote domestic industry.
彼は新しい方式を編み出した。He worked out a new formula.
方針は２つの意見の間をあれこれとぐらついた。The policy fluctuated between two opinions.

以下の方程式の解を求めよ。Find the solution to the following equation.

その会社の株の仕手戦は、倒産の危機が差し迫っていることを隠す方便にすぎなかった。The big promotion of that company's stock was just a cover-up to hide their impending bankruptcy.
これが、私が英語を勉強した方法だ。This is how I learned English.
２５号線北方面の入り口付近にいます。I'm near the on ramp to 25 north.




すべての人は法の前に平等です。Everybody is equal before the law.これは生物の学習法としてはあまりよくないと思う。I don't think this is a good approach to biology.
その法案はついに通過した。The bill at last went through.

法王は赤い法衣をまとって現れた。The pope appeared in his red robe.

法王は赤い法衣をまとって現れた。The pope appeared in his red robe.

私はこの自転車を法外に安く買った。I bought this bicycle dirt-cheap.
彼は法学修士の学位を得た。He got a master's degree in law.

我々は交通法規を守らなければならない。We must observe the traffic regulations.











あらゆるものは自然の法則を受けている。Everything is subject to the laws of nature.

法廷は彼を死刑に処した。The court sentenced him to death.
製造業者はその製品の欠陥に対して法的な責任がある。Manufacturers are liable for defects in their products.
弁護士は依頼人に法的手段を取るように勧めた。The lawyer recommended that his client take legal action.




首相は三顧の礼をもって彼を法務大臣に迎えた。The Prime Minister has won his services as Minister for Justice.
この法律はすべての人に適用される。This law applies to everybody.
合衆国には小火器の販売に関する法律上の制約はほとんどない。There are few legal constraints on the sale of firearms in the U.S.
その日は国会の法令によって祝日になった。That day was made a holiday by an act of the diet.
くだける波が泡を作った。The breaking waves formed foam.
唐突な質問に彼は泡を食った。He was confused by a sudden question.


コーヒーがポットの中で泡立った。The coffee bubbled in the pot.


敵は我々の砲火に応酬した。The enemy answered our fire.

砲撃はますます激しくなってきたので、私たち、走って地下室に降りていったのよ。The gunfire was getting worse, so we ran down to our cellar.


この仕事はその砲兵中隊のだれにもできない。This job is not for any person in the battery.
母は縫い物をやめ、本を拾い上げた。My mother stopped her sewing and picked up her book.
２．身頃の肩を縫い合わせる。2. Sew together the shoulder of the garment body.

彼女は上着にボタンを縫い付けた。She sewed a button on her coat.
その小さな女の子は泣いてクマのぬいぐるみを欲しがった。The little girl was crying for the teddy bear.
これを手で縫ったんですか。Did you sew this by hand?その小道は山中を縫って続いている。The path twists through the mountains.
多くの医者はある種の吸収性縫合糸を使っている。Many doctors are using some form of absorbable sutures.
あなたが本を読んでくれている間、私が縫物ができる。While you are reading to me, I can do my sewing.

現在のその市の財政は芳しくない。The present state of the city's finances is not good.

蓮の花はなんとも言えない芳香をはなっていた。The lotus blossoms diffused an inexpressibly pleasant scent.




アメリカではもやしをサラダにして食べる。Bean sprouts are eaten as a salad in America.


蜂は花から花に飛ぶ。Bees fly from flower to flower.

彼は砂糖の代わりにハチミツを使う。He uses honey instead of sugar.
誰でも彼でもほめそやす人は誰をもほめない人である。He who praises everybody, praises nobody.
みんな口を極めて彼女を褒めちぎった。Everybody praised her to the skies.




内気なその少年は彼女からのほめ言葉に顔を赤らめた。The shy boy blushed at her compliment.
みんな彼のことを褒めたたえる。Everyone speaks highly of him.








この動物は単にほうびが欲しいから、活動しているのにすぎないのだ。This animal is just working for rewards.

いつでも私のオフィスを訪ねなさい。Call at my office at any time.
あなたは何回京都を訪れましたか。How often did you visit Kyoto?

大統領は訪日を延期しました。The president put off visiting Japan.

私はあなたを訪問するつもりだったができなかった。I meant to have called on you.
オーストラリアは天然資源が豊かである。Australia is rich in natural resources.豊かな社会では、大部分の人々が高い生活水準を維持している。In an affluent society most people have a high standard of living.若いころに心を豊かにすべきだ。You should enrich your mind when young.

米作は今年豊作だ。The rice crop is large this year.


その国は石油が豊富である。Oil is abundant in that country.


どこで邦貨をドルに変えられるか。Where can we exchange yen into dollars?






彼の演説は聴衆を飽かせなかった。His speech held the attention of the audience.

彼の長話には飽き飽きした。I got bored with his long talk.

君はあくまで意地を張るのだね。You're never going to give in, are you?











ある女性が、帽子をかぶって写っている亡き旦那の写真をカメラマンの元へ持っていった。A woman brought an old picture of her dead husband, wearing a hat, to the photographer.


その老夫婦は息子をなきものとあきらめた。The old couple gave up their son for lost.



ディックは１０歳のときなくなりました。Dick died at ten years of age.
しかし我々は彼なしで続行した。But we carried on without him.

彼女は父親の亡骸を見て泣いた。She cried at the sight of her father's dead body.






新聞紙を広げて亡子に覆いかぶせた。He opened a newspaper and covered the dead child.


今すぐ大金をつかみたい亡者がうようよしている。Greedy cats are out for a fast buck.





彼は他の大勢の人達と共に亡命した。Along with thousands of others, he fled the country.
その亡命者は故国への思いに胸を焦がした。The exile yearned for his home.

彼女は亡霊を見て髪を逆立てた。When she saw the ghost, her hair stood on end.
王妃は王のかたわらに立っていた。The queen stood beside the king.
世間はいつまでこれらの暴虐を傍観し続けるのか。How long can the world stand by and watch these atrocities?
傍観者にはゲームの大部分がみえる。Onlookers see most of the game.





傍若無人の振る舞いだね。They are cutting loose.
よりよいサービスのため、お客さまのお電話は傍受されることがあります。In order to serve you better, your call may be monitored.



時々、政治家の一人がテレビの討論会に出て傍聴者の意見を押さえつけようとする場面をみる。Sometimes, one of the politicians can be seen trying to keep the audience's opinions under control during televised debates.

裁判官は傍聴人に静寂にするように命じた。The judge charged the audience to be silent.





あの偉い坊さんを見ろよ。Look at the big shot.
あっちへ行きな、ぼうや。Out of my way, boy.




それは君の勉強の妨げになるだろう。It will disturb you in your studies.
騒音が彼の睡眠を妨げた。The noise disturbed his sleep.
彼は私たちの会話を妨害した。He broke in on our conversation.



この帽子は１０００円なら安い。This hat is cheap at 1000 yen.


私たちは年をとるにつれて忘れっぽくなるんだよ。We become forgetful as we grow older.


今日忘れ物をした。I left behind something today.
彼女が散々してやった挙げ句の果てが忘恩だった。All she got for her pains was ingratitude.
彼は忘我の境をさまよっている。He is wandering around in a trance.


私、今夜の忘年会には参加しないつもりなの。I am not going to join the year-end party tonight.
あいつはのらりくらりの仕事にお忙しい事だ。He is busy loafing on the job.
私は市場でリンゴを３個にブドウを二房、デザート用に買った。I bought three apples and two bunches of grapes for dessert at the market.


彼の秘密は近々あばかれるだろう。His secret will be disclosed soon.
少年たちは２階でどたばた暴れていた。The boys were banging about upstairs.




馬が急に暴れ出した。Suddenly the horse began to run about wildly.
知識のない熱意は暴れ馬のようなもの。Zeal without knowledge is a runaway horse.


世間はいつまでこれらの暴虐を傍観し続けるのか。How long can the world stand by and watch these atrocities?

このようにして、暴君はその王国の征服に成功した。Thus, the tyrant succeeded in conquering the kingdom.
その中年の男は暴行のかどで訴えられた。The middle aged man was charged with assault.

戦闘ロボＪＡは暴走した。The battle robot JA went berserk.
彼等はいわゆる暴走族です。They are what we call hot rodders.
暴徒は広場から強制的に排除された。The rioters were forcibly removed from the plaza.
厳しい住宅不足は１つには暴騰した家賃のせいである。The severe housing shortage is partly to blame for the inflated rents.
暴動の噂が広まっていた。Rumor of a riot was in the air.
銃を掃除していたら、突然暴発してしまった。The gun suddenly went off when I was cleaning it.
その家は暴風の為に屋根を剥ぎ取られた。The house had its roof ripped off by the storm.
その暴風雨は大損害をもたらした。The storm brought heavy losses.

アメリカ経済は１９８７年の大暴落からいち早く回復していますね。The U.S. economy shrugged off the '87 Crash.
当時の農家の暴利はすさまじかった。The bloated profits of farmers at the time were something again.
非暴力というのは私の信仰の第１条だ。Non-violence is the first article of my faith.
暴力団は強盗を計画していた。The gang was planning a robbery.
その会合には出席されることが望ましい。It is desirable that you should attend the meeting.
あなたの望みが実現するといいですね。I hope your wish will come true.あのチームは、あるとしても、まず優勝の望みはない。That team has little, if any, chance of winning.
全国民が平和を望んでいる。The whole nation wants peace.健康でなければ成功を望めない。Without health, we can not hope for success.

彼は望遠鏡に目を当てた。He put his eye to a telescope.




その事故は某映画スターの酔っぱらい運転のせいだった。The accident was due to the drunken driving of a certain film star.

我々は某氏からそれを聞いたのだ。We heard it from Mr Such and such.


この棒は先がとがっている。This pole is sharp at the end.



学校に本や紙や鉛筆がないのを知ると、彼女は棒きれで地面にアルファベットを書いた。When the school had no books or paper or pencils, she wrote the alphabet on the ground with a stick.


喫煙が彼の肺を冒した。Smoking has affected his lungs.
何の冒険もしないなら、何も得られない。Nothing ventured, nothing gained.


残っているのは冒頭の部分だけであった。All that was left was the opening.

私はおばあちゃんがするのを見てウールの紡ぎ方を覚えました。I learned how to spin wool from watching my grandmother.








イースト菌がパン生地を膨らます。Yeast makes dough rise.

一陣の風をうけて帆がふくらんだ。A gust of wind swelled the sails.
ふくれっ面してないで、機嫌を直して笑ってごらんよ。Quit pouting. Smile and cheer up.
多くの天文学者は、宇宙は永遠に膨張してゆくものだと考えている。Many astronomers assume that the universe expands infinitely.




彼は絶対にその謀議に加担していなかった。反政府の悪だくみがあったのは、彼ではなくて、その兄だった。He has had absolutely no part in the conspiracy; it was not he, but his brother, who had an axe to grind against the government.



日本は貿易に頼っている。Japan depends on foreign trade.
ある貿易会社に勤めています。I'm working for a trading firm.
父は貿易業に従事している。My father is engaged in foreign trade.

昨年は輸出が好調の反面、輸入が落ち着いていたので貿易収支は改善した。The nation's trade balance improved last year as exports were strong, while imports remained steady.


塩は魚が腐るのを防ぐ。Salt preserves fish from spoilage.
その防衛計画に関する見通しは暗い。The outlook for the defense program is dismal.





私たちは昨日防火訓練をした。We had a fire drill yesterday.






その市の防御は堅固だ。The defenses of the city are strong.




チョコレートにはＬＤＬの酸化を防止する力がある。Chocolate acts to prevent LDL oxidisation.










若いキャンパーたちは新しい防水上着を身につけていた。The young campers were kitted out with new waterproof jackets.






波が激しく防波堤にぶつかった。The waves dashed against the seawall.

都市の周囲はすっかり防備してあった。The city was fortified all about.



彼女は私のほっぺにちゅっとキスをしてくれた。She gave me a peck on the cheek.
赤ん坊のほっぺたはビロードのような手触りがする。Little babies' cheeks feel like velvet.
ほお紅や口紅を差すだけで表情や笑顔がどんどん変わってくるんです。Expressions and smiles change like that just from applying rouge and lipstick.


船はまっすぐ北に向かっている。The ship is bearing due north.

北の方では冬が寒いです。In the north, it's cold in winter.
北にはスコットランド、南にイングランド、西にウェールズ、そして、さらに西には北アイルランド。In the north, there's Scotland; in the south, England; in the west, Wales; and further west, Northern Ireland.



北欧では冬の訪れが早い。Winter comes earlier in North Europe.
ＯＥＣＤの調査で北欧諸国が税率において世界の上位をキープした。In the OECD survey, northern European countries are keeping their high ranking in tax-rates.



ラジオによると、北海で嵐が起こるとのことだ。According to the radio, a storm is imminent in the North Sea.
私は明日北海道に行くつもりです。I will go to Hokkaido tomorrow.




深刻な伝染病が北京で発生した。A serious epidemic has broken out in Beijing.
彼は、北京語を話すのがとても進歩した。He has made great progress in speaking Mandarin.

北極圏とは北極周辺の地域の事である。The Arctic is the area round the North Pole.シロクマは北極地方に住んでいる。Polar bears live in the Arctic.

実のところ、いかなるスピードで移動するにせよ、北極熊は他のおおかたの哺乳動物の２倍のエネルギーを消費する。In fact, to move at any speed the polar bear uses twice as much energy as do most other mammals.
北極圏とは北極周辺の地域の事である。The Arctic is the area round the North Pole.














台風１１号は、毎時２０キロメートルの速さで北上中です。Typhoon No.11 is moving up north at twenty kilometers per hour.


アメリカの太平洋北西海岸沿いに住む原住民は、おそらくアジアから移住した種族の子孫なのである。The natives of the North-West Pacific Coast of America were probably descendants of tribes from Asia.







今日のトピックは「北朝鮮による日本人拉致問題」です。Today's topic is "the problem of Japanese people abducted by North Korea".

北斗七星は簡単に見つかる。You can find the Big Dipper easily.


その動物類は北半球で見ることができる。Those animals can be seen in the northern hemisphere.
北海道は日本の北部にあります。Hokkaido is in the northern part of Japan.
彼らは彼を北米へ行かせた。They sent him to North America.



北海道は仙台の北方にある。Hokkaido is to the north of Sendai.


彼らは険しい北面を登った。They climbed the rugged north face.





僕はスーザンに謝ろうと電話したのに、彼女ときたら一方的に電話を切っちゃったんだ。I called Susan to apologize to her, but she hung up on me.「ぼくだいじょうぶ？」といわれました。「だいじょうぶ」とこたえました。I was asked, "You OK, kid?". I replied, "Fine."
僕らは時間に気付かなかった。We weren't aware of the time.
彼は僕たちのテニスチームに所属している。He belongs to our tennis team.







墨を染料として使うと面白い模様ができます。India ink produces an interesting pattern when used as a dye.



















科学者たちはエイズを撲滅するために懸命に努力している。Scientists are working hard to put an end to AIDS.




１９６４年にキング牧師はノーベル平和賞を受賞した。In 1964, Rev. King won the Nobel Peace Prize.


ある暑い夏の午後、ジョンとダンヌは長くなった牧草を刈っていました。One hot summer afternoon, John and Dan were cutting the long grass.
乳牛が牧草地で草を食べているのが見えた。We saw cows grazing in the meadow.


牧童達は馬で名もない町に入っていった。The cowboys rode into an unknown town.








第一次世界大戦は1914年に勃発した。World War I broke out in 1914.


指導者は国民と没交渉になっていた。The leaders were out of touch with the people.
兵隊たちは彼らが征服した人々から食物を没収した。The soldiers seized food from the people they conquered.

彼はわれを忘れて研究に没頭した。He lost himself in his studies.


商売でそんな失敗をしたらどんな会社でも没落する。Such a business failure would sink any company.
夕食の準備はほとんどできています。The dinner is almost ready.ケイトは中国語をほとんど話せない。Kate can hardly speak Chinese.彼女は人生のほとんどを貧しい人々の世話をするために費やした。She spent most of her life taking care of poor people.






私は奔放な生き方にあこがれている。I long for an uninhibited way of life.


昨日はその本を８０ページまで読んだ。I read the book up to page 80 yesterday.性能のよさとデザインの優美さが両々相まって本機種の声価を高めてきた。The high performance and the elegant design of this model have combined to give it a high reputation.ウイスキーを１本持っています。I have a bottle of whiskey.


彼は何でも金本意に見る。He sees everything in terms of money.





１階は本屋に貸してあった。The downstairs was rented to a bookseller.
世界からは【麻疹輸出国】と嫌味とも本音ともとれることをいわれている始末。Ending up with being called a "measles exporting country" by the rest of the world, something that you could take as insult or truth.







本格的な休暇は３年ぶりだ。It's three years since I had a real vacation.
地震のため水道の本管が破裂した。The water mains burst due to the earthquake.
別館は本館の北側にある。The annex is on the north of the original building.

ケンさん、君は本気かい。Are you on the level, Ken?

コールセルフライはパリに本拠を置く航空会社です。Corsairfly is an airline based in Paris.
我が社の本拠地は東京である。Our company's base is in Tokyo.


そろそろ話の本筋に入るべきです。It's time to get down to business.






トムが明日本校へ来ます。Tom is coming to our school tomorrow.

雨は本降りになってきた。The rain came down in earnest.
彼の音楽は本国では人気がなかった。His music was not popular at home.

さて、本腰を入れてまじめな話をしよう。Now let us get down to a serious talk.






それから、彼は、ケンブリッジで研究を始め、宇宙の本質について前よりいっそう多くの考えを発展させ始めた。Then he began his work at Cambridge, developing many new ideas about the nature of the universe.
その社は大阪に本社がある。The firm has its head office in Osaka.
沖縄は本州よりも中国に近いということに気付いてましたか。Are you aware that Okinawa is closer to China than to Honshu?



私は本章でその問題を取り扱うつもりです。I'm going to deal with the problem in this chapter.
日本にあるインドカレー屋のカレーって、やっぱり日本人の口に合わせて本場よりマイルドに作られてるよね。The curry they serve in Japan is milder than real Indian curry. They adapt it to Japanese tastes.


ギターでカントリー・ウエスタンを弾くのは本職のミュージシャンならごくたやすいことだ。Playing country-western music on guitar is real kid stuff to a true professional.
彼は口やかましいが本心は悪くない。He grumbles a lot, but deep down he's not a bad guy.
あなた本人が彼女に話さなければならない。You must talk to her in person.


わずかの言葉が人の本性を表すことがある。A few words may betray a man's true character.














この寺の本尊は何であるか知っていますか。Do you know which deity this temple is dedicated to?
なんであれ物事の本体を捕らえる事が肝心だ。No matter what the problem is, it's essential to get at the heart of the matter.


この本棚は組み立てが簡単です。This bookcase is easy to assemble.

やっと本調子を取り戻した。I have finally regained my regular form.
彼女の家は本通りから引っ込んだ所にある。Her house stands back from the road.
本店は警察の手入れを受けた。The main office was raided by the police.



その悪い知らせは残念ながら本当だ。The bad news is unfortunately true.




あいにくですが本日は予約でいっぱいです。I'm sorry, today is fully booked.

動物は本能のままに振る舞う。Animals act on instinct.
私の本箱は大きな辞書が入る奥行がある。My bookcase is deep enough to take large dictionaries.
咳止めシロップ。本番前に一口飲まないと落ち着かない！Cough syrup. If I don't drink a mouthful before going on stage I can't settle down!

大学本部はニューヨークに分校を設立することを決定した。The University Administration decided to set up a branch campus in New York.
これは本物のダイヤではないかもしれない。This may not be a real diamond.






本命と対抗馬が競り合ったお陰で、ダークホースの彼が漁夫の利を得たってわけだ。Since the favorite and his rival were running against each other a dark horse like him was able to pull out in front.

この詩は本来フランス語で書かれていた。This poem was originally written in French.競争は本来悪いものではない。Competition is not by nature evil.

この作家が本領を発揮しているのは短編小説だ。This writer is at his best in his short stories.


本論に入ろう。Let's get down to business.

その裁判官は、最終判決をひるがえした。The judge reversed the final decision.組合員たちは反旗をひるがえした。The union members were up in arms.
ポニーテールが翻って思わず見とれる仕草だ。The way she flips her ponytail will charm you before you realise it.




彼女はそれを一語一語翻訳した。She translated it word for word.
なぜなら私は翻訳家になりたいからです。Because I want to be a translator.

翻訳者は、彼の言っていることを説明するのは不可能だとわかった。The translator found it impossible to explain what he meant.
船は波に翻弄されていた。The ship was at the mercy of the waves.
およそどれくらいの価値がありますか。What's their approximate worth?

















彼は凡俗を超越している。He rises above the rest of mankind.
彼は凡打を打ち上げた。He hit an easy fly.
強打者が簡単に凡退した。The slugger was easily put out.



投稿一覧の下の凡例を見て原因が分かりました。When I looked at the explanatory notes under the posts list I realized what was causing it.
アイリーン・ペパーバーグが、アレックスと名づけたオウムの前で丸いお盆を持っている。Irene Pepperberg holds a round tray in front of a parrot she has named Alex.


大雨で盆栽がめちゃくちゃになった。The heavy rain made a mess of the bonsai.


河川の盆地には普通肥沃な農地がある。The basin of a river usually has rich farmland.


胸をさすってあげましょうか。Would you like me to massage your chest?

タイヤはゴムと路面の摩擦によってすり減る。Tires wear down because of friction between the rubber and the road surface.米国人とイギリス人との間の摩擦が高まった。Friction between the Americans and the British mounted.

その摩天楼はまわりの他の建物の上方にそびえていた。The skyscraper rose above the other buildings around.







弟は銀の食器類を磨いた。My brother polished the silver.学生は読書の技能を磨くべきだ。Students should develop their reading skills.

すり減らすのはシーツではなく靴にしろ。Better wear out shoes than sheets.








魔王が神に野球で勝負を挑んだ。The devil challenged God to a baseball game.
「なに、アンタ疑ってんの」「だ、だってそんな、いきなり魔界とか魔族とか、信じろという方がおかしいよ」"What? Are you doubting us?" "B-but, that is, suddenly 'spirit world', 'magical beings' - it's strange to ask me to believe."





男は魔術で少女を恐れさせた。The man awed the girl with his magic tricks.
魔術師サラ。人は彼女を『大魔導師』とか呼ぶらしい。The magician Sarah. Apparently people call her "The Great Mage" or some such.
ここだけの話だけれど、あの太った見苦しい魔女は減量中なのだ。Between ourselves, the fat ugly witch is on a diet.
彼女はいつも魔除けのお守りを持っている。She always carries a charm against evil.






あいつに魔法をかけてカエルにしてやろう。I'll bewitch him into a frog!
エドガーさんは魔法使いだった事もあるんですか。So, was there a time when you were a wizard, too?

ううん、由美ちゃんが魔法瓶に入れて、部室に持って来てくれたの。No, Yumi put it in a thermos flask and brought it into the club room.

彼はすべての悪から魔力で守られた。He was charmed against all evil.




はしかにかかると非常に危険なこともある。Measles can be quite dangerous.



麻雀牌はとってもきれいなものです。Mahjong tiles are very beautiful.





私達は国民から麻薬を追放しなければならない。We must rid the nation of drugs.




けいこは枕に顔をうずめて泣いた。Keiko buried her head in the pillow and cried.昨夜、約８万人の観衆がスタジアムをうずめた。About eighty thousand spectators packed into the stadium last night.
犬はよく骨を地面に埋める。Dogs often bury bones.群衆がホールをうめつくした。The crowd filled the hall.問題は、この必要な隔たりを埋めるのが知覚であるという点にある。The problem lies in the fact that the necessary gap is bridged by perception.



そのあたりは、一面に割れたガラスで埋もれているんですって。The place is deep in broken glass.
彼女は生まれ故郷に埋葬された。She was buried in her hometown.
彼らは埋蔵された宝物を求めて砂漠を探検した。They explored the desert in quest of buried treasure.

彼はすっかり家庭生活に埋没していて働く気がない。He is totally immersed in family life and has no wish to work.
あのかわいい少女は私の妹です。That pretty girl is my sister.
妹さんが手術後危機を脱したそうで、よかったですね。I'm glad to hear that your sister is out of danger after her operation.
このページのコピーを３枚とってください。Please make three copies of this page.



ベッドメーキングは毎日しますか。Should I make my bed every day?
バスは１０分ごとに通っている。The buses run every ten minutes.
毎回食事の前に手を洗いなさい。Wash your hands before each meal.
ニュースは毎時放送しています。We broadcast news on the hour.
彼らは毎週日曜日に教会へ行く。They go to church every Sunday.
私は毎朝六時に起きます。I get up at six every morning.
毎度ごひいきにありがとうございます。Thank you for your patronage.毎度、またいらっしゃい。Thanks, please come again.
その犬に毎日食べ物をやって下さい。Please feed the dog every day.
私は毎晩家にいます。I am at home every evening.
光の速度は毎秒約１８万６千マイルである。The light travels at about 186,000 miles a second.
万雷の拍手のうちに幕が下りた。The curtain fell amid the wild applause of the audience.この劇は三幕からなる。This play has three acts.音楽会は国歌で幕となった。The concert concluded with the national anthem.



それは幕切れの一瞬の出来事であった。It happened just when the curtain was falling.

徳川幕府は１８６８年に終わりを告げた。The Tokugawa Shogunate came to an end in 1868.



彼は枕に頭を横たえた。He laid his head on the pillow.



彼らは川でマスを釣った。They fished the stream for trout.
また会えて嬉しいよ。Nice to see you again!またの機会にしましょう。Let's make it some other time.ありがとう。また、次の日にくるようにします。Thanks. Maybe we'll come back.
又しても死を免れることができた。Again I was able to escape death.

彼はまたとない優れた思想家である。He is as great a thinker as ever lived.


紅茶またはコーヒーはいかが？Would you like some tea or coffee?
あなたの行いはまたもや厄介なことを引き起こした。Your conduct gave rise to another problem.



ジャックはたしかメアリーのまたいとこだと思う。Jack is Mary's second cousin, I believe.



本を又貸ししてはいけない。Don't lend a borrowed book to another.






なぜその政治家は大多数の意見を抹殺しようとするのか。Why is the politician trying to kill off the opinions of the majority?
チャーリーは最後の語を抹消することに決めた。Charlie decided to cross out the last word.




彼は来月の末でここに１０年間住むことになる。He will have lived here for ten years by the end of next month.末の娘にはいつもリンゴの３分の１が与えられる。One-third of an apple is always given to our youngest daughter.試行錯誤の末、彼はふと正しい答えを思いついた。Through trial and error, he found the right answer by chance.
お支払日が先月末の請求書５６７８９について、まだお支払いを受けておりません。With reference to the invoice No.56789 which was due last month, we have not yet received your remittance.

ジョージは、最近３時間の格闘の末に釣った、重さ３０ポンドのバスの話をしていた。George was describing a 30 pound bass he'd caught recently after fighting it for three hours.







火は末広がりに大きくなった。The fire spread out in a fan-shape.


















レポートは今月の末日までに提出してください。Please hand in your papers by the last day of this month.









１０時までに夕食の準備をしておくように取り計らいなさい。See that dinner is ready by ten.
蚕は繭を作る。Silkworms spin cocoons.




麿はプリンを食べないではおれぬ。I cannot resist eating pudding.

万万承知の上です。I know it very well.
万が一気が変わったら、知らせて下さい。If you change your mind, let me know.万が一に備えて、武器になるものを探した。I looked around for a weapon just in case.
万一の場合に備えて貯金するのは賢明だ。It is wise to save money for a rainy day.万一彼がこちらへきたらすぐ知らせます。If by any chance he comes here, I'll let you know at once.

彼の万引きはどうしたものかわからない。I don't know what to do about his shoplifting.














万国の労働者よ。団結せよ！Workers of the world, unite!







僕はもう万策尽きた。It's all up with me.



一事成れば万事成る。Nothing succeeds like success.



















万難を排して君の味方をしよう。I'll stand by you through thick and thin.






新しい万年筆をなくしてしまった。I have lost my new fountain pen.





テキサス州の、縮尺25万分の1の地図が欲しいんですよ。I want a map of Texas on a scale of 1 to 250000.








私たちはニュートンが万有引力の法則を発見したと習った。We learned that Newton discovered the law of gravitation.




その公演は万雷の拍手を受けた。The performance was received with applause.






彼女は慢性の病気にかかっている。She suffers from a chronic malady.
慢性的な便秘で苦しんでいます。I'm suffering from chronic constipation.

この仕事はわれわれの必要条件を満たしていない。This work does not meet our requirements.このコップをミルクで満たした。I filled this glass with milk.
潮の満ち干は月の運行に左右される。The rise and fall of the sea is governed by the moon.
レギュラー満タンでお願いします。Fill it with regular, please.

バスは満員だった。The bus was filled to capacity.


さくらは満開だった。The cherry trees were in flower.
満開をチョイ過ぎた感はありましたが、それでも、美しい桜を満喫してきました。They seem a little past their peak, but even so we enjoyed the beautiful cherry blossoms.
満月でしたか新月でしたか。Was it a full moon or a new moon?




非常にうまい洒落だったので、満場爆笑した。It was such a nice joke that everybody burst out laughing.
彼のばかげた提案が満場一致で承認された。His foolish proposal was approved unanimously.

申し訳ありませんが、満席です。I'm sorry, the flight is full.
彼は努めて雇い主を満足させようとした。He was zealous in satisfying his employer.いつもあかだらけで、食事も満足に与えられていない様子でした。He was always filthy and looked like he wasn't given enough food.
きょうの満潮は午後３時です。High tide is at 3 p.m. today.満ち潮で水没する砂浜でキャンプを張るのは、実に愚かな行為です。Pitching camp on sand banks that go under at high tide is a truly stupid thing to do.

満腹なので、もうこれ以上食べられない。I am full, and I can eat no more.

９回２死満塁。Bases loaded, two outs in the ninth inning.
僕の趣味は漫画を読む事です。My hobby is reading comics.


今悪性の風邪がまん延している。A bad cold is going about now.
このチーズはピリッとした味がする。This cheese has a sharp taste.

このお料理は、パリのエスプリを意識して、味付けしてみました。This cuisine is seasoned to evoke the esprit of Paris.

この酒には独特の味わいがある。This liquor has a taste all of its own.
あのテーマパークでスリルを味わった。We had a thrilling time at the theme park.
風邪で彼の味覚は鈍くなっていた。A cold dulled his taste.
この電子辞書は携帯しやすいところが味噌です。The good thing about this electronic dictionary is that it's easy to carry.
この味噌汁は熱くて飲めないよ。This miso soup is too hot to drink.
私は民主主義の味方だ。I am on the side of democracy.


まだ肉眼じゃ無理だよ。双眼鏡だと、ちょびっとだけ見えるかも・・・。It's still impossible with the naked eye. With binoculars you might be able to glimpse it....私はまだその問題が解けない。I haven't been able to solve the problem yet.情報がないより悪い知らせでもあるほうがまだましだ。Bad news is preferable to an absence of information.

彼はいまだに古い車を愛用している。He still cherishes his old car.
いずれどこかに落ち着いて身を固めるつもりだが、まだまだだ。Eventually I'd like to settle down and have a family, but not yet.
２つの問題が未解決のままであった。Two problems remained unsolved.

その当時、そこには未開民族が住んでいた。A savage tribe lived there in those days.






「Ｕ．Ｆ．Ｏとは何を表しているの」「未確認飛行物体のことだと思う」"What does U.F.O. stand for?" "It means Unidentified Flying Object, I guess."



私の仕事はまだ未完成です。My work is not complete yet.




彼は若くて未経験だがやる気満々だ。He is young and inexperienced, but quite enterprising.

訴訟は未決である。The lawsuit remains undecided.



裁判官はその未決囚の行動に対する嫌悪の念をためらうことなくあからさまにして、できるだけ過酷な刑を下した。The judge made no bones about his disgust with the accused's actions and handed down the severest sentence possible.
その計画は今のところ未決定である。As yet, the project is in the air.





その実験は未婚の男性１００人を対象に行われた。The experiment was made on a hundred unmarried males.







彼のフランス語の知識は未熟だ。His knowledge of French is poor.
娘は未熟児でした。My daughter was premature.
彼らは私達を未熟者として軽蔑する。They look down on us as inexperienced young men.






彼は自殺しようとしたが、未遂に終わった。He tried to kill himself but it ended in failure.


未成年者の喫煙は法律で禁じられている。Minors are prohibited from smoking by law.



政府は感染の拡大を未然に防ぐための適切な措置を取らなかった。The government didn't take appropriate measures to prevent the infection from spreading.



ソフイーは未知の差し出し人からまた手紙が来るのを心待ちにしていた。Sophie had been looking forward to getting another letter from the unknown sender.
Ｘ記号は数学ではたいてい未知数を表す。The symbol "x" usually stands for an unknown quantity in mathematics.




計画はまだ未定である。The plans are still up in the air.











非行、学校嫌い、人格の未発達などの問題が現在以上に顕在化してくることが懸念される。We are concerned about the further actualization of current problems among youth, such as truancy, dislike of school and lack of appropriate character development.

私にはまだ未払いの借金が１００ドルある。My unpaid liabilities are still $100.



その未亡人は黒衣をまとっていた。The widow was dressed in black.
５歳未満の小人は、入場料は要りません。There is no admission fee for children under five.

あなたの未来に乾杯！To your future!






彼女にはまだ未練がある。I still have some feelings for her.
一目で彼女に魅了された。She attracted me at first sight.
彼女の魅力はうまく表現できない。Her charm is beyond description.
彼女は魅力的な人柄である。She has a magnetic personality.







スリの一人は残りの二人を密告した。One of the pickpockets blew the whistle on the other two.

この森には野ブドウが密集して生えている。There is a dense growth of vines in this forest.
オランダ語はドイツ語と密接なつながりがある。Dutch is closely related to German.
その問題は我々の日常生活に密着している。The problem closely relates to our everyday life.


その倉庫は麻薬密売者の隠れみのだった。The warehouse was a front for drug traffickers.


この食品は密閉された容器に入れておけば一週間もつ。This food will keep for a week in an airtight container.
最新の報告書には、全世界で密輸されているコカインの９０％が海路で運ばれており、そのほとんどがスピードボートによるものだと記されている。In the latest report, it is written that 90% of all the cocaine smuggled in the world is transported by sea, and most of that by speedboat.



このみかんは食べ頃だ。These oranges are good to eat.

その花には蜜蜂がいっぱいたかっている。The flower is alive with bees.
脈が遅いです。My pulse is slow.
患者の体内で再び脈打ち始める。In the patient's body the pulse began beating again.



彼は自分の妙な行動について明確に説明はしなかった。He offered no specific explanation for his strange behavior.彼は生徒を教える事に妙をえている。He is skillful in teaching pupils.
突然私は妙案を思い浮かべた。Suddenly I hit on a happy idea.
その選手は妙技を演じた。The player performed a wonderful feat.
彼はダイビングの妙手だ。He is good at diving.








合衆国では２億１６００万丁もの鉄砲類が、民間の手にあるという。In the U.S., as many as 216 million firearms are said to be in private hands.




















私は民主主義の味方だ。I am on the side of democracy.


アメリカ人は民主的な国民である。The Americans are a democratic people.
彼はまったくの民主党員だ。He is heart and soul a Democrat.



あらゆる所の人々が世界平和に尽くす民衆の指導者を切望している。People everywhere yearn for public leaders dedicated to world peace.


あの民宿なら、素泊まり５千円だよ。That inn is 5,000 yen a night, meals excluded.















政治的レベルにおいて、その反応はマカベー一族の民族主義的、根本主義的反乱であった。On the political level the response was the nationalist and fundamentalist revolt of the Maccabees.



ここでは多様な民族的・経済的利害関係がみられる。We find diverse ethnic and economic interests here.















彼は日本の民話を教科書用に纏めた。He compiled a Japanese folklore anthology for use in schools.

彼は眠くて瞼が重かった。His eyes were heavy with sleep.
彼は勉強を始めるとどうして眠気を催すのだろうか。Why should he feel drowsy whenever he begins to study?
その薬を飲むと私はとても眠たくなりました。The medicine made me very sleepy.
その音で彼女は眠りから覚めた。The sound roused her from sleep.

もし眠るといけないので目覚し時計をセットしなさい。In case you sleep, set the alarm.彼は今地下に眠っている。He is dead and buried now.
あなたの夢がみんな実現されますように。May all your dreams come true!
そのようなことは決して夢にも思わなかった。Never did I dream of such a thing.
私は昨夜良い夢を見た。I had a good dream last night.
彼はまるで夢見ているような感じだった。He felt as if he were in a dream.


誰でも夢精したことがある。Everybody has wet dreams.
ピアノ・コンクールで私が第１位になるなんて夢想だにしなかった。Never did I dream that I would take first place in the piano contest.
彼は夢想家にすぎない。He is nothing more than a dreamer.
私は、うれしくて夢中だった。I was beside myself with joy.

２つの意見に大した差はない。There is not much difference between the two opinions.引退するつもりは毛頭ない。I have no intention whatever of resigning.車も何もなく、生活保護で生きてます。I'm living on welfare, without a car or anything.
彼女は新しい時計をなくした。She lost her new watch.その国の財政の赤字をなくすには、もっと、たくさんの外国の援助を注ぎ込まなければならなかった。To get the nation's economy out of the red, more foreign aid had to be pumped in.

それで疑いをさしはさむ余地はなくなる。That leaves no room for doubt.あなたの青いペンがなくなってしまいました。I misplaced your blue pen.残り時間があまりなくなってきた。The sands are running out.

あなたはオーバーなしですますつもりですか。Do you mean to do without an overcoat?
彼女は私にひどく不愛想だった。She was very short with me.
むやみに自殺を否定しようとは思いませんが、親が子どもを道連れにするのはぜったいにやめてほしい、と思います。I don't intend to flatly reject suicide, but I really wish parents would not make their children join in with them.
お母さんは無意識に椅子をつかんだ。Unconsciously my mom took hold of the chair.
だが俺はお前のとって永遠に無意味なまま。But for you I'll always be insignificant.
無為なれば孤独を避けよ。孤独なれば無為を避けよ。If you are idle, be not solitary, if you are solitary, be not idle.


自分が生きている世界との共感がなければ、作家であることは無益である。It is no use being a writer if one is not in sympathy with the world in which one is living.
当時、貧乏は彼らにとっては無縁なものと思われた。Poverty seemed to have nothing to do with them in those days.
奴等の無遠慮がしゃくなんだ。I'm annoyed by their impudence.


イエスは答えて言われた。「あなたがいちぢくの木の下にいるのを見た、と私が言ったので、あなたは信じるのですか」Jesus said, "You believe because I told you I saw you under the fig tree."

私は無我夢中で部屋を飛び出した。I ran out of the room without knowing what I was doing.


私はその件とは無関係だ。I have no connection to the matter.
スーザンは政治に無関心である。Susan is indifferent to politics.








無言が記録されたためしはない。No silence was ever written down.

石油の供給は無限ではない。Supplies of oil are not infinite.




脅迫のもとになされた約束は無効だ。A promise given under a threat is worthless.
大きくて、のろくて、無口でした。He was big and slow and silent.



われわれは彼が無罪であると考えている。We hold that he is not guilty.
アンケート用紙が無作為に配布された。The questionnaires were distributed at random.
よくもまああなたはそんな無作法な振る舞いができるものだ。How dare you behave so rudely!見知らぬ人をじろじろ見るのは不作法である。It is rude to stare at strangers.
コメディアンは無惨な死や大事故といった悲劇的状況を冗談のネタにしている。Comedians base their jokes on tragic situations like violent death or serious accidents.
彼は私の忠告を無視した。He took no notice of my advice.
彼の無事を知らされて、部長は安堵のため息をついた。Informed of his safety, the manager breathed a sigh of relief.積み荷は無事届きました。The shipment has reached us safely.我々は無事使命を果たした。We carried out our mission successfully.
彼女は無事に戻ってきた。She returned safe and sound.


私たちは彼が無実であると信じていた。We believed him to be innocent.
彼女は無邪気を装った。She put on an air of innocence.


その宇宙飛行士は無重力の状態になかなか慣れなかった。The astronaut was slow to get used to the condition of weightlessness.



彼女の不幸な気持ちも、彼の声を聞くと無上の喜びに変わった。Her unhappiness turned to bliss when she heard his voice.
人生の無常をしみじみと感じる。I feel the uncertainty of life.
彼は無情にも妻を捨てた。He heartlessly deserted his wife.
無条件にあなたはそのスイッチに触らなければならない。On no account must you touch that switch.


無神論者が司教の説明をあざけった。The irreligious scoffed at the bishop's interpretation.

彼らは無人島を調査するだろう。They will survey the desert island.
私達は、地球のエネルギー資源をまるで無尽蔵であるかのように使ってきた。We have used earth's energy resources as if they were limitless.


いきなり本人に誰何するのも無粋と考えました。I thought it would be boorish to challenge his identity without warning.
顧みられぬ無数の漂流者が家を求めてる。A hundred billion castaways are looking for a home.
もし建物の取り壊しが無制限に行われるなら、美しい町が単なるコンクリート・ジャングルになる危険があるのである。If the demolition of buildings is uncontrolled, a fine city is in danger of becoming nothing more than a concrete jungle.


無声子音にこれらの規則を適用することは適切だと思われる。It seems appropriate to apply these rules to the voiceless consonants.

私は無税でカメラを買った。I bought a camera free of tax.
彼は怠惰で無責任だった。結局、彼は退社を命じられた。He was lazy and irresponsible. Thus, he was told to leave the company.

パイロットは無線で空港と情報を交換する。Pilots communicate with the airport by radio.










古今無双の勇士だ。He is the bravest soldier that ever lived.
彼女は髪を無造作に束ねている。She is doing her hair simply.
今更後悔しても無駄だ。It's no use regretting it now.
なんてひどいむだ使いでしょう。What a fearful waste of money!


あの老人たちは街角に無駄話をしに行くのが好きだ。The old men like to meet on the street corner just to shoot the bull.




彼女はよく無断欠席をする。She is often absent without leave.
メアリーは母に無断でケーキを作った。Mary made a cake without her mother's knowledge.

彼はすぐに無知をさらけ出した。He soon betrayed his ignorance.

無地の白い紙で十分です。Plain white paper will do.
みんなが規則に忠実でないと無秩序になる。There will be chaos unless we all adhere to the rules.
君がそれをたった一人でやろうなんてむちゃだ。You are mad to try to do it all alone.冬にその山に登るなんて彼は無茶だ。He'd be crazy to climb the mountain in winter.無茶しなければよかった。I shouldn't have overdone it.
彼女は泣きながら、彼からの手紙をむちゃくちゃに引き裂いて捨てた。In tears, she tore up his letter and threw it away.


無鉄砲で子供の時から損ばかりしている。Because of my recklessness, I have been playing a losing game since childhood.


次郎は服のことに無頓着だ。Jiro is indifferent about clothing.
男性の一部と女性の一部が計算は速いと言うほうが無難だ。It is safer to say that some men and some women are good at figures.


あらゆる芸術評論家達は無能であり危険な存在である。Regard all art critics as useless and dangerous.



彼は勇敢無比である。He is unrivaled in bravery.



政府は無法者たちの激突に対して大胆に対処した。The government acted boldly to deal with the outlaw uprising.




その詩は無名の著者が詠んだ。The poem was composed by an anonymous author.


電気のために、ろうそくは我々の生活にほとんど無用になった。Electricity made candles of little use in our life.あせって仕事を仕上げようとすれば、無用な間違いを犯す。When we rush to complete our work, we make needless errors.無用の立ち入り禁止。No admittance except on business.
大欲は無欲に似たり。Grasp all, lose all.

それは無理な注文だ。Your demands are unreasonable.
私は彼を無理強いして私の意向に従わせた。I forced him into complying with my wish.




彼は無理やり残業させられた。He was forced to work overtime.
こちらのパンフレットは無料です。This pamphlet is free of charge.
「おまえの軍など我が軍に対しては無力だよ」と、彼は笑っていった。"Your army is impotent against mine!!" he laughed.
彼の無礼さには我慢出来ない。I can't stand his impoliteness.
皆さん、今夜は無礼講で行きましょう。それでは、乾杯。All right, everyone, let's not stand on ceremony tonight. Cheers!
むろん信用していいとも。君にヨタ情報を教えたことが一度でもあったかい。Of course you can trust me. Have I ever given you a bum steer before?
それは矛盾だらけだ。It's a bundle of contradictions.

濃い霧のために私たちの飛行機は遅れた。A thick fog delayed our flight.


ムクドリのヒナを親鳥に返せますか。Can you return starling chicks to their parents?



彼女は娘の身支度を手伝った。She aided her daughter in dressing.私は若い娘の厚化粧は好まない。I don't like heavy makeup on a young girl.
あなたの娘さんはいつ成年に達したのですか。When did your daughter come of age?


彼の娘婿は海外の支店に転勤になった。His son-in-law was transferred to an overseas branch.

冥界の扉は開かれた。The nether gate was opened.




ご冥福をお祈りします。May his soul rest in peace.

私はいつまでも彼の名を覚えている。I still bear his name in mind.彼女は歌手として名を挙げた。She made a name for herself as a singer.

その時、名案が浮かんだ。A good idea occurred to me at that time.
彼は名医だそうだ。He is said to be a good doctor.
彼は北部で一番の名家の中の一つの出だ。He sprang from one of the best families in the north.
とりわけ、彼は名画の鑑識眼がある。Among other things, he has an eye for good pictures.

彼は娘の名義で毎月収入から１万円貯蓄した。Every month, he saved ten thousand yen out of his income for his daughter.





その教授はシェークスピアの研究で名高い。The professor is noted for his study of Shakespeare.
この映画はまさしく不朽の名作である。This film is indeed an enduring masterpiece.
自分の荷に名札を付けたけれども、すぐに取れてしまった。I attached my name-tag to my baggage, but it soon came off.



「私の名刺です。追加情報があったらいつでも連絡下さい」と記者は言った。"Here is my business card. Please call me anytime with more information," said the reporter.
市長のほかにたくさんの名士が出席していた。Beside the mayor, many other distinguished guests were present.
名詞を修飾するものは、形容詞または形容詞相当語句です。Things that modify nouns are adjectives or equivalent to adjectives.


スイスには名所が多い。Switzerland boasts many sights.

この会の名称はＥ．Ｓ．Ｓ．とする。This association shall be called the E.S.S.

その仕事をしようと名乗り出る者はいなかった。There were no volunteers for the job.
支配人はドアを開いて身分を名乗った。The manager opened the door and identified himself.
その恐ろしさは名状し難い。It is frightening beyond description.
彼女の夫は料理の名人なのだ。Her husband is an excellent cook.
その噂で彼の名声が傷ついた。The gossip hurt his reputation.

あなたの名前はリストからはずされた。Your name was dropped from the list.ああ、もしかして名前を呼ばれるのが恥ずかしいって？Ah, could it be you're embarrassed to be called by your first name?






彼女は子猫をジャガーと名付けた。She called the kitten "Jaguar".
彼は私の長男の名付け親であった。He stood godfather to my first son.
この地方の名物料理がありますか。Do you have any regional dishes?
誰もが名文を書けるわけではない。It's not as if just anybody can write a literary gem.
名簿に私の名前も追加してください。Please add my name to the list.

実質成長と名目成長率の差は物価上昇を意味する。Price increases explain the difference between the real and nominal growth rates.
彼は名門の生まれなのだ。He was born into a noble family.
招待された事は大変な名誉です。It is a great honor to be invited.これは我が校の名誉にかかわる問題だ。The problem affects the prestige of our school.大学は彼に名誉学位を与えた。The college bestowed an honorary degree on him.


彼は軍を名誉除隊した。He received an honorable discharge from the army.


その犬は少女の命を救った。The dog saved the girl's life.
キャプテンは静かにするように命じた。The captain commanded silence.

全ての兵士は王様に敵からこの城を守るよう命ぜられた。All the soldiers were called out by the king to defend the castle against all opposition.


その写真の中には命がけで撮ったものもある。Some of the photos have been taken at the risk of life.


その間違いが彼の命取りとなった。The mistake cost him his head.
避難民はやっと命拾いをした。The refugees barely escaped death.



戦艦ビスマルク号を海のもくずとするには、何発もの魚雷を命中させなければならなかった。It took many torpedo hits to send the battleship Bismarck to Davy Jones's locker.


その石には彼の命日が刻まれていた。The stone was inscribed with the date of his death.


赤ちゃん、もう命名した？Have you named your new born baby?
ケンは自分の犬に、そこで待つように命令した。Ken told his dog to wait there.





彼は寝ずに一夜を明かした。He sat up all night.これは秘密です。他人に明かさないでください。This is a secret. Keep it to yourself.





彼らはその高地を敵軍に明け渡した。They abandoned the hill to enemy forces.
その事故は明け方に起こった。The accident occurred at dawn.
その船が沈んだのは明らかだ。It is clear that the ship sank.
彼は自分の立場を明らかにしなかった。He did not make his position clear.
それで間もなく新たな問題が明らかになってきた。So a new problem soon became apparent.その会社の社員は事実を隠そうとしたが、すぐにそれは明らかになった。The staff at the company tried to cover up the truth, but soon it came to light.

ダイヤは明るく光った。The diamond shone brightly.明るい色が私たちの目を引いた。The bright colors arrested our eyes.あの子供は明るい微笑でみんなをひきつける。The child captivates everyone with his sunny smile.




この語を明確に定義できますか。Can you clearly define this word?
とりあえずまともな人間はいないということを明記しておきたい。In any case I just want to make clear that the fact that these are not normal people.
政府は減税の意向を明言した。The government has declared its intention to reduce taxes.
明細を教えていただけますか。I'd like you to itemize the charges.


彼は明治維新からとき起こした。He began his lecture with the Meiji Restoration.
その法律は明治時代に制定された。The law was enacted in the Meiji era.




トムは明朝神戸をたちます。Tom is leaving Kobe tomorrow morning.


明晩何か約束がありますか。What do you have on for tomorrow night?
彼は明敏な問題意識をもっている。He has a keen awareness of the problem.

その２語の用法の区別は明瞭である。The distinction in usage between the two words is clear.

彼は明朗快活な青年だ。He is a cheerful young man.


彼らは盟約しているかのように一致して行動した。They acted together as if by compact.

道に迷った犬が昨日私たちの近所に迷い込んできた。A lost dog strayed into our neighborhood yesterday.

彼は森の中で迷った。He lost his way in the woods.どの道を行くか迷った。I hesitated about which road to take.彼女の色香に迷った。He was fascinated with her beauty.

四天王も倒した、クソ長い地下迷宮もクリアした。I'd defeated the four sub-bosses and got through the damn long underground labyrinth.
迷彩のショートパンツを履く場合、上は何色のTシャツが合いますか？When you wear camo shorts, what colour t-shirt goes with that?
迷子の女の子はすすり泣きしながら名前を言っていた。The stray girl sobbed her name.
その迷信は彼らの間で今なお残っている。This superstition still lingers on among them.


市の北のはずれは路地の迷路である。The northernmost part of the city is a maze of alleys.
迷惑にならないようにしなさい。Never make a nuisance of yourself.
生徒はめいめい自分の机を持っている。Each student has his own desk.
お言葉を心に銘記いたします。I will bear your words in mind.


彼女はあの銘柄が一番だと思っている。She swears by that brand.１０００銘柄以上の株が取引所に上場されている。More than 1000 issues are listed on the stock exchange.
鶏の鳴き声は夜明けの前触れです。The crowing of a cock is the harbinger of dawn.
カエルが鳴いたら帰ろう。Let's return when the frog croaks.あのかわいい鳥は来る日も来る日も鳴いてばかりいた。That pretty bird did nothing but sing day after day.羊は何て鳴くの？What sound does a sheep make?
火事の時はベルを鳴らせよ。In case of fire, ring the bell.
二人が教会から出ていく時に、鐘が鳴り響いた。The bells chimed as the couple left the church.

電話は繰り返し鳴っていた。The telephone rang repeatedly.


その姪は彼女の叔母さんのように見えます。The niece looks like her aunt.


ビーバーは人に危害を加えることはめったにない。Beavers rarely inflict damage on people.
オラ気分が良くなったで。でもよ、おとうさんに滅茶苦茶怒られちまうと思うべさ。I feel a lot better now, but I know Dad's going to be real upset.その地震は何もかもめちゃくちゃにした。The earthquake smashed everything.
彼の悲観論は周囲の人々を滅入らせた。His pessimism depressed those around him.
彼は滅法強いね。He's going from strength to strength.
仮に核戦争が起こったとすれば、人類は滅亡するだろう。If a nuclear war were to break out, mankind would perish.


君に免じて彼を許そう。I will forgive him out of consideration.
皿洗いめんじてやろう。I'll let you off doing the dishes.
この規則を破った人は厳しい処罰を免ぜられない。Anyone who breaks this rule is liable to severe punishment.
うちの子供はみな、はしかには免疫がある。All our children are immune to measles.



やっと免許が取れました。I got a driver's license at last.

免許証を見せていただけますか。Can I see your license, please?




わたしは、彼女の残業を免除してやった。I exempted her from working overtime.

彼は軍職を免職になった。He was discharged from the army.
この品物は全部免税です。These articles are all exempt from duty.

この商品は免税品です。The goods are exempt from taxes.
３００ドルの免責額の保険でカバーされます。You are covered with a $300 deductible.






この綿のシャツは洗濯がよく効く。This cotton shirt washes well.
我々は綿の代わりにピーナッツを植えた。We planted peanuts instead of cotton.茶碗を投げれば綿にて受けよ。A soft answer is a specific cure of anger.



彼は綿密に立てた計画を実行に移した。He carried out the plan he had made in detail.
ニューヨークは、ハドソン川に面している。New York is on the Hudson River.
母の面影を忘れられない。The image of my mother is on my mind.この町はいまだに昔の面影をとどめている。This town still retains something of the old days.
あいつは一家のつらよごし。He is the black sheep of the family.

あなたに面会したいという婦人がいます。There's a lady asking for you.

ニッコリすれば面子を保てますよ。You can save face with a happy smile.
文句があるならはっきり言えよ。君のその態度は面従腹背そのものだよ。If you have a complaint let me hear it. There's a difference between superficial obedience and honest loyalty you know.
あの専務はまったくの面食いです。The executive director is a real pushover for looks.
ウォルターはジョンのひどい侮辱に面食らった。Walter was taken aback by John's cruel insult.
この都市の面積はどれくらいか。What is the area of this city?
ホームステイをするにはスポンサーの面接を受けなくてはならない。In order to qualify for the homestay you must have an interview with the sponsors.
彼は、このことを僕の面前でやった。He did this in front of my face.


おじはいつも私たちの面倒をよくみてくれた。My uncle always did well by us.
そこまで歩いて行くのはめんどうくさい。It's too much trouble to walk there.

新聞には何も面白いことは載っていない。There is nothing interesting in the newspaper.これは私が読んだ中で一番面白い本です。This is the funniest book in my reading.彼女は子供たちに面白い話をしてあげた。She told her children an amusing story.
ケンはその試験に合格して面目を保った。Ken saved his face by passing the examination.
ニキビが治りません。I can't get rid of my pimples.
麺はふつう小麦粉から作られる。Noodles are usually made from wheat.

未来のパイロットは模擬操縦室で訓練される。The future pilot is trained in a mock cockpit.
50分の模擬試験に挑戦して、試験であなたの実力がどれくらいかがわかります。Try a 50 minute mock examination, and know just how good you really are.
父は私に船の模型を作ってくれた。Father made me a model of a ship.

彼はゴッホの模写をした。He imitated the works of Van Gogh.

あなたの答案を模範答案と比較しなさい。Compare your paper with the model one.
全ての子供には、尊敬し模倣する人が必要だ。Every child needs someone to look up to and copy.

彼女はその皿の模様が気に入っている。She likes the design on the plate.
猫は茂みに隠れていた。The cat lay hidden in the bushes.
丘には低い木がたくさん茂っている。Lots of low trees grow on the hill.





飼い猫の毛のつやが悪くなった。Our cat's fur has lost its luster.

刺激を受け続けると肌の保護作用により角質が肥厚して、ゴワゴワしたり硬くなって、毛穴が目立ってきます。If it continues to be stimulated the skin's protective function causes thickening and it becomes stiff and hard with pores that stand out.
彼はユダヤ人を毛嫌いする。He has a prejudice against Jews.
赤ん坊が毛糸の玉をもつれさせた。The baby tangled the ball of yarn.
スコットランドは毛織物で有名だ。Scotland is famous for its woollen textiles.
蝶は成長した毛虫である。A butterfly is a mature caterpillar.
日本語のニュアンスが分からないくせに、自分の辞書のほうが正しいと言い張る傲慢な毛唐だ。You're an arrogant dirty foreigner who claims your dictionary is correct even though you don't understand the nuances of Japanese.
私は誰にもこの時計を貸すつもりはありません。ましてや手放すつもりなど毛頭ありません。I have no intention of lending this watch to anyone, much less parting with it.引退するつもりは毛頭ない。I have no intention whatever of resigning.


開拓者達は現地人たちから毛皮を物々交換で手に入れた。The colonists bartered with the natives for fur.
彼女は毛筆を使うのがいやだった。She doesn't like to use a writing brush.
この柔らかい毛布は赤ちゃんにちょうどいい。This soft blanket is just right for babies.ケンは毛布を二つに畳んだ。Ken folded the blanket in half.

インフルエンザが都市部で猛威を振るった。The flu struck the metropolitan area.

猛犬に注意！Beware of the dog!




原始人はその猛獣を見ておびえた。The primitive man was frightened at the sign of the beast.
猛暑をどうしのいでいますか。How are you keeping off this intense heat?




警官がやってくるのを見ると彼は猛烈に走り出した。When he saw a policeman coming, he began to run like anything.









疑惑の影を捜そうとする盲人。There's a blind man looking for a shadow of doubt.




外科医は患者の盲腸を摘出した。The surgeon took out his patient's appendix.盲腸のようですね。I believe you have appendicitis.


私は盲導犬として訓練された犬を飼っている。I have a dog trained as a seeing eye dog.




彼女は盲目の人を助けるための協会を創設した。She set up an association to help blind people.愛は盲目。Love is blind.
彼らは盲目的に指導者に従った。They followed their leader blindly.


あみでせみを捕まえた。We captured cicadas with a net.




電車の網棚に鞄を置いたまま、降りてしまった。I left my bag on the overhead rack in the train.

微生物学の基本から最新の情報までを網羅する。It covers everything from the fundamentals of microbiology to the latest news.

何も賭けなければ、何ももうからない。Nothing ventured, nothing gained.
ここに先物取引で儲けた方いらっしゃいますか？Has anybody here made a profit in futures trading?

その木には実がたわわになっていた。The tree was heavy with fruit.
今年は木の芽の出方が早い。The trees are budding early this year.
ボブはいろいろな種類の木の実を見つけた。Bob found various kinds of nuts.
秋には木の葉が落ちる。Leaves fall in the autumn.
彼らは木蔭に座った。They sat in the shade of a tree.








この古い家は木材でできている。This old house is made of wood.

あの上の方で光っている星は木星です。The star which shines up there is Jupiter.
それは木製ですか、それとも金属製ですか。Is it made of wood or metal?

彼も木石ではない。He is neither a stock nor a stone.


どちらかといえば木造住宅に住みたい。I'd rather live in a wooden house.

塔はこっぱみじんに爆破された。The tower was blown to atoms.



その女の子は木登りが大好きだった。That girl loved climbing trees.


古い木箱がテーブルの役目をした。An old wooden box served as table.

木片は１本の留め木で留めてある。The wooden pieces are fastened with a peg.
このブラウスは木綿製です。This blouse is cotton.
木曜の夜はビールが無料なのです。Thursday night is free beer night.
その週刊誌は木曜日に出る。The weekly appears on Thursday.

全く黙りこくって座っていた。We sat in total silence.
彼は石のように黙り込んだままだった。He remained silent like a stone.
もうこれ以上、黙ってられないわ。I can no longer remain silent.





ユダヤ正統派の主流から外れた部分においては、黙示録はある種の運動に対して、より成功を収めたのである。Outside the mainstream of orthodox Judaism, the apocalyptic books were more successful with certain movements.

全員、死者にしばし黙とうを捧げた。The whole company stood in silence for a few moments, as a tribute to the dead.

どうして君はそのような行いが黙認できるのだろうか。How can you tolerate such a deed?
法廷弁護士達はマフィアのボスの用いる黙秘戦術をかわすことができなかった。The trial lawyers couldn't get past the Mafia leader's stonewalling tactics.
ニクソンはウォーターゲート事件に関し、黙秘権を行使して無視しようとしたが、結局明るみにでた。Nixon tried to stonewall through Watergate by ignoring it, but it didn't work.

その一撃で目から火が出た。The blow made me see stars.
アンはチョコレートに目がない。Ann has a weakness for chocolate.
ここのところ目が回るほど仕事が忙しくて、ビデオを見る暇もない。I'm so busy these days it makes my head spin. I don't even have time to watch a video.

彼は金もうけのあらゆる機会に目ざとい。He is alert to every chance of making money.年を取ると目ざとくなる。As one grows old, one becomes a light sleeper.
ぼくの家は目障りだったけれど、小さな目障りだったから、見逃されていた。My own house was an eyesore, but it was a small eyesore, and it had been overlooked.
家内もお目にかかることを楽しみにしておりますから。My wife will be glad to see you, too.
彼の横暴ぶりは目に余った。His tyrannies were beyond endurance.
ここ数日天気がめまぐるしく変わっている。We've had all kinds of weather over the past few days.
彼女は本を閉じて目をつぶった。She shut the book and closed her eyes.
禎子は、親友のチズコが自分のために折ってくれた金色の鶴に目をやった。Sadako looked at the golden paper crane that her best friend Chizuko had made for her.
目覚し時計で、私は７時に目を覚まします。The alarm clock wakes me at seven.


母は私の足が汚れていることに目をとめた。Mother noted that my feet were not clean.

これらの書類に目をとおしていただけませんか。Will you look over these papers?
私が彼女をじっと見つめ続けると、彼女は完全に当惑して目を伏せた。I kept gazing at her until she, totally confused, dropped her gaze.
私は彼女のスーツケースから目を離さないでいた。I kept an eye on her suitcase.


彼女は自分の傘に赤いリボンで目印を付けた。She put a red ribbon on her umbrella as a mark.そこに行く道がわかるように、近くの目印を教えて下さい。I wish to know a landmark nearby so I can find my way there.
詐欺師は新たに人をだますまえに、目隠し、すなわち、人をだますテクニックを磨く。A confidence man polishes his "hood winking" or "eye-washing" techniques before bilking a new victim.
目下の者をないがしろにするな。Don't ignore your subordinates.
船は改装のため目下ドック入りしている。The ship is now in dock for a refit.
目覚しは５時３０分に鳴った。The alarm went off at five-thirty.
私はこんなに早く目覚めたことはない。I've never woken up this early.
その少年はカエルめがけて石ころを投げた。The boy threw a stone at the frog.

軽く目玉焼きにでもしてください。Fried eggs, sunny-side up, easy please.
彼らはこの事件を目撃したことを報告した。They reported seeing the incident.
トムはその事故の目撃者だった。Tom was a witness to the accident.
卵から孵化したてのメダカにはどのようなえさをあげればよろしいでしょうか？What should you feed killifish that have just hatched from their eggs?

教育はテストに合格することを目指すべきでない。Education shouldn't be aimed at passing a test.アメリカ人はみんな、成功の機会のある北部を目指している。Americans are all heading north to the land of opportunity.
目やにが出ます。I have mucus coming out of my eyes.


目上の人には礼儀正しくしなければならない。You must be polite to your elders.

彼の目新しい提案はみんなに受け入れられた。His novel proposal was accepted by everybody.

目先の利益だけにとらわれてはいけない。You must not think about your immediate profit only.
試験が目前に迫った。The examination is near at hand.

彼の目的はそのテストに合格することです。His object is to pass the test.
実は、「have 目的語 done」は使役じゃない場合が多い。Actually, there are many cases where 'have [object] done' is not causative.
私たちは目的地に着かなければならない。We must get to our destination.
彼らは石油を目当てに土地を試掘している。They are boring the ground for oil.




売れ行きは目標に達しなかった。Sales fell short of their goal.

彼女は悩ましい目つきで僕を見た。She looked at me seductively.
塩は目方で売られる。Salt is sold by weight.
目薬をください。I'd like to buy eye drops.
スーツを着て彼は目立っていた。He was conspicuous in his suit.
７月２２日付けのお手紙につきまして私共の最新の目録を同封します。With regard to your letter of July 22nd, I enclose our most recent catalogue.
地球側の圧政に苦しむコロニーの人々の中で、テロによる現状打破を目論む勢力が誕生。Among the people of the colonies suffering under Earth's tyranny a force emerges intending to overthrow the status quo through terrorism.
私は自分の目論見を漏らさないように用心した。I was wary of showing my intention.

物事は中途半端にするなかれ。Don't leave things half done.

勿体振るのはやめてくれ。Don't give yourself airs.
「ご一緒してもいいですか」「もちろんです」"May I go with you?" "Of course."
彼は餅をすっかり食べたわけではない。He didn't eat all of the rice cakes.

彼がその画家を尊敬するのはもっともだ。He may well respect the artist.
君の説明はもっともらしいが、筋がちっとも通ってない。Your explanation sounds plausible, but it just doesn't hold water.


その本を棚に戻しておきなさい。Put the book back on the shelf.


やってしまったことは元に戻らない。What is done cannot be undone.


それじゃ、僕はチキンをもらいましょう。Well then, I'll have chicken.あさって彼にここへ来てもらうつもりです。I will have him come here the day after tomorrow.

私はその問がたいへんやさしいことを発見した。I found the question very easy.


この本が図書館にあるかどうか問い合わせて下さい。Please ask whether they have this book at the library.
花子は不信に思って本当かどうか問いただした。Hanako questioned his sincerity.

彼にもう一杯いかがかと問う。Ask if he wants another drink.この男は窃盗罪に問われた。This man was charged with theft.あなたの人種、年齢、宗教は問いません。I don't care about your race, age, or religion.
あなたはどのようにしてその問題を解いたのですか。How did you solve the problem?
今日は主にホームレスの問題をとりあげます。Today we're going to focus on the question of homeless people.
我々は問題解決と情報整理のためにコンピューターを使う。We use computers to solve problems and to put information in order.
君は問題児ですね。You are a troublemaker.
我々の計画の問題点は費用というよりもそれにかかる時間だ。The problem with our plan is not so much the cost as it is the time required.


その兵士はベッドに横たわってもだえ苦しんでいた。The soldier lay in agony on the bed.

彼はしょっちゅう悶着を起こしたため、首になった。He got fired for making waves too often.





「なあ、寮の門限って何時だっけ？」「２１時よ」「やばい、走らないと間に合わないぞ」"Hey, when do the dorms lock up?" "9 o'clock." "Whoops, if we don't run we won't make it!"
１６３９年以降日本は外国料理に対して門戸を閉ざした。After 1639 Japan closed the door to foreign cuisine.







門番は門を通りぬけるのを許してくれた。The gatekeeper permitted me through the gate.


死は万人に来るべきもの、すべて人は死すべきものなり。Death is certain to all, all shall die.





あなたは夜よく寝れませんか。Don't you sleep well at night?

今夜は夜なべをしなきゃならないよ。I have to burn the midnight oil tonight.











夜会服は仕事をするには不便だ。It is inconvenient to work in evening clothes.



フクロウは昼間寝ていて夜間狩りをします。An owl sleeps by day and hunts by night.











でも週に２回、夜勤しなくちゃいけないんだ。But I have to take night shifts twice a week.
母はひろしの夜具をぐいと引き剥がした。Mother yanked the bedclothes off Hiroshi.
何かとても明るいものが夜空を横切って飛ぶのが見えた。I saw something very bright fly across the night sky.
電気のイルミネーションが夜景の魅力を増す。Electric illuminations add to the attraction at night.
彼らは順番に４時間ずつ夜警に立った。They watched four hours at night in turn.










わが軍は敵に夜襲をかけた。Our army attacked the enemy during the night.




夜食にインスタントラーメンを食べた。I had instant noodles as a midnight snack.







私は夜中に３度目が覚めた。I awoke three times in the night.

秋の夜長は読書にまさるものはありません。There's nothing better than reading in the long autumn nights.

彼らは夜通し話し合った。They went on talking all night.

２人の警官は夜盗を逮捕した。２人は夜盗がミラー夫人宅にしのび込もうとした現場を押さえたのだ。Two policemen arrested a burglar. They caught him sneaking into Mrs. Miller's.


彼は借金がたまって夜逃げ同然に町を去った。He was deeply in debt. And he and his family skipped town.

夜道を１人で歩くのは危険だと思います。I think it dangerous walking alone at night.







夜霧に当たって風邪をひいた。I caught cold from exposure to the night fog.

私は、突然夜明け前に起こされた。I was woken up suddenly at dawn.









この野バラは甘い香りを放つ。This wild rose gives off a sweet scent.

天気が良かったので、その野外コンサートは大成功だった。Thanks to the good weather, the outdoor concert was a success.


あなたは昨日野球をしましたか。Did you play baseball yesterday?
我々の野球場は非常に狭い。Our baseball diamond is very small.
ケンは野球部に入った。Ken joined the baseball club.
私なんぞには野牛と鹿と馬とを描き分けることなど到底出来ない。Me? I can't even begin to draw buffalo, deer and horses so you can tell them apart.


野原は雪で覆われています。The field is covered with snow.
その店は野菜を売っている。The store deals in vegetables.

その歌手が舞台に現れると聴衆は彼にブーブーという野次を飛ばした。なぜなら彼は自分の妻を捨てて他の女性に乗り換えたからだ。When the singer appeared on stage, the audience gave him the Bronx cheer, because he dumped his wife for another woman.
彼らは彼の提案をやじった。They hooted at his suggestion.

すべての野獣が集う。The wild beasts all gather.
彼は野心があるために熱心に働いた。His ambition made him work hard.
彼は大変な野心家だった。He was a man of great ambition.

世界で、鹿やムースやキジといった野性獣を狩ることは違法とする国が多い。In many parts of the world it is illegal to shoot wild game such as deer, moose or pheasant.
野原には野生の花がたくさんある。The fields abound in wild flowers.
多くの野生動物の生命が危険にさらされている。Many wild animals are in peril of losing their lives.





野ねずみが農家の穀物を食べ尽くしていった。The field mice were eating up the farmers' grain.
春が来ると人々はのぐさを摘みに出かけます。When spring comes, people go out to pick wild plants.
野鳥を観察するのはとても面白い。Watching wild birds is great fun.
与党は野党非難のキャンペーンを展開しています。The ruling party is running a smear campaign against the opposition.
まだ野蛮な国がある。There are still barbarous nations.
移住者の部落が野蛮人によって征服され、移住者の希望も生活も土壇場にきた時、長い歳月をかけての不幸とのたたかいに終止符がうたれた。Years of resistance to misfortune ended when the settlers' village was overcome by the savages and their hopes and lives came to the bitter end.

・・・言いたいことは色々あるのだが、ここで口を挟むのは野暮というもの。There are things I'd like to say but to butt in now would be what they call uncouth.


彼女は野望に燃えていた。She was consumed with ambition.




先月の日直当番全部私に押し付けた形でエスケープした野郎だ。He's the pest that, on last month's class-help day, escaped leaving me with all the work.





私は矢を的に当てた。I hit the mark with the arrow.
矢印が進むべき方向を指示する。The arrow indicates the way to go.
上役にやたらにぺこぺこするな。Don't be subservient to your boss.彼女はやたらと靴を買う。She buys shoes indiscriminately.
議長が批判の矢面に立った。The brunt of criticism was borne by the chairmen.


そんなことをするとやっかいなことを招くことになる。To do so is asking for trouble.

そして彼女はいつもやっかいものです。And she is always a troublemaker.
これだけで厄介払いできたら安いもので、みな大喜びした。We were all pleased to be so cheaply quit of him.










彼が重要な役を果たした。He played an important part.彼の望みはハムレットの役を演じることです。His ambition is to play the part of Hamlet.
それ以上はお役に立てません。Beyond that I cannot help you.
彼は役員の地位をねらっている。He is aiming for the directorship.
彼は自分の役割を十二分に生かしていますよ。He's living his role to the hilt.
その役者の事は聞いたことが無い。I've never heard of the actor.
君は役所に自分で出頭する事が必要なのだ。It is essential that you present yourself at the office.

彼は策略で役職から追い出された。He was maneuvered out of office.
あの役人たちは全然、財政のことはわかっていない。Those officials don't understand finance at all.


古い木箱がテーブルの役目をした。An old wooden box served as table.
英語は商業において役立つ。English is useful in commerce.
その値段は約５０ドルだった。The price was in the neighbourhood of 50 dollars.

９０の約数のうち、９でわり切れない数は何個あるでしょうか。Among the divisors of 90, how many numbers are not divisible by 9?
自分が約束したことはちゃんと実行するように最善を尽くすべきだ。You should do your best to carry out your promises.ジムは映画に行く約束をしたガールフレンドに待ちぼうけをくわされ、雨の中を一時間も待たされて頭にきている。Jim's angry because his date for the movie stood him up and he wasted an hour waiting for her in the rain.

イタリアの人口は、日本の人口の約半分だ。The population of Italy is about half as large as that of Japan.
この薬を飲めば、あなたは頭痛が治るでしょう。The medicine will cure your headache.この薬はごきぶりを退治するのに効果的だ。This poison is very effective in getting rid of roaches.
薬屋はこの道の突き当たりにあります。The drugstore is at the end of this road.

薬剤師になる目的で薬学を志望する人は６年制学科を選んでください。People taking pharmacy with the intent of becoming chemists should choose the six year course.
一番近い薬局はどこにありますか。Where's the nearest drugstore?


薬剤師は処方どおりに調合してくれた。The pharmacist made up the prescription for me.

彼女は左手の薬指にダイヤの指輪をはめていた。She wore a diamond ring on her left third finger.

薬箱は子供の手の届かない所に置いとく方がいいよ。You should keep the medicine box away from your child.
この薬品は日光に当てないようにしなさい。Don't expose this chemical to direct sunlight.

警察は学校で大量の薬物を押収した。The police seized a large quantity of drugs at the school.


そういうわけで私はこんなに早く帰って来たのです。That's why I came back so soon.
彼がいうことはわけがわからない。What he says makes no sense at all.
この文を英語に訳しなさい。Put this sentence into English.







彼女は踊りあがって喜んだ。She leaped for joy.
なぜ彼と踊らなかったの？Why didn't you dance with him?

ますます多くの人が、その媒体の双方向的な性質を利用しようと躍起になっている。More and more people are rushing to make use of the interactive nature of the medium.
医師達は癌との戦いで大躍進を遂げた。Doctors have made great strides in their fight against cancer.


柳の枝に雪折れなし。Oaks may fall when reeds stand the storm.




やぶへびを出すな。Let well enough alone.

あなたは昨日愉快に過ごしましたか。Did you enjoy yourself yesterday?

私の服は油で汚れていた。My clothes were dirty with oil.
こってりあいつの油を絞ってやった。I gave him a stern talking-to.
お前どこで油を売っていたんだ。Where were you loafing?
その油井はたくさんの原油を産出する。The well delivers a great deal of oil.
彼女は油絵を始めた。She has taken to painting in oils.





私は油断していたことに気づいた。I realized I was off my guard.


この油田はかつては現在の何十倍もの石油を産出したものだ。This oil field used to produce an order of magnitude more oil as it does now.


時はどんな悲しみも癒してくれる。Time tames the strongest grief.

先生は生徒たちに不注意を諭した。The teacher admonished his pupils for carelessness.



輸血が必要です。A blood transfusion is necessary.
オーストラリアは多くの羊毛を輸出している。Australia exports a lot of wool.


私の手荷物は輸送中に紛失した。My baggage was lost in transit.

１９９８年日本の輸出が輸入を７７８億ドル上回った。Japan's exports exceeded imports by $77.8 billion in 1998.


私はただの名無しの権兵衛です。I am just a nobody.私はその切符をただで手にいれた。I got the ticket for nothing.彼は結構しぶといね。転んでもただでは起きぬ、いい根性しているよ。He's a tenacious guy who always manages to come out on top. He's the kind of guy who can turn any situation to his advantage.

初めの一歩が唯一の難関。The first step is the hardest.
この地上で唯一無二の平等は死である。The sole equality on earth is death.
本人は唯我独尊を決め込んでいるようだけども、周りから見れば単なるわがままだよね。He's completely convinced of his own greatness but to the people around him he's just a selfish jerk.

ただいま、お母さん。I'm home, Mom!申し訳ありませんが、ただ今満室になっています。I'm afraid we're quite full at the moment.メアリーはただいま戻ったところです。Mary has just come home.







彼の優しい言葉で彼女の気持ちが和らいだ。She melted at his kind words.

ここから郵便局まではゆうに５キロあります。The post office is a good five kilometers away from here.

彼女は現代の最も優れた画家の一人である。She is among the best artists of today.

広告に関してはコークの方が優位にたっている。When it comes to advertising, Coke is ahead of the game.

憲法の規定に従い衆院の議決が参院に優越する。Under the Constitution, the lower chamber's resolutions override those of the upper chamber.
あんなに美人なんだから、彼女も優越感を感じているんだろうな、きっと。I'll bet it gives her a feeling of superiority to be so beautiful.




エステサロンで優雅な至福のひとときを過ごしてみませんか？How about spending an elegant and blissful time at a beauty salon?




彼女は作文が優秀だ。She is excellent in composition.


彼の優柔不断さにイライラした。I was irritated by his indecision.

トムが優勝したんでしょう。Tom got first prize, didn't he?
選手達は優勝旗を獲得したのですっかり興奮していた。The players were terribly excited over winning the pennant.
彼は優勝者の名前を大声で叫んだ。He called out the name of the winner.



人類は地球上で最も優勢である。The human race is dominant on earth.




この任務はすべての任務に優先する。This duty has priority over all others.



獲得した優先権を無駄にしないために、そのまま切らずにお待ちください。Please hold the line so as not to lose your place in the queue.



うん。確か使ってない優待券もどこかにあったはず。Yes. I'm pretty sure there are complimentary tickets that haven't been used somewhere.

彼はケンブリッジ大学を優等で卒業した。He graduated from Cambridge with honors.
私は優等賞を受けた。I was awarded an honor prize.

カールが優等生だったはずがない。Carl cannot have been a model student.


大部分ではないにしても多くの人々が文学的趣味を優美なたしなみと見なしている。Many people, if not most, look on literary taste as an elegant accomplishment.




私たちはワインは最優良品のみ使っている。We use only the best brand of wine.
それらの作品には優劣をつけがたい。I can't tell which work is better than the other.


一人で原始林へ乗り込もうとは君はなんて勇ましいんだ。How brave of you to go alone into the primaeval forest!






彼は勇敢でかいかつな少年だ。He is a brave and cheerful boy.
彼の勇敢さは賞賛の言葉もない。His bravery is above all praise.
我々は彼女の勇気に感心する。We admire her for her bravery.

あなたが勇気づけてやれば彼女は自由に話すでしょう。Your encouragement will draw her out.


古今無双の勇士だ。He is the bravest soldier that ever lived.
彼は勇者の誉れが高い。He is celebrated for his bravery.

















まさかの時の友こそ真の友。A friend in need is a friend indeed.












彼女は非友好的な態度だった。She had an unfriendly attitude.
彼には友情というもののよさが理解できない。He cannot appreciate friendship.
私の友人の１人が私に会いにきました。A friend of mine came to see me.

犬は人間の最も親しい友達である。Dogs are man's closest friends.メグは新しい友達をたくさん得た。Meg acquired many new friends.

彼女は友達付き合いを犠牲にしてそのテストに合格した。She passed the test at the expense of her social life.





彼女は泣いている男の子にキスをしてなだめた。She kissed away the boy's tears.
































その家には幽霊が出るといわれる。The house is said to be haunted.
私は、幽霊屋敷に行った。I went to a haunted house.










決して悠長な仕事ではない。This certainly isn't a job where you can take it easy.


憂いの反面には喜びがあるものだ。Every cloud has a silver lining.



彼女は憂鬱症の虜に成った。She fell prey to melancholy.














無から有は生じない。Nothing comes from nothing.
偉大な天才は最短の伝記を有する。Great geniuses have the shortest biographies.
医者はあらん限りの手段を尽くして患者の命を救おうとした。The doctor tried every possible means to save his patient.
勤勉さが経験不足を補うこともあり得る。Diligence may compensate for lack of experience.
ぼくは興味ありそうな風をした。I put on an air of interest.
ありのままの事実を伝えることは難しい。It is difficult to tell the bare facts.
全くありふれた人間にすぎない。He is just an ordinary person.
競馬で稼ぐ！ありえないほど儲かる競馬ノウハウ集！Earn money on the races! Know-how collection on horse racing will have you raking it in!
警察はありうべき証拠を求めて家宅捜索した。The police searched her house for possible evidence.
親切なお手紙をいただきありがとうございます。I appreciate your kind letter.
ありあまるほどの時間がある。I have more than enough time.
それはさんたんたる有様だった。That was a fearful scene.

大学での生活は有意義である。The life in the university is significant.


私にはとても有益だった。It was of great benefit to me.

煙草は健康に有害である。Smoking is harmful to your health.
この本は君にとって有害無益だろう。This book will do you more harm than good.





昨日、有給休暇を取りました。I took a paid day off yesterday.


その有権者はメアリー・ジョンソンさんで、民主党員であることが後になってわかりました。That voter, Mary Johnson, turned out to be a Democrat.




その切符は一週間有効です。The ticket is valid for a week.

このビザの有効期限はどれくらいですか。How long is this visa good for?



何もかも彼の有罪をしめしている。Everything points to his guilt.
その協会は有志を求める広告をテレビに出した。The institution advertised on TV for volunteers.





この山は世界でも有数の高い山です。This mountain is among the highest in the world.










彼は喜びのあまり有頂天になっていた。He was beside himself with joy.
この食品は有毒である。This food is unhealthy.
どんなインプットでもいただければありがたいです。Any input would be appreciated!


彼女は有望な仕事に就いている。She has a job with good prospects.
排卵の有無を調べる方法はありますか？Is there some way to check for ovulation?

これは芭蕉の非常に有名な俳句です。This is a very famous haiku by Basho.
彼はちょっとした有名人です。He is something of a celebrity.

鉄は最も有用な金属です。Iron is the most useful metal.



この道路は有料です。We must pay a toll to drive on this road.

コカ・コーラは清涼飲料水ではいつも最有力会社だ。Coke has always been the top dog when it comes to soft drinks.

事態は一刻の猶予も許さない。There's not a moment to waste.

それについては知る由もなかった。She had no way to know about it.




スコットランドに由来する歌がいくつかあります。Some songs come from Scotland.

彼の給料では裕福になれないだろう。He won't get fat on his salary.
ロバートはとても忙しかったのでゴルフの誘いを断らざるを得なかった。Robert was so busy he had to turn down an invitation to play golf.





ウラウラとした日差しに誘われて、眠りに落ちた。The soft, gentle sunlight beckoned me to sleep.
彼女を夫の手からおびき出した。He lured her away from her husband.

私はエイリアンに誘拐されていた。I was abducted by aliens.
誘拐犯は降参する気配を見せなかった。The kidnappers showed no sign of giving up.
彼は私が誘拐犯人と接触出来るようにしてくれた。He put me in touch with the kidnappers.






水先案内人は船を港に誘導する。A pilot guides the ship toward the port.

どんな誘惑にも負けるな。Don't yield to any temptation.


今度の旅行は仕事じゃなくて遊びです。Our next trip is for pleasure, not for work.
子どもと遊び場の関係は葉と森林の関係と同じである。Children are to the playground what leaves are to the forest.


遊び相手がなくて孤独だった。I was lonely, with nobody to play with.

遊び半分に学校へ来るな。Don't come to school to lark around.

２人の子供が通りで遊んでいた。There were two children playing on the street.その機械は今遊んでいる。The machine is lying idle.
その遊園地を建設するのに１０年かかった。It took ten years to build the amusement park.












市は遊歩道を拡張する計画だ。The city is planning to extend the boardwalk.

遊覧船が出てるらしいよ。It looks like there's a pleasure boat.





計算書は四半期ごとに郵送されます。Statements will be mailed every quarter.
価格には郵送料が含まれている。The price includes the postage charge.
印刷物には、特別郵袋印刷物というのがあります。Included in the printed matter category is what is called 'special mailbag printed matter'.
１０ドルの郵便為替にしていただきたいのですが。I'd like a money order for ten dollars.
犬が郵便屋さんに吠えた。The dog barked at the mailman.
あの〜郵便局はどちらでしょうか。Uh..., where's the post office?



郵便配達の人があの犬にかみつかれた。The postman was bitten by that dog.
ニューヨークの郵便番号を教えていただけますか。Can you tell me what the zip code is for New York?
あなたに来た郵便物は取りに来られるまで保管しておきます。Mail for you will be held until you call for it.
その値段は郵便料金を含みます。The price includes postage.

飛行機からアルプスの雄大な眺めを楽しんだ。We enjoyed a grand view of the Alps from the airplane.
おんどりに時を告げさせるのは、めんどりである。It is the hen that makes the rooster crow.
その少年は次第に雄弁になった。The boy became more eloquent.
彼はキケロの様な雄弁家だ。He is a Cicero in eloquence.

第３の問題点は、エメットが自分の理論とデザインの現実の融合を図ったということである。The third point to make is that Emmet attempted to harmonize his theory with the reality of designing.
銀行はその会社に融資をした。The bank accommodated the company with a loan.



昨夜はよく眠れましたか。Did you have a good sleep last night?

夕闇が次第に深まっていった。The twilight merged into darkness.

選挙の結果は夕刊に載るでしょう。The results of the election will appear in the evening paper.

その旅行者は夕刻ニューヨークに着いた。The traveler arrived in New York in the evening.
真っ赤な夕焼けは明日の晴天を告げた。The deep red of the setting sun portended fine weather.

夕食後にピアノを弾きます。I play the piano after supper.
そのとき彼らは夕日を見ていました。They were watching the sunset then.

その校舎は夕暮れの中にきらきらと輝いていた。The school building was a blaze of light in the evening darkness.

ひょっとすると夕方前に雨になるかもしれない。It might rain before evening.

私たちは夕立にあって、びしょ濡れになった。We were drenched in the shower.５分も歩いた後、夕立に出会った。We had already walked five minutes when we were caught in a shower.


私たちはあらかじめスナックを用意しておいた。We prepared snacks beforehand.



吹き荒れる嵐の予感に、僕らはこぞって震えあがった。At this hint of the violent storm to come we shuddered as one.
ここでお目に掛かれるとは全然予期しませんでした。I little expected to see you here.
いつ戦争が終わるかだれにも予見できない。Nobody can foresee when the war will end.
キリストでもなく、エリヤでもなく、またあの預言者でもないなら、なぜ、あなたはバプテスマを授けているのですか。Why then do you baptize if you are not the Christ, nor Elijah, nor the Prophet?




立ち退きの予告を受けた。We received an eviction notice.
委員会は予算を承認した。The committee approved the budget.
誰も予算案に賛成の投票をしないだろう。No one will vote for the budget.





トムは明日の授業の予習をしているらしい。Tom seems to be preparing for tomorrow's lessons.





あなたはどんな結果を予想していますか。What results do you anticipate?

彼は予想外の結果にまごついた。He was perplexed at the unexpected result.


それは予想通りでした。It went just as we expected.

何が起こるか予測できない。We cannot predict what will happen.

実際人の運命を予知することは困難である。In point of fact it is difficult to foresee the destiny of people.

ご搭乗は６時４０分になる予定です。Boarding will be at six-forty.




アップルの新型ノートは予定通りに発表されるだろうか。Will Apple's new model notebook be announced on schedule?
船積みの予定日をご連絡ください。Would you please inform me of the expected shipping date?

２階に予備の部屋が二部屋ありますが、そのどちらもここ数年使用されていません。We have two spare rooms upstairs, neither of which has been used for years.














我々はすべての本をひとまとめにして予備室に入れた。We gathered all the books together and put them in the spare room.




彼女はそのことに関して何の予備知識もなかったのに、いつもきちんと理解した。She had no rule of thumb about it, but she got it right every time.










今夜の予報は雨である。Rain is forecast for this evening.


治療よりも予防。Prevention is better than cure.


ＭＭＲの予防接種は日本で受けていません。He didn't have MMR shots in Japan.





「ホテルの予約はしてありますか」「すみませんが、まだなんです」"Have you reserved a hotel room?" "Sorry, not yet."あなたの定期購読予約は六月号で切れます。Your subscription expires with the June issue.

掲示には「全席予約済み」とあった。"Fully booked" was on the notice.




予鈴だ。校門の辺りにいた生徒たちが一斉に足を速める。It's the class bell. The pupils that had been around the school gate quickened their steps as one.

うるさいなっ！少しの頭痛くらい我慢しろ。余は魔力がすっからかんだ。それもこれも姫のせいだぞ。Shurrup! Don't make such a fuss over a little headache. I'm flat out of magical power - this is all your fault!

彼は、旅券を余そうとした。He tried to save something from his travel expenses.


料理にあまりに時間がかかりすぎる。Cooking takes up too much time.
それは彼にとってはあまりにも易しすぎる仕事だ。It is too easy a task for him.
スキーシーズンも終わりに近づいて、ウエアとかのバーゲンやっているけど、余り物しかなくて丁度いいサイズのモノがない。Since ski season is almost over, the ski wear that's on sale is all leftovers, so there's nothing that's just my size.
日本では米が、ヨーロッパではワインが余っている。Japan has a surplus of rice, Europe of wine.

観客はコンサートの余韻に浸っていた。The audience was immersed in an aftertaste of the concert.




ユリコは余暇に花を生ける。Yuriko arranges flowers in her spare time.









余計な努力の結果、彼の血圧は通常以上に上がった。The extra effort raised his blood pressure above normal.こんな余計な機能なんでつけたんだろう。What did they add this needless function for?そうするとよけい傷をとがめるよ。It will aggravate the wound.
そんなことは余計なお世話だ。Mind your own business.










村人は、そのよそ者を自分たちの敵とみなした。The villagers regarded the stranger as their enemy.



最初は彼がよそよそしいように見えた。He looked unfriendly at first.










余談だが、この念発火能力のことをパイロキネシスというらしい。By the by, this ability to will fire into existence is apparently called pyrokinesis.
屋根裏には十分広い余地がある。There's ample room in the attic.彼女の才能に関しては疑問の余地が無い。There is no question as to her talent.






彼は私腹を肥やすのに余念がない。He is always busy feathering his own nest.

台風の余波で２日間停電した。There was no electricity for two days in the aftermath of the typhoon.
彼は作文の余白に自分の論評を書いた。He wrote his comments in the margin of the composition.



私たちは余分に１０ドル必要だ。We'll need an extra ten dollars.




彼は余命いくばくもない。His days are drawing to their close.

車を持つ余裕はないな。I cannot afford to keep a car.
彼は余裕綽々と落ち着いている。He seems to have much in reserve.












人は天から与えられるのでなければ、なにもうけることはできません。A man can receive only what is given to him from heaven.

私は彼の思想には組しない。I don't support his ideas.
クラブの今日の発展にはこれらの人々の努力があずかって大いに力があった。What this club is today is largely due to the effort of these people.


彼の仕事は与信管理です。His job is to manage credit authorization.
むろん信用していいとも。君にヨタ情報を教えたことが一度でもあったかい。Of course you can trust me. Have I ever given you a bum steer before?





与党は野党非難のキャンペーンを展開しています。The ruling party is running a smear campaign against the opposition.
国会の動きはこの問題をめぐる与野党間の政治的綱引きとなった。Parliamentary activity has become a political tug of war between the ruling and opposition parties over the issue.

彼はよい息子をもって、それが彼の誉れとなっている。He has a good son to his credit.



勝負は預かりとなった。The match ended in a draw.

４時まで荷物を預かっていただけませんか。Could you keep my bags here until four?地価が上がり続ければ私はかなりの利益にあずかることになろう。I'll come in for a nice profit if land values continue to rise.
お預けになる荷物はございますか。Do you have any bags to check?
あなたが先に帰ってくるといけないので、お隣に鍵を預けておきます。I'll leave a key with my next-door neighbour in case you get here before I do.


私の預金残高はどうなっていますか。What's the balance of my account?






その幼い少年は父親の両肩の上に乗っていた。The little boy sat on his father's shoulders.彼の考えはとても幼い。His way of thinking is very childish.
幼なじみが春から大阪の大学に行くらしい。Apparently an old friend of mine is going to a university in Osaka in Spring.



彼は幼児虐待で罰せられた。He was punished for child abuse.




私はまるで幼女のように大声で叫びたい気持ちだった。I feel like crying out loud as if I were a little girl.
彼のマナーが悪いのは幼少時代のしつけが足りなかったせいだと彼らは考えた。They attributed his bad manners to lack of training in childhood.


幼稚な説得とは、人をしつこく唆すことだ。Crude persuasion is to persistently egg someone on.
それにしても、幼稚園というところは、季節の行事にとても敏感です。Even so, kindergartens are sensitive to seasonal events.


一匹の妖怪がヨーロッパを徘徊している。共産主義という妖怪が。A spectre is haunting Europe ― the spectre of communism.


彼女の足取りは妖精のように軽やかだった。Her footsteps were as light as a fairy's.

ココの知能指数を調べるのは容易ではない。Testing Koko's IQ is not easy.
彼はたやすく彼女の家を探すことが出来た。He could find her house easily.
これらの容器は気密になっている。These containers are airtight.
その役人は建設会社から賄賂を受け取った容疑をかけられた。The official was suspected of accepting bribes from the construction companies.
警察が容疑者を捕まえた。The policeman got the suspect.
彼女は自分の容姿については、思い違いはしていなかった。She had no illusions about her looks.
今言ったことをどうかご容赦ください。Please accept my apologies for what I said just now.
近い将来、ゴミ処理費用が容積基準で有料化される可能性が高い。We will soon most likely be charged for garbage disposal by how much of it there is.
ケンは彼のお父さんの容態を尋ねた。Ken inquired about his father.
たばこは健康に害であるという主張は容認されてきた。The argument that smoking is injurious has become accepted.
タンクの容量は５０ガロンだ。The tank has a capacity of fifty-gallons.





揚げ物は私の体質に普通合わないんだ。Fried food usually doesn't agree with me.






地震が突然、建物をゆさぶった。The earthquake suddenly shook the buildings.強い円が経済を揺さぶっている。A strong yen is shaking the economy.



そして、徐々にスピードを上げて、乗客たちを右に左にと揺らしながら、トンネルの中を突き進んだ。Then, gathering speed, it raced through the tunnel, shaking the passengers from side to side.
突然私は誰かに揺り起こされた。All of a sudden, I was shaken out of my sleep by someone.
赤ちゃんを腕に抱いて揺り動かした。I rocked the baby in my arms.


彼の信念は何事にも揺るがなかった。Nothing could sway his conviction.
地震のあと小さなゆれが何回かあった。Several slight shocks followed the earthquake.
大地が揺れるのが感じられた。The earth was felt to tremble.
ボートは波立つ水の上で揺れ動いた。The boat danced on the choppy water.

それは五千人の兵員を擁する大部隊なのです。That is a large force with 5,000 soldiers.




このざまはどうしたんだ。How did you get into this mess?彼女は王女様になった夢を見た。She dreamed that she was a princess.どうもご親切さま。That's very kind of you.


彼はどうしたら良いのかわからない様子だった。He looked uncertain what to do.
この服装様式はパリに始まった。This style of costume originated in Paris.
コンピューターが産業の様相を大きく変えた。Computers have changed the industrial picture considerably.
彼の様態は、どちらかといえば、昨日よりよいほうです。His condition is, if anything, better than yesterday.






若い男女が人里離れた洋館で恐怖の一夜を過ごすという、ホラーの定番スタイルだ。This is a horror staple - young men and women spend a night of terror in an isolated house.


梨奈は家政部で、主に洋裁をやっている。Rina is in the home economics club. Her main activity is dressmaking.
私は洋式のホテルに泊まりたい。I'd like to stay in a Western-style hotel.


その店では洋書が売られている。Foreign books are sold at the shop.
私は洋食はあまり好きではない。I don't care for foreign food.

お前に新しい洋服を作ってあげよう。I will make a new suit for you.

４．中華鍋にごま油を熱してバターを溶かす。4. Heat the sesame oil in the wok and melt the butter.彼はコーヒーに砂糖を溶かした。He dissolved some sugar in his coffee.


氷が溶けると液体になる。When ice melts, it becomes liquid.砂糖は水に溶ける。Sugar dissolves in water.
海と空の色がお互いに溶け合っている。The colors of the sea and the sky blend into one another.
空が海と一つに溶け込むように見えた。The sky seemed to blend with the sea.
リトマス紙で溶液の液性（酸性、中性、塩基性）を調べるときは、リトマス紙をすべて溶液に浸すのではなく、紙の先端の部分だけを浸します。When investigating the pH (acidic, neutral, alkaline) of a liquid, don't soak the litmus paper completely in the liquid but just put the end of the paper in it.
空気中の酸素は水に溶解する。Oxygen from the air dissolves in water.
その火山は溶岩を流し出した。The volcano poured molten rock.

その液から溶剤を揮発させる。残るのは、香り成分と植物ワックスの塊。Vaporise the solvent from the liquid. What's left is the perfume component and a lump of vegetable wax.




何の用でここに来たのですか。What has brought you here?それから服を着て、講義用のメモを手さげ鞄に詰め込み、階段を駆け下りた。Then he got dressed, stuffed his lecture notes into his briefcase, and ran down the stairs.
この語は今では用いられない。That word has fallen out of use.
その部屋はあなたが使えるよう用意ができています。The room is now ready for you.
用意周到に見えてどこかで抜けてるしな。It looks well prepared but you see there'll be a slip somewhere.
料理用具を一括して買いたい。I want to buy cooking utensils in one lot.
その用件は明日まで待てますか。Can the matter wait till tomorrow?

「美しい」とか「醜い」といった言葉は相対的な用語である。The words 'beautiful' and 'ugly' are relative terms.

いま、この用紙に書き込まなくてはいけないのですか。Should I fill in this form now?
私は街に用事がある。I have an errand to do in town.
火には、用心しなさい。Be on your guard against fire.
なるほど彼は若いが、用心深い。Indeed he is young, but he is prudent.


マンション用地は杭で囲まれている。The site of the condominium is enclosed with stakes.
その発見はいろいろな用途に応用できる。We can apply the discovery to various uses.

衛生用品売り場はどこですか。Where is the sanitary section?
その２語の用法の区別は明瞭である。The distinction in usage between the two words is clear.


この辞書の用例はわかりやすい。The examples in this dictionary are easy to understand.




少年は羊の番をしている。The boy was watching the sheep.


私は牛肉より羊肉の方が好きだ。I prefer mutton to beef.
オーストラリアは多くの羊毛を輸出している。Australia exports a lot of wool.

こちらには大きなハスの葉があります。We have very big lotus leaves.


向こうで葉巻を吸っている背の高い男の人は有名な映画監督だ。The tall guy smoking a cigar over there is a famous director.
はがきにこの切手を貼って郵便箱に投函しなさい。Put this stamp on the postcard and drop it in the mailbox.

教えるということは大いに忍耐力を要する。Teaching demands a lot of patience.
彼女は要するにおしゃべりなんだ。She is, in brief, a chatterbox.

今のところお金はいらない。I don't need money at present.

Ｂ要因の取り扱いに関して、両者のアプローチにはわずかな違いがあるようだ。There seems to be a slight difference on the treatment of the B factor between their approaches.
私は彼に損害賠償を要求した。I claimed damages against him.







そこでまだ要塞都市の遺跡をみることができる。You can still see the remains of the fortress there.
以下は大統領の演説の要旨だ。The following is a summary of the President's speech.
彼は私の要請については何も言わなかった。He said nothing as to my request.

教育は重大な要素である。Education is a critical element.
彼はその要点を理解させようとした。He tried to make his point.
ご要望により地図を送ります。A map is available upon request.

この報告書は要領をえていない。This report isn't to the point.


私のガールフレンドは踊りがうまい。My girlfriend is a good dancer.

つまり彼女は下手な踊り子だ。That is, she is a poor dancer.

私の故郷は海のはるか向こうにある。My home lies far across the sea.はるか昔の初期の文化においては、競技で使われているボールは太陽を象徴していました。Long ago in early cultures, the ball in the game was the symbol of the sun.
鉄は金より遥かに役に立つ。Iron is much more useful than gold.



ナンシーはとても陽気でかわいらしい性格だ。Nancy has a very lively and sweet temperament.今日は汗ばむような陽気だ。It's warm enough today to bring out a slight sweat.

丘は陽光をいっぱいに浴びていた。The hills are bathed in sunlight.


ツベルクリン反応は陽性でした。The result of the tuberculin test was positive.




我々は精神を養わなければならない。We need to nourish our spirit.
医者は概して子供の養育の訓練を受けていない。Doctors are not, as a rule, trained in child rearing.




妻は養子をとりたかった。My wife wanted to adopt a child.

夫婦は孤児を養女にすることを決心した。The couple decided to adopt an orphan.

心身共にベストのコンディションで新人養成合宿に臨みましょう。With both mind and body in their best condition, let's look forward to the newcomers' training camp.






この段階を踏まえ、抑圧という概念をさらに詳細に検証していくことになります。From this point we go on to an even more detailed examination of the concept of repression.

彼は怒りを抑制することができなかった。He could not control his anger.
彼の話し方には抑揚が欠けている。Intonation is absent in his way of speaking.

彼は欲の少ない人だ。He is a man of few wants.
私は鉛筆をけずるナイフがほしい。I want a knife to sharpen my pencil with.この書類をそれぞれ２部ずつコピーしてほしいんだが。I'd like two copies of each of these documents.
それを欲するのは私の中の獣性だ。It's the animal in me that wants it.
彼女の医者になりたいと言う欲求が彼女を駆り立てた。Her desire to be a doctor spurred her on.
彼の怒りは欲求不満から生じた。His anger was born of frustration.


持てば持つほど、欲張りになる。The more you have, the more you want.
欲張っても食べきれないよ。Your eyes are bigger than your stomach.
欲望を愛と混同するな。Don't confuse desire with love.

彼は私に毒舌を浴びせた。He showered abuse on me.
屋根は日を浴びて輝いている。The roof is shining in the sun.
浴室付きの二人部屋をお願いします。We'd like a room for two with a bath.
これが原因でたいていの街の浴場は困難な状態に陥った。This caused most of the local bath-houses to fall on hard times.
何者かが彼女を浴槽で溺死させた。Somebody had drowned her in the bathtub.
彼は車の代金を翌月まで払わなくてもよいように取り決めた。He bargained that he should not have to pay for the car till the next month.
コンサートは、歌手が病気のため翌週まで延ばされた。The concert was held over till the following week because of the singer's illness.
私たちは翌日日光を訪れた。We visited Nikko the next day.
その会社の会計年度は４月から翌年の３月迄である。The company's financial year runs from April until March of the following year.
それは翼の全長が約４インチある。It has a wingspan of about four inches.



私は、この羅針盤の使い方を知りません。I don't know how to use this compass.
彼の日記は出来事の羅列に近かった。もっとも時には、長々と記述することもあった。His diary was a kind of list of events, though he commented at length once in a while.

その少年は上半身裸であった。The boy was naked to the waist.




彼はびっくりして裸足で外に飛び出した。He was so startled that he ran outside barefoot.彼は専門家はだしの優れた技術をもっている。He has excellent techniques which would outdo a specialist.




来年末までで、ここで働き始めてどれくらいの期間になりますか。How long will you have been working here by the end of next year?
１０時までに来ます。I'll come by 10.私の父は私に、ぜひそこを見てくるようにといった。My father insisted that I should go to see the place.

あのかわいい鳥は来る日も来る日も鳴いてばかりいた。That pretty bird did nothing but sing day after day.来る日も来る日も雪が降っている。It has been snowing day after day.






私は今学期ほとんど勉強をしなかったので、来学期はうんと勉強をするつもりです。I have hardly studied this term, so I'm going to study hard next term.








来月フランスの大統領が来日する予定だ。The French president is to visit Japan next month.



ペリーは浦賀に１８５３年に来航した。Perry visited Uraga in 1853.



お忙しいところをご来社いただきありがとうございました。Thank you for taking the time out to pay a visit to our company.


来週ヨーロッパへ行くつもりなんです。I'm going to Europe next week.





彼らは来世を信じている。They believe in a life after death.
来世紀の終わりまでに海は５０センチで上昇すると予想される。Oceans are expected to rise by 50 centimeters by the end of the next century.






来週またご来店下さい。Check back next week.


ボブがいつ来日したか分からない。I don't know when Bob came to Japan.

健は来年で１５歳になります。Ken will be fifteen next year.





彼の突然の来訪に驚いた。His sudden visit took me by surprise.
町をあげて来訪者を心から歓迎した。The whole town accorded a hearty welcome to the visitor.






男は頼み込んだ。「御願いします、オレの両腕を折っちゃってください！」The patient implored, "Please ... Break my arms!"
あなたに頼んでもよろしいですか。May I request a favour of you?私が頼んだものがまだ届いていません。I'm still waiting for my order.田中さんのことを頼むよ。Take care of Mr. Tanaka for me!
彼は頼もしい男だ。He is a man to be depended on.
私は何も頼りにするものがない。I have nothing to fall back on.


２時間ほど前から雷雨のため連絡が断たれている。Communications have been cut off for two hours because of a thunderstorm.




私たちは雷鳴を聞いた。We heard the crack of thunder.

網がスクリューに絡まった。The net got entangled in the propeller.

このつる草は木にからみつきます。This vine winds around trees.
彼らのけんかには多くの要因がからんでいる。There are many factors behind the quarrel between them.居酒屋で変なおっさんにからまれた。I was given a hard time by a strange guy at the tavern.
そんなにがぶがぶ飲み続けると、アル中になるのがオチですよ。If you go on drinking so much, you may well end up an alcoholic.オチの意味がわからなかったらすいません・・・。If you don't get the punch line, I'm sorry.
いまはおちぶれているがスミスさんは昔、たいしたものだったんだ。Mr Smith is poor but he has seen better days.
おじいちゃんが階段から落ちて大怪我をしたんだ。Grandpa fell down the stairs and got a serious injury.山の向こうに日が落ちた。The sun descended behind the mountains.今月は売上が落ちた。Sales are down this month.
君の家と私の家の中間で落ち合うことにしよう。Let's meet halfway between your house and mine.
ちょっとしたことで直ぐに落ち込んでしまいます。I get depressed by the slightest things.１年前に比べれば価格は大きく落ち込んでいる。Compared with the level of a year ago, the price is sharply lower.

彼は心の落ち着きを失った。His presence of mind deserted him.
私は落ち着き払っていた。I was cool as a cucumber.
私のほうに落ち度はない。There is no fault on my part.喧嘩は落度が一方にだけある場合には、永くは続かないであろう。Quarrels would not last long if the fault were only on one side.

このテストには落とし穴がある。This test has a catch.
アダムは岩登りをしている時に、落下してあしを折りました。While Adam was rock-climbing, he fell and broke his leg.





聖職者は人生の落伍者の方に味方して、勝利者を説得し、歩み寄らせることを生業としているようにおもえる。The priest seems to make it a practice to climb on the underdog's bandwagon and persuade the other side to compromise.

私の息子は落語家になろうとしたんだ。My son tried to become a rakugoka.



その壁には一面に落書きがあった。There were scribbles all along the wall.

私達はそのビルの落成式に出席しました。We were present at the dedication ceremony of the building.
このあたりを歩くときには、落石に注意しなければいけない。When you walk around here, you have to look out for falling rocks.
彼はいつも遊んでいたため落第した。He failed by playing all the time.
彼は落胆した気持ちを表した。He gave vent to his disappointment.



野原の大木に落雷があった。A big tree in the field was struck by lightning.






父は私の楽観を乱さないことにした。My father chose not to disturb my optimism.
ダイヤが乱れていた。The timetable was disrupted.


乱交パーティーの中で、めぐみはすっぱだかで芝生を走り回った。During the orgy Megumi ran naked round the lawn.

君の部屋は乱雑だね。Your room is out of order.
強い乱視はコンタクトレンズのほうが矯正できます。Contact lenses are more able to correct strong astigmatism.




警官隊はデモ隊と乱闘になった。The police brawled with the demonstrators.
強盗が彼の家に乱入した。The burglar burst into his house.



弟の乱暴はこのごろ目に余る。My brother has been much too rowdy lately.道具を乱暴に扱うな。Don't handle the tools roughly.

彼は特権を乱用したに違いない。He must have abused the privilege.

卵を一ダースづつつめなさい。Pack eggs in dozens.卵は硬くゆでてください。Boil the eggs hard.彼は医者の卵だ。He's a future doctor.



















この風は嵐の印だ。This wind is a sign of a storm.
一番最初に見るのはスポーツ欄だよ。I always read the sports page first.注はページの下欄についている。The notes are at the bottom of the page.

州警察のジャネット・ウェルプ広報官によれば、そのトラックは州間高速道路３０号線沿いの橋の欄干に激突して止まったとのことです。State police spokeswoman Janet Welp says the truck wound up crashing into a bridge railing along Interstate 30.




私は温室でランを栽培している。I grow orchids in my greenhouse.


漁夫の利を占める。A third party makes off with the profits.
一郎は利益よりも友情を大切にする。Ichiro puts friendship above profit.利益になるような本を読みなさい。Read books that are worthwhile.
その投資には６％の利回りが保証されている。A 6% yield is guaranteed on the investment.
彼は自分の利害に敏感である。He is alive to his own interests.


彼女は利己一点張りの女だ。She puts her own interests above everything else.
利己的な行動をするべきではない。You ought not to act selfishly.
しかし、トニーは利口な少年ではありませんでした。But Tony was not a clever boy.
この貸付金は高い利子をとられることになっている。This loan will carry very heavy interest.

もちろん利潤は生産費を上回るべきです。Benefits of course should exceed the costs.

彼は利息を付けて借金払いをした。He paid the loan with interest.

我々の計画には多くの利点がある。Our plan has lots of advantages.
政治家は国民の無関心に付け込んで利得に走っています。Politicians are cashing in on public apathy.


休暇をできるだけ上手く利用しなさい。Make the most of your vacation.
私が関心があるのは車ではなくその利用者の方だ。It is not the car but the users that I am concerned about.
そんなに急激に利率が下がるとは誰も予想しなかった。Nobody anticipated such a sharp decline in interest rates.







これらの回答は、原因と結果をはき違えている。These answers confuse cause with consequence.

このスリッパに履きかえてください。Please put on these slippers.
この契約は当事者全部が履行すべきものである。This agreement is binding on all parties.
単位履修の手続きは終えましたか。Did you finish your class registration?
警察はその男の履歴を調べた。The police looked into the records of the man.
応募者は彼らの履歴書を提出するように求められた。Applicants were requested to submit their resumes.


箱の中には梨がいくつかある。There are some pears in the box.



彼女は理科を勉強しなければなりません。She has to study science.彼は理科を２科目とらなければならない。He has to take two science classes.
わたしはあなたの言うことが理解できる。I can understand what you are saying.





彼らは彼を理事に任命した。They appointed him as a director.
彼が理事長の代行をしている。He is acting for the chief director.

人間には理性があるが動物には無い。Man has reason, animals do not.
サミーはジョンにとって理想の歌手だった。To John, Sammy was an ideal singer.

彼は理想的な夫であることが分かった。He proved to be an ideal husband.
我々が真理を知るのは、理知によるだけではなく、また心情によって知るのである。We know the truth, not only by reason, but also at heart.
これらの理念は憲法に具体化されている。These ideas are embodied in the constitution.

理髪師は人のひげをそり、散髪をする人である。A barber is a man who shaves and cuts men's hair.
私は月に１度理髪店へ行く。I go to the barber's once a month.




どうしてあなたにお詫びする理由があるのですか。Why should I apologize to you?
その理容師は彼の髪を刈った。The barber gave him a haircut.
その考えが彼の理論の基礎となっている。The idea underlies his theory.
靴の裏にガムがこびりついちゃった。There's gum stuck to the bottom of my shoe.家のうらに広い庭があった。There was a large garden behind the house.不幸の裏には幸いあり。Every cloud has a silver lining.





彼は裏金をもらいました。He got paid under the table.
彼は裏口入学した。He bought his way into college.




彼はこっそりと歩いて家の裏手のドアへと回った。He sneaked around to the back door.




あの男は裏切りもしかねない。He is capable of treachery.
やつは僕を裏切ったんだ！He stabbed me in the back!
裏切り者は国を敵に売った。The traitor betrayed his country to the enemy.

えりはまず裏側にアイロンをかけ次に表側をかけなさい。Iron the inside of collars first, and then the outside.



どの雲にも銀の裏地がついている。Every cloud has a silver lining.
難民がごみごみした裏町に住んでいました。The refugees were living in a narrow, squalid backstreet.

強盗は裏通りで彼女を襲った。The robber attacked her on a back street.
家の裏庭なら１０人以上入れるわよ。My backyard can hold more than ten people.


私たちは交通渋滞を避けるために裏道を通った。We took a back road to avoid the heavy traffic.


お前のすることには裏表がある。You are two-faced.
私は日記の裏表紙に彼の住所を走り書きした。I scribbled down his address in the back of my diary.

私の意見を裏付ける証拠はたくさんある。I have a couple of pieces of evidence to support my opinion.

「見た目は悪くないがちょっと軽薄そう」な外見とは裏腹に、彼女はいないし、女性に手が早いワケでもない。In contrast to his "not bad looks but seems a bit of a dandy" appearance, he didn't have a girlfriend and he wasn't particularly fast with the ladies.
ここへ来る途中、風が強すぎて僕の傘は裏返しになってしまった。On my way here, the strong wind blew my umbrella inside out.
彼はシャツを裏返しに着ていた。He had his shirt on inside out.

いわゆる裏方仕事もたくさんあります。There's also a great deal of so called behind-the-scenes work.





計画は裏目に出て我々は大損をした。The plan backfired on us and we lost a lot of money.





１００里を行く者は９９里を半ばとする。There's many a slip between the cup and the lip.



この子犬は里心がついて泣いているんだ。This puppy is crying because it misses its mother.

すみません。いま手が離せないんです。I'm sorry, I'm busy right now.
ケイトは、これを最後に永久にここを離れていった。Kate left this place for good.



私は離婚に同意するつもりだ。I will consent to the divorce.
彼女は彼に対して離婚訴訟を起こした。She filed a suit for divorce against him.



国民党は、簡潔に言うと、政治が崩壊する前に政府を離脱する必要があった。The People's party, to put it briefly, needed to leave the government before the government fell.


結婚している人々の間では、離婚や離別が増え、その結果、片親の家庭がますます多くなっている。Among married couples, there has been an increase in divorce and separation with the result that there are many more one-parent families.
２２６便は１０時３０分に離陸します。Flight 226 takes off at 10:30.
強風が陸の方へ吹き始めた。A strong wind began to set in.


戦時中、彼は陸軍に所属していた。During the war, he served in the army.



陸上競技会は大雨のため中止になった。The track meet was called off on account of the heavy rain.








陸路ではそこへ行けない。The place is not accessible by land.




実質成長と名目成長率の差は物価上昇を意味する。Price increases explain the difference between the real and nominal growth rates.
しかし城にたどりつくなり、近衛兵を率いた人によって、わたしはこの牢獄に勾引されてしまった。However, when I finally reached the castle I was thrown into this prison by the commander of the imperial guard.







夕方会社にお立ち寄りください。Drop by my office this evening.昨日彼がぶらっと立ち寄った。He dropped in on me yesterday.明日の朝立ち寄ってあなたを車に乗せていきましょう。I'll come by and pick you up tomorrow morning.
私は彼の墓を立ち去り難かった。I hesitated to leave his grave.

彼女は自分の運命に立ち向かう覚悟ができていた。She was ready to face her fate.

彼は立ち止まってポスターをのぞき込んだ。He paused to look at the poster.
彼はこれまでこんな苦境に立ち至ったことはなかった。Never in his life had he encountered such a dilemma.
突然若い女性が立ち上がった。Suddenly, a young woman stood up.多くの消費者は消費税反対に立ち上がった。Many consumers rose up against the consumption tax.どうしよう、コンピューターが立ち上がらない。I can't start up my computer. What am I supposed to do?
あの会社もついにホームページを立ち上げたらしい。That company just put up a web page.ノートパソコンの電源を入れ、ブラウザを立ち上げて、もう覚えてしまったアドレスを打ち込む。I switch on my laptop, start up the browser, and type in the address I've already learnt by heart.
すぐそこでそばを立ち食いしてきた。I had a bowl of noodles at a street nearby.


大水のため人々は立ち退いた。The people were evacuated because of the flood.彼は家賃をだいぶ滞納し、そのためアパートをたちのかされた。He was way behind on his rent. As a result, he was evicted from his apartment.

ショックから立ち直りましたか。Have you recovered from the shock?

その通りに立ち並ぶ木々は春に美しい花を咲かせます。The trees that line the street have lovely blossoms in spring.
面倒なようでも、基本に立ち返って検討し直したらどうだろう。急がば回れ、というじゃない。It may seem like a hassle, but I think you ought to go back to the basics and start over. Haste makes waste they say.

私たちは３０分立ち話をした。We stood talking for half an hour.
落ちはしないかという恐怖で彼は立ちすくんだ。Fear of falling caused him to freeze.
湖から霧が立ちこめてきた。The fog was rising from the lake.

バースデーケーキにろうそくを立ててください。Please put some candles on the birthday cake.彼らは円の中心に棒を立てた。They set up a pole at the center of the circle.猫が私の手につめを立てた。The cat dug its claws into my hand.
はしごを塀に立てかけてください。Place the ladder against the wall.




彼女は計画の立案を指揮した。She directed the planning of the project.




私は大統領に立候補するのを諦めた。I gave up running for president.
その達成には非常に困難なことが立ちふさがっている。Great difficulties stand in the way of its achievement.


彼らは彼女の有罪を立証しようとしている。They sought to prove her guilt.
お答えできる立場にありません。I'm not in a position to answer.彼女の立場からその問題をとらえるようにしなさい。Try to see the problem from her point of view.






私たちの学校には立派な図書館があります。We have a nice school library.
鈴木さんはトムのいたずらにご立腹だ。Mr. Suzuki is angry about Tom's prank.




その州の立法者は時代遅れの法律を廃止した。The legislators of that state did away with outdated laws.
このテーマに関するほとんどの研究では、立法府の介入が悪影響をもたらしたということが示されている。It has been shown in most studies on this subject that intervention of the legislature had adverse effects.

私は彼のわきをかすめて走った。I brushed by him while running.




「ほぼ４ポンドだよ」とボブが言う。"Nearly four pounds," says Bob.アジアはヨーロッパのほぼ４倍の大きさである。Asia is roughly four times the size of Europe.
ＡＩは人工知能の略です。AI stands for artificial intelligence.
私の名前はロバートなので、皆は略してボブと呼びます。My name is Robert, so they call me Bob for short.


Ａｐｒ．はＡｐｒｉｌ（４月）の略語です。Apr. is an abbreviation for April.
ＷＨＯと言う文字は何の略字ですか。What do the letters WHO stand for?


ＵＳＡはアメリカ合衆国の略称です。USA stands for the United States of America.





ガラスのコップを流しにおこうとしたら手が滑って、ガシャッと割れた。When I tried to set the glass down in the sink my hand slipped and it shattered to pieces.彼は流しのタクシーを止めた。He hailed a cruising taxi.
僕ならスープ皿を持ってきて、グラスを充分に注意しながらテーブルの端まで滑らせて水をそのスープ皿に流し込むな。水は床にはこぼれない。I'd get a soup plate and then slide the glass very carefully over to the edge of the table, and let the water run into the soup plate - it doesn't have to run onto the floor.ページが読み込まれたら更新情報をページ内に流し込む　prototype.jsprototype.js - inserts update information into the page when the page is loaded.
あんな恐ろしい男のために流す涙はない。I cannot shed a tear for that horrible man.たくさんの家が洪水で流された。A lot of houses were washed away by the flood.彼は夕方のニュースで、その殺人の裁判を最初に流すことに決めた。He decided to put the murder trial first in the evening news.
流れは池に注いでいる。The stream falls into the pond.田中さんの教えるのは歴史の流れに逆らう。Tanaka's teaching goes against the stream of history.こういう流れになると結局、どんぐりの背比べになる。Once things start going this way, in the end they'll all be much of a muchness.
アルフォンスが空を見上げたまま、速く流れる雲を見つめていた。Alphonse looked at the racing clouds, his eyes turned to the sky.セーヌ川はパリを流れている。The Seine flows through Paris.当時はきれいな水がこの川にも流れていた。Pure water was washed away to this river as well at that time.
この川はオンタリオ湖に流れ込む。This river runs into Lake Ontario.

水が壊れたパイプからどっと流れ出した。Water poured from the broken pipe.
切れた血管から血がどくどくと流れ出た。Blood poured from the cut vein.

あ、流れ星だ！Look! There goes a shooting star.


ダムが切れて流域に大水が押し寄せた。The dam gave way and sent a great flush of water down the valley.

流感の予防ワクチンの注射をした。I was vaccinated against the flu.



警察は流血を避けたかった。The police wanted to avoid bloodshed.
流言飛語に惑わされるべからず、とはいうものの、言うは易く行うは難し、と思わない？They say you shouldn't take rumors seriously, but that's easier said than done.
「性差別」という言葉が今、流行っている。Terms like "sexism" are now in vogue.その年はペストがはやった。The plague occurred that year.
彼は流行歌を歌うのが好きです。He likes to sing popular songs.

流産はとても辛い経験です。Miscarriage is a heart-breaking experience.

やけどした指を、流水中で冷やしなさい。Cool the burned finger in running water.
隕石が燃えて、流星となる。A burning meteoroid produces a meteor.

さすが、お嬢様。自由奔放な生活をしていたわけじゃないんだ。Just what you'd expect of a young lady, you certainly weren't left to live as you pleased.



デビッドは流暢にフランス語を話すことができる。David can speak French fluently.
よって流通するマネーが減り、物価上昇は鎮静化する。Thus money in circulation drops, and price escalation quietens down.




経済情勢は流動的である。Economic conditions are in a state of flux.

外国人労働者の流入が、この地域で深刻な住宅難を引き起こした。The influx of foreign workers has caused a serious housing problem in this area.
その作品は小説の新流派を生むだろう。The work will give birth to a new school of novel.
流氷を見るために北海道に行った。I went to Hokkaido to see the floating ice.
吸血鬼伝説はバルカン地方に流布している。Legends of vampires flourish in the Balkans.








コレステロールをためたくなかったら、脂肪のない赤身の肉を食べるのがよい。If you want to avoid cholesterol, eat lean meat with no fat.
彼はずいぶんため込んだようだ。He seems to have saved a lot of money.
彼女の目に涙がたまった。Tears gathered in her eyes.

例えば、ペパーバーグは緑色のもくせいの留めくぎと赤色の紙の三角形のような物体を見せる。For example, Pepperberg would show Alex an object, such as a green wooden peg or a red paper triangle.
何びとも奴隷の状態に留め置かれてはならない。No one shall be held in slavery.
ここで留意しなければいけないことは、ウイルスが繁殖するスピードが速いという点である。Something else to be borne in mind here is the rapidity with which the virus can reproduce.
私は自分の力で留学するつもりだ。I will study abroad on my own.
３人の中国人留学生がその大学に入学が許された。Three Chinese students were admitted to the college.
彼女に留守を頼んで外出しました。I went on the trip, leaving the house in her care.

私の留守中に誰か来ましたか。Did anyone come in my absence?
留守電に入れといてね。Leave me a message, please.
その子は留守番をしなければならないと言って怒っていた。The boy was cross at having to stay at home.
あなたは留守番電話を買うべきだ。You should buy an answering machine.


硫黄はマッチを作るのに使われる。Sulfur is used to make matches.




２粒の涙が彼女のほおを流れ落ちた。Two tears fell down her cheeks.

空気中のごく小さい粒子がガンのもとになり得る。Tiny particles in the air can cause cancer.

















あなたも人の上に立たれる方でしたら、そこのところをほんの少しでも慮っていただきませんと。If you're placed in a position of authority, it is imperative that you take into consideration that point, if even just a little...

以前は、人々は歩いて旅をしたものだった。People used to travel on foot.
あの旅館は家庭的だ。The hotel has a homey atmosphere.
覆面をした男達が旅客を襲って金を奪った。Masked men held up the passengers and robbed them of their money.
ＡＢＣニュースによれば、もう一機のジェット旅客機が、中近東でハイジャックされたそうだ。According to the ABC news, another jet-liner was hi-jacked in the Middle East.
彼は、旅券を余そうとした。He tried to save something from his travel expenses.
いつ旅行においでになりますか。When will you go on a journey?
ほとんどの旅行者はニューヨークのゴーストタウンに立ち寄らなかった。Few of the trippers called in at the ghost town of New York.
一番近い旅行代理店はどこにありますか。Where's the nearest travel agency?

その男は旅人からお金を奪った。The man robbed the traveler of his money.
旅先では迷子になりやすい。When traveling, it is easy to get lost.


安いホテルに泊まって旅費を浮かした。I saved on travelling expenses by staying at a cheap hotel.
旅立ちの時が近づいている。The time is approaching when we must leave.
彼女はタイ国に旅立った。She set out for Thailand.
私は今まさに最後の旅路につき、暗黒へと一大飛躍しようとしている。I am about to take my last voyage, a great leap in the dark.


彼はゆっくりうなずいて了解の意を示した。He nodded slowly in comprehension.「とりあえず店の前、掃除しといてくれ」「了解！」「打ち水も頼む」"Clean up in front of the shop first." "OK!" "Sprinkle some water out there too."

官軍に入城を許すとはどういう了見だ。What do you think you're doing letting the loyalists into the castle?






法案は両院を通った。The bill passed both Houses.
そのいさかいは両家の間に深い溝を残した。The quarrel left a gulf between the two families.



大雨が続いて川の水が両岸からあふれ出た。After the heavy rains, the river overflowed its banks.
結婚前は両眼を大きく見開いておれ、その後は、その半ばを閉じよ。Keep your eyes wide open before marriage, half shut afterwards.





むろん、この両極端の間に多くのバリエーションがある。Obviously there are many variations between these two extremes.





海底ケーブルが両国の間に引かれた。A submarine cable was laid between the two countries.




私は、両耳を指でふさいで、あの恐ろしい音が聞こえないようにしたの。I put my fingers in my ears to block out the terrible sounds.
両者の溝が狭まった。The gap between them has narrowed.

両手に花でいい環境じゃん！It's nice to have a pretty girl on each arm.












これをドルに両替してください。Please change this to dollars.



両替人の金を散らし、その台を倒した。He scattered the coins of the money-changers and overturned their table.

両天秤をかけると失敗する。You can't have it both ways.







ナンシーは膝の上に両肘をついた。Nancy put her elbows on her knees.




この手袋は両方がそろっていない。Their gloves are not in pairs.

彼らの申し出には両面があるぞ。Their offer cuts both ways.






鳥は両翼を広げた。The bird spread its wings.
健康は節制と両立する。Health coexists with temperance.
お前と俺は、今回のプロジェクトでは車の両輪ということだろう。仲良くしないことにはうまくいかないよ。It seems you and I are essential to this project. We'd better get along or it'll go badly.


ろうそくの両端を燃やすことは、極めて簡単にろうそくを溶かすことになる - 美女を両脇に抱え込んだプレイボーイのように。Burning the candle at both ends reduces the candle to wax in a hurry - just like a playboy having a pretty girl on each arm.
彼女は彼の首の回りに両腕を巻き付けた。She wrapped her arms around his neck.


この新車は他車をしのぐだろう。This new car will put other cars to shame.この金で何とか１ヶ月はしのげる。The money will carry us for about a month.


私の大学には寮があります。My university has a dorm.
「ちょっと、寮生相手にアンケートでもとってみる？」「あっ、いわゆるひとつのマーケティングリサーチだな」"Say, shall we try a questionnaire with the boarding students?" "Ah! One of those things they call 'marketing research'."


貴重な思い出料としては安いものですよ。That'll make for a memorable time.
料金は会計係へ払って下さい。Pay your dues to the treasurer.


これらのりんごは料理用にもってこいだ。These apples are good cookers.良い所：様々なコンボで自由に敵を料理する楽しさ。Good points: The pleasure of disposing of enemies with a variety of combos.

きのうある料理店で、私は突然、バーナードにあった。I happened upon Bernard at a restaurant yesterday.



日増しに涼しくなっていく。It's getting cooler day by day.



鹿は昔猟の獲物の主たるものだった。Deer were once the main game.
私たちの猟犬は大きな鹿を追いかけた。Our pointer took off after a big deer.

猟師たちは銃でその象をねらった。The hunters aimed at the elephant.
ウィリーは誤って父親の猟銃を発砲し、壁に穴を開けた。Willie accidentally let off his father's shotgun and made a hole in the wall.
重病には思い切った療法が必要だ。Desperate diseases require desperate remedies.
療養に専念すべきです。You have to concentrate on your recovery.
探検隊の糧食はすぐ尽きてしまった。The expedition's supplies soon gave out.

それに比べ最近彼女のお天気は良好。In comparison to which she's been in a really good mood recently.
この世で男にとって最良のことは良妻を選ぶことであり、最悪のことは選び損なって悪妻を持つことである。The best thing in the world for a man is to choose a good wife, the worst being to mistakenly choose an ill-suited one.
彼は良識ある人です。He is a person with good sense.
このテーブルは良質のオーク材でできている。This table is made of good oak.
彼は良心のとがめを感じた。He felt the pangs of conscience.
賢明で良心的な人に助言を求めなさい。Take counsel with a man who is wise and of a good conscience.



彼女はかなりの量の酒を飲んだ。She has had quite a lot to drink.

その作家は７０歳だが、２０年前と変わらず作品を量産している。The author is seventy, but he's no less productive than he was twenty years ago.





民間機が軍事的領域を侵犯したとのことです。A commercial airplane allegedly violated military airspace.かかわってくる問題は経済学の領域をはるかに越えている。The questions involved go far beyond economics.

私はこのビザを、神戸のアメリカ領事館でとりました。I got this visa at the American Consulate in Kobe.

領収書は必ず保管してください。Make sure you save the receipt.


あの島はアメリカの領土です。That island is American territory.


あなたは私の２倍の力がある。You are twice as strong as I.あなたは集中する力を失ってしまった。You've lost the ability to concentrate.チョコレートにはＬＤＬの酸化を防止する力がある。Chocolate acts to prevent LDL oxidisation.



群衆に押されないよう力を入れて踏ん張った。I braced myself against the crowd.
彼は力いっぱい引っ張ったが、岩はびくともしなかった。He pulled with all his strength, but the rock would not move.


熱力学の背後には、第１巻で学んだ力学の法則にしたがう原子や分子の運動があります。Behind thermodynamics lie the movements of atoms and molecules following the laws of motion learned in the first volume.


踊り子達は白いドレスを着てきゃしゃに見えますが、実際には彼女たちは馬のように力強いのです。The dancers look delicate in their white dresses, but they are really as strong as horses.



今回発売されたアルバムは、ストーリー仕立てになっていて力作だ。Her latest album is a tour de force. It even has a storyline.
彼は非常に身体が弱くて力仕事はできなかった。He was too feeble to do manual labor.
姉は若い力士を応援しています。My sister cheers young sumo wrestlers.

あの人は化け物のような力持ちだ。That man's monstrously strong.




火星にはかつて原始的な生物が存在していたと彼は力説している。He contends that primitive life once existed on Mars.





天におわす神のお力添えがあった。God above helped us.
彼の話の力点は一生懸命に働かなくてはならないということにあった。The emphasis of his talk was on the need to work hard.





あの討論会では力不足でした。I was out of my depth in that debate.


地位は君の力量しだいだ。The position is conditional on how well you are able to perform.


あなたは緑と青を見分けることができますか。Can you tell green from blue?東京ミッドタウンは緑がいっぱい！There's a lot of greenery in Tokyo Midtown!

彼は壁を全て緑色に塗った。He painted all the walls green.




たくさんの人々が倫理の面から遺伝子治療に反対した。A great many people were opposed to gene therapy in terms of ethics.
倫理学というのは、行動の規範を意味する。Ethics means the rules of conduct.
そうですね。下手にでてばかりもなんだし。かつ、倫理的ですね。That's right. It's written in an unassuming fashion, and it's an ethical standpoint as well.
彼の打率は３割４分３厘で、ホームランは５４本であった。He batted .343 with 54 home runs.銭厘を大切にすれば大金はおのずとたまる。Take care of the pence, and the pounds will take care of themselves.

林に竹が目立つ。Bamboo stands out in the woods.



これらのりんごは料理用にもってこいだ。These apples are good cookers.

そうだ、どうせなら散歩がてらに、林道に行ってプチ森林浴でも・・・。Right, while we're taking a walk anyway, we could like go along the woodland path and enjoy a little stroll through the forest...

ニューヨークには高層ビルが林立している。New York bristles with towering buildings.


彼はレースにのぞんで精神統一した。He psyched himself up for the race.

何か実際に起これば、私は臨機応変にやるだけだ。If something does happen, I'll just play it by ear.


私はその会社で臨時の仕事を得た。I got a temporary job at the firm.彼等は貿易問題について臨時の会合を開いた。They held a special session on trade problems.









我々は家族の輪の中で育った。We grew up within our family circle.
今朝この輪ゴムをポケットに入れたときには、これが役に立つことになろうとは思ってもみなかった。I never thought this rubber band would come in handy when I put it in my pocket this morning.

彼はその機械の輪郭をスケッチします。He sketches the outline of the machine.






警備員たちは１時間ごとに輪番で見回った。The guards rotated in making their rounds every hour.

ジョーダンさんは彼の隣に座った。Mr Jordan sat down beside him.
火がめらめらと隣家に燃え移っていった。The fire spread and licked the neighboring house.
よい垣根はよい隣人をつくる。Good fences make good neighbors.

その二つの村は隣接している。The two villages adjoin each other.





２粒の涙が彼女のほおを流れ落ちた。Two tears fell down her cheeks.
うちの子供達は早く起きるようにと涙ぐましい努力をしている。My children make pathetically sincere efforts to get up early.


回収対象のソニー製充電池は累計で７６５万９０００個となった。The amount of Sony rechargeable batteries supposed to be collected totalled 7,659,000 units.





アメリカ人が貿易赤字を累積したのは、限度を超えたぜいたくをしたからですよ。Americans accumulated their trade deficits by living far beyond their means.
あの店には織物類が置いてありますか。Does that store keep textile goods?





この構成において、三角形の代わりに長方形を用いても類似の困難が生ずる。We encounter similar difficulties when we substitute rectangles for triangles in this configuration.
なぜ類人猿は他の動物よりも進化したのか。Why have the apes evolved more than other animals?



国際貿易禁止令がその国の経済にとって最後の頼みでしょう。An international trade ban could be the last straw for that country's economy.




















たとえば、標本はいくつですか。How many samples, for example?
例によって彼は新聞を読みながら食事をしている。As is his way, he eats reading a newspaper.


この規則には例外は認められない。This rule allows no exception.

これは例外的な場合だ。This is an exceptional case.









彼は図を使って自説を例証した。He illustrated his theory with diagrams.

君のワークブックの最初の例題をしなさい。Do the first example in your workbook.

今年は例年より桜は早いだろう。The cherry blossoms will come out earlier than usual.

例文の選定がまずかったです。The choice of example sentence wasn't wise.



冷えたビールがあればたまらないね。A cold beer would hit the spot!
明け方近くは、ぐっと冷え込む。It gets extremely cold toward dawn.


私は体の芯まで冷え切った。I was frozen to the bone.



晴天にもかかわらず、空気は冷え冷えとしていた。In spite of the sunny weather, the air was rather chilly.
もう手が冷たくって。My hand's getting too cold.ケイトが彼にあっちに行ってと冷たく言ったので、彼の心は傷つきました。Kate broke his heart by rudely demanding he go away.
ちょっと冷まして、熱いうちは食べないように。Let your food cool off a bit; don't eat it while it's hot.
スープは冷めていない。The soup is not cool.「いいえ、違います」とイギリス人はさめた返事をしました。"No, I'm not," replied the Englishman coldly.
彼らはジャックの髪の刈り方をひやかした。They made fun of Jack's haircut.
ワインをもっと冷やしたいんだ。I want to chill the wine more.


先ほどの彼らのやり取りにはひやひやしたよ。まさに一触即発の危機だったね。I was really nervous to see how they dealt with each other just now. I guess things were touch-and-go between them.

東北地方は大変な冷害に見舞われた。The Tohoku district was badly hit by the cold weather.


氷のような冷気が車内に忍び込んできた。An icy chill stole into the car.
鉄は熱してから急に冷却して焼きを入れる。Iron is tempered by heating and sudden cooling.


彼は友人の冷遇に心を痛めた。He smarted under his friend's ill-treatment.


魚は冷血動物である。Fish are cold-blooded animals.




犬を叩くなんて彼は冷酷だ。It was cruel of him to beat his dog.


彼女は人生に対してとても冷笑的だ。She is very cynical about life.
冷水機が故障している。The water cooler is out of order.

彼は最近まで冬でも冷水浴をしていた。He took a cold bath even in winter until recently.
君はもっと冷静に行動すべきだ。You should act more calmly.
冷戦はソビエトの崩壊と共に終わった。The Cold War ended when the Soviet Union collapsed.




うちの冷蔵庫は故障している。Our refrigerator is out of order.



私の演説は冷淡な沈黙で迎えられた。My speech was greeted with cold silence.

その魚と肉を冷凍してください。Please freeze the fish and meat.
その冷凍魚をここに持ってきてくれ。Bring the frozen fish here.

私が冷凍庫を持つ十分な理由がいくつかある。There are several good reasons why I have a freezer.


この冷凍食品はどのくらい保存できますか。How long can we keep this frozen food?




冷房が効きすぎているのですが。How do I fix the air-conditioner?





その調子で勉強を続けなさいと先生が励ましてくれた。My teacher encouraged me in my studies.
昇進が見送られた女には働く励みがない。She had no incentive to work after she was refused a promotion.


今まで以上にいっそう勉強に励みなさい。You should study even more than before.





彼女の親切な助言に対して彼は礼を述べた。He thanked her for her kind help.
行ってじきじきに彼女に礼を言いなさい。You had better go and thank her in person.
そんなことをするのは礼儀の常識を欠いている。That is beneath ordinary decency.
私の母は、礼儀作法に厳しい。My mother is strict with manners.
それはあまり礼儀正しくもありません。It is not very polite, either.



あなたは彼らにお礼状を書くべきだと思いませんか。Don't you think you ought to write them a thank-you note?
いかにも敬虔なるクリスチャンが送る、礼節重き言葉です。So characteristic of what a pious Christian would say, this courteous phrase.
朝の礼拝は１１時に始まります。Morning worship begins at eleven o'clock.
将軍は礼服を着てひときわ目立っていた。The general cut a distinguished figure in his dress uniform.
だれがその猫に鈴をつけられるか。Who can put a bell on the cat?



我々は抵抗か隷属かの二者択一を迫られている。We are faced with the alternatives of resistance or slavery.

私はコーヒーをじゅうたんにこぼしてしまった。I spilled my coffee on the carpet.父は交通騒音について不平をこぼした。My father complained about the traffic noise.
コーヒーがこぼれましたよ。You've spilt your coffee.急に涙がこぼれてきた。I burst into tears.
今は零下１０度だ。It is ten degrees below zero now.

零細なパン屋はスーパーマーケットに圧倒された。Mom-and-pop bakeries were overwhelmed by supermarkets.


そのテストではだれも零点をとらなかった。Nobody got zero in that test.
寒暖計はしばしば零度以下になる。Thermometers often go below zero.
これで彼の霊も浮かばれるだろう。With this his spirit will be consoled.



忠告を与えることは出来るが、行動を起こさせる霊感を吹き込むことは出来ない。We may give advice, but we do not inspire conduct.

私は霊魂の不滅を信じる。I believe in the immortality of the soul.


人間は万物の霊長である。Man is the lord of all creation.
霊長類の毛づくろいは集団の結合を強める。Grooming in primates increases group cohesion.
これに対して霊的なことがらに関する熱心な会話は、霊的な進歩に大いなる助けとなります。Nevertheless, devout conversation on spiritual things helps no little with spiritual progress.







太陽はどんなに麗しく輝いていようとも沈まなくてはならない。No matter how fair the sun shines, still it must set.












私は地理より歴史が好きだ。I prefer history to geography.
ジョージ３世は歴史家によって不当に悪し様に言われてきた。George III has been unfairly maligned by historians.

歴史学は人文科学の一部門である。History is a branch of the humanities.



日本の歴史上の人物であなたは誰が好きですか。Which one of Japan's historical characters do you identify yourself with?


彼はその謎を解くために歴史的な文書を調べた。He looked into historical documents to solve the mystery.彼は歴史的な航海に出かけた。He set out on his historic voyage.



今日の土地問題は歴代の政府の無策によるものである。Today's land problems are the product of years of neglect by successive governments.










この数字の列を合計しなさい。Add up this column of figures.
徳川家の系図を列挙しなさい。Recite the names of the members of the Tokugawa clan.


この列車は東京行きです。This train is bound for Tokyo.
彼はその式に列席していた。He was present at the ceremony.

彼女は、彼より、数学において劣っている。She is inferior to him in math.
そのため、派遣労働者は劣悪な労働条件の下で働いている。For that reason, temporary workers are working under inferior conditions.






あのダークホースは予備選挙の前は、劣勢でした。The dark horse candidate was losing in the polls before the primary.



あなたはだれにも劣等感を感じる理由はない。There is no reason for you to feel inferior to anyone.


彼は烈火のように怒った。He was raging mad.



この布は裂けやすい。This cloth tears easily.
私は壁の裂け目から外を覗いた。I peeped out through a crack in the wall.




それは片思いの恋だった。It was a one-sided love affair.







あなたはアメリカで日本料理が恋しくなるでしょう。You will miss Japanese food in the United States.



時は友情を深めるが、恋愛を弱める。Time, which strengthens friendship, weakens love.










私は恋人を「ダーリン」と呼びます。I call my sweetheart darling.





シャーレイとアランは恋仲になるだろうと私はずっと思っていた。I always thought that Shirley and Alan would get together.





彼女は彼の昔の恋文を大切にしていた。She cherished his old love letters.


あの家はレンガ造りだ。That house is built of bricks.




私の心と思いとを練り清めてください。Try out my reins and my heart.タイムをとって作戦を練ろう。Let's take time out to elaborate a strategy.

あなたはいつピアノの練習をしますか。When do you practice the piano?
白いスーツを着たバレー教師の合図の一言を聞くと、たちまち練習場が生き生きとしてきます。At a word from the ballet master in the white suit, the room will come alive.

こちらには大きなハスの葉があります。We have very big lotus leaves.





私の連れは疲れすぎていて走るのはおろか、歩くこともできない、と言った。My companion said that she was too tired to walk, let alone run.
女ってどうして連れションしたがるの？物凄く理解不能。Women - why do they want to go to toilet in groups? I don't get it at all.

でもさ、母を連れて行かなくてはいけないんだ。But, I have to take my mother.
彼は警官に連れ去られた。He was taken away by a policeman.

犬を中へ連れ込むな。Don't bring the dog in.
私は彼を散歩に連れ出した。I took him out for a walk.

至急電報が彼女を大急ぎで東京に連れ戻した。An urgent telegram brought her hurrying back to Tokyo.


先生も連休をエンジョイしたかったが、どっかの６人組の補習やら準備やらで連休無かったぞ！I also wanted to enjoy the break, but thanks to preparation and supplementary lessons for a certain six-man team, I got none!


ここでも、このアプローチがマシュー・アーノルドの「どこにも連結がある」という考えに由来していることを見て取ることができる。Again, we can see this approach as deriving from Matthew Arnold's idea that everywhere there is connection.


警察が容疑者を尋問するために連行していったよ。The police have hauled in a suspect for questioning.
戦争は連合軍の勝利に終わった。The war ended in victory for the Allied Powers.



世界の熱帯雨林は、この惑星上の生命が形成する生態学的な連鎖の中で、かけがえのない環をなしているのである。The world's tropical rainforests are critical links in the ecological chain of life on the planet.

この物語は朝日新聞に連載された。This story appeared serially in the Asahi.
来月号から新連載小説が始まります。A new serial will begin in next month's issue.
新婚なのに子供？そう・・・息子は父親の連れ子。彼はバツイチというわけだ。Newlyweds but with a child? Yes, that's right - the son is from the father's former marriage. He's been divorced once.


試合に４連勝するのは難しい。It is hard to win four successive games.



緑は草を連想させる。Green is associated with grass.
賢人いわく、人生は失望の連続である。Some wise man has said life consists of one disappointment after another.




荷物が遅れた場合、特別な連帯保険がある。In case the shipment is delayed, we have special delay insurance.

この犬は我が連隊のマスコットだ。This dog is our regimental mascot.

あの連中には近づいてはいけないよ。You must steer clear of that gang.
肩関節は、単独で動くほか、腕の動きにも連動して動きます。The shoulder joints, as well as moving on their own, also move in conjunction with arm movements.
連日交通事故が起きる。Traffic accidents happen daily.

彼は世界選手権で４連覇を成し遂げた。He won four successive world championships.
みじめな連敗で我々は意気消沈した。A miserable sequence of defeats discouraged us.
初めて上手に口が利けるようになった子供は「なぜ」とか「なに」とかを連発して両親を悩ますものだ。A child who has just learned to talk will badger his parents with "whys" and "whats".


アメリカ人は連邦税と州税の両方を払っている。Americans pay both federal taxes and state taxes.米国連邦準備銀行は銀行の取り付け騒ぎを食い止めようとしています。The Fed is trying to stave off a run on the banks.
連邦議会がその法案を可決した結果、それまで以上に多くの国旗が焼き捨てられたに違いありません。I am sure that more flags were burned as a result of Congress passing that law than had ever been burned before.




連邦予算はかろうじて議会の承認を得た。The federal budget was narrowly approved by Congress.
某連盟元会長が背任の容疑で逮捕されました。The former president of a certain association has been arrested on suspicion of breach of trust.


ここに来た時は、必ず連絡してね。Please get in touch with me when you are here.


ご連絡先の電話番号は何番でしょうか。Do you have a number where we can contact you?


新しい連立政府はこの難局を乗り切ろうとしています。The new coalition government is trying to ride out the storm.
「西遊記」の中には錬金術の話が数多く登場します。Many tales of alchemy show up in "Journey to the West".現代の日本で錬金術といえば、比喩的にしか使われない。モラルや羞恥心と無縁の政治屋や宗教家が、不正な手段でカネもうけをするときに。In present day Japan, "alchemy" is only used metaphorically; to refer to improper means of making money by politicians or religious hucksters with no morals or shame.






路線地図をもらえますか。May I have a bus route map?大統領は強硬路線をとった。The President took a hard line.
市の北のはずれは路地の迷路である。The northernmost part of the city is a maze of alleys.

芝生に露が降りている。Dew has formed on the lawn.


「その人なんて言ってたんスか？」「露語が全く通じなかったので露語でなじってやった」"What was that person saying?" "He couldn't communicate in Russian at all so I told him off in Russian."

露骨に嫌な顔をして、彼を睨みつけた。I glared at him with a blatant look of disapproval on my face.




この旅館は露天風呂がすばらしいのよ。The outdoor spa at this hot spring is wonderful.


労なくして益なし。No pain, no gain.


老人をいたわりなさい。Be kind to old people.私は病気の姉をいたわった。I took care of my sick sister.


私が提供できるのは血と労苦と涙と汗のみであります。I have nothing to offer but blood, toil, tears and sweat.





労使間の話し合いはうやむやに終わった。The talk between labor and management yielded no definite results.










英国では労働祭は五月にある。In England, Labor Day is in May.
株式市場の暴落で、定年退職者の多くが労働市場に戻らざるを得なかった。The stock market crash forced many retirees back into the job market.
これらの労働者を一時解雇するかわりに、彼等の労働時間を短縮すればよいじゃないか。Instead of laying off these workers, why don't we just cut their hours?
その会社は５００人の労働者を雇っている。The company employs 500 workers.


労働者は労働条件に不平をこぼしている。The workers are complaining about their working conditions.
彼らは労働組合を組織するだろう。They will organize a labor union.
彼はその労働争議の経済的側面より、政治的側面により多くの関心を持っていた。He was more interested in politics than in economics of the labor dispute.

去年の選挙で労働党の票数が増えた。The Labor Party's vote increased at last year's election.

コンピューター・プログラマーの労働力が不足している。There is a labor shortage of computer programmers.



設定料金に労務費用は含みません。The stated price does not include labor charges.



コンピューターを使えば数字やグラフを扱うときに多くの時間と労力が省ける。Computers will save you much time and energy when you deal with figures and graphs.

「学園の廊下で、濃厚なキスシーン・・・聞いたぞ聞いたぞ」「濃厚じゃなーい！話に尾ひれ付いてるって・・・」"A passionate kiss scene in a school corridor ... I've heard all about it!" "It wasn't passionate! That's an exaggeration..."


その鍵をいじるな！Don't play with that key!書類は勝手にいじられた形跡があった。The documents were tampered with.子供がおもちゃをカチャカチャいじっている。The kid is clanging away with his toy.
母は、のんきでほがらかでお人好しです。My mother is carefree, cheerful and good-natured.

彼はその詩を一本調子で朗読した。He read the poem in a monotone.
彼らからの朗報を待っているところだ。I've been expecting good news from them.
君の計画は砂上の楼閣に過ぎないよ。Your scheme is like a house built on the sand.




それは確かに時間の浪費です。It's certainly a waste of time.


詩人キーツはロマン派に属する。The poet Keats belongs to the Romantic school.
雨が降ると必ず屋根から雨水が漏る。Every time it rains, the roof leaks.


漏えいはすぐに食いとめる必要がある。The leak needs to be stopped immediately.






その少年は狼が来ると言った。The boy said a wolf would come.
昔彼らはのろしで通信していた。Back then, people communicated using smoke signals.
ろうばいしたため、彼のうそが暴露された。His confusion betrayed his lie.


かわいそうな事にその老いた女性はまたもバッグを盗まれた。The poor old woman had her bag stolen again.

気苦労で彼は急にふけた。Care aged him quickly.


彼は老後に備えて貯金した。He saved money for his old age.




あの老人は食べ物に難しい。That old man is a fussy eater.


彼は老衰で二年前に亡くなった。He died of old age two years ago.
私はその老婆を助けることに同意した。I consented to help the old lady.
私は老婆心から言っているんだ。I'm saying this out of kindness.
老齢は気づかぬうちに我々に忍び寄る。Old age creeps upon us unnoticed.



聾唖者は手話で話す。Deaf-mute people talk using sign language.


聾者は手話で会話ができる。Deaf people can converse in sign language.

ろうそくはひとりでに消えた。The candle went out of itself.
タッソーろう人形館へ行く道を教えて頂けませんか。Could you tell me the way to Madame Tussaud's?







６月にしては寒い朝だ。It is a cold morning for June.












４月５日か６日に会っていただけませんか。Would it be possible to set up a meeting with us on April 5 or 6?聖書によれば、神は６日で世界を創られた。According to the Bible, God made the world in six days.











そのテープレコーダーは彼の声を録音した。The tape recorder has recorded his voice.

私はラグビーの試合を録画した。I recorded a rugby game on videotape.
その問題を自由に論じた。We discussed the problem freely.


この前の娘は口述内容を筆記するのも無理だった。速記なんて論外さ。That girl couldn't take things down in longhand, let alone shorthand.
その計画は詳細に論議された。The plan was discussed in detail.


これは当面の問題にとって大事な論拠だ。This is an argument material to the question in hand.

彼の論旨は筋が通っていた。His argument was logical.
健康擁護論者は職場での喫煙を制限する法律を強く要求してきた。Health advocates have pushed for laws restricting work-place smoking.


彼女は次々と論戦に挑んでいる。She has waded into one controversy after another.
彼は論争すべきことを投げ与えてくるだろう。He will cast me a bone to pick.


記事の論調は一種の悲観論だった。The article's tone was one of pessimism.
「結論」の目的は論文の主要な論点を要約することだ。The purpose of a conclusion is to sum up the main points of the essay.
僕は虚偽を論破しようと論争した。I contended against falsehood.

その本についての彼の論評は好意的だった。His comments about the book were favorable.
彼はその問題について論文を書いた。He wrote a paper on the subject.
どうするかを決めるときは、論理ではなく本能を当てにする。In making a decision, I rely not on logic but on instinct.



人間だけに論理的思考力がある。Man alone has the ability to reason.


３角形のすべての角の和は１８０度に等しい。The sum of all the angles in a triangle equals 180 degrees.スポーツではチームの和が成功には欠かせません。In sport, team harmony is vital to success.
その歌手の歌は心をなごませてくれる。The singer's voice melts your heart.
オフィスにはなごやかな雰囲気がある。There is a friendly atmosphere in the office.
彼の優しい言葉で彼女の気持ちが和らいだ。She melted at his kind words.
その薬は彼の苦痛を和らげた。The medicine decreased his pain.





和菓子にはやっぱり日本茶が合う。Traditional Japanese sweets really do go well with Japanese tea.
闘争は満足の行ったことに和解に終わった。The struggle ended in a satisfactory settlement.


きのうは和牛が特売だった。Japanese beef was on sale yesterday.




和室が好きな英国人もいると言われます。It is said that some British people like a Japanese-style room.
衣ばかりで和尚はできぬ。The robes do not make the monk.
和食を食べたことはありますか。Have you ever eaten Japanese food?





確かに彼女は和服を着ると美しく見える。She certainly looks beautiful in a Japanese kimono.




イスラエル側の心変わりのために、中東和平交渉の構成国に変更があるかもしれません。The makeup of Mideast peace talks may change due to a change of heart on the part of Israel.
ついに、インディアンの二人の酋長は和睦することに決めた。At long last, the two chiefs of the Indian tribes have decided to make peace.

私の知る限りではその小説は和訳されていない。As far as I know, the novel is not translated into Japanese.

彼は和洋折衷の家に住んでいる。He lives in a house built in a semi foreign style.
私はそんな失礼な話しかけられ方に慣れていない。I'm not used to being talked to in such a rude manner.男が近づいて私に話しかけた。A man came up and spoke to me.
ここでその問題について話し合いましょう。Let's discuss the matter here.

彼はまあなんて雄弁な話し手なんでしょう。What an eloquent speaker he is!
私は彼女の話し方は好きではない。I don't like the way she speaks.
ジョンはお客さんと電話で話した。John talked with his customer on the phone.あなたの趣味について話してください。Please tell me about your hobbies.英語はカナダで話されている。English is spoken in Canada.
もう６ヶ月たてば流暢にドイツ語が話せるようになるでしょう。In another six months you will be able to speak German fluently.彼女は話せる人だ。She has good sense.


彼は、話術が巧みだ。He has a good art of talking.
その話題は話し合う価値がある。The topic is worth discussing.

いびつな野菜はお嫌いですか？Do you hate misshapen vegetables?
日本経済では、大きなひずみが進行しつつある。The Japanese economy is going through a period of great stress.




私はまかないつきで週５０ポンド家賃を払っている。I pay fifty pounds a week for board and lodging.
彼のプロジェクトは助成金でまかなわれていた。His project was funded by grants.
彼はわいろを取るような人ではない。He isn't a man to take a bribe.
彼がブリーフケースを脇に抱えてやってくるのが見えた。I saw him coming with his briefcase under his arm.

私は急にわきばらに痛みを感じた。I felt a sudden pain in my side.
ケイトがある映画で脇役を演じた時、彼女の演技は批判されました。When Kate played a minor part in a movie, her acting was criticized.

流言飛語に惑わされるべからず、とはいうものの、言うは易く行うは難し、と思わない？They say you shouldn't take rumors seriously, but that's easier said than done.
他の惑星には生命が存在するのですか。Is there life on other planets?
ドアが枠に合わなければ合うまでドアにかんなをかけなければならない。If a door doesn't fit the casing, we must plane it carefully until it does.

ワシが空を飛んでいる。An eagle is flying in the sky.
彼の足はワニにかまれた。His leg was bitten by a crocodile.


どうしてあなたにお詫びする理由があるのですか。Why should I apologize to you?


あのわらは火が付きやすい。That straw catches fire easily.






そのお椀のスープはとてもおいしかった。The soup in the bowl was very delicious.
あなたがこれらのりんごをもいだ木がみたいものだ。I would like to see the trees from which you picked these apples.
川は山から下って湾に注いでいる。The river descends from the mountains to the bay below.
湾岸諸国は常に戦争の脅威にさらされている。Gulf nations are constantly menaced by war.
城からそのふもとをゆるやかに湾曲して流れる川全体が見えました。From the castle we could see the whole curve of the river around its base.


ＡＬＳのために、彼の手や腕はペンを握ったりタイプを打ったりすることができないほど弱くなってしまっていた。ALS had made his hands and arms too weak to hold a pen or to type.あなたにいくら給料を支払うかは、あなたの腕次第ですね。How much we pay you depends on your skill.

机の上の腕時計は私のです。The watch on the desk is mine.

私はそのゴルファーの腕前に驚いた。I marveled at the golfer's skill.
彼は腕組をしてそこにすわっていた。He sat there with his arms folded.
あのわんぱく小僧のいたずらには閉口する。That naughty boy annoys me by his pranks.
うちの一番腕利きの交渉者はいつも強引に有利な取り引きをする。Our best negotiators always drive a hard bargain.

毎朝腕立て伏せを２０回やります。He does twenty push-ups every morning.
父は昔腕力のある人でした。My father used to be a strong man.君は腕力に訴えてはならない。You must never resort to force.


国の経済だって、家庭の経済だって、個人の経済だって、丼勘定でいいものではない。Whether it's national economics, family economics, or personal economics, it's not something where sloppy accounting is good enough.




講演者は政界の腐敗をほのめかした。The speaker hinted at corruption in the political world.


遠方にほの白い灯台が立っていた。In the distance, there stood a dimly white lighthouse.







彼はアルプス山脈の夜明けの美しさをぼんやりとたたずんで見ていた。He stood dazedly watching the beauty of the Alpine dawn.雑踏の中おまえは一人たたずむ。In the crowded street you're standing all alone.






















言ってから、まゆちゃんは恥ずかしそうに俯いてしまう。Having said it, Mayu hangs her head in embarrassment.



























彼の態度にはごう慢なところがある。His manner partakes of insolence.






























お金の事では彼女は几帳面です。She is exact in money matters.
彼女は母の肩に頭をもたせかけた。She rested her head on her mother's shoulder.
彼は壁にもたれていた。He was leaning against the wall.

彼は壁にもたれかかっていた。He was leaning against the wall.








私は刹那的な生き方をしている人間です。I'm a person who lives for the moment.












「どうしたの？」「あのね、植木の枝の剪定をして欲しかったのよ」"What is it?" "Well, you see, I wanted the shrubs pruned."



























なるほど彼は、金持ちだがけちん坊だ。It is true he is rich, but he is a miser.
宿代をケチって野宿しました。We skimped on the hotel fees and slept outside.
下手な職人は道具にけちをつける。A bad workman blames his tools.
チップにけちけちしないこと。Don't be mean with the tip.

先生は彼女が間違ったことを咎めた。The teacher blamed her for the mistake.守衛にとがめられた。I was challenged by a gatekeeper.

その内気な少年はぼそぼそと自分の名前をつぶやいた。The shy boy murmured his name.

樫の老木が嵐にうめいている。An old oak is groaning in the storm.


社長のとっさのひらめきなんだって。It came to the president like a bolt of lightning.

彼の声は悪霊の突然の咆哮にかき消される。His voice was drowned out by the wraith's sudden howl.



鯨は一種のほ乳動物である。A whale is a sort of mammal.
コウモリって私たちと同じ哺乳動物なのです。Bats are mammals, just like us.
ほ乳瓶を煮沸消毒しなさい。Boil the milk bottles.
イルカは哺乳類の一種です。A dolphin is a kind of mammal.
彼は熱いコーヒーをゆっくりすすった。He sipped the hot coffee slowly.


なにやら唸りながら、ほとばしるパッションをキャンバスにぶつけている！Groaning strangely she is hurling her overflowing passion onto the canvas!その犬は小さな男の子に向かって唸った。The dog growled at a little boy.




彼はかなりの重圧にあえいでいる。He is under considerable stress.
喘息の発作が起きました。I had an asthma attack.
退却のラッパが鳴った。The trumpets sounded the retreat.


ラッパスイセンが咲くのは早春の頃だ。It is in early spring that daffodils come into bloom.
何かを記録するために、彼らはラマかアルパカの毛糸でできた、結び目のついたひもを使った。To record something, they used knotted cords made of the wool of the llama or alpaca.


ああ悲しい。Ah, me!彼女に疲れているのかと聞かれて彼は「ああ」といった。He said "Yeah" when she asked if he was tired.ああ、また失敗した。Ah, I've failed again!
この犬は麻薬を嗅ぎ出すよう訓練されている。This dog is trained to smell out drugs.
その新聞記者はニュースを嗅ぎつける鋭い勘を持っている。The newsman has a nose for news.

犬は見知らぬ人の匂いをかいだ。The dog sniffed at the stranger.
嗅覚が鈍っています。I can't smell well. I have lost my sense of smell.


放射線を大量に浴びたら、すぐに嘔吐と下痢が始まります。After being exposed to a large amount of radiation, vomiting and diarrhea will start quickly.

煙でむせた。I was choked by smoke.
彼は部屋に満ちていた煙にむせ返った。He was choked by the smoke which filled the room.
きつつきは、長く尖ったくちばしで、木の幹をつついて、中にいる虫を食べます。Woodpeckers peck tree trunks with their long pointed beaks and eat insects found there.


無神論者が司教の説明をあざけった。The irreligious scoffed at the bishop's interpretation.
公衆の面前で彼を嘲笑するのはよくない。It is not good to ridicule him in public.
われわれは貧しい人あざ笑ってはいけない。We must not laugh at the poor.
さぞショックだったでしょう。It must have been a shock to you.


一人の教授がささやいた。One of his colleagues whispered.



空で鳥がさえずっていた。Birds were singing in the sky.

合衆国は長い間「るつぼ」として知られているが、それは国民のほとんどが移民の子孫だからである。The United States has long been known as a "melting pot" because most of its people are descended from immigrants.

彼女はほこりを払った。She brushed away the dust.




敵軍は首都の周囲を塹壕で固めていた。The enemy was entrenched all around the capital.

子供に少し愛情を注いで見給え、すると君におびただしい愛情が戻ってくる。Give a little love to a child, and you get a great deal back.








彼女は私たち一人一人にアイスクリームをおごってくれた。She treated each of us to an ice cream.













彼女は先生にこびてばかり。She always kisses up to teachers.










作家としての彼女は伝統的なカテゴリーのいずれにも当てはまらない。As a writer, she does not fit into any of the traditional categories.いずれどこかに落ち着いて身を固めるつもりだが、まだまだだ。Eventually I'd like to settle down and have a family, but not yet.
めん鳥がひなをかえしている。The hen is hatching her chicks.
ひよこがかえらぬうちにその数を数えるな。Don't count your chickens before they are hatched.
卵から孵化したてのメダカにはどのようなえさをあげればよろしいでしょうか？What should you feed killifish that have just hatched from their eggs?










屁理屈ばかり並べて、お前の言ってること全然筋が通ってないよ。All you do is string together a bunch of farfetched ideas. I can't understand a word of it.





彼の肖像画は装飾の施された額縁にはめられた。His portrait was mounted in the fancy frame.彼女は左手の薬指にダイヤの指輪をはめていた。She wore a diamond ring on her left third finger.奴が俺をわなにはめてスキャンダルにおとしいれた。He set me up for the scandal.
ダイアモンドは金の指輪にはめ込まれていた。The diamond was set in a gold ring.

もうやめなさい。今日はやけにふざけているんだから。Stop it. You're being ridiculous.



私はやむなく薬をのまされた。I was forced to take medicine.
彼女はほうきで部屋を掃除する。She sweeps the room with a broom.













そういう方法で彼はその彗星を発見したのです。That's how he discovered the comet.




彼女は森をさまよっていた。She was wandering in the woods.
真夜中は幽霊がうろつく時刻だと考えられている。Midnight is when ghosts are thought to walk the earth.


有難くも、10000hit越えのお祝いイラストを頂いてしまいました！本当にかたじけないです。I'm very lucky to have been gifted with this 10,000 hit picture! Thank you so very much.









彼のいんぎんさは本心ではないかもしれない。His cordiality may not be authentic.
あいつの慇懃無礼なものの言い方、思い出すだけで不愉快になるよ。I find just the memory of his overly polite patronizing manner really offensive.
彼らはその知らせにりつ然とした。They were horror stricken at the news.









私たちは罹災者たちに十分な食料を供給すべきだ。We should furnish enough food for sufferers.





彼はホームランをかっ飛ばした。He hammered out a home run.






扁桃腺がはれている気がするのですが。I'm afraid my tonsils are swollen.




彼女は私の腕をきつくつねった。She pinched my arm sharply.




拗音（ゃ　ゅ　ょ）と促音（っ）の出し方も、加えていただけると参考になるかもしれません。I think it might be useful if you could add how to output the diphthongs (with small ya/yu/yo) and geminate consonants (with small tsu).



彼は四人の警官によって深夜拉致された。He was spirited away by four police officers in the middle of the night.


２人の兄弟は協力して食事をこしらえた。The two boys cooked their meal between them.彼は借金をこしらえた。He ran into debt.彼は遅刻の口実をこしらえた。He invented an excuse for being late.




電車でポケットの中にあるものをすられた。I had my pocket picked in the train.
すりは人ごみの中に消えた。The pickpocket disappeared into the crowd.



彼は手紙をポケットにねじ込んだ。He shoved the letter into his pocket.



彼らは非常口から出ようともみ合った。They jostled one another to get out of an emergency exit.




その結果の報道に満足して彼は手をもんでうれしがっていた。He was rubbing his hands over the report of the result.

彼らは財産分けのことでもめている。They are arguing about their share of the property.

我々はこの事で彼をからかった。We made fun of him about this.





彼はトラックに跳ね飛ばされた。He was knocked down by a truck.
彼らは我々の和解の試みを鼻の先で笑ってはねつけた。They scorned our attempts at reconciliation.


彼の嫉妬が頭をもたげてきた。His jealousy began to raise its head again.




その女の人は赤ん坊が健康でないことを斟酌してくれるように頼まれた。The woman was asked to make allowance for the poor health of the baby.

すぐにでもエチオピアに雨が降らなければ、深刻な干ばつの問題が起こるだろう。Unless it rains in Ethiopia soon, there could be severe drought problems.



海綿は水を吸収しますので水彩絵具をぼかしたりする時に便利です。Sponge absorbs water so it is convenient for shading water-colours and such.
その法律には曖昧な点が多い。That law is full of ambiguities.

いったい賛成なのか、反対なのか、曖昧模糊とした意見だねえ。That doesn't make it clear at all whether you're for it or against it.
ふふ・・・いわくがあるのさ、あそこには。He-heh... there's a tale behind that, for that place.賢人いわく、人生は失望の連続である。Some wise man has said life consists of one disappointment after another.
私は飲みすぎて頭がもうろうとしていた。My mind was in a haze after drinking so much.

元気な声がそのまま返ってくる。杞憂だったかな・・・。Her cheerful voice responded just like that. Guess I was worrying over nothing...
制度的に大きな枷となるのは、著作権の問題である。Institutionally, a major restraint is the copyright problem.







フクロウは昼間は目が見えない。Owls cannot see in the daytime.



















ねじ、てこ、くさび、滑車などは単一機械と呼ばれる。The screw, the lever, the wedge, the pulley, etc. are called simple machines.



飲み物はヤシの実の殻に入れてあった。The drinks were served in coconut shells.







その動物は檻から出ようともがいた。The animal struggled to get out of the cage.

毎日うっとうしくていやですね。Don't you just hate this weather?
彼は最近、うつ病を患い、仕事に支障が出ている。He has been suffering from depression recently, which is interfering with his work.






旅行者は、そのナイトクラブでむしり取られた。The tourists were ripped off at the nightclub.
ぐはっ！？俺の貴重な頭髪を、むしるな！O-oi!? Don't rip off my precious hair!







私たちはその教授が昔から言っているしゃれにうんざりしている。We are tired of the professor's old joke.


君はそのシャツを着るとしゃれてみえる。You look smart in the shirt.


浣腸をしました。I gave him an enema.



水の価値は井戸がかれて初めて分かる。We never know the worth of water till the well is dry.




ドレスを洗ったら色がにじんだ。The color ran when the dress was washed.
部屋には切迫した空気がみなぎっていた。There was a tense atmosphere in the room.







彼は濡れた服を火にあぶってかわかした。He dried his wet clothes by the fire.それは油であぶられた。That was cooked in oil.
ルーは、バターと小麦粉を炒めながら作ります。Roux is made while cooking flour and butter together.
味も濃厚で、炒め物、スープなど中華料理に深みを与えます。It also has a strong flavour, and adds depth to Chinese food such as soups and stir-fries.






プラスチックの皿はこんろにかけると溶ける。A plastic dish will melt on the stove.

大きな建物は光でこうこうと輝いていた。The big building was blazing with lights.





あんな妹達でよければ、ノシをつけてさしあげますよ。If those little brats of sisters are good enough I'll make a gift of them to you!



このままでは熾烈な情報戦に勝てない。ＣＩＯの首を挿げ替えよう。This is a bruising information war. At this rate we'll never come out on top. We've got to replace our CIO.








爬虫類が大嫌い。I can't stand reptiles.

狐は他のどんな動物よりもずるいということだ。It is said that the fox is more cunning than any other animal.

それだけ北朝鮮は（中国も）狡猾なんです。That's just how cunning North Korea is (and China, too).






「や、それほどでも。せいぜい、大きさ比べたり、わい談するくらいだし」「大きさって何の？」「ナニの」"No, not so much. At most comparing sizes, telling dirty stories." "Sizes of what?" "Of 'that'."




時を超えて古代の昆虫たちが琥珀の中で生き生きと踊る。Transcending time, the insects of ages gone past dance livelily in amber.







このいぼに悩まされています。I'm troubled by this wart.
彼の冷酷な言葉が今でも私の心の中でうずいている。His bitter words still rankle in my mind.



頭皮がかゆいのです。My scalp is very itchy.
怒ったり緊張すると首がつる。I feel the tension in my neck, where it gets sore and stiff.
この薬を飲むと胃の痙攣が治ります。This medicine will ease your cramps.
たんがたくさん出ます。I have a lot of phlegm.
しびれがとれるまで食事はしないでください。Don't eat till the numbness wears off.
右手がしびれます。My right hand is numb.このからしは舌が痺れるほど辛い。This mustard really bites the tongue.



ラクダは背中のこぶに大量の脂肪をためることができる。A camel can store a large amount of fat in the hump on its back.

これが彼にかんしゃくを起こさせた。This flung him into a passion.


奴等の無遠慮がしゃくなんだ。I'm annoyed by their impudence.

この服はすぐしわになる。This dress creases easily.
彼のスラックスはしわくちゃだ。His slacks are all wrinkled.
政権のたらい回しは反対だ。I'm opposed to political power being monopolized within a clique.

太陽がまぶしい。My eyes are dazzled by the sun.

「ちょっと目まいがするわ」「顔色が悪いぞ。一日休んだほうがいいよ」"I feel sort of dizzy." "You look pale. You'd better take the day off."




彼女は眼を怒らせて私をにらみ付けた。She glared at me with angry eyes.
彼はにくらしげに彼女をにらんだ。He stared at her with hatred.

アレが痛いんですよ、アレが。んー、何て言うの？コーガン？とにかく、男性の大事なものです。Down there hurts, down there. Er, what do you call them? Testicles? In any case a male's 'important parts'.
ハエと蚊が彼の瞑想を邪魔した。Flies and mosquitoes interfered with his meditation.










そのろくでなしどもはクビになりましたよ。Those good-for-nothing layabouts were sacked.
昨夜はろくに眠れなかった。I could not sleep much last night.



後のたたりが恐いぞ。There will be the deuce to pay.
触らぬ神に祟りなし。Let sleeping dogs lie.

自民党はみそぎが必要ですね。The LDP needs a spiritual cleansing.
この学校は規律がやや緩やかだ。Discipline is rather mild at this school.







彼は彼女の不実をたしなめた。He chided her for her unfaithfulness.
あなたは相当やつれているようだね。You look quite run down.
ヘビを見て足がすくんでしまった。I froze at the sight of the snake.
彼はただ肩をすくめただけだった。He just shrugged his shoulders.






私の最初の務めは資格のない志願者をふるいにかけることだった。My first task was to screen out unqualified applicants.




くじで誰が勝ちか決めよう。Let's decide the winner by lot.





その兄弟の間には強い絆がある。There is a strong bond between the brothers.
母は傷口にばんそうこうをつけてくれた。Mom applied the plaster to the cut.







彼は緻密に立てた計画を実行した。He carried out the plan he had made in detail.


あの二人はよりを戻したらしい。It looks like they have made up again.
中世には、天文学者はあるギリシアの哲学者の説にすがりついていた。During the Middle Ages, astronomers had clung to the theory of a Greek philosopher.
彼女は繻子のガウンを着ていた。She was wearing a gown of satin.
彼女の手は寒さでひび割れしている。Her hands are raw from the cold.

チーズはしばしばネズミを罠におびきよせる。Cheese often lures a mouse into a trap.奴が俺をわなにはめてスキャンダルにおとしいれた。He set me up for the scandal.


彼女は無邪気なのか羞恥心がないのか。Is she an innocent, or is she just shameless?







その峰は雲の上にそびえている。The peak rises above the clouds.
肛門のまわりに湿疹があります。I have a rash around my anus.






彼女はまだ親のすねをかじっている。She's still dependent on her parents.







最近寝てるときにこむらがえりを起こします。Recently I get leg cramps when I sleep.


長時間歩くと踵にたこができる。If you walk a lot, you will develop calluses on your heel.


腱鞘炎ではないかと思うのです。I think I have tendonitis.


先月膀胱炎にかかりました。I had a bladder infection last month.

彼はお母さんの頼みをにべもなくことわった。He gave a flat refusal to his mother's request.

























その子犬は彼女の頬を舐めた。The puppy licked her on the cheek.ここのソースは舐めてみるとちょっと塩っぱい。If you taste this sauce you'll find it a bit salty.私は長い間臥薪嘗胆の苦しみをなめた。I have struggled under extreme difficulties for a long time.







艱難汝を玉にす。Adversity makes a man wise, not rich.
さまざまな艱難辛苦を乗り越え、彼は南極大陸単独横断を成し遂げた。He overcame all sorts of hardship and setbacks to succeed in a solo crossing of Antarctica.



苺は今がシーズンだ。Strawberries are in season now.
卵は硬くゆでてください。Boil the eggs hard.





その双子はさやの中の２つのえんどう豆のように似ている。The twins are as alike as two peas in a pod.
















卵を食べるとじんましんが出ます。He gets hives when he eats eggs.

そのバラはよい香りを発散した。The roses gave off a nice smell.

ピンクとばら色は似た色だ。Pink and rose are similar colors.

バラのつぼみは摘めるうちに摘め。Gather ye rosebuds while ye may.






救援隊は子供をしらみつぶしに捜した。The rescue worker searched the area, looking for the child.








蜃気楼は幻影だと言われている。A mirage is said to be an illusion.

その虫はさなぎから成虫になった。The insect grew out of a pupa into an imago.


彼はトンボ返りをした。He turned a somersault.仙台へ行ってとんぼ返りで戻ってきました。I went to Sendai and back without resting.
あの小屋にはトカゲや虫がうようよしている。That hut is crawling with lizards and insects.

カタツムリがすっと角を出した。The snail shot out its horns.

あれが蝙蝠ですか。Is that a bat?



１匹のキリギリスと多くのアリが野原に住んでいた。A grasshopper and many ants lived in a field.



カエルとヒキガエルの区別が出来ない。I can't distinguish a frog from a toad.




















日光で看板の文字があせた。The sun had faded the lettering on the sign.
色はさめないでしょう。The color will not go off.







その男はボロを着ていた。The man was in rags.ぼろ服が正直者を包んでいるかもしれない。A ragged coat may cover an honest man.
その家はかなりぼろ屋になっている。The house is quite run down.

その薬はてきめんに効く。The drug acts like magic.

突然の彼の訃報は私を驚かせた。The news of his sudden death astounded me.

その男はドイツ語なまりの英語を話す。The man speaks English with a German accent.トムはいつもジョンの言葉のなまりを理由にからかう。Tom always makes fun of John because of his dialect.



神よ、最初にキスを発明したのは、どんな馬鹿者であったか私はいぶかる。Lord, I wonder what fool it was that first invented kissing.





私はデパートでオーバーをあつらえた。I ordered my overcoat from a department store.






くどいよ君の質問は、もううるさい。Stop bugging me with your annoying questions!
いさかいで私たちの融和が壊れた。Quarrelling spoiled our unity.

あなたはボスにへつらわなくてもよい。You don't need to flatter your boss.
彼の不正直をいさめた。I expostulated with him on his dishonesty.























いいのよ。いままで実のないブランド品を高く売りつけて暴利をむさぼってきたんだから。今後せいぜい良心的な商売にはげめばいいんだわ。Never mind that. After all, up till now he's been stuffing himself on huge profits, selling brand-name goods of no real worth at high prices. From now on, he can just try his best at honest trade.お腹を空かせたその男は、食物をむさぼり食った。The starving man devoured the food.


君は、いつも私の服をけなすのだから。You are always digging at me about my clothes.

はい、お賽銭・・・１０円ずつね。はい、美羽ちゃん。OK, here's the donation ... 10 yen each. Here you go, Mihane.
ジョンソンさんは蓄えてきたお金で退職してからもぜいたくに暮らせるだろう。With the money Mr Johnson had saved, he would be able to live high on the hog when he retired.
アメリカでは自動車は必需品であり贅沢品ではない。In the United States the automobile is a necessity and not a luxury.

多くのものが中国から日本にもたらされた。Many things were brought to Japan from China.彼は私たちに悲しい知らせをもたらした。He brought us sad news.科学は私達の生活に多くの変化をもたらした。Science has brought about many changes to our lives.
彼女は自分のひいきの馬を応援した。She cheered for her favorite horse.






彼女はひざまずいて神に祈りをささげた。She prayed to God on her knees.
丈の長いコートは、ほとんどくるぶしまで届いていた。He was wearing a long black coat that reached almost to his ankles.

あんなにかかとの高い靴はいてたら、すぐに捻挫しちゃうよな。If I tried to wear shoes with heels that high, I'd sprain my ankle.

彼はうずくまって泣き続けた。He crouched and went on crying.



ひとたび躊躇したら、君はおしまいだ。Once you hesitate, you are lost.
スーツにそんなにお金をかけるにはためらいがある。I hesitate to pay so much for a suit.
質問するのをためらわないでください。Don't hesitate to ask questions.
私は石につまずいて、足首をひねってしまった。I tripped on a stone, twisting my ankle.
男の子へのしつけは可能である。Boys can be trained to behave.
この犬は見知らぬ人にほえるようにしつけられている。This dog is conditioned to bark at strangers.

テーブルがきしむほど食物がたくさんあった。The table was groaning with food.
重荷で机がまた軋んだ。The loaded desk groaned again.
人種間には様々な葛藤、軋轢があることは、本書においても明らかにされているところである。That there are various conflicts, frictions, within the races of man is a point made clear within this book as well.



ピートはそりで丘をすべり降りてきた。Pete came coasting down the hill on his sled.


彼はもうちょっとで車にひき殺されるところだった。He barely escaped being hit and killed by a car.
ひき逃げの犯人は翌日父親に伴われて自首してきました。The hit-and-run driver, accompanied by his father, came and turned himself in the next day.


彼は人付き合いに辟易している。He's fed up with socializing.


骨格たくましい体格なので彼は柔道家でとおっている。With his muscular constitution he passes for a judoist.彼女は逞しく逆境に耐えた。She bore her misfortunes with a brave spirit.彼は想像力のたくましい少年であった。He used to be an imaginative boy.
なにやら唸りながら、ほとばしるパッションをキャンバスにぶつけている！Groaning strangely she is hurling her overflowing passion onto the canvas!

「ねこまっしぐら」というのは、飼い猫がエサに向かってまいしんする様子を表している。The phrase "make a bee line for" expresses the look of how a bee heads straight for food with speed and energy.






彼は叱られているとき口をつぐんでいた。He held his tongue while he was being scolded.


ドアが枠に合わなければ合うまでドアにかんなをかけなければならない。If a door doesn't fit the casing, we must plane it carefully until it does.


ジェイはその古いはさみを拾い上げた。Jay picked up the old scissors.






彼はやすりで錆を落とした。He rubbed the rust off with a file.











隕石が燃えて、流星となる。A burning meteoroid produces a meteor.

あの元気な男が病気で倒れるなんて、鬼の霍乱ともっぱらの噂だよ。For a healthy cheerful guy like that to get sick is like the devil getting sunstroke. Everyone is talking about it.
概してひょうは夏に降る。As a rule, hail falls in the summer.




もやがロンドンの町をすっぽりと包んだ。The haze enveloped London.


彼女は笑うと愛らしくえくぼができる。She has cute dimples when she smiles.
もし気を付けなければ彼女はそんなことをしているうちに靭帯を切ってしまうだろう。If she's not careful she'll tear a ligament doing that.


ぶらんこが上下に動いている。The swing is moving up and down.






私は同意したということをうなずいて知らせた。I nodded to show that I agreed.


彼女のしかめた顔は、他の乙女の微笑みより遥かに美しい。Her very frowns are fairer far than smiles of other maidens are.

半角カタカナをインターネット上の色んな所で使えば、いつか顰蹙をかいまくる事になるよ。If you go around the Internet, using half-width katakana in various places, eventually you're going to end up pissing off a lot of people.

彼の歩き方はさっそうとしている。He walks in a stately manner.

何か飄々とはぐらかされてる気がするわ。I get the feeling I'm being given the runaround.
ぎょうざの具のあまりは？餃子を家で作りましたが、皮が少なかったせいか、具が少し余ってしまいました。Gyoza stuffing? I made some gyoza at home but, possibly because I didn't have enough dough, I had some of the filling left over.


そばはそば粉から、うどんやきしめんは普通の小麦粉からできてるの。Soba is made of buckwheat flour, and udon and kishimen are made of plain wheat flour.




このらくだは人によくなれているからだれが乗っても大丈夫です。This camel is so tame that anyone can ride it.
私は彼女の約束にだまされた。I was taken in by her promise.

「ねこまっしぐら」というのは、飼い猫がエサに向かってまいしんする様子を表している。The phrase "make a bee line for" expresses the look of how a bee heads straight for food with speed and energy.
いじめられたラバは、怒って地面を蹴り上げ砂ぼこりを立て始めた。The harassed mule got his back up and began kicking up dust.





あれは馬ではなくロバだ。That is not a horse, but a donkey.












悪夢に魘された。I had a nightmare.





その説明に対する彼の答はとどのつまり意味をなさない。His explanation of the problem adds up to nonsense.




ちなみに、魚のえらが真っ赤であるのは、肺と同じように「毛細血管」が多く集まっているからである。Incidentally, that the gills of fish are bright red is because there are many 'capillary vessels' collected there, the same as for lungs.












彼はおろかにもがちょうを殺した。He killed the goose, foolishly.






オウムは人の言葉をまねできる。A parrot can imitate human speech.

インコを飼うために必要なものを揃えましょう。Let's get what we need to keep a parrot.



私は動物園に行くまできりんを見たことがなかった。I had never seen a giraffe till I visited the zoo.王を得た麒麟もまた寿命を持たない生き物だが、この病ばかりは治癒の方法がない。A qilin with a king too has no limit on its lifespan, but this illness alone admits of no remedy.










カーテンが風になびいた。The curtains blew in the wind.

管理人体調不良、モチの低下等により継続は不可能と判断しました。Due to ill-health of the web-manager, loss of motivation and other circumstances I have decided that it is not possible to continue.


長靴にかびが生えた。Mold grew on the boots.

この部屋はかび臭い。This room smells musty.

月とすっぽんだ。They are as different as day and night.


いたちはその悪臭で知られている。The weasel is noted for its bad smell.

いびきとたばこの吸い過ぎは実際に関連がある。Snoring and excessive smoking are indeed related.







選挙の結果出てくるにつれ、皆テレビにかじりついた。Everyone was glued to the TV set as the election results came in.

何でもかんでもむきになってあくせくするのをやめれば、きっと人々は今の２倍も長生きするだろう。I'm sure people would live twice as long if they stopped getting themselves worked up over everything.





彼女はとても愛想のよい隣人だ。She is a most gracious neighbor.
フロイトは、親子間の愛憎関係をエディプス・コンプレックスとして展開しました。Freud developed the love-hate relationship between parents and child as the Oedipus complex.
私はこの古い麦藁帽子にとても愛着がある。I am very much attached to this old straw hat.
「ロミオとジュリエット」の２家族は互いに悪感情を抱いていた。There was bad blood between the two families in "Romeo and Juliet".
その雑誌の記事で彼の悪業は白日の下にさらされましたね。That magazine article exposed his devilish acts to the full light of day.


陰で他人の悪口を言うべきでない。You should not speak ill of others behind their backs.
どこへ行こうとも、彼の悪行の例が見つかるでしょう。Wherever you may go, you may find examples of his evil doings.




悪癖を捨てるのは簡単ではない。It is not easy to get rid of bad habits.

その悪名高い犯罪者は昨日逮捕された。The notorious criminal was caught yesterday.
その儀式は悪霊を追い払うためのものである。The ceremony is to turn away evil spirits.


月も出ていない闇夜だった。It was a dark night, with no moon.
それはすべて天候に依存している。It all depends on the weather.
依頼人は弁護士と相談した。The client talked with the lawyer.



メアリーは卵を一つずつ取り出した。Mary took out the eggs one by one.
ジョンソン一家はパーティーをするのが大好きだ。The Johnsons love to have parties.

ペダルを踏むたびごとに、車輪が一回転する。Each time you step on the pedal, the wheel turns once.
涙が一筋頬を流れた。A tear ran down her cheek.

一言で言えば、彼は馬鹿だと思います。In a word, I think he's a fool.


ハムレットから１行引用できますか。Can you quote a line of Hamlet?

「ウィキペディアを引用するな」という主張が昨日だか一昨日だかの朝日新聞に載っていた。The exhortation "Don't quote Wikipedia" was included in the Asahi newspaper of yesterday or the day before.
彼女は、一昨年よりもはるかに暮らし向きがよい。She's far better off than she was the year before last.


父の懐におられる一人子の神が、神を解き明かされたのである。But God the only begotten Son, who is at the Father's side, has made him known.

誰かから電話があったら一時に戻るといって下さい。If anyone should phone, say I will be back at one o'clock.彼は一時ここに住んでいた。He lived here for a time.霧のために、交通は一時不通になっている。Due to the fog, traffic is temporarily suspended.


夏の山では目に見えるものはすべて緑一色です。The mountains are a lush green in summer.街はクリスマスムード一色・・・もうじきイブだ。The streets are in full Christmas mood - it's almost Christmas Eve.
一食くらい食事を抜いてもたいしたことないよ。It won't hurt you to skip one meal.
私は一人の弟がいます。I have one brother.ジムは目覚めると、自分が部屋に１人なのに気がついた。Jim awoke and found himself alone in the room.彼はひとりになると即座にその手紙を開いた。The moment that he was alone he opened the letter.

１６０３年、ジェームズ一世が政権の座についたとき、フットボールは再び許可されたのです。In 1603, when King James I came into power, football was allowed again.
彼は臍を固めて一世一代の大事業に乗り出した。He resolved to embark on a once-in-a-lifetime enterprise.
あなたは、一生勉強しなければならない。You must study your whole life.マイホームは一生の買い物だからね、そんな即断即決はできないよ。A home is a once-in-a-lifetime purchase so you don't want to make any snap decisions.

その一節を一語ずつ訳しなさい。Translate the passage word for word.
子供らは二人一組になったスタートした。The children started in pairs.
一束だけ一番上に本物の札がのっていた。Only one stack had a real bill on top.
習慣は一度身についてしまうと、断ち切るのがとても難しい。A habit is very difficult to shake off once it is formed.赤道における経度1度当たりの長さ。Distance per degree of longitude at equator.
私は、月・水・金と一日おきに仕事をします。I work every other day: Monday, Wednesday, and Friday.私のｅ―ｍａｉｌアドレスは４月１日より下記になります。My e-mail address will be as follows effective April 1.
あなたのお帰りを一日千秋の思いでお待ちしています。I can hardly wait till I see you.
私は１年契約で働いた。I worked on a yearly contract.
彼女に一筆書いてみたらどうですか。Why don't you drop her a line?
どうも君は未だ胸に一物もっているような気がする。文句があればはっきり言ってよ。I get the feeling you still have an axe to grind. If you've got something to say come on out and say it.
彼らは海岸で一夜を明かした。They spent the night on the beach.


本題からそれないようにしましょう。Let's not deviate from the subject.


そして、彼らは、かくれんぼをしてあそんだ。And they would play hide and go seek.
急いでいない人はエスカレーターの右側に立ちなさい。People who are not in a hurry stand on the right side of the escalator.
五輪旗の右端の輪っかって何色だったっけか？What color is the far right ring on the Olympic flag?

雨あしが強くなる前に家に帰ろう。Let's get home before this rain gets any stronger.
ひさしから雨水が滴り落ちている。The eaves are dripping.
この雨模様の天気はうんざりだ。I am fed up with this wet weather.






彼は永久に日本を離れた。He left Japan for good.

その疫病が流行して何千人もの人々が死んだ。Thousands of people died during the plague.
労なくして益なし。No pain, no gain.
彼は、中国語をしっていたので、私たちは計画を円滑に実行できた。His knowledge of Chinese enabled us to carry out our plan smoothly.

頭に円形の脱毛があります。I have a round bald spot on my head.


このスープは塩が少し足りない。This soup wants a bit of salt.

せきには塩水のうがいが効く。Gargling with salt water helps stop coughing.








われわれの文明の黄昏に。We find ourselves in the twilight of our civilization.
床は緑色に塗られていたが、一方壁は黄色だった。The floor was painted green, while the walls were yellow.









おまえはオレを殺そうとしている。You are trying to kill me.
あのさ〜俺らいま遊ぶお金ないんだけどね。まあ、ぶっちゃけ恵んでよな。Y'know we're short of money to have fun and ... Well to be blunt, gimme!

ここから海の音が聞こえる。We can hear the ocean from here.彼女はピアノで高い音を出した。She struck high notes on the piano.
このギターは音色があっている。The guitar is in tune.



直径23m(下段)及び18m(上段)、高さ5ｍの二段式の円墳である。It is a two level style round burial mound, 23m diameter (lower level), 18m (higher).






１年が過ぎ、彼の死体は塵と化した。A year had passed by and his body turned to dust.
こってり化粧した顔は異様である。A face with too much make up looks strange.
彼女は化粧水をつけている。She is putting on some face lotion.



今のアナウンスは何だったのですか。What did the announcement just say?「や、それほどでも。せいぜい、大きさ比べたり、わい談するくらいだし」「大きさって何の？」「ナニの」"No, not so much. At most comparing sizes, telling dirty stories." "Sizes of what?" "Of 'that'."なによ！出来ないの？この度胸なし！腰抜けッ！What? You can't do it? You coward! Chicken!
我々はボロ勝ちした。何せ相手の選手ときたら弱いのなんの。We won hands down, because the other players were weak.
あなたはなぜ働いているの。How come you're still working?
私はいつでも喜んでお手伝いします。I am always ready to help you.あなたはいつでも歓迎されています。You will be welcome at any time.
あなたはどこでテレビを見ますか。Where do you watch television?
何人も空の胃の腑では愛国者たり得ない。No man can be a patriot on an empty stomach.
アメリカの尻馬に乗るなというセリフに正面から反論するのが、どれほどしんどいことだったことか。Just how tiresome was it to argue straight against the phrase "Don't blindly follow America's lead!"


この世にかわいい子はただ一人、母親にとってはそれはわが子。There's only one pretty child in the world, and every mother has it.私にとって子供たちは目の中に入れてもいたくないほどかわいいのです。My children are very precious to me.


夏草が地面をおおっている。The summer grass covers the ground.



役者は台詞を暗記しなければならない。An actor has to memorize his lines.それはこっちのセリフですよ。That's what I want to say.
仕事は楽で、暇がたくさんあります。My job is easy and I have a lot of free time.今晩暇かな？Are you free tonight?ジョンはひどく急いでいたので話をする暇もなかった。John was in such a hurry that he had no time for talking.

アイロンで手をやけどしました。I burned my hand with an iron.












水は外側から供給された。Water was supplied from outside.

この池には以前蛙がたくさんいたものだった。There used to be a lot of frogs in this pond.


彼、スラッとしてて、格好いいじゃない。Isn't he gorgeous? - So tall and smart-looking.あら、かっこよく決めているわね。Wow, you're dressed to kill.





妻の乾咳が気になります。I'm concerned about my wife's hacking cough.





絵の中の少女は黄金ではなくて花のかんむりをかぶっています。The girl in the picture is wearing a crown not of gold but of flowers.


管から水が吹き出した。Water shot from the pipe.

私はメガネがなくては読めない。I cannot read without glasses.
週末に偽札が市場にあふれた。The counterfeit bills flooded the market over the weekend.
彼はガンに向かって発砲した。He had a shot at the goose.
彼の願望は商売を始める事です。His desire is to go into business.
同書を一部ご寄贈いただければ幸いに存じます。I would very much appreciate receiving a copy of the book.

うちの社長は気難しい。Our boss is hard to please.彼女は気難しそうに見えるが、本当は優しい。She looks bad-tempered, but she is kind at heart.




この本物の宝石とその偽物とを比較してみなさい。Compare this genuine jewel with that imitation.

ぼくは君のたわごとにうんざりしている。I am fed up with your nonsense.







せっかくの苦労もあだになった。All my pains went for nothing.


次の給油所で満タンにする必要がある。We need to fill up at the next gas station.
新しいコンピューターは旧型よりも１０倍速い。The new computer is ten times as fast as the old one.



民主主義に対する信頼をなくした者もいる。Some have lost faith in democracy.映画に行くのと家にいるの、どっちがいい？Which would you rather do, go to the cinema or stay at home?すっかり食べ終わってはいない。I haven't quite finished eating.
「私の後から来る方は私に優る方である。私より先におられたからである」といったのはこの方の事です。This was he of whom I said, "He who comes after me has surpassed me because he was before me."おかげで元気にしております。They're all fine, thank you.

こうして私はいつも魚を料理する。This is how I usually cook fish.


両国とも今は平和な状態にある。Both countries are now at peace.


彼女は猫を脅かして追い払った。She scared the cat away.脅かさないでよ。Don't scare me like that!
これらは男性と女性をともに脅かす危険なものだ。There are dangers that threaten both men and women.



彼の秘密は近々あばかれるだろう。His secret will be disclosed soon.
ドアには大きな金色の星がついていました。There was a big gold star on the door.


彼は「九時だ」と言った。He said, "It's nine o'clock."




そのポールは左に傾いた。The pole inclined to the left.太陽が西に傾いた。The sun declined westward.

彼女はちょっと首をかしげて、黙然と立っていた。She stood silently, her head tilted slightly to one side.
「でも、俺たち兄妹だろ！」「名目上ではね」"But we're brother and sisters, aren't we?!" "In name we are."

彼女の足取りは妖精のように軽やかだった。Her footsteps were as light as a fairy's.
ニワトリの赤く立派なトサカは性別や種類を見分けるときに役立っていると考えられている。The cockerel's splendid red cockscomb is thought to play a part in determining gender and breed.




当時、とにかくケンブリッジでは、研究所生活はかなり打ち解けたものだった。In those days, or at any rate in Cambridge, laboratory life was rather informal.

彼女は好奇心からというより見栄からテニスを始めた。She has begun to play tennis not so much out of curiosity as out of vanity.



国債発行が高水準なので、それらの元利支払コストが増加するだろう。Given a high level of bond issues, the cost to service them will increase.

彼は現存する最高の芸術家である。He is the greatest living artist.








彼女は物置の中で偶然いくつかの古文書を見つけた。She came across some old documents in the closet.
私はその古本に倍額を払った。I paid double the price for the secondhand book.あの古本はまったくの掘り出し物だ。That old book is a real find.
彼はまだ自分の意思に固執している。He still sticks to his opinion.

銀行はリスクの高い顧客へのローンには高い金利をつける。Banks charge higher interest on loans to risky customers.















その工場は玩具を製造している。The factory manufactures toys.

彼はその浅い溝を飛び越えた。He leaped over the shallow ditch.両者の溝が狭まった。The gap between them has narrowed.
甲の損は乙の得。One man's gain is another man's loss.
みんなでカブトムシを競争させた。We raced our beetles.

船には甲板が３つあった。The ship had three decks.


庭の木がすっかり紅葉しました。The leaves of the trees in the garden have turned completely red.
私は歯医者行きを延ばさねばならない。I must postpone going to the dentist.１０時前にはホテルを出発しなければなりません。さもなければマイアミ行きの電車を乗り逃がしてしまいます。We must leave the hotel before 10 a.m., otherwise we will miss the train for Miami.


その道は行き止まりだった。The road came to a dead end.
駅への行き方を教えてもらえますか。Could you tell me how to get to the station?あなたに公園の行き方を教えましょう。I will show you how to go to the park.
好きなように行き来していいですよ。You may come and go at will.
お母さん、泳ぎに行ってもいい？Can I go swimming, Mother?探検家が山中の道なき道を行った。The explorer pushed his way through the trackless mountain region.あなたのおかげで仕事がうまく行きました。Thanks to you, the job went well.
会社の行く末は彼の肩に掛かっていた。He bore the future of the company on his shoulders.

オーブントースターのタイマーが鳴る。食パンがコンガリ焼けた、香ばしい匂い。The toaster-oven's timer rings. The fragrant smell of well toasted bread.


彼は高名な詩人であるとともに有能な外交官でもあった。He was a famous poet and a competent diplomat.






２社は合併を計画している。The two companies plan to unite.
その未亡人は黒衣をまとっていた。The widow was dressed in black.
黒雲が空一面に広がった。Black clouds spread over the sky.


私は黒白まだらの犬を飼っている。I have a black and white dog.



こいつは困ったぞ。Here's a fine how-do-you-do.
大抵の晩餐は１１時頃に終わります。Most dinner parties break up about eleven o'clock.あなたは結婚してもよいころだ。It's about time you got married.彼女は夏頃から病気だった。She has been ill since about summer.

今朝はとても寒かった。It was very cold this morning.
その事故は去年の今日、起きたのだ。The accident happened a year ago today.今日は何をしたいですか。What would you like to do today?今日ますます多くの人が、都会より田舎の生活を好むようになっています。Nowadays more and more people prefer country life to city life.
今年の暑い夏には耐えられません。I can't stand this hot summer.
雨が降っているから、今夕は早めに暗くなるでしょう。It will get dark earlier this evening, as it is raining.


魂の吐息を感じ始めた。I'm feeling the breath of life.
車を運転しているときは左側を通りなさい。Keep to the left when driving.
最後に笑う者の笑いが最上。He laughs best who laughs last.
コンサートの最中に喋るのは無作法である。To talk during a concert is rude.




昨日彼がぶらっと立ち寄った。He dropped in on me yesterday.

桜花が盛りであった。The cherry blossoms were at their best.
鮭は川をさかのぼって砂に産卵する。Salmon go up the river and lay their eggs in the sand.

新任の大使は休戦を推し進めて、これ以上の殺りくを終わらせるでしょう。The new ambassador will push for a cease-fire to stop the killing.
水はすぐにはけるだろう。The water will soon drain away.米はそこならすぐさばける。Rice will find a ready market there.
ゲーリーはフットボールをする事に活力のはけ口を見つけた。Gary found an outlet for his energy in playing football.
彼は手荷物が三個あった。He had three pieces of baggage.


３角形のすべての角の和は１８０度に等しい。The sum of all the angles in a triangle equals 180 degrees.



その牧師は今週３組の結婚式を行った。The clergyman has married three couples this week.


彼女は三味線による新しいジャズの演奏法を始めた。She originated a new way of playing jazz on the shamisen.

その湖は直径四マイルである。The lake is four miles across.

彼の姉妹は二人とも美人です。Both his sisters are beautiful.

いつその法律は施行されますか。When will the law go into force?

彼は他人の私事を侵害する。He invades the privacy of others.
私はこの詩歌を暗記しなければならない。I must learn this poem by heart.
彼は、歯痛で苦しんでいる。He is suffering from toothache.

画像をクリックすると次ページへ移ります！Click the picture to go to the next page!第２次世界大戦は、いつ起こったか。When did World War II break out?
この磁場の線が２極で北の磁力と南の磁力の間に走っています。The lines of this field run between magnetic north and magnetic south at the two poles.

彼は七十歳まで生きた。He lived to be seventy years old.
光線はプリズムによって七色に分解される。Light is resolved by a prism into seven colors.
１月７日付けのお手紙、ありがとうございました。Thank you very much for your letter of January 7th.人間は食べ物がなくても４０日まで生きられるが、水がないと７日間しか生きられない。Human beings can live up to 40 days without food, but no more than 7 without water.
七夕は漫画によく出てくるので、私もそこそこ知っています。Tanabata comes up in manga a lot so I also know it fairly well.


彼らは借家に住んでいる。They live in a rented house.
前の借家人は、アパートの雑用を抜群によくやっていた。The previous tenant took excellent care of her apartment.

一人で生活するのは寂しい。It is lonely to live alone.それで、彼女はとてもさびしく思っています。And she misses them very much.会えなくて淋しい。I miss you.





主人は料理がとても上手です。My husband is a very good cook.

只今、僕は旅立ちの日に向けて修業中です。Right now I'm training in preparation for the day we set off.


その会は十時に終わった。The party ended at ten o'clock.



彼は十七歳で高校を退学した。He left high school at seventeen.

それは彼の十八番だ。That's his specialty.
彼は渋面を作り、教師の話を聞いていた。He made a sour face, and listened to what his teacher had to say.


重荷で机がまた軋んだ。The loaded desk groaned again.彼の成功で私の心の重荷がおりた。His success took a load off my mind.

ある実験で怪我をして、かなりの重傷だった。I got hurt during an experiment, and the injury was pretty serious.


車は持っていると重宝なものだ。A car is a handy thing to own.


あなたが出国するまでお預かりします。We will keep it for you until you leave.
良い新聞記者は、どんなニュース源からも、つまり、出所不明型のニュース源からも、学びとれるものはなんでも利用する。A good newspaper reporter takes advantage of what he learns from any source, even the "little bird told him so" type of source.
先週の激しい降雨のために出水した。We had flooding because of last week's heavy rains.
新しい出生政策は人口増加ゼロをめざしています。The new birth policy is aimed at achieving zero population growth.


昨年は死者数より出生数が多かった。Last year, there were more births than deaths.
これはおそらく戸籍上の出生年月日を調べた上で修正したのではないかと思います。I believe this may be a correction after investigation of his date of birth in the family register.
たしかに出生率の低下で子供の数が減り、学校でも生徒の数が少なくなっているのは事実ですが、しかし、これはまったくもってけっこうなことです。It's true that there are fewer children due to the falling birthrate, and there are fewer children in the school, but that is all to the good.
スイカは今が出盛りだ。Watermelons are in season now.






最も野性的な子馬が最高の駿馬になる。The wildest colt makes the best horse.

彼女はまばたきして涙を止めようとした。She blinked to stop the tears.
順風の時に帆を上げよ。Hoist your sail when the wind is fair.


コーチが助言をしてくれた。The coach gave me some advice.


海水が傷にしみて痛いよ。The seawater stings my cut.彼の額の傷は目立つ。The scar on his forehead is conspicuous.ここに傷があるので安くしてください。There's a scratch here. Could you give me a discount?
あの商人は絹織物を商う。The merchant deals in silk goods.
朝立ちやしょんべんまでの命かな。A morning erection: Will it last only until I take a leak?

彼の手のひらに硬貨を置く。Place a coin in the palm of his hand.
その男の子の世話で彼女は非常に精力を消耗する。Taking care of the boy is a great drain on her energies.


男性の方は上着を着用してください。Jackets are requested for men.
予算案は上院を通過した。The budget passed the Upper House.

景気はかなり上向きである。Business is, to a large extent, improving.
どちらかと言えば、我が国の経済は上向いている。If anything, the economy in our country is going up.
彼は食卓の上座についた。He sat at the head of the table.
妙子は上手から登場して。Taeko, come on from stage left.






その摩天楼はまわりの他の建物の上方にそびえていた。The skyscraper rose above the other buildings around.

彼は丈夫だったそうです。He is said to have been strong.

乗客はどちらの側にも４人すわっていた。The passengers sat four aside.

そのような情緒と行動の分離に比べれば、破局的結果の方がまだましである。Even disaster is better than such a divorce between emotion and action.




嘘から出た誠。Many a true word is spoken in jest.手八丁口八丁の彼だけど、誠がないのが玉に瑕だね。He works fast and is very articulate but his insincerity is his biggest defect.

彼は、寝台の長さを測った。He measured the length of the bed.


あなたはきのう放課後まっすぐ帰宅しましたか。Did you go straight home after school yesterday?


見渡す限り、野原は真っ白だった。The field was white as far as the eye could see.

この人は画家だ！This fellow is an artist!人は意識のある生き物だ。Man is a conscious being.人がなんと言おうと僕は君の味方だ。I'll stand by you no matter what others may say.
以前は、人々は歩いて旅をしたものだった。People used to travel on foot.人々はみな彼の英雄的行為をたたえた。Everybody praised his heroism.
船上の人々はその島に５人の人影を見てびっくりしました。The men on board were surprised to see five men on the island.



敵側の人数は味方の３倍になった。The enemy had triple our numbers.





その家は高い塀で人目から遮られている。The house is screened from view with a high fence.



妹は水鳥を見て興奮した。My little sister was excited to see the waterfowl.

算数は数を取り扱う。Arithmetic deals with numbers.
あの木の枝に数羽の鳥がとまっている。Some birds are sitting on the branch of that tree.今年は失業者数が記録的になるだろう。This year unemployment will reach record levels.


やっとメアリーは正気に戻った。At last, Mary recovered her senses.






その島は日本の西方にある。The island lies to the west of Japan.
石綿金網を発見された場合飛散防止のため石綿の部分を水に濡らしてビニール袋に包み安全を確保して下さい。In the event that asbestos-covered mesh is found, ensure its safety by damping the asbestos portion to prevent dust release and wrapping in a plastic bag.
この赤色で柄全体がだいなしだ。The red kills the whole pattern.
挨拶抜きでいきなり用件を切り出す。Skip the pleasantries and get down to business.



経済の先行きが明るくなっているので、日本の大企業が今年予定している設備投資は上方修正された。Capital investments planned by major Japanese businesses for this year have been revised upward in view of an improving economic outlook.
先ごろのサービス上の不備について釈明したかった。We wanted to explain the recent service failure.







船底が海底に当たった。The ship touched ground.
荷物を全部選り分けるのにかなり時間がかかった。It took quite a while to sort out all our luggage.
前金で払っていただけますか。Can you pay me in advance?
小さい白いウサギは、小さい黒いウサギに彼女の柔らかい前足をふれました。The little white rabbit gave the little black rabbit her soft paw.
息子の前歯が曲がってはえてきました。My son's front teeth have come in crooked.
プログラムは今頃もう始まっているはずです。だから、前半はたぶん観られないでしょう。The program should have started by now, so we'll probably miss the first half.
二輪車が倒れずに走行するのには前輪が大きな役割を演じています。The front wheel plays an important role in two-wheeled vehicles moving without falling over.

この女の子はまだ小さくてもののよしあしがわからない。The girl is not old enough to be responsible.
その報道は全国に行き渡った。The news report spread all over the country.
彼は全治一ヶ月の負傷を受けた。He sustained an injury which will take a month to heal completely.

一般に日本人は、自分たちがかつてより暮らし向きがよくなったと考えている。The Japanese at large consider themselves better off than they used to be.
曾祖父の代から東京に住んでいます。My family came to live in Tokyo in my great-grandfather's time.




１月２０日（月曜日）の午前中に最終の議事事項を出しますので、早急にお返事を下さい。We'll release the final agenda on the morning of Monday, January 20, so please reply quickly.
私は早合点して彼がうそをついているのだと決めつけてしまった。I was too hasty in concluding that he was lying.

我々の利害は相反するようだ。Our interests seem to conflict with each other.
雨が降らなかったせいで草木が枯れてしまった。Absence of rain caused the plants to die.
審判はどちらの側も支持するべきではない。A referee should not favor either side.
彼は、まきを束ねた。He set up a bundle of firewood.
足跡が床に残っていた。Footprints were left on the floor.





彼は他言しないと約束した。He promised not to tell.
彼女はもっと他人の言うことを聞くべきだ。She should listen more to other people.

これだけまあ、多士済済の人材が一堂に集まったもんだよな。Not bad―not bad at all. This is quite a gathering of talent to have under one roof.
彼女はその悲しい知らせに打ちのめされた。She was overwhelmed by the sad news.
板にくぎを打ち込んだ。He hammered nails into the plank.ノートパソコンの電源を入れ、ブラウザを立ち上げて、もう覚えてしまったアドレスを打ち込む。I switch on my laptop, start up the browser, and type in the address I've already learnt by heart.彼はその仕事に打ち込んだ。He applied himself to the task.

切符を申し込まれる際は代替日もご指定ください。When applying for tickets, please give alternative dates.



あいつは小山の大将だった。He was the cock of the walk.
この壮大な大聖堂の建立は中世にまでさかのぼる。This magnificent cathedral dates back to the Middle Ages.

口をゆすいでください。Please rinse out your mouth.彼は汚名をそそいだ。He vindicated his honor.
凧を飛ばすのは危険になることがある。Flying kites can be dangerous.


谷は彼の呼び声でこだました。The valley echoed with his call.

こっちの端を持っててくれる？Will you please hold this edge?
そりゃ、フィクション世界ってのはそういう細かい部分をはしょるからな。Well that's because in fiction that sort of fine detail gets skipped.
魔力(Ｍａｇｉｃ)：魔法を使うために必要な能力値。 魔法を使うと減少するが、時間で回復する。MP (magic): Ability score needed to use magic. As you use magic it drops, but with time it recovers.普通は、id属性とname属性に同じ値を割り当てます。（訳注：異なっていても構わないが便宜上同じ値を割り当てるという事）Usually the id and name attributes have the same value applied. (N.B. Not because it matters if they differ but just as a matter of convenience.)




ステーキは中位で焼いてください。I like my steak medium.


太陽は昼間輝く。The sun shines during the day.
滞りのない、優雅な仕草でグラスに水を注ぎ込んだ。She smoothly and elegantly poured the water into the glass.その国の財政の赤字をなくすには、もっと、たくさんの外国の援助を注ぎ込まなければならなかった。To get the nation's economy out of the red, more foreign aid had to be pumped in.
その学者はなけなしの金を全部本につぎこんだ。The scholar spent what little money he had on books.
私はビニール袋にワインを注ぎ、それからそれを氷水に付けた。I poured the wine in a plastic bag and then dipped it in ice water.彼は友人を助けることに全力を注いだ。He concentrated his energies on helping his friend.川は山から下って湾に注いでいる。The river descends from the mountains to the bay below.




いつも何時に朝飯を食べますか。What time do you usually have breakfast?
彼女はじきよくなるだろう。She will get well soon.

奥歯に物の挟まった言い方をせず、ズバリ直球で言ってあげる事をお勧めします。I recommend giving it to them straight, don't waffle your way around the subject.








彼は口ひげをそり落とした。He shaved his mustache off.
お父さんがバスルームでひげを剃っている。Dad is shaving in the bathroom.


彼は私と弟を取り違えた。He mistook me for my younger brother.

イエスも、また弟子たちも、その婚礼に招かれた。And Jesus and his disciples had also been invited to the wedding.


この果物は摘み取られるほどのは成長していない。This fruit isn't ripe enough to pick yet.
ある男を判断するには、その人の友人によるのと同様に敵によって判断するのがいいだろう。You shall judge of a man by his foes as well as by his friends.彼は敵に不意打ちを食わせた。He surprised his opponent.

初めて天の川を見た夜のことを私は覚えている。I remember the night when I first saw the Milky Way.
天皇は国家の象徴である。The Emperor shall be the symbol of the State.









あの店はサービスが良い。That store gives good service.
私はこのペンを近所の文房具店で買った。I bought this pen at the stationer's around the corner.
転んで手首を痛めました。I fell down and hurt my wrist.
身命をかけて職務を実践し、すべての警察官の心に火をともしてくれました。He risked his life to carry out his duty and inspired police officers everywhere.
窓に灯がともっていた。There was a light burning in the window.


私宛に何か伝言がとどいていませんか。Are there any messages for me?

学校へ行く途中でトムに会った。I met Tom on my way to school.途中であきらめるな。Don't give up halfway.
この鉄の板はすずでメッキしてある。This iron sheet is coated with tin.彼もとうとうメッキがはがれた。He has finally shown his true colors.




日本とイギリスは島国である。Japan and Britain are island countries.
そのホテルは東側は湖に接している。The hotel adjoins a lake on the east.
その火は東風にあおられて市の中心部を焼き尽くした。The fire, driven by an east wind, destroyed the center of the city.
窓に灯がともっていた。There was a light burning in the window.
２、４、６などは偶数です。Two, four, six, etc. are even numbers.私は冗談など言う気がしない。I am in no mood for joking.

アリスは頭に花をさしています。Alice has a flower in her hair.私、ケンと付き合ってるの。彼って、カッコ良くて優しくて、頭もいいの。おまけに、独身よ！I'm going with Ken. He is cool, gentle and smart. What's more, he is single!トムは先週の頭に車を盗まれた。Tom had his car stolen early last week.
ここを出発する前に頭数を数えておきましょう。Let's count heads before we leave.
離婚率はやがて頭打ちになるでしょう。Divorce rates might reach a plateau soon.
企業は率先して事にあたる働き手を歓迎する。Companies welcome workers who take initiative.

アメリカ合衆国の同胞諸君、国家が諸君のために何をしてくれるかを求めず、諸君が国家のために何をできるかを求めよう。My fellow Americans: ask not what your country can do for you; ask what you can do for your country.


銅はよく電気を通す。Copper conducts electricity well.

バスはでこぼこ道を走りながらガタガタと音を立てた。The bus rattled as it drove along the bumpy road.

確かに彼は少々にぶいが勤勉だ。Indeed he may be a little dull, but he is diligent.
テレビは創造力を鈍らせる力がある。Television can dull our creative power.インフレ進行度は鈍っている。The rate of inflation is slowing down.
このことは内々にしてください。Please keep this a secret.

あの政治家は内外の事情に精通している。That politician is well versed in internal and external conditions.


あの男の人、内股で歩いているよ。That guy is walking pigeon-toed.






彼は内幕をばらすといっていますよ。He says he'll blow the story open.
なんて大きなかぼちゃなんだ！What a big pumpkin!


彼の家は川の南側にある。His house is on the south side of the river.
ディールはイングランド南東部の、ロンドンからおよそ１１０キロ離れた地点にあります。Deal is in the southeast of England, about 110 kilometers away from London.

これは始末の難い問題だ。This is a difficult problem to solve.

彼は一日に二食しかとらない習慣だ。He is in the habit of eating only two meals a day.
二人の男は刑務所から釈放された。The two men were released from jail.


長い日数ではなかったが、そこに滞在された。There they stayed for a few days.
日本は中国の東方にある。Japan is to the east of China.
乳牛というのは、役に立つ動物です。A dairy cow is a useful animal.
乳首から分泌液が出ます。I have a discharge from my nipple.


乳房にしこりがあります。I have a lump in my breast.



１台の車が入り口に止まった。A car stopped at the entrance.

天候のいかんにかかわらず駅へ迎えに参ります。Rain or shine, I will come to meet you at the station.
アルコールの消費量は年々増えている。Alcohol consumption is increasing every year.
あれだけのコインを収集するのにどれだけの年月がかかりましたか。How long did it take you to collect so many coins?


このガラクタは火に燃やしなさい。Burn this rubbish on the fire.彼女は嫉妬の炎を燃やした。She burned with jealousy.
このコップをミルクで満たした。I filled this glass with milk.この数年間に彼は不朽の名詩を書いた。During these years he wrote immortal poems.



天気予報によれば、まもなく梅雨に入るそうだ。According to the weather forecast, the rainy season will set in before long.


少年は木の皮を剥いだ。The boy stripped a tree of the bark.

彼は博士論文を月末までに教授に提出しなければならない。His doctoral thesis must be submitted to the professor by the end of the month.
博打で彼は失敗した。Gambling brought about his failure.

大きなかしわの木が風の力を弱めている。The big oak tree breaks the force of the wind.
父の髪は白髪交じりになった。My father's hair has become streaked with gray.


ボールを丸く、そして堅くするために麦わらをいっぱいに詰め込んでいました。They filled them with straw to make them round and hard.
会は八時に解散した。The meeting broke up at eight.
そこに八つの小石があった。There were eight pebbles there.



安倍内閣は、第９０代の内閣総理大臣に指名された安倍晋三が２００６年９月２６日に発足させた内閣である。The Abe Cabinet is the Cabinet inaugurated on September 26, 2006 by Shinzo Abe, who was appointed as Japan's 90th Prime Minister.



私たちはその船を半月と名付けた。We named the boat the Half Moon.
半日のツアーはありますか。Do you offer any half-day tours?
あと半年したら、彼女は外国へ行ってしまう。She'll be going abroad in another six months.


これらの事実には反駁の余地がない。These facts admit of no contradiction.


「机の中に本がありますか」「いいえ、ありません」"Is there a book in the desk?" "No, there isn't."
そのスピードを出した車は道路に飛び出した子供を、間一髪で、避けることができた。The speeding car missed the child, who ran out into the road, by only a hairsbreadth.あなたはいやな経験を避けるかもしれない。You might avoid an unpleasant experience.

当時私は自分を美男子だと思う傾向があった。In those days I tended to think of myself as a nice looking guy.

鼻血が止まりません。I can't stop my nosebleed.


鼻声だね。You are talking through the nose.


私たちは１匹の犬と１匹の猫を飼っている。We own a dog and a cat.




私はビニール袋にワインを注ぎ、それからそれを氷水に付けた。I poured the wine in a plastic bag and then dipped it in ice water.



やっと絵を描き終えた。Finally, I finished a painting.
ここでお買い上げの品は無料で配達します。Articles bought here will be delivered free of charge.



彼女を公平に評価すれば、彼女は不器量ではない。To do her justice, she is not plain.






彼はあの大切な仕事には不適格だ。He is not equal to the important job.



ああ、バスタブ付きがいいな。Oh, a bath, please.つきが、ずっと廻ってこないと、あきらめない賭博師は危機をおかして、大金を狙わざるをえなくなる。After a streak of bad luck, a persistent gambler will be forced to play for high stakes.
ご夫婦でお越しください。Please come over with your wife.

ちょっと肌寒かった。There was a slight chill in the air.
彼は危険を侮った。He was scornful of the danger.
武士は食わねど高楊枝。A samurai, even when he has not eaten, uses a toothpick like a lord.


オランダを訪問するまで、風車を見たことがなかった。I had never seen a windmill until I visited the Netherlands.
ただの風邪でしょう。You probably just have a cold.

副官は戦術の変更を彼に提案した。The aide suggested a change in tactics to him.






女性ホルモン分泌の乱れが不妊症の大きな原因です。Female hormone imbalance is a major cause of infertility.


この文書はあなたのお目にだけ留めていただきたい。This document is for your eyes only.


今年の冬は気温が平均以上だ。The temperature is above average this winter.

飛行機から見ると、小さな丘陵は平地のように見える。Small hills look flat from an airplane.

厳しいしつけでその子は別人のようになった。Discipline transformed the child.

偏頭痛がおこったときに対処するだけではなく、普段の生活のなかで、偏頭痛をなるべく防いでいくのも大事なことです。It's the prevention of migraines during daily life that's important, not dealing with migraines when they occur.







私たちは父の墓参りをした。We visited our father's grave.

彼はこの墓地に埋葬されている。He was buried in this graveyard.

彼女は贈り物を紙に包んだ。She wrapped the present in paper.この民族の起源は神秘につつまれている。The origins of these people is shrouded in mystery.島は濃い霧に包まれていた。The island was enveloped in a thick fog.

彼らは宝物を探しに行った。They went in search of treasure.
その子供は母親の腕の中に抱かれて安心した。That child felt secure in his mother's arms.その経験で彼女は民主党に対して好感を抱くようになった。The experience prejudiced her in favor of the Democratic Party.
貴社の社員の方々にお会いでき、とてもうれしく思いました。It was a great pleasure for me to meet many associates of your company.
観光名所をほうぼう訪ね歩いたので、すっかり疲れ果ててしまった。Visiting all the tourist sights really wore me out.


この国には石油が乏しい。Oil is scarce in this country.

熱い涙が彼女の頬を伝った。Hot tears ran down her cheeks.
日本の北国に住む人々は、降雪を利用して冬にはスキーを楽しむ。The people who live in the north of Japan enjoy skiing in the winter in the snow.
カナダはアメリカの北側にある。Canada is on the north side of America.
北東方向に土地が低く横たわっていた。The land to the northeast was low-lying.

北風は一日中吹き続けた。The north wind held on all day.


あなたの牧場は何エーカーありますか。What is the acreage of your ranch?牛が牧場で草を食べている。Cows are eating grass in the meadow.

この本は本文の部分はそんなに多くない。There's not so much text in this book.






この区域に財宝が埋まっているという話だ。It is said that treasure is buried in this area.会場は立すいの余地もないほどに聴衆で埋まっていた。The hall was filled with such a large audience that there wasn't even standing room.
私は両親には必ず毎月手紙を書きます。I never fail to write to my parents every month.
彼は毎年軽井沢へ行く。He goes to Karuizawa every year.
この話は又聞きなので、真偽の程は分かりません。As I heard the story secondhand, I can't ascertain the truth of it.
私は末っ子です。I'm the youngest in the family.
新しく来た人は末席についた。The newcomer sat down at the foot of the table.
末弟は悪くないかもしれない、けれど私も悪くない。It mightn't have been my youngest brother's fault, but it wasn't mine either.




４０万ガロンの石油がパイプラインから溢れ出た。400,000 gallons of oil have spilled out of the pipeline.



死は万人に来るべきもの、すべて人は死すべきものなり。Death is certain to all, all shall die.
我が社は、２０００年問題への対応は万全です。We're thoroughly prepared for the Y2K bug.

富は一生の宝、知は万代の宝。Wisdom is better than gold or silver.
もちろん万能ではないからといって価値がないわけではないから、ＧＴＤはダメということにはならない。Of course you can't say that it's worth nothing because it isn't perfect, so that doesn't mean that GTD is useless.人間は神ほど万能ではない。Man is not as almighty as God.
年来の経済病には手軽にきく万能薬などありません。There is no easy cure-all for old economic ills.

神は万物の根源である。God is the cause of all things.

趣味がないと生活があじけないものになるかもしれない。If one does not have a hobby, his life may be desolate.



子たる者すべからく親の命に従うべし。Children should obey their parents.
あさって彼にここへ来てもらうつもりです。I will have him come here the day after tomorrow.

あしたは一日中ひまです。I'll be free all day tomorrow.
われわれはかろうじて事故を免れた。We narrowly missed the accident.

蛙の面に水。Like water off a duck's back.
二人の男が面と向かい合った。Two men met face to face.その男はトラの面をかぶっていた。The man wore a mask of a tiger.そよ風で池の面にさざ波が立った。A gentle wind made ripples on the surface of the pond.
勝負をしましょう。より酷い暴言を吐いた方が勝ちです。Let's have a contest. The side to come up with the worst insult wins.
きちんと分別のある人は決して盲信などしません。A person of good sense will certainly not believe blindly.

あの少女は自分が王女様だという妄想にとらわれている。That girl is under the delusion that she is a princess.


盲馬にはうなずいても目配せしても同じこと。A nod is as good as a wink to a blind horse.


そうは問屋がおろさないぞ。You won't get it so easily.
２人の兵士が、門のところで見張りをしていた。Two soldiers kept guard at the gate.


その晩と次の日とその夜中ずっと地下室で過ごしたのよ。We spent all of that night, the next day, and the next night in the cellar.
我々はしゃべりづめで夜半まで起きていた。We sat up half the night just talking.


爺ちゃんはやっとのことで脱出した。The old man escaped, but with difficulty.

石油を２、３リッターばかり融通してもらえますか。Can you spare me a few liters of petrol?
私は昨日夕飯を作った。I cooked supper last night.
君の予言が当たったよ。Your prophecy has come true.
ぎょうざの具のあまりは？餃子を家で作りましたが、皮が少なかったせいか、具が少し余ってしまいました。Gyoza stuffing? I made some gyoza at home but, possibly because I didn't have enough dough, I had some of the filling left over.それはあまり価値がない。It's not worth much.この手の本はあまり読まない。I don't read this kind of book much.
よそ行きの靴をはきなさい。Put on your good shoes.



彼らの船は波に揺られていた。Their ship was at the mercy of the waves.
地震が大地を揺すった。The earthquake shook the ground.
ジャーン。それじゃ春田くん、もう見てもいいわよ。みんなの浴衣、お披露目ねぇ〜。Ta-dah! Well then, Haruta, it's OK to look now! It's everybody's yukata debut.
我々は翌朝早く出発することで一致した。We agreed to start early the next morning.
この機械は１時間に千個のねじを製造する。This machine cranks out a thousand screws an hour.


今日は来客があります。I'm expecting a customer today.
そのコンサートは来春おこなわれる。The concert will take place next spring.

子供達は雷におびえた。The thunder scared the children.
落葉を取り除いて下さい。Please get rid of the dead leaves.
とりわけ人目をひいたのは、彼女の卵型の顔立ちだった。Especially remarkable was her oval face.


あの種の服が今流行だ。That kind of dress is now in fashion.


舞台の両側からライトが照らされた。The stage was lit from both sides.
彼は両足を広く開いて立っていた。He stood with his feet wide apart.かれらは彼の両足を縛りあわせた。They bound his legs together.

テープの両端をつないで下さい。Please join the two ends of the tape together.


ヘレンの言葉で私は急に力づいた。Helen's words suddenly filled me with new energy.
彼は群衆の中を力ずくで進んでいった。He muscled his way through the crowd.
この国は隣国の支配下にあった。This country was subject to a neighboring country.

彼は例を示して自分の理論を説明した。He illustrated his theory with examples.彼女はこれまでに例のないほどの偉大な科学者だった。She was as great a scientist as ever lived.

彼女はその恋歌を非常にうまく表現した。She rendered the love song very well.
彼女はほのかな恋心を知るようになる。She has come to know something like love.





私は毎朝六時に起きます。I get up at six every morning.
６つの先端技術の会社がその県に支社を設立した。Six high-tech companies set up branch offices in that prefecture.




苦痛で彼の顔が歪んでいる。His face is distorted by pain.
ジョーンズさんはその知らせを聞いた時、顔をゆがめた。Miss Jones made a face when she heard the news.

町は昔のままだった。The town was exactly the same as before.物価は現状のまま続くだろう。Prices will continue as they are.彼は会議中ずっと黙ったままだった。He kept silent during the meeting.
その音楽は全員をとりこにした。The music lured everyone.


さて次の話題に移ることにしよう。Let's go on to the next subject.



傷を深くえぐってはならない、傷を新たに作ることになるから。Search not the wound too deep lest thou make a new one.


私たちはさじでスープを飲む。We eat soup with a spoon.

その取っ手を右にねじると箱は開きます。Twist that knob to the right and the box will open.




水槽にボウフラがうようよしている。The water tank teems with mosquito larvae.






どう猛な犬が女の子に飛びかかった。A fierce dog attacked the girl.


あまりに光が強いので彼女は目をつぶった。She shut her eyes because the light was so strong.




クモはそこで、チョウとかトンボといった小さな昆虫が罠にかかるのを待つ。There the spider waits for small insects like butterflies and dragonflies to be trapped.










合鍵を持ってきてください。Please bring the master key.

彼は７年間、合気道をやっていた。He had been a practitioner of Aikido for seven years.
その合い言葉は解きやすかった。We easily figured out the password.
お互い相性がいい。The chemistry is right for us.



相乗りしている人は他の乗客との会話を慎むべきだ。People sharing a ride should refrain from conversation with other passengers.


大学生の時、有理子が愛欲に身を委ねた。When she was at university, Yuriko abandoned herself to sexual passion.
春になると森は青々としてくる。Woods grow greener in the spring.



火は赤々と燃えていた。The fire was burning brightly.
その家は灯火で赤々と輝いていた。The house was ablaze with lights.
この明かりで字を読もうとすれば目が悪くなるよ。You'll strain your eyes trying to read in this light.どうか明かりをつけて下さい。Turn on the light, please.
空巣にやられた。Our house was robbed while we were away.
このところの美しい秋晴れは、雨の多かった夏の埋め合わせをしてくれている。This beautiful autumn weather we've been having makes up for the wet summer.
箱の中に空瓶があります。There are some empty bottles in the box.
息子はハンバーガーにあきています。My son is tired of hamburgers.

どの車両がすいていますか。Which car is less crowded?私達はまだあまりお腹は空いていない。We aren't very hungry yet.
ぐいと押すとドアは開いた。The door yielded to a strong push.１塁があいていたので打者を歩かせた。With first base open, he walked the batter.放課後は空いてますか？Are you free after school?

コンピューターを物色して歩いたあげく、デイヴィドより２００ドル安い値段で手に入れた。I shopped around for my computer and ended up paying $200 less than David.
挙げ句の果てにクビになった。And on top of it all, I was fired.


朝ごはんにはなにがよろしいですか。What would you like for breakfast?

小さなあざは彼女の美しさを少しも損なわなかった。The tiny birthmark took nothing from her loveliness.彼は全身あざだらけだった。He was covered with bruises.

何とか足がかりをつかんだ程度ですよ。We just got to first base.

飲み過ぎて、なんか足元がフラフラする。I drank too much and the ground seemed to spin under my feet.


だんだん暖かくなります。It will get warmer and warmer.彼女は心の温かい人なんです。She has a kind heart.
ここにお掛けになって暖まってください。Sit down here and warm yourself.
ミルクを温めてくれませんか。Will you warm the milk, please?
機会とは神意を表す一つのあだ名である。Chance is a nickname for Providence.

今すぐあつあつのピザが欲しいなぁ。I could go for a nice hot pizza right now.

この宛先に送ってもらえますか？Could you send it to this address?

この手紙は宛名が違っている。This letter is wrongly addressed.
この規則は貴方には当てはめることはできない。This rule cannot be applied to you.

ケーキをあなた方２人で分けなさい。Divide the cake between you two.


宗教は人類のアヘンである。Religion is the opium of the people.
マルチするなアホ。Don't multi-post, idiot.
それを日よけや雨傘の代わりによく使います。We use them often as parasols or umbrellas.





彼女はせっせと編み物に精を出していた。She was busy with her knitting.
雨上がりの木の葉は生き生きとしている。The leaves are fresh after a rainfall.
私たちは雨降りにもかかわらず、外出した。We went out in spite of the rain.ある雨降りの朝、目が覚めてみると有名になっていた。One rainy morning I woke up to find myself famous.
みんな奴は怪しいと思っている。We are all suspicious about him.彼が時間どおりに来るかどうかは私は怪しいと思う。I question whether he'll come in time.その怪しい女性は、魔女と考えられた。The strange-looking woman was thought to be a witch.


他人のあらばかり探す嫌な人である。He is a very irritating critic of others.
だから、この荒々しい試合では選手がひどいけがを負っていたし、ときには死ぬこともあったのです。So, players were often seriously injured and sometimes even killed in these rough games.


新たな入植者達がその広大な荒野を開拓した。The newcomers cultivated the immense wilderness.
あらゆるものに限界がある。There is a limit to everything.

ありがとう。また、次の日にくるようにします。Thanks. Maybe we'll come back.

ある学生に会うところです。I'm going to meet a certain student.
ガスで調理しますか、あるいは電気ですか。Do you cook by gas or electricity?
その古城は荒れ果てている。The old castle is in a sad state.
しかもなお、石の大きいブロックが非常にぴったりと合わさっているので、ブロックの間にナイフの先を差し込むことができない。And yet the large blocks of stone are fitted together so closely that you cannot put in the point of a knife between them.


この詩を暗記しましょう。Let's learn this poem by heart.
私は今まさに最後の旅路につき、暗黒へと一大飛躍しようとしている。I am about to take my last voyage, a great leap in the dark.
あんずの花が満開だ。The apricot trees are in full blossom.


いい塩梅だ。The seasoning is just right.


親と言い合いをした事がありますか？Have you ever argued with your parents?
互いに自分の預金高は言い合わなかった。They did not tell each other about the size of their savings.もう言い合うのはやめにしましょう。Let's patch up our argument.


他人の悪事を引き合いに出して自分の悪事の言い訳をすることはできない。Two wrongs don't make a right.ジェーンは自分の言い訳が正しいと主張した。Jane insisted that she was right.
「みんなひと休みしようぜ」とジョンは言った。John said, "Hey guys, let's take a break."この動物は日本語で何と言いますか。What do you call this animal in Japanese?
何と豪華な家々でしょう。What splendid houses they are!
家並みを分断する運河が流れていた。A canal flowed between two rows of houses.
彼はわずかな収入を精一杯活かした。He made the best of his small income.自分も生き、他人も生かせ。Live and let live.心停止の患者を応急処置で生かした。We used emergency measures to revive the cardiac arrest patient.

人の死に方は、その人の生き方を見ればわかる。As a man lives, so shall he die.
彼は生き字引と呼ばれている。He is called a walking dictionary.
ワールドカップで優勝した全日本チームは、意気揚々と帰国してきた。The Japanese World Cup champion team came back home flushed with victory.
この雑誌は広く行き渡っている。This magazine circulates widely.
腹が減っては戦ができぬ。An army travels on its stomach.
ワインにはいろいろなタイプがあり、それによって育成の仕方もさまざまです。There are various types of wines and the way they are matured varies accordingly.

猫は生け垣を通り抜けた。The cat got through the hedge.
生け花は日本では伝統的な芸道である。Flower arrangement is a traditional art in Japan.
彼女は花を生けるのが好きです。She likes to arrange flowers.
私は彼を無理強いして私の意向に従わせた。I forced him into complying with my wish.




伊勢エビが大好きなのですが、非常に高いのです。I am very fond of lobsters, but they are very, very expensive.



アトランタ訪問の際には、お時間をさいていただき、ありがとうございました。Thank you for the time you spent with me during my visit to Atlanta.「もっとコーヒーはいかがですか」「もう結構です。十分頂きました」"Will you have some more coffee?" "No, thanks. I've had enough."
ここにしつこい痛みがあります。I have a persistent pain here.モモの皮は傷みやすい。The skin of peaches bruises easily.
彼の事務所は町の中心部に位置している。His office is located in the center of the town.私はパレードが見えるいい位置にいた。I was in a good position to see the parade.その位置に誰を選ぶか考えがありますか。Do you have any idea who we should single out for the position?
ジョンが品物をいちいち手に取って見た。John picked up the articles one by one and examined them.彼は私のしたことにいちいち文句を言う。He finds faults with everything I do.



私たちはとても高く上ったので、町を一望することが出来た。We went up so high that we could get the whole view of the city.



多くの人が一攫千金を夢見て宝くじを買う。Many people buy lottery tickets with the dream of immediately becoming wealthy.
彼は一ヶ月以上ロンドンにいた。He stayed in London over a month.
お金と技術を地球の一カ所から別の場所に移動させるだけでは十分でありません。Moving money and technology from one side of the globe to the other is not enough.

森の近くに一軒家がある。There stands a cottage close to the forest.
彼は４歳と１歳の２児の父親だ。He has two children, aged 4 and 1.
この見積もりは経費一切合切を含めたものでしょうね。これ以上はびた一文お金は出さないからね。I hope this expense report contains all the relevant business expenses because I'm not paying a cent more after this.


君は常軌を逸しているよ。You are way off track.




彼は国境警備兵の姿を見て命からがら逃げた。He ran for his life at the sight of the border guard.


あいつを見ると、いまいましくてしょうがない。The sight of him is hateful to me.
あなたは今までに阿蘇山に登ったことがありますか。Have you ever climbed Mt. Aso?

彼の話し方が嫌なの。I don't like his way of talking.この卵は嫌な匂いがする。This egg has a bad smell.
その命令に嫌々従う兵もいた。Some soldiers were reluctant to obey the commands.


世界からは【麻疹輸出国】と嫌味とも本音ともとれることをいわれている始末。Ending up with being called a "measles exporting country" by the rest of the world, something that you could take as insult or truth.
いよいよ薄暮、もうすぐ宵闇。It's getting more and more shadowy, soon it will be twilight.いよいよ千載一遇のチャンスがめぐってきた。At last, a chance in a million arrived.

その老人は生きる意欲をなくした。The old man lost the will to live.
ビルは試験のことでいらいらしている。Bill is nervous about the exam.


この丘から入り江がよく見える。This hill commands a fine view of the bay.
私たちは美しい入り日に見とれた。We admired the beautiful sunset.
町田は古いものと新しいものが入り交じった面白い街です。Machida is an interesting city that's a mix of the old and the new.



窓を開けてむしむしするこの部屋の空気を入れ替えて下さい。Will you open the window and air out this stuffy room?


総入れ歯にする必要があります。You have to have a full denture.

眼窩とは、目をいれている骨のいれもののことです。The eye socket is the bone receptacle in which the eye fits.
いろいろな国へ行ったがやっぱり日本が一番いい。I've visited many countries, but I like Japan best of all.色々と有り難うございます。忘れないように彼はそれを書き留めた。Thank you very much for everything. He wrote it down lest he should forget it.


陰影に気をつけてみたのですがなかなかうまくいかないです。I tried to take care with the shadows, but it just doesn't go very well.

科学の進歩は因襲によってしばしば阻害された。Progress in science was often barred by convention.






母は植木の世話をよくする人だ。My mother looks after the plants well.
餓死するくらいなら溺死したほうがましだ。I might as well drown as starve.
我々はその畑に今年は綿を植え付けるつもりだ。We will crop the field with cotton this year.
雨期は六月から始まる。The rainy season begins in June.
おーい、その浮き袋をこっちへ投げてくれ。Hey! Throw that float to me.

後で憂き目をみる。This will bring you to grief.
浮世の心配事のない人はない。No one is free from worldly cares.
きれいな花が受付のデスクに飾ってありました。There were beautiful flowers on the reception desk.
受け持ちの患者に客観的になる事は看護婦にとって困難だ。It's hard for nurses to be objective about their patients.


彼に会ったのを薄々覚えている。I vaguely remember meeting him.

ジョンはステージで何を歌いましたか。What did John sing on the stage?
私は彼に心配事を打ち明けた。I confided my troubles to him.
あのグループは近く開催するパーティーについての打ち合わせをしようとした。The group was planning a bull session to talk about the upcoming party.
その仕事をブラウン氏と打ち合わせた。I arranged the business with Mr Brown.








スミスはジョーンズを三振に打ちとった。Smith struck Jones out.







このページをノートに写しておきなさい。Copy this page in your notebook.その写真は空から写されたものである。The picture was taken from the air.
一本の高い木が水面に長い影を映している。A tall tree projects its long shadow on the water.
洞窟からうつろに反響する音を耳にした。We heard somber hollow sounds from the cave.

営業成績はまさに鰻上り、というところかね。Our sales performance is just skyrocketing.


その貸付金は、８分の利益を生む。The loan bears an 8% interest.
なくした時間を埋め合わせなければならない。We must make up for lost time.

この小切手を裏書きしてください。Please endorse this check.
この報告は彼の背信を裏付けしている。This report confirms his betrayal.
占い師に手相を見せました。A fortune-teller read my hand.



今年の売り上げは倍増と見込んでいます。Sales should double this year.

今日、野球の試合を見に行くと、売り子がお湯の入ったタンクを持って、そこいらを歩き回っている。If you go to a baseball game today, sellers are walking around with hot-water tanks.
あのデパートでは今週メンズスーツが売り出し中だ。Men's suits are on sale this week at that department store.
長々と協議した末に、売り手と買い手は結局折り合った。After considerable argument, the buyer and the seller finally came to terms.
衛生用品売り場はどこですか。Where is the sanitary section?



売れ行きは目標に達しなかった。Sales fell short of their goal.








いわゆる英知は単に知識の断片ではないことを心にとめておくべきだ。We should bear in mind what is called wisdom is not a mere item of knowledge.

これらの絵葉書は全部私のものです。All of these picture postcards are mine.
とにかくエビを与えよう。Have some lobster at any rate.
どうやって新鮮な魚をえらぶのですか。How can I pick out fresh fish?

彼のえりのサイズはいくつですか。What size of collar does he take?
１０チームが賞を得ようと争った。Ten teams competed for the prize.これらのガスは地球規模の温暖化をもたらし得る。These gases can lead to global warming.
彼のスピーチは延々と続いた。His speech went on and on.アマゾン川は延々と北ブラジルを流れている。The Amazon River meanders through northern Brazil.
縁組は天でなされる。Marriage is made in heaven.
彼を援護するのが義務だ。It is incumbent on us to support him.
追い風の時に帆を上げよ。Hoist your sail when the wind is fair.
トムに追いつくために走らなければならなかった。I had to run to catch up with Tom.


机はほこりで覆われている。The desk is covered with dust.
大売り出しは今日から３日間続く。The bargain sale will run for three days, beginning today.


きみは何と大きい家を持っているんだろう。What a big house you have!もっと大きい声で言ってください。Louder, please.
その老人はおおげさに言う傾向がある。The old man tends to exaggerate.

私の仕事はいつも多すぎるか少なすぎるかのどちらかである。My work is always feast or famine.
その丘は見晴らしがよい。The hill commands a fine view.





彼女が彼に惚れてるのは岡目八目疑いのないところだよ。As a disinterested third-party, I can declare that she secretly loves him.傍目八目という言葉があるように一度協会から離れて、日本サッカーをみて頂きたい。Like the saying that things are seen clearest from outside I wish he'd leave the association for a time and take a look at Japanese soccer.
数艘のヨットが、はるか沖合を並んで航行していた。Several yachts were sailing side by side far out at sea.



ジェニーは贈り物をありがとうと言った。Jenny thanked me for the gift.
アンディはけっしてデートにおくれたことはない。Andy is never late for a date.彼女は勉強が非常に後れている。She's far behind in her studies.
彼は勇気ある行いをした。He did a courageous act.そのような行ないはいかにもメグらしい。Such behavior is just like Meg.
自分の責任において何でも行いなさい。Do everything at your own risk.
他人の意見を押さえつけることはできても、自分の発言がどんな結果に結びつくかを想像できていない。Even if the opinions of others can be suppressed, I cannot imagine to what results my speech may lead.
このはしごをしっかり押さえてくれ。Hold this ladder steady.警察はその強盗の首を押さえた。The police seized the robber by the neck.私は彼が私の悪口を言っているところを押さえた。I caught him speaking ill of me.
書類は全部テープでくくられて金庫におさめられた。All the papers were taped up and kept in the safe.その事典は約５０万語の単語を収めている。The dictionary contains about half a million words.そのアメリカ映画は大成功を収めた。That American movie was a great success.
レバーを押しあげて下さい。Please push up the lever.私を押し上げてくれれば枝に手が届くと思うけど。I think I can reach the branch if you'll give me a boost.
強盗はその子供を押し入れに閉じ込めた。The burglar shut the child in the closet.


我々は込んだ列車に押し込められた。We were crushed into the crowded train.

私は押し出された。I was crowded out.

雄のくじゃくは尾の羽毛が色彩豊かである。The male peacock has colorful tail feathers.
大人はしばしば変化を恐れる。Older people often fear change.
鯉がおたまじゃくしを食べるって知ってた？Did you know that carp eat tadpoles?
彼は当惑して落ち着きませんでした。He felt lost and uncomfortable.



彼は花瓶を落とした。He dropped a vase.道の途中で鍵を落としたに違いない。I must have lost my key along the way.トニーはシャツを脱いで、それでピアノのよごれを落としました。Tony took off his shirt and cleaned the piano with it.
乙姫様は浦島太郎に美しい玉手箱をくれました。Lady Otohime gave Urashima Taro a beautiful Tamate-box.




遠方に明かりが見えたとき私たちはほっとする思いだった。We felt relieved when we saw a light in the distance.
いい考えを思いついた。A good idea came into my mind.
貴重な思い出料としては安いものですよ。That'll make for a memorable time.
晴れだと思うよ。I think it will be sunny.状況は深刻だと思いますか。Do you regard the situation as serious?我々が思っているほどには、それほど我々は幸福でもなければ、不幸でもない。We are never as happy or as unhappy as we imagine.
彼は群衆に向かって重々しく話しかけた。He addressed the crowd gravely.
あまり面白味のない小説だった。It wasn't a very interesting novel.


重みで氷が砕けた。The ice cracked under the weight.

三郎はテーブルの上に出されたおやつをガッと取った。Saburo snatched up all the snacks that were sitting on the table.おやつにプリンを食べた。I had some custard pudding for an afternoon snack.

彼は私に折り紙をどこで買ったらいいか話してくれた。He told me where to buy origami.


彼女は身体を折り曲げておなかをかきむしった。She doubled over, clutching her side.

あのプロのスキーヤーは離れ業をしながら山をおりるのが好きだった。The professional skier liked to "hot-dog" down the mountain.ここで降りましょう。Let's get off here.今朝は露が降りた。The dew fell this morning.


小売商人は卸しで仕入れて小売りで売る。A retail merchant buys wholesale and sells retail.
卸売り業者は取引から手を引こうとするかもしれません。The wholesalers might try to back out of the deal.
卸売物価は基本的に安定している。Wholesale prices had been basically flat.


２階からトランクを降ろしてきてくれませんか。Can you bring down my trunk from upstairs?あの信号の手前で降ろしてください。Please let me off on this side of that traffic light.銀行で１０万下ろしてください。Please draw a hundred thousand yen from the bank.
それは授業の終わりだった。That was the end of the class.
野球の試合は引き分けに終わった。The baseball game ended in a draw.彼は彼らの激論を終わらせようとしたが無駄だった。He tried in vain to put an end to their heated discussion.彼は食べ終わるとすぐに、再び歩き始めた。As soon as he finished eating, he began to walk again.
あなたには病気の時助けてもらった恩義がある。I feel indebted to you for your help during my illness.
その国は気候が温和だ。That country has a mild climate.


飼い犬を外に連れ出そうとした。I tried to take our dog out of our house.
その日に限って子供たちは会館に入ることを許される。The hall allows children in only on that day.



有望な買い手は、契約内容をよく理解できませんでした。Prospective buyers couldn't make heads or tails out of the contract.

イヌは飼い主に反抗した。The dog rebelled against his master.
１日おきに買い物に行く。I go shopping every other day.




お花の水を替えましょう。Shall I change the water for the flowers?銀行に行けばその５０ドルの小切手を現金に換えてくれる。The bank will cash your fifty dollar check.

その映画では二大女優が顔合わせをした。The movie costarred two great actresses.

そのバラはよい香りを発散した。The roses gave off a nice smell.
庭には薔薇の花が香っている。The garden is fragrant with the smell of roses.
今、誰か係りの者を差し向けます。I'll send someone up to help you now.
「身分確認のためにあなたの運転免許証を見せていただけますか」とその係員はいった。"May I please see your driver's license for identification?" said the clerk.
金持ちにかかわらず彼女は幸せでない。Though she is rich, she is not happy.晴雨にかかわらず、開会式は９時に始まる予定です。Rain or shine, the opening ceremony is to begin at nine.
そこに住んでいる人すべてに関わりがある。It concerns all the people living there.
新聞によれば、彼はその陰謀に関わっていた。According to the newspaper, he participated in the plot.その顧客の苦情は微妙な問題に関わるものだった。The customer's complaint was about a sensitive issue.これは我が校の名誉にかかわる問題だ。The problem affects the prestige of our school.



この文章は書き換えなければならない。You should rewrite this sentence.
そのフロッピー、念の為書きこみ禁止にしておいて。Make that floppy uncopiable, just in case.
一両日中に上京すると書き添えてあった。He added that he was coming to town in a day or two.

この手紙は紛失するといけないから、書留にするがよい。You had better get this letter registered for fear it should be lost.君の新しい電話番号を手帳にかきとめさせてくれ。Let me put down your new phone number in my notebook.
今日は漢字の書き取りがある。We have a kanji dictation test today.
彼女はスプーンを使ってスープをかき混ぜた。She stirred the soup with a spoon.




会社の賭けはうまくいきました。The company's gamble paid off.
アンとザチャリーは駆け落ちしたらしいんだ。It seems Ann and Zachary ran off together.
その保険の掛け金は１ヶ月１万円だ。You pay 10,000 yen a month as an insurance premium.

子供たちは掛け算を暗記している。The children are learning the multiplication tables by heart.

そうだな、私の時計が止まったので彼が時間を知っているかどうか、たずねただけだ。彼はただ駆け出しただけだ。Well, I just asked him if he knew the time, because my watch has stopped, and he simply bolted.
彼女は急いで彼の病床へ駆けつけた。She came hurrying to his bedside.
意図していたものとかけ離れた結果となった。It had an effect alien from the one intended.
外交の駆け引きでは、とても彼には及ばない。I am no match for him in diplomatic shrewdness.

その少女は自分の影におびえていた。The girl was afraid of her own shadow.水たまりに映った影が見えた。Reflections could be seen in the puddles.
あの木の陰に腰をおろしましょう。Let's sit down in the shade of that tree.カーテンの陰に隠れているのは誰？Who is hiding behind the curtain?陰で他人の悪口を言うべきでない。You should not speak ill of others behind their backs.



降伏条件は過酷だった。The surrender terms were harsh.
そのかごはリンゴでいっぱいだった。The basket was full of apples.


貸し切りバスを一台都合して欲しいんですが。I want to charter a bus.
銀行は産業向け貸出を減らしている。Banks are cutting lending to industrial borrowers.
この湖はこの箇所が一番深い。The lake is deepest at this point.私はスキー中に２箇所も骨折した。I broke my leg in two places during a skiing mishap.



すぐそばでかすかな音がした。I heard a faint sound nearby.
彼の演説には数々のすばらしい言い回しが含まれていた。His speech contained many fine phrases.

これらのデータはその仮説を支持している。This data supports the hypothesis.

高額品の値下げなどときれいごとをいっても、結局のところ新消費税への風当たりを和らげる口実にすぎない。The reduced price of luxury goods is just window dressing to make the new consumption tax look better.

それは片思いの恋だった。It was a one-sided love affair.
肩書きが偉くても地位が高いとは限らない。A big title does not necessarily mean a high position.


神は自らにかたどって人を創造された。God created man in his own image.

巨大な肉の塊が当たった。I was hit by a huge chunk of meat.
ハンバーガーばかり食べていると、栄養が偏るよ。Your diet is going to be really unbalanced if all you eat is hamburgers.２桁のＩＱがある人間なら誰でも、この選択が政治的に偏ったものだって分かってるよ。Anybody with at least a two-digit IQ knows this was a politically biased choice.

メアリーは読書をしており、１匹の猫がかたわらで眠っていた。Mary was reading, with a cat sleeping beside her.
外国勢力に加担するスパイ活動にたずさわるならば、あなたは祖国を裏切ることになる。If you engage in espionage for a foreign power, you are selling your country down the river.
その花壇は水をやる必要がある。The flower garden needs watering.

あの少年は格好がいい。The young man is a handsome figure.ここは時間潰しに格好の場所である。Here is a fit space for whiling away.


エミリーは茶道と花道にたいへん興味を持っています。Emily is very interested in tea ceremony and flower arrangement.
工場はフル稼動している。The factory is running at full capacity.



時はどんな悲しみも癒してくれる。Time tames the strongest grief.
４マイルはかなりの距離だ。Four miles is a good distance.
お噂はかねがねたいそう承っています。I have heard quite a lot about you.

さらに、人類の最善の努力が神々の宇宙的御業を補助するのに必要であった。The best efforts of the human race, in addition, were necessary to assist the gods in their cosmic task.
どの科目が一番好きですか。Which subject do you like best?



この鶏の唐揚げをそのままにしておくのですか。Are you going to let this fried chicken go begging?




踊り手たちは舞台を横切って軽々と踊っていった。The dancers tripped lightly across the stage.
この問題は軽々しく扱ってはならない。This matter must not be trifled with.
カルタを配ってください。Please deal the cards.
あの枯れ木を切り倒しなさい、さもないと、君の家に倒れてくる。Cut down that dead tree, or it will fall down on your house.
１枚の枯れ葉が地面に落ちた。A dead leaf fell to the ground.
私は何匹かのかわいそうな猫が追い出されるのを見た。I saw some poor cats kicked out.
誰が議長に任命されるかについて、激しい議論がかわされた。There was a heated argument as to who should be appointed chairman.
だいたい、この川原の辺りを一巡りするのが、基本的な朝のコースである。Generally once round this river side area is the basic morning course.
自分で行く代わりに手紙を送りました。Instead of going myself, I sent a letter.二つ折りにしたクッションを枕代わりに、僕はフローリングの上にカーペットを敷いただけの固い床へと横になる。Using a doubled-up cushion in place of a pillow I lie down on the hard wooden floor with nothing but a carpet spread over it.

２階に私のかわりにもっていってください。Would you mind carrying it up the stairs for me?

ジムは、ベティーにかわって手紙を書いた。Jim wrote the letter for Betty.その会社は、経営者が３回替わっている。The company has changed hands three times.
二人はかわるがわる試みた。The two tried one after the other.
このなぞの答えを考えつきますか。Can you guess this riddle?
乾季がまもなく始まる。The dry season will set in soon.

なんであれ物事の本体を捕らえる事が肝心だ。No matter what the problem is, it's essential to get at the heart of the matter.
4つのレジスタは、呼び出された関数側が保存する。The contents of the four registers are preserved by the called subroutine.

「ああ」は感嘆詞だ。"Ah" is an interjection.




ご健康を祝して乾杯。Here's to your health!今夜の主賓に乾杯しよう。Let's toast the guest of honor!

君は完璧な仕事をしてくれた。You've done a perfect job.



合衆国では２億１６００万丁もの鉄砲類が、民間の手にあるという。In the U.S., as many as 216 million firearms are said to be in private hands.
あの件に関しては、画竜点睛を欠いてしまった。That plan still needed some finishing touches.
チームは試合に向けて気合いが入っている。The team is up for the game.

ドアを閉めてから、鍵を置いてきたことに気がついた。After I shut the door, I remembered I had left my key behind.何時間もたって彼は気がついた。It was many hours before he came to.

その薬の効きめが現れた。The medicine took effect.
これらの国はしばしば飢饉に襲われた。These countries were often visited with famine.
木々は芽を出し始めた。The trees are beginning to bud.
この丸薬は心臓に効く。These pills act on the heart.よくもまあ私にそんな口がきけるね。How dare you speak to me like that?私は５万円までつけがきく。My credit is good for 50,000 yen.
一番のチャンネルで英語が、７番のチャンネルでは日本語がお聞きになれます。You can hear English on Channel 1, and Japanese on Channel 7.音楽が好きで、毎日聴いています。I like music, and I listen to it every day.

今いる市民が逃げ出すという事態が危惧されます。It is feared that those citizens now present will run away.

この民族の起源は神秘につつまれている。The origins of these people is shrouded in mystery.
妙な音が聞こえた。I heard a strange sound.この話は、変に聞こえるかもしれないが、全く本当です。This story may sound strange, but it's absolutely true.
その建物は老朽化の兆しを見せている。The building exhibits signs of dilapidation.



何百羽とキジを撃った。We shot pheasants by the hundred.
あいての基準を受け入れるのは、そのあいての力に服従することだ。Accepting the other's norms is submitting to the other's power.
彼のほおの傷あとは今ではほとんどわからない。The scar on his cheek hardly shows now.
傷ついた鳥が地面に落ちた。The injured bird fell to the ground.その噂で彼の名声が傷ついた。The gossip hurt his reputation.
奇蹟に近いですね。It's nothing short of a miracle.
町の水道は豪雨で重大な支障をきたした。The town water supply was seriously obstructed by heavy rainfalls.

機知は会話に趣を添える。Wit gives zest to conversation.
彼等は彼に逃げるきっかけを与えた。They gave him a chance to escape.

切符売り場で買わなければなりません。You have to buy one at the office.

彼は危険に気づいていなかった。He was unaware of the danger.

ペットのためにご祈祷していただける御守と御札が実現しました。Now there are charms and talismans for your pet that you can have blessed.


高く登るにつれて、空気は希薄になる。As you go up higher, the air becomes thinner.
倫理学というのは、行動の規範を意味する。Ethics means the rules of conduct.
彼女は赤十字に寄付した。She contributed to the Red Cross.
私たちがポルトガルへ行こうと決めたのはまったくの気まぐれだった。Our decision to go to Portugal was quite arbitrary.気まぐれな天気だな。The weather is fickle.
いつ始めるのかはまだ決まっていない。It is still undecided when we will begin.






キュウリはスイカの親戚だ。Cucumbers are related to watermelons.
最近の凶悪事件をニュースで見るたび、バーチャルな世界と生きる世界の区別がなくなった若者が急増していることに気付かされる。These days when I hear about these horrible incidents on the news I get the feeling that more and more young people are losing their ability to distinguish between real and virtual worlds.

凶漢が王の馬車に爆弾を投げつけた。A fanatic threw a bomb at the king's coach.
凶器に残された指紋は容疑者のものと一致する。The fingerprints left on the weapon correspond with the suspect's.

この実験で彼の学説はいっそう強固なものになった。The experiment confirmed his theory.







マーテイン・ルーサー・キング・ジュニアは暗殺者の凶弾で命を落としたのである。Martin Luther King, Jr., a man of peace, was killed by an assassin's bullet.

私たちはその店を共同で経営している。We run the store jointly.私は妹と共同で部屋を使っている。I share the room with my sister.


この本は興味津々たるものがあって飽きない。This book is so absorbing that I can't put it down.

かつては恐竜が地球を支配していた。Dinosaurs used to rule the earth.
ご協力に感謝します。I appreciate your cooperation.

たくさんの星が空にきらめいている。Many stars are twinkling in the sky.



でも、私には何も残ってない、ただの古い切り株です。But I have nothing left. I am just an old stump.
マユコは指に切り傷を作った。Mayuko got a cut on her finger.
もう少しやさしく意見してあげたらどうなの。一刀両断のもと切り捨てられた彼の立場も考えてよ。Why don't you try expressing your opinion a little more gently? Think about how he feels getting told flatly that he's being cut loose.
彼は自分の母親にナイフで切り付け殺人未遂で有罪になった。He was found guilty of attempted murder for attacking his mother with a knife.


箱の中には新聞や雑誌の切り抜きがあった。Inside the box were cuttings from newspapers and magazines.
あの会社の社長は切り札を隠し持っています。The president of that company has an ace up her sleeve.


この芋虫がきれいな蝶になるのだ。This caterpillar will become a beautiful butterfly.この辺りは空気がきれいだよ。The air is pure around here.


金の切れ目が縁の切れ目。The end of money is the end of love.


下品極まる盛り場に通いつける。He haunts the lowest resorts.
多くの運動選手は青年時代に盛りを極める。Most athletes are at their best during their early manhood.
私のことには少しも気を使ってくれません。He doesn't care a bit about me.
静かにするように気をつけなさい。See to it that you keep quiet.








彼はなんでもぎょうぎょうしく考える人だ。He makes mountains out of molehills.


お腹を空かせたその男は、食物をむさぼり食った。The starving man devoured the food.この事業は金を食う。This job eats money.主人に大目玉を食った。The boss bawled me out.
彼女はここから数区画離れた所に住んでいる。She lives a few blocks away from here.

グラウンドは白線で３つに区切られている。The playground is divided into three areas by white lines.




くすぶっていた薪が突然燃え上がった。The smoldering firewood burst into flame.

その不当な扱いを口々に訴えた。Everyone complained about the unfair treatment.



とうとう彼らは敵に屈伏した。Finally they gave in to their enemy.
その王がその国を治めていた。The king governed the country.『北の国から』は、北海道富良野市を舞台にしたフジテレビジョン制作のテレビドラマ。"From the North Country" is a TV drama produced by Fuji TV and set in Furano in Hokkaido.その科学者は国の内外で有名である。The scientist is famous both at home and abroad.
我々の国はいくつかの国々と境を接している。Our country borders on several countries.
その首と頭部はとてもやわらかかった。Its neck and head were very soft.鳥は首をひょいと水に浸した。The bird dipped its head into the water.あなたの首は風前のともし火だ。Your job hangs by a thread.
その部屋をすみずみまできれいにしましょう。I'll give the room a good cleaning.
一国にとって金融政策と財政政策の適切な組み合わせが大切である。It is important for a nation to have an adequate mix of monetary and fiscal policies.

この本棚は組み立てが簡単です。This bookcase is easy to assemble.


昨日、東京は曇りでしたか。Was it cloudy in Tokyo yesterday?
監督はチームをトーナメント優勝に今一歩という所までもっていったのに悔しいことだった。It was annoying, as the manager took his team to a near-miss in the tournament.




毒を食らわば皿まで。As well be hanged for a sheep as a lamb.昔は、悪いことをすると、学校の先生から平手をくらったり拳固をもらうことが当たり前だった。In the past it was perfectly normal to get the back of a teacher's hand or fist as punishment.銀行強盗すると懲役１０年食らうぞ。Bank robbery will cost you ten years in prison.
今日はクラゲがいるから気をつけて。There are jellyfish out there today, so watch out.
ページの下の合計額は繰り越しになっている。The total at the bottom of the page is carried forward.



島は月光の中に黒々と見えた。The island showed black in the moonlight.


時計の具合が悪い。Something is the matter with my watch.彼はこの数年間ずっと身体の具合が良くない。He has not been in good health for some years.
群衆が現場に群がった。A crowd gathered at the scene.
群集は嬉しさのあまり歓声を上げた。The crowd yelled with delight.


蛍光灯がチカチカしてるな。新しいのと交換しないとダメかな。This fluorescent lamp is starting to flicker. We'll have to replace it.ハリーは本当に蛍光灯だね。Harry's really slow to catch on.
最初の電気計算器は１９世紀末に出現した。The first electric calculator came into existence toward the end of the 19th century.











計算をするとき、検算をしない。He doesn't check his figures when he's calculating.

私はこのドレスを絹糸で繕った。I sewed the dress with silk thread.
堅実な草の根レベルの運動を築きあげることに集中しなければならない。We must focus on building a solid grass-roots movement.



肩に激痛を感じた。I felt a severe pain in the shoulder.
激務で彼はすっかり参った。The hard work has run him down.
激論の後、喫煙者に喫煙コーナーでの喫煙を許す妥協案が生まれた。The compromise which permits a smoker to smoke in the smoking corner was born after heated discussion.



我々は原価を最小限に下げないといけない。We have to reduce the cost to a minimum.彼らは同じ製品をはるかにやすい原価で製造できる。They can produce the same goods at a far lower cost.
元素記号Ｈは水素をあらわす。The chemical symbol H indicates hydrogen.


我々はかつて、恋敵だった。We had been rival lovers at one time.
彼女、小粋な服装してるよね。Her dress has an understated charm.

子供の頃、小犬を飼っていた。I had a puppy when I was a boy.

お腹をすかせている人がいればその人達のために食べ物を乞うた。When she saw that the people were hungry, she begged for food for them.
私達は幸運に小躍りして喜んだ。We exulted at our good fortune.

あの交差点で何が起こったのか。What happened at that crossing?
毎朝、雌牛は仔牛に乳をやる。Cows give their calves milk every morning.
我々は交替で車を運転した。We took turns driving the car.





小売商人は卸しで仕入れて小売りで売る。A retail merchant buys wholesale and sells retail.

地球人の一人として、私は文化の壁を越える方法を知っています。As a citizen of the world, I know ways of overcoming cultural barriers.６５歳を超えるアメリカ人は全人口の１２．５％を構成している。Americans who are over sixty-five make up 12.5% of the total population.
彼女は通り過ぎるときに必ず声をかけた。She didn't pass me without speaking to me.
私達は幸運に小躍りして喜んだ。We exulted at our good fortune.
道が凍っているから気を付けなさい。The road is icy, so take care.







そのクラスの個々のメンバーは数学のあまり得意でない生徒によって足を引っ張られたくないと思っているのです。Those individual members of the class do not want to be held back by others not so good at math.



彼は競争相手を落とし入れようと虎視眈々としている。He watches for an opportunity to intrigue against his rival.
彼はやたらに故事来歴に詳しいけれど、それが人生の役に立っているのかはなはだ疑問だね。He has a great storehouse of knowledge about historical details but I seriously doubt that's of any use in life.

小鳥が木立の中で囀っている。Birds are singing in the trees.


この小包を船便で送ってください。Please send this parcel by surface mail.


お父さんからことづけがあります。I have a message for you from your father.

ジムは万事が事なかれ主義だ。Jim always avoids trouble at all costs.
ピーターは子供じみた娘達にほとほとうんざりした。Peter was fed up with childish girls.
花びんは粉々になった。The vase broke into fragments.

彼女は子猫をジャガーと名付けた。She called the kitten "Jaguar".
子羊は狼に殺された。The lamb was killed by the wolf.

今晩は列車がとても込んでいる。The train is very crowded this evening.

彼は、よく書斎にこもって、こういうものを書きます。He often shuts himself up in the study and writes things like this.彼は私に愛情のこもった手紙をくれた。He sent me an affectionate letter.


乳房にしこりがあります。I have a lump in my breast.
そろそろ衣替えしなくちゃ。I need to start changing my outfit for the new season.

彼は君がヘビが恐いのかしらと思っている。He wonders if you are afraid of snakes.

外では冷たい北風が轟々と吹き荒れていた。The cold north wind was roaring outside.
彼はああ強情だとは思わなかった。I never thought he was all that stubborn.
彼女は昔、豪勢な生活をしたものだ。She used to live in luxury.




ご存知だとは思いますが、クオーターしかつかえませんよ。This only takes quarters, you know.

手伝ってくれたお礼に、お昼をごちそうしたいのですが。I'd like to treat you to lunch to thank you for all your help.叔母さんを訪ねた時はすごいごちそうだったね。What a feast we had when we visited my aunt!
ボブは本当にごますりだ。Bob is really a brown noser.

肥大化、過度の商業化などの問題も抱えて、五輪は新世紀に向かう。Despite the problems of excessive commercialization, etc. the Olympics will go forward into the new century.
あんなやつを負かすのはお茶の子さいさいだ。I can beat him hands down.


その絵は逆さまにかかっている。The picture is hung upside down.
警察は一日中、迷子になった子を四方八方捜し回っていた。The policemen beat the bushes all day to find a lost child.
私は寝る場所を探した。I looked for a place in which to sleep.警察は行方不明の少年を捜した。The police searched for the lost boy.鍵を求めて机の中を捜した。I searched the drawer for the key.
クロッカスは春の先駆けである。The crocus is a forerunner of spring.

その土地は今年は作付けしていない。The land is out of crop this year.
満開をチョイ過ぎた感はありましたが、それでも、美しい桜を満喫してきました。They seem a little past their peak, but even so we enjoyed the beautiful cherry blossoms.



この本には美しい挿絵が入っている。This book is beautifully illustrated.
彼らは差出人と受取人の名前を混同した。They confused the names of the sender and the addressee.

その家は理想的とはいえないが、まぁさしつかえはない。The house is not ideal, but it's all right.

サハラは広大な砂漠です。The Sahara is a vast desert.

この車は錆に強い。This car is resistant to rust.
庭には様々な花が咲き乱れていた。The garden was a riot of color.



彼女は全部の賞をさらって行った。She carried off all the prizes.
あの二人、元に戻すつもりなんて更々ないみたいだし・・・。It seems they don't have the slightest intention of restoring it.

あまり長い時間肌を太陽にさらしてはいけない。Don't expose your skin to the sun for too long.





客は三々五々到着した。Guests arrived by twos and threes.
彼女はさんざん私の事をののしった。She called me many terrible things.

彼は三段跳びできっと新記録を樹立するだろう。He is sure to set a new record in the triple jump.

また、「安楽いすに座りながらの買い物」には、雑踏や交通から来るフラストレーションが伴わない。Also, "armchair shopping" gets rid of the frustrations of crowds and traffic.

仕上げの筆を少し加える。I add a few finishing touches.

金持ちが幸せとは限らない。The rich are not always happy.

塩漬けキャベツを細かく切る。Chop the pickled cabbage finely.

この仕掛けはスイッチで動く。This device is actuated by a switch.
あなたはチェスの仕方を知っていますか。Do you know how to play chess?
彼はしかたなくその仕事を引き受けた。He took the job reluctantly.



私はそのしきたりをよく知っている。I am acquainted with the custom.

経済学は経済の仕組みを研究する学問である。Economics is the study of economic mechanisms.
光が刺激となって花が咲く。Light is the stimulus that causes a flower to open.昇進がより一層働く刺激となった。Promotion was an incentive to harder work.金利が低下したことが自動車の市場を刺激した。Falling interest rates have stimulated the automobile market.


刺激的な町だよ、ニューヨークは。It is an exciting city, New York.
酔いとは脳がある刺激物に冒されることである。Intoxication is what happens when the brain is affected by certain stimulants.



シンと静まった部室。響くのは、クロッキー帳に擦れる鉛筆の音だけ。The club room returned to quiet. All that could be heard was the sound of pencil on sketchpad.海をじっと眺めていると私は気が静まる感じがする。When I contemplate the sea, I feel calm.
心を静めるために私は目を閉じた。I closed my eyes to calm down.暴動はすぐに鎮められた。The rebellion was soon put down.


急いては事を仕損じるよ。もう少々慎重に。Be more careful. Rushing through things is going to ruin your work.







君にはもっとしっかり仕事をしてもらいたい。I want you to work harder.
その失策には弁解の余地がない。This fault admits of no excuse.
彼女は失神しそうに見えました。It seemed as if she was going to faint.
あの事件は大統領の失態であった。That incident was a black mark against the president.

彼が次に何をしでかすかわからない。There is no knowing what he will do next.


彼は借金の支払いを要求した。He demanded payment of the debt.

私は、しぶしぶ彼の言うことを聞いてやった。I listened to him reluctantly.

はい。ここに私たちが牛のミルクをしぼった牧場の写真がありますよ。Yes, and here's a photo of the farm where we milked the cows.

その島々にはどんな動物が住んでいるのですか。What animals inhabit those islands?



彼女は私のお供をするように仕向けられた。She was tempted to come with me.
レポートの締め切りが間近に迫っているので、私はひどく忙しい。I am terribly busy because the report deadline is near.
ラスト・オーダーは締め切らせていただきました。Last call!
彼はクラブから締め出しを食っている。He has been barred from the club.


私は彼の態度が癪に障った。I was annoyed at his behavior.




阪神三日天下。あっと言う間に首位から転落しちゃったよ。Hanshin's moment of glory didn't last. They fell out of first place in a hurry.


情報を収集しなければならない。We have to gather information.私の趣味は外国切手を収集することです。My hobby is collecting foreign stamps.私たちのゴミは週３回収集されます。Our garbage is collected three times a week.

彼は弁護士になれるという希望に執着していた。He clung to the hope that he could be a lawyer.
英語を習得するのは容易ではない。It is not easy to master English.









出処進退の潔さをわきまえている、と彼は言っているけれど、いざとなったらどうだかね。He always talks as though he knows how to handle himself but you never know how he'll act when the chips are down.
あの出版社は黒字だ。That publishing company is in the black.




この本は賞賛に値する。This book is worthy of praise.
ぼくは少々君に腹が立っているんだ。I'm a little angry with you.






ある少女の職業は娼婦だったが、彼女は自分のおばあちゃんにこのことを知られたくなかった。A certain girl was a prostitute but didn't want her grandma to know.

同社は醤油その他の食品を生産する。The company produces soy sauce and other food products.
この水は少量のアルコールを含んでいる。This water contains a little alcohol.

暑中見舞いをみんなに書いた。I wrote to everybody inquiring after their health in the hot season.

どこで彼女と知り合いになったのか。Where did you get to know her?
そこにいると邪魔なんだよね。どいてよ。Move! You're in my way.
おじは去年教職を退いたが、それでも何とか大学での地位にしがみつこうとした。My uncle retired from teaching last year, but he still managed to hang onto a position at the university.
彼女は蛇を見て退いた。She drew back when she saw a snake.彼は役職から退いた。He retired from office.
金より銀の指輪の方が好きです。I prefer silver rings to gold ones.


シャーペンの芯２・３本もらえるかな。Could you lend me a few mechanical pencil leads?私は体の芯まで冷え切った。I was frozen to the bone.








ヒトラーは１９３９年にポーランドを侵略した。Hitler invaded Poland in 1939.
行ってじきじきに彼女に礼を言いなさい。You had better go and thank her in person.


事態はかなり切迫している。The matter is really pressing.

実情がどうなっているかはっきり言いましょう。I will tell you exactly how the matter stands.
私はいつも辞典を３冊手元に置いています。I always keep three dictionaries at hand.


政府は、若年層の要求と、老人の要求との釣り合いをとるのに大いに苦労することになるだろう。The government will have much trouble balancing the needs of its younger population with the requirements of the old people.


すべてのものは、お金に従順だ。All things are obedient to money.
その患者は重態だ。The patient is in critical condition.
私はコーヒーをじゅうたんにこぼしてしまった。I spilled my coffee on the carpet.
そのロッカーは十代の若者アイドルだ。The rock star is an idol of the teenagers.






あなたのことだから上々でしょう。I hope and I know you did great!


単語は徐々に増えますので、こまめにチェックしてください。The words covered are steadily increasing, so check frequently.

それは人知の範囲を超えている。It is beyond the boundary of human knowledge.
もう・・・タバコの吸殻まで散らばってるし。Sheesh, you've even got cigarette butts scattered around.

この吸い取り紙はインクをよく吸い取る。This blotting paper absorbs ink well.
あのフランス人は日本にきてわずか数ヶ月です。It is only a few months since that Frenchman came to Japan.

今日はすがすがしいお天気ですね。It's a nice day, isn't it?
音楽の好みは人によって好きずきです。Music preferences vary from person to person.

私は少なからずがっかりした。I was not a little disappointed.
私は、少なくとも１０冊の本を持っている。I have at least ten books.


国内市場の競争はすさまじいものです。Competition in the domestic market is cutthroat.
かなり多くのアメリカ人が寿司を好む。Quite a few Americans like sushi.
移民たちは、そこへ、木の漁船にすし詰め状態で、危険な航海をするのである。Packed into wooden fishing boats like sardines, the immigrants undergo the dangerous voyage there.

私は貴方が汽車で行くことを勧めます。I recommend you to go by train.トムは彼らにその小説を薦めた。Tom recommended the novel to them.彼にウイスキーかジンをすすめたが、彼はどちらもいらないと言った。I offered him whisky or gin, but he said he didn't need either.


彼女はだんだん、捨て鉢になった。She was beginning to get desperate.

彼女は子供のために全てを犠牲にした。She gave up everything for her children.人間は全て平等である。All men are equal.あなたの計画をすべて話してください。Tell me all about your plan.
アリスは長い滑り台を滑り降りた。Alice slid down the long slide.
ところで、お住まいはどちらですか。By the way, where do you live?



彼の周りのものは全て粉々に吹き飛ばされたが、彼はすり傷１つ負わずに逃げた。Everything around him was blown to pieces, yet he escaped without a scratch.

この擦り切れたカーペットを取り除かねばならないでしょう。I will have to get rid of this worn-out carpet.

お前の鼻をクソに擦りつけてやった。I sure rubbed your nose in shit.




ケリーはマッチを擦ってパイプへもっていった。Kelly struck a match and put it to his pipe.ありがね全部すってしまった。We shot our wad.
通りですれ違った時私をわざと無視した。He deliberately ignored me when I passed him in the street.

よくずうずうしくそんな事が言えるね。How dare you say such a thing!
「ああ・・・ちょっと、体調が優れなくて」「そうなんだ。大丈夫か？」「うふふ。実はズル休みなんです」"Ah ... I'm just not feeling so well" "Really? Are you OK?" "Heh-heh. Actually I'm playing hooky."

オレ自身を制御する力を失い始める。I begin to lose control of myself.

ずっと正座してたからか、足がしびれちゃって。I've sat on my heels for so long my legs have fallen asleep.

彼がいなくなってせいせいした。It's nice to be rid of him!
ウィルソンさんは彼が正々堂々とやってくれることを望む。Mr Wilson likes him to play square.
桜の花は数日、せいぜい一週間しか持たない。Cherry blossoms last only for a few days, a week at the most.狭い部屋をせいぜい広く使った。I made the best of my small room.
その地震の生存者は２名だけだった。Only two people survived the earthquake.
川の水をせき止めるために堤防が建設された。A bank was built to keep back the water of the river.
あなたは赤裸々な現実を直視すべきだ。You ought to face the stark reality.

せっかくの苦労もあだになった。All my pains went for nothing.お前が大声出すから、せっかくのシャッターチャンスを逃しちゃったよ。You just made me miss the perfect shot when you hollered.こういう事情ですから、残念ながら、せっかくのご招待をお受けいたしかねるのです。As such is the case, I am sorry I can't accept your kind invitation.





浅学非才の私ではありますが、何とぞ皆様のお力を賜りたく、ここにお願い申し上げる次第です。I may not have much to offer in the way of learning or ability, but I want to do whatever I can for us all and humbly ask for your favor.

真の友情は千金にも代え難い。True friendship is priceless.



さあ出発しよう。君先頭を行きなさい。Let's start now, and you go first.
遠くに教会の尖塔が見えた。A church spire could be seen in the distance.

ドアにいちばん近い駐車場所は重役専用です。The parking spaces nearest the door are reserved for executives.そう、専用浴室付きのシングルにしてください。Yes, I'd like a single room with a private bath, please.
この額は税込みです。This amount includes tax.
今までは「なーなー」で付き合ってきたけれど、今後は是々非々の立場で付き合うよ。Up to now we've been taking a casual relaxed attitude toward our relationship but I want to start looking at us more critically.
この学校には、全国津々浦々から秀才達が集まっている。Talented students come from far and wide to attend this school.





この風は嵐の前兆だ。This wind is a sign of a storm.

総売上高の点から見て、あの会社はとてもうまくいっている。That company is doing very well in terms of total sales.

それは相互理解の欠如がもとになっていると思う。I think that is based on a lack of mutual understanding.
このプロダクトはインテリジェント総合情報システムです。This product is an intelligent integrated information system.
この掃除機は非常にうるさい音がする。This vacuum cleaner makes a lot of noise.


私は角を曲がって、開店早々の食堂を見つけた。I turned the corner and caught sight of a newly opened restaurant.
彼はひ孫を見るまで生きた。He lived to see great-grandchildren.
私は子供達の騒々しさは我慢できない。I cannot tolerate noisy children.


偉人が必ずしも聡明であるとは限らない。Great people are not always wise.

彼は花にきれいなカードを添えて彼女に送った。He sent her some flowers, along with a pretty card.

彼はその手紙に返事を出し損なった。He failed to answer the letter.
ＰＫされたの、蘇生しました。He was PK'ed, I resurrected him.

彼女は水をそそぎ入れた。She poured in the water.
彼女はいつも僕にそっけない。She's always short with me.
企業は率先して事にあたる働き手を歓迎する。Companies welcome workers who take initiative.
あなたの率直な意見が聞きたいのです。I would like to hear your honest opinion.
彼女は血を見て卒倒した。She fainted when she saw blood.





このホテルには体育館とプールが備わっている。This hotel has a gym and a swimming pool.生きようという本能は誰にも生まれつきそなわっている。The instinct for survival is innate.
映画に行きたいような気がしない。その代わり散歩をしよう。I don't feel like going to the movies. Let's take a walk instead.
喧嘩のそば杖を食った。I got involved in other people's quarrel.
彼女の口振りはいかにもそらぞらしい。She talks too aloofly.

その兄弟はそれぞれ車を所有している。Each of the brothers has a car.



劇場から続々と人が出てきた。A stream of people came out of the theater.

カクテルパーティーは退屈なときもある。Cocktail parties can be boring.
アメリカの対日貿易赤字は解決の見通しがありません。There is no end in sight to the U.S. trade deficit with Japan.


台風が勢いを増した。The typhoon gathered strength.

彼等は多くの苦難をたえしのんだ。They endured many difficulties.
彼はトロフィーを高々と差し上げた。He held the trophy up high.

ご飯の上手なたき方を知っていますか。Do you know how to cook rice well?
とても寒かったので火をたいた。It was so cold that we made a fire.

干し草を納屋に蓄えた。We stored the hay in the barn.
こういった類の宝石はほとんど価値がない。These kinds of jewelry are of little value.



食べられることなくそのたこは、海に帰ったのであった。That octopus returned to the sea without being eaten.

彼が間違っているのは確かです。It is certain that he is wrong.私はそのニュースを確かな筋から得た。I got the news from a reliable source.これは確か淡水魚だと思います。I believe this fish is a freshwater fish.
口と心は裏腹なことが多々ある。What we say and what we mean are often quite different.
戦いは人間の獣性をよびおこす。War arouses the animal in man.彼の勇敢な戦いの物語は我々を深く感動させた。The story of his brave struggle affected us deeply.
おまえも決して戦う拳を忘れるな。Never lose your fighting fists.


母はただただ泣くだけだった。My mother did nothing but weep.
あいつはただ者ではない。He is no ordinary man.
この建物は、現在立ち入り禁止だ。This building is off limits now.


次々に立って出ていった。One after another they stood up and went out.しかし、あなたがたのなかに、あなたがたが知らない方が立っておられます。But among you stands one you do not know.断崖のてっぺんに古い城が立っている。An old castle stands on top of the cliff.
その２軒の家は背中向かいにたっている。The two houses stand back to back.

村に竜巻が起こった。There was a tornado in the village.
今ちょっと立て込んでいるので、後にしてもらえませんか。I'm tied up now. Could you make it later?
しかし王女は部屋に立てこもって出てこなかった。However, the princess had barricaded herself in her room and wouldn't come out.


少数民族の雇用促進政策とはいっても、建前にすぎず、現状はマイノリティーが職に就けるチャンスなどほとんどない。Although many pay lip service to the idea of affirmative action, in reality, very few minorities get hired.
「陸に上がった河童」とは環境が変わったために能力を発揮できずにいることのたとえです。"A fish out of water" is a metaphor for being unable to use your talents due to a change of environment.
たとえ両親が反対しても私は留学したい。I want to study abroad, even if my parents are against it.たとえ雨が降っても、その試合は行われるだろう。The game will be played even if it rains.
その詩人は死を眠りにたとえた。The poet compared death to sleep.
小さな鳥が楽しげにさえずっている。Little birds are singing merrily.

私はたびたび彼から手紙をもらう。I often get a letter from him.

通りを歩いていたとき、私はたまたま旧友に出会った。Walking along the street, I happened to meet my old friend.
「溜息なんてついてた？」「不幸せなオーラ出しながらね」"Did I really sigh?" "While giving out an aura of unhappiness."
あまり人に頼ってはいけない。Don't rely too much on others.



この探検には、お金がかかる。This expedition will be expensive.
あの支部は炭鉱労働組合に属している。That branch is affiliated to the miners' union.
彼は他人の苦しみに対して淡淡だ。He is indifferent to the suffering of others.




彼女を胸に抱き寄せて、額に口付けをした。I clutched her to my chest, and kissed her on her forehead.

ダチョウは空を飛べない。Ostriches are incapable of flight.
だんだん暖かくなります。It will get warmer and warmer.

職業柄彼は数人の外国人と近づきになっている。His job has brought him in contact with some foreigners.
学校への近道だよ。It's a shortcut to the school.

彼はそれを力ずくで彼女から奪った。He took it from her by force.


その国民の社会生活に関する限りでは、進歩は実に遅々たるものである。Progress has been very slow indeed, so far as the social life of the people is concerned.



私たちは午後９時シカゴ着の予定だった。We were arriving in Chicago at 9:00 p.m.私はズボンを２着買った。I bought two pairs of trousers.彼はレースで１着だった。He took the first place in the race.
仕事は着々と進んでいる。The work is progressing steadily.




彼は茶碗を床にたたきつけた。He dashed the cup on the floor.








私たちはそれらの徴候を常に意識している。We are always conscious of the signs.

あなたは美しい蝶々です。You are a beautiful butterfly.





まさかのときに備えて貯蓄せよ。Keep something for a rainy day.

その穴は直径二メートルです。The hole is two meters across.
悪運続きという目にあったので、私の財産は、たちどころに、ついえさってしまった。Having hit a streak of bad luck, my fortune had gone to pot in no time.
ついたてで部屋が２つに分かれている。A screen divided the room into two.
使い捨てスポイトはどうか。How about using disposable droppers?

MPEG-4 AVC録画の実力テスト：使いやすさはもとより、画質・音質の実力も高い。MPEG-4 AVC recording practical test: It was always easy to use, now the picture and sound quality is high too.
警察が容疑者を捕まえた。The policeman got the suspect.その男は少年の手をつかまえた。The man took the boy by the hand.ここでタクシーをつかまえられますか。Can I catch a taxi here?
佐知子さんと付き合っているの？Are you going out with Sachiko?一杯付き合いませんか。Would you join me in a drink?
二人は手を取り合って月明かりの中を歩いた。The couple walked holding hands in the moonlight.

彼女は結婚式で花嫁の付き添い役をつとめた。She was a bridesmaid at the wedding.
月々給料の一部を貯金しておけば損はないよ。It will pay you to save a part of your salary each month.

彼らは次々と出発した。They started one after another.
次々に立って出ていった。One after another they stood up and went out.
彼の話は作りごとだったとわかった。What he had said proved to be a myth.

どこへ行っても、彼は必ず友達を作る。Wherever he may go, he is sure to make friends.たまごを割らずにオムレツは作れない。You can't make an omelet without breaking eggs.あなたの菜園で作れる穀物や野菜を食べて生活する方がずっと安上がりだ。It's much cheaper to live on grains and vegetables you can grow in your garden.











時が時だからことばを慎みなさい。As the situation is delicate, you should be careful of what you say.でしゃばるのは慎んでください。Please refrain from pushing forward.


お名前の綴りを教えてください。How do you spell your name?

ああ、僕も実に分かりやすいなあって、常々思っているんだよ。Yeah, I've always thought it's as plain as the nose on your face.


息を止めて鼻をつまみなさい。Hold your breath and pinch your nostrils.

政府は、若年層の要求と、老人の要求との釣り合いをとるのに大いに苦労することになるだろう。The government will have much trouble balancing the needs of its younger population with the requirements of the old people.
彼は釣り糸を湖に投げた。He cast his line into the lake.

ランプが木の枝から吊り下げられた。The lamp was suspended from the branch of a tree.

つり銭のいらないようにお願いします。Exact change, please.

つり橋は５マイル上流にある。The suspension bridge is miles above.
彼は釣り針に生き餌をつけた。He put live bait on a hook.


どうして私をつれていってくれないの。How come you aren't taking me?
会社は通常の月給の他に諸手当で毎月１０万円払ってくれる。The company pays me 100,000 yen in various allowances a month in addition to the regular salary.彼は痛む腕を手当してもらった。He had his sore arm dressed.
しかし定形外ということで、全く保証が効かなかった。However, the guarantee is not effective at all outside the fixed form.



検査に手落ちがあったのではないだろうか。I suspect that there was an oversight in the examination.
その殺人者の正体は手掛かりがまったくなかった。There was no clue as to the identity of the murderer.ここの下りも手掛かりがないので危険だ。The downclimb here is also dangerous as there are no handholds.
ねじ、てこ、くさび、滑車などは単一機械と呼ばれる。The screw, the lever, the wedge, the pulley, etc. are called simple machines.
彼は手すりに寄りかかっていました。He was leaning against the rail.
腰を下ろし、手帳を開きました。I sat down and opened my notebook.
大学出たての新人は資料を作ったり、コピーをとったりと裏方仕事に徹するのだろうと、勝手に想像していたのですが見事に裏切られました。I had imagined that the newbies fresh from university would probably be stuck with all the backstage work - collecting reference material, getting copies and such but I couldn't have been proved more wrong.夜を徹するか否か。Should I stay up all night or not?
搭乗手続きをするのはどこですか。Where is the check-in counter?
それは全て手作りのものだった。All of them were handmade things.









池に落ち葉が点々と浮かんでいた。The pond was dotted with fallen leaves.


あなたの支払から１０％を税として天引きします。A 10% tax will be withheld from the payment to you.



きのう旧友の一人に出会った。I saw an old friend of mine yesterday.
乗務員がただいま出入り口を開けております。The crew is now opening the hatch.
１０分前に出かけました。She left home ten minutes ago.
アジア諸国などから出稼ぎにきた外国人をメイドとして使うのが常識のようになっている。It has become common practise to employ foreigners working abroad from Asian countries as maids.
大会９日目、ベスト８が出揃った。The top eight players survived the ninth day of the tournament.

ご兄弟のことはカンザス州から問い合わせを受けたばかりです。We have just received an inquiry from Kansas concerning your brother.


愛より尊い物はない。Nothing is as precious as love.
イギリス人は自由を尊ぶ国民である。The English set a high value on freedom.

岩の上で髪をとかしながら、彼女は快い歌を歌った。Sitting on the rock, she sang a sweet song as she combed her hair.
私は時おり学校で彼に会う。I meet him at school now and then.
ジェーンはときどき学校まで走っていく。Jane sometimes runs to school.
交通の流れにはとぎれがなかった。There was no gap in the stream of traffic.
彼女はいつも人に対してやいばをといでいます。She always has some axe to grind.
どのバラにもとげがあるように人生には悲しみがある。Life has its sorrows, as every rose has its thorns.この指に刺がささって取れません。I can't get this splinter out of my finger.彼の言葉にはとげがあった。There was a bite in his remark.
そんなトゲトゲしい言い方しなくたっていいだろう。You don't have to use such a harsh tone with me.彼女の声はとげとげしかった。Her voice was sour.
その本は所々非常にすばらしい。Parts of the book are quite good.

目が見えない看護婦は年寄りの世話をすることに一身を捧げた。The blind nurse devoted herself to caring for the elderly.


私は戸に新しい取っ手を付けた。I put a new handle to the door.

あなたの出発の準備がすべて整うよう取り計らいます。I will see to it that everything is ready for your departure.
盗難の届をだしたいのですけど。I would like to report a theft.
我々はあらゆる学校を運営させ続け、あらゆる教師を職にとどめておくべきです。We should keep every school open and every teacher in his job.彼の勇気は歴史に名をとどめた。His courage went down in history.
うちと彼の家は隣り合っている。Our house adjoins his.
彼は「飛び石」連休を利用して郷里を訪れた。He availed himself of the 'off-and-on' holidays to visit his native country.

３人の男が飛び降り、古い芝刈り機をトラックと地面にかけた板で降ろした。Three men jumped out and rolled the old mower down the ramp from the truck to the ground.
マイクは君の妹のこと、とびきりいかしてるって思ってるんだ。Mike really thought your sister was something else.

少年は水の中に飛び込んだ。The boy jumped into the water.


彼女はネックレスの留め金を留めた。She fastened the clasp of her necklace.
私は彼ともどもその企業に参加した。I share with him in the enterprise.

ついに反逆者は捕らえられ、拘置所に入れられた。The rebel was ultimately captured and confined to jail.なんであれ物事の本体を捕らえる事が肝心だ。No matter what the problem is, it's essential to get at the heart of the matter.
年をとるほど、ますます固定観念にとらわれるものです。The older you grow, the more you tend to adhere to fixed ideas.
とりあえずこれをやってしまおう。Let's do this first of all.
先生は彼女に正当な取り扱いをしなかった。The teacher didn't do her justice.
冷蔵庫を修理するなら取り扱い説明書を参照しなさい。Refer to the instruction manual if you need to fix the refrigerator.
ティーカップの入っている小包には取り扱い注意とかくべきです。You should write HANDLE WITH CARE on the parcel that contains the teacups.

１５年間は満足しうる取り決めであった。It was a satisfactory arrangement for fifteen years.
社長が社員の主体的な取り組みを促した。The president urged employees to act on their initiative.


警察は違法駐車の取り締まりを始めた。The police began a crackdown on illegal parking.



先生が二人の学生の口論を取り成した。The teacher intervened in the quarrel between the two students.
ぜひ取引させていただきたいと思います。We would love to work with you.
営業員をこの新しい取引先に派遣してください。Please send your sales reps to this new account.

とりわけ子供たちは愛情を必要とする。Above all, children need love.
このカップに尿をとってください。Please leave a urine sample in this cup.



ナチズムはドイツ独特のものでしたか。Was Nazism peculiar to Germany?
動悸が激しくなることがよくあります。I often experience palpitations of the heart.



警察はそのグループの動静を常に監視する。The police is always watching the movements of the group.
その老人は堂々とした顔つきをしていた。The old man had a noble countenance.彼はその式典で堂々と振る舞った。He bore himself well at the ceremony.

戦争の直前、日本がフランスと同盟を結びました。Japan entered into an alliance with France just before the war.

彼女は毒々しい化粧をしている。She wears heavy makeup.



そこの乞食が泥棒である事がわかった。The beggar turned out to be a thief.
彼の名誉は貪欲によってむしばまれた。His honor was corroded by greed.


内紛が党の分裂したもとです。Strife is the rock on which the party split.
いまそれを直そうったって無駄だ。It's no use trying to fix it now.あなたの時計は明日までには直しておきますよ。I will have repaired your watch by tomorrow.その本をなおしなさい。Put the book back where you found it.
２週間もすれば自然に治ります。It will go away by itself in two weeks.

あいつは、なかなかいい奴だぜ！He is a good joker.いまどき良い仕事はなかなか得がたいのを忘れないでね。Don't forget that good jobs are very hard to come by these days.
財布の中身をこの袋に空けなさい。Empty the purse into this bag.
先生は時間を守ることの大切さについて長々と述べた。Our teacher dwelt on the importance of punctuality.ジョンは長いすに長々と寝そべっていた。John stretched out on the couch.
長らくお待たせして申し訳ありません。I'm sorry to have kept you waiting so long.


ってゆーか、こうやってぐじぐじ考えるのが情けないんじゃないのか？Or rather, is it not just pathetic that I think such whiny thoughts like this?

「もしおまえが私のなぞなぞ答えられたら、私はおまえを無事に通してやる」とスフィンクスは言った。"I will let you pass safely," the Sphinx said, "if you can answer my riddle."
興奮した観客はコンサートホールになだれこんだ。The excited audience ran into the concert hall.
トムは夏祭りに参加した。Tom took part in the summer festival.




何気なく言った言葉も誰かを傷つけることがある。A casual remark can hurt someone.

何もかも彼の有罪をしめしている。Everything points to his guilt.
その出来事は今でも私の記憶に生々しく残っている。The event still remains vivid in my memory.
これは並の能力ではない。This isn't any ordinary ability.世間一般のホテルなみにいえば良い昼食会だった。It was a good luncheon, as hotels go.

我々は背の高いポプラ並木を歩いた。We walked along an avenue of tall poplars.


彼は並外れて優秀とは言わないでも優れている。He is good, not to say exceptional.
彼は父親の例にならっていった。He followed in his father's footsteps.
この学校の成り立ちをお話しましょう。Let me tell you about the origin of this school.
あなたは成り行きを見てさえいればよい。All you have to do is wait and see.

お預けになるお荷物は何個ですか。How many bags do you want to check?
私はなんとなく彼の家を見つけた。Somehow or other I found his house.


あの花はにおいが強いな。That flower has a powerful smell.

この辺臭うんだけど。Something stinks here.


私はそれをとても苦々しく思う。I'm very bitter about that.
彼はその紙を握りつぶして丸めた。He crushed the sheet of paper up into a ball.




そんな物を売っても二束三文にしかならない。That would bring only a small price.
若い娘には慎みが似つかわしい。Modesty is befitting to a young girl.

この梱包材が断熱機能を担っている。This packaging material provides heat insulation.

にわか仕込みの知識ではその問題は解けなかった。Hastily acquired knowledge was not enough to solve the problem.
ところによりにわか雨が降る。There are isolated rain showers.
にんにくは強いにおいを放つ。Garlic gives off a strong odor.

この間違いを修正するためにこの縫い目をほどかなくてはならない。In order to fix this mistake we'll have to tear out this seam.

新しい税法は抜け穴だらけです。The new tax law is full of loopholes.
奈落の底には抜け道はなく。I feel there is just no way out.
ドレスが塗りたてのペンキがついてるよ。Your dress is touching the wet paint.

今週ハンバーガーが値上がりした。Hamburgers have gone up this week.
１９９９年４月１日より地下鉄運賃が値上げになります。Subway fares will be raised as of April 1st, 1999.

「あなたの願い事は本当にそれなの？」と小さい白いウサギが聞きました。"Do you really wish that?" asked the little white rabbit.
そんな猫なで声で話したってだまされないよ。You can't fool me with your honeyed words.
ネコババ職員はいつかはバレて職を失う。Clerks with sticky fingers won't keep their jobs for long.
兄は芝生に寝ころんで何時間も怠けて過ごしたものだった。My brother used to idle away many hours lying on the grass.

あの店では商品を値下げして値段がつけてある。They mark down goods at that shop.




ほのかな光が俺のねじれた視界を幻影に変えてゆく。Light shines on my sigh of doubt.
このラジオの値段はいくらですか。What is the price of this radio?

あなたはオクラと納豆はどちらがよりねばねばしているかわかりますか。Do you know which of okra and natto is more gooey?
価格を値引きする店もあります。Some stores discount the price.



もちろん年輩者の中には、退職を喜ぶ人も多い。Of course, many senior citizens are happy with retirement.
おじいさんの年齢は僕の年齢の５倍だ。My grandfather is five times as old as I am.

私は一つの袋は運んできたが、もう一つのほうは後へ残してきた。I carried one bag, but the other one was left behind.論文は結論を残し、あとは仕上がっている。The thesis is finished except for the conclusion.私達は彼に少しケーキを残してあげた。We left him some cake.
車に乗せてください。Give me a lift in your car.
今日起きたら喉がいがらっぽかったです。When I got up today, my throat felt a little sore.
その男の子はあくまでも髪の毛を伸ばすことにこだわった。The boy persisted in wearing his hair long.あつかましいその子は私のひざの上に両足を伸ばした。The impudent child extended her legs across my lap.彼は手を伸ばして小さな皮表紙の本をとった。He reached out and took down a small leather bound book.
もう髪を切ってもらってもいい時ですよ。大分伸び過ぎていますよ。It's high time you had your hair cut; it's grown too long.ふふ、恵一君いつも授業終わったら、ノビするよね。Ha-ha, you always stretch when class is over don't you?





契約では３年の延べ払いということになっている。The contract provides for a deferred payment over three years.
金の延べ棒１本を盗まれた。We had a bar of gold stolen.
彼はその会社でたたき上げで最高の地位まで登りつめた。He rose through the ranks to the top position at the company where he started his career.
トムは初心者だが飲み込みが速い。Tom's a beginner, but he catches on fast.
洪水がその村を飲み込んでしまった。The flood overwhelmed the village.こつが飲み込めましたか。Got the hang of it?


何か飲み物をいただけますか。May I have something to drink?
ここはいい飲み屋のようだ。This looks like a nice watering hole.

途中で乗り換えが必要ですか。Is it necessary to change trains along the way?この電車が遅れたら、神戸での乗り換えにまにあわない。If this train is delayed, we shall miss our connection at Kobe.
東京駅で列車を乗り換えなさい。Change trains at Tokyo Station.今までは民主党に投票したものだが、これからは共和党に乗り換えるつもりだ。In the past I used to vote the Democratic ticket, but from now on I'll climb on the Republicans' bandwagon.彼女がおまえを捨てて英語学校で出逢ったアメリカ人の男性に乗り換えたことを認めてはっきり言ったらどうだい？Why don't you just call a spade a spade and admit that she dumped you for that American guy she met at the English school?

乗客の乗り心地にはあまり注意が払われていなかった。Little attention was paid to the comfort for the passengers.


空港バスの乗り場はどこですか。Where do I get an airport bus?
乗り物は子供向けである。Rides in the cars are for kids.
のるかそるかの瀬戸際まできた。The situation has come to the point where we either sink or swim.

お前は当事者じゃないから、そんなのんきなこと言ってられるんだよ。You wouldn't be so casual about it if you were directly involved.
ビルは本当に飲んべえだ。Bill really drinks like a fish.
別に制服着込んだ外宇宙の使者が、伴侶を求めて徘徊してるわけでもなかろうに。It's not as if an emissary from outer space will have slipped into uniform and be loitering around seeking a partner.
ある研究によれば、ガンによる女性の死亡数の中では肺がんが１７％を占めている。A study shows lung cancer accounts for 17% of women's cancer deaths.


夕空に映えて塔が美しく見える。The tower looks beautiful against the evening sky.
人生は儚いよ、と人は言う。People say that life is short.

優れた教育の価値は金銭でははかれない。The value of a good education cannot be measured in terms of money.
私はいろいろな機会を利用して英語の上達をはかった。I made use of every opportunity to improve my English.その会社は市場を拡大するために最近の製品の多角化を図った。The firm has recently diversified its products so as to extend its market.
彼女は窓からステッカーを引き剥がした。She tore away the stickers from the window.

その家は暴風の為に屋根を剥ぎ取られた。The house had its roof ripped off by the storm.
スポーツは友情をはぐくむものだ。Sports nurture friendships.

その２チームは激しく戦った。The two teams fought very hard.
あなたはノアの箱舟を知っていますか。Do you know Noah's ark?
彼は耳に鉛筆を挟んだ。He stuck his pencil behind his ear.ドアに指をはさみました。I caught my finger in the door.彼らはテーブルをはさんで向かい合った。They confronted each other across the table.


あなたの言う事が果たして事実なのか調べてみよう。We will check to see if what you have said is really the truth.
彼女は二十歳だと言ったが、それは嘘だった。She said she was twenty years old, which was not true.
この布は肌触りが良い。This cloth is agreeable to the touch.

彼は手八丁口八丁だ。He is as ready to talk as to work.


私は二十日までに帰るつもりです。I expect to be back by the 20th.

彼はひどい鼻風邪をひいている。He is suffering from a bad cold in the nose.
目くそ鼻くそを笑う。The pot calls the kettle black.

人の話に水を差さないでくれ。Don't throw a wet blanket over our conversation.彼は不愉快な話を２時間もした。He dwelt on an unpleasant subject for two hours.３時間議論したが、我々は話がまとまらなかった。After three hours of discussion we got nowhere.
英語の授業では、時々輪になって座り、読んでいる本について話し合いをすることもあります。In English class, sometimes we sit in a circle to talk about a book we are reading.
これで３０分もお話中です。The line has been busy for 30 minutes now.






ショービジネスというのは本当に華やかだ。Show business is really glamorous.

ボールは空中高く跳ね上がった。The ball bounced high in the air.

車がぬかるみにはまって動けなくなった。The car got stuck in the mud.彼女は今度は自分が罠にはまった。She fell into a trap in her turn.彼女は編み物にはまっている。She is absorbed in knitting.
歯磨きをしなさい。Brush your teeth.歯磨きはどこ？Where's the toothpaste?


ウサギでさえ、いじめられて片隅に追いつめられると、刃向かってくるだろう。Even a rabbit, if badgered into a corner, will fight back.
その薬が成長の過程を早めた。The medicine hastened the process of growth.我々はふだんより足を速めて歩いた。We walked more quickly than usual.



彼は「壊れ物注意」のステッカーを荷物に貼り付けた。He attached a "Fragile" label to the package.

彼ははるばる海の向こうからやって来た。He came all the way from abroad.
彼女は晴れ着を着て出かけた。She was off in her Sunday best.
価格は需要を反映する。The price reflects the demand.時間をおかないと追加・削除が反映されない。Additions and deletions are not shown immediately.
組合員たちは反旗をひるがえした。The union members were up in arms.


彼はそこで反徒の襲撃を受けた。He was attacked there by the rebels.
二つのグループが半々に同社を所有している。The two groups share equally in the company.



梅毒は性行為を通じて感染する病気です。Syphilis is an infection that can be transmitted through sexual intercourse.
こんな荒れ模様の日に外出するなんて君は馬鹿だよ。You are an idiot to go out in this weather.なんという馬鹿なことだろう。What a piece of folly!

ついに正体を暴露したな。Now you've given yourself away.

その建物は化け物みたいだ。The building is a monstrous structure.
彼はその詩から一節を抜粋した。He extracted a passage from the poem.
ベンは悪意から私の噂をばらまいた。Ben spread a rumor about me out of malice.

母は晩御飯の支度で忙しい。Mother is busy cooking the dinner.
彼が金メダルをとったという知らせをきき、私たちは万歳と叫んだ。We cried banzai at the news that he won the gold medal.女王万歳。Long live the Queen!
今頃彼は万事休すだ。It is all up with him by this time.




日照り続きでその池は干上がった。The pond dried up in hot weather.
彼らは日当たりのよい家に住んでいる。They live in a sunny house.



他人の悪事を引き合いに出して自分の悪事の言い訳をすることはできない。Two wrongs don't make a right.
引き上げてくれ。Give me a hoist.政府は近々、消費税を引き上げるつもりなのかしら。Will the government raise the consumption tax soon?彼は夕食後自室に引き上げた。He retired to his own room after supper.



その仕事を引き受けようかなと思っている。I'm wondering whether to take on that job.


彼はお金と引換に切符を受け取った。He received a ticket in return for the money.

その男はピストルを額にあて、引き金を引いた。The man put the gun against his forehead and squeezed the trigger.陪審団による有罪評決が大論争の引き金となった。The jury's guilty verdict gave rise to widespread debate.

米国連邦準備銀行は金利を引き下げました。The Federal Reserve slashed interest rates.
足し算は好きだけど引き算は嫌いだ。I like addition but not subtraction.

ウィッチヘーゼルは、乾燥させずに毛穴を引き締めます。Witch hazel tightens pores without drying skin.

きれいなタオルは引き出しにありますよ。The clean towels are in the drawer.
私は封筒を開けて手紙を引き出した。I opened the envelope and pulled out a letter.太郎は銀行から一万円引き出した。Taro drew 10,000 yen from the bank.彼はその調査から結論を引き出した。He drew his conclusions based on that survey.
新大臣は月曜日に職務の引継をした。The new minister took over the job on Monday.
この磁鉄鉱は地球の磁場に引きつけられる。The magnetite is attracted to the earth's magnetic field.そのサッカーの試合は大観衆を引き付けた。The soccer game attracted a large crowd.
引き続き努力いたします。I will continue with my efforts.
式に引き続いてパーティーがあった。The ceremony was followed by the reception.
顔がひきつります。My face twitches.ジョンの顔は引きつっていた。John's face was drawn.


従兄弟の結婚式の引き出物に鍋をもらった。We were given a pot as a gift of my cousin's wedding party.
引き止めても無駄だ。It's no use holding me back.

彼はその手紙の返事を引き延ばした。He delayed answering the letter.

その男は警察へ引き渡された。The man was handed over to the police.

お父さんがバスルームでひげを剃っている。Dad is shaving in the bathroom.
久々に聞いたこの曲。なつかしい。Hearing this song after so long really brings back the old times.
太陽の日差しに誘われて人々が外出した。The sunshine tempted people out.


ティムはまるで左利きのような書き方をする。Tim writes as if he were left-handed.
彼はテーブルをひっくり返した。He turned the table upside down.
引っ越しのとき手伝っていただけますか。Could you help me when I move?
その奴隷は必死に逃げた。The slave ran for his life.ジェフとミアは何とか離婚だけは避けようと必死になっている。Jeff and Mia are making a last ditch effort to avoid a divorce.

この生地は引っ張るとすぐ伸びる。This material stretches easily.

美貌は皮一重。Beauty is but skin deep.

火ばさみで人差し指をやけどした。I burned my forefinger on fire tongs.

彼は人並みの楽もできない。He cannot afford the common comforts of life.

彼は打ち切って、ひとまず休息しようという動議を出した。He made a motion that we stop and rest awhile.
本はひとまとめに束ねてあった。The books were tied up in a bundle.
世界を一周したいんだ。I want to travel around the world.
彼はこの広い部屋を独り占めしている。He has this large room to himself.
彼は一人旅に出かけた。He set out on a lonely journey.
一人ぼっちで暮らしたくはない。I don't want to live by myself.

この薬はひどい味がする。This medicine tastes horrible.





彼はどうやって日々の生計をたてていたのですか。How did he earn his daily bread?日記をつけることで日々の生活に対する反省の機会を得ることにもなる。Keeping a diary also gives us a chance to reflect on our daily life.私たちが一緒に暮らした楽しい日々を覚えている。I remember the happy days we spent together.
その手紙には強制的なひびきがあるし、さらに悪いことには、思いやりがない。The letter sounds forced, what is worse, insincere.

うるさいなっ！少しの頭痛くらい我慢しろ。余は魔力がすっからかんだ。それもこれも姫のせいだぞ。Shurrup! Don't make such a fuss over a little headache. I'm flat out of magical power - this is all your fault!
火事の際は１１９番に電話してください。In the case of fire, dial 119.

緊急の場合には１１０番にお電話ください。In case of an emergency, dial 110.
この百科事典は、妻のものです。This encyclopedia belongs to my wife.

会議で川添さんの追及を受けて、冷や汗ものだったよ。When Kawazoe pinned me down at the meeting, I broke out in a cold sweat.
私の肌は日焼けしやすい。My skin burns easily.

私は敵意をもったまでも、冷ややかな対応を受けた。I met with a cool, not to say hostile, reception.








今日は昼食をとる時間がない。I don't have enough time to eat lunch today.
昼ご飯を食べに外に出ませんか。How about going out for lunch?
うわさは四方八方に広がった。The rumor spread far and wide.
私は机の上に地図を広げた。I unfolded the map on the desk.
彼らの家の食堂はとても広々としている。Their dining room is very spacious.

昨今は災害が頻ぴんとあった。Recently we have had several disasters.


彼は敵に不意打ちを食わせた。He surprised his opponent.
ここの交通量は増えた。The traffic has built up here.
寝ている間は、体の機能は不活発になり、体温は下がる。While you are asleep, the bodily functions slow down and body temperature falls.
外へ出ると、私は深深と安堵のため息をついた。Once outside, I gave a deep sigh of relief.



管から水が吹き出した。Water shot from the pipe.
雨が我々の顔に吹き付けてきた。The rain was driving in our faces.
暑い季節には息子の皮膚に吹き出物がでやすい。During the hot season, my son's skin breaks out easily.

福引きでカメラが当たった。I got a camera in a lottery.
たくさん食べたので腹が膨れた。I've had enough, so my stomach is full.

道路は倒れた木で塞がっていた。The road is blocked by fallen trees.あお向けに寝ると、舌やノドチンコがノドの奥に下がるため、上気道が塞がりやすくなります。If you sleep on your back it's easier for your upper airway to be obstructed because your tongue, uvula, etc. slip towards the back of your throat.この椅子ふさがっていますか。Is this seat taken?
彼女は急にふさぎ込む性癖がある。She is apt to fits of depression.
彼女はなぜかふさいでいる。She looks blue for some reason.
戦争はみんなを不幸せにする。War doesn't make anybody happy.
体の節々が痛いです。My joints ache.
彼は部下の不始末を見つけた。He detected his men's misconduct.
花嫁は伏目がちに、満座の注目を浴びながら入場した。The bride came into the room with lowered eyes and with everyone staring at her.






そのカレッジは大学に付属している。The college is affiliated with the university.
あなたを私の両親に紹介したい。I want you to meet my parents.


普段着でおいでください。Please come in an ordinary dress.

休みの前などは少し羽目を外して飲むのだが、杜仲茶割りで飲むと二日酔いが全くない。I usually cut loose a bit and drink plenty before a day off work, but if my drinks are cut with tochu tea, then I get absolutely no hangover.
この大きな門は小さな庭に不釣り合いだ。This big gate is disproportionate to the small garden.
秀樹ったら、当時は全っ然こっちに慣れなくてね、しょっちゅうふてくされてたのよ。Hideki, he really hadn't settled in here at all and sulked all the time.

彼らは船を岸に引き上げた。They drew their boat on the beach.


警報機が鳴っているときは絶対に踏切を渡らないでください。Don't cross the tracks when the alarm is ringing.

芝生を踏みつけるな。Don't trample on the grass.

体力を増やすように努めなさい。Try to build up your strength.

彼らは不用の物は捨てた。They discarded unnecessary things.


ですから私たちは、社員が現金ではなく、エレクトロニクスによる振替でお金を受け取るよう、説得に努めているのです。Therefore, we try to persuade people not to have cash, to have money electronically transferred.
途中で何かが彼の身に降りかかったに違いない。Something must have happened to him on the way.


銀行振込でお支払いします。We will make the payment by bank transfer.

振り袖で仕事はできぬ。The cat in gloves catches no mice.
振り出しに戻ってしまった。We were back to square one.

大勢の人がその旧跡を訪れる。A large number of people visit the historic site.
私は勇気を奮い起こし中に入っていった。I summoned up my courage, and walked inside.


トムは故郷へと戻って行った。Tom went back to his hometown.

その部屋には古ぼけた椅子が一つあるだけだった。There was nothing but an old chair in the room.
学生であるならそのように振舞いなさい。If you are a student, behave as such.彼女は私に紅茶を１杯ふるまってくれた。She treated me to a cup of tea.



その資料はこの部署にはありません。Our department doesn't have that information.


殺してやる！ぶっ殺して、踏み潰してやる！くそったれ！死ね！I'll kill you! Knock your block off and grind you underfoot! You shithead! Die!




偏屈な奴とまともに話し合っても無駄だ。It is useless to reason with a bigot.
ビルは編集部員です。Bill is on the editorial staff.


彼女はたいしたべっぴんだぜ。She is a regular beauty.

我々は別れて別々の道を行った。We broke up and went our own ways.
別々に払います。Please bill us separately.


彼の事業もやっと萌芽の兆しを見せた。His business has begun to thrive at last.

私は片足に包帯を巻いた犬を見た。I saw a dog with one paw bandaged.

彼のドジ話を聞いて、皆、抱腹絶倒した。He had everyone howling with his stories of all his past bloopers.



彼は午後いっぱい使って昨年のほうれん草の根を始末した。He's spent all afternoon rooting up last year's spinach plants.
犬が郵便屋さんに吠えた。The dog barked at the mailman.
彼はほおづえをついた。He rested his chin on his hands.


会社での彼の正式な肩書きは社長補佐である。His official title at the company is Assistant to the President.


いかなる政党も本質的に保守的である。Any political party is conservative in itself.
彼女の誠実さは私が保証します。You have my word on her sincerity.
この座布団を干して下さい。Please air the zabuton.なんで途中から突然干されるようになってしまったんだろうか。I wonder why he was suddenly dropped from the team half way through.
ほのかな光が俺のねじれた視界を幻影に変えてゆく。Light shines on my sigh of doubt.

ヘレンはみんなにほめられて顔を赤くした。Helen blushed at their praise.

春になると畑をほりかえして種をまきます。When spring comes, they dig up the fields and plant seeds.いくどとなくおのを埋めては、きまって、また、ほりかえす。永遠の平和がやってくる気配もない。After countless burials of the hatchet, we always dig it up again. There doesn't seem to be any sign of an ever-lasting peace.
私は先日そのお店ですばらしい掘り出し物をした。I made a great find in the store the other day.
彼らの言葉には文字がなかったので、原住民は彫り物によって行いや出来事を表現したのである。As their language had no written form, the natives expressed deeds and events in carvings.

それは御子を信じるものが、一人として滅びることなく、永遠の命を持つためである。That whoever believes in him shall not perish but have eternal life.
核兵器はわが地球を滅ぼすと思う。We think nuclear weapons will destroy our earth.

あなたの言っていることは本末転倒だと思わないかい？Don't you think you're putting the cart before the horse?

私たちは訪問客で忙殺された。We were swamped with visitors.
インテル社はその発明で膨大な特許料を得ている。Intel gets a huge royalty from the invention.





御坊ちゃんに幸あれ。All our best to that little boy.





予約は全て前売りである。All the seats are sold in advance.
前売り券をここで取り扱っていますか。Do you sell advance tickets here?
前払いしてほしいですか。Do you want me to pay in advance?
先日、学校からの帰りに古本屋に立ち寄ったところ、前々から探していた本を偶然見つけた。The other day, I stopped at a secondhand bookstore on my way home from school and happened to find a book I had been looking for for a long time.
私は前もってあなたに知らせる。I will let you know in advance.

人生は長い曲がりくねった道だ。Life is a long and winding road.



彼女は彼の首の回りに両腕を巻き付けた。She wrapped her arms around his neck.

この本は二巻物です。This book comes in two volumes.
睡眠は薬に勝る。Sleep is better than medicine.
私たちは、いろんな人種の混ざり合った集団だから、私は、誰がセルビア人で、誰がクロアチア人で、誰がイスラム教徒かなんてちっとも知らなかったわ。We're a mixed group and I never knew who was a Serb, a Croat or a Muslim.
トムは知らない人に混じって居心地が悪かった。Tom is ill at ease among strangers.
けが人は麻酔から覚めた後痛みで泣きわめいた。The injured person wailed with pain after recovering from the anaesthesia.
われわれは彼をますます尊敬した。We respected him all the more.

馬の背にまたがり野山を走り回った。I rode all over the countryside on horseback.台風の被害は数県にまたがっていた。The damage of the typhoon spread over several prefectures.
またまた彼らはけんかをしているようです。It looks like they are at it again.
町が一面すっぽり雪をかぶった。Snow completely covered the town.楽隊が町をパレードした。The band paraded the streets.
異国情緒あふれる街並みが続く。The streets are filled with an air of exoticism.
その件について彼らの意見はまちまちだ。Their views vary on the subject.
彼らはみんなその休暇を待ちわびた。They all longed for the holidays.

その物語の舞台は明治末期の日本である。The setting of the story is Japan in the late Meiji period.
あーあ、トーストが真っ黒に焦げてしまっているよ。Oh, the toast is burned black.


これをきいたとたん、彼は真っ青になった。On hearing this, he turned pale.
彼らは町の騒音の真っただ中にいる。They are amid the city noises.僕らは青春の真っ只中だ。We are in the heyday of youth.

君がいくのはまっぴらだ。I cannot endure your going.
例えばジャック・パインの松かさは、高温により影響を受けるまでは自ら開いて種子を放出しない。The cones of the jack pine, for example, do not readily open to release their seeds until they have been subjected to great heat.
その祭りはつまらないどころではありませんでした。The festival was far from dull.


ああ、オレも実際、こうして目の当たりにするまでは半信半疑だったが・・・。Yes, truthfully, until it was right in front of me like this, I half-doubted it ...
ゼネストで国中の機能が麻痺した。The general strike paralyzed the whole country.





コロンブスは地球が丸いと信じていた。Columbus believed that the earth was round.彼が仲裁してその場は丸く収めた。He intervened and settled the matter peacefully for the time being.
彼女は丸顔です。She has a round face.

それから、毎日おじいさんと、おばあさんがこねこにミルクを飲ませましたら、こねこは、まもなく、かわいらしいまるまるとしたねこに、なりました。Every day grandfather and grandmother gave the kitten plenty of milk, and soon the kitten grew nice and plump.明日で丸々１週間雨が降り続く事になっているでしょう。It will have been raining a whole week tomorrow.
チャンスというものはいずれにしても、まれにしかない。Chances come rarely in any case.
周りを見渡しなさい。Look about you.彼は多くの点で周りの人と違う。He is different from the people around him.
踊り手はつま先立ってぐるぐると回った。The dancer spun on his toes.その船は岬を回った。The ship sailed around the cape.子供達はハロウィーンの夜に１軒ずつ家を訪ねてまわる。Children walk around from door to door on Halloween night.



彼は数学で満点を取った。He got full marks in mathematics.ベッドは寝心地満点だった。I found the bed quite comfortable.
砂漠の真ん中で私たちの車はガス欠になった。We ran out of gas in the middle of the desert.

厳密に言えば、地球はまん丸ではない。Strictly speaking, the earth is not round.
彼は権力獲得に野心満々だ。He is full of ambition for power.
その計画には大きな見落としがある。There is big oversight in that plan.
彼は彼女に見覚えがある。He knows her by sight.

見かけ通り彼女は行動力がある。She is as active as she looks.
私は安室奈美恵を見かけた。I caught sight of Namie Amuro.
警察は鉄砲の指紋とドアの指紋とを見くらべた。The police compared the fingerprints on the gun with those on the door.



そんな計画はほとんど成功する見込みはありません。Such a plan can hardly succeed.
君は未成年だから入れません。Because you're a minor, you can't enter.
彼はいかにも私の親友らしく見せかけた。He posed as my close friend.



「世界平和」という言葉は魅力的に聞こえるが、世界平和への道は長く苦難に満ちている。Although the phrase "world peace" sounds attractive, the road to world peace is very long and full of troubles.潮が急速に満ちてくる。The tide is rising fast.
運悪く仕事が見つからなかった。He had no luck in finding work.

探していた珍本を見つけた。I found a rare book I had been looking for.
いい加減に現実をみつめろ。Open your eyes to reality.
特別価格の見積りです。We have quoted special prices.
しかしそこには山ほど未踏の問題があった。However, that involved a mountain of previously unconsidered problems.
その法案は今会期中に成立する見通しである。The bill is expected to be enacted during the present session.

私はその男を敵と見なした。I regarded the man as an enemy.

１１ページの地図はとても奇妙に見える。逆さまにしてみると、見慣れた地図になる。The map on page 11 looks very strange. Turn it upside down. Then it becomes a familiar map to you.

これは絶対見逃せないよ。It's just too good to pass up.

あなたが病気だと知っていたら、病院へ見舞いに行っただろう。If I had known about your illness, I would have visited you in the hospital.

体温上昇、脈拍上昇・・・酸素欠乏状態です。Body temperature rising, pulse rising ... he's in a state of oxygen deficiency.
私には彼のうそが見破れなかった。I couldn't see through his lies.
あなたの名字はどうつづるのですか。How do you spell your family name?
アジアにはたくさんの民族がいる。There are many people in Asia.

その店は通りの向かいにあります。The store is across the street.
ついに彼らは面と向かい合った。At last, they met face to face.
向かい風が帆に吹きつけた。The headwind blew against the sail.
彼の家はちょうど道路の向かい側です。His house is just over the road.

一日中コンピューターに向かってるから、結構電磁波浴びてる。I sit in front of a computer screen all day, so I get pretty heavily bombarded by electro-magnetic waves.あなたは何処へ向かっているのですか。Where are you bound for?
むかしむかし、この村におじいさんがいました。Once upon a time, there was an old man in this village.
私はこの古い麦藁帽子にとても愛着がある。I am very much attached to this old straw hat.
わたしたちの学校は川の向こう側にあります。Our school is across the river.

どうも虫歯のようです。I think I have a decayed tooth.

今日はむしろ外出したくない。I would rather not go out today.

彼女はきれいな目をしている。She has beautiful eyes.ヘレン・ケラーは目と耳と口が不自由だった。Helen Keller was blind, deaf and mute.彼は崇拝の眼で彼女を眺めた。He regarded her with worship in his eyes.



日本は戦後目覚ましい産業の進歩をとげた。Japan achieved a remarkable development in industrial technology after the war.
もし眠るといけないので目覚し時計をセットしなさい。In case you sleep, set the alarm.

召使いをもっと親切に扱いなさい。Treat your servant more kindly.

一体だれが私の名簿をめちゃめちゃにしたのだ。Who's gone and messed up my list of names?
我々はつらい目にあった。We had a rough time.もう少し知恵があったら、彼は面倒な目にあわずにすんだのに。With a little more wisdom, he would not have got in trouble.
彼は貧しさを私の眼につかないようにした。He concealed his poverty from my eyes.
何かおかしな物が私の目にとまった。Something strange caught my eye.

この定規にはミリメートルの目盛りがある。This ruler has the scale in millimeters.



多くのギャンブラーは競馬でお金を儲けもし、失いもする。Many gamblers win and lose money at the horse-race track.





あなたの申し入れを受け入れてもよい。I'm willing to accept your offer.
結婚の申し込みが殺到した。Marriage proposals flooded in.
ジェーンは申込書に必要事項を書き入れた。Jane filled out an application.
私の申し立ては本当だと彼は発表した。He announced my statement to be true.

車は砂ぼこりをもうもうとあげて走っていた。The car raised a cloud of dust.



イギリスに加えて、フランスもドイツからの廃棄物の持ち込みを禁止しそうだ。Together with Britain, France may ban imports of waste from Germany.
この家の持ち主は誰ですか。Who is the owner of this house?
自分の持ち物を忘れないように。Don't leave your stuff behind.
とてもいい天気だから家の中にいるのがもったいない。It's too sunny to stay inside.

この物語は事実に基づいている。This story is founded on fact.彼らの争いは誤解に基づくものだ。The dispute between them is due to a misunderstanding.
彼らは元々あった文明を破壊した。They destroyed the native civilization.

彼はそのもめごとに巻き込まれた。He was involved in the trouble.
スケートをするには強い腿の筋肉が必要である。You need to have strong thigh muscles to skate.
彼女は秘密をもらした。She let the secret out.彼は自分の真意を漏らしてしまった。He gave away his real intention.彼は仕事が終わったとき、ため息を漏らした。He let out a sigh when the job was finished.
ガスがパイプから漏れているようです。Gas seems to be escaping from the pipe.
発展途上国は財政問題で諸々の困難に苦しんでいる。Developing countries suffer from difficulties of fiscal problems.

薬缶がシュンシュンいうまで待ちなさい。Wait till the kettle begins to sing.




さあ、みんなで食べ放題の焼き肉屋さんに行こうよ。Let's all go to an all-you-can-eat Yakiniku restaurant.
焼き増ししてください。Please have some copies made.
焼もちは友情の敵だ。Jealousy is an enemy to friendship.

彼はいなかの屋敷に住んでいる。He lives on his country estate.

どの仕事もやすやすとはできない。No work can be done with ease.


若い頃は痩せてたんだよ。I used to be thin when I was young.



彼らの雇い人は住み込みだ。Their employees live in.
彼らは雇い主に忠実だ。They are loyal to their master.
あの店は８人の店員を雇っている。That store employs eight clerks.
この辺の山々は変化に富んでいる。The mountains in this part of the country are full of variety.欲しいのはやまやまだが予算がない。We'd really like one, but we just don't have the money.行きたいことはやまやまですが、あいにく忙し過ぎるのではないかと思います。Much as I'd like to come, I'm afraid I'll be too busy.

進子はそのことで彼とやりあった。Shinko disputed with him about it.
失敗したらやり直しができないから、失敗するな。If you mess-up it can't be redone, so don't mess-up!
なされたことはやり直せない。What is done cannot be undone.
私は柔らかいベッドで眠るのが好きです。I like to sleep on a soft bed.風が柔らかく木立に触れた。The wind gently kissed the trees.
雨が降ると彼女は憂鬱になる。When it rains, she feels blue.



強盗が郵便列車をめちゃくちゃにした。Robbers wrecked the mail train.

飛行機は頭上をゆうゆうと飛んで行った。The airplane sailed over our heads.

その証拠は彼に有利であった。The evidence was in his favor.
あの人は行きずりの人です。He is only a passing chance acquaintance.



赤ん坊がゆりかごの中で眠っている。A baby is sleeping in the cradle.

鍋が湯わかしを黒いという。The pot calls the kettle black.
光が世にやって来た。Light has come into the world.新聞は世の動向を左右する。Newspapers influence the current of time.
私にはよい友達が数人いる。I have several good friends.
私もそうだが、ＩＴ業界には宵っ張りの人が多いに違いない。I'm one too, and I'm sure there are lots of night-owls in the IT world.
ケンは人懐っこい人であるようだ。Ken appears a friendly person.


子供の権利擁護に関して我々は委任されている。We are entrusted with the protection of children's rights.
その報告を１ページに要約せよ。Boil down the report to one page.
そのプロジェクトはよく計画されていて興味深いが、当面の利益には大した結果をもたらさないと見られている。The project is well-planned and interesting, but its immediate impact on the bottom line is not considered substantial.みつなは綺麗好きだから、よく自ら進んで掃除をしています。Mitsuna is very tidy so she often cleans up without being asked.ジャック、よく来てくれたね。You are welcome, Jack!


この横町は人の通りが多い。This cross street is busy with pedestrian traffic.

その将軍は退役後ひっそり余生を送った。The general lived the rest of his life peacefully after his retirement.
ここの人たちはよそから来た人をみな嫌う。These people hate all foreigners.


よって流通するマネーが減り、物価上昇は鎮静化する。Thus money in circulation drops, and price escalation quietens down.
彼はその話がよほど面白かったようだ。It seems that he was very much amused by the story.
呼び出しをお願いします。I'd like to page someone.
そんなに夜ふかしをするべきではない。You ought not to sit up so late.
我々は夜更けまで語り合った。We talked late into the night.
春の雨が花に生気をよみがえらせた。A spring rain revived the flower.彼女の顔が記憶にまざまざとよみがえった。Her face came back vividly to my memory.




この本は面白い読み物です。This book makes pleasant reading.

この伝統は代々受け継がれている。This tradition has been passed down from generation to generation.

彼は手すりに寄りかかっていました。He was leaning against the rail.

我々はお互いに喜びをわかちあった。We partook in each other's joy.
世論は非常に重要である。Public opinion counts for much.

その弱々しい患者は胃癌に苦しんでいる。The feeble patient is suffering from stomach cancer.






彼はその理屈がわからないほどばかではない。He is too wise not to see the reason.
トムによって、メアリー様は利益を約束する略奪の尊師の一つしかありません。According to Tom, Mary is just a predatory guru who promises gain.


この件についてのあなたのお求めを了承します。Your request of this matter has been accepted.


性能のよさとデザインの優美さが両々相まって本機種の声価を高めてきた。The high performance and the elegant design of this model have combined to give it a high reputation.




各種の性格類型が概略図の形で図１に示されている。The different character typologies are represented schematically in figure one.





むかしのような激しい日雇い労働はできやしない。I can't work as hard as I used to.



彼の罪は露見するだろう。His sin will find him out.





喫煙による短期的な影響の方が分かり易いと思う人もいる。Some people find it easier to grasp the short-term effects of smoking.
「博、君の気持ちは分かるよ」とマイクが言います。"I understand how you feel, Hiroshi," says Mike.彼が有名な人物だというのがわかります。I understand that he's something of a famous personality.

私は分かれ道を右手に行った。I took the right fork of the road.
あなたが彼女と別れるのは賢明である。You will do well to leave her.
その問題で上院議員の意見が分かれた。The issue divided the senators.
その年になってもまだ彼女は若々しい少女の面影を保っていた。At her age, she still preserved the appearance of a young girl.
我が軍はその王国を襲った。Our army attacked the kingdom.
こういう人たちが我が国を動かしている。These persons run this country.
そんなことを考えながら『我輩はカモである』を再見しました。Thinking about those sorts of things, I watched "Duck Soup" again.
わが家の近くに教会がある。There is a church near my house.
宇宙飛行士達は自然と湧き起こった拍手で迎えられた。The astronauts were greeted with spontaneous applause.
地面から水が沸き出ている。The water is welling up from the ground.その女の子の目から涙がわきでた。Tears welled up in the girl's eyes.人間の胸に希望は永遠にわき出る。Hope springs eternal in the human breast.
薬缶のお湯が沸いている。The kettle is boiling.市の産業はみんな好景気に沸いている。All the industries in the city are booming.
彼女の目には涙が湧きあふれていた。Her eyes gushed with tears.いざとなれば勇気が湧いてくる。Your courage will come out in a crisis.肉にはウジがわいていた。The meat was crawling with maggots.
ここでの問題は、社会のトレンドを概観できるような枠組みを創出することである。The question here is one of creating the framework with which we can outline the social trend.
お互いに利益の分け前にあずかることにしよう。Let's agree to share in the profits.
わざわざおいでにならなくて結構です。Don't bother to come to my house.彼はわざわざ髪にくしをかけたりしない。He doesn't bother to comb his hair.




あなたがいなくなったら、この世は本当に侘びしくなるわ。What a lonely world it would be with you away!

その男は私の足を踏んだのにわびることさえしなかった。The man did not so much as apologize for stepping on my foot.
トムは勤務終了時間を超えて働くと、５割アップの時給をもらっていた。Tom got time and a half when he worked beyond his usual quitting time.私は割のいい仕事の申し入れを受けた。I received a good job offer.休みの前などは少し羽目を外して飲むのだが、杜仲茶割りで飲むと二日酔いが全くない。I usually cut loose a bit and drink plenty before a day off work, but if my drinks are cut with tochu tea, then I get absolutely no hangover.
クラスの女生徒の男生徒に対する割合は３対２だ。The proportion of girls to boys in our class is three to two.
輸入割り当て量についての多国間貿易交渉は暗礁に乗り上げてしまいました。Multilateral trade negotiations ran aground over import quotas.

食事代を割り勘にした。We shared the cost of the meal.


人の話に割り込むのは失礼だぞ。It is rude to interrupt others.

午前中に電話をすると割高になりますか。Is it more expensive to call in the morning?



この布は値段の割に品質が良い。This cloth is good in quality for its price.
和食のレストランへ行くたびに、割り箸を家へもって帰ります。Whenever I go to a Japanese restaurant, I take the disposable chopsticks home with me.
現金払いには１０パーセント割引いたします。We give a 10% discount for cash.


割り増し料金はいくらでしたか。How much was the additional charge?
シーズンオフはホテルは割安だ。Hotels are cheaper in the off season.


彼は割れ目をパテでふさいだ。He stopped up the crack with putty.

死がまさに我らを引離すまで愛し、いつくしむ。To love and to cherish, till death do us part.
しかし我々は彼なしで続行した。But we carried on without him.
おじさんがぼくにカメラをくれました。My uncle gave me a camera.いまおじの家に滞在しています。I'm now staying at my uncle's.
私の伯母は、無料ハワイ旅行に当たった。My aunt won an all-expenses-paid tour of Hawaii.その姪は彼女の叔母さんのように見えます。The niece looks like her aunt.

会計士は各週の会社の収入と支出を算出する。A bookkeeper computes all the company's income and expenses each week.



このクレジット・カードは使えますか。Do you honor this credit card?
それはもっと低温で保存しなさい。Keep it at a lower temperature.





この靴はきつすぎてはけない。These shoes are too tight to get into.

彼女の亡夫はピアニストであった。Her late husband was a pianist.














毎朝彼女の歌声が聞こえてくる。You can hear her singing every morning.
昭和天皇が靖国神社で７５年までに戦後計８回参拝した。In the post-War period, up until 1975, Emperor Showa prayed at the Yasukuni Shrine a total of 8 times.






演奏は終わりかけていた。The performance was almost over.





学校では学園音楽祭の準備をしています。My school is getting ready for the campus music festival.



まもなく音楽コンクールがあります。We will have a music contest soon.



あいつ、自分が音痴だってこと知らないんだよ。He doesn't realise that he's tone deaf.





















彼女は近代音楽の典型的な例を挙げた。She took a typical example of modern music.




最近、銀行の貸し渋りで倒産する会社が増えている。A lot of companies are going under lately because banks are so tight with their money.


彼は思い違いをしているらしい。It appears that he is mistaken.
月が湖に映し出されていた。The moon was reflected in the lake.

彼は医者に見放された。He was given up on by the doctors.
自民党が小泉人気の尻馬に乗った。The LDP rode on the wave of Koizumi's popularity.

鎌倉は源氏ゆかりの地です。Kamakura is a place noted in connection with the Genji family.



平成１６年１月１日から、改正労働基準法が施行されます。The reformed Labour Standards Act will be in force from Jan 1st 2004.



その方法は粗雑なものであったが、効果的だった。The method was crude, but very effective.







安逸の生活が軍人精神をだめにした。Easy living corrupted the warrior spirit.






どこからどう見ても薄幸の美少女、悲劇のヒロインだ。No matter how you look at it you're a beautiful, ill-fated woman, the heroine of a tragedy.






あいつめ明日こそ痛い目にあわせてくれる。I'll take my revenge on him at all costs tomorrow.





ビルはこの会社での語り草になっている。Bill is still a legendary figure in this company.








その一件はめでたく落着するだろう。The affair will come to a happy conclusion.
おんどりに時を告げさせるのは、めんどりである。It is the hen that makes the rooster crow.





ジャーン。それじゃ春田くん、もう見てもいいわよ。みんなの浴衣、お披露目ねぇ〜。Ta-dah! Well then, Haruta, it's OK to look now! It's everybody's yukata debut.
犬が猫を追いかけていた。A dog was running after a cat.

そういう相手の前では、私の見せ掛けだけの怜悧な技術は、見抜かれた時に負けていたと思う。I think that against somebody like that, my seemingly clever techniques would be seen through and then I would be defeated.

くーっ、ビールが五臓六腑にしみわたる。やっぱり仕事の後はビールだね。Ahhh! Feel that beer seep into every fiber of my being. Yep, nothing beats a cold one after work.












手八丁口八丁の彼だけど、誠がないのが玉に瑕だね。He works fast and is very articulate but his insincerity is his biggest defect.



鉄砲玉に当たるも当たらぬもみな運命だ。Every bullet has its billet.
昔の友情のよしみで君を助けてあげるよ。I will help you for the sake of our old friendship.
私の後について各文を復唱しなさい。Repeat each sentence after me.




彼はあおいで火をおこした。He fanned the fire into flame.
字と字の間の空きをもっと広くしなさい。Leave more space between characters.うちの会社には空きがない。There is no opening in our firm.
その計画には大いに飽き足らぬところがある。The plan is far from satisfactory.
私はあさはかにも彼が私を助けてくれるんだなあと思った。I foolishly imagined that he was going to help me.
あの博物館はくるに値する。That museum is worth visiting.
ごく内輪の集まりなのです。It's quite an informal meeting.
例えばベルベットモンキーは、輪を描いて飛ぶワシがいるとある種の呼びかけを用いるようになる。ワシはサルを捕食するのだ。For example, vervet monkeys learn to use a certain call in the presence of circling eagles, who prey on the monkeys.

洗い物を手伝いに行って下さい。Go and help wash up, will you?
彼はその言いがかりを否定した。He denied the accusation.
そのボートは岸辺に碇を降ろした。The boat anchored near the shore.
彼は生き生きとした想像力を持っている。He has a very vivid imagination.
ジムくんは行き過ぎの嫌いがある。Jim tends to go too far.

今日の幸せが幾度も巡ってきますように。Many happy returns of the day! Happy birthday!
中学・高校では陰湿ないじめが増える傾向にあるという。In junior high and high schools, they say insidious forms of bullying are on the rise.
その痛ましいエピソードは私には痛切に感じられた。The touching episode came home to me.
一度にひとつのことをするようにしなさい。Try to do one thing at a time.

健康のせいで仕事がいっこうにはかどらない。My health makes me a very slow worker.彼の言うことは僕には一向にわからない。I can make nothing of what he says.

これを戒めとしなさい。Let this be an example to you.
彼は急げと言われるのをいやがる。He hates being told to hurry up.
私たちはかなりいろんな所を訪ねました。We visited quite a few places.



私はうつぶせに寝た。I lay on my face.
私は生まれも育ちも東京だ。I was born and raised in Tokyo.
アフリカ大陸のどこかへ行くとしたらどこが一番衛生的で安全ですか？If I was going to the African continent where would be the safest and most sanitary place?

医学では日本は欧米に追いつきました。Japan has caught up with Europe and America in medicine.


エイズウイルスの拡散は恐るべき速さで進んでいる。The speed of the spread of AIDS is horrifyingly fast.

彼は思いきって意見を発表しない。He dare not express his opinion.
その独裁者は思う存分特権を乱用した。The dictator abused his privileges to his heart's content.
君をみていると母さんを思い出す。You remind me of my mother.
大投資かは株を買い占めた。The big investor bought up the stocks.
その気候で健康を害した。The climate affected his health.
私はかつて大病にかかったことがあった。Once I had a very bad disease.


私は貸間を探しているところです。I'm looking for a room for rent.
喉が痛くて、熱があります。風邪薬はありますか。My throat hurts, and I have a fever. Can I have some cold medicine?
試合は彼の勝ちに終わった。The match ended in victory for him.




その部屋は紙くずだらけだった。The room was littered with scraps of paper.
辛口がほしいのですが。I want something dry.
君が彼の申し出を受けるとは軽はずみだったね。It was foolish of you to accept his offer.
人生から非常な喜びを感ずる。I get a kick out of life.
毎日のきまり仕事にはつくづく飽きた。I am quite tired of daily routine.
おそらく、人間の持って生まれた感情の中で、虚栄心ほど抑えにくいものはないだろう。There is, perhaps, not one of our natural passions so hard to subdue as vanity.



ロッククライミングも、海で深く潜ることもしたし、インドネシアの熱帯雨林で眠ったこともある。I've done rock climbing and deep-sea diving and slept in an Indonesian jungle.

彼はパイプをくわえて話した。He spoke with a pipe in his mouth.
私は経済的に困っている。I am in financial difficulties.
ピーターはその子を恋するようになった。Peter fell in love with the girl.

日本の国力はまだ発展している。The Japanese national power is still developing.

彼はその機会を最大限に活用した。He made the most of the chance.



ジョンソン氏は自営業で、家具の修理をやっている。Mr Johnson is self-employed and is in the business of repairing furniture.
このカツオの塩辛は塩辛すぎる。These salted bonito guts are too salty for me.
あなたの昇進は時機を得た、当然なものだと思います。I am sure your promotion was timely and well deserved.
ペットは私たちに親しみ以上のものを与えてくれる。Pets offer us more than mere companionship.
外国資本家は現地の政情不安が理由で手を引きました。Foreign investors backed off because of regional political unrest.
このシーツ、湿っぽいよ。The sheets feel damp.
彼はなぜ妻が自分を捨てたのかと自問した。He wondered to himself why his wife had left him.
我々は交渉して週休２日制にする協定をした。We bargained that we should go on a five-day week.
「順路→」といったかんじの看板を設置したいと思うんですけど、これを英語で作るとどうなるでしょうか？I'd like to set up a sign like, "This Way ->," but what would it be if I made it in English?
食中毒に罹ったことはありますか。Have you ever had food poisoning?
中には女性的であると言うよりも男性的に見える女性もいる。Some women look more masculine than feminine.

心中お察し致します。You have my sympathies.


彼女は行かせまいとして私に縋った。She held on to me to prevent me from going.私は彼の親切にすがった。I relied on his kindness.
待たせてすまなかったな。I am sorry to have kept you waiting.すまないが今僕、手がいっぱいなのだ。Excuse me, but I'm tied up now.
彼はとてもずる賢いので私は嫌いだ。I don't like him because he is sly as a fox.
あなたの頭痛は過労のせいだ。Your headache comes from overwork.
私には成算がある。I am sure of success.

この事は絶対に口外しません。I'll never tell this to anyone.
船は海岸沿いに航行していた。The ship sailed along the coast.
その花は早春に咲く。The flower comes out in early spring.


速達便でお願いします。Please send it by special delivery.






シリウスを回る軌道は楕円形である。The orbit around Sirius is elliptical.

私は船長に命を託さなければならなかった。I had to trust the captain with my life.
校長は彼に無断欠勤の理由をただした。The principal called him to account for being absent without an excuse.

動物園から一頭のトラが脱走した。A tiger has escaped from the zoo.

三日間立て続けに雨が降っている。It has been raining for three days on end.
ちょっとおたのみがあるんですが。Would you do something for me?

中には女性的であると言うよりも男性的に見える女性もいる。Some women look more masculine than feminine.





このうわさの張本人はだれだ？Who is at the bottom of these rumors?
その理論は私にはちんぷんかんぷんだ。The theory is too abstract for me.
その件は通産省の管轄下にある。The matter comes under MITI.

テレビをつけて。Please turn on the television.

つまり彼女は下手な踊り子だ。That is, she is a poor dancer.
今年は梅雨明けが遅かった。The end of the rainy season came late this year.
彼は夫人を一緒につれてきた。He was accompanied by his wife.
恵子が手際よく食器を重ねて、シンクへ運んでゆく。Keiko deftly piles up the cutlery and takes them to the sink.
南部の州へ冬期に旅行すると、今旅行するよりも料金が高くなります。Traveling to the southern states during the winter will be costlier than it is now.
彼は父さんほど背が高くない。He is not as tall as his father.

私たちはお金を得するために働く。We work to get money.

それは彼女の性格の表れだ。It is an index of her character.



言い換えれば、彼は私たちを裏切った。In other words, he betrayed us.
彼はすべて妻の言いなりになっている。He echoes his wife in everything.
ここだけの話だが、彼はいささか間が抜けている。Between you and me, he is rather stupid.

私のお気に入りの味はチョコレートです。My favorite flavor is chocolate.
彼は全く思いがけなく着いた。He arrived quite out of the blue.
犬は肉を骨からかじりとった。The dog bit meat off the bone.

仲たがいをした原因は口げんかであった。A quarrel brought about the break.
あの小売店のバックにはもっと大きな会社がひかえています。The small retail outlet is only a front for a much larger entity.
昨日父が心臓発作を起こしたが、診療所が近くにあるのは好運だった。My father had a heart attack yesterday, but he was lucky to have a clinic close at hand.

あなたの迅速な返事が是非とも必要です。Your prompt reply is urgently required.
あの人にたてつかない方がいいよ。You're better off not getting in his way!
会社を立て直すために新しい指導者が必要だ。We need a new leader to pull our company together.

再婚した今、彼はもっと幸福に違いない。He must be happier now after having remarried.

私は、アイスコーヒーが好きではないし、彼女もそうだ。I don't like iced coffee, and she doesn't either.
キリスト教とイスラム教は異なった２つの宗教だ。Christianity and Islam are two different religions.

私はカレーライスが好きだ。I like curry and rice.

水はセ氏100度で沸騰する。Water boils at 100 degrees Celsius.


彼らは年取った人に大変親切です。They are kind to old people.
これをきいたとたん、彼は真っ青になった。On hearing this, he turned pale.


彼は同社の取締役です。He is a member of the board of the company.
内向的な奴でいることの自由はずっと愛してきた。I've always loved the freedom that comes from being introverted.
妻は夫より長生きするものだ。Wives usually outlive husbands.
その経済学者は長引く不況を予期していた。The economist anticipated a prolonged depression.
眺めのよい部屋をお願いします。I'd like a room with a good view.

彼女はなぜかふさいでいる。She looks blue for some reason.
ヘロヘロになる前に、夏バテ対策をしっかり行い元気に夏を乗り切りましょう。Let's take precautions against heat fatigue, before we flake out from the heat, and have a healthy summer.
この木には実がならないんだ。This tree does not bear fruit.
彼は何十冊も英語の本を持っている。He has dozens of English books.
テニスウェアってなんでミニスカートなのかしら？I wonder why tennis is played in mini-skirts.ここになんで来たの？How did you come here?
この犬は何でもほとんど食べます。This dog eats almost anything.


この仕事は日給１万円です。This job pays 10,000 yen a day.
彼女がベッドで寝返りばかりうっている。She is tossing and turning in bed.こいつ、さっきまで俺の相棒だったのに、もう寝返りやがった。This rat, up until just now he was my partner and now he's gone and turned on me.
その取っ手を右にねじると箱は開きます。Twist that knob to the right and the box will open.
あしたの朝は寝過ごさないようにしなさい。Do not oversleep tomorrow morning.


彼は有り金を残らず奪われた。He was robbed of all his money.
今日は、ばーさんのお使いを兼ねて街で買い物。Today I'm shopping in town as well as running an errand for my grandmother.「店のばーさんは、すげー愛想悪いんだけどさー」「大輝、聞こえとるぞ」「げっ・・・」"The old lady of this shop is very unsociable but ..." "Taiki, I can hear you!" "Ack!"


彼はまったくの恥知らずだ。He is dead to all sense of shame.

始まりがうまければ半ばうまくいったもおなじ。Well begun is half done.

右上にある「バッテン」のボタンが、ウィンドウを消すボタンだよ。The "X" button in the top right shuts the window.
私には葉っぱとりんごしかありません。I have only leaves and apples.
隣の部屋で誰かの話し声が聞こえる。I can hear someone talking in the next room.
これらの語は話し言葉では使われない。These words aren't used in spoken language.
すんでのところで車にはねられるところだった。I was nearly hit by a car.通りがかりの車が私たちに水をはねた。A passing car splashed water on us.今朝は髪の毛が撥ねてるんだ。せめて手鏡を貸してくれ、そこの引き出しにしまってあるだろ。My hair's messed up this morning. At least lend me a hand mirror - it should be shut in the drawer there.
早寝早起きには慣れています。I'm used to keeping early hours.
これは、会社払いだ。Charge this to my company.この小切手は持参人払いだ。This check is payable to the bearer.漢字を書くときは点やはらいに気をつけて、なるべく早くていねいに書きましょう。When drawing kanji be careful of dots and sweeps, write as carefully and quickly as possible.
家に帰って朝食を腹一杯に食べた。I went home and ate a hearty breakfast.
帆がいっぱいに風をはらんだ。The wind filled the sails.
日替わり定食にしませんか。How about getting the special of the day?
セールスマンはひき肉機の使い方を操作して説明した。The salesman demonstrated how to use the mincer.
ペンや鉛筆は筆記用具である。Pens and pencils are examples of writing tools.
濡れた服はからだにぴったりひっつく。Wet clothes cling to the body.
その犬は、一晩中ほえつづけた。The dog kept barking all night.
会合の日にちと場所が決定された。The date and place of the meeting have been fixed.
患者は日に日によくなっていった。The patient was recovering daily.
日増しに暖かくなっている。It's getting warmer day by day.
彼はふいに私たちの話に口をはさんだ。He interrupted us abruptly.
風が雪のふきだまりを作った。The wind drifted the snow.
今日は不燃物のゴミの日です。Today is a non-burnable rubbish day.
山の麓に日が昇るが早いかただ一人山を登り始めた。The sun had barely risen at the foot of the mountain when she set out alone up the slope.
彼女は私の靴にさっとブラシをかけてくれた。She gave my shoes a quick brush.


たまには偏差値の高い人とレベルの高い会話してみたい。I like to have a deep conversation with a more academic person from time to time.
法学部の図書館で仕事を見つけた。He got a job at the Law Library.

彼を「サー」と呼ぶのは少し封建的に思える。It seems a bit feudal to call him "sir".
革命政府は、民衆から兵をつのって防戦するとともに、共和政治を確立して、捕らえていたルイ１６世を処刑しました。The revolutionary government, while raising troops from the masses and fighting a defensive battle, established a republic and executed Louis XVI.

ナンシーは赤い靴を１足ほしがっている。Nancy wants a pair of red shoes.
その費用はみな発起人にかかります。All the expenses will fall on the sponsor.

あなた達は本当に素敵なお客だ。You're such a lovely audience.

彼女は会社の床掃除よりましな仕事を望んだ。She wanted a better job than cleaning office floors.非会員は50ドル増しとなります。Non-members pay an additional 50 dollars.
彼女の名前のつづりが間違っていた。Her name was spelled wrong.番号を間違っていると思います。I think you have the wrong number.彼はとても若く見えるのでよく学生と間違われる。He is often taken for a student because he looks so young.
町中で、珍しい物を見つけました。I found something interesting in the town.

３時間議論したが、我々は話がまとまらなかった。After three hours of discussion we got nowhere.
この機種は気に入らないが、これで間に合わせなければならない。I don't like this model but I'll have to make do with it.締め切りに間に合わせるために、私は夜通し働いた。I worked all night so as to meet the deadline.
あの娘だってまんざらじゃないさ。She isn't so against the idea.
満面朱をそそいで怒った。He went red in the face with rage.
ジョーンは夫をさっさと見限って別れてしまった。Joan dropped her husband like a hot potato.
捕らえることのできないもの、身軽で素早いもののたとえ、だそうです。It's apparently a metaphor for something uncatchable, light of body and fleet of foot.
その船は岬を回った。The ship sailed around the cape.
たまには夫婦水入らずで温泉に行ってのんびりするのもいいもんだ。Sometimes it's good for a married couple to go to a hot spring together―just the two of them.
そう水くさくするな。Don't be so reserved.
どうして見ず知らずの男が自分の名前を知っているんだろう？How did a total stranger know his name?

彼女はみためにかわいい少女だ。She is a pretty girl to look at.
帰り道で道草するんじゃないのよ。Don't play around too much after school.
地下鉄の駅までの道順を教えていただけませんか。Can you give me directions to the subway station?



彼女の顔の美しさに、僕はただ見とれていた。I was simply entranced by the beauty of her face.
彼は私の耳元でその答えを囁いた。He whispered the answer in my ear.
耳寄りな話がある。I've got an attractive proposition for you.

オーナーたちは新しいレストランのおかげで見る見るうちに大金をかせいでいた。The new restaurant was making the owners money hand over fist.
善悪の見分けをつけるのはやさしいことではない。It is not easy to distinguish good from evil.
この島ではたいていのヘビは無害である。Most snakes on this island are harmless.
組合は無期限ストに入った。The union went out on a strike for an indefinite period.
石は無機物である。A stone is dead matter.


クリスはとても失礼で無神経だから私は彼が嫌いなの。I dislike Chris because he is very rude and insensitive.




その物語の舞台は明治末期の日本である。The setting of the story is Japan in the late Meiji period.
私は健康に恵まれている。I am blessed with good health.

今、私はめったに映画を見に行きません。Now I seldom go to the movies.
散歩には申し分のない日だった。It was an ideal day for walking.あの詐欺師と金髪のコールガールは下宿のおかみさんを怒らせるには申分のない取り合わせだ。The confidence man and his blonde call girl make a perfect match in enraging his landlady.
今のところはすべて申し分無い。Everything is fine so far.
申し訳ありませんが、満席です。I'm sorry, the flight is full.ご迷惑をおかけして、本当に申し訳ありません。I really appreciate all the trouble you've gone to.
申し訳ないけど、できません。I'm sorry, but it's impossible.
もしも別の方法でお手伝いできることがありましたら、ご連絡ください。Please let us know if we can be of help in other ways.
腰痛持ちです。I have back problems.この種の洋服地は持ちがよくないだろう。The suit materials of this sort will not stand up well.
この糸はすぐもつれる。This thread tangles easily.
この子は物覚えが早い。The child is learning quickly.
この若人に対してねたましく思う気持ちを、君はやむを得ないものと受け入れなければならない。You need to come to terms with your jealousy of this young man.

壊れた湯飲みの補充をした。I replaced the broken cups with new ones.





よくも彼女にそんなことがいえるものだ。How dare you say such a thing to her!よくも顔をつぶしてくれたな。You really made me lose face.
汚れに強い合成皮革を使用した２人掛けのソファです。This is a two-seater sofa using stain-resistant artificial leather.
収穫したトマトの中からいいものだけをよって、市場に持って行こう。Let's choose the best of the tomato crop and take them to the market.
その少年は両親を喜ばした。The boy made his parents happy.
彼は利己主義の化身だ。He is the personification of selfishness.

「じゃ留年しなかったら付き合ってくれんの？」「タラレバ話って好きじゃないの」"So, you'll go out with me if I don't have to repeat a year?" "I don't care for 'what if' stories."


君が注意を払っていなかったのは歴然としている。It's quite plain that you haven't been paying attention.
老化を防ぐためにもっと体を動かすべきだ。You have to get more exercise in order to stave off senility.
老眼になってきたようです。I'm getting longsighted as I get older.
麻薬に手を出すとろくなことはない。If you mess with drugs, you're asking for trouble.
路上の血痕は俺のものに違いない。The blood on the road must be mine.




春の雨が花に生気をよみがえらせた。A spring rain revived the flower.





彼女の目から涙がとめどなく流れていた。An endless flow of tears fell from her eyes.
彼はその手品を難無くやって見せた。He performed the trick with ease.
彼女に逃げ道はない。There's no escape for her.

うちの弟は、よく寝ぼけて変なことを言い出す。My little brother gets delirious when he's sleepy. He says the weirdest things.
金融引き締め政策が実施されている。A fiscal tightening policy is being enacted.
彼はひそかにあなたの財産を狙っていますよ。He has designs on your property.
メイドは客を一人一人大声でとりついた。The maid announced each guest.


僕はその問題を黙って見過ごすわけにはいかない。I cannot silently overlook this problem.
間違いをしないようによくよく注意しよう。Let's take the utmost caution against errors.そんな話にだまされるなんて、よくよくおめでたいね。You must be very naive to be taken in by such a story.

僕らの周囲で水はよどんでいた。The water was dead around us.
この先生は「おじさん」という呼び名で通っている。This teacher goes by the name of "Pops."
本が部屋のあちこちに散らばっていた。There were books lying about the room.
彼の言うことはあながち間違っていない。He is not altogether wrong.
「どうしたの？」「あのね、植木の枝の剪定をして欲しかったのよ」"What is it?" "Well, you see, I wanted the shrubs pruned."
クラス会に出席して、昔懐かしい学生時代の思い出があれこれとよみがえった。Our class reunion brought back old memories of when we were students.もうかれこれ１０時です。It is almost ten o'clock.
その問題をうやむやにしておくことはできない。We shouldn't leave the matter unsettled.
御中元や御歳暮の習慣はなかなかすたれない。The gift-giving custom dies hard.
感謝祭のお休み、楽しんでね。Have a nice Thanksgiving!お休み、いい夢たくさん見てね。Good night and sweet dreams.彼女はお母さんにおやすみのキスをした。She kissed her mother good night.
お預けになる荷物はございますか。Do you have any bags to check?
彼は、彼らに親切そのものだった。He was kindness itself to them.
私は古新聞をちり紙と交換した。I traded old newspapers for toilet paper.私はいつもポケットに十分なちり紙を持っています。I always have a good supply of tissues in my pockets.
お見送りくださってどうもありがとう。It's nice of you to see me off.
私は普通日曜は１日ぼんやりやり過ごします。I usually spend the whole day idly on Sunday.
村人たちは、あの世があると思っていた。The villagers believed in life after death.

すぐにお医者さんを呼びなさい。Call the doctor in immediately.

あなたのお帰りを一日千秋の思いでお待ちしています。I can hardly wait till I see you.
先週の日曜日におかしな映画を見た。We saw a funny movie last Sunday.私は彼のおかしな物腰に笑わざるを得ません。I cannot help laughing at his odd manner.
コーヒーのおかわりはいかがですか。Would you like another cup of coffee?
今日ではお手伝いさんを雇う余裕のある人は少ない。Nowadays few people can afford to employ a maid.恐縮ですがお手伝い願えませんか。May I make so bold as to request your assistance?
おはよう。ご飯をよそっても良いかしら？Morning. Shall I dish up?
お坊さんが突然大声で笑い出し、厳粛な雰囲気を台無しにした。All at once, the Buddhist priest burst into laughter, spoiling the solemn atmosphere.

他にその仕事をこなせる人はいないよ。No one else can fill that job.
そうしてくれて君は親切ですね。It is kind of you to do so.
彼の手紙はその事件にそれとなくふれている。His letter alludes to the event.

それにも関わらず彼は試験に合格することができた。And yet he could pass the exam.
彼女は馬鹿らしい質問をされていらいらした。She got rattled by the stupid question.
その犬は車にひかれた。The dog was run over by a car.
私たちは夕立にあって、びしょ濡れになった。We were drenched in the shower.
その件についてあなたのお父さんと面談したい。I'd like to have an interview with your father about the matter.
我々はたくさんの敵をやっつけた。We defeated various enemies.


彼は世間をあっといわせた。He took the public by surprise.
新作の映画で彼はアカデミー賞を得た。His new movie earned him an Academy Award.



カリブ海には島が多い。The Caribbean abounds with islands.

このようなスラム街は市の恥だ。These slums are a disgrace to the city.
チェコスロバキア製のセーターが買いたいのです。I want to buy a Czech sweater.
警官隊はデモ隊と乱闘になった。The police brawled with the demonstrators.





フライ級チャンピオンは強い挑戦者と戦った。The flyweight champion contended with a strong challenger.





夜の静けさの中にいると、平和で安らいだ気持ちになる。In the still of the night I find peace and contentment.
彼と一緒だと安心感がある。I feel secure with him.
おやおや。いかな体育の授業といえど・・・真剣勝負の意気込みで臨まなければ、いざ実戦と言う時に役に立ちませんよ。Well, even if it is just P.E. class, if you don't take it seriously, it won't do you any good in a real match.
禎子の友人達は、彼女と原爆でなくなったすべての子供達の慰霊碑を建てたいと思った。Sadako's friends wanted to build a monument to her and all children who were killed by the atomic bomb.
男性用の衣類はゆったりしている。Men's clothing is loose fitting.



一時期は、コーラにはまって、毎日のように飲んでたよ。For a while, I was really addicted to cola and drank it every day.

マユコは一人暮らしに耐えられない。Mayuko can't bear living alone.
テストで一問も答えられなかった。I couldn't answer any questions on the test.



私はその重い責任を引き受けたくはない。I don't like to take on the heavy responsibilities.


彼女は赤ん坊にミルクを飲ませた。She had her baby drink some milk.
２本も飲めなかったから、１本はあなたに残しておきました。I couldn't drink both bottles, so I left one for you.
「あ、は、はい・・・ごめん、玲姉」「コラ。幾ら親戚とはいえ、私は先輩医師よ？院内ではちゃんとケジメをつけなさい」"Ah, y-yes ... Sorry, Coz." "Hey! You might be my relative but here I'm your senior and a doctor. Keep things straight while you're in the hospital!"

このような名詞句を隠れ疑問文（concealed　question）といいます。This type of noun phrase is called a "concealed question".

日本はすぐに宇宙開発に乗り出すだろう。Japan will soon start to engage in the exploration of the universe.






泳ぎを身につけるのは簡単なことだ。It's a cinch to learn to swim.


ドルに対する円相場があがった。The exchange rate for the yen against the dollar has risen.






私の計画に横やりを入れないでください。Please don't interfere with my plan.



少し仮眠をとるといいですよ。A few hours nap will do you good.

このロボット何でも私の言うことを聞くんだ。疲れて、何にもしたくない時は、助かるね。なんて、ありえない話だよね。This robot does whatever I say. That's a big help when I'm too tired to do anything. Not too likely, huh?


テレビはしばしば家庭内の意思の疎通を妨げるという事実はすでによく知られている。The fact that television frequently limits communication within families is already well known.












ボーイング社は海上自衛隊用の飛行艇を開発しました。Boeing developed a flying boat for the Maritime Self-Defense Force.
海戦に先立って出港したからには、乗組員が船に慣れる時間がないことが、しばしばあるものだ。A sailor frequently has no time to get his sea legs after leaving port before a battle starts.

彼は絵筆をカンバスにさっと走らせた。He swept his brush across the canvas.
開国は日本文明に大きな影響をもたらした。The opening of the country had a great influence on Japanese civilization.


海の氷はきわめて変わりやすい――寒く風のない天候のときは固く凍っているが、嵐のときは外洋の広い水域で割れてしまう。The sea ice is highly variable - frozen solid during cold, calm weather and broken up in large areas of open water during storms.






「失礼ですが」とアンが話に割って入った。"Excuse me," Ann broke in.


彼の大胆な計画は大きな論争を巻き起こした。His bold plan gave rise to much controversy.
君ばかりか僕まで巻き添えを食らった。Not only you but also I was involved.




彼が完全試合を成し遂げるとは、少しも想像できませんでした。Little did I imagine he would achieve a perfect game.

チケットは一週間で完売した。The tickets sold out within a week.

彼らは我々よりも感情的だ。They are more emotional than we.
耳の感染症によくかかります。I often have ear infections.




航空管制官は厳しい精神的緊張にさらされている。Air traffic controllers are under severe mental strain.







館内に案内所がありますか。Is there an information counter?

私は持ち前の頑張りの精神で難関を突破した。I got over the difficulty with my characteristic tenacity.
たまたま彼女とは顔見知りだった。It happened that I knew her by sight.
あの子には大人も顔負けだ。The child puts adults to shame.


この喜ばしい日をお祝いし、幸せと喜びがあなたにきますように。May happiness and joy come to you as you celebrate this joyous day.


多くの人がこの自由の旗印の下に集った。Many people gathered under this banner of freedom.






その電報は彼女を帰郷させるための手であった。The telegram was a trick to get her to come home.


健康を害さないように、常日頃から、体に対して様々な気配りをしています。In my daily life I take care in various ways of my body so as not to damage my health.








全員出席を義務づけられている。Attendance is compulsory for all members.全ての会員に出席が義務付けられている。Every member must attend.









その国は経済の急成長で有名だ。The country is famous for the rapid growth of its economy.



関税引き上げの提案国はお互いに反目しています。Proponents of increased import duties are at odds with each other.


ジョーンはその事故で左腕の骨を折った。Joan broke her left arm in the accident.
















週末に胆石が動いて、七転八倒の苦しみを味わったよ。I spent the weekend writhing in agony when my gallstone started to move.











その災害の被害はべらぼうに大きかった。The damage of the disaster has been enormous.






超自然的な物が存在する。There exist supernatural beings.




それには絶対的で普遍的な意味はない。It has no absolute and universal significance.





知らないほうが幸せな場合には、知ることは愚である。Where ignorance is bliss, 'tis folly to be wise.





肥沃な土壌は豊かな作物を産する。Rich soil yields good crops.
彼はあまりにもひ弱で戸外でゲームをする事はなかった。He was too frail to play games outdoors.












もし他の条件が同じならば、簡明な説明がベストだ。Other things being equal, the simplest explanation is the best.



被弾しました。ダメージは軽微です。We've taken a hit. Trivial damage.












ポールはお金持ちだったが高慢にはならなかった。Paul didn't become arrogant even though he was rich.


只見町は福島県南会津地方にあり、急峻な山を隔てて新潟との県境に位置しています。Tadami is in Minamiaizu in Fukushima; cut off by steep mountains and located on the prefecture border with Niigata.

彼は物静かな人で、良家の出だった。He was a quiet fellow and came from a good family.

そのことは、各研究分担者とこのテーマとの関係を瞥見すれば、おのずから明らかとなる。That fact becomes self evident if you take a look at the relation between this theme and those leading research on it.


彼はその仕事にかけては老練な人だ。He is an old hand at that work.

どこからかハープの流麗な調べが聞こえてきた。They could hear the elegant, flowing sound of a harp coming from somewhere.


暑い季節は、生鮮食品はとても腐りやすい。During hot season, perishables go bad easily.


















多角的に見なければならない。We must examine the various aspects.
大地の色彩は解き放たれた視界の中で高らかに鳴り響き。Shades of earth are ringing through my open view inciting and inviting me.
手荒に扱われたので、カップにはいくつかひびが入っている。Treated roughly, the cup has some cracks.


スティーブはとても嬉しそうに見えた。Steve looked very happy.






条約の精神が没却されていた。The spirit of the treaty was ignored.














警察は山田の挙動を注視している。The police are closely watching Yamada's behaviour.



君は自分の健康を度外視するわけにはいかない。You can't afford to neglect your health.



まあその、自慢できる事でもないんだけど。というか、臆面もなく吹聴できる話でもない。Well, that is, it's not something I can boast about. In fact, it's not something I can talk about in public without shame



いつ返してもらってもいいですよ。その本は布教用に買った本ですから。You can give it back whenever you want to as I bought that book for missionary work.






彼の現実離れした提案はみんなを驚かせた。His impractical proposal astonished us all.








お手紙確かに拝受いたしました。I acknowledged the receipt of your letter.
























また辞去する際に決して忘れないようにすること。It is very important to be careful not to forget them when you leave.
バラは時として自生することがある。The roses sometimes grow wild.










１年次開講の『大学生のための表現法』と２年次開講の『食品化学』の２科目を担当しています。I'm teaching two courses, year one's "Self-expression for University Students" and year two's "Food Chemistry".




部活のかけもち、大変だと思うけどがんばれよ。I'm sure it's tough taking part in the activities of two clubs, but good luck!

おそらく自分には半覚醒の時間があり、そのため１日を短く感じている。It's quite possible that there are times I am half awake, and thus the day feels shorter.













私ほど彼に敬服しているものはありません。No one admires him more than I do.











非行、学校嫌い、人格の未発達などの問題が現在以上に顕在化してくることが懸念される。We are concerned about the further actualization of current problems among youth, such as truancy, dislike of school and lack of appropriate character development.











彼はその結果に気落ちしている。He's depressed about the result.








こんなきつい仕事はこりごりだ。I can't stand an awful sweat like this.
彼は次のバス停で降車した。He got off at the next stop.


















彼らは湖で水浴びをした。They bathed in the lake.











落馬の結果足を折った。The fall from the horse resulted in a broken leg.
その一件はめでたく落着するだろう。The affair will come to a happy conclusion.













老衰するな！老成せよ！Don't grow old, grow wise!








ディビッドは今まで安定したくらしはなかった。彼はいつもやりくり算段の生活をしてきた。David has never had a steady job. He has always lived by his wits.



大病からようやく生還した私の目には、森羅万象が美しく映った。Since I recovered from my serious illness, all of creation is beautiful to me.

さっき、なかなか起きなかったのも、折檻して欲しかったからでしょう？The reason you didn't wake up just now was because you wanted me to punish you, right?













彼は危険に直面してしり込みした。He shrank back in the face of danger.






















２日で３つの州を走破した。We covered three states in two days.





いきなり本人に誰何するのも無粋と考えました。I thought it would be boorish to challenge his identity without warning.

顧問は学長を推戴し、本会の重要事項に関し諮問に応じる。The consultant, who is under the authority of the Chancellor, gives the committee advice on important questions.

その将軍は退役後ひっそり余生を送った。The general lived the rest of his life peacefully after his retirement.












展覧された絵のかなり多くが開会初日に売れた。A good many of the pictures on exhibition were sold on the opening day.
そのレースでは３人も転倒した。No less than 3 men fell in that race.本末を転倒するな。Don't put the cart before the horse.


その警官は、その日は当直であった。The policeman was on duty on that day.暴動が起こったとき、当直の監視員はたった１人だった。There was only one warden on duty when the riot started.
彼らはエベレストに初登頂した。They made first ascent of Mount Everest.



１９４５年広島に原子爆弾が投下された。An atomic bomb was dropped on Hiroshima in 1945.











私は前任者の方針を踏襲する考えです。I intend to follow my predecessor's policy.
「刀の投擲の練習？」「すっぽ抜けただけです」"Practising sword throwing?" "It just slipped out of my hands."
その医者はどの薬を投与すべきかを決める前に慎重に考える。The doctor thinks carefully before deciding what medicine to give.
この本を通読するのに５時間かかりました。It took me five hours to read through this book.













彼は宇宙を遊泳した最初の人間だった。He was the first man to float in space.




テレビを点け、彼女がブラウン管の前で遊弋している。「おい、飯だぞ？」Television turned on, she patrols in front of the CRT. "Hey you, food's up!"






人工干潟を造成する試みが全国的に展開されている。Artificial tidelands are being developed on a country-wide basis.








地球上にはたくさんの文化がある。There are many cultures on Earth.





空気中のごく小さい粒子がガンのもとになり得る。Tiny particles in the air can cause cancer.ある調査によると、今日では５人中３人が外交問題には無関心のようだ。According to a survey, three in five people today are indifferent to foreign affairs.１０人中３人はビデオを持っている。Three out of ten persons have a video.






かぜの治療には蜂蜜入りのホットレモンがよく効く。Hot lemon with honey is a good remedy for colds.
彼は生え抜きの外交官として一生の大部分を送ってきた。He has spent most of his time as a career diplomat.



偶然、はるかかなたを友人が歩いているのが見えた。It happened that I saw my friend walking in the distance.


その色白の女の子は１９歳でとおっている。The girl with fair skin passes for nineteen.






もっとも重要な点は、エメットの理論が物理学の従前の理論と矛盾しないということである。It is that Emmet's theory is compatible with previous theories in physics that is of most significance.











それは木製ですか、それとも金属製ですか。Is it made of wood or metal?

大型と小型の２台の飛行機が、ハンガー内で停止していました。Two airplanes, one large and one small, were at rest in the hangar.



私はこの種の鳥は見たことがない。I've never seen this sort of bird.




虹は空に弓じょうにかかる。The rainbow forms an arc in the sky.


彼の言ったことは的はずれだった。What he said was beside the point.
君と一緒に行きたいけれど文無しなんだ。I want to go with you, but I'm broke.






この薩摩芋は生焼けでがりがりする。This sweet potato is only half-baked and is still crunchy.



天の川は、遠方の星が巨大な帯状に見えるものであって、その１つ１つは、われわれの知る太陽に似たものである。The Milky Way is a vast belt of distant stars, each star a sun like ours.


彼がおまちかねよ。He is impatient to see you.

彼は男まさりの姉に育てられた。He was bought up by his strong willed sister.

奥さんのがみがみ小言にフレッドさんは大弱りの体であった。Fred was very troubled by his wife's nagging.





そのため、いつも清新な雰囲気に包まれますが、今回もその通りの充実した一日となりました。For that reason it's always held in a fresh atmosphere, and this time too it was a fulfilling day.
木造の家は石造の家よりも燃えやすい。A wooden house burns more easily than a stone house.








彼らの雇い人は住み込みだ。Their employees live in.
乱交パーティーの中で、めぐみはすっぱだかで芝生を走り回った。During the orgy Megumi ran naked round the lawn.
このみかんは食べ頃だ。These oranges are good to eat.







ジョンは今お手すきですか。I'd like to speak to John.


「都庁舎でもらえますよ」と係員が付け加えた。"You can get it at the Metropolitan Government Office," the clerk added.

彼らは粒よりの兵士だ。They are picked soldiers.







確かに彼女は絶世の美人です。It is true; she is a rare beauty.



赤旗が危険があることを示していた。The red flag indicated the presence of danger.

彼は何をしても飽きっぽい。Whatever he takes up, he gets soon tired of it.
運命に甘んじるくらいなら自殺したほうがいい。I would rather kill myself than reconcile myself to my fate.










息子のことを考えると頭が痛い。My son is my biggest headache.

操り人形はワイヤーで動く。Puppets work with wires.





初日から番狂わせが多かった。There were many upsets right from the first day.

彼の馬は３馬身の差で勝った。His horse won by three lengths.
日本の金を米貨と交換した。They exchanged Japanese money for American.


琵琶湖は日本で一番大きな湖です。Lake Biwa is the largest lake in Japan.








私はあなたのために一生を棒にふるのはいやです。I do not want to waste the best years of my life for you.







部活のかけもち、大変だと思うけどがんばれよ。I'm sure it's tough taking part in the activities of two clubs, but good luck!




両国間の文化交流が進むにしたがって、相互理解も一段と深まっていった。As cultural exchange continued between the two countries, their mutual understanding became even deeper.




















私は肝臓の病歴がある。I have a history of liver trouble.
彼女は献身的に病身の父親に仕えた。She waited on her sick father hand and foot.


パイロットは完璧な着地をした。The pilot made a perfect three-point landing.













軍隊はその地歩を保った。The troops maintained their ground.



ピックは硬い地表を砕くために用いられる長い取っ手の道具だ。A pick is a long handled tool used for breaking up hard ground surfaces.

家の地階に問題があるようだ。The basements of the houses are likely to have problems.


















あそこの食べ物はうまいし値段も安いが、地の利が悪いのが難点だね。That place's food is great, and their prices are good, but the fly in the ointment is their terrible location.



彼の治世の次の十年間の政治的状況は、控え目に言っても極度に不安定であった。The political situation was, to say the least, extremely unstable during the next ten years of his reign.

彼は知識欲が旺盛である。He is in a rage to know.












彼らは税金を逃れるために帳じりをごまかした。They falsified the account balances to evade the tax.










父は長命だった。Father enjoyed a long life.






丈の長い黒いコートを着た、あの長身の男だった。It was the tall man in the long, black coat.








忠犬ハチ公の像は渋谷駅前に立っている。The statue of Hachiko, the faithful dog, stands in front of Shibuya Station.

所属していた組織に対する、長期間に渡る忠勤ぶりにもかかわらず、彼が報われたのは僅かな金額に過ぎなかった。For his length of loyal service to his organization, he was only repaid in chicken feed.
















しかし、私たちが口にする第一声は「こんにちは」だ。But the first thing we say is "hello."
乾いてぼそぼそになったパンをかみながらの山の旅で、大蛇にあった。While on a mountain trip, I was chewing on some hard, stale bread when I happened upon a huge snake.



そして第三が地球環境の保全であり、省エネルギー、省資源型の生活を送る仕組みが必要となる。The third is the preservation of environment. In this case, the conservation of energy and resources is needed.








火の暖気で彼女のほおが赤く染まった。Her cheeks were tinged with red by the warmth of fire.




ゴムのボールは弾力性があるから弾む。A rubber ball bounces because it is elastic.









１０人の囚人たちが脱獄した。Ten prisoners broke out of jail.
ダイエット中脱力感がでます、どうすればよい？I feel lethargic when I diet, what should I do?




一日中コンピューターに向かってるから、結構電磁波浴びてる。I sit in front of a computer screen all day, so I get pretty heavily bombarded by electro-magnetic waves.




でしゃばるのは慎んでください。Please refrain from pushing forward.













私は独力でその仕事を終えた。I finished the work by myself.





この霧では道路標識は見えない。I can't see the road signs in this fog.











枝毛に悩んでいます。I'm troubled by split ends.
向こうに見えるのがエッフェル塔です。That tower you see over there is the Eiffel Tower.


このビタミン剤は栄養分を豊富に含んでいる。The vitamin pill contains abundant nutrition.






その双子はさやの中の２つのえんどう豆のように似ている。The twins are as alike as two peas in a pod.
彼は縁の下の力持ちだ。He is an unsung hero.




彼は見よう見まねでゴルフを覚えた。He learned golf by watching others and following their example.


コンピューターを使う人は多くの流行語を用いるが、他の人が理解できるかどうかは怪しいものだ。Computer users have so many buzzwords, it's a wonder if anyone else can understand them.



















スイスは風光の美で有名である。Switzerland is famous for its scenic beauty.



この服地は１ヤード単位で売られている。This cloth is sold by the yard.








にんにくは食事の風味を増す。Garlic enhances the flavor of meals.


上手な船乗りはほんの短時間で船になれる。A good sailor only requires a short time to get his sea legs.











内閣が触れを回した。The Cabinet sent round an official notice.彼女は彼に赤ちゃんに触れさせなかった。She didn't let him touch her baby.




この二人の兄弟は風采が全く違う。The two brothers are quite unlike in their appearance.




しかし、彼女が一つ目のグラスを持ち上げ、水をこぼした後では二つ目のグラスはどうするであろうか。But after she does that with the first glass, what is she going to do with the second one?
















私たちは岐阜に行った。We went to Gifu.


ふさふさとしたまっすぐな銀髪をしていました。He had a lot of straight, silvery hair.


























日本の多くの河川は工場の廃液で汚染されている。Many rivers in Japan are polluted by waste water from factories.


敗軍の将兵を語らず。It is not for the vanquished to talk of war.


Ｌｏｏｋは廃刊になった。The magazine Look is no longer being published.





彼は廃屋に隠れた。He hid in an abandoned building.





その映画の配役が決まった。They have cast the movie.

文句を言っても始まらないだろ。Complaining won't change anything.
「はじめまして、ジェイムズさん」「こちらこそ、あなたにお会いできて、こんなに嬉しいことはありません」"Pleased to meet you, Mr. James." "The pleasure is all mine. It's an honor to make your acquaintance."
彼女は恥じらいの色を隠すために顔をそむけた。She turned away to hide her blushes.





私は薄給で何とか暮らしています。I manage to live on a small income.

いよいよ薄暮、もうすぐ宵闇。It's getting more and more shadowy, soon it will be twilight.




それを実験するのは薄氷を踏む思いだったよ。While I was at it, I felt as if I was walking on thin ice.
下記の指示に従いさえすれば、すぐに白票と同様に容易かつ迅速にフルカラーの書類を印刷することができる。Simply follow the instructions below, and in no time you will be printing full color documents just as easily and quickly as black and white.
美人薄命とはいうけれど。ということは、内のかみさんは長生きだな。Beautiful women die young - or so the saying goes. If so then my wife is going to live a long life.






スミス夫妻は家を白色に塗ってもらってた。The Smiths had their house painted white.







あの犬を放し飼いにしておくのは危険だ。That dog is too dangerous to be left loose.
アパートの部屋代についてはすぐ話がついた。We soon agreed on a rent for the apartment.








腹が減っては戦ができぬ。An army travels on its stomach.

彼の振る舞いに腹が立った。I was offended at his behavior.



いやあ、見事に晴れ渡った秋の日になったね。これが台風一過というやつかね。What a glorious fall day. This is what they mean by the lovely weather you get after a storm.

母は針仕事で忙しかった。Mother busied herself with sewing.








彼女が初舞台を踏んだのは1969年であった。Her first appearance on the stage was in 1969.



早い話が彼は首になったのだ。To cut a long story short, he was fired.

この花は早咲きだ。These flowers bloom earlier than others do.




州教育委員会はある学校を閉校したいと思っていますが、その考えに同意しない人々もいます。The Council Education Committee wants to close a school, but some people don't agree with the idea.

この鉱山は来月閉山になる。This mine will close down next month.






たまたま彼は今日は非番だ。It chances that he is off duty today.



被弾しました。ダメージは軽微です。We've taken a hit. Trivial damage.



摩擦でマッチに火がつくようになる。Friction causes a match to light.









レフトが好走して大飛球を捕った。The left fielder ran hard and caught the long fly.



ひなびた温泉が好きです。I like hot springs off the beaten track.


彼の品行は厳しい非難を免れない。His conduct is open to grave objection.





その病人の生命は危険にひんしている。The sick man's life is in danger.




女房の尻にしかれている亭主は、幸せな独り者に話してはじめて、自分の問題を認識することがたびたびだ。Many times, a hen-pecked husband doesn't know his problems until he talks to a happy bachelor.









首相は報道陣と会見した。The Prime Minister met with the press.
彼は私よりも砲丸を遠くまで投げた。He put the shot farther than I did.













その会合で最初の演説をしたのはほかならぬかの有名なクリント＝イーストウッドだった。The first speech was given at the convention by none other than Clint Eastwood, the famous actor.
その息子は放校された。His son was expelled from school.

彼は放漫だったので失脚した。He lost his job through his irresponsibility.



彼は自分の本分を踏み外したことがない。He has never swayed from his duty.
英国本土はウェールズを含まない。England proper does not include Wales.
初めは非常に骨が折れた。I had great difficulty at the beginning.
彼はなかなか骨っぽい男だ。He is a man of spirit.
浪士は本懐を遂げた。The rōnin attained their long-cherished ambition.

本末を転倒するな。Don't put the cart before the horse.











先生も連休をエンジョイしたかったが、どっかの６人組の補習やら準備やらで連休無かったぞ！I also wanted to enjoy the break, but thanks to preparation and supplementary lessons for a certain six-man team, I got none!

















彼はうちの社員の中でも一頭地を抜く存在として一目置かれている。Among our employees he's recognized as a towering figure.

出で立ちが何となく貴族っぽいような気がする。His dress somehow gives an aristocratic impression.













彼はトラの頭を射抜いた。He shot a tiger through the head.







色あせたジーンズは今でも流行っている。Faded jeans are still in fashion.













アメリカに行くには大洋を横断しなければなりません。You have to cross the ocean to get to America.






貧しい老父が王様に拝見を許された。A humble-looking old man was presented to the king.

その老夫婦には子供がなかった。The old couple had no children.
いつごろ返事をいただけますか。When will you give me your answer?














けど、一晩加湿器つけっぱなしで朝になると窓が結露してドボドボ・・・。But because the humidifier is on all night, in the morning the condensation pours off the windows.






あなたに頼んでもよろしいですか。May I request a favour of you?


これは面白い本だよ。This is an interesting book.これは兄です。かっこいいですね。This is my brother. Handsome, isn't he?私はこれからは英語を一生懸命勉強します。I will study English hard from now on.












その会社には会社の付属病院が３つある。The company has three hospitals of its own.



その少年の髪は金髪でもじゃもじゃだ。The boy has a shock of blond hair.
よりによってこんなところで君に会うなんて。Of all places to meet you!



安倍内閣は、自由民主党、公明党を与党とする連立内閣である。The Abe Cabinet is a coalition Cabinet where the Liberal Democratic Party and New Komei Party form the government.

















足の裏は暑さや寒さに対して鈍い。Soles of the feet are insensitive to heat and cold.









彼女は体重を減らすためにソフトドリンクの代わりに水を飲むことにした。She decided to drink water instead of soft drinks in order to lose weight.

豹はその斑点を変えることはできない。A leopard cannot change his spots.









私はずっと竜が見たかったのですが、竜は現実の生物ではないのです。I have always wanted to see a dragon, but dragons are not real creatures.

彼らは王の殺害をたくらんでいる。They are plotting to kill the king.

このチョッキは前が合わない。This waistcoat won't meet at the front.


ソファーのクッションはひじ掛けいすのクッションとは調和しない。The cushions on the sofa don't match those on the armchairs.
ここに受取人の名前を書いてください。Write the recipient's name here, please.


生年月日は１９６０年２月１４日です。I was born on February 14, 1960.
シングルの部屋を２４日から２泊お願いしたいのですが。I'd like a single from the 24th for two nights.

いとこのテディーは大学でフランス語を専攻し、パリで１年間勉強しました。My cousin Teddy majored in French in college and studied in Paris for one year.







彼はその場逃れの言い訳をした。He made an excuse just to suit the occasion.

するとサルは、小さなブリキのコップを持って歩き回りました。Then the monkey went round with a little tin cup.









屋根裏部屋のネズミを退治しなくてはと彼はいっている。He says he must get rid of the mice that are in the attic.














貴君に、この統合軍の指揮をとってもらいたい。We want you to take command of this unified force.




彼女は有機化学を専攻している。She majors in organic chemistry.











それまで！２人ともなかなか力演でした。OK, stop there! That was a strong performance from the two of you.













彼女はなかなかあか抜けている。She is a polished lady.

どうして私が彼の居場所を知っていようか。How should I know where he is?
その部屋は居心地の良い感じがした。The room had a nice cozy feel.

好奇の視線と、若干の殺意のこもった視線・・・言うまでもなく居心地が悪いことこの上ない。Curious gazes, gazes carrying a bit of murderous intent...it goes without saying that I couldn't be more uncomfortable.
その巨木の枝が池に覆いかぶさっていた。The boughs of the large tree overhung the pond.
環境を救うために、みんなが拠出も含めた協力をしなければならないでしょう。Everybody will have to pitch in to save the environment.


いくつかのチームがその賞を勝ち取ろうと競い合っています。Several teams are contending for the prize.

本命と対抗馬が競り合ったお陰で、ダークホースの彼が漁夫の利を得たってわけだ。Since the favorite and his rival were running against each other a dark horse like him was able to pull out in front.
競走馬は互角でトラックをまわった。The horses are coming down the track and it's neck and neck.




教育委員会が学校を管理している。The Board of Education governs the schools.
タイレルの調査で収集されたデータは、管理者にとっても教育者にとっても非常に価値の高いものである。The data collected in Tyrel's research is of great value both to administrators and to educators.


従業員は共済手当を守るために、ストライキのおどしをかけました。Employees threatened a strike to protect worker benefits.
報復のおどかしが交渉を妨げています。Threats of retaliation are blocking negotiations.








男はその老婦人から金品を強奪したことを白状した。The man confessed that he had robbed the old woman.




バッターは空振りの三振をした。The batter struck out swinging.
アメリカは最後の手段としてしかその国を空爆しないだろう。The USA will only use air strikes in the country as a last resort.












そういうことは計画的というよりむしろ偶然に起こることがしばしばある。Such things often happen by accident rather than by design.












彼女は健康食品に関心を持っている。She is concerned with health foods.



検察官が容疑者に詰め寄った。The prosecutors pressed the suspect for an answer.






背後に見え隠れするのは近年の不動産不況だ。What slips in and out of view in the background is the real estate slump of recent years.




２人の兵士が、門のところで見張りをしていた。Two soldiers kept guard at the gate.
その建物は右側にあります。見逃しっこありません。The building is on your right. You can't miss it.







泥棒は現行犯でつかまった。The thief was caught in the act.

現段階ではその問題についてコメントできません。At this point, I'm unable to comment on that problem.
言い残したことはもうほとんどない。Little remains to be said.



私は古新聞をちり紙と交換した。I traded old newspapers for toilet paper.
私の名前が暗闇の中で二度呼ばれるのが聞こえた。I heard my name called twice in the dark.バラは花の女王と呼ばれている。The rose is called the queen of flowers.私たちは今晩食事に呼ばれました。We have been invited to dinner this evening.

ある戸別訪問のセールスマンがお人好しの老婦人を馬鹿にして大金を持ち逃げした。A certain door-to-door salesman made a fool of a trusting old lady and went off with a lot of her money.






父の髪は白髪交じりになった。My father's hair has become streaked with gray.





公定歩合の引き下げは産業界を苦しめてきた厳しい金融逼迫を緩和するだろうと期待されている。The bank rate cut is expected to relieve the severe financial squeeze that has hit industry.

市の産業はみんな好景気に沸いている。All the industries in the city are booming.

彼の努力が好成績に結びついた。His efforts led to good results.
この好天が続けば豊作になるだろう。We'll have a good crop if this good weather keeps up.






彼は興奮して顔が紅潮した。He was flushed with excitement.


会社の経営が行き詰まってきたのよ。The company is at the end of its rope.
落ち目って言うけど、まだイケるよね。They say it's on the wane, but it's still got something, hasn't it?
行楽地は観光客でいっぱいだ。Resort areas abound in tourists.
楽団は行進曲を何曲か演奏した。The band played several marches.
行政機関には非常に厳格な階級制度がある。There's a very rigid hierarchy in the Civil Service.



別の手立てを講じるだろう。They will lay another scheme.
適切なときに適切な措置を講ずるべきです。You should take the appropriate measures at the appropriate time.

この降りでは彼は来ない。He won't come in a rain like this.
彼は降格されたことを達観している。He's quite philosophical about his demotion.



どの家も人に憚る秘密がある。Every family has a skeleton in the closet.憎まれっ子世に憚る。Ill weeds grow apace.






店の連中がいつもあたふたしているのを知っていたからチップをグラスの下に置いたのだ。I put the tip under two glasses because I knew they were always in a hurry.


いやはや、こんなにはっきりものを言う秘書は初めてだ。Do you know, girl, that you're the first secretary I've ever had who stood up to me?
その音楽は少女たちをうっとりさせるだろう。The music will carry away the girls.私は彼の新車をうっとりして眺めていた。I was admiring his new car.

おいおい、一枚看板のお前が来れないんじゃ、今日の合コン盛り上がらないよ。We're counting on you to be the life of the party. It'll bomb if you don't come.犬が死んだ時彼はおいおいと泣いた。When his dog died, he cried his heart out.
会社に入ってきたばかりの新人は何をするにもオズオズしている。New hires who just joined the company do everything in this timid manner.
有名になったのでお高くとまっているんだよ。He's letting his fame go to his head.
返品お断り。No merchandise can be returned.

悪魔の話をすると彼の骨がカタカタいう音が聞こえる。When you talk of the devil you will hear his bones rattle.

催促がましくて恐縮ですが、先日お貸ししたお金を返していただけませんか。I'm afraid this sounds like a demand, but could you return the money I lent you the other day?
私が早く去るので彼らは残念がった。My leaving early made them feel sorry.

ほらっ、キリキリ歩くっ！Come on, get walking!


青二才のくせに何を言うか。That's big talk for an upstart like you.


標高がぐんと高くなると呼吸困難を感じる。In high altitudes, people find it hard to breathe.

ちょいとここらで河岸をかえましょうや。Let's get out of here.ここらで１０分、休憩しようじゃないか。Why don't we take a 10-minute break here?


刺激を受け続けると肌の保護作用により角質が肥厚して、ゴワゴワしたり硬くなって、毛穴が目立ってきます。If it continues to be stimulated the skin's protective function causes thickening and it becomes stiff and hard with pores that stand out.

ざあっと雨が降ってきた。Down came the rain in torrents.

その知らせを聞いて、皆シーンとしてしまった。A blanket of silence fell over everyone when they heard the disappointing announcement.いくつかのシーンがオリジナルから外された。Several scenes have been cut from the original.

背筋をしゃんと伸ばして歩きなさい。Carry your head high.
ニクソンはオフィスに盗聴器をしかけておきながらシラを切ったので見付かった。Nixon was caught lying because he bugged his own office.
シンと静まった部室。響くのは、クロッキー帳に擦れる鉛筆の音だけ。The club room returned to quiet. All that could be heard was the sound of pencil on sketchpad.

あなたはみんなの中でずば抜けて上手に泳ぐ。You are by far the best swimmer of us all.

望遠鏡で見ると、それはたいまつであることがわかった。It was identified by telescope as a torch.
時計がたった今十時を打った。The clock has just struck ten.

みんなクリスマスに小雪がちらつくのを望んでいた。Everyone hoped for a snow flurry for Christmas.
試験結果発表もつつがなく終わって、当面の視点が自然と夏休みに集まってくるでしょ？The publication of the exam results over without incident, for the time being attention is naturally going to focus on the summer break, right?


僕はスーザンに謝ろうと電話したのに、彼女ときたら一方的に電話を切っちゃったんだ。I called Susan to apologize to her, but she hung up on me.
アインシュタインにとって理論物理学は遊びのようなものだったが、そんな彼も税金の計算となるとからきし駄目だった。Theoretical physics was child's play to Einstein, but he couldn't figure out his income tax.

パターソン博士：いいですとも。ココの猫好きを知っていますか。Dr. Patterson: Sure. Do you know about Koko's love for cats?どんなことが起ころうとも落ち着いていなさい。Stay calm whatever happens.

どうかドアを閉めてくれませんか。Will you please shut the door?

車をどかしてくれませんか。Would you move your car, please?
切れた血管から血がどくどくと流れ出た。Blood poured from the cut vein.
車がどしんと木にぶつかった。The car banged itself against a tree.

これは私が見た中で一番どっしりとした建造物です。This is the most massive structure I have ever seen.

道はなだらかな上がりになっていた。The road climbed gradually.日本における今年の賃上げはなだらかなものだった。Wage settlements in Japan this year were moderate.

彼女は私を見てにこりとさえしなかった。She did not so much as smile at me.
猫はにゃーにゃーいいつづけた。The cat continued to mew.

９時までにそこに行かなければなりません。I must get there by 9 o'clock.
泳ぎ手は頭を上げて、はあはあと息を吸った。The swimmer raised his head and gasped for breath.


彼女は美しいばかりでなく才能もあった。She was not merely beautiful, but also talented.

道でばったり彼女に会いましてね。I just ran into her on the street.



彼女は彼にぴょこんとおじぎをした。She bobbed at him.


そして、どうすることも出来ない物憂さに、ふっとため息をつく。And then I breathe a sigh from melancholy in being unable to do anything about it.その金を見ると彼はふっと盗みたくなった。The sight of the money tempted him into stealing.

「じつは自由研究で相談したいことがあって・・・」「どれ・・・。ふーん、被子植物について調べてるのね」"Well, there's something I'd like your advice on about my research project ..." "Let's see... Hmm, you're investigating flowering plants then."
あなたは本当に不器用ですね。You are really clumsy, aren't you!

彼らは私の顔に水をぶっかけた。They dashed water into my face.


各会員は会費を払うべし。Each member has to pay a membership fee.

その内気な少年はぼそぼそと自分の名前をつぶやいた。The shy boy murmured his name.外米はぼそぼそしていて、日本人の口には合わない。Foreign rice is hard and tasteless, and doesn't appeal to the Japanese palate.

鼻が出ているよ。かみなさい。Your nose is running. Blow it.
怒りっぽい人は１０まで数えるようにすべきだ。そうすれば油が風波をしずめるように、むしゃくしゃした気持ちはおさまる。A man who angers easily should learn to count to ten - it calms trouble like pouring oil on troubled waters.

私はむらむらとその本が買いたくなった。I was seized with the desire to buy the book.「それよりそのカッコ・・・水着！？」「そうよ。イケてるでしょー！？ムラムラする〜？」"Never mind that, what's with that get up ... a swimming suit!?" "That's right. Sexy isn't it? Feeling horny?"

暗闇の中で何かがもぞもぞと動いていた。Something was stirring in the dark.
疲れやら空腹やらで、彼は死んだように倒れた。What with fatigue and hunger, he fell down as if he were dead.さて。その言葉に信を置いてよいものやら。Well now. Are those words to be trusted I wonder?
私は鳩たちがその箱の上によじ登ったご褒美に餌を与えた。I rewarded my pigeons with food for climbing onto the box.
彼は小型トラックとよれよれの大きな芝刈り機をもっていた。He had an old pickup truck and a big, battered mower.


君はあくまで意地を張るのだね。You're never going to give in, are you?




彼は眼鏡ごしに彼女を見た。He looked at her over his glasses.

彼は横にばったり倒れた。He fell flat on the floor.彼らは３人横に並んで歩いていた。They were walking three abreast.

私は走る前に、体をほぐすのにちょっと体操をする。I like to do a few exercises to loosen up before I run.


彼は帽子をかぶり、外套を着たままで部屋の中に飛び込んできた。He ran into the room with his hat and overcoat on.
彼は上着を鉤にかけた。He hung his coat on a hook.
彼が現れるとパーティーは活気づいた。His appearance animated the party.
使っている鎌は光る。A sickle that gets used shines.
彼はテーブルの上にひと箱の紙巻タバコを置いた。He put a pack of cigarettes on the table.
その男は頑としてその職にしがみつき、決して退職しようとはしなかった。The man held on to his job stubbornly and would not retire.
彼は他の事に気を取られている。He is preoccupied with something else.


彼女は今にも泣き出しそうだった。She was on the verge of crying.



彼女は金切り声を上げて、気絶した。She screamed and fainted.
お金を借りようと思ってかけずり回った。I ran all over town trying to borrow some money.

カレンの裾が捲れている。Karen's skirt is riding up.



「あなたを愛しているのよ」と言わんばかりに彼女は僕にウィンクした。She winked at me, as much as to say, I love you.
多くの科学者は世間に変人呼ばわりされている。Many scientists have the reputation of being eccentric.

それは部屋というよりはむしろ広間だ。It is a hall rather than a room.

米の生産高は減ってきた。Production of rice has decreased.
スーが彼のプロポーズを受け入れたのにはたまげた。I'm amazed Sue accepted his proposal.



もし酸素がなかったら、すべての動物はとうに消滅していただろう。Without oxygen, all animals would have disappeared long ago.
４．煮え立たせる寸前で弱火にして、もう一度灰汁を取り除きます。4. Just before bringing it to the boil, set to a low flame and remove the scum again.
あの詐欺師と金髪のコールガールは下宿のおかみさんを怒らせるには申分のない取り合わせだ。The confidence man and his blonde call girl make a perfect match in enraging his landlady.


今までそのなぞを首尾よく解いた人はいなかった。No one has succeeded in solving the mystery.



鉦や太鼓で探しあてた割には、あいつ期待はずれだったよな。He turned out to be a real disappointment after we went through hell and high water to find him.
ドアにかんぬきをし、錠をかけた。We barred the door and locked it.ラベルには１回２錠と書いてある。It says on the label to take two tablets.
彼らはそのころ暮らし向きが悪かった。They were badly off at that time.
彼女は辛抱強く彼を待った。She waited for him with patience.







かいつまんで話せば、すべてがうまく行った。To make a long story short, everything went fine.
この草地には蛙がうようよいる。This meadow abounds in frogs.
８時も過ぎたのでその日は打ち切りにした。As it was past 8 p.m. we called it a day.
試合が始まるのが待ちきれなかった。I was impatient for the game to start.
彼はひどく急いで大またで道を歩いた。He strode along the road in a great hurry.

腐ったリンゴが１つあるとたる全体がだめになる。One rotten apple spoils the barrel.
彼は階段を一度に三段ずつかけあがった。He jumped up the steps three at a time.


バットを長めに持ってください。Please hold your bat by the end of its handle.「この髪型にしてもらえますか？」「前髪を短く、横は長めにお願いします」"Can you cut it like this, please?" "A little shorter in the front and a little longer on the sides, please."
この定めから逃れないといけない。I need to escape from this decree.



彼の無作法は仲間を怒らせた。His gross manners offended his companions.彼は肩を怒らせて歩いていた。He was walking with his shoulders squared.彼女は眼を怒らせて私をにらみ付けた。She glared at me with angry eyes.



立て板に水の如きプレゼンテーション、おそれ入りました。Your presentation was so smooth and fluent - what can I say?
ボートは波立つ水の上で揺れ動いた。The boat danced on the choppy water.
この布はすぐ破ける。This cloth tears easily.




地面は一面に落ち葉が敷き詰められたようだった。The ground was blanketed with fallen leaves.
この敷物はカーテンと合わない。This carpet does not match the curtain.


その残酷な男は犬をムチで打った。The cruel man beat the dog with a whip.シンガポールでは罪人の背中を鞭で打ったり、杖で何度か叩いたりする。In Singapore, one method of punishing criminals is to whip them, or hit them several times on the back with a cane.
彼は両手で頭をかかえこんだ。He buried his head in his hands.
株式市場は魔の市場だとよく言われる。The stock market is often called a dangerous one.まずいよ。また遅刻だ！！はやくも遅刻魔の異名をとってしまう。Oh no! I'm late again!! I'm going to get the nickname 'King of Late arrival'.
かわいそうな事にその老いた女性はまたもバッグを盗まれた。The poor old woman had her bag stolen again.

その子供は時計を面白がって分解した。He took the clock apart just for fun.

彼女は試験で四問目をぬかしてしまった。She left out the fourth question on the examination.
今日は我々は野宿しないといけない。Today, we have to sleep outdoors.
叔父は新しい冒険的事業を始める矢先だ、と言っている。My uncle says he's about to embark on a new business venture.
私が返事をしようとした矢先に、彼が口を出してきた。I was about to reply, when he boldly cut in.





彼は日本文化のよさを認めています。He appreciates Japanese culture.
それは私の領分ですよ。That's my province.


記念碑の一番上で禎子が頭の上に金の鶴をかざしている。On top of the statue, Sadako is holding a golden crane over her head.市長は片手を目にかざした。The mayor screened his eyes with his hand.
いやしくもやるからには上手くやれ。If you do it at all, do it well.

藪をつついてヘビを出す。It's not good to wake a sleeping snake.
谷には星をちりばめたように黄色い花が咲いていた。The valley was starred with yellow flowers.

誰も洞穴を見つけ出すことはできなかった。No one could find the cave.

でかしたね。ご両親もさぞかし鼻が高いでしょうね。Well done! Your parents must be proud of you.


庭は草むしりが必要だ。The garden needs to be weeded.

彼女は何の断りもなしに私の車を運転した。She drove my car without so much as asking.

彼はシャーウッドの森を突っ切って通り抜けて行った。He cut through Sherwood Forest.


ありったけの金を彼女に与えた。I gave her all the money I had.




この種の専門知識は日常生活とはほとんど関係がない。This kind of specialized knowledge has very little to do with daily life.




ときたま彼から便りがあります。I hear from him once in a while.
たまには会いに来て下さい。Come and see me once in a while.











図体ばかり大きいから喧嘩強そうだが、実際喧嘩弱いだろ。He's just got a large build, so he looks like he'd be a fighter, but he's probably really a pushover.




赤信号で通りを渡るのは危険だ。It's dangerous for you to cross the street when the light is red.それは実業人にとって一つの赤信号になる。It raises a red flag for businessmen.
彼は老母を養うために一生懸命働いている。He works hard to support his aged mother.
開発者は集合体として以下の権限を持つ。３：１の賛成多数をもって、この憲章を修正できる。Together, the developers may amend this constitution, provided a 3:1 majority is in agreement.


彼はその家族にいとまごいをした。He took leave of the family.











だんだん地金が出てきた。His true colors are coming out.




どういった時事が公務員試験で出題されるのか。What sort of current affairs appear in the civil service examination?



彼女は実権のない重役に祭り上げられました。She got kicked upstairs to an executive position.











その推理小説は地の文よりも会話の部分の方が多い。The mystery contains more dialogue than narrative.




私の持論の一つは、物事は少しはなれたところから見るべきだということである。A pet theory of mine is that things should be seen from a distance.

おそらく彼らは自分たちの体にこの磁力線を感じることができるのでしょう。Perhaps they can feel the lines with their bodies.
私たちは時流とともに進まなければならない。We must keep up with the times.



会議は次週再開の予定で散会した。The meeting was adjourned until the following week.







この磁鉄鉱は地球の磁場に引きつけられる。The magnetite is attracted to the earth's magnetic field.
趣味と実益とを結びつけることはやさしくない。It is not easy to combine hobbies with profits.


























日本人は主に米を常食とする。The Japanese live mainly on rice.





文法事項としては、現在完了の受動態が含まれています。The grammar section includes the passive voice of the present perfect.








あらゆる職業に手を出す者は何の熟練工にもなれない。Jack of all trades is master of none.









国庫は資金が潤沢である。The government coffers are replete with funds.















戻ってみると私のバッグは影も形もなかった。When I got back, my bag had disappeared without a trace.


安物買いの銭失い。Buy cheap and waste your money.







薬を飲み始めると、すぐに痛みなどの症状はとれてきますが、すぐに潰瘍がなおるわけではありません。When you start taking medicine it begins working on symptoms, like pain, right away, but that doesn't mean that the ulcer heals right away.


いよいよ賭け金を回収するときがきました。It's time to call in our chips.


各人各様の物事のやり方がある。Each person has his own way of doing things.






紙切れを取ってきてください。Please fetch me a piece of paper.















大声でしゃべりたい衝動にかられた。I felt an impulse to cry out loud.






こうじはついていた。交通事故でたった車のサイドをちょっとかすっただけだった。Kouji was lucky; his traffic accident left only a minor scratch on the side of his car.

肩が凝ってるんです。My shoulders feel stiff.彼女は肩が凝る本を読む気にはなれなかった。She was not in the mood for serious books.

このセーターは伸びてすっかり型崩れしている。This sweater is all stretched out of shape.


騙りメールにご注意ください。Please beware of fraudulent emails.









それは川底で見つかった。It was found at the bottom of the river.


毛深いまゆ毛が彼の顔の特徴だった。His bushy brows accented his face.













やけくそになった男はしばしばやけくそな事をする。Desperate men often do desperate things.




「louse」の複数形は「lice」です。The plural form of "louse" is "lice".


そんな逃げ腰では戦いはできないね。You can't fight a good fight with such a defeatist attitude.


















会議の席で常務は、開口一番何を言ったと思う。大規模なリストラ計画を発表したんだよな。Guess what the managing director started off the meeting by saying. The first thing out of his mouth was an announcement of some major restructuring.リストラされた彼は心機一転、自宅を拠点にＳＯＨＯビジネスを始めた。After getting downsized he started off on a clean slate and started a business working out of a home office.





総員、脱出せよ！All hands, abandon ship!














喫煙席を頼んだのですが。I asked for a seat in the smoking section.
















これは水っぽい茶だね。This is a weak tea, isn't it?




彼は子供のころその岩穴によく行った。He used to haunt those caves as a little boy.
光学の研究で彼は拡大鏡の発明をした。His study of optics led him to the invention of the magnifying glass.



「転石苔を生ぜず」はことわざである。"A rolling stone gathers no moss" is a saying.



「このたびはご愁傷さまでございます」とひとことお悔みの挨拶をします。Use a brief expression of condolence, such as: "On this sad occasion we grieve with you".



２人っきりでデート・・もとい、ＯＦＦ会だと思ったけど、そこまで甘くもないよな。So I thought my date, er rather, offline-meeting was going to be just me and her but things aren't that easy.













明らかに彼女は生物工学についてよく知っている。Clearly, she knows a lot about biotechnology.




ダックスフント・ソーセージは、最初ニューヨークで大人気になった。とりわけ野球の試合の時である。Dachshund sausages first became popular in New York, especially at baseball games.








金は諸悪の根源。Money is the root of all evil.
ここでの問題は、社会のトレンドを概観できるような枠組みを創出することである。The question here is one of creating the framework with which we can outline the social trend.



若い男女が人里離れた洋館で恐怖の一夜を過ごすという、ホラーの定番スタイルだ。This is a horror staple - young men and women spend a night of terror in an isolated house.






私の良心にやましいところはありません。My conscience is clear.















いかだでその川を下ったときはハラハラした。It was an adventure going down the river on a raft.










現在は、滅私奉公ではなく、滅公奉私の時代だと言われています。In the old days people valued selflessness. But this generation seems to make a virtue out of selfishness.

ソクラテスは主神ゼウスを信じなかったので無神論の罪に問われた。Socrates was accused of atheism because he did not believe in Zeus.





真っ赤な手紙を忌々しげに見つめ、これが悪名高い赤紙ってヤツなのか？I glare resentfully at the crimson letter, is this the infamous red-paper draft notice?







袋はとうもろこしではちきれそうだった。The bag was bursting with corn.

どうぞよい旅行をしてきてください。Have a nice trip!
オーバーシューズは水を通さない。Galoshes are impervious to water.




















ケイトは婚約者からもらった大きなダイヤモンドの指輪をいつもみせびらかしている。Kate always shows off the big diamond ring she got from her fiance.

登場人物がうまく割り振られていた。The characters were well cast.

観客席の最前列に席を予約したわ。I've staked out places for us in the front row of the auditorium.



新しい製造過程は高い歩留まりを可能にする。The new production process achieves a high yield.







予定表を見てみましょう。I'll check my schedule.












遊学先はもう決めた？Have you decided where you're going to go to study abroad?




子供たちをこの通りで遊ばせてはいけない。Don't let the children play on this street.




アルペンスキーの方がノルディックより好きです。I like Alpine skiing better than Nordic skiing.















新しい仕事で彼は気が張っていた。He was tense with his new business.

気が抜けないうちにビールを飲んで下さい。Please drink the beer before it goes flat.
自分の職場に、見るからにとても気が強い女性がいます。In my workplace is a woman who's very strong willed, on the face of it.

「うん、ビスクドールの様なエリカさん」「そ、その表現は少し気恥ずかしいから止めてくれない？」"Yes, the bisque-doll-like Erika" "Th-that expression is a little embarrassing, could you stop using it?"


何を着るかではなくて、どう着こなすかが問題ですね。It's not what you wear, it's how you wear it.



彼は何か気にかかることがあるようだ。He seems to have something on his mind.
あんな不作法な少年たちのことなど気に留めるな。Don't take any notice of those rude boys.










外交術とは、この上ない美しいやり方で、最も汚らしいことを行ったり、言ったりすることである。Diplomacy is to do and say the nastiest thing in the nicest way.
その机は、乱雑極まりない状態だ。The desk is in a state of total disorder.



子宝に恵まれに粗末でも、我が家にまさる所はない。Be it ever so humble, there's no place like home.





彼はこげ茶色の髪をしていた。He had dark brown hair.
彼は彼女に小声で言った。He said to her under his breath.











「その話の結末はハッピー・エンドですか」「まあ、とにかく、心温まる結末ではありました」"Does the story have a happy ending?" "Well, a warm one, anyway."



君は心ないことをしたものだ。How thoughtless of you to do that.
よい考えが私の心に浮かんだ。A good idea came across my mind.

心安ければ眠りも安らか。A good conscience is a soft pillow.
ごちそうを心行くまで味わった。We thoroughly enjoyed the delicious meal.





「安いですね。じゃあ10ヤードください」小娘が答えた。"That's cheap. I'll take ten yards," the girl answered.
しかし城にたどりつくなり、近衛兵を率いた人によって、わたしはこの牢獄に勾引されてしまった。However, when I finally reached the castle I was thrown into this prison by the commander of the imperial guard.

私は渾身の力をこめてその戸を開けようとした。I tried to open the door with all my force.










メアリーは見知らぬ人に話し掛けられて、言葉につまってしまった。When Mary was spoken to by a stranger, she was at a loss for words.
この本は言葉のあやに富んだ本だ。This book is full of figures of speech.
そこがあなたと意見を異にするところです。That's where I can't agree with you.






端的に言って、彼は首になったのだ。To make a long story short, he was fired.
し、しまったぁ！つい口がすべった。D-drat! I didn't mean to let that slip..
トムはメアリーを口説きおとすことができなかった。メアリーはトムのデートの要求を突っぱねたから。Tom couldn't make the grade with Mary; she refused him when he asked her for a date.


彼は私の信頼を食いものにした。He abused my confidence.



私はその計画をなんの苦もなく実行した。It was quite easy for me to carry the plan out.



この会社は石油業界で２位に位している。This firm ranks second in the oil trade.


最新のバイオ技術によって、芋の臭みを最小限に抑え、非常に飲みやすい「芋焼酎」です。It's very easy to drink potato shochu now that the potato-like smell has been reduced to a low level through use of the latest biotechnology.


彼はこの分野では草分けだ。He is a trailblazer in this field.
田中さんの特徴的な癖毛が耳の裏で跳ねていた。Mrs Tanaka's characteristic curly hair was sticking up behind her ear.


チキンは食べられない、というけど、単なる食わず嫌いじゃないの。You can't eat chicken? How do you know if you never try it?
岩崩れに気をつけて。Look out for rock slides.
その建物は突然崩れ落ちた。The building fell down suddenly.





車の速度を落とす装置（ハンプや狭さく）について、意見があったら書いてください。If you have any opinions concerning traffic calming devices (humps, curb extensions, etc.) please write them.



あのツアー、キャンセル待ちの状態だって。That tour already has a waiting list.



ジェット機が建物の上を飛ぶと窓ガラスがびりびりした。When the jet flew over the building the windowpanes rattled.

彼はそれを見るとふと魔がさして盗んだ。The sight tempted him to steal.
彼女は腹立ちまぎれに婚約を破棄した。She broke off her engagement in a fit of anger.





マッコウクジラは、1,000メートルの深さまで潜ることができる。The sperm whale can dive to a depth of 1,000 meters.







我々は生きている限り学び続けなければならない。We must continue to study as long as we live.



そんなこと真に受けちゃだめだよ。彼は大袈裟に言う傾向があるから。Don't take it literally. He is inclined to exaggerate.


花嫁は伏目がちに、満座の注目を浴びながら入場した。The bride came into the room with lowered eyes and with everyone staring at her.

我が国の商社は世界をまたにかけて商売をする。Our trading companies do business all over the world.
自動車を門の外に待たせてある。The car is waiting at the gate.



彼は天寿を全うした。He lived to a ripe old age.


人には、迷いと苦しみのもとである煩悩がある。People have worldly passions which lead them into delusions and sufferings.





彼は家の周りに塀をめぐらした。He built a fence around his house.彼は心の中でその事件に思いをめぐらした。He turned over the matter in his mind.













その女優は雑誌を名誉き損で訴えた。The actress sued the magazine for libel.
彼は自分が名優だとうぬぼれた。He flattered himself that he was the best actor.



机の上の手紙が彼の目に触れた。He noticed a letter on the desk.

私はスミス氏と面識がある。I am acquainted with Mr Smith.


その学生は親切にも私に道案内をしてくれた。The student was kind enough to show me the way.

満ち足りた心は永遠の祝宴である。A contented mind is a perpetual feast.
女性ホルモン分泌の乱れが不妊症の大きな原因です。Female hormone imbalance is a major cause of infertility.

おまえは床をみがきさえすればよい。You have only to sweep the floor.
彼の身勝手な態度に腹を立てた。His selfish attitude put my back up.
２．身頃の肩を縫い合わせる。2. Sew together the shoulder of the garment body.

それは見かけ倒しだ。It is not as good as it looks.

警備員たちは１時間ごとに輪番で見回った。The guards rotated in making their rounds every hour.


彼は耳が早い。He is quick to learn.

ぶたれて耳鳴りがした。My ears were ringing from being beaten.

彼は２００人の男を連れて南アメリカを目指してスペインを出発した。He had left Spain for South America with 200 men.
身の程を知れ。Cut one's coat according to one's cloth.




我々はどうにかしてその密林を通り抜けよう。We will get through the jungle somehow.




このドレスは水洗いができますか。Is this dress washable?
豆腐は軽く重しをして、２０分ほどおいて水切りする。Lightly weigh the tofu down, leave it for about 20 minutes then drain.

水先案内人は船を港に誘導する。A pilot guides the ship toward the port.










彼らの最高の技術は木工細工に見られた。Their highest skill was woodworking.






関係代名詞のthatは、主格、目的格の2つであり、所有格はありません。The relative pronoun 'that' has two states, a nominative case and objective case, but there is no possessive case.
彼女の車は不注意から門柱にぶつかった。Her car struck against the gatepost through her carelessness.

私はその演奏家にフルートで何かもの悲しい曲を吹いて欲しいとおもった。I wanted the musician to play some sad tune on his flute.
その男は一軒ごとに物乞いをしてまわった。The man went begging from door to door.


私の父は物思いにふけっていた。My father was lost in thought.
君は確かに物知りだが、それを教えるのはうまくない。Indeed you know a lot of things, but you're not good at teaching them.




申込書は全ページにもれなく記入する必要がある。It is necessary to complete all pages of the application form.

ちなみに、魚のえらが真っ赤であるのは、肺と同じように「毛細血管」が多く集まっているからである。Incidentally, that the gills of fish are bright red is because there are many 'capillary vessels' collected there, the same as for lungs.



医師が患者の秘密を漏らすのは道義にもとる。It is not ethical for a doctor to reveal confidences.







彼は医者になり無医村へ行こうと決意した。He made up his mind to be a doctor and go to a doctorless village.
父は車の無事故を自慢している。My father boasts of the fact that he has never had a traffic accident.



悪事の報い。What one has sown one will have to reap.




彼は昇進の機会を無にした。He threw away his chance of promotion.





















「ロミオとジュリエット」を見ると必ず涙ぐむ。One never sees "Romeo and Juliet" without being moved to tears.






彼には欠点があるのでなおのこと彼が好きだ。I like him the better for his faults.


彼らはブルドーザーで道ならしをしている。They are now leveling the road with a bulldozer.
彼女は彼を名指しで呼んだ。She called him by name.

寝が足りないので、今日は早めに寝ます。Because of my lack of sleep I'm going to bed early tonight.




それぞれの品物に値札をつけなさい。Put price labels on each individual item.



赤ん坊を寝かしつけなければ。I have to put the baby to bed.
私はセーターを着たまま眠り込んだ。I fell asleep with a sweater on.











彼の煮え切らない態度にいらいらした。I was vexed at his irresolute attitude.
煮え湯を飲まされる。He pushed it down my throat.
君にはちょっと荷が勝っているね。I'm afraid this job is too much for you.



ジムはスキーをしていて脚に肉離れを起こした。Jim pulled a muscle in his leg while skiing.
彼はその漢詩を肉太に書いた。He wrote the Chinese poem in bold strokes.
最近、お腹の周りに肉がついてきたみたい。中年太りかな。I'm getting a spare tire around my waist. I guess it's middle age creeping up on me.









公園のつつじの世話をする庭師が若干名いる。Several gardeners look after the azaleas in the park.
この森には野ブドウが密集して生えている。There is a dense growth of vines in this forest.










彼は、３月の野ウサギのように狂っているよ。He is as mad as a March hare.私は森の中で野うさぎをみつけた。I caught sight of the rabbit in the middle of the forest.

わたしのテクに抜かりはないわ。My technique is without flaw.
抜け毛がひどいんです。A lot of my hair has fallen out.



仮に競馬でたまたま大穴を当てたとしましょう。Let's suppose you happen to strike it rich at the races.



大助かりでした。You've really helped me a lot.




「学園の廊下で、濃厚なキスシーン・・・聞いたぞ聞いたぞ」「濃厚じゃなーい！話に尾ひれ付いてるって・・・」"A passionate kiss scene in a school corridor ... I've heard all about it!" "It wasn't passionate! That's an exaggeration..."

少年老い易く学成り難し。Art is long, time is fleeting.






そのパーティーはいつ行われますか。When will the party take place?


彼女は臆することなく王の面前に出た。She boldly went up to the king.


その悲しい光景を思い描くと彼女の目には涙があふれた。Her eyes were filled with tears when she pictured the sad scene to herself.







ボクが憧れたのは翔太部長の『力』じゃない。体を張ってでも信念を貫こうとする雄々しい勇気だったはず。What I looked up to in Shota was not his 'strength'. It was his heroic courage to put his life on the line to carry out his convictions.

その植物は遅霜で被害を受けた。The plants were damaged by the late frost.






雷雲が谷一面にたれこめていた。The storm-clouds brooded over the valley.






彼は私たちの予想に反して落選した。He failed to get elected contrary to our expectation.



乱気流のために飛行機が揺れた。We had a rough flight because of turbulence.







隊長は礼砲を放つように命じた。The captain gave orders for a salute to be fired.








全員が戦後、連合軍によって投獄され、その後戦犯として死刑か長期の刑期を宣告された。All were imprisoned by the Allies after the war and later sentenced to death or given long prison terms for war crimes.




彼はその分野で練達の芸術家として知られている。He is known as a proficient artist in his field.









この本は私の理解力を超えている。This book is above my understanding.


今日では１０％の陸地しか覆われていないのである。Today only 10 percent is covered.










あんな風に理路整然と話されちゃうと、こっちは何も言えないよな。What am I supposed to say when he puts it so logically?




彼は離党した。He severed himself from the party.




囚人が牢獄から逃げた。A convict has escaped from prison.




タイヤはゴムと路面の摩擦によってすり減る。Tires wear down because of friction between the rubber and the road surface.
ニコデモは言った。「人は老年になっていて、どのようにして生れる事が出来るのですか」"How can a man be born when he is old?" Nicodemus asked.








涙腺が詰まっていると言われました。I was told my tear duct was blocked.




その婦人は良家の出身であった。The lady came from a good family.



紅茶と緑茶の違いを私に説明できますか。Can you describe to me the difference between black tea and green tea?





その料理人は彼の信じられないほどの食欲に驚いた。The cook was astonished at his incredible appetite.


我々は良書を読んで心を養わねばならない。We should cultivate our minds by reading good books.








流動食を取ってください。You should take liquid food.







彼は酒飲みのため、健康を害した。He was given to drinking and ruined his health.







あらゆるところを捜しましたが、札入れが見つからないのです。I have looked everywhere, but I cannot find my wallet.







その虫はさなぎから成虫になった。The insect grew out of a pupa into an imago.







庶民のなりわいは、米をつくることだった。The ordinary people had their livelihood in farming rice.

成否に関わらず、私はできるだけのことをやってみます。I will try my best, whether I shall be successful or not.

性能のよさとデザインの優美さが両々相まって本機種の声価を高めてきた。The high performance and the elegant design of this model have combined to give it a high reputation.


聖火のあたりもひどい状態だと言うことも聞いたわ。I also heard that it'd been awful around the Olympic Flame.





彼女はそれに精魂を込めた。She worked on it with her all soul.



青年期友情は長続きしないことが多いと言われる。It is said that adolescent friendships do not often last.
ヘレンは生来楽天家だ。Helen is by nature an optimist.

生理学は３単位です。Human physiology is a three-credit course.











最近の海外移転の動きを見てもわかるように、製造業の生産性改善も限界に近いところまで進んでいる。Recent overseas transfers show that productivity improvements in Japanese manufacturing industry have almost reached their limit.

それぞれの文化には首尾一貫した世界観がある。Cultures have a coherent view of the world.
彼は世間体を気にしない。He has no regard to appearance.

咳止めはありますか。Do you have any cough medicine?




クララの責任感の無さには頭に来る。Clara's lack of responsibility drives me mad.



彼は誰の言うことも聞こうとしない。石像にでも話し掛けるほうがましだ。He will not listen to any of us; you might as well talk to a figure of stone.













戦況は我々に有利に展開している。The war is going in our favor.
選挙区の見直しの試みは、反対の壁にぶちあたりました。Attempts to redraw voting districts have hit a wall of opposition.















大きな雪片がひらひらと降った。Snow fell in large flakes.





それを見てうれしくて背筋がぞくぞくした。The sight sent chills of delight up my spine.








４月１日、南洋フーズ株式会社は横浜の新社屋に移転します。On April 1, Nanyo Foods Co. Ltd. will move to its new building in Yokohama.















日本の子午線は東経１３５度です。Japan is on the 135th meridian East.
支配人は我々の計画を許可した。The manager approved our plan.

ちょうどいいね。新型の試乗してってもらうね。Good timing. I'll get you to test drive the new model.





恐竜は現在では死滅してしまった。Dinosaurs are now extinct.









このことを背景知識として、ここで進化論生物学の現状についての考察に移ろう。With this as background I turn now to an account of the present state of evolutionary biology.

彼女は絶えず神経痛に悩まされている。She suffers from constant neuralgia.








多くの実業家たちは政府の役人にとり入るために、進物や金を惜しげもなくあたえる。Many businessmen, in order to curry favor with government officials, will shower them with gifts and money.






僕は新世界の神となる。I will become God of the new world.







彼女はその子供の心痛をいやすのに苦労した。She took pains to help the child overcome his grief.




もう君の尻拭いはごめんだ。I'm fed up with always backing you up.


地球上で最大の動物は巨大なシロナガスクジラだ。The largest animal on Earth is the gigantic blue whale.



「神はわれらの救いである」と司祭は言った。"God is our salvation," said the priest.






深刻な就職難のしわ寄せが、そういった不法就労の外国人労働者にまで及んでいる。The serious job shortage is also affecting those illegal foreign workers.



１つの種が絶滅するたびに、我々は自然界の一部を永久に失うことになる。Every time a species dies out, we lose forever a part of our natural world.

それ自体はおめでたいことですが、１つ気になるコメントがありました。This is a really good thing, but one comment keeps bothering me.そんな話にだまされるなんて、よくよくおめでたいね。You must be very naive to be taken in by such a story.









ＪＳＴは日本標準時を表わす。JST stands for Japan Standard Time.

ノスタルジックな感じがたまらなく好きな人もいるし、独創性を愛する人もいる。There are people who go mad for the nostalgic feel and also those who love originality.
















そして、だからこそ、ほぼ百年にわたって、従業員はだれでも雇用者のところに行って、現金による賃金支給を要求できるようになったのです。And that's why for almost a hundred years, any employee has been able to go to his employer and insist on being paid in cash.








口の中には蜜、心の中には毒。Honey in the mouth and poison in the heart.


報道機関は現職議員についてはいつもマル秘情報をつかんでいます。The press always has something on the incumbent.



信じないものは神の一人子の御名を信じなかったので、すでに裁かれている。But whoever does not believe stands condemned already because he has not believed in the name of God's only son.

ホームページ作りに四苦八苦してるようだけど、手伝ってあげようか。You look like you're having a lot of trouble setting up that web page. Want some help?
ある戸別訪問のセールスマンがお人好しの老婦人を馬鹿にして大金を持ち逃げした。A certain door-to-door salesman made a fool of a trusting old lady and went off with a lot of her money.公平に評すれば、彼はお人好しだ。To do him justice, he is a good-natured man.
私には後宮の支配者になる資質は、どうやらないようだ。It appears that I don't have it in me to have a harem in my charge.







証拠隠滅どーすんのよ！普通は警察に連絡するもんでしょっ。What does destroying evidence get you? The usual thing would be to contact the police, wouldn't it?
アイスランドは以前はデンマークに属していた。Iceland used to belong to Denmark.

















クリスはソードを振るった！Chris swung his sword!








会社を経営する上で、社員の配置転換を行う必要があります。Job rotation is essential to running a business.


火事で４世帯が焼死した。Four families were killed in the fire.







乗りかかった船ということでやっていく所存です。I've come this far, so I'll keep going.
睡眠不足で、心筋梗塞リスクが上昇。Sleep deprivation increases risk of heart attacks.







人のパスワードを乱用する「なりすまし」行為が問題になっている。Now that people can steal passwords, illegal impersonation is becoming a serious problem.
彼はその酒場で歯医者に成りすましていた。He posed as a dentist at that bar.

梁が屋根をささえている。Beams bear the weight of the roof.
我が社の販促活動は大いに成功しています。Our sales campaign is successful in a big way.









その場限りのことを言う。He says things on the spur of the moment.












金のゴーレムは宝を守るためのガーディアンです。Gold golems are guardians used to guard treasure.






金のゴーレムは宝を守るためのガーディアンです。Gold golems are guardians used to guard treasure.



















クリスはヴァンパイア・ナイトを倒した！Chris defeated the vampire knight!









彼は４１８号室というとても狭い部屋が空室だったことを思い出しました。He remembered that Room 418, a very small room, was empty.



私の祖母は八十二歳でまだ元気である。My grandmother is still vigorous at 82 years old.
トムはちょっとした音楽家だ。Tom is something of a musician.



彼は酔っ払ってだみ声になっていた。He was drunk and his speech was thick.








テロリストが手榴弾を投げる前に爆発してしまい、片腕を吹き飛ばされてしまった。The grenade blew up before the terrorist could throw it, and his arm was blown off!
これから何か手職を身に付けたいと思う方は、是非お読みになることをおすすめします。I greatly recommend reading it to anybody thinking of learning a craft.



その少年はカエルめがけて石ころを投げた。The boy threw a stone at the frog.















馬を水辺に連れて行くことは出来ても、馬に水を飲ませることは出来ない。You can take a horse to water, but you can't make him drink.






あの、私、残念ですが小用が御座いますので、この辺りで失礼致しますね。Ah, unfortunately there is a small matter I need to attend to so I'll take my leave now.
その町には狭い小路が多い。The town has many narrow lanes.

彼は試しに遠山に登ってみた。He tried climbing the distant mountain.
















アインシュタインが死んでからほぼ四十年になる。Einstein has been dead for nearly forty years.





寝汗がひどいんです。I perspire a lot at night.




うちの先祖には有名な人がいく人かいる。Our family has some distinguished ancestors.
彼らは幾年間も、その土地の所有権について論争した。They disputed the ownership of the land for years.
















潮流がその船を外海へと漂流させた。The tide carried the boat out to sea.










私はニワトコジュースが好きだ。I love elderberry juice.

その小屋はどうにか雨露をしのげた。The hut kept the rain and dew out after a fashion.





私が外国人なら、生魚を食べることはできないだろう。Were I a foreigner, I could not eat raw fish.
















こんなどうしようもない愚息ですが、どうかご贔屓ください。I may be a hopeless fool, but please be kind to me.

彼らはその宝石店に押し入った。They broke into the jewelry shop.
ボブは土曜日には食料品店で店員として働いた。Bob worked as a clerk in the grocery store on Saturday.
彼は偶然この古銭を骨董品店で見つけた。He came across this old coin in an antique shop.




英日の翻訳と日英の翻訳では、英日の翻訳を希望する人のほうが多いようです。Between E→J translations and J→E, it appears that more people want English-Japanese translations.

川の水位が少しずつ上がった。The level of the river rose little by little.


倫理委員会では, クローン実験の一時停止が決定した。At the ethics committee, a temporary halt to cloning experiments was decided.運転者は一時停止線のところで停止しなければならない。Drivers must stop at the stop line.

昨日、ひょんなことで父親の戸籍抄本のコピーを見てしまいました。Yesterday I stumbled across a copy of my father's family register.
まっすぐにすわり、かいばおけをつつく動物のように皿の上にかがみこまない。He sits upright, not crouched over his plate like an animal at a feeding trough.
熱気球に乗ったことありますか。Have you ever ridden in a hot air balloon?





ライオンと虎は猫科の２つの違った種である。The lion and the tiger are two different species of cat.

込み上げる感情をさらけ出せ。Let it all out.












その少年は運動靴を履くと、外へ走って出て行った。The boy put on his athletic shoes and ran outside.

骨折り損のくたびれもうけだった。All my effort went for nothing.





おなかが痛いんです。胃腸薬をください。My stomach hurts. Can I have some stomach medicine?


しかもメモの下側にあるのは汚れじゃなく・・・け、血判！？Moreover, what's on the bottom of the memo isn't dirt but a ... b-blood seal!?





その事件は時が進むにつれて忘れ去られていった。The event was forgotten as time went on.


風が吹くたびに、桜の花びらが、ひらひらと舞い降りてました。The cherry blossoms flutter down whenever the wind blows.

それが見えないようなら明盲だ。You must be blind as a bat if you couldn't see it.







彼らは町に攻め寄せた。They advanced on the town.




彼女は自分の容貌を気にしている。She is sensitive about her looks.











































中には耐え難いものもある。Some of them are too much to bear.
その子供はお母さんを見るとすぐに泣きやみました。As soon as the child saw his mother, he stopped crying.

客人たちはその幸せな夫婦が末永く裕福な人生を送る事を祈った。The guests wished the happy couple a long and prosperous life.





最初は別々だったんですがある日一緒行き帰りするようになりました。At first we used to go separately, but one day we started going and returning together.
あなたは何回京都を訪れましたか。How often did you visit Kyoto?




























フランスはロシアと戦争をしていた。France was at war with Russia.






そこには消えることのない薄明かりがあった。There was eternal twilight in the place.















彼は駐英大使に選ばれた。He was appointed ambassador to Britain.





相手チームがあまり闘志をわかしていなかったので、我々は楽勝した。The opposing team did not put up much of a fight, so we won hands down.




彼は店じまいのため商品を投げ売りした。He sold his goods at a loss to wind up his business.






















オーナーたちは組合のシンパを一人残らず解雇するために首切り役を投入した。The owners brought in a hatchet man to fire all the union sympathizers.










彼女は終生その町に住んだ。She lived all her life in that town.

この汽車は世界の果て行きの終列車です。This train is the last train to the world's end.

フェニックスはアリゾナの州都である。Phoenix is the capital of Arizona.


兄は手仕事がうまかった。My brother was expert in handwork.




















寸鉄人を殺す。The tongue stings.
そのうち、小さな村落の真上を高架線が行ったり来たりするようになりました。Pretty soon, there was an elevated train going back and forth just above the small village.
存外、口は達者なようね。It seems like you're unexpectedly eloquent.







彼は警察署長です。He is the chief of a police station.










私は報告書をすっかり書き上げた。He wrote out a thorough report.




ここに彼の書き置きがある。これはここに来たに違いない。Here is a note he left. He must have been here.





私は社会科にはたいへん興味をもっています。I'm very interested in social studies.











別の理由があるね？どう？図星でしょう？There's another reason, isn't there? Well, how did I do? I bet I hit the mark.
党大会は延期された。The party convention was put off.












睡魔と空戦わなくちゃ。You'd better fight off sleep.






この辞書には序文はあるが端書きがない。This dictionary has a preface, not a foreword.



テレビに映し出されるものは、いわば実社会の反映である。What is shown on television is, as it were, a reflection of what society is like.



彼はチェスのトーナメントで優勝を勝ち取った。He carried off the first prize at the chess tournament.庶民の身から、ジョンは世界的な名声を勝ち取った。From a humble background, John achieved worldwide fame.


彼の成功は大きな犠牲をはらって勝ち得たものであった。His success was purchased dearly.








まるでそれが正しい英語の証左かのように。Just as if that was proof that that was correct English.
アリバイが彼女の無罪を証拠立てている。The alibi points to her innocence.




あえて休暇を取りやめるには及ばない。You don't have to cancel your vacation.
いつも一番いい取り分を得やがって！You always take the lion's share!
彼らは街路の雪を取り払った。They cleared the street of snow.
私は取り立てて騒ぎ立てられるのは好きではない。I don't like to be made a fuss about.










君は速球が投げられますか。Can you throw a fastball?
彼は私の数倍多くの本を持っている。He has several times as many books as I.







































長方形の対辺は平行である。The opposite sides of a rectangle are parallel.



それを発明した教授は大学から相当の対価を受ける権利がある。The professor who invented it has the right to reasonable remuneration from the university.










ここにいるといやでも感覚は研ぎ澄まされる。I can't help but feel that when I come here, all my senses are sharper than usual.






彼女は大量の本を読んで精神を陶冶した。She cultivated her mind by reading many books.


いさかいで私たちの融和が壊れた。Quarrelling spoiled our unity.




処方箋をもらうために医者に行きなさい。Go to the doctor to get your prescription!
「広辞苑にこう書いてあります」と言って、広辞苑を唯一の拠り所に論陣を張る人がよくいる。There are a lot of people who say, "it says this in Koujien," and use that dictionary as the only grounds for their argument.










車が横滑りして道路から湖に落ちたとき彼女は九死に一生を得た。She had a narrow escape when her car skidded off the road into a lake.

新茶を摘む季節になった。This is the season to pick fresh tea.




俺は絶海の孤島の漂流者。I am just a castaway on an island lost at sea.
数日は絶食するようにしてください。You must not eat anything for a few days.


彼らは絶景を背にして立った。They stood against the picturesque scenery.

その病人は絶え間のない世話を必要とした。The sick man required constant attention.

彼は独特の節回しで演説した。He made a speech using his unique tone of voice.


































銀行に二百万円残っている。The balance at the bank stands at two million yen.

彼女はゆっくりと日記帳を閉じた。She closed her diary slowly.

むかしのような激しい日雇い労働はできやしない。I can't work as hard as I used to.









彼女はその事件を生き生きとした筆致で描写した。She painted a vivid picture of the event.














さて、犯人は、告白するか否かが、沈黙するＭＬ参加者たちの焦眉の関心事となる。Well then, it becomes a matter of urgent concern to the lurkers of this mailing list whether the guilty party confesses or not.




































水差しの取っ手が壊れた。The handle of the pitcher was broken.

川のこの部分は水深が深い。The water is deep in this part of the river.










この高速度道路は東京と名古屋を結んでいる。This expressway connects Tokyo with Nagoya.

過去において高齢者たちは人生の様々な問題を解決するときのエキスパートと考えられていた。In the past, the old used to be looked upon as experts in solving various problems of life.


この豪邸には寝室が十二もあります。There are no fewer than a dozen bedrooms in this mansion.

国家試験に合格おめでとう。I congratulate you on your passing the state examination.





そのジャーナリストはいわゆる国際人だ。The journalist is what you call a cosmopolitan.
ご存じのように、ＵＮとは国際連合のことです。UN, as you know, stands for the United Nations.


合衆国では１０年に一度国勢調査が行われる。In the United States, there is a census every ten years.



彼は大学で国文学を専攻をした。He majored in Japanese literature at the university.


ユーモアを解する心は、国民性と密接に結びついているが、その結びつき方は不思議である。The sense of humor is mysteriously bound up with national characteristics.
政治は国民生活に深い関係がある。Politics has much to do with me.






昨年度のコンピューターからの利益は、今年度分よりも１０％近く多かった。Profit on computers for the previous year was nearly ten percent higher than the current year.
彼女はバターと砂糖を混ぜ合わせた。She mixed the butter and sugar together.



再開発によって地域に便益が生ずる。Benefits accrue to the community from reconstruction.







最前列の席は有りますか。Can I have a seat in the stalls?

世界最長なのです。It is the longest in the world.

彼こそ本校で野球の最優秀選手だ。He is the very best baseball player in our school.
卒業に際して、私たちは感謝の印として彼に置き時計を贈りました。On leaving school, we presented him with a table clock as a token of our thanks.




その通りに立ち並ぶ木々は春に美しい花を咲かせます。The trees that line the street have lovely blossoms in spring.


昨秋は晴天続きだった。We had a spell of fine weather last autumn.
昨年度のコンピューターからの利益は、今年度分よりも１０％近く多かった。Profit on computers for the previous year was nearly ten percent higher than the current year.




もういちど三種混合の予防接種をしなければならないのです。She needs another DPT shot.

彼は腕を３度撃たれた。He was shot 3 times in the arm.

この小説は三部構成だ。This novel consists of three parts.





いま、日本のたばこ産業界は、大人の男たちのたばこ離れに頭をいためている。The fact that nowadays fewer men smoke is a headache for the Japanese tobacco industry.
日本の競争力は工業製品では非常に強いが、農業産品では弱い。Japan's competitiveness is very strong in industrial products, but weak in agricultural products.







あの亜弓って子、まだ１３歳だけど５つのときから子役として映画や舞台に出演。That 'Ayumi' kid, only 13 but has performed in movies and theatres as a child actor since she was five.


その団体は騒音が有害なことを人々に思い起こされるためにポスターを掲げた。The group put up posters to remind people that noise is harmful.


家族のことを思い浮かべるといえが恋しくなる。I feel homesick when I remember my family.彼はその詩を読んでアルカデイアを心の中に思い浮かべた。He conjured up Arcadia reading the poem.


シドニー支店長に就任すると伺いました。I heard you have become Branch Manager of the Sydney office.












ヒントの ***** の数と語の中の字数とは関係がありません。The number of *****s in the hint has no relation to the number of characters in the word.

自分たちの持ち家が欲しい。We want a house of our own.

理事会は海外の持ち株を放棄することを議決しました。The Board of Trustees voted to divest the organization's overseas holdings.
ミツバチは、においのサンプルを巣に持ち帰ることによって食糧のありかを伝える。Bees communicate the location of food by carrying odor samples back to the hive.

「当たって砕けよ」が俺の持ち味だからね。My strong point is my philosophy - nothing ventured nothing gained.
天才は時として態度が粗野なことがある。A genius can sometimes have rude manners.
６時半までには、夕食の用意ができているだろう。Dinner will be ready by six-thirty.




彼は自家用車を持っている。He drives his own car.



彼は自室に閉じこもった。He confined himself to his room.
自助は最上の助け。Self-help is the best help.













私の読んだ冒険談は実生活とは縁遠い。The adventures I read about are absent from my life.
おやおや。いかな体育の授業といえど・・・真剣勝負の意気込みで臨まなければ、いざ実戦と言う時に役に立ちませんよ。Well, even if it is just P.E. class, if you don't take it seriously, it won't do you any good in a real match.



講演は彼らの社会運動を支持していた。The address was in favor of their social movement.






社会保険庁や厚生労働省への不信感は募る一方である。Distrust of the Social Insurance Agency and the Ministry of Health, Labour and Welfare just keeps getting stronger.
お名前と社会保障番号をおっしゃって下さい。State your name and social security number, please.
その団体は社会問題を解決しようとした。The group tried to solve social problems.


今朝車中で偶然彼に会った。I met him by chance in the train this morning.




もし建物の取り壊しが無制限に行われるなら、美しい町が単なるコンクリート・ジャングルになる危険があるのである。If the demolition of buildings is uncontrolled, a fine city is in danger of becoming nothing more than a concrete jungle.
その古い建物は取り壊された。The old building was broken down.

米国連邦準備銀行は銀行の取り付け騒ぎを食い止めようとしています。The Fed is trying to stave off a run on the banks.




手の内を見せるべきです。You should lay your cards out on the table.

彼の生命は私の手中にある。His life is in my hands.
気にいったものはなかなか手放しがたいものだ。It's not easy to part with one's favorite possessions.






アカデミー授賞式は、ハリウッド最大の華やかな催しだ。The Oscar ceremonies are Hollywood's biggest extravaganza.
州政府は彼から市民権を剥奪した。The state government deprived him of his civil rights.





本当は土曜日からの予定が、いろいろあって週明けからってことになった。It was going to be from Saturday, but, with one thing and another, it ended up being from the new week.
将軍は兵士をパリに集結した。The general concentrated the soldiers in Paris.





いかにも敬虔なるクリスチャンが送る、礼節重き言葉です。So characteristic of what a pious Christian would say, this courteous phrase.




彼の馬はダービーに出走した。His horse ran in the Derby.






話し合いのもとにするために、ミーティングに先立ち、皆様からいただいた提案をとりまとめてみました。I have tried to compile the ideas that you proposed prior to the meeting, so that we can use them as the base for the discussion.
こういう手引書はもっと分かりやすく書くべきだ。Such manuals should be written in simpler language.

私はアルジェリアからの代表と部屋を共にした。I roomed with a delegate from Algeria.

すぐにでもエチオピアに雨が降らなければ、深刻な干ばつの問題が起こるだろう。Unless it rains in Ethiopia soon, there could be severe drought problems.
ケニアは1963年に独立した。Kenya became independent in 1963.
コンピューターチップのダンピングに関する不当な非難に日本は反論しました。Japan disproved phony accusations of computer chip dumping.

日本では心臓病を患う人が多いようですが、リビアでも心筋梗塞になる人が最近とても増えています。Many people suffer from heart disease in Japan, but in Libya those having heart attacks have also increased a lot recently.



私はレシピからナッツをはずした。デリアはナッツアレルギーだから。I've left out the nuts in this recipe because Delia's allergic to them.





その船はカイロ行きだった。The ship was bound for Cairo.


あの女の子は信頼できるカントリーシンガーだ。That girl is a true blue country singer.




アキレスは古代ギリシアの英雄だった。Achilles was an ancient Greek hero.




大臣は新聞記者たちからの矢継ぎ早の質問に直面しなくてはならなかった。The minister had to face a barrage of questions from the press.
どの女の子も小ぎれいな服装をしていた。Each of the girls was dressed neatly.

きのうの火事で２００戸が全焼した。Two hundred houses were burnt down in the fire which broke out yesterday.






「あれ、タンジェントってサインでコサインを割るんだっけ？」「逆、逆」"Eh? Is the tangent cosine divided by sine?" "Other way round!"





その事件は最高裁判所で解決された。That matter was decided by the Supreme Court.




お昼をおごってくれたのを覚えてますか。Do you remember buying me lunch?お昼までには戻ってきなさい。You are supposed to be back by noon.
村は日没後静まり返っていた。The village was dead after sunset.





すべての将兵が力を合わせて反撃した。All the officers and men joined their efforts against the attack.

小事は小人を喜ばす。Little thing please little minds.

この紹介状は叔父によってかかれた。My uncle wrote this letter of introduction.

私たちの小道は、しばしば出会いましたね。Our paths have crossed very often.


キャビネットは集めたものを陳列するための食器棚である。A cabinet is a cupboard used for displaying things.







私は職責を果たさなければならない。I have to discharge my duty.




近著を一部お送りいたしました。ご笑覧いただければ幸いです。I have sent you a copy of a recent work, in the hope that you may enjoy it.



この小冊子は無料だ。This booklet is free of charge.









博物館には興味深い展示品が所蔵されている。There are some interesting exhibits in the museum.

























お客さまに粗相のないように気をつけなさい。Take care not to be impolite to our visitors.






妻が早産で１５００グラムの女の子を授かった。My wife gave birth prematurely to a 1,500-gram baby girl.







私はかつて大病にかかったことがあった。Once I had a very bad disease.



彼は定年まで大過なく勤めあげた。He served without any serious errors until he reached retirement age.





彼女は６つの都市に滞留してアメリカを観光旅行した。She made a tour of America, stopping in six cities.
この本は1,000ページ以上の大冊ですが、来週の今日までには読み終わります。Though this is a bulky book of more than a thousand pages, I'll have read it all by this time next week.


彼は大食漢だ。He is a big eater.
彼は１００万ドルの退職金をもらった。He was paid one million dollars in retirement allowance.



海王星は太陽系の8番目の惑星だ。Neptune is the eighth planet of the solar system.


その話をするとき彼の胸は高鳴っていた。His heart was pounding as he told me that.
彼は降格されたことを達観している。He's quite philosophical about his demotion.
今回の成果はひとえに彼の獅子奮迅の働きの賜物でしょう。Our latest results are the fruit of his furious efforts.













それでは私の立つ瀬がない。That would leave me in a fix.
ウーマン・リブは底辺は広いが、非公式な民衆の運動である。Women's Liberation is a broad-based but informal popular movement.
















まもなく鉄道網が全国に広がった。A network of railroads soon spread over the entire country.



当地は食べ物があまり良くない。The food isn't very good here.




このタイプライターを特価で買ってきた。I got this typewriter at a bargain price.









私たちは隣近所とは仲良くしている。We get on well with our neighbors.


鳥かごの中の鳥はカナリアです。The birds in the cage are canaries.









先日、パソコンショップでＳＩＭＭの掴み取りをやっていた。いくらなんでもマニアックすぎる。I grabbed as much SIMM as possible in the computer shop the other day. Say what you like, it was more than just enthusiasm.


修道士のように頭巾をかぶった雲は、ポツリポツリと落ちる雨を数珠のようにつまぐっている。The hooded clouds, like friars, tell their beads in drops of rain.


しかも初陣があのドラゴン退治！What's more, our first battle is to defeat that dragon!

その歌手は売れっ子になるだろう。That singer is going to become popular.



私はカラオケ好きだが、たいした歌い手ではない。I love karaoke, but I'm not much of a singer.















彼はゲリラの一隊に要撃された。He was waylaid by a band of guerrillas.


私たちはそれを宵の明星と呼ぶ。We call it the Evening Star.

どのくらい洋行していたのですか。How long have you been abroad?












必ず弱火で煮立たないように煮ること。Be sure to simmer on a low heat so it doesn't boil.



雪降りの日です。It's a snowy day.

屋根の雪おろしをしなくてはいけないな。We have to clear the snow off the roof.
これらの生物はクラゲのようなもっと単純な有機体から進化した。These creatures evolved from simpler organisms like jellyfish.
君の夢物語にお金をつぎ込む気なんてないよ。I have no interest in putting my money into your dreams.


カメラ製造における日本の競争力は揺るぎない。Japan's competitiveness in camera making is unchallenged.
彼を通して私は町の有力者と知り合いになった。Through him I got acquainted with the big names of the town.



郵政事業は政府の独占事業です。Postal services are a government monopoly.





ミッチェル氏は私に週末までに残額を支払うようにと求めた。Mr Mitchel demanded that I pay the rest of the money by the end of the week.

さて、斬首刑の時間だ。この世に言い残す事はないか。Well, it's time for your decapitation. Don't you have any last words to say?


彼は全身全霊を仕事に打ち込んだ。He gave body and soul to his job.














私は造花が好きではない。I don't like artificial flowers.













あんな男見ても胸くそが悪い。I can't bear the sight of him.

４年以上も音信不通だったんだよ。I haven't heard a word from them in over four years.

よしき君が「寒いよ、いやだよ」と泣きっ面でぶつぶつ言っている。"It's cold! I hate it!" Yoshiki complains with teary face.











私は家に帰ってからうたた寝した。I took a doze after coming home.
足手まといになる子供をお頼みしてすみません。I am sorry to encumber you with the children.






そんなことは生まれてこの方、見たことも聞いたこともない。Never in my life have I heard or seen such a thing.この方を玄関まで御案内しなさい。Show this gentleman to the front door.
この方が２つのうちではるかによい。This is by far the better of the two.











私のうちは小人数です。My family is small.

























そんな審判員はやめてしまったほうがよい。Such a judge may as well retire from his job.


























その花は雨風にさらされないように保護されている。The flowers are protected against the weather.



彼女の使い走りをしようと一人の少年が待機した。A boy stood by to run errands for her.









好事魔多し。Happy events tend to be accompanied by problems.






その猫は彼女の着物にまつわりついた。The cat clung to her dress.見たこともないような数の虻が、私にまとわりついてきたのです。More horseflies than I'd ever seen came and flew around me.









この機会のおかげで私たちは大いに手間暇が省けた。Thanks to the opportunity, we were able to avoid substantial effort.


















わたしが前をよく見てなかったから、出会い頭にぶつかっちゃって。小川くんは悪くないわ。Because I wasn't looking where I was going, I bumped into him when we passed. It wasn't his fault.



















彼は年の割にとても世慣れて見える。He looks quite sophisticated for his age.













今釣ってきた魚を、活き造りにしてもらえますか。Can you make sashimi out of this fish I just caught?
















実のところ、即決を悔やんでないといったら嘘だった。Truthfully, if I'd said I didn't have any regrets over my snap decision I'd have been lying.


果樹栽培者がリンゴの接ぎ穂を台木に接ぎ木しました。The orchardist grafted an apple bud onto the rootstock.話の接ぎ穂がなくて困った。He found it very hard to keep the conversation going.






禁酒法のしかれていた時代に、酒類密輸入の悪どい商売を腕ずくで自分の支配下におくために、てき屋たちは、おたがいに殺しあっていた。During prohibition days, racketeers used to rub each other out to get control of the rum-running racket.
















残念ながら、完全雇用はもう当然の事ではなくなっている。Unfortunately, full employment can no longer be taken for granted.
























昔は、悪いことをすると、学校の先生から平手をくらったり拳固をもらうことが当たり前だった。In the past it was perfectly normal to get the back of a teacher's hand or fist as punishment.











官軍に入城を許すとはどういう了見だ。What do you think you're doing letting the loyalists into the castle?



































その工場の廃棄物は深刻な環境汚染を引き起こした。The factory waste gave rise to serious environmental pollution.
グリーンピースは環境保護のために困難な戦いをしています。Greenpeace is fighting an uphill battle to save the environment.


環境破壊は驚くほどすすんでいる。The destruction of the environment is appalling.





果樹栽培者がリンゴの接ぎ穂を台木に接ぎ木しました。The orchardist grafted an apple bud onto the rootstock.












お前らの憐れみなんぞ願い下げだ。I don't want your pity.








私は時々隣の家の人と垣根越しに話をする。I sometimes talk to my neighbor across the fence.













イランはアメリカ合衆国に対して宣戦布告をした。Iran proclaimed war against the US.







和平会議が来週始まる。Peace talks will begin next week.


彼は和書は言うまでもなく洋書も読んでいる。He reads foreign books, not to mention Japanese ones.





インベーダーと和議の交渉をしないことに決めた。We decided not to have peace negotiations with the invaders.

１９９０年代は湾岸戦争で始まった。The 1990s began with the Gulf War.









彼女は家政学の一部として衛生学を学んでいる。She studies hygiene as part of her domestic science course.






東京はたくさんの衛星都市に囲まれている。Tokyo is surrounded by many satellite cities.


この重役のポストに適当な人物を見つけるには、人材斡旋業者に依頼する必要がある。We'll need a head hunting agency to find the right man for this executive position.

私はそうしたことを週末に考え始めたのだが、それはかん木の下に残っている葉を残らずかき集めている時のことであった。I got thinking about it over the weekend, when I was raking the last of the leaves out from under the bushes.





















軍備競争の狂気と不道徳に終止符を打つ時が、人類にやってきた。The time has come for mankind to put an end to the madness and immorality of the arms race.








その風船は風でどこかに運び去られた。The balloon was carried away somewhere by the wind.
運まかせにするな。Don't leave it up to chance.

















多くの運動選手は青年時代に盛りを極める。Most athletes are at their best during their early manhood.

運転手は運転台からもんどり打って投げ出された。The driver was thrown from his seat head over heels.
運転免許証を持っていますか。Do you have a driver's license?







運試しだ、やってごらん。Take your chance, and do it.


囲い込みに関する要点は、エスニック・グループの構成を明確に記述しなければならないということである。The point about enclosure is that the configuration of ethnic groups must be clearly described.



彼は自分の違法行為を恥じていない。He is not ashamed of his misconduct.
































寒風が骨身にしみた。The cold wind cut me to the bone.
その仕事は十分骨折ってするだけの価値がある。The work is well worth the trouble.











祖母の遺灰は寺院に置かれた骨壷に入っている。Grandmother's ashes are in an urn at the temple.














オニユリはユリ科に属する１つの種である。Tiger lilies are one species of the lily family.























中央には机が据えられていて、赤い革張りの回転椅子がそえてあった。A desk stood in the centre, with a red leather swivel chair.






























帰りがけに郵便局に寄るよ。I'll call by the post office on the way home.
鳥には帰巣本能がある。Birds have a homing instinct.
行方不明だった漁船が無事帰港した。The fishing boat that had been missing returned to its port safely.











お礼を申し上げるのが遅くなりましたが、貴国訪問の際にはお世話になりました。I regret the delay in writing to you to thank you for your hospitality on my visit to your country.

彼の貴族的な作法には感心する。I admire his aristocratic manners.








たくさんの人々が倫理の面から遺伝子治療に反対した。A great many people were opposed to gene therapy in terms of ethics.






















空気はさまざまな気体の混合物である。Air is a mixture of various gases.



















雨くらいで電話が混線してたら日本なんて大変ですよね。If rain was enough to get phone-lines crossed then Japan would be in a right mess, wouldn't it?






市は困窮者に毛布を供給した。The city supplied the needy with blankets.








血圧計の数値は？What's the reading on the blood pressure monitor?


彼女の顔には血の気がなかった。Her face was the color of chalk.




血尿が出ました。I had blood in my urine.


血便がでます。I have bloody stools.











血液検査をしましょう。I'd like you to have a blood test.












血たんが出ます。My phlegm has blood in it.


































私はそれに引き付けられて、それを採用し、ぶっきらぼうな反対や真正面からの議論を止め、謙遜な探究者、懐疑主義者を装った。I was charmed with it, adopted it, dropped my abrupt contradiction and positive argumentation, and put on the humble inquirer and doubter.










ゆりかごの中で覚えたことは墓場まで続く。What is learned in the cradle is carried to the tomb.


























彼はその模造品を本物と比較した。He compared the imitation with the original.





なるほど、言われてみれば確かに、田中さんは模擬戦で一度も被弾していませんでしたね。Of course. Now that you say that, certainly Ms Tanaka wasn't shot even once in the mock battles.
















そんなに欲をかいていると、虻蜂取らずになっちゃうよ。Don't be so greedy or you'll wind up with nothing.


















こんな荒れ模様の日に外出するなんて君は馬鹿だよ。You are an idiot to go out in this weather.



情勢は荒療治を必要とする。The situation calls for drastic measures.

彼は私の望み通りの人物だ。He is a man after my own heart.








５年前に網膜剥離を起こしました。I had retinal detachment five years ago.



その場しのぎの対策では麻薬中毒問題に切り込むことはできないでしょう。Stopgap measures won't make a dent in drug addiction.










我こそ魔女がりの大将。I'm the witchfinder general.


彼は無一文だ。He is as poor as a rat.





他ならぬ君の頼みなら、無下には出来ないだろう。If it's a request from you, I'm hardly likely to be able to turn you down flat.


そんなことをするなんて何と無分別な男だ。What a thoughtless man to do that!



彼は高校３年間無遅刻無欠席だった。He attended the high school for three years without missing a single day or being late.



























僕、無芸大食で何の取り柄もないんです。I'm afraid my greatest talent is for eating.


私は彼女に無利子で５００ドル貸した。I lent her 500 dollars free of interest.






無表情な女の人にいいよるのは、味つけの入ってないスープをすするようなものだ。Making love to an expressionless woman is like sipping soup without any seasoning.






髪のカット料、1000円だったんだよ。今時珍しいですよね。無免許だったりして。My haircut only cost 1,000 yen. That's pretty rare these days. He probably didn't have a license.















その無所属候補者は中絶問題を公約からはずしました。The independent candidate took the abortion issue off his platform.





ソクラテスは主神ゼウスを信じなかったので無神論の罪に問われた。Socrates was accused of atheism because he did not believe in Zeus.
その無政府主義者はかっとなりやすい。The anarchist is apt to lose his temper.



彼は若い頃は実に無軌道だった。He was very wild in his youth.







彼の態度はすこぶる無骨だ。He is very blunt in his manner.





年を取ると、無病息災であることが何よりだと思うようになる。As you get older you start to feel that health is everything.















地方自治体では新しい開発プロジェクトを無理押ししようとしています。Local officials are twisting arms to push new development projects.











リンドバーグの大西洋横断無着陸単独飛行はめざましい偉業であった。Lindbergh's solo nonstop transatlantic flight was a remarkable accomplishment.




ゲームは無期延期になった。The game has been indefinitely postponed.



彼女はモルヒネ注射によって無痛の状態になった。She was kept under with morphine injections.



今日の土地問題は歴代の政府の無策によるものである。Today's land problems are the product of years of neglect by successive governments.



多勢に無勢。私の企画は残念ながら取り下げますよ。It looks like I'm outnumbered here. I hate to do it but I'll withdraw my plan.











無試験で入学を許可された。I was admitted to school without having to take an entrance examination.




彼は、無電で通信を送った。He sent a message by wireless.











彼らは敵の無線通信を受信した。They monitored the enemy's radio communications.

























これは昭和座から舞台中継です。This is a direct broadcast from the Showa theater.



我々のクラスが劇を上演した時、私は舞台効果を受け持った。When our class performed a play, I took charge of stage effects.

















馬上の騎士をみてごらん。Look at that knight on the horse.




競馬で万馬券を当ててウハウハなんだ。I'm tickled pink about winning 10,000 yen at the horse races.







こいつはどこの馬の骨だ？Who's this nobody?





僕たちは昨日の夜、町中を飲んでばか騒ぎをして回った。We really painted the town red last night.







































私の心は明鏡止水だ。My mind is as bright and clean as a stainless mirror.

猛吹雪に遭うまでは順調に進んだ。We made good time until we ran into a blizzard.





犬が侵入者に猛然と吠えかかった。The dogs barked furiously at the intruder.


ヘミングウェーはアフリカで猛獣狩りをたのしんだ。Hemingway enjoyed big game hunting in Africa.










その国は急速に工業化された。The country was industrialized very quickly.




日本は工業国だ。Japan is an industrial nation.



























彼女の行動はしだいに攻撃的になってくるだろう。Her behavior will become more aggressive.


















その条件は空文化している。The treaty is now a dead letter.









空気汚染の問題があるので、自転車が自動車にとってかわる日があるかもしれない。Because of the problem of air pollution, the bicycle may some day replace the automobile.










エンジンを空回りさせちゃいかん。長持ちさせたいからね。Don't race the car. We want to make it go as far as possible.
空耳ですよ。You are hearing things.


















その家は今空き家だ。The house is not occupied now.
本当の自信と空威張りは別問題だ。True bravery is quite another thing from bravado.











皆、空理空論ばかり言って、時間の無駄だよ、この会議は。This meeting is a waste of time. Everybody is just talking in vague theoretical terms.




そのことはうろ覚えに覚えてはいる。I have a faint recollection of the event.











彼は空想家にすぎない。He is no more than a dreamer.

すき腹にまずいものなし。Hunger is the best sauce.






















そのオペラにはおそれ多くも皇太子殿下ご夫妻が足を運ばれた。The opera was graced with the august presence of the Crown Prince and Princess.
私はよく説明して彼の恐怖心を取り除いてやった。I reasoned him out of his fears.







彼らははずかしくてうなだれた。They hung their heads in shame.










容姿端麗、頭脳明晰、運動神経抜群、家は金持ちで、ついでに学生会の副会長をしてたりもする、いわゆるパーフェクトな奴だ。Looks, brains, reflexes, rich family and, for good measure, vice president of the student committee - in other words he's 'perfect'.














親の欲目。The crow thinks her own birds fairest.






















これだけ禁煙、禁煙といわれる以上、喫煙というのは公序良俗に反する行為なんだろうね。There are so many anti-smoking campaigns these days; maybe smoking really is a threat to the public order.














講師は公害問題について講演した。The lecturer spoke on pollution problems.




どういった時事が公務員試験で出題されるのか。What sort of current affairs appear in the civil service examination?





































歯を食い縛る、喉元までせりあがった感情を強引に飲み込む。He grits his teeth and forces back his growing fear.
ジョージののどぼとけは信じられないぐらい大きい。George has an incredibly large Adam's apple.












彼は私の胸ぐらをつかんだ。He grabbed me by the collar.

























ノースウエスタン大学の研究者、アイリーン・ペパーバーグは、オウムは人の口まねをするだけでなく言葉の意味を学ぶことができることを発見しつつある。Irene Pepperberg, a researcher at Northwestern University, is discovering that a parrot can not only mimic people but also learn the meaning of words.



今日の会議で、私は友人のために口添えをしてやった。I put in a good word for my friend at today's meeting.






セールスマンは大抵口達者だ。Salesmen are usually fast talkers.









これらの話は口語体の日常の言葉で語られる。These stories are told in colloquial and everyday language.



口髭は鼻の下にはえる。A mustache grows on the upper lip.









強盗は私を後ろ手に縄で縛った。The burglar tied my hands behind my back with a rope.
ちなみに、それはこの話の後日談にする予定です。By the way, I plan to do that for this story's sequel.





その場に居合わせた者は皆、かすかな後光に照らされる学部長に視線を向けた。Now, all heads turn toward the dean, who sits surrounded by a faint halo of light.









いずれ後便で詳しく申し上げます。You shall hear more from me by the next mail.









いまさら嘆いても、それこそ、後の祭だよ。You can regret it all you want, but it won't do you any good now.



その後援者は本物の骨董品の良さが分かる。The patron appreciates genuine antiques.




俺は締め出されてるんだぞ？後ろ暗いことがあるに決まってる。I was locked out! There's got to be something fishy going on.































教育委員会は何としてでもあの本を発売禁止にするでしょう。The local school board would go to any length to ban that book.

彼は複雑なぜんまいじかけのおもちゃを考案した。He devised a complicated clockwork toy.

彼は何度も質問して発言者の話の邪魔をした。He interrupted the speaker with frequent questions.



コンピューターは比較的最近の発明品だ。The computer is a relatively recent invention.
Ｂ．フランクリンはアメリカの政治家であり発明家であった。B. Franklin was an American statesman and inventor.

発音記号が読めますか？Can you read phonetic signs?
ロケットは発射台から打ち上げられた。The rockets were fired from a launching pad.


遠慮せずに先生に話してね。理解できなければ発案して。Don't be shy about talking to the teacher; if you don't understand, use some initiative!






ビザの再発給をお願いしたいのですが。Could you please issue me a visa again?




































そのことは、各研究分担者とこのテーマとの関係を瞥見すれば、おのずから明らかとなる。That fact becomes self evident if you take a look at the relation between this theme and those leading research on it.









彼は抜き足差し足で部屋に入った。He tiptoed into the room.










彼は抜けがけの功名をたてた。He forestalled everybody in accomplishing.










活動家たちは反対運動を強めています。Activists are stepping up their protest drive.
子供は反抗的になる傾向がある。Children are inclined to be disobedient.
子供は反抗期になる傾向がある。Children have a tendency to become rebellious.












保守主義の人が必ずしも反動主義者とは限らない。A conservative is not always a reactionary.




サダムが脅威でないなどと言うのは、赤がかった反戦運動の人達くらい。It's only the anti-war pinkos who say things like Saddam isn't a threat.


これは私の血ではない。すべて相手の返り血だ。私の身体には傷ひとつない。This isn't my blood. It's all splash-back from my opponent. There isn't a single scratch on me.








彼らはどんな体勢で捕っても地肩が強いからいい返球ができる。Their shoulders are strong no matter what stance they are in so they can throw back to the pitcher well.












追われた敗残兵は、どうやら対決のときがきたと、腹をきめた。The pursued remnant of soldiers decided it was high time for a show-down one way or another.






























その鶴は片足で立っていた。The crane was standing on one leg.








その患者は片時も目を離せない。The patient requires constant care.

バーミンガムまでの片道切符をください。Can I have a single to Birmingham?











いろいろな不幸な原因から、片親家族が増えている。Due to a number of unfortunate causes, one-parent families are on the increase.
















この国宝は年１回しか拝観を許されない。This national treasure can be seen by the public only once a year.

























































彼は以前より今の方が金回りがよい。He is now better off than before.




彼は金使いが荒い。He is free with his money.

「軽くならいいけど」「うむ、では金的と目潰しは有効にするか？」"If it's a light workout, OK." "Right, so will we allow crotch-kicking and eyeball crushing?"










































この大分類には、金融業又は保険業を営む事業所が分類される。Into this broad category fall companies that run money lending and insurance businesses.




娘の父親は金離れがいい。Her father is liberal with money.












先日の夜のパーティーで、兄は少しのみ過ぎて酔いつぶれてしまった。At the party the other night, my brother drank a bit too much and passed out.







二台のバンが激突してめり込んだ。The two vans telescoped together.
























感覚的にそれに違和感を感じるが、一体それが何なのかわからなかった。Even though I felt that there was something strange, I just didn't know what it was.









ホワイト先生は感謝状を何通か生徒に読んで聞かせた。Mr White read out some letters of thanks to his students.
感謝祭のお休み、楽しんでね。Have a nice Thanksgiving!





三菱銀行は東京銀行を吸収合併した。The Mitsubishi Bank merged with the Bank of Tokyo.

私の目はその光景に吸い付けられた。My eyes were intent on the scene.


音を吸収する素材のことを吸音材といいます。Sound absorbing material is called acoustic material.








山越えの道は狭く、しかも急勾配だった。The road across the mountain was narrow, and what's more, it was a steep slope.












おとなしいものもあれば、急進的なものもある。Some are moderate; some are radical.
彼らは急進派の烙印を押された。They were labeled radicals.

自動車の輸入は第一・四半期には急減するでしょう。Auto imports will take a nose-dive in the first quarter.


うちの会社はあの合弁会社と提携している。We are affiliated with the new joint venture company.






汚れに強い合成皮革を使用した２人掛けのソファです。This is a two-seater sofa using stain-resistant artificial leather.






































マーテイン・ルーサー・キング・ジュニアは暗殺者の凶弾で命を落としたのである。Martin Luther King, Jr., a man of peace, was killed by an assassin's bullet.
























この講座では応急手当の基本的な技能を教えます。This course teaches basic skills in first aid.




何故か鷹派と目される人たちが、ことごとく苦手。For some reason, I don't cope well with those recognized as hardliners.






禁酒法のしかれていた時代に、酒類密輸入の悪どい商売を腕ずくで自分の支配下におくために、てき屋たちは、おたがいに殺しあっていた。During prohibition days, racketeers used to rub each other out to get control of the rum-running racket.













勘定書がまちがっているように思います。I think there's a mistake in my bill.


人は泣きつつ生まれ、泣き言を言いつつ暮らし、失望落胆して死ぬ。We are born crying, spend our lives complaining, and die disappointed.








彼は立派な古典学者です。He is a fine classical scholar.
教養のある人によくあることだが、彼はジャズより古典音楽が好きだ。As is often the case with educated people, he likes classical music better than jazz.





苦心惨憺の末、考え出した企画が、会議で一瞬にして却下されちゃうんだからな。After all the trouble we went to in coming up with that project, it only took them a second to shoot it down in the meeting.















彼らは固形燃料を携えていた。They brought solid fuel with them.

彼女は、卵を固ゆでにするのがすきだ。She likes her eggs hard-boiled.










































これらの青い線は、航空路をあらわす。These blue lines correspond to airlines.










雇用主は彼の協力に心から感謝した。His employer was sincerely grateful for his cooperation.






僕も結構風呂の時間が短いけれど、君は本当に烏の行水だね。I don't usually take long baths but you're in and out in no time.




我々は暗闇の中で正しい道に行き当たった。We hit the right road in the dark.


彼は部屋の中を行きつもどりつした。He walked back and forth in the room.

弾丸の降ってくる中を行軍した。We marched under a hail of bullets.







行きがかり上しなけりゃならなかった。It just turned out that I had to do it.




私の母は行儀作法にやかましい。My mother is strict about manners.


















































農家の人は春に小麦の種まきをする。Farmers sow grain seeds in spring.















銀行は我々が要請したローンを用立ててくれた。The bank came through with the loan we had requested.
よほど重要な用向きでやってきたことが、彼の顔色で分かった。I could tell by the look on his face that he had come on very important business.







あの女は用済みだ。The woman served her purpose.

退職者は、自分たちを用なしで非生産的と感じることが多い。The retired often feel that they are useless and unproductive.









博多までの通し切符を買いましょう。I'll buy a through ticket to Hakata.









それが盗賊の通り言葉です。That's thieves' cant.
自慢じゃないが僕は通知表の家庭科で３以上を取ったことがない。１０段階評価で。I don't want to boast, but I've never gotten better than a 3 on my report card for home economics. Out of 10 that is.




彼の通信簿はオールＡだよ。He has a straight-A report card.












通りがかりの車が私たちに水をはねた。A passing car splashed water on us.
通りがけに本屋によった。I entered the bookstore on the way.











科学者の通弊は、あらゆる問題に技術的解決策があると誤認すること。A fault common to scientists is mistakenly believing that every problem has a technical solution.






このことで彼は痛い目にあうだろう。This will give him something to cry about.







わが軍は敵に痛撃を与えた。We gave the enemy a drubbing.






私が同時通訳を務めた。I acted as a simultaneous interpreter.







彼は彼の洞察力を得意に思っている。He congratulates himself on his foresight.





























彼は続けざまに五時間以上働かされた。He was forced to work more than five hours on end.

ご読了ありがとございました〜。Thank you for reading to the end.













君は大変読書力がある。Your reading is very advanced.




僕だってちょっとした読書家なんだよ。I'm a bit of a reader myself.

昨夜は彼が貸してくれた本に読みふけっていた。Last night, I indulged in reading the book he lent me.






私の叔父の字は読みにくい。My uncle's handwriting is hard to read.











これらの人々がコミュニティから排除されたのだと考えることは非合理的だとは言えない。It is not unreasonable to think that these people were excluded from the community.









いかなる非常時にもホームズさんはいつも頼りになる。You can always count on Holmes in any emergency.










彼の非業の死を聞いた時、彼の妻は悲しみで気も狂わんばかりだった。When his wife heard of his violent death, she was beside herself with grief.














排卵誘発剤を使っています。I'm taking a fertility drug.










彼の突然の死は悲劇的事件だった。His sudden death was a tragedy.
記事の論調は一種の悲観論だった。The article's tone was one of pessimism.
楽観主義者は鏡をのぞきこんでますます楽天的に、悲観論者はますます悲観的になる。The optimist looks into a mirror and becomes more optimistic, the pessimist more pessimistic.



分相応の暮らしをするように努めなさい。Try to live within your income.











































配達人が彼女宛の手紙を置いていった。The mailman left a letter for her.

















ボーイング社は海上自衛隊用の飛行艇を開発しました。Boeing developed a flying boat for the Maritime Self-Defense Force.

彼はとびぬけて分別のある人だ。He is by far the most sensible.














私は捕虫網で蝶を捕まえた。I captured butterflies with a net.















債券発行による調達資金は予算の赤字を補填するのに使われる。The proceeds from the bond issue will be used to finance the budget deficit.











このナイフはパンを薄切りにするのにちょうどよい。This knife is just good for slicing a loaf.























群集は勝者に拍手喝采を送った。The crowd gave the winner a big hand.


彼は迫害者を懲らしめて人民たちのあだを討つだろう。He will avenge the people on their oppressor.


















りんごを盗んでいるところを捕まった子供は、おめずおくせず罰を受けた。The child who was caught stealing apples bravely faced the music in accepting his punishment.








彼には扶養家族が多かった。He had a large family to support.












歩哨はみんなに合い言葉を言わせた。The sentry demanded the password from everyone.
























彼のおじいさんはいわゆる独立独行の人だ。His grandfather is what is called a self-made man.













彼女は独眼の猫を見て震え上がった。She shuddered at the sight of the one-eyed cat.


私は、彼の独創力は、とても重要だと思った。I considered his originality of great importance.

人権擁護団体は独裁的な政府に圧力をかけています。Human rights groups are putting pressure on authoritarian governments.
独裁者は人々を虐げた。The dictator oppressed the people.




ジムは仏語と独語が自由に使える。Jim mastered French and German.






















なるほど持田は最善を尽くしたが、注意力が足りなかった。It is true that Mochida did his best, but he wasn't careful enough.
そのページの注意書きを読みなさい。Read the note at the bottom of the page.


彼は駐米日本大使に任命された。He was accredited to the United States to represent Japan.

駐車違反の罰金は高い。Parking fines are very costly.
駐車禁止区域に車を止めてはいけません。You must not park your car in a no parking zone.


株式市場は活況を呈している。The stock market is very active.
































「直る見込みは？」「システム開発チームのシュバイシェン博士が現在闘病中のため、もう暫くはかかるかと・・・」"Prospects for repair?" "Prof. Shubaishen, the leader of the system development team, is presently unwell so we think it will take a while longer ..."


























彼はこの頃研究を投げやりにしている。He is neglecting his research these days.












私は詩人、たとえば啄木が好きである。I like poets, such as Takuboku.










仕事の邪魔立てされては黙っておれない。I cannot endure being disturbed in my work.





五十肩に悩まされています。I'm suffering from a frozen shoulder.








語彙力を増強したい。I want to build up my vocabulary.

あのニュースを聞いた時にはがくぜんとした。When I heard the news I was caught with my pants down.

あごひげが、ある為に彼は１０歳ほど実際よりふけてみえた。His beard made him look older by ten years.




彼女の名前は誤記されていた。Her name was wrongly spelled.











その犬はライオンを見ると毛を逆立てた。The dog's hair bristled when it saw the lion.



















逆さまつげがあります。I have in-growing eyelashes.
逆説的に言えば、彼は正しい。Paradoxically, he is right.










それは御子を信じるものが、一人として滅びることなく、永遠の命を持つためである。That whoever believes in him shall not perish but have eternal life.











ペットのためにご祈祷していただける御守と御札が実現しました。Now there are charms and talismans for your pet that you can have blessed.









少しの間だけでも一緒に戦ってくれるだけで御の字よ。Even if it's just for a short while fighting alongside us is all I could ask for.























オレを非難するのはお門違いだ。You're barking up the wrong tree.
彼女は待たされて少々お冠です。She is a bit indignant about being kept waiting.



あんなやつを負かすのはお茶の子さいさいだ。I can beat him hands down.


この商品にはおまけが付く。This article comes with a free gift.






検査は全くおざなりなものだった。The inspection was quite perfunctory.

１９７０年代、日本は自動車産業の分野でアメリカのお株を奪った。In the automotive industry of the 1970's, Japan beat the U.S. at its own game.
ご破算にしよう。Let's throw it away and start over with a clean slate.






パーティーはお祭り騒ぎで終わった。The party ended up becoming a great revelry.

それはご都合主義というものだ。That's opportunism, pure and simple.









その会社では、会長が院政を敷いていて、社長はお飾りにすぎない。The "retired" president of that company runs the whole show from behind the scenes, so the current president is nothing but a figurehead.

彼は他人の感情など全くおかまいなしだ。He pays no attention to others' feelings.
何かおつまみない？Do we have anything I can snack on?




彼はお調子者だ。He is easily flattered.
御霊によって生まれるものも、皆そのとおりです。So it is with everyone born of the Spirit.
お嬢様こちらへどうぞ。This way, please, mademoiselle.
これは、すでに教科書に書かれている結果が得られるようにお膳立てをするというものだった。This was to arrange things so that I obtained the result already written in the textbooks.








抽象芸術は感じるものだ。Abstract art is something to feel.
現代抽象画、特にモンドリアンが理解し難い。I have difficulty understanding abstract modern art, especially Mondrian.


























輸入制限は両国間により親密な関係を作る支障になる。Import restrictions are barriers to closer relations between the two countries.
あの店では輸入品を売っている。They sell imports at that store.










その島の輸出品の８２％ーこれは５分の４以上になるがーは、農産物である。Of the island's exports, 82% - more than four-fifths - is agricultural produce.











ふたをして始めは強火、沸騰したら中火にして約７分間煮ます。Put the lid on and start at high flame, when it boils set to medium flame and boil for about seven minutes.




中央銀行に物価の番人だけさせておくのはもったいない。It's a waste to just have the central banks watching over commodity prices.
















４．中華鍋にごま油を熱してバターを溶かす。4. Heat the sesame oil in the wok and melt the butter.




































































驚いたことに、その著名な心理学者は誘拐罪で告訴された。To my surprise, the noted psychologist was accused of a kidnapping.


検事は誘導尋問をした。The prosecutor asked me a leading question.





日本は多くの国からしっぺ返しをくらうだろう。Japan will get it from many countries.





彼は目下首位打者だ。At this time, he's our best batter.
君の行動が首尾一貫していない。You are not consistent in your actions.





刑事の一人が彼の首根っこをつかんだ。One of the detectives seized him by the neck.

首脳会議は世界平和に貢献した。The summit conference was held for world peace.










彼は祖国愛に燃えている。He is burning with love of his country.








だが、組み手で手を出さないのは優しさではない！！However not attacking your partner in sparring is not a kindness!






























バブルが跡形もなく消え去ったからである。That's because the bubble vanished into thin air.











守備隊は降伏を強いられた。The garrison was forced to surrender.










時々、政治家の一人がテレビの討論会に出て傍聴者の意見を押さえつけようとする場面をみる。Sometimes, one of the politicians can be seen trying to keep the audience's opinions under control during televised debates.


その年の日本のＯＤＡの最大の受け手は中国だった。The largest recipient of Japan's ODA that year was China.




大阪の中村さんから料金受信人払いの電話が入っています。お受けになりますか。This is a collect call from Mr Nakamura in Osaka. Will you accept the charge?
















妹の咲子です。俺と年子で、今受験生です。This is my little sister Sakiko. She was born the same year as me and is now studying for her exams.





















この花はたいてい冬場も枯れずにもちますよ。These flowers will live through the winter more often than not.





















彼は砂を手いっぱいにすくいあげた。He scooped up sand by the handful.



我々は今人手不足だ。We need more workers.



つまらない手出しをしてやぶへびに終わった。He meddled where he wasn't wanted and it backfired on him.



あやふやな手つきで一枚の紙を動かした。She fumbled with a piece of paper.


























手押し車を上手に使って、コンクリートブロックを運んでいる。A wheelbarrow fills the bill for moving concrete blocks.



彼のしたことは手っ取り早く言えば詐欺だ。What he did is, in plain language, fraud.




手負いの熊は一般にとても危険だ。Wounded bears are usually very dangerous.



タバコでも吸っていないと手持ちぶさただ。Sometimes I smoke just to give my hands something to do.






















彼は手腕家だ。He is a man of ability.





















この自転車に乗っててひどい事故に遭ったんです。I had a terrible accident riding this bike.






















ボクシング・デイは、郵便屋さんや牛乳屋さんなどに贈り物をする日ですが、クリスマス後の最初の週日です。Boxing Day, when presents are given to the postman, the milkman, etc., is the first week-day after Christmas.

ジョーンズ家では週給で召し使いに給料を支払っている。The Joneses pay their servant by the week.







孤軍奮闘したけれど、衆寡敵せず、彼のビジネスプランは受け入れられなかったよ。He put up a brave and lone struggle, but up against such heavy odds he couldn't get his business plan accepted.






戦いは人間の獣性をよびおこす。War arouses the animal in man.





彼の卒業論文は私のと関係がある。His thesis is related to mine.








その男は三杯で酔いつぶれてしまった。After three drinks, the man passed out.






















彼女はあらゆるもののあるべき場所を寸分違わず知っていた。She knew to an inch where everything should be.






































彼は罪滅ぼしに難行苦行をしている。He is doing penance.




損害額は何百万ドルにも達するだろう。Losses will run into millions of dollars.







都市化が田園生活をどんどん侵食しています。Urbanization is encroaching on rural life.
都市再開発計画は現在着実に進行している。The urban-renewal project is now well under way.

彼は都市計画の分野の専門家だ。He is an expert in the area of city planning.
彼は都会人の作法を身につけているけれども根は田舎育ちだ。For all his city ways, he is a country boy at heart.

















彼の衣服は着古されている。His clothes are worn out.















外れた。相手に着弾していない。Off-target. My opponent hadn't been hit.










まず、市長あてに、請願書を提出して、署名運動をしています。First, we will present a petition to the mayor and collect signatures.






テレビが普及したおかげで、諸外国の風景を楽しく眺めることができる。The spread of television enables us to enjoy the scenery of foreign countries.
風雨をもろともせず駅まで歩いた。We braved the elements to walk to the station.

























この小説を子供向きに書き改めるのは難しい。It is hard to adapt this story for children.





あなたには禍の前兆である壁上の書きものが読めるかもしれないが、私にはちんぷんかんぷんだ。You may be able to read the handwriting on the wall, but it is Greek to me.




















彼は手紙を書き続ける。He has been writing a letter.













それは山火事の後に「土石流」が発生するということです。That's the fact that avalanches occur after mountain fires.


土地改革は人々の暮らしに大きな変化をもたらした。Land reform caused a great change in the lives of the people.


日本では土地勘というものは、あまり価値がない。The locality does not count for much in Japan.








































彼は近所の人々より社会的に一段上だ。He is a cut above his neighbors.






彼女がはじめて社交界に登場した事はその時期の社交界最大の出来事だった。Her debut was the biggest social event of the season.

君の言っていることはただの社交辞令だよ。You're just being diplomatic.

君も社風に染まっている。You're taking on the company style.
新しい社則は年配の労働者達には不公平だった。The new company rule was unfair to older workers.

























禎子の友人達は、彼女と原爆でなくなったすべての子供達の慰霊碑を建てたいと思った。Sadako's friends wanted to build a monument to her and all children who were killed by the atomic bomb.



















「とすると石造り？」「一般的なＲＣ造よ」"So it's built from stone?" "It's ordinary reinforced concrete."



















































専制君主は人民を弾圧した。The tyrant kept the people down.
人々は常に専制政治に抵抗するものだ。People will always resist tyranny.

尿瓶でおしっこするのを手伝ってあげることを専門用語でなんと言いますか？What's the technical terminology for assisting someone to go to the toilet with a urine bottle?
私たちは、ブラウン博士を合衆国で最高の心臓病の専門医とみなしている。We regard Dr. Brown as the best heart specialist in the United States.
専門ガッコのタメだよ。They're buddies from my technical school.




専務取締役にご就任されるとのこと、おめでとうございます。I was delighted to hear of your promotion to Senior Managing Director.
女性はもはや、伝統的な専業主婦の役割に満足せずに、仕事場での彼女たちの必要性を認識してもらいたいと思っている。Women no longer are satisfied with their traditional role of housewife, and are seeking recognition of needs in the workplace.





湿疹も伝染性だって。The rash is, um, also incredibly contagious.







彼らは団体競技に参加した。They participated in the team games.





転地があなたにとって効果があるでしょう。A change of air will do you good.
医者が勧めるので、どこかへ転地療養に行こうと思っています。I'm thinking of going somewhere for a change of air, since my doctor advises me to.











彼らは会社を転々とした。They were transferred from one office to another.

















































１００ドルなんてはした金さ。One hundred dollars is just chicken feed.









インターネットの断片的ニュースを読んでいるだけですが、まあ、だいたい想像がつきます。I'm only reading the scraps on news on the Internet, but, well, I get the general picture.







断続的ですが、もう２、３ヶ月になります。It's been intermittent for 2 or 3 months.
彼らは断髪にしている。They wear their hair bobbed.
断熱性が優れていることの欠点は、すぐに過熱状態になってしまうということである。The disadvantage of excellent insulation is that it quickly leads to overheating.



今日隣の子が真っ逆様に木から落ちたのよ。The boy next door fell head first from a tree.


真夏日には屋内にひっこんで太陽を避けるしか手がないよ。All I want to do during the dog days is stay indoors and keep out of the sun.

ブレーカーが落ちて真っ暗闇になった時、赤ちゃんが怖くて泣きだしました。When the breaker tripped and it became pitch black, the baby got scared and started crying.









気前のよきより、まず至当たれ。Be just before you are generous.









詩とは至福至善の心は最善至福の時の記録である。Poetry is the record of the best and happiest moments of the happiest and best mind.



彼は室内装飾を学んだ。He studied interior decoration.
室料はいくらですか。What's the room rate?




















診察券を持って来るのを忘れてしまいました。I forgot to bring my I.D. card.
その医者の診察室は２階にある。The doctor's office is on the second floor.

遅かれ早かれ彼は破滅する。He will eventually ruin himself.










離婚して身一つで所帯を切り盛りしているのですから大変でしょう。It must be terribly difficult, running her household on her own after divorcing.



姉は身支度に時間をかけすぎる。My sister spends too much time dressing.





身命をかけて職務を実践し、すべての警察官の心に火をともしてくれました。He risked his life to carry out his duty and inspired police officers everywhere.




その子供は恐怖で身動きができなかった。The child was paralyzed with fear.君はこのまま収入不相応な暮らしを続ければ金に困って身動きがとれなくなるだろう。You'll find yourself in deep water if you continue to live beyond your means.
























この像は実物大です。This statue is as large as life.








事件の原因を取り調べるために実情調査委員会が作られた。A fact-finding committee was set up to determine the cause of the incident.









あなたの考えはとても実際的とはいえない。Your ideas are hardly practical.














勝手口から入ってはいけないよ。Don't enter at the kitchen door.








勝ち負けの確率は五分五分だ。The chances of victory or defeat are even.


「あの、かりんさん・・・、そろそろお開きにしませんか？」「駄目、勝ち逃げ禁止！今度こそボクが勝つの！」"Er, Karin ..., shouldn't we call it a night soon?" "No! No quitting while ahead! Next time I'll win for sure!"


ドジャースは破竹の勢いで勝ち進んだ。The Dodgers went on winning with irresistible force.








物質が直接固体から気体に変わる過程を昇華という。The process by which substances are turned directly from a solid state into a gas is called sublimation.



乗り物酔いの薬をください。Please give me some airsickness medicine.
乗務員がただいま出入り口を開けております。The crew is now opening the hatch.

落石は登山者にとって危険である。Falling rocks present a danger to climbers.
登山家は清水が欲しくてたまらなかった。The mountaineer craved fresh water.




では、ならばなぜ梟王などを登極させた。Then, if so, why were the like of Kyouou let upon the throne?





株でやられるまで彼は証券市場の帝王でしたよ。He was a stock-market tycoon until the bears got him.
私は証券会社で働いています。I work for a stock company.
調査官は、証拠物件をもとめて残るくまなく捜索した。調査官がその場を去る時、そこはまったく目茶苦茶だった。The investigator left no stone unturned in his search for evidence. When he left the place, it was in an utter mess.













蒸気機関は熱を力に変える。A steam engine transforms heat into power.
蒸気機関車は電車に取って代わられた。Steam trains were replaced by electric trains.


父は蒸留酒は飲まない。My father drinks no spirits.



取り入れ時には天気がよかった。The weather was good for the harvest.




１０００銘柄以上の株が取引所に上場されている。More than 1000 issues are listed on the stock exchange.


テレビがラジオに取って代わった。TV has taken the place of radio.






みんなで分けて食べたいので、取り皿をもらえますか。We're all going to share it. Could you bring us some extra plates?









お父さん、めがねを居間から取ってきましょうか。Shall I fetch your glasses from the living room, Dad?







社長とその取り巻きが怪我をした。The president and his entourage were injured.








彼女は飛行機墜落事故で息子が一命をとりとめたことを聞いてうれし泣きした。She cried for joy when she heard that her son had survived the plane crash.



クリントン陣営は、両州でオバマが取った白人票を取り崩そうと必死になった。The Clinton camp became desperate to eliminate the white votes Obama had got in both states.


その２国は平和条約を取り決めた。The two countries negotiated a peace treaty.

君はいつも取り越し苦労をしている。You're always anticipating trouble.

卵を取り集めるのが彼の仕事だ。It was his job to gather eggs.
彼女はいつもボールを取り損なってばかりいる。She is always missing the ball.

彼女はいささかとりすました良家のお嬢さんだった。She was a rather prim and proper young lady.







彼はほかの人の宗教心には寛大だ。He is tolerant in religious belief of others.


その大寺院の天井には宗教画が描かれていた。The cathedral had a religious painting on its ceiling.

彼は政治家ではなくて宗教家だった。He was not a political figure but a religious one.





アンには崇拝者が多い。Anne has many admirers.


あちこちにヒナギクが群生している。There are clumps of daisies here and there.

公園を歩いているとき、私はひな鳥を見つけた。Walking in the park, I found a baby bird.








村民総出で彼を迎えた。The whole village came out to welcome him.




軍隊はグラント総司令官のもとで南部軍と戦った。The troops fought with Grant against the Confederates.










































これらの問題を総轄して取り扱わねばならない。We must treat these problems as a whole.





足代にもならない。That will not make even carfare.
























これが速記術というもので、こうすれば話す人に付いて行けるのです。This is shorthand writing, by means of which we can keep up with the talker.



国語の問題ができないというケースには三つあり、一つは速読力がないということです。There are three cases where people are not able to do English questions; the first is not being able to read fast.



その恐ろしい事故で数十人が負傷した。Dozens of people were injured in the terrible accident.
熱帯雨林は一日数万ヘクタールの割合でなくなっている。The rainforests are disappearing at the rate of tens of thousands of hectares a day.



ガウスには数学的な問題を考える生まれついた才能があった。Gauss had an innate talent for mathematical problems.
若いけれども彼はこれまでに例のないほどの偉大な数学者である。Young as he is, he is as great a mathematician as ever lived.

電話が数度鳴った。The telephone rang several times.








































彼女は電話の送話口を手でおおった。She covered the mouthpiece of the phone with her hand.














ここにおいて、著者たちは方法論の中心的な問題に言及している。Here the authors touch on the central methodological issue.

















音は防音装置で十分小さくなった。The noise was deadened by the insulation.











防衛庁が防衛省に格上げされたのはなぜですか？Why was the Japan Defense Agency upgraded to the Japanese Ministry of Defense?













ふさふさとしたまっすぐな銀髪をしていました。He had a lot of straight, silvery hair.











ストロンチウム９０：ストロンチウムの放射性同位体の一つ；放射性降下物に含まれ人体に有害。Strontium 90: One of the radioisotopes of strontium; part of radioactive fallout, harmful to human health.











うちは、安手の居酒屋じゃないんですからね、放歌高吟はお断り。Would you please stop singing so loudly? This is not a cheap drinking place.






彼はその訪問者を居間に通した。He let the visitor into the living room.
くれぐれも浄水器の悪質訪問販売業者や無料点検商法にはご注意ください。Please exercise every caution against cowboy salesmen of water purifiers and fraudulent-test sales.






喫煙者の病欠日数は非喫煙者の２倍です。Smokers take twice as many days off sick as non-smokers.
















私たちは並木道を歩いた。We walked along an avenue lined with trees.




















部屋の除湿のため窓を開けた。I opened the windows to remove the damp from the room.
































茶飲み友達がほしい。I want someone to talk to.












あのダークホースは予備選挙の前は、劣勢でした。The dark horse candidate was losing in the polls before the primary.











野手はボールを取り損ねた。The fielder failed to catch the ball.








喧嘩を見ようと、野次馬が集まった。A crowd collected to watch the fight.


彼はのたれ死にをしてしまった。He died by the roadside.































クラスのほとんど全員が謝恩会を開くことに賛成した。Almost everyone in the class voted in favor of having a thank-you party for the teachers.

部屋は兎小屋みたいだけど。But my place is like a rabbit hutch.




彼からは殴り書きの手紙が一通届いただけで、その後音沙汰が無い。I got a scribbled note from him, but haven't heard from him since.
駆け出しの新聞記者にしては腕がいい。You are doing well for a cub reporter.
さあ、駆けつけ三杯、威勢よくぱっといきましょう。Anybody who shows up late has to chug!















局部麻酔をしますね。I'll give you a local anaesthetic.














きみの説明は具体性に欠ける。Your explanation lacks concreteness.





















この推理小説はまだ半分ぐらいしか読んでいない。I am halfway through this detective story.





椎間板ヘルニアは背骨の間にある椎間板という軟骨が飛び出すものです。Disk herniation is when cartilage, called 'intervertebral disk' and found between each vertebra, slips out.




彼女は結婚式のために純白のドレスを着ていた。She was dressed all in white for the wedding.

















彼はとんちのきく男だ。He is a quick-witted man.






























その墜落事故で４００人もの乗客が死亡した。As many as 400 passengers were killed in the crash.












彼の馬は着々と対抗馬に追いついた。His horse gained steadily on his rivals.












その絵はこの絵とは対照的にカラフルだ。The picture is colorful in contrast with this one.





























彼らは事務所に建て増しをした。They built an extension to the office.


この建築物は一般に公開されていますか。Is this building open to the public?



ブラウン氏は建築業者と新しい家を建てる契約をした。Mr Brown contracted with the builder for a new house.




６歳ぐらいから鍵っ子生活だったんだから。From about age 6, I led the life of a latchkey kid.




これを解く何らかの方法があるはずだ。There must be some way to solve this.







































キング牧師が献身的に力を尽くしたものすべてが水泡に帰したかのように思われた。Everything Rev. Martin Luther King had worked so hard for seemed lost.





























間欠泉は２時間毎に湯を噴出する。The geyser sends up a column of hot water every two hours.
















フレッドには忍耐心というものがまるでないから、彼のカンシャク玉を破裂させるのはわけもない。Fred has very little patience, and it doesn't take much to make him fly off the handle.












見目より心。Handsome is that handsome does.
トムは現代美術を見る目がある。Tom has an eye for modern art.












あそこなら花火が見やすいよ。It's easy to see the fireworks from over there.
彼がダンスをする様子は見物だった。It was a sight to see him dance.
そこが彼女の腕の見せどころだった。That was her chance to show what she could do.
カップの中のスープは、見たところとても熱そうだ。The soup in the cup looks very hot.
君の家の見取り図を書いてよ。Make a sketch of your house.


あるものを見て見ぬふりをすればそれを無視しているのである。If you turn a blind eye to something, you ignore it.
液晶画面は、見にくいなぁ。You can't see too well with these LCD displays.









見様によっては彼女は正しい。In a sense, she is right, too.








デザインも、アーチ型のロゴデザインにより現代的で「登場感」「躍動感」のあるものに仕上げました。The design was also given the finishing touch to have launch impact and dynamism provided by the novelty of the arch shaped logo design.



現在完了は、過去〜現在という長いスパンを表現するものです。The present perfect expresses the long span from past to present.






その瞬間、私は現実感を失った。I lost my sense of reality at that moment.
































今肩慣らししているところです。I am just warming up now.







小包を速達で送ると割り増し料金がいります。There is an extra charge for mailing packages by express.





実業家として成功なさったやり口を教えてください。Tell me about your successes in business.

その弁護士は大変なやり手なので依頼人が多い。Because of his great professional skill, the lawyer has a large number of clients.

この仕事にはあまりやりがいを感じない。I don't get enough challenge in this job.

宿題をやりかけにしておいた。The boy left his homework half-finished.
この遣り場なき怒りをどこにぶつければいいのか。Where can I find an outlet for all my anger?














彼女は調子外れに歌う。She sings out of tune.










調教師とイルカはお互いに私たちが予想したよりはるかにコミュニケーションを上手にをした。The dolphin and trainer communicated much better than we expected.












































忠言耳に逆らう。Good advice grates on the ear.
































フレッドの意見がしゃくにさわったラリーは、居丈高な態度に出た。Because he thought Fred's comment was tacky, Larry got up on his high horse.








十字キーを上へ！するとＢＧＭが変わり、背景は魔王の居城へ・・・。Hit up on the D-pad, and the background music will change as the background itself becomes the Demon King's castle....


彼は居眠り運転をしていて事故を起こした。He fell asleep at the wheel and had an accident.
















私は湖岸で写真をとってもらった。I had my photo taken on the shore of the lake.























この店は家庭用品を備えている。This store carries household equipment.
あの旅館は家庭的だ。The hotel has a homey atmosphere.




彼女は家政学の一部として衛生学を学んでいる。She studies hygiene as part of her domestic science course.
















ホワイト教授は去年処女作を出版した。Professor White published his first book last year.


タイタニック号は処女航海で沈没した。The Titanic sunk on its maiden voyage.
































政府によるもっと効果的な価格統制が必要だ。We need more effective price controls by the Government.























往復切符を買いましたか。Did you buy a round-trip ticket?


















広告費はこの会社の経費の約７％を占めている。Advertising makes up about 7% of this company's expenses.












横倒しになった自動車が通行の妨げになった。A car lying on its side blocked the passage.







細かいことに気をつける人は、ものを書く時にｉに点をつけ、ｔに横棒をつけることを忘れないだろう。He who minds his Ps and Qs will not forget to dot the "i's" and cross his "t's", when writing.





その国は鉱物資源に富んでいる。That country is rich in minerals.




泳者の呼吸機能の特性について。Concerning the characteristics of respiratory function in swimmers.





白色の光束はプリズムによって様々な色の光線に分離される。A beam of white light is split by a prism into rays of various colors.
























満月でしたか新月でしたか。Was it a full moon or a new moon?








隊長は長時間行進させて新兵たちを訓練した。The captain exercised the new recruits with long marches.





私は新品のワープロを持っている。I've got a new word processor.
この車は新品同様だ。This car is as good as new.







新教徒の労働観であるこの考え方は依然、今日のアメリカ人にも影響を与えている。This attitude, the Protestant work ethic, still influences Americans today.



新進ボクサーがチャンピオンに打ち勝った。The new boxer outboxed the champion.
村民たちは新道に賛成した。The villagers supported a new road.









新薬が彼の命を救った。The new medicine saved his life.




















親思いの娘さんであることはわかります。I can tell that you're a daughter who cares a lot for her parents.





ムクドリのヒナを親鳥に返せますか。Can you return starling chicks to their parents?






















血は鮮血でした。The blood was bright red.




そのバスは最大限度４０人を乗せることができる。The bus can carry a maximum of forty people.

私の成績は一気にクラス最下位まで転落してしまっていた。My grades had dived to the bottom of the class.







彼は試験で最高点をとった。He got the highest grade on the exam.


われわれは最終的決定を行った。We've made a final decision.


彼はケーキをつまみ食いするのを見られた。He was seen to eat a piece of cake secretly.























コンピューターは現在では絶対的な必需品である。A computer is an absolute necessity now.






彼女があのピンクのドレスを着た姿はまさに絶品だった。In that pink dress, she was it.



状況は絶望的のようだ。The situation appears desperate.

彼は息も絶え絶えに横たわっていた。He lay breathing very feebly.









彼はまもなく親の膝元を離れる。He leaves the parental roof soon.












怠け者の節句働き。In the evening the idle man begins to be busy.
俺の目は節穴ではないぞ。You cannot pull the wool over my eyes.
その日が彼の人生の節目であった。That day proved to be the turning point in his career.














「未来形」というのは存在しない、ということは受験英語でも一般的になりつつあります。It is even becoming accepted even in exam-English that that called "simple future tense" does not exist.


呪術は未開社会においては重要な役割をもつ。Magic plays an important part in primitive society.

彼女は甘さ加減がよいかどうかケーキの味見をした。She tasted the cake to see if it was sweet enough.














彼女はタオルをきれいにたたみ、それを物入れに仕舞った。She folded up the towels and put them away in the cupboard.






最近、物忘れが激しくて。少しボケてきたのかな？Could I be going soft in the head? I forget things so easily these days.
締切に間に合うように死に物狂いでやってるよ。I'm killing myself to meet the deadline.






年金の額は原則として前年の物価変動にスライドして算出される。As a general rule, the pension amount is based on price changes in the previous year.


宮殿は物々しい警戒ぶりだった。The palace was heavily guarded.彼はいつも物々しい話し方をします。He always talks in such high-sounding terms.
開拓者達は現地人たちから毛皮を物々交換で手に入れた。The colonists bartered with the natives for fur.
彼はいつも物知り顔で話す。He always talks as if he knows everything.





物取りなので、物を盗ったら帰ります。通報したら刺します。I'm a thief, I'll go back when I've taken the stuff. Report me and I'll stab you.


彼は大変ものぐさな男だ。He is such a lazy fellow.




彼は他の男の子達の物笑いの種だった。He was the scorn of the other boys.








命あっての物種。While there is life, there is hope.






私は物質的な利益には関心がない。I am not interested in material gain.



公平に言えば彼女の文才を認めないわけにいかない。To do her justice, we must admit her talent as a writer.
知名の文士たちの集まりが昨夜あった。Noted literary personalities gathered together last evening.
彼はいわゆる文化人である。He is what we call a man of culture.








私達は異なった文化圏の人々と接触を持たないわけにはいかない。We cannot avoid contact with people from different cultural backgrounds.










大部分ではないにしても多くの人々が文学的趣味を優美なたしなみと見なしている。Many people, if not most, look on literary taste as an elegant accomplishment.





すべての文明国は戦争に反対している。All civilized countries are against war.












チャーチルは偉大な政治家であるばかりではなく、偉大な文筆家でもあった。In addition to being a great statesman, Churchill was a great writer.


























































お返しに微積分のノートを貸してあげるわ。I'll pay you back with my calculus notes.






























突然火災警報機が鳴った。All of a sudden, the fire alarm went off.



火事場はやじ馬で大変だった。A big crowd gathered at the scene of the fire.









これから火葬場へ移動しますので、小川様と君は車へ。We are now going to move to the crematorium so if Mr. Ogawa and you would enter the car ...







中東は今でも危険な火薬庫と呼ばれている。The Middle East is still called a powder keg.






















もっと古典的な顔立ちなのかと思いきや、今の時代でも充分通用する美形です。I expected more classical features, but hers is a beauty that would do well even in this age.「あれが生徒会長？」「かっこよくない？」「つーか、美形？」"That's the new head of the student council?" "Cool, isn't he?" "Rather, pretty boy?"

その歌手は美声の持ち主だ。The singer has a beautiful voice.





今度は彼はくだけた服装をした。美々しいスーツは場違いである事に気がついたからだ。This time he dressed down, having realized that the smart suit would be out of place.













あなたの美意識を満足させるものは何ですか？What is it that satisfies your aesthetic sense?


凄いです！こんな感動的な話は初めてです！まさに美談の中の美談です！Amazing! This moving a story is a first for me! It's truly an epic among epics!












この先の道は凍結してるよ。The road ahead is frozen.この先何が起こるか誰もわからない。None of us knows what is in store for us.


ええ、このところ野宿ばかりだったものだから、久しぶりにゆっくり出来ました。ありがとう。Yes, thanks. Recently I've been roughing it so I was able to get a proper sleep for the first time in a while.




このような義務があるなんて知らなかった。I never knew about such a duty.
私たちはこのままやっていくより仕方がない。We have no choice but to carry on.





















彼はかなりの資産家だ。He is a man of considerable means.














彼は自己宣伝に熱心だ。He is intent on advertising himself.

































彼は自分の自制心を誇りに思っていた。He prided himself on his self-control.








彼は勝てると自信満々だ。He flatters himself he will win.

その言葉は彼の自負心を傷つけた。The words hurt his pride.






地方の党員たちは自党に有利な形の選挙区割りをもくろんでいます。Local party members are trying to gerrymander the district.






























最近になってようやく人々は自然保護の必要性を痛感するようになってきた。It is only recently that people have begun to realize the importance of nature conservation.


干し草に自然発生的に火がついた。A spontaneous fire started in the hay.
自然食品は体によい。Natural food will do you good.

虹は自然現象である。A rainbow is a natural phenomenon.










あなたの自慢話はもうたくさんだ。I've had enough of your boasts.



























その記者は緊急事態のときでも落ち着いていた。The journalist was calm even in an emergency.


大統領の演説は世界の緊張緩和を意図したものだった。The President's speech was calculated to ease world tensions.
緊縮財政政策は経済を冷やし過ぎることになるかもしれない。The fiscal austerity may lead to an overkill of the economy.








今すぐ、すし屋さんに行くなんてどうですか。How about going to a sushi bar right now?










グレースは階上の内線電話のところへ行く。Grace goes to phone extension upstairs.















かなりの数の人々が、その夫婦の結婚記念日のお祝いに招待されている。Quite a few people have been invited to celebrate the couple's anniversary.





つまるところ想像力だろう。After all, it might be imagination.

彼もとうとう詰め腹を切らされたってわけだね。He was finally forced to resign.






彼は一人っ子だったので、唯一の相続人だった。Being an only child, he was the sole inheritor.














あの店、一見さんでも入れるのかな。I wonder if that restaurant accepts unfamiliar customers.
刑事はその場で、彼の証言を一言一句正確に書き取った。The detective took down his testimony on the spot, word for word.


彼女は他の人と一味違う。She has something different.










その自動車会社は３００人もの労働者を一時帰休させた。The automobile company laid off 300 workers.
これらの労働者を一時解雇するかわりに、彼等の労働時間を短縮すればよいじゃないか。Instead of laying off these workers, why don't we just cut their hours?


















彼らは第二次オイルショックで一儲けした。They cashed in on the second oil crisis.





開会式は昨日催された。The opening ceremony took place yesterday.

窓を開けっぱなしにしておいたの？Did you leave the window open?



























その付き人はお世辞がうまい。The attendant is good at flattery.







私にはどうも腑に落ちない。I cannot quite understand it.






小作人達は領主に反抗して蜂起した。The peasants rose up in rebellion against the ruler.
ハチドリはチョウと同じくらい小さい鳥です。A hummingbird is no larger than a butterfly.















間違ったら、そのまま棒引きで消しておいてください。If you make a mistake, just cross it out neatly.
















教えるということは大いに忍耐力を要する。Teaching demands a lot of patience.
この発明は数年間の忍耐強い実験の結果であった。This invention was the result of years of patient experiment.















選挙戦はとうとう泥試合になってしまった。The political campaign has turned into a dirty fight at last.








そのはしごは泥塗れだった。The ladder was covered with mud.

いつものことですが、今回も泥縄式の勉強でした。This time, the same as always, I crammed at the last minute.











彼は２度目に成功した。He succeeded on his second try.
















いくら器だけを日本一にしても、中身が三流やったらな〜んの意味もないんちゃうの？The container may be the best in Japan, but if the contents are third class, then isn't it completely meaningless?






我々は日本国憲法に従わないといけない。We are subject to the Constitution of Japan.


あなたはアメリカで日本料理が恋しくなるでしょう。You will miss Japanese food in the United States.








猫は日なたぼっこをしていた。The cat was basking in the sun.


日没前に仕事を終えるよう全力をつくしてやった。We went all out to finish the work before dark.
村は日没後静まり返っていた。The village was dead after sunset.


先月の日直当番全部私に押し付けた形でエスケープした野郎だ。He's the pest that, on last month's class-help day, escaped leaving me with all the work.




歩道の上には日よけがあった。There was a sunshade over the sidewalk.




















我々は世界の人口問題を討議した。We debated on the question of world population.




























ここ数年南ア連邦は人種問題をかかえてきた。The Union of South Africa has had racial problems in recent years.

人権擁護団体は独裁的な政府に圧力をかけています。Human rights groups are putting pressure on authoritarian governments.
１０時から６時まで年中無休でやっています。It's open ten to six daily throughout the year.



年毎に彼らはだんだん貧しくなっていった。From year to year they were growing poorer.









四半期１．２％の成長は年率４．９％の成長率を意味する。A quarterly growth of 1.2% means an annual growth rate of 4.8%.




また、温度が高いと、潤滑剤を頻繁に交換する必要がある。Also, increased temperatures may require that lubricants be changed frequently.













組織犯罪の秘密結社「マフィア」のしきたりでは、その働きを洩らすものは、だれでもかならず消されることになっている。In the "Mafia" tradition of organized crime secret societies, any member who discloses its operation is sure to be rubbed out.

公務員が秘密を漏らして、秘密漏洩罪として罰せられた。The public servant leaked the secret and he was prosecuted for revealing a state secret.

デモの最中秘密警察が人込みの中を動きまわった。Secret police moved among the crowd during the demonstration.

























禁酒法のしかれていた時代に、酒類密輸入の悪どい商売を腕ずくで自分の支配下におくために、てき屋たちは、おたがいに殺しあっていた。During prohibition days, racketeers used to rub each other out to get control of the rum-running racket.










このほうが比べものにならないほど優れている。This is superior beyond comparison.

その比喩的意味はもはや使われていない。The figurative meaning is no longer in current use.













先ずは憧れの作家の文章の呼吸をつかむためにひたすら筆写、丸写しをする。First, in order to get a feel for your favourite author's work, transcribe and copy in full.

その風景は筆舌に尽くせないほど美しい。The scenery is beautiful beyond description.















彼は水彩絵具を短くほぼ直角の筆使いで用いた。He used watercolors in short vertical brush-strokes.













鼻汁は黄緑色です。The mucus is greenish yellow.

そうするといやが上にも美しく見える。That makes you even more attractive.




悪臭が部屋中にびまんした。A bad smell permeated the room.











テッドはその野球チームの２番手選手だ。Ted is the second pitcher on the baseball team.
私は各生徒用に番号札を使います。I use numbered index cards for each student.

























あそこの販売店で、中古の日産を２０万円で売ってくれた。The dealer gave an old Nissan to me for 200,000 yen.
私は販売促進の予算を組まなければなりません。I have to set up a budget for sales promotion.






チェスの盤面はこの世に似ている。The chessboard is the world.





















どんな治療法を受けることになりますか。What kind of treatment will I get?




























うちが援助してる酒造さんがね、新しい甘酒を造ったから試飲してみてくださいって持ってきてくれたんだけど。A brewery we finance has made a new sweet sake and brought some to us asking us to try it.




















西欧の思考はすべて等質です。Western thought is consistent.




















人々が我々について言っていることが真実であることを反省してみると粛然とせざるをえない。How awful to reflect that what people say of us is true!








































このホテルの宿泊料はいくらですか。What are the charges in this hotel?



新しい客はホテルの宿帳に登録せねばならない。New guests must register in the hotel book.



























医者は彼に酒量を減らすように言った。His doctor told him to cut down on drinking.






























これはいわゆる適者生存の例である。This is an example of the survival of the fittest, as it is called.




体温を適温に保つということは大切なことです。It is important to maintain your body temperature at a suitable level.









指揮官は軍を率いて敵地に入った。The commanding officer led his army into enemy territory.




大将は敵陣に攻撃をかける決断を下した。The general decided to launch an offensive against the enemy camp.



周囲に敵影ありません。No sign of the enemy in our surroundings.
町は敵機の爆撃を受けた。The city was bombed by enemy planes.

















大使館は外国人難民の政治亡命を拒否しました。The embassy denied political asylum to foreign refugees.
政治犯たちは待遇改善を求めてハンストをしています。Political prisoners are on a hunger strike for better conditions.

彼はたかが政治屋だ。He is not any better than a politician.

企業の政治献金は厳しい検査の対象になっています。Corporate political donations are coming under heavy scrutiny.
その土地はローンダリングした政治資金で購入されました。The property was purchased with laundered political money.



























来週の火曜日に役員会がその提案を検討することになっている。The board of directors is going to discuss the proposal next Tuesday.








私の物は君の程よくありません。Mine is not so good as yours.


ここからゴールまではほど遠い。It is a far cry from here to the goal.


私は１４歳のときに、父をくも膜下出血で亡くした。I lost my father to a subarachnoid haemorrhage when I was fourteen.











船中にはどのくらいの人がいるのですか。How many people are on board the ship?

彼らは来週の月曜日にボンベイに向けて船出する。They will sail for Bombay next Monday.












船客のブリッジ立ち入り禁止。No passengers are allowed on the bridge.


あなたの船荷は、２４時間以内に運ばれるでしょう。Your shipment should be delivered within twenty-four hours.















近代的な港湾施設がないために、多くの船積み業者が不便を被った。The lack of modern post facilities caused trouble for many shippers.
船頭多くして船、山に登る。Too many cooks spoil the broth.





彼女が彼を助ける巡り合わせになった。The lot fell to her to help him.















私達は彼の術中にはまらないように注意しなければならない。We'll have to be careful not to play into his hands.






































水泳大会が中止になった。The swimming event was called off.



















この河で水浴するのは危険だ。It is dangerous to bathe in this river.











彼は水彩絵具を短くほぼ直角の筆使いで用いた。He used watercolors in short vertical brush-strokes.












































大気と水質の汚染の問題は住民の増加によってひどくなるだろう。The problems of air and water pollution will be intensified by the growth of inhabitants.
水ぶくれがかさぶたになってきました。The blisters have formed scabs.






















追い剥ぎが通行人から金を奪った。A highwayman robbed a foot passenger of his money.
















庭は木の葉が落ちてとび色だ。The garden is bare and brown.


















バッターのイチローは、目の覚めるような２塁打を打った。Ichiro hit an eye-popping double.












その後まもなく私はクセノフォンの「ソクラテスの思い出」を手に入れたが、この中にはそれと同じ論法の実例がたくさんある。And soon after I procured Xenophon's Memorable Things of Socrates, in which there are many instances of the same method.



とりわけ、論理学には正確な定義が要求される。Above all, logic requires precise definitions.





進化という科学的真理が反対しようもないほど確証されるもので、実質的に論駁できない。The scientific truth of evolution is so overwhelmingly established, that it is virtually impossible to refute.






それは討論に適切な論題ではない。It's not a suitable topic for discussion.














というのは、律法はモーセによって、恵みとまことはイエス・キリストによって実現したからである。For the law was given through Moses; grace and truth came through Jesus Christ.





私の母は涙もろい。My mother is easily moved to tears.






君の問題と僕の問題との間には類似点はない。I see no analogy between your problem and mine.

















君たちの訳文と黒板の訳を比較しなさい。Compare your translation with the one on the blackboard.





こんなデカイのがチャリの荷台に乗るわけないだろ。There's no way one that big is going to go on a bike's luggage rest.



















































なんとおいしい夕食でしょう。How delicious your dinner was!









不妊手術を受けました。I had a tubal ligation.
一酸化炭素とは炭素化合物の不完全燃焼で発生する有害物質です。Carbon monoxide is a poisonous substance formed by the incomplete combustion of carbon compounds.

































日本は北方領土を日本固有のものにしたがっている。Japan claims the Northern Territories for its own.







































その学者は財政政策の権威である。The scholar is an authority on fiscal policy.




財産分与が争いの種だった。The division of the property was a bone of contention between the brothers.

そのあてもないのに、父親の財産相続を口にするとは、ボッブも根も葉もないことをいう人だ。Bob went about building his castle in Spain when he spoke of inheriting his father's wealth.

特許権は重要な財産権である。A patent right is an important property right.










日航のチケットがあまりにも高いので、国外在住者たちはイラク航空をつかった。With JAL tickets so expensive, expatriates flew Air Iraq.












大阪支店に在勤中にはいろいろお世話になりました。Thank you very much for everything while working for the Osaka branch.



捨てる神あれば拾う神あり。やっと採用試験に合格したよ。When one lucky spirit abandons you another picks you up. I just passed an exam for a job.

この部屋は採光が悪い。This room doesn't get a lot of sun.




























仕事が忙しすぎるのも考えものだけど、時間が余るのもなぁ。Being too busy with work is a problem, but then so is having too much free time.



彼はそのことについて考え違いしている。He is in error about the matter.
















この犬は鋭い臭覚をもっている。The dog has a keen scent.





















僕のやることにとがめだてしないでくれ。Don't find fault with me.

その式典は中国からの招待客のために行われた。The ceremony was held in honor of the guest from China.



















彼は世界平和のために超人的な努力をした。He made superhuman efforts to maintain world peace.












その老人は俗世界から超然としている。The old man stands aloof from this world.

従業員たちは超過勤務をするのに異議を唱えた。The employees demurred at working overtime.
労働者側の要求は超過勤務手当のことが中心となった。The workers' demands centered around overtime pay.










１０軒の家がその火事で焼失した。The fire burned down ten houses.

彼は上着に焼け穴をあけた。He burned a hole in his coat.

いまさら焦っても焼け石に水じゃないの。No matter how much you hurry your effort is just a drop in the bucket.








焼け野の雉子夜の鶴。A mother's heart is always with her children.
その町は火災で焼け野原になった。The city was destroyed by fire.










彼はたいした肖り者だ。What a lucky person he is!


事故当時に航行を直接指揮していたコーエン哨戒長の行動が最大のポイントとなる。The actions of Coen, directly commanding the cruise at the time of the accident, are of utmost significance.





いよいよ薄暮、もうすぐ宵闇。It's getting more and more shadowy, soon it will be twilight.
食べ過ぎると、消化不良に苦しむことになる。When we eat too much, we suffer from indigestion.





テロリストの爆弾によって、祭気分はいささか消沈した。The festive mood was slightly spoiled by terrorist bombs.


消防隊は指令を受けてから５分以内で現場に来ていた。The fire brigade was on the scene within five minutes of receiving the call.











米消費者団体がRealPlayerを「バッドウェア」と認定。American consumer group identifies RealPlayer as 'badware'.























知恵は小出しにせよ。Dole out your wisdom a little at a time.





こんな小田原評定はやめよう。Let's stop this fruitless discussion.


小休止を提案します。I propose a short rest.









小作人達は領主に反抗して蜂起した。The peasants rose up in rebellion against the ruler.








































議案は１０票の小差で通過した。The bill passed by a small majority of 10 votes.




この魚はずいぶん小骨が多いな。This fish has a lot of small bones in it.


























彼女の目の回りには、小じわができてきた。She has started to get a few wrinkles around her eyes.



ジュディーは小論を何時間も続けて書いたり書き直したりした。Judy spent hours on end writing and rewriting her essay.





小難をのがれて大難に陥る。Jump out of the frying pan into the fire.






このままだと日本は世界の笑い者になる。At this rate, Japan will make an exhibition of itself before the world.


つまらないものですがご笑納ください。Please accept this little gift.














我々は執務中の禁煙を申し合わせた。We agreed to refrain from smoking while we are at work.



この踏台を使えばクローゼットの上に手が届くよ。If you stand on this stool, you can reach the top of the closet.









十把一からげにしないで、もう少し個別案件をきちんと検討してくださいよ。Don't lump all these issues together. You need to give every single one careful consideration.



































彼は有り金を残らず奪われた。He was robbed of all his money.
命がある限りあなたのご恩は忘れません。I shall never forget your kindness.













今度の上司？個性的どころか、ありがちなタイプね。The new supervisor? He's not very original - pretty much like the rest.

























随分尽くしてやったのに、それでも彼にはありがたみが無かった。After all we had done, he was still ungrateful.
それは有難迷惑なことだ。That's too much of a good thing.





どこであれ道路を横切る時に右左を見るというのはいいことだ。It's a good rule to look both ways before you cross the street anywhere.







国内市場の競争はすさまじいものです。Competition in the domestic market is cutthroat.

政府は国内産業振興の方策を講じた。The government has taken measures to promote domestic industry.


国文法の現在形はこれからのことを示す用法が多い。There are many uses of the 'present tense' of Japanese grammar which indicate things yet to happen.





この建物は国民的遺産として保存すべきだ。This building should be kept as a national heritage.








この国立公園には景色のいい所がたくさんある。This national park is full of beautiful scenery.





共産主義の下では、生産手段は国有化される。In communism, the means of production are owned by the state.


















国家主義と愛国心とを混同してはならない。Nationalism is not to be confused with patriotism.

国家の名誉は最高の価値ある国家的財産である。National honor is national property of the highest value.










国連憲章は１９４５年に署名された。The United Nations Charter was signed in 1945.
このバターは国産品だが、外国産とくらべて少しも劣らない。This butter is domestic, but it is in no way inferior to foreign butter.
今朝私は国元から父が病気になったという電報を受け取った。This morning I got a telegram from home saying that my father had been suddenly taken ill.










日本の国際収支は長年巨額の黒字を続けている。Japan's balance of payments has been running a huge surplus for many years.
その国際会議は今年の２月に開催されるはずだった。The international conference was to be held in February this year.




その国は国際問題には力がある。The country has power in international affairs.
言葉は国際結婚がかかえている基本的な問題である。Language is a fundamental problem of international marriage.
国際電話をお願いします。Give me overseas service, please.
英語は国際語になった。English has become an international language.






デイモンは私に郵便切手のアルバムを見せてくれた。Damon showed me his stamp album.


彼女からの手紙が郵便受けにはいっていた。I found her letter in the mailbox.


はがきにこの切手を貼って郵便箱に投函しなさい。Put this stamp on the postcard and drop it in the mailbox.

亀の甲より年の功。Experience without learning is better than learning without experience.


















監督はその映画でハムレットを活動的な人物に描いている。In the film, the director makes Hamlet an active person.
我々の町は活断層の上にある。Our city sits on an active fault.








この事件を過大視してはならない。We must not make too much of this incident.
























この船は遠洋航海には堪えない。This ship is not fit for an ocean voyage.







姫君は皇帝に寛恕を請いました。The princess begged forgiveness from the emperor.








あぶく銭を稼ごうとする開発業者たちよ。They're some developers who aim to make a fast buck!











彼は社長の鞄持ちだ。He is the boss's private secretary.

空はあくまでも青い。The sky is as blue as blue can be.








保安官は、その町の秩序を確立した。The sheriff established order in the town.



彼女の保健体育の講義はさっぱり理解できない。I can't make head nor tail of her lecture on health and physical education.
























どうせ、時間に関わらず、俺が先に来てなかったら、さっさとネカフェへ行く腹積もりだったんだろう。No doubt, regardless of the time, she was planning to go to the net café without me if I hadn't arrived first.
じゃあ僕らはその腹いせ受け続けるんですか？Then that animosity is being passed on down to us?



伝家の宝刀をぬく。Play one's trump card.












浮き名を流したものだ。His romance was the talk of the town.

人生には浮き沈みがつきものだ。Life is full of ups and downs.






















身を捨ててこそ浮かぶ瀬もあれ。Risk all and gain all.

そこで他人との相互作用が大切になる。Then interaction with others becomes important.



相手次第で我々の態度を決める。We determine our attitude on the basis of the other party.





「文化相対主義」とはどういう意味ですか。What do you mean by cultural relativism?









性能のよさとデザインの優美さが両々相まって本機種の声価を高めてきた。The high performance and the elegant design of this model have combined to give it a high reputation.





その晩は見知らぬ人と相部屋になった。I doubled up with a stranger that night.
相場師の中には老人の無知と寂しさに付け込む奴がいる。Some speculators take advantage of the ignorance and helplessness of old people.

彼は息子を正式の相続人と認めた。He recognized his son as lawful heir.



う〜む、相貌から判断するに上海からか。Hrmmm, to judge from their looks they might be from Shanghai.







この小説は想像力に富んでいる。This novel is very imaginative.


















彼女はそ知らぬ顔をした。She feigned ignorance.















































報道担当官がその計画の青写真を報道陣に説明した。The spokesman explained the blueprint of the scheme to the press.
青田は信じるに値しない。Aota was not worthy of your trust.
















輸出業界は青息吐息だ。The export business isn't doing well.








青銅器は主として銅と錫の合金で出来ている。Bronze-ware is largely made from alloys of brass and tin.








状況証拠としちゃあ、十分だね。For circumstantial evidence, that's plenty.





技術革新は情報産業に急速な進歩をもたらした。Technological innovation brought about the rapid progress of the information industry.

情報検索の効率を測る尺度として、再現率と適合率というものがある。As yardsticks to measure the effectiveness of information retrieval there exist those called 'recall ratio' and 'precision ratio'.










金が物言う、世知辛いこのご時世に、彼の生き方は一服の清涼剤だね。In this harsh, petty world where money does the talking, his way of life is like a breath of fresh air.










マラソンは晴雨にかかわらず開かれます。The marathon will be held, rain or shine.
















医者は彼女に静養するように言った。The doctor told her that she should take a rest.












いつから日本人は精白米を食べるようになったのですか？When did the Japanese start eating polished rice?






フロイトは精神分析を考案した。Freud originated psychoanalysis.




彼の病気は主に精神的な物だった。His illness was mainly psychological.


彼には精神障害が有る。He is mentally handicapped.




これが彼の話し方に生彩をそえている。This adds color to his speech.彼、今日、精彩がないね。青菜に塩だね。He seems really depressed and lifeless today. I wonder what took the wind out of his sails.




















請求額は合計３０００ドルになった。The bill added up to three thousand dollars.







その役人は請負業者にとり入ったかどで、くびになった。The official got the sack for currying favor with the contractors.



まず、市長あてに、請願書を提出して、署名運動をしています。First, we will present a petition to the mayor and collect signatures.


















避難民はやっと命拾いをした。The refugees barely escaped death.


私は卑怯者には我慢ならない。I have no tolerance of cowards.




彼ほど平々凡々たる主人公は珍しい。A protagonist as plain and ordinary as him is rare indeed.





平和部隊にいる頃に彼女は教職の第一歩を踏み出した。She got her feet wet teaching while she was in the Peace Corps.
彼の時ならぬ発言は秘密をもらしたばかりではなく、平和運動の計画をも、くつがえしてしまった。His untimely statement has not only let the cat out of the bag but also upset the apple cart for the peace move.
















私の一番上の兄が父の名代としてその会合に出席した。My oldest brother attended the meeting on behalf of our father.




















































この論文では、ドイツとオランダの民間伝承を比較する。In this paper, I compare the folklores of Germany and Holland.




私は眠気覚ましに紅茶を飲んだ。I had a cup of tea to keep myself awake.




日銀は推定１０億ドルのドル買い支えを東京市場で行ったものと考えられている。The Bank of Japan is considered to have conducted a support buying of an estimated $1 billion on the Tokyo foreign exchange market.
買い手市場とは、ものが豊富で、買い手は広い選択範囲を持ち、かつ価格が低い市場ということである。A buyers' market is a market in which goods are plentiful, buyers have a wide range of choices, and prices are low.

父のしごとは羊毛の買い付けです。My father's work is to buy wool.



彼のせりふは割り引いて聞いてよ。単に売り言葉に買い言葉というだけなんだから。Don't let what he said get to you. He was just getting back at you for what you said.




このカーペットは実にお買い得だった。This carpet was a real bargain.

トイレットペーパーの買い置きがある。We have a stock of toilet paper.




売り手市場とは相対的に物が少なく買い手は選択範囲が限られ、かつ価格が高い市場ということである。A seller's market is a market in which goods are relatively scarce, buyers have a limited range of choice, and prices are high.



彼のせりふは割り引いて聞いてよ。単に売り言葉に買い言葉というだけなんだから。Don't let what he said get to you. He was just getting back at you for what you said.
それは売れ足が早いですよ。That will fly on the market.





私は売り値が赤インクで書かれているのに気づいた。I noticed the sale prices were written in red ink.














































滞在中は楽しかったですか。Did you enjoy your visit?








彼は世界中を旅した。He traveled all over the globe.


彼の記録は１００メートルの世界新記録だ。His record is a new world record in the 100-meter dash.
英語が世界語であることは言うまでもない。It goes without saying that English is an international language.

我々も世間なみのことをしなくちゃ。We had better do what other people do.





さあ、今汲みなさい。そして宴会の世話役の所に持っていきなさい。Now draw some out and take it to the master of the banquet.



移住者の部落が野蛮人によって征服され、移住者の希望も生活も土壇場にきた時、長い歳月をかけての不幸とのたたかいに終止符がうたれた。Years of resistance to misfortune ended when the settlers' village was overcome by the savages and their hopes and lives came to the bitter end.













































君の計画は砂上の楼閣に過ぎないよ。Your scheme is like a house built on the sand.






車は砂ぼこりをもうもうとあげて走っていた。The car raised a cloud of dust.
















敵は戦場からちりぢりに逃げ去った。The enemy fled in disorder from the battlefield.
私たちは散開して森の中を捜索した。We spread out and began to search through the woods.
私は散髪屋で髪を刈ってもらった。I had my hair cut at the barber's.















産科医が減り続け、産科医療が危機に陥っている。Obstetric care in crisis as the number of obstetricians continues to fall.





産業革命は最初イギリスで起きた。The Industrial Revolution took place first in England.







彼は殺人罪で刑務所に送られた。He was sent to jail for murder.
















葉が山吹色になる。The leaves turn to gold.

その劇はある山村が舞台でした。The action took place in a mountain village.



山国ほど天候の変わりやすいところはない。The weather is more changeable in mountain regions than in any other district.

























その少女は山ほどある困難を克服している。The girl is getting over mountains of difficulties.
山越えの道は狭く、しかも急勾配だった。The road across the mountain was narrow, and what's more, it was a steep slope.














この２日間皿洗いする時間もないよ。キッチンの流しに山積みしているよ。I haven't had time to do the dishes for two days; they are in a pile in the kitchen sink.



































彼らは法案の通過を阻止しようと、合法的な議事妨害をしています。They are filibustering to prevent the bill from passing.













結局、言い出しっぺの人が来てないんだけど、どういうこと？He brought it up first, but he didn't show up. What's going on?

このような言い争いはやめよう。We must put an end to this kind of quarrel.





忙しいからその仕事ができないというのは単なる言い逃れじゃないか。Saying you can't do the job because you're too busy is just a cop out.
それにもかかわらず彼女は私たちの言い値を受け入れた。She accepted our offer notwithstanding.







「盲人」を「目の不自由な人」とする言い換えが提案された。It was proposed that the term "blind person" be replaced with the term "visually impaired person".


お礼の言いようもありません。I don't know how to thank you enough.










論じるまでもなく基本的人権は尊重されなければならない。Needless to say, fundamental human rights should be respected.

あなたの給与は一定の基本給に販売手数料が加算されます。You will be paid a stable base salary plus commissions on sale.



鉄鋼は基幹産業である。Steel is a key industry.



基礎体温をつけています。I'm keeping a record of basal body temperature.
概して、真理が基礎的なものであればあるほど、その実用の可能性も大きくなる。As a rule, the more fundamental a new truth, the greater will be its practical possibilities.
５０万円の個人基礎控除がある。You have a personal tax exemption of 500,000 yen.



もし期限切れになったら、大変なことになるよ。There will be hell to pay if I don't make this deadline.













１９６０年代に日本の大学生は政府に対して示威運動を起こした。In the 1960's, Japanese college students demonstrated against their government.








空輸のおかげで食べ物に季節感を感じなくなったというお話です。It's talking about how, thanks to air transport, we've lost the sense of 'season' for foodstuffs.





僕は器楽曲が好きだ。I like instrumental music.





この機械には安全装置が付いていない。This machine doesn't have a safety device.









この安楽いすは非常に快適だ。This easy chair is quite comfortable.

あなたからのパーティーの案内状をなくしてしまったなんて、自分でも信じられません。I can't believe I misplaced the party information and registration you sent to me.


鞍馬は、力よりもバランス感覚が必要です。The pommel horse requires more balance than strength.

客のうちの何人かが宴会場を出て行くのが見えた。I saw some of the guests leave the banquet room.










そう言えば、肝心要の部分を何も決めていなかった。Now that you mention it, I wasn't involved in the decision-making for the vital part.







小泉首相が「憲法違反だから靖国神社参拝しちゃいかんという人がいます」と語った。Prime Minister Koizumi said, "There are people who say that, because it's unconstitutional, I should not pray at the Yasukuni Shrine".













今年の夏も冷夏になりそうだ。It seems to be cold again this summer.



零細企業はインフレで苦境に陥っています。Small enterprises are feeling the squeeze of inflation.


小作人達は領主に反抗して蜂起した。The peasants rose up in rebellion against the ruler.




















彼女は利己心がない。She has no thought of self.
彼は徹底した利己主義者だ。He is a thorough-going egoist.



















彼女は美しいだけでなく利発でもある。She is not merely beautiful but bright.





ＥＣ諸国はこの会談に非常に大きな利害関係をもっています。The EC countries have a huge stake in the talks.












彼は歴史小説を読んでいるだろう。He will be reading a historical novel.












































今日は底冷えのする日だ。I feel chilled to the bone today.








これらの植物は除草剤に抵抗力がある。These plants are resistant to weed killers.





中村さんは東京ではしご酒をした。Mr Nakamura went bar hopping in Tokyo.

第一次世界大戦は1914年に勃発した。World War I broke out in 1914.



彼女は今も第一線で活躍している。She's still active in the front lines.

その国は第二次世界大戦中は中立を保っていた。That country remained neutral throughout World War II.





























体重計に乗りなさい。Stand on the scales.

体操競技の中では、鉄棒の大車輪が好きです。I like to see a gymnast do the giant swing on the high bar.



指示代名詞が多すぎて、正直、わかりづらいことこの上ない。There are too many demonstrative pronouns. To put it bluntly, it couldn't be harder to understand.





























私の金に意地汚く手を出すな。Don't put your greedy hands on my money.

結婚式は、意義深い儀式である。A wedding is a significant ceremony.

彼が不作法なのは意識的であって、偶発的ではなかった。His rudeness was conscious, not accidental.

「実を言うと、俺、高所恐怖症なんだ」「臆病者っ！」"To tell you the truth, I am scared of heights." "You are a coward!"






















恒久的な平和など幻想に過ぎない。Permanent peace is nothing but an illusion.




イングランドとスコットランドの間の恒常的な国境戦争は終わった。The constant border wars between England and Scotland came to an end.
恒産なき者、恒心なし。From hand to mouth will never make a worthy man.





新しい葡萄酒は古い皮袋に入れてはならない。Do not put new wine into old bottles.
革張りのソファにするか？布張りのソファにするか？Shall we go for a leather-covered sofa? A cloth-covered sofa?


選挙では、保守派と革新派がせめぎ合った。In the election, conservatives and progressives were fighting each other.
































ラッシュアワーの交通渋滞にあった。I was caught in the rush hour.


























校則なので生徒たちは学生服を着なくてはならない。The school rules require students to wear school uniforms.
学生割引はありますか。Do you have a student fare?

君の息子さん学生運動に加わってたそうだね。Your son took part in the student movement, I hear.
彼は学外に住んでいる。He lives off campus.









彼は貧しい家に生まれたので、学校教育もほとんど受けなかった。He was born so poor that he received hardly any school education.













その名の人は学籍簿に載ってません。No person by that name is listed in the register of the school.
こんな天気にかれが来るかどうかおぼつかないと思う。I have some doubts about his coming in this weather.






教会堂の鐘が鳴っている。The church bells are ringing.








彼の教育法には、良い面と悪い面の両方ある。I think his method of teaching cuts both ways.
その会社は教育的な本を出版する。The firm publishes educational books.




教育産業に関する情報を掲載したインターネットサイトには以下のようなものがあります。Among the Internet sites that publish information on education related businesses are those given below.




テープレコーダーは有用な教具です。The tape recorder is a useful aid to teaching.







教授会は学部長の提案を採用した。The faculty meeting adopted the dean's proposal.
あの学校では新しい英語教授法を採用した。They adopted a new method of teaching English in that school.










かみ合わせが不自然ではないですか。Do you feel anything unnatural when you put your teeth together?




若い男の肩に頭をつけていた女子学生は、驚いてあたりを見まわした。The girl, who had her head on the boy's shoulder, looked around in surprise.



ある歌によれば、女心は変わりやすいそうだ。A song says a girl's mind is variable.






その劇で彼女は女中と女店員との二役を努めた。In the play she doubled the parts of a maid and shop girl.













彼女は今女盛りだ。She is now in the prime of womanhood.



彼は女嫌いだ。He is a woman hater.






リンカーンは奴隷制度に反対であった。Lincoln was opposed to slavery.





私の第一印象は、彼は如才ない政治家であるということでした。My first impression was that he was a tactful politician.

いかほどの金額でも結構です。Any amount of money will do.




朝食にはゆで卵をとりたいですか。Do you want a boiled egg for breakfast?


これは若木だからまだ実はみのらない。This tree is too young to bear fruit.





彼は年の割には若作りだ。He looks young for his age.






























その会社にてこ入れするために数百万ドルが使われた。Millions of dollars have been spent trying to shore up the company.








天才と狂人の差は紙一重だ。Genius is but one remove from madness.





















地下組織では、仲間を裏切ることは、間違いない死を意味する。In the underground, to double-cross any member means sure death.




海賊は宝を地中に埋めた。The pirates buried their treasure in the ground.
私は地中海が一番好きです。I like the Mediterranean Sea best.





彼女は地方公務員だ。She is a local government officer.


そして、我々の議会こそ、我々が住む地域の地方行政機関なのです。And our council is the local government for our area.

いくつかの地方自治体では開発を禁止した。Localities imposed bans on development.































その答えを知るためにあなたは地界の周りの磁場について少し知らなければなりません。To learn the answer you must know a little about the magnetic field around the world.




我々は地域社会について考えなければいけない。We must think about the community.




JAXAの地球観測衛星「だいち」が撮影した画像。Images taken by the JAXA Earth observation satellite, 'Daichi'.









































彼は成長株の事業に２００ドルを投資した。He invested two hundred dollars in a growing business.



どんな組織であれ、内部の融和と団結はその組織の成敗を決める重要な要素だ。For any type of organisation, internal harmony and unity are important factors in deciding its success or failure.






この方が私達のために城内を案内してくれた人です。This is the guide who took us around the castle.
人々は城外に走り出した。People ran out of the castle.








パーティーは大盛会だった。The party was such a great success.





































君は自分の行動の申し開きをしなければならない。You must account for your conduct.






























野球人でこれほど神格化された男もいない。No baseball player has been as deified as this man.












神経細胞は弱い刺激に反応する。A nerve cell responds to a slight stimulus.
このコンピューター網は、いわば、会社の神経組織である。This computer network is, as it were, the nervous system of the company.
彼は非常に神経過敏である。He is all nerves.




機会とは神意を表す一つのあだ名である。Chance is a nickname for Providence.









苦しいときの神頼み。Danger past, God forgotten.





彼は決して紳士的ではない。He is anything but a gentleman.













電気自動車の性能はよくなっている。The performance of electric cars has improved.





私はこの電気掃除機をただで手に入れました。I got this vacuum cleaner for nothing.




その電気器具は輸送中にこわれたのにちがいない。The electrical appliance must have been damaged in transit.


















彼を電話口に呼び出した。I called him to the telephone.




















引き換え券を見せて下さい。May I see your claim tags?











ここに先物取引で儲けた方いらっしゃいますか？Has anybody here made a profit in futures trading?
私は彼の叔父さんの死のことを彼に話すのを出来る限り先送りした。I delayed telling him about his uncle's death as long as I could.







ショッピングセンターの隣にある洗車場だよ。At the car wash next to the shopping mall.


何もかも洗いざらい言ってしまえ。You had better tell me the whole story.













ほとんどの場合、近代化は西欧化と同一のものとみなされる。In most cases, modernization is identified with Westernization.







これは私がスペインで買った物です。This is what I bought in Spain.











飛行機は四千フィートまで上昇した。The plane climbed to 4,000 feet.
四天王も倒した、クソ長い地下迷宮もクリアした。I'd defeated the four sub-bosses and got through the damn long underground labyrinth.










インカ族が約四百年前にスペイン人に征服されたとき、少数のインカ族がクスコを去ってペルーの中心部にあるマチュピチュに行った。When the Incas were conquered by the Spanish about four hundred years ago, some of the Incas left Cuzco and went to Machu Picchu in the heart of Peru.





















死力をつくしなさい。Do your very best.

死中に活を求める。Your gift was like discovery of an oasis in the midst of a desert.






ハゲタカが突っつく死んだ鹿とか、他の動物の食べ残しとか、 そういう腐った肉を死肉と書きました。A dead deer being pecked by vultures, remains partly eaten by other animals, that sort of rotten meat is called 'carrion'.
口は体の死刑執行人であり医者である。The mouth is the executioner and the doctor of the body.





























生きざまの立派な人は死にざまも立派である。They die well that live well.



















































彼は２年前に細君に死なれた。He had his wife die two years ago.



























彼女は私を枕元にくるようにと頼んだ。She asked me to come to her bedside.









勤務中なのに職員の目を盗んでインターネットに耽溺する。Even during work, I secretly indulge my Internet addiction.












私はそれに引き付けられて、それを採用し、ぶっきらぼうな反対や真正面からの議論を止め、謙遜な探究者、懐疑主義者を装った。I was charmed with it, adopted it, dropped my abrupt contradiction and positive argumentation, and put on the humble inquirer and doubter.


第２番目の男はスペインの探検家でした。The second man was a Spanish explorer.














深酒は体によくない。Excessive drinking is destructive of our health.
雪がしんしんと降り積もる・・・オレの体に。Snow falls silently and piles up ... on top of me.












雨が降って土に湿り気があると草は取りやすくなる。When rain's fallen and the soil is moist, it becomes easier to pull out weeds.

















鶏口となるも牛後となるなかれ。Better be the head of a dog than the tail of a lion.





























科学的研究は機械的な決まりきった仕事ではなく、科学者の側の継続的な努力である。Scientific research is not a mechanical routine, but a continuing struggle on the part of the scientist.








待ち時間はどのくらいですか。How long do you think we'll have to wait?




我々の同社における持分は、６０％です。Our ownership in the company is 60%.

少しはお金の持ち合わせがある。I have a little money with me.

秋は読書にもってこいの季節だ。Fall is a good season for reading.

彼は彼女の時計を持ち逃げした。He got away with her watch.
この小切手は持参人払いだ。This check is payable to the bearer.本状の持参人は友人の鈴木君です。The bearer of this letter is my friend Suzuki.

ここで召し上がりますか、それともお持ち帰りですか。Is this to eat here, or to go?




パソコンの使い方も知らないのにあんな高い機種を買うなんて、宝の持ち腐れだ。What a waste to buy such an expensive machine even though he doesn't even know how to use computers.






彼女はいったん話し始めると止めどがない。Once she starts talking, she is hard to stop.



ボードが箱に歯抜けで入れられてるから、詰めていれれば、箱がもっと有効につかえるよ。There are gaps between the boards in the box. If you fit them in snugly, you'll get more use out of the box.

歯磨き粉はどこにありますか？Where is the toothpaste?





市場価格の暴落で一文無しになってしまった。The market drop has cleaned me out.

市議会は遠慮なく意見をいえる大事な場所だ。The city council meeting is a great place to sound off.





彼はまた持論についてトクトクと話をした。He lectured us about his pet theories again.


得意顔の新しい父親として、私は最初の子供に本をたくさん与えた。As a proud new father, I gave my first child plenty of books.









英国王アルフレッドは、偉大な統治者であるとともに偉大な学者であった。Alfred, King of England, was a great scholar as well as a great ruler.










道中御無事を祈ります。I wish you a good journey.



彼らはみな道化師みたいなかっこうをしていた。They were all done up like clowns.















道々でいい。込み入った話でもあるから。Along the way will be fine. It's a complicated matter.







彼は道徳的に堕落した。He lapsed morally.
道徳家であると言われている。He is described as a moralist.
道徳教育は日本では必要だ。In Japan, moral education is necessary.










その祝賀会で、彼は自分の親戚に私を紹介した。He introduced me to his relatives at the reception.










この種の毛布は十分に虫干ししなければならない。This kind of blanket needs good airing.





何があっても海に行く！タオルに、海パン。虫除けスプレー！No matter what I'm going to the beach! Towel and trunks. Insect repellant!



















このソーダはあれほど甘くない。This soda is less sweet than that.




波風を鎮めるにはチーズケーキのお土産が良いらしいですよ。A gift of cheesecake is apparently good to soothe discord.







「じつは自由研究で相談したいことがあって・・・」「どれ・・・。ふーん、被子植物について調べてるのね」"Well, there's something I'd like your advice on about my research project ..." "Let's see... Hmm, you're investigating flowering plants then."











私はその川を見に行ったが、たいへん増水していた。I went to see the river, which I found greatly swollen.




バスを増発しなければならない。Bus service must be increased in frequency.

その銀行は二割増配ですよ。The bank has raised its dividend by 20%.
２０％増量って書いているとつい手が出ない？Don't you find yourself reaching for things with '20% extra' written on them?




小遣いの増額を父に掛け合った。I approached my father about an increase in allowance.

















この磁場の線が２極で北の磁力と南の磁力の間に走っています。The lines of this field run between magnetic north and magnetic south at the two poles.





















私はイギリス再訪を心待ちにしている。I am looking forward to visiting Britain once again.













婦人参政権を認めるように憲法が修正された。The constitution was amended so that women could vote.



彼は婦人警官の扮装をして彼女に近づいた。He approached her in the disguise of a policewoman.

彼女はあらゆる婦徳の典型である。She incarnates all womanly virtues.

















これが初めての海外旅行ですか？Is this your first trip abroad?













海底油田の開発をしたい。We want to explore an underwater oil field.


































































彼は過去の苦しい生活を黙想した。He meditated on his past life of suffering.










夢うつつでテレビを見ていた。I was watching TV half sleeping.












そこそこの釣果を期待してるから。頑張って釣ってきてちょうだい。I'm expecting a decent catch, so please try your best at fishing for us.
つり革につかまりなさい。電車がすぐ動き出すだろうから。Hold on to the strap. The train will start to move soon.



もう辺りが暗くなってきた。秋の日は釣瓶落としだね。It's getting dark early around here. The sun seems to drop like a rock when autumn rolls around.









私は息子がクッキーを盗み食いしようとしているところを見つけた。I caught my son stealing from a cookie jar.




彼は場外にボールを飛ばした。He hit the ball out of bounds.




闇夜に鉄砲じゃあるまいし、そんな場当たり的なやり方でうまくいくとは思えないよ。That's just a shot in the dark. How do you think you'll succeed by just acting on the spur of the moment like that?






君はいつも僕の揚げ足を取るね。You always like to trip me up, don't you?





















ボイラは湯あかがびっしりついた。The boiler was heavily scaled.



















































この箱は上げ底だ。This is a false bottom pan.

被告は上級裁判所に控訴するだろう。The defendant will appeal to a higher court.

































悪貨は良貨を駆逐する。Bad money drives out good.




良薬は口に苦し。A good medicine tastes bitter.










お手紙落手いたしました。I am in receipt of your letter.

落ち目って言うけど、まだイケるよね。They say it's on the wane, but it's still got something, hasn't it?














子供の学費を考えると、おちおちビールも飲んでられないな。Knowing how much school for my kids is costing, it's impossible to relax with a beer and take it easy.















フランスはロシアと戦争をしていた。France was at war with Russia.





























エマは虚弱体質だ。Emma has a very poor constitution.










このセンターに入るには許可証を提示するよう求められている。You are asked to produce your permit to get in this center.













「とりあえず店の前、掃除しといてくれ」「了解！」「打ち水も頼む」"Clean up in front of the shop first." "OK!" "Sprinkle some water out there too."





ラグビーの試合の後、全身打ち身だらけだった。My whole body was one big bruise after the rugby game.











打球がインかアウトかを判定するのは難しいことが多い。It is often difficult to see if a ball is in or out.





















今夜はとてもおもしろい番組があるから、テレビの前にくぎづけだろう。I'll be glued to the TV tonight watching a really exciting program.
































彼女は定期的に私をたずねてきたものだった。She used to visit me regularly.


定期船は、火曜日に神戸港に寄港するでしょう。The liner will call at Kobe on Tuesday.
私は金を銀行に３年定期預金に入れた。I put the money in a three-year time deposit at the bank.












彼は昇進を目指して策動している。He is angling for promotion.






子供は積み木で遊ぶ。Children play with blocks.







積荷のバランスが取れなくて船は転覆した。Due to a lack of balance the ship turned over.



























君は彼の奇行を気にしないほうがよい。It's better to ignore his eccentricities.


「野田恵って子知っていますよね」「のだ？」「『はぎゃ』とか『ふぎ』とか奇声を発する」"You know a kid called Megumi Noda, right?" "Noda?" "Makes weird sounds like 'Hagya', 'Fugi'."
















高額品の値下げなどときれいごとをいっても、結局のところ新消費税への風当たりを和らげる口実にすぎない。The reduced price of luxury goods is just window dressing to make the new consumption tax look better.





































彼は苛立たしい表現で答えた。He answered with a look of annoyance.


硬貨に「あび」がついてるからよ。Because there's a red-throated loon on the coin.

おたふくかぜは伝染病である。Mumps is an infectious disease.









アコギなんか弾いて遊んでる暇があったらベースの練習しろ！If you've got time to play around on an acoustic guitar, practice your bass!














彼女は大学を出たてで、まったく経験がない。She is fresh from college, so she has no experience.
出だしがよければ半ば成功したも同じこと。Making a good start is half the battle.



作物の出来不出来は試合中の選手達のボールの投げ方やけり方によって決まるものと信じられていたのです。It was believed that the success of their crops depended on the way the players threw or kicked the ball during the game.
自分ができそこないであると気が付いたまま生きていくのは辛いことだ。It's hard to live with the knowledge that you are a failure.





















この頃私は退屈しのぎに庭造りをしています。I am gardening these days just to kill time.
随意に退席してかまいません。You may leave your seat at will.







会社は退職者を募った。The company appealed for people to take voluntary resignation.





トムと飲みに行くんだったら、突拍子もないホラを吹くだろうから、覚悟した方がいいよ。If you go drinking with Tom, be prepared to listen to some pretty outlandish cock and bull stories.











線路の上に鉄片があったために列車は脱線した。The train was derailed by a piece of iron on the track.


























彼女は金づちで鏡を粉々にしました。She shattered the mirror with a hammer.ジェーンはかなづち同然泳げない。Jane swims like a brick.









彼は余命いくばくもない。His days are drawing to their close.


泣いた夜も幾夜かあった。There were several nights when I cried.

この規制はいくとおりにも解釈できる。This rule reads several ways.



そう言えば、機内食もまったく食べませんでしたね。Oh yes, you didn't eat any in-flight meals either did you?











熟練した機械工はかなりの賃金を稼ぐ。A skilled mechanic earns decent wages.




科学的研究は機械的な決まりきった仕事ではなく、科学者の側の継続的な努力である。Scientific research is not a mechanical routine, but a continuing struggle on the part of the scientist.



















彼は近代文学を専攻している。He majors in modern literature.



































































ＣＯ２はいわゆる温室効果と大いに関係があります。CO2 has a lot to do with the so-called greenhouse effect.


温故知新というからねえ。歴史の勉強は大切だよ。They say you should consult the past if you want to learn about the future. History has a lot to teach us.



















その家は赤レンガづくりです。The house is built of red bricks.


























安倍内閣は、自由民主党、公明党を与党とする連立内閣である。The Abe Cabinet is a coalition Cabinet where the Liberal Democratic Party and New Komei Party form the government.
その少年は連立方程式を楽に解いた。The boy solved the simultaneous equation with ease.



わが連合艦隊は敵の防衛海域を突破した。Our combined fleet broke through the enemy's defense zone.





































































分析においては、クルツによって最初に分析された権威的行動の類型に負っている部分が大きい。In my analysis I rely considerably on the types of authoritarian behaviour first analyzed by Kurz.
リツコはその問題については相当の権威者です。Ritsuko is something of an authority on the subject.






京都は観光産業に依存している。Kyoto depends on the tourist industry.



観光案内所はどこですか。Where is the tourist information office?

彼の福祉の概念はかなり観念的だ。His notion of welfare is pretty abstract.















彼は観察力が鋭い。He has an acute sense of observation.
すべてが多数の観察者の目に見える。All this is visible to numerous observers.











ジョージはとても話好きだ。George is quite talkative.

ボブは誰か話し相手を探していた。Bob was looking for someone to talk with.


彼は喧嘩早い人だ。He is an aggressive person.

僕は友達と喧嘩別れした。I parted from my friend in anger.







母系の祖母はその旧式のドレスを着ることに固執する。My maternal grandmother persists in wearing that old-fashioned dress.







毎夕、放課後に僕たちは彼の家の裏庭で会って、インディアン戦争ごっこをした。Every evening after school we met in his back garden and arranged Indian battles.



明日から梅雨前線が活発になります。The seasonal rain front is moving in tomorrow.











牧羊犬が、羊の群を牧場へ連れていく。A sheep dog drives the flock to the pasture.














救助隊がくるまで頑張りなさい。Try to hold on until a rescue team arrives.






被災地に救援物資が急送された。Relief supplies were raced to the disaster area.




































彼が当代随一の作家のひとりであるのは言うまでもない。Needless to say he is one of the best writers of the present generation.






今年は彼にとって当たり年だった。This year has been a lucky one for him.





コンサートチケットは当所で発売中です。Concert tickets are on sale at this office.






























彼女はその知らせに唖然とした。She was struck dumb at the news.






英仏海峡を泳ぎ渡るのに成功した最初の人はウェッブ船長でした。The first man that succeed in swimming the Channel was Captain Webb.
あなたは英字新聞を定期購読したことがありますか。Have you ever subscribed to any English language newspaper?








折り入って頼みたいことがある。I want to ask you a big favor.










そのホテルはこの辺りでは最高だとの折り紙つきです。It is admitted that the hotel is the best in this area.






今禎子にできることは、折り鶴を折って奇跡を願うことだけだった。All Sadako could do now was to make paper cranes and hope for a miracle.






























彼は長く製鉄業を支配したが、完全な独占には至らなかった。Though he long dominated the steel industry, he never achieved a complete monopoly.



同社の今年の設備投資計画は１００億円と決められている。The company's capital expenditure program is set to be 10 billion yen for this year.





















日経指数は大引け間際に大きく跳ね上がりました。The Nikkei index jumped dramatically just before closing.






よく聞き全く話さぬものは奥の間でも大広間でも歓迎される。He that hears much and speaks not at all shall be welcome both in bower and hall.





その少年を厳しく罰しないでください。もう少し大目に見てやってください。Don't punish the boy severely; go easy on him.




ロケットは大気圏外へ飛んでいった。The rocket blasted out of the atmosphere.








その映画は大当たりした。The movie was a big draw at the box office.



早熟は大成せず。Soon ripe, soon rotten.
今回の旅行では、大自然に触れることができた感じがした。I feel I was able to get back to nature on this trip.












体操競技の中では、鉄棒の大車輪が好きです。I like to see a gymnast do the giant swing on the high bar.


トムのジョークは学生たちに大受けだった。Tom's joke was a big hit with the students.




大味な試合だった。The game lacked excitement.




















目が覚めてみると我々は大海原を漂流していた。When we awoke, we were adrift on the open sea.






えっへんと大いばりでアリスは胸を張った。"A-hem!" Alice boasted, puffing up with pride.

かぜには大食、熱には小食。Feed a cold and starve a fever.
ここだけの話だが、彼は大食いだ。This is just between you and me, he is a big eater.


彼は大逆罪で島流しにされた。He was banished to an island for high treason.





大酒を飲んだ報いで彼は健康を害した。His health was the forfeit of heavy drinking.
君なら一番の大酒飲みとしてギネスブックに載せてもらえるよ。You could get into the Guinness Book of World Records as the heaviest drinker.














私をランドルフ社の大野氏に紹介していただけませんか。Could you introduce me to Mr Ono of Randolph, Ltd?







大欲は無欲に似たり。Grasp all, lose all.




わが国のサッカー代表チームが歴史的大敗を喫しガックリした。I was extremely disappointed to see our national soccer team suffer a historic loss.





大寒：１年で最も寒さが厳しくなる日ですが、春がもうすぐ間近に迫っているとも言えます。Major Cold: It's the day of the year that the cold is most severe, but you could also say that Spring is just coming around the corner.
嫁と姑の仲は大嵐。Mother-in-law and daughter-in-law are a tempest and hailstorm.





私を４０歳だと見ているのですか。それは大間違いです。Do you take me for forty? You are wide of the mark.
時々イタリア人の大道音楽家が町にやって来ました。Sometimes an Italian street musician came to town.













真剣にやってよね。学園祭は待ってくれないんだよ、もう大詰めなんだから。Take it seriously! The school festival won't wait for us. We're already in the final countdown.









彼らは自由という大儀のために戦った。They fought in the cause of freedom.












小難をのがれて大難に陥る。Jump out of the frying pan into the fire.



























太陽電池で動く自動車を望んでいる。I hope for a solar battery car.

太陽熱は日本では発電より太陽熱温水器として利用されています。In Japan solar heat is used more for solar water heaters than for electricity generation.

太陽熱は日本では発電より太陽熱温水器として利用されています。In Japan solar heat is used more for solar water heaters than for electricity generation.



























この季節にはわれわれはしばしば多雨の害を受ける。In this season we often suffer from an excess of rain.



今年はコレラ患者が多発した。There have been many cases of cholera this year.



その小説は人生を多面的に描いている。The novel gives a manifold picture of human life.


才子多病、佳人薄命。Whom the gods love die young.





彼は多趣味だ。He has a lot of hobbies.





































過度の供給は値崩れにつながる。Excessive supply leads to a drop in prices.













植物学は植物の研究を扱っている。Botany deals with the study of plants.
天候は、世界の至る所で、植物界と下等動物界の間の複雑な調和状態に影響を与えている。To this extent, it has the characteristics of a great complicated balance between plant life and lower forms of animal life.




彼は自分のお気に入りの本を私への置き土産にして大阪に引っ越した。He left me with his favorite book and moved to Osaka.
彼女は私に置手紙をした。She left me a note.

彼女は自分の子供たちを置きざりにした。She abandoned her children.





明日の夜から雨だから置き傘をしていこう。It's supposed to rain tomorrow night, so let's leave our umbrellas until then.


















特別国会の会期は４週間の予定である。The extraordinary session of the Diet will last four weeks.







特価品の値段は、赤インクで書かれている。The sale prices are written in red ink.





















特務機関が彼を襲撃から守っている。The secret service guards him against attack.



インテル社はその発明で膨大な特許料を得ている。Intel gets a huge royalty from the invention.


彼の功績は特筆大書すべきものがある。His accomplishments should be written in large letters.














宝くじでも当たれば、左うちわで暮らせるだろうに。If I win the lottery, I'll be able to live high on the hog.

日本では、自動車は左側通行です。Cars keep to the left in Japan.




道は行進にさしつかえない。The way is free for an advance.






２人の恋人は差し向かいに座ってお茶を飲んでいた。The two lovers sat face to face, drinking tea.

















みなプロジェクトを抱えているので、差し詰め、君しか適任者はいない。Everybody has their own projects on, so after all you are the only suitable candidate.会社をクビになったけど、貯金がすこしあるので、差し詰め生活には困らない。I got the sack but I've a little saved up, so for the time being I won't be troubled by living expenses.



















朝の礼拝は賛美歌ではじまった。The morning service began with a hymn.
彼は彼女の演技に賛嘆の声をあげた。He cried in admiration of her performance.


うちの猫って甘えん坊で、どこでも私のあと付いて来るのよね。My cat is such a baby; she follows me around wherever I go.








































リトマス紙で溶液の液性（酸性、中性、塩基性）を調べるときは、リトマス紙をすべて溶液に浸すのではなく、紙の先端の部分だけを浸します。When investigating the pH (acidic, neutral, alkaline) of a liquid, don't soak the litmus paper completely in the liquid but just put the end of the paper in it.


















既往は咎めず。Let bygones be bygones.








肉は桃色をしているといったことについてのすべての慨世観念や先入観。All the accepted notions and prejudices about flesh being pink.












彼は貧乏であるが、気位が高くて援助を求めない。He is poor but is too proud to ask for help.


彼は人の名前を忘れ気味である。He is apt to forget people's names.


彼は主たる論点を明らかにすることに気乗り薄である。He is not eager to unveil his main argument.



















僕は若い頃は気短かだった。I was quick tempered when I was young.







風邪をひくとよく気管支炎になります。When she catches a cold, she often develops bronchitis.










貧乏するとこじき根性がでる。When a man becomes poor, the beggar in him will come out.




今日のランチも愛妻弁当ですか？妬けますね。Did your wife make your lunch again today? I'm so jealous.









あいつは優柔不断だから、彼女が愛想尽かしちゃったんだよ。She got tired of his waffling and dumped him.












ダンス部に入部しませんか。How would you like to join the dance club?
もし、システムの完全な入れ替えが必要ということになれば、彼らは古いシステムで満足することと思う。If it's going to require a total restructuring, I'm sure they will be satisfied with the old system.

























そのような内緒事はいつも結局は暴露される。Such secrets are always eventually revealed.














納税者は払った金の行方を知る権利がある。Each taxpayer has the right to know where his money goes.























妊娠中毒症にかかりました。I had toxemia during my pregnancy.


やっぱり男手があると、作業の幅が広がるねぇ。When there's a man around, the work that can be done sure increases.

男心と秋の空。Man is as fickle as autumn weather.










男物は２階で売っています。Men's things are on sale upstairs.









妻が死んだ男の人は男やもめと呼ばれます。A man whose wife is dead is called a widower.






ベッドは寝心地満点だった。I found the bed quite comfortable.





















寝癖がついちゃった。My hair got kinky.






それらの子供たちは潜在的な顧客だ。Those children are potential customers.
たぶん彼女の潜在意識の中にそういう衝動があったんでしょうね。Maybe the impulse was working upon her subconscious.















心づくしのおもてなしを感謝します。Thank you very much for your hearty hospitality.








君と意見を異にするので私には心苦しい。It pains me to disagree with your opinion.











ハルくんは昔からこうなの、心根は凄く優しいのよ。Haru's always been like that; he's very kind at heart.
私は彼に心配事を打ち明けた。I confided my troubles to him.
私、心配性なんです。I do a lot of worrying.







いやだと言うことは彼女にとって心理的に難しい。It is psychologically difficult for her to say no.





あの人の言うことはどうも心もとないわね。I cannot place confidence in his words.





心静かに花鳥風月を愛でる気持ちの余裕も最近になってでてきたよ。Lately I've had the time to quietly enjoy the wonders of nature.





彼は心機一転やり直した。He turned over a new leaf in life.



彼は心臓外科の第一人者だ。He is the foremost authority on heart surgery.


緊張が心臓病の主な原因だ。Tension is a major cause of heart disease.
突然の恐怖に老婆は心臓麻痺を起こした。Fright gave the old lady heart failure.


































日本の養殖真珠は世界の真珠市場の６割を占めるまでになった。Japanese cultured pearls have come to monopolise as much as 60% of the world pearl market.



ケンの伯父さんは大きな養鶏場をもっている。Ken's uncle has a big chicken farm.
養鶏業は遅かれ早かれ破産するだろうという旨の手紙を彼は私によこした。He sent me a letter to the effect that his poultry farm would go bankrupt sooner or later.











私の洋服屋から戻ってきた時に破れていた。My dress was ruined when it came back from the cleaner's.
彼には洋々たる前途があった。A brilliant future lay before him.


上から眺めたときのその島は形が洋ナシに似ている。The island as seen from above resembles a pear in shape.


































































改革者たちは支配層からのあらゆる非難にさらされた。The reformers were subject to every attack from the Establishment.















彼はよい記憶力をもっている。He has a good memory.

彼の記憶喪失は物理的な記憶障害というよりは心理的な障害である。His loss of memory is a psychological problem rather than a physical one.

株価が史上最高に上昇する中、記録的な出来高となった。A record number of shares changed hands in busy trading as prices soared to a historic high.

















「冬の時代」が大学改革の起爆剤となってくれればと思う。So-called "winter time" is expected to enhance the college reform.














あなたはもっと理性的であるべきだ。You should be more reasonable.









ギリシャ人たちは幾何学の理論的原形を作った。The Greeks made theoretical models of geometry.
アインシュタインにとって理論物理学は遊びのようなものだったが、そんな彼も税金の計算となるとからきし駄目だった。Theoretical physics was child's play to Einstein, but he couldn't figure out his income tax.
われわれの宇宙はまだ生まれて間もないが、理論家たちはその最後の姿を究明することにやっきになっている。Although our universe is still young, theorists are busy exploring its ultimate fate.



彼らは裏面工作をしている。They are maneuvering behind the scene.










それまで！２人ともなかなか力演でした。OK, stop there! That was a strong performance from the two of you.






























プレステ２発売後、ゲームソフト売り場は百花撩乱状態だ。Since the release of the PlayStation 2, game store shelves have blossomed with a variety of new titles.







































労働者階級には敬意を払うべきである。Respect is due to the proletariat.






去年の選挙で労働党の票数が増えた。The Labor Party's vote increased at last year's election.















その国の人々は暴政下で暮らしていた。People in the country were living under a tyranny.


暴漢のピストルが発射された。A ruffian's pistol went off.








地球の表面積の３分の２は水でおおわれている。Two-thirds of the earth's surface is covered with water.



















彼は長広舌をふるった。He drew out his speech.




彼の最近作の小説は以前のに比べて長足の進歩を示している。His latest novel marks a great advance on his previous ones.




長雨は植物に害をおよぼす。A long spell of rainy weather is harmful to plants.



凝った彫刻のしてある鞘に収まった長剣。A longsword sheathed in an intricately engraved scabbard.










長靴にかびが生えた。Mold grew on the boots.
あの長髪の青年は粗野だ。That long-haired youth is rude.












要するにタイマン勝負なんだけど、その試合内容は常人では考えられないほどの高レベル。Essentially it's a one-to-one match, but the content of that match is a level so high as to be unthinkable to an ordinary person.






























ごく常識的には、客２人に対して牛肉１ポンドを用意すべきだろうね。As a rule of thumb, you should plan on one pound of beef for every two guests.













関係代名詞のthatは、主格、目的格の2つであり、所有格はありません。The relative pronoun 'that' has two states, a nominative case and objective case, but there is no possessive case.


所持金を全部あげよう。You shall have what money I have.








学校に対するあなたの寄付は、所得控除の対象になる。Your contribution to the school is tax-deductible.




































初診の受付は一番窓口です。Registration for the first visit is at Counter No.1.


秋になると日はだんだん短くなり夜はさむくなってきました。彼女は初霜が木の葉を黄色や赤に変えていくのをみていました。In the fall, when the days grew shorter and the nights colder, she watched the first frost turn the leaves to bright yellow and orange and red.
















その寝室には、美しい装飾品がいっぱいあった。The bedroom was laden with beautiful ornaments.




手前のガラス張りの建物は薔薇園なんです。温室になっていて、いつも薔薇を観賞できるようになってるんですよ。The glass fronted building before you is the rose garden. It's a greenhouse so you will always be able to appreciate the roses.
結婚は天上において行われ、床入りは地上において行われる。Marriages are made in heaven and consummated on earth.






















幸福になりたいなら人生における境涯に満足することを学びなさい。If you wish to be happy, learn to be content with your condition in life.



経済は今景気循環の頂点にある。The economy is at peak of a business cycle at present.








明日から強化合宿に入るんですが、強化するのは体力面ではなく、メンタルの部分です。I'm going to a training camp tomorrow. However it's not the physical side that I'll be training, but the mental.


ふたをして始めは強火、沸騰したら中火にして約７分間煮ます。Put the lid on and start at high flame, when it boils set to medium flame and boil for about seven minutes.















下手に手を動かすと気付かれてしまうという強迫観念が俺を襲う。I was assailed by the stupid, but unshakeable, idea that if I was imprudent enough to move my hand I'd be noticed.









その映画監督は自分の権力を使って、映画界に特別な場を設けました。The director used his power to arrange a special place in the cinema world.



数年前、ある仕事を得るために面接を受けているときに、私はその職を求める競争者に紹介された。Several years ago, in the course of being interviewed for a job, I was introduced to a competitor for the position.

我々は競争相手にどうしても勝たねばならない。We must prevail against our rivals by all means.

ギリシア人は昔大競技会を開いていた。The Greeks used to hold a big athletic meet.
競技場にはどうやって行ったの？How did you get to the stadium?













僕をいいところまでひきつけておいてあとはしらんぷり。She took me half way there, and then played innocent.

ココの知能指数を調べるのは容易ではない。Testing Koko's IQ is not easy.














彼は知識人ぶるのが好きだ。He likes to posture as an intellectual.




全ての放送の内容も方法も、実際に決定するのは聴取者である。It is the audience which really determines both the matter and manner of every broadcast.








「この用語の意味をはっきりさせて下さい」とビジネスマンは聴聞取り引きの場で要求した。"Define your terms," requested the businessman at the contract hearings.












手始めは、三大宗教の聖地、エルサレムを訪れることだった。For a start, I visited Jerusalem - a sacred place for three major religions.








その聖者が埋葬されている聖堂を多くの人々が訪れた。Many people visited the shrine where the saint lay buried.

















お支払日が先月末の請求書５６７８９について、まだお支払いを受けておりません。With reference to the invoice No.56789 which was due last month, we have not yet received your remittance.





これは、この現象において支配的な要素を決定するという問題である。The problem is one of determining the dominant factors in this phenomenon.

その君主は臣民に対して絶対の支配権を持っていた。The lord held absolute power over his subjects.











解き方を教えてあげるよ。I will show you how to solve it.







































軍は敵に弾薬庫を引き渡した。The army surrendered its arsenal to the enemy.


日本の戦中は、飢えとの戦いに明け暮れていたとも言えます。We can say that Japan was fighting a constant battle against hunger during the war.









彼は戦災孤児をひきとって養女として育てています。He adopted a war orphan and is bringing her up as a foster daughter.






我々は戦時中は石油なしで済まさなければならなかった。We had to do without oil during the war.





















チャンピオンの戦歴は若い相手の力に屈してしまいました。The champion's experience submitted to the young opponent's power.






近代戦の戦術は兵士が戦闘員として効果的な働きをするために必ずしも十分に武装することを必要とはしていない。The art of modern warfare does not necessarily require soldiers to be armed to the teeth to be effective as combatants.












学生達は扇動者のアピールに動かされた。The students were animated by the agitator's appeal.
















彼女は脱走兵をかくまった。She harbored the deserter.
彼は脱兎のごとく逃げた。He ran like a scared rabbit.






















長いこと贅沢三昧に暮らしていた彼らが、今になって何もない質素な生活に耐えるなんてとても無理な話だ。They lived high on the hog for so long, and now they can't adjust to a simple life without luxuries.

彼は私にその単語のつづり方を教えてくれた。He taught me how to spell the word.



ここにつづり字の問題に成りそうな単語がいくつかあります。Here are some words whose spelling may cause trouble.
































































彼はニューヨーク行きの貨物列車に飛び乗った。He hopped on a freight train bound for New York.
機関車は長い貨物車の列を引っ張って走っていた。The locomotive was pulling a long line of freight cars.
英国は、１９７１年にその貨幣制度を１０進法に移行させた。In 1971 the United Kingdom changed its currency to the decimal system.
ほとんど全ての社会が今日では、何らかの硬貨と紙幣に基づいた貨幣経済を持っている。Almost all societies now have a money economy based on coins and paper bills of one kind or another.



















政治的レベルにおいて、その反応はマカベー一族の民族主義的、根本主義的反乱であった。On the political level the response was the nationalist and fundamentalist revolt of the Maccabees.

さあ、根比べをしよう。Let's see who can hold out the longest.














警察は飲酒運転を根絶やしにしようとしている。The police are trying to get entirely rid of drunken driving.





これは僕の眼前で起こったことです。This happened under my nose.





眼窩とは、目をいれている骨のいれもののことです。The eye socket is the bone receptacle in which the eye fits.





眼鏡の形をしていることから、その橋を眼鏡橋とよぶ。Since the bridge looks like a pair of glasses, they call it Meganebashi.


あすの朝までには一面の銀世界になっているだろう。By tomorrow morning all the world will have been covered with snow.
ニッケルは硬い銀白色の金属です。Nickel is a hard, silver-white metal.



その女優は銀行家と婚約したといった。The actress said that she was engaged to a banker.
「動くな、全員！」と銀行強盗は叫んだ。The bank robber shouted, "Stay where you are, all of you!"





銀河系には無数の星がある。There are innumerable stars in the galaxy.























ジャイアンツは２０点差で試合に負けた。The Giants lost the game by 20 points.
































それは犯罪行為です。本当に罰せられますよ！That is a criminal offense, and you will surely be punished!



























法学を学んでいる学生が皆法律家になれるというわけではない。Not every student studying law can be a lawyer.
そしてこの法律案が通らなかった場合において、おまえはどういう責任をとるのだ。And how will you take responsibility in the case that this bill doesn't pass?




彼は法科の学生だ。He is an undergraduate in the law department.








この法律が定めたのは、法貨以外での賃金支給は違法だということです。What these acts said was that it was illegal to pay someone in anything other than coin of the realm.

教区牧師は法話の時しばしば聖書に言及する。The vicar often refers to the Bible in his sermon.



嘘ではないにしろ、ホラに近い。If not a lie, close to a boast.
彼はほら吹きで、言ったことの半分もやったことがない。He talks big but he's never done half the things that he said he has.


勤勉と品行方正とが彼にその奨学金を受けさせた。His diligence and good conduct earned him the scholarship.

次には、主賓がそれらを開き、品定めをするのである。Then the guest of honor opens them and expresses his or her appreciation.




彼女は自分のテリア犬を犬品評会に出した。She entered her terrier in a dog show.

１９世紀末になって初めて植物の品種改良は科学の一分野となった。Not until the end of the nineteenth century, did plant breeding become a scientific discipline.








快食快眠快便は健康のしるし。A good appetite, sound sleep, and regular motions are the three signs of good health.







母は神経痛が快癒した。My mother made a complete recovery from neuralgia.





彼は決断力に欠けている。He lacks decisiveness.
二人の走者は同時に決勝線に着いた。The two runners reached the finish line at the same time.

決算報告を申し上げます。We will now report on this year's business results.




我々はその決議案に賛成投票をした。We voted for the resolution.












それは越権行為だ。You are acting beyond your position.



月世界への旅は今世紀中に実現するだろうと一般に考えられている。It is generally believed that a trip to the moon will be made possible during this century.
あなたは月刊雑誌を何か取っていますか。Do you subscribe to any monthly magazine?
よい投資方法としては月払いの分割がある。A good method for investing is a monthly allotment.

























私の外出中に、だれか電話をかけてきましたか。Did anyone call me when I was out?
彼女は外出嫌いだ。She's allergic to going out.







それは外交辞令だ。Those words are mere diplomatic niceties.










































一般的に言って、オーケストラの指揮者は演奏会で燕尾服を着ます。Generally speaking, orchestra conductors wear tailcoats at concerts.



私の読んだ冒険談は実生活とは縁遠い。The adventures I read about are absent from my life.

女は次から次へと帽子をかぶってみて帽子屋をでた。The woman tried on one hat after another, then left the hat shop.
帽子を帽子掛けに掛けなさい。Hang your hat on the hook.






なぜ一種の植物が一年生の草本になったり、多年生の木本になったりするのでしょうか。I wonder why it is that some plants become annuals and others perennials?


















彼はでくの坊にすぎない。He is no better than a fool.






彼女は庭に木犀を植えた。She planted fragrant olives in the garden.
小鳥が木の間で楽しそうにさえずっている。Little birds are singing merrily in the trees.









谷は彼の呼び声でこだました。The valley echoed with his call.
















君の目元はかわいいね。You have lovely eyes, don't you?




















この間ミュージカルに見に行ったんだけど、前から３列目でさ、もう憧れの人が目の前で、もう最高だったね。一段と彼を好きになった。I was at a musical recently, in the third row. Seeing the actor I love up close like that made me feel more smitten with him than ever.





盲馬にはうなずいても目配せしても同じこと。A nod is as good as a wink to a blind horse.










彼女は目鼻立ちが美しい。She has fine features.
「軽くならいいけど」「うむ、では金的と目潰しは有効にするか？」"If it's a light workout, OK." "Right, so will we allow crotch-kicking and eyeball crushing?"

ジェーンは私達に目線を投げかけた。Jane threw a glance at us.納税者の目線で努力を致したいと思います。I want to work from the taxpayers' point of view.

目くそ鼻くそを笑う。The pot calls the kettle black.










気がつくと逃げ場はどこにもなかった。Now that I notice it, I have nowhere to run.

どこかへ逃避行したい。蒸し暑い夏はそんな気分になりがち。I want to disappear somewhere! I tend to feel like that in sultry summers.














水は見る見るうちに橋げたのところまで達した。The water came up to the bridge girder in a second.
そばはそば粉から、うどんやきしめんは普通の小麦粉からできてるの。Soba is made of buckwheat flour, and udon and kishimen are made of plain wheat flour.






そこは高山植物が豊富だ。Alpine flowers are abundant there.




















彼は高利でお金を貸している。He lends money at a high rate of interest.



彼らは高飛びしたに違いない。They must've skipped out of town.








彼女は高級車好みだ。She has expensive tastes in cars.



高校野球チームは選手権大会で競いあった。High school baseball teams competed with one another at the tournament.










高望みをするとかえって損をする。You may go farther and fare worse.






その国は高等教育社会に変わりつつある。That country is turning into a society with high education.





武士は食わねど高楊枝。A samurai, even when he has not eaten, uses a toothpick like a lord.

高跳びでは彼は私よりずっとうえだ。He is much better than me at the high jump.
彼は高遠な望みを持っている。He has a soaring ambition.





















そんなことは私には高嶺の花です。That's to me like a flower on lofty heights.

彼は高いびきをかいて寝ていた。He was snoring loudly while he slept.















































彼は駅までの道がわかるように略図を書いてくれた。He did a rough drawing to show me the way to the station.














路面電車は今では確かに時代遅れかもしれない。The streetcar is now certainly out of date.























更年期障害があります。I have menopausal troubles.













右脚にうおのめができています。I have a corn on my right foot.

















漁火が島影に瞬く。A fishing light wavers under the lee of an island.














庭園用の鋼製柵＃ＳＴＬ３４５６の価格と、一番早い納期をご連絡下さい。Please let us know the prices and earliest delivery of your Steel Landscape Edgings #STL3456.
























川下りでびしょびしょになった。I got soaked boating downriver.





私たちは涼しい川風に吹かれた。We enjoyed the cool breeze that came from the river.




川幅はこの地点で急に狭まっています。The river suddenly narrows at this point.


















引用した問題ではありませんが、関係代名詞と関係副詞の使い分けを問う問題がリーディングセクションにはあります。The problem quoted isn't one, but there are problems in the reading section that ask you to distinguish relative pronouns from relative adverbs.
引用した問題ではありませんが、関係代名詞と関係副詞の使い分けを問う問題がリーディングセクションにはあります。The problem quoted isn't one, but there are problems in the reading section that ask you to distinguish relative pronouns from relative adverbs.











１９０６年のある日、タッド・ドーガンという名の新聞漫画家が野球の試合を見に行った。One day in 1906, a newspaper cartoonist named Tad Dorgan went to a baseball game.









このつる草は木にからみつきます。This vine winds around trees.



数字を足したり引いたりという面倒臭い仕事も一旦始めてしまえば、それはそれで面白さがあるものだよ。Once you go ahead and start, even the tiresome work of adding and subtracting figures is interesting in its way.この本は面白さの点ではあの本にまさるとも劣らない。This book is not less amusing than that one.
面白半分なら来ないで欲しい。If you're doing it in fun, I'd rather you didn't come.
人生は面白おかしい事ばかりではない。Life is not all beer and skittles.

いやあ面目ない。穴があったら入りたい心境だよ。I'm so sorry about what I did. I wish I could just crawl into a hole and die.
面会人は午後９時以降病院に留まることはできない。No visitor can remain in the hospital after 9 p.m.
あの政治家は水曜日が面会日だ。The politician receives on Wednesdays.
面会時間を教えてください。What are the visiting hours?
細菌などから隔離するため、面会謝絶となっています。In order to isolate him from bacteria, and such, he is not allowed visitors.






面疔ができた。小鼻の奥に1個、痛い塊がある。I have a facial boil. There's a painful lump at the back of one nostril.























彼は満身の力を込めてそれを持ち上げた。He lifted it up with all his might.

申し訳ありません、満室です。I'm sorry, we have no vacancies.
































その工場は綿製品を生産する。The factory produces cotton goods.































車庫のまわりをぶらついて時間をつぶしていると古いトラックが進入路にさっと入ってきた。I was wasting time, wandering around the garage, when an old truck swept into driveway.


新しいオイル・タンカーが進水した。A new oil tanker was launched.

進行形の文では、動詞のing形、つまり現在分詞となります。In a progressive tense sentence it becomes the -ing form verb, that is the present participle.




ホワイト氏は進歩的な政治家だ。Mr. White is a liberal politician.

その困難に打ち勝つには進取の精神が必要だ。We need a spirit of enterprise to overcome the difficulty.

ナポレオンの軍隊はモスクワに進軍した。Napoleon's army has advanced to Moscow.









老婦人は３LDKの集合住宅に独りで住んでいた。The old lady lived in a three-room apartment by herself.


















































彼が亡くなって三年になります。It is three years since he died.





















彼は三等賞を得た。He won the third prize.





そうだ、どうせなら散歩がてらに、林道に行ってプチ森林浴でも・・・。Right, while we're taking a walk anyway, we could like go along the woodland path and enjoy a little stroll through the forest...










































その地区には猟鳥が多い。Game birds abound in the area.
この公園は貴族の猟場でした。This park used to be a hunting ground for a noble family.



















われわれはその会合を暫定的に月曜日ときめています。それは変更することがあります。We've set the meeting tentatively for Monday. It's subject to change.










果樹栽培者がリンゴの接ぎ穂を台木に接ぎ木しました。The orchardist grafted an apple bud onto the rootstock.







接待費はうちのグループが負担させられた。The entertainment expense was borne by our group.
































鑑定書を送ってください。Send me the account.


とりわけ、彼は名画の鑑識眼がある。Among other things, he has an eye for good pictures.








彼は臨時雇いを採用した。He took on extra workers.







ナンシーは屋内競技が好きです。Nancy enjoys indoor games.





屋根裏には十分広い余地がある。There's ample room in the attic.


人の心臓はその人の握り拳とほぼ同じだ。A man's heart is about as large as his fist.




米航空宇宙局によれば、ガリレオ搭載のものと類似した発電機を搭載して行った宇宙飛行２２回のうち、３回の飛行で事故が発生したとのことです。NASA says three of 22 space missions that carried generators similar to Galileo's ended in accidents.


























ほら、健一、そこの雨樋伝っておいでよ。引っ張ってあげるから。Hey, Ken'ichi, come along that drain pipe. I'll pull you up.




突然敵の爆弾が雨あられと我々に降り注いだ。All of a sudden, the enemy bombs came down on us like rain.



彼女はしけで船に酔った。She became seasick in rough seas.


彼女は時世が悪いのだと言った。She cursed the times.
彼は中学時代小説ばかり読んでいた。He did nothing but read novels in his junior high school days.



あなたの考えはまったく時代遅れである。Your ideas are all out of date.





真理は通例現在時制で表現される。Truth is usually expressed in the present tense.




































５年目頃に芝刈りはもう自分でやりたくない、と思った。In about the fifth year I decided cutting the grass was something I didn't want to do any more of.


その志望者は試験官に好ましい印象を与えた。The applicant impressed the examiner favorably.






私は彼に入るように耳打ちした。I whispered to him to come in.

左耳から耳だれが出ます。I have a discharge from my left ear.










１万メートルを走るには大いに耐久力を必要とする。You need great endurance to run ten thousand meters.
この機械は、耐久性であの機械に劣ります。This machine is inferior to that one in durability.
































その会社の株の仕手戦は、倒産の危機が差し迫っていることを隠す方便にすぎなかった。The big promotion of that company's stock was just a cover-up to hide their impending bankruptcy.



















今年は例年に無く多くの学生が司法試験を受けた。More students than ever before have sat for their bar examinations this year.



年を取ると、無病息災であることが何よりだと思うようになる。As you get older you start to feel that health is everything.





「これは何？供物か？」「そうだよ、このお賽銭箱の中に入れて・・・この紐を引っ張るの」"What is this? An offering?" "That's right. Put it in this offertory box ... and pull this rope."



























このジャケットの色違いはありますか。Do you have this jacket in different colors?











なぜ一種の植物が一年生の草本になったり、多年生の木本になったりするのでしょうか。I wonder why it is that some plants become annuals and others perennials?







骨折り損のくたびれもうけだった。All my effort went for nothing.



これらの動物は草食動物である。These animals feed on grass.






























造園のために庭師が呼ばれた。A gardener was called in to design the garden.





















一番下の弟は祖母により幼年時代育てられた。My youngest brother was brought up by our grandmother.
























乗客、乗員合わせて７９名の生存者の中に操縦士が含まれていた。The pilots were among the 79 survivors consisting of passengers and crew.

















縞柄の服で彼女のほっそりした姿が目立つ。Her striped dress accentuates her slimness.

「お前、どこの子だ？」足に纏わりついてきたのは、小さな子猫だった。灰色の縞模様のふわふわした猫だ。"Who do you belong to?" Wrapped around his feet was a small cat. It was a fluffy grey striped cat.








年間所得が１５００万円を越す人は毎年３月に確定申告しなければならない。An individual with an annual income of more than 15 million yen is required to file his or her final tax return in March.














劇中の俳優さんが好きな方は買って損はないと思います。I think those who like the actors in the play won't lose anything by buying it.




















以前に乳腺炎をわずらいました。I had mastitis before.


天候が許せば、彼らは森へきのこ狩りにでかけるでしょう。They will go to the woods to pick mushrooms, weather permitting.




去年緑内障の手術をしました。I had an operation for glaucoma last year.








































































穂木を台木に差し込む際、形成層を重ね合わせるようにします。When inserting the budwood into the root stock, make the cambium layers overlap.




















彼は幸運児であったと言われるのももっともだ。He may well be said to have been a fortunate man.










納屋のドアは不注意にも掛け金がはずれたままになっていた。The barn door had been carelessly left unlatched.





この種の保険は掛け捨てが多い。With this type of insurance, most policies don't come with a maturity refund.
彼女は、僕にとって掛け替えのない人だ。To me, she's irreplaceable.





がけくずれで交通は遮断された。Traffic was blocked by a landslide.






私の参謀としてついたからには、危機感を持って任にあたって貰わねば困ります。If you're with me as a staff officer, then I need you to bring a sense of danger with you to your work.












あのプロのスキーヤーは離れ業をしながら山をおりるのが好きだった。The professional skier liked to "hot-dog" down the mountain.








離着陸の際にはシートベルトをしめて下さい。Please secure your seat belt during takeoff and landing.





離ればなれにちょうど２週間過ごしたところです。We've just spent two weeks apart.








































「ひょっとして、今まで気づいてなかったのですか」「いや、まぁ・・・。想像の埒外だったもんで・・・」"Did you possibly not notice until just now?" "Er, well ... it was just so beyond my imagination that ..."






小さな裸電球が唯一の明りだった。A small, naked bulb gave the only illumination.
マネがこの絵を描くまで、女性の裸像は女神に限られていました。Until Manet painted this picture, his female nudes were limited to goddesses.

汚い手で会社を乗っ取ったものの、腹心だと思っていた部下に裏切られ、因果応報だね。When the trusted confidant of the person who conducted a hostile takeover of the company betrayed him, it was a sort of retributive justice.










その洞窟が私たちの隠れ家になった。The cave did for our hiding place.その俳優にはコロラドに隠れ家があった。The actor has a hideaway in Colorado.

彼女は彼の隠れ場所を警察に密告した。She betrayed his hiding place to the police.











５年に及ぶ、つらかったガンの治療期間中、彼は何とか弱音をはかず毅然とした態度を崩さなかった。Throughout the five years of painful cancer treatments, he managed to keep a stiff upper lip.












私は本代に毎月千円もらいます。I am allowed 1,000 yen a month for books.


本件についての率直なご意見をお聞かせください。Could you share your honest opinion on this issue?













彼の料理はフランス仕込みの本格派だ。His cooking is of the classic French style that he studied in France.




いかなる政党も本質的に保守的である。Any political party is conservative in itself.



刺激を受け続けると肌の保護作用により角質が肥厚して、ゴワゴワしたり硬くなって、毛穴が目立ってきます。If it continues to be stimulated the skin's protective function causes thickening and it becomes stiff and hard with pores that stand out.















ここは免税店ですか。Can I buy things here duty-free?


彼女は勉強部屋から出ていった。She went out of her study.



そんな些細な事は問題外だ。Such a trivial thing is out of the question.
彼は明敏な問題意識をもっている。He has a keen awareness of the problem.




人を動かす秘訣は話し上手であることより、聞き上手であることにある。The secret of influencing people lies not so much in being a good talker as in being a good listener.






彼が秘密を打ち明け始めるとみんな聞き耳をたてた。We were all ears when he started to tell us his secret.










それは聞き捨てならんな。I cannot let it go unchallenged.


電話の声は私には聞き覚えのないものだった。The voice on the phone was unfamiliar to me.











パーティー会場に入るなり、サムは食べ物めがけて脇目もふらず突進した。When he got to the party, Sam made a bee line for the food.
保憲は脇息に身を預け、目前に出された朝餉に当惑の目を当てていた。Yasunori leaned into the armrest and looked in bemusement at the breakfast laid before him.



































六十の手習い。It is never too late to learn.




新しい規約は全会一致で承認された。The new regulations were confirmed by the full committee.

























あの科学者たちは選り抜きだ。Those scientists are the cream of the crop.



よだれの出そうなものがよりどり見どりでいっぱいありますよ。It offers a mouth-watering selection of delights.







彼はこの選挙運動において長く熱心に戦い、愛する国のためにずっと長く、熱心に戦った。He's thought long and hard for this election. Very long and hard for the country he loves.


















代表取締役は取締役の職務の執行を監督するものだ。The Representative Director supervises Directors' performance of duties.



かわりばんこが公平だ。Turn about is fair play.











資金の貸し手は高利益の時期を享受している。Money lenders are enjoying a profitable period.







ようやくその男と貸し借り無しになった。I am finally quits with the man.




















彼はいつでも私を子供扱いする。He always treats me like a child.


２年前に子宮外妊娠をしました。I had an ectopic pregnancy two years ago.
子宮後屈があると、排卵痛が痛くなりやすいですか？Are you more likely to get worse ovulation pains if you have a tipped uterus?
子宮筋腫があります。大きくならないようにする方法はありますか？I have fibroid tumours. Is there a way to stop them getting large?
子宮癌の検査をしていただきたいのです。I'd like to have a Pap smear done.























ジグソーとは糸鋸の事で、名前の由来はそこからきているの。Jigsaw refers to a fret saw - that's how the name's origin was derived.





神様のおぼしめしで息子は死んだ。It pleased God to take away my son.


人間だけに論理的思考力がある。Man alone has the ability to reason.



あの女は思わせぶりをする。She is quite coquettish.
どうしても自分の思い通りにしたがるね。You will have your own way.

向こうの思う壷だぞ。You will play into their hands.



彼はまたとない優れた思想家である。He is as great a thinker as ever lived.



チャンピオンは挑戦者たちを思うままにあしらった。The champion had the challengers at his mercy.

















































彼は福祉事務所で働いている。He works at the welfare office.





















































農作物は平年並みだ。The crops are up to the average.
































私は肉体労働には向いていない。I'm not fit for physical labor.
食物と飲み物は肉体的に必要なものだ。Food and drink are material needs.



ニューギニア島には、大型の肉食獣がいなかったためです。That's because there weren't any large carnivores in New Guinea.


















９月に復学することを彼は切望した。He was eager to return to school in September.
私は復活祭のパレードを見て楽しんだ。I enjoyed watching the Easter Parade.













複写機の紙を切らしたよ。We've run out of paper for the photocopier.















複雑骨折の痛みはほとんど耐え難かった。The pain from the compound fracture was almost intolerable.



















脳しんとうを起こしました。I had concussion.

























乙姫様は浦島太郎に美しい玉手箱をくれました。Lady Otohime gave Urashima Taro a beautiful Tamate-box.


















ども、愚弟がお世話になってるようで。Thanks, I hear you've been taking care of my little brat of a brother.
ぐずは時間の盗人。Procrastination is the thief of time.

君子が恐れて踏み込まぬ所へも愚者は突入する。Fools rush in where angels fear to tread.
彼はいわば賢い愚か者だ。He is a wise fool, so to speak.














ほ乳瓶を煮沸消毒しなさい。Boil the milk bottles.










彼女は赤の他人です。She is a total stranger to me.







コレステロールをためたくなかったら、脂肪のない赤身の肉を食べるのがよい。If you want to avoid cholesterol, eat lean meat with no fat.












彼は赤葡萄酒を一杯飲んだ。He drank a glass of red wine.



























陰徳あれば陽報あり。Secret gifts are openly rewarded.

空手は武器を用いない護身術である。Karate is an art of unarmed defense.













仕事を生半可に知っている人が書くことは、できれば避けたい。I'd rather not have those written by people who only know their work imperfectly.




これは実物そっくりだ、生き写しだ。This is the spitting image of the real thing, perfectly true to life.




生き地獄は、言い過ぎだと私も思う。I also think 'living hell' is putting it too strongly.












その詩人が言っているように生兵法は大けがのもとだ。As the poet says, a little learning is a dangerous thing.












生活水準は上がるべきである。Living standards should be higher.

車も何もなく、生活保護で生きてます。I'm living on welfare, without a car or anything.


これがアメリカ風の生活様式だ。This is the American way of life.





彼女は生まれ故郷に埋葬された。She was buried in her hometown.


生計費は昨年うなぎ上りでした。The cost of living has shot through the ceiling in the last year.

会社は生き残りを賭けて奮闘している。The company is struggling for survival.






最近のぼくは、「生き恥」「赤恥」をかくことを恐れなくなりました。Recently I've stopped being afraid of "living in shame" and being exposed to "public ridicule".






生産力が落ちた。従って労働者のボーナスも少なくなるだろう。Productivity has fallen. Accordingly, workers' bonuses will be reduced.

わが国は生産物に富んでいる。Our country abounds in products.


したがって生産費を削る必要がある。Therefore, it is necessary to reduce the cost.
キャベツは生産過剰で値をくずした。The price of cabbage fell because of overproduction.








早く帰った方がいい、暑いから。サバは、生き腐れとも言われるくらい足が早い。It's hot, so you'd better head back quickly. Mackerel goes off so fast that they coined 'fresh-looking rotten fish'.




彼は釣り針に生き餌をつけた。He put live bait on a hook.





タランチュラはそのいけにえを素早く捕まえた。The tarantula seized its victim very quickly.










ゴムをすると確かに性感が落ちるので、出来れば生でしたいです。The sensitivity certainly drops if I use a condom, so if possible I'd like to do it bareback.



きれい好きは敬神に次ぐ美徳。Cleanliness is next to godliness.
いかにも敬虔なるクリスチャンが送る、礼節重き言葉です。So characteristic of what a pious Christian would say, this courteous phrase.







警官隊はデモ隊と乱闘になった。The police brawled with the demonstrators.


２階で朝早い時間に警報器が鳴っているのが聞こえた。The alarm was heard ringing at an early hour on the second floor.









彼は驚異的な力で自動車を持ち上げた。He lifted the car with his phenomenal strength.









これ以上姉さんのすねかじりはやめたまえ！Don't live off your sister any more.












今日の日本は世界最強の経済大国の一つに考えられている。Japan is today considered to be one of the greatest economic powers of the world.

経済白書を読んでから、我が国の財政状態が正しくわかってきた。After having read the economic white paper, I am beginning to see the light on our financial standing.




我々は政府の経済政策を検討した。We studied the government's economic policy.












その文書を経営管理部に送って検討してもらって下さい。Please forward the document to the administrative office for review.

会社は経営難に陥っている。The company is in financial difficulties.

























牛にくびきをかけすきにつなぎなさい。Yoke the oxen to the plow.





彼女はそこでしかじかの人々を見たと言った。She said that she had seen such and such there.











彼は罪滅ぼしに難行苦行をしている。He is doing penance.








君はそれらの難問題に対処しなくてはならない。You have to cope with those difficult problems.












電車が近づくと、トンネルから一陣の熱風が吹きつけた。There was a gust of hot wind from the tunnel as the train approached.















この熱源は安心して使えるし、将来の予測もたてられるが、この分野での研究はさらに必要である。This source is dependable and predictable, but more research is still needed in this area.
















そんないい加減なことはわしの職人気質が許さない。My artisan pride cannot tolerate such sloppiness.





























強盗は彼女の頭をめった打ちにした。The robber bashed her head in.








月が雲の上に出た。The moon rose above the clouds.












































数字は天文学的なものだろう。The figure will be astronomical.



























よかったよ。欠席者はひとりもいなくて。Good. No absentees.
















ウェストハンプトン州住民によって、議会の構成員として選出されるのです。We're chosen by the people of Westhamptonshire County to be members of the council.



水の構造式は H-O-H である。The structural formula for water is H-O-H.






この講習会に参加をご希望のかたは、今すぐお電話ください。Please give us a call now if you want to participate in the workshop.



講演者は咳払いをした。The speaker cleared his throat.




購買部にとって重要な人材になられると思います。She will be an asset to the Purchasing Department.

この新聞は購読者が多い。This paper has a large circulation.

















異文化の生活に適応するのは一般に難しい。It is generally hard to adapt to living in a foreign culture.



異国情緒あふれる街並みが続く。The streets are filled with an air of exoticism.








彼は埋もれ木の生活を送った。He lived in obscurity.


私は損失の埋め合わせをしなければならなかった。I had to make up for the loss.



























彼は学者というよりもむしろ流行作家だ。He is not so much a scholar as a popular writer.
















水も空気も両方とも流動体である。Water and air are both fluids.
















彼は暗いところで何か捜し物をしていた。He was looking for something in the dark.
捜索隊は彼が崖の下で倒れているのを発見した。The search party found him lying at the foot of a cliff.












豆のかき揚げが好きです。I like pea pods in my stir fry.















留守中いい子でいるんですよ。Behave yourself during my absence.

好天気が長く続いている。We've had a long spell of fine weather.





私が失敗したとき、彼は「いい気味だ」と言った。When I failed, he said, "It serves you right."








レフトが好走して大飛球を捕った。The left fielder ran hard and caught the long fly.

好奇の視線と、若干の殺意のこもった視線・・・言うまでもなく居心地が悪いことこの上ない。Curious gazes, gazes carrying a bit of murderous intent...it goes without saying that I couldn't be more uncomfortable.
あなたは好き放題に酒を飲んではならない。You must not indulge in drinking.











あなたの劇に対する好意的な批評が次号に出ます。A favorable review of your play will appear in the next issue.
彼はついに好敵手に出会ったと思った。He thought he met his match at last.








日本の貿易依存度はＧＮＰ比としては必ずしもそう高くない。Japan's dependence on foreign trade is not necessarily very high as a percentage of GNP.
その貿易商は戦後に莫大な財産を築いた。The merchant accumulated tremendous fortune during the postwar era.
いわゆる貿易摩擦はいつの日か避けることができよう。So-called trade friction could be avoided some day.


彼は要人だから、そのように扱わねばならない。He is a VIP and we must treat him as such.













悪い人間が国家の要職に就いていますね。Bad people are at the helm of the nation.


彼は大臣の腰ぎんちゃくだ。He is just a minion of the minister.





















































刺激を受け続けると肌の保護作用により角質が肥厚して、ゴワゴワしたり硬くなって、毛穴が目立ってきます。If it continues to be stimulated the skin's protective function causes thickening and it becomes stiff and hard with pores that stand out.



彼はいわゆるたたき上げだ。He is what we call a self-made man.


























この絵は垢抜けしたかき方だ。The picture is done in a masterly style.








一酸化炭素とは炭素化合物の不完全燃焼で発生する有害物質です。Carbon monoxide is a poisonous substance formed by the incomplete combustion of carbon compounds.







以前尿にタンパクが出ました。Albumin was found in my urine before.























その家はひどい建てつけだった。The house was very badly built.








彼は立身出世のために大変な努力をした。He made great efforts to succeed in life.


我々はその問題を立体的に調査した。We investigated the matter from all angles.











彼は立志伝中の人物だ。He is a self-made man.

きっと立ち見よ。There'll be standing room only.

今はもう立ち見席しか残っておりませんけど。Well, at this point, it's standing room only.


政府は立法権を持っている。The government has the power of legislation.


私は病院へ行く途中、交通渋滞にあって立ち往生してしまった。I was held up on my way to the hospital in a traffic jam.フランス語の先生は生徒の質問に立ち往生した。The French teacher was stumped by her student's question.



立て板に水の如きプレゼンテーション、おそれ入りました。Your presentation was so smooth and fluent - what can I say?

悪運続きという目にあったので、私の財産は、たちどころに、ついえさってしまった。Having hit a streak of bad luck, my fortune had gone to pot in no time.





立ち退きの予告を受けた。We received an eviction notice.
人数が多いですから、今日は立食形式にしたんです。There are a lot of people so today we've gone for buffet style.
捜査を立ち消えにしてほしくない。I don't want the investigation to burn out.



立ちくらみがします。I get dizzy spells when I stand up.
バスはたいへん混んでいたので駅までずっと立ち通しだった。The bus was so crowded that I was kept standing all the way to the station.







バスに空席がなかったので、駅までずっと立ちづめだった。There being no vacant seats on the bus, I was kept standing all the way to the station.

あなたの話を立ち聞きするつもりはありませんでした。I didn't mean to eavesdrop on your talk.










































これは確か淡水魚だと思います。I believe this fish is a freshwater fish.













もっと安い廉価版はないのですか。Haven't you got a cheaper edition?











雨が岩場の窪んだところにいくつもの水溜まりを作っていた。Rain formed pools in the hollow spaces on the rocks.








彼は旅支度を整えていた。He was equipped for a trip.




「ガリバー旅行記」を読んだことがありますか。Have you ever read Gulliver's Travels?





















あの工場では古い食用油で石鹸をつくっている。They make used cooking oil into soap at that factory.




食虫植物は、昆虫を捕らえるための様々な種類の罠を備えている。Insect-eating plants are equipped with various kinds of traps to catch insects.










この近所には食品店はない。There are no food stores in the immediate area.


食料品商をやっている。I am in the grocery line.









あのさ恭平、この問題・・・食塩水のやつなんだけど・・・。You see, Kyohei, this question ... it's about saline solution but ...

食い意地のはった少年は料理を全部たいらげた。The greedy little child ate all the food.

食事療法にきちんと従うように。It's important to follow a strict diet.






「ねこまっしぐら」というのは、飼い猫がエサに向かってまいしんする様子を表している。The phrase "make a bee line for" expresses the look of how a bee heads straight for food with speed and energy.

インコやオウムと仲良く楽しく健やかに暮らすために、飼鳥の行動学やペットロスについて考える。In order to live happily and healthily with parakeets or parrots, you should understand the science of animal behavior for domesticated birds, and consider the emotional effect of eventually losing them.
































警察は彼女を留置場に送ると脅した。The police threatened to send her to jail.

このバーは学生のたまり場として知られている。This bar is a popular student hangout.









老女は御客をじろじろ見た。The old woman studied the visitor carefully.

老化現象の一種です。This is a condition caused by aging.




樫の老木が嵐にうめいている。An old oak is groaning in the storm.




























































半年前に右目の白内障の手術をしました。Six months ago I had an operation for the cataract in my right eye.




















波は白波が立っていた。The sea was white with foam.













彼女は白雪姫のように美しい。She is as beautiful as Snow White.















シロクマは北極地方に住んでいる。Polar bears live in the Arctic.

















ベルリンの壁が崩壊したのは１９８９年のことだった。It was in 1989 that the Berlin Wall was taken down.









貴殿宅の水道水は硬水過ぎます。軟水を使用しましょう。Your tap water is too hard. Get a water softener.

























彼は部下と馬を引き連れ雪山を越え暑い谷へといった。He led his men and horses over snowy mountains and down into hot valleys.
富士山の雪化粧がすばらしくきれいだね。A snow-clad Mt. Fuji is fabulously beautiful.





柳の枝に雪折れなし。Oaks may fall when reeds stand the storm.




















見渡す限り一面の雪景色だった。Everything was covered with snow as far as the eye could see.


昨日私たちは通りの雪かきをした。We cleared the street of snow yesterday.













































生け花は日本では伝統的な芸道である。Flower arrangement is a traditional art in Japan.


彼らは互いに盗み合いをする、だまし合うくらいは、なおさらのことだ。They rob, and furthermore cheat each other.

私の知る限りでは、これが手にはいる唯一の翻訳書だ。To the best of my knowledge, this is the only translation available.










２か月前にむち打ち症をやりました。I had a whiplash injury two months ago.




孤軍奮闘したけれど、衆寡敵せず、彼のビジネスプランは受け入れられなかったよ。He put up a brave and lone struggle, but up against such heavy odds he couldn't get his business plan accepted.
ニューヨークはただ規模の点で長いこと孤高を保ってきた。New York City has long been unusual because of its sheer size.





システィナ礼拝堂は、１４７３年にバティカン宮殿内に建立された壮大な礼拝堂です。The Sistine Chapel is a vast chapel built inside the Vatican Palace in 1473.

























先生は答案一枚一枚に短い短評を書いてやった。The teacher put a short comment on each paper.








羊毛は染め上がりがきれいです。Wool dyes nicely.










染物屋が黒くできないほど白い羊毛はない。There is no wool so white that a dyer can't make it black.
















スイスは風光明媚なことでよく知られている。Switzerland is famous for its scenic beauty.





風見は北をさしている。The weather vane points north.





今日は風邪気味だ。I have a touch of a cold today.



その少年にはどこか風変わりなところがあるように思われる。There seems to be something peculiar about the boy.

あなたの首は風前のともし火だ。Your job hangs by a thread.











セザンヌは風景画で有名だ。Cezanne is famous for his landscapes.













彼は仕事を終えると、炉辺で本を読み勉強したものだった。After he had finished his work, he would read and study by the fireside.




















当時の習慣ではあったが、彼は早婚だった。As was the custom in those days, he married young.






早飯の人は仕事が早い。Quick at meal, quick at work.







この冬は降雪量の記録を更新した。This winter the record for snowfall was broken.










標高がぐんと高くなると呼吸困難を感じる。In high altitudes, people find it hard to breathe.


そのショーは今夜の番組の大きな呼び物になる。The show will be a great feature of tonight's program.


花乃、嘘泣きはたまーにやるから効果あるんだぞ。Kano, pretending to cry has impact from being used sparingly!







ぼくは手が足の指に楽々とどくよ。I can easily touch my toes.


しかしこの期待は第二次世界大戦が始まったとき、単なる楽観主義の表明に過ぎなかったことが明らかとなった。That proved to be no more than an expression of optimism when World War II began.


















後で吠え面かくなよ！You'll be sorry!














私達は忙しくて猫の手も借りたいくらいだ。We are so busy we'd take any help we could get.






うちの庭は猫の額ほどの狭さなんですよ。We have just a tiny bit of garden.

トラの子は大きな子ネコのようだった。The tiger cub looked like a large kitten.






「キツネの嫁入りですね」「はぁ？」「今日は81パーセントの確率で晴れますが、ところによっては天気雨です」"It'll be a 'fox's wedding'." "Huh?" "There's an eighty-one percent chance of sun today with sun showers in a few places."




私たち、撃ち合いに耳をすましたわ。We listened to the shooting.




彼はそうそうたる学者に混じって落ち着かなかった。He felt ill at ease among prominent scholars.

ジェット機は離陸する時に轟音を立てた。The jet roared during takeoff.

































窮地から足掻き出る。He will wriggle out of the fix.














ネットワークの発達で、かつてないほど大量の文が世界中を駆け巡っています。With the development of networks a huge and unprecedented volume of messages flies around the world.







日本は経済の建て直しをはからなければならない。Japan has to reconstruct its economy.









私はあの人が将来偉くなると見取った。I discerned the potential of great things in him.




その作品でついに彼女の才能が現われ出た。Her true talent was finally revealed in that painting.
肩肘張って生きることはないよ。It's no use playing tough.


いったんはやりだしたら、リーバイスのジーンズは決してすたれなかった。Once they came in, Levi's never went out of fashion.



何事もやりすぎてはいけない。Don't carry anything to excess.






試験の日が私の姉の結婚式とかち合った。The date of the examination clashed with my sister's wedding.
二人の刀がガチッと切りあった。Their swords clashed.




物言えば唇寒し・馬鹿ほど言いたがる。He knows most who speaks least.



彼はその仕事で一山当てた。He made a big hit in that business.



彼はその件に一役かっているらしい。He seems to be involved in that matter.
あのカーディーラーはこの中古のトヨタが調子がいいなどと、まんまと一杯くわせやがった。That car dealer gave me a bum steer when he told me this used Toyota was in good condition.彼は、嘘の情報をあたえられて、一杯くわされた。He was duped by being fed false information.



残念ながら、サッカーの試合、一敗地に塗れてしまったよ。It's too bad but we got pummeled at the soccer match.




彼女はあなたのドレスを縫い上げるために夜遅くまで起きてたんだよ。She stayed up late to finish sewing your dress.



実際彼には嘘をでっち上げる癖がある。The truth is he has a habit of inventing lies.








船は波をけたてて進んだ。The boat plowed the waves.








若者は自分が追い求めているものがわかっていないようだ。Young men and women don't seem to know what they are seeking after.
警官がデモ隊を追いまくっている。The policemen are driving the demonstrators away.
彼は若い人のグループにその職から追い落とされた。He was edged out of office by a group of younger men.

これらのたび重なる失敗で彼の大望がくじけた。His ambition was blasted by these repeated failures.





君らは自らの責任において、自らの良心に照らし合わせ、決定を下さなくてはならない。You must make decisions about your responsibility in the light of your conscience.

魚は遠火でゆっくり、こんがり焼き上げます。The fish is baked slowly till browned over a not-too-close fire.
その火事で７世帯が焼け出された。Seven families were burned out by the fire.




春になれば花が甘く咲き匂う。When spring sets in, the flowers smell sweet.


公園の全ての桜の花は咲きそろっている。All the cherry trees in the park are in full bloom.

女の子達は彼のジョークを聞いたとたんに笑い出した。The girls burst into laughter when they heard his joke.
ジェーンは悲しみを笑い飛ばした。Jane laughed away the sorrow.
聴衆は足を踏みならしていらだちを示した。The audience showed their impatience by stamping of feet.





殺してやる！ぶっ殺して、踏み潰してやる！くそったれ！死ね！I'll kill you! Knock your block off and grind you underfoot! You shithead! Die!




メアリーは父の首に抱きついた。Mary threw her arms around her father's neck.

彼は彼女を抱きすくめた。He suddenly tightened his arm around her.
彼女はデザート用にクリームを泡立てた。She beat the cream for dessert.


その山くっきりと青空に浮き出ている。The mountain is standing out in sharp relief against the blue sky.
君は浮き足立っているね。You are wavering.
会社は元会計を相手取って訴訟を起こした。The company took action against its former accountant.







今年のモデルは全て売りきってしまいました。We have closed out this year's model.



ロバート・ハンセンが、旧ソ連に秘密情報を売りさばいた容疑で逮捕された。Robert Hansen was arrested on suspicion of having sold off secret information to the former Soviet Union.


あなたは世間知らずですね。You know nothing of the world.







それでは、みなさまも呼んでくるように言いつかってありますのでご同道くださいませ。In which case, I was also requested to invite all of you so if you would please accompany me...





口数が少なければ言い直しもたやすい。Least said, soonest mended.

彼はいい加減な返事で言い逃れた。He put me off with a vague answer.
彼ならそれくらいの事はいいかねない。He can say such things.


ゴチャゴチャ文句を言いなさんな。Don't make a fuss.


彼が何か言いかけたが先手を打ってやった。He started to say something, but I beat him to it.


ちょっときつく言い過ぎたかな、とずっと思っています。I've been thinking that I may have been too critical.

ちょっとした言いそこないが思いがけない結果をもたらすことが多い。A slip of tongue will often lead us to unexpected results.









彼とは学生時代から肝胆相照らす仲だよ。He and I have been inseparable friends since our student days.








彼女はオレンジからジュースを絞り出そうとした。She tried to express juice from the orange.




君に会い損ねて地団駄を踏んだよ。I was chagrined at missing you.
卒業して久しぶりに彼女に会ったが彼女は全く主婦になりきっていた。I met her a long time after graduation, and she had totally become a housewife.
息子に成り代わってお礼を申し上げます。I thank you on behalf of my son.

その料理はいつもこのように芸術的に盛りつけられる。The food is always arranged so artistically.





この古い建物は修理する値打ちがない。引き倒す方がよろしい。This old building isn't worth fixing up. It would be better to tear it down.










鯨が今世紀の終わりに死に絶える可能性は五分五分である。As likely as not, whales will be extinct by the end of this century.

その体の弱い少年はその厳しい競技でふるい落とされた。The weak boy was eliminated from the bitter contest.



私は彼女を待ちあぐんだ。I became weary of waiting for her.



あなたは一日中働いた後で疲れきっているにちがいない。You must be worn out after working all day.









まさかそのような窮地に立たされているとは露知らず。Good grief! I had no idea you had been placed in such a tight spot.





今日は昨日の寒さとはうって変わった陽気だ。It isn't anything like as cold as it was yesterday.
彼は相手を打ち負かした。He got the better of his opponent.
百合が雨のために打ち倒されてしまった。The lilies have been beaten down by the rain.




波が海岸に激しく打ち寄せていた。Waves were battering the shore.


私は虎を狙って発砲したが、撃ち損なった。I aimed at the tiger and fired, but missed him.










それは話が出来過ぎている。That sounds too good to be true.







この企画はもう一度想を練り直せ。You should rethink this program.









持ち物を置き忘れないように。Don't leave your things behind.




今、誰か係りの者を差し向けます。I'll send someone up to help you now.



その会社の株の仕手戦は、倒産の危機が差し迫っていることを隠す方便にすぎなかった。The big promotion of that company's stock was just a cover-up to hide their impending bankruptcy.
「ええ、そうね」とスーザンが言葉をさしはさむ。「私が電話したのは・・・」"Ah, that's true," Susan puts in, "I just wanted to call to ..."それで疑いをさしはさむ余地はなくなる。That leaves no room for doubt.






彼はジョンを閑職に祭り上げた。He kicked John upstairs.




あやは物事を極端にまで押し進める傾向がある。Aya tends to carry things to extremes.

男の子が縁石の方へカートをゆっくり押しやっている。A boy is taking his sweet time pushing the cart toward the curb.

怯んだのを相手に気取られてはいけない。You mustn't let the other person notice that you flinched.



その赤ちゃんは泣き疲れて寝入った。The baby cried itself to sleep.彼は早く床に就いたが午前２時近くまで寝入れなかった。He went to bed early but did not go to sleep until almost 2 in the morning.

首を寝違えました。I woke up with a crick in my neck.
彼は心ゆくまで歌った。He sang to his heart's content.











父の懐におられる一人子の神が、神を解き明かされたのである。But God the only begotten Son, who is at the Father's side, has made him known.
我々はあくまでも戦い抜く決心をした。We have made up our minds to fight it out.

彼は生命の起源にまで説き及んだ。He even referred to the origin of life.

彼に家業を継ぐようにときつけた。I persuaded him to take on the family business.

教師は生徒に善行をするように説き勧めた。The teacher exhorted his pupils to do well.




クリスマスを２、３週間後に控えていた頃、トムは右足を骨折し、病院へかつぎ込まれた。Tom broke his right leg and was taken to hospital a few weeks before Christmas.
彼は彼女と添い遂げられなかった。He was not able to marry her.


どんなに速く走っても、自分の運命から逃げ切ることはできない。Flee ever so fast, you cannot flee your fortune.

彼は私を見るとすぐ逃げ去った。He ran away as soon as he saw me.











彼は私達をこき使っている。He works us too hard.




かんかんになって息巻いている。He is fuming that they will be sorry for it some day.


それは息づまるような試合だった。It was a breathtakingly close game.

葉が色付き始めた。The leaves have begun to color.












私のアメリカのクラスはそんなに形式ばっていません。My American classes are more informal.

















君の自慢話はもう聞き飽きた。I'm tired of hearing your boastful tales.

口いっぱいにほおばっておしゃべりしていけません。Don't speak with your mouth full.


銀行は会社に１００万ドル貸し付けた。The bank loaned the company $1 million.









いつも自分以外の人の気持ちを思いやらなくてはならない。We must always consider the feelings of others.




「うちの愛妻がケチでさー」「のろけてる？愚痴ってる？」"My wonderful wife is so stingy that ..." "You boasting? Or complaining?"

はらわたの煮えくり返る思いをした。I was having thoughts that made my blood boil.

その日その日を生き抜くのがやっとだ。I'm just living from day to day.






その子は燃えさかる家から救助された。The child was rescued from a burning house.
彼は自ら野心の事業に織り出した。He fell a victim to his own ambition.











私たちは声を振り絞って助けを求めた。We shouted for help at the tops of our voices.彼は全力をふりしぼってつぶれた車からはい出した。He used all his strength to crawl out of the wrecked car.


骨と皮ばかりにやせ細る。Be reduced to skin and bones.



人垣をかき分けて出なくちゃね。You have to blast your way out.






彼の声はその叫びでかき消された。His voice was drowned by the yells.




その不幸な女性は涙にかきくれて身の上話をした。The unhappy woman, drowned in tears, told her story.
彼女は規則をかいくぐるのがうまい。She's good at getting around rules.




リンカーン大統領は、いわゆるたたき上げの人だった。President Lincoln was what we call a self-made man.


彼は椅子を叩き壊して薪にした。He broke up the chair for firewood.

警察は彼の生活に立ち入って調べ上げた。The police raked through his life.
彼は立ち上るように言われ、ゆっくりとそうした。He was told to stand up, and he did so slowly.



その少年は恐れおののき立ちつくした。The boy stood still in horror.






父は旅慣れしている。My father is used to travelling.




あなたの家を思う熱心が、わたしを食い尽くす。Zeal for your house will consume me.

あの野暮ったい服を幾らで買ったのかと聞いただけで、彼女は逆上して私にくってかかってきた。I only asked her what she paid for that dull-looking dress and she flew off the handle at me.









一時間前に雪が降り止みました。It stopped snowing an hour ago.


１週間も雨が降り続きました。It kept on raining for a week.

雪がしんしんと降り積もる・・・オレの体に。Snow falls silently and piles up ... on top of me.










あの日彼女に会おうとは思いもよらなかった。She was the last person I expected to meet that day.
この世に思い煩らうことはない。I don't have a care in the world.












自分の衰えを感じた事がありますか。Do you ever feel like you're running down?
今年は春の訪れが早かった。Spring has come early this year.

おって通知があるまで待て。Wait until further notice.



アメリカは小麦・オート麦・ライ麦や他の穀物を食べる。Americans eat lots of wheat, rye, and other grains.























彼女は魚をサラダ油で揚げた。She fried fish in salad oil.




黒魔法の話を聞きたいです。学院ではさわりしか聞いたことがないんですが興味があります。I'd like to hear about black magic. I was only told the highlights in the academy, and it interests me.
















私はカメラを質に入れた。I pawned my camera.









彼は心から彼女を迎えた。He greeted her with cordiality.


仕事を済ませて数分して、彼は寝についた。A few minutes after he finished his work, he went to bed.
我々の真の国籍は人類である。Our true nationality is mankind.








私は白い物が空を飛んでいるのを見て、その結果、天使の存在を信じるようになった。I saw something white flying in the sky, so that I came to believe in angels.


物を視覚的に覚える器官は視床下部の下にある。The sight memory organ is below the hypothalamus.
私たちは長年親しくしている。We've been close friends for many years.












貧乏は彼女の性に合わない。Poverty is alien to her nature.

そして第三が地球環境の保全であり、省エネルギー、省資源型の生活を送る仕組みが必要となる。The third is the preservation of environment. In this case, the conservation of energy and resources is needed.





ついに、インディアンの二人の酋長は和睦することに決めた。At long last, the two chiefs of the Indian tribes have decided to make peace.









「なあ、そこの姉さん」「え？」「ちょっと相談に乗ってくれないか？」"Say, you, the lady over there." "Eh?" "Could you give me a bit of advice?"












あの民宿なら、素泊まり５千円だよ。That inn is 5,000 yen a night, meals excluded.
自由は優れて根源的なものだから重要性は幾ら強調してもし過ぎない。Freedom is so fundamental that its importance cannot be overemphasized.



彼がうろたえてるすきにすかさず彼女は逃げた。She took advantage of his confusion to escape.
彼女は妻？あなたも隅に置けないわねえ。She's your wife? There's more to you than meets the eye.










警棒で空をなぐりつけ、よろめいて体勢をたてなおしたガードマンは、自分に向かって突進してくる金網づくりのクズカゴを見た。The guard's truncheon hit air. Off balance, he regained his posture to see a metal-mesh rubbish bin flying towards him.



食料の蓄えはその時まで持たないだろう。The food supplies will not hold out till then.













天網恢恢疎にして漏らさずの言葉通り、天罰覿面だ。They say fate will catch up with you. That was God's way of punishing him.




次に何をすればよいか彼は途方にくれた。He didn't know what to do next.


わたしはいつもより遅く床に就いた。I went to bed later than usual.




透明度はどれくらいですか。What's the visibility?
東名高速道路は東京と名古屋を結んでいる。The Tomei Expressway connects Tokyo with Nagoya.








追試を受けなくてはいけません。I have to take the test again.
お通じがよくなりますよ。It moves the bowels.


書類は内ポケットにしまっておけ。Keep the paper in the inside pocket.

点滴石を穿つ。Constant dripping wears away a stone.


あの２人はとてもうまが合います。Those two really hit it off.
その生みの国であるドイツでは、ホット・ドッグは「フランクフルター」と呼ばれていた。In its home country of Germany, the hot dog was called the frankfurter.
最高の運が向きますように祈っています。The best of luck to you.

彼女は美貌を売りにしています。She uses her looks.アイスクリーム売りが外の売店で客にアイスクリームを売っている。The ice cream vendor is waiting on customers at his outdoor stand.

メーカーの謳い文句を迂闊に信じてはいけない。You mustn't carelessly believe the maker's motto.
このテレビ、チカチカしてどうも映りがよくないな。The picture on this TV is no good. It keeps flickering.


彼はまんまとわなにかかった。He was fairly caught in the trap.
私どもには娘が２人います。We have two daughters.７月２２日付けのお手紙につきまして私共の最新の目録を同封します。With regard to your letter of July 22nd, I enclose our most recent catalogue.




長いわずらいで彼は借金をこさえた。His long sickness ran him into debt.



彼もついに野にくだった。He has at last retired from public office.





少し酔いが回ってしまったようですね。すみません、意味の分からないことを言って・・・。It seems I've got a little tipsy. Sorry to have talked rubbish...



野山は春の装いだ。Hills and fields cloaked in spring colors.





ろうそくの火は２、３回ゆらめいて消えた。The candle flickered a few times and then went out.














この土地は家を建てるのには最適である。This site is ideal for our house.

この替え芯は半年持つ。This refill lasts half a year.













旅人は立ち止まって私に道を聞いた。The traveler stopped to ask me the way.
私達は危険から身を守った。We protected ourselves against danger.









彼女は、甲斐性のない夫に愛想を尽かして離婚しました。Disgusted with her good-for-nothing husband, she divorced him.







ピラミッドの秘密は科学によって明るみに出された。The secret of the pyramid was brought to light by science.





彼は悪に染まった生活を送った。He led a life of vice.









その商売からはすっかり足を洗った。I washed my hands of the whole business.足を洗いなさい。Wash your feet.











僕たちの先生って本当に頭が固いよね。Our teacher is really stubborn, isn't she?
ここだけの話だが、彼はだいぶ頭が悪いと思うよ。Between ourselves, I think he is rather stupid.
あなたは、彼女があなたよりずっと若いということを頭に入れておくべきです。You must keep in mind that she's much younger than you.





とりあえず、あたりさわりのない話をしておいたよ。I steered clear of sensitive topics.




君は女性の扱い方がうまい。You have a way with women.
このような問題は扱いにくい。Such a problem is hard to deal with.


自分の直感が、いかに確かなものか自慢した手前、当てがはずれた時は首をやらなければならなくなった。Having boasted how sure his hunches were, he was forced to eat his hat when he guessed wrong.

繁華街を当てもなくウロウロした。We wandered aimlessly around the shopping district.あてもなくあちこちを歩き回った。I walked aimlessly about the street.
彼は跡形もなく姿を消してしまったんだ。He disappeared without a trace.







このバケツには穴が開いている。There's a hole in this bucket.
その議論は穴だらけだ。The argument is full of holes.

ねずみがかじって壁に穴をあけちゃったの。A rat chewed a hole in the wall.









無罪の男が誤って逮捕された。An innocent man was arrested by mistake.



私の父はとても頑固なので、自分の誤りを認めることができない。My father is too stubborn to admit his faults.




時には歩き疲れ。Sometimes I feel tired of walking.
あきらめずに歩き続ければ、進歩するでしょう。If you keep trying, you will make progress.



























彼は怒り狂っていた。He was beside himself with rage.



その勝利で私たちのチームは意気が上がった。Our team was in high spirits because of the victory.
トムはこのごろ意気盛んだ。Tom is riding high these days.
生きざまの立派な人は死にざまも立派である。They die well that live well.
よくも自分を欺いたなと、伯父に対して憤りを感じた。He felt resentment against his uncle for deceiving him.


寒い天気に息を吐くと、息が見える。When you breathe out in cold weather, you can see your breath.



幾夜も眠れない夜を過ごしたようです。It seems he spent many a night unable to sleep.
好きな花をいくらでも選びなさい。Choose any flowers you like.彼はいくらでもお金を出せる。He can come up with any amount of money.食料はまだいくらでもある。We still have a lot of food left.




その兵士は丸腰の兵士を撃つことを潔しとしなかった。The soldier disdained shooting an unarmed enemy.


顔色が悪いですね。医者を呼びましょうか。You look pale. Shall I call the doctor?






君の英語はすっかり板に付いた。You are now quite at home in English.




世界が一丸となって気候変動の問題に取り組む必要がある。The whole world needs to tackle the problem of climate change together.



突然に一陣の風が起こった。The gust of wind rose suddenly.

この小説は一読の価値がある。It is worthwhile to read this novel.

















彼に一矢を報いてやった。I took a swing at him.





もう薬を一服飲む時間ですよ。It's time you had a dose of your medicine.
もう一歩下がると、崖から落ちるよ。Another step, and you'll fall over the cliff.
われわれはときどき一歩退いて考えなければならない。We should sometimes pause to think.











彼は彼女を救うために命をかけた。He risked his life to save her.














最近、社員の入れ替わりが激しくないですか。The turnover at my company is really speeding up lately.


そのドレスは高すぎる、もう少し色をつけられないか。The dress is too expensive. Can't you sweeten the deal a little?


































そのテレビコマーシャルの受けがよい。The TV commercial is drawing well.






金は打ち延ばされ薄い板になった。The gold was beaten into thin plates.














うちの会社は頭でっかちだ。Our company is too top-heavy.うちの会社には空きがない。There is no opening in our firm.






腕をふるって料理をしましょう。I'll try my hand at cooking.










泥棒は警官の裏をかいて盗品を持って逃げた。The thief outwitted the police and got away with his loot.



海外旅行をすれば得るところがありますよ。You will benefit from a trip abroad.










えへへへ、私は運痴だから、ちょっと走ると、すぐに脇腹が痛くなっちゃうの。He-heh-heh, I'm terrible at sports so if I run a while my sides hurt right away.



























平野を横切って水路が枝分かれしている。The waterways branch out across the plain.












あの女の子はお金に縁がなく育ったが、結婚してからは浪費家になった。The girl had grown up without any money and when she married she became a spendthrift.












私たちは火の周りに円を描いて座った。We sat around the fire in a circle.私はコンパスで円を描いた。I drew a circle with compasses.
ああいう男とは縁を切れ。Break up with a guy like that.




私達は経験によって多くを学ぶ。We learn much by experience.イギリスは多くの植民地を設けた。Britain established many colonies.米は世界の多くの地域で作られています。Rice is grown in many parts of the world.













彼はなんて大食らいなんだろう。What a big eater he is!
山の上で大声を出せ。Shout it from the mountaintops.










同じことを何回繰り返すの。屋上屋を架すようなくどい説明は勘弁してよ。You're wasting your time with all this needless repetition, so spare us the long-winded explanation.





自分の気持ちを押し隠すことはないんだよ。You don't have to hide your feelings.


警官たちは群衆をおしとどめた。The police held the crowd back.

















踊り手はつま先立ってぐるぐると回った。The dancer spun on his toes.






今日の活動は、これでお開き。With this, today's activities come to a close.
















居酒屋で飲んで、カラオケか。俺達もワンパターンだな。We're doing the same old routine: going bar hopping and then to karaoke.
梅雨は六月の終わり頃に始まる。The rainy season sets in about the end of June.


この地方は新しい産業の恩恵を被ることになるだろう。The community will benefit from the new industry.




彼女の演技に心を奪われた。I was fascinated by her performance.























私は会社勤めです。普通のサラリーマンです。I'm a company man - an ordinary salaried office worker.




かんかんに怒った社員は、即刻会社を辞めた。The outraged employee resigned at once.















まもなく彼は快方に向かうだろう。It will not be long before he gets better.負傷者たちは快方に向かっている。The wounded are getting better.


その野球の試合は回を重ねるごとに面白くなった。The baseball game got more exciting with each inning.






１時間かそこらで帰ってきます。I'll be back in an hour or so.








世間知らずのその男は、恥ずかしさで顔を赤らめた。The naive man blushed with shame.
彼は、母がギョッとするだろうと思いながら、顔を上げて母を見つめた。He looked up at his mother, waiting for her to be shocked.
彼女は両手で顔をおおった。She buried her face in her hands.
彼女は顔をそむけて泣き始めた。She turned away and began to cry.







まっすぐにすわり、かいばおけをつつく動物のように皿の上にかがみこまない。He sits upright, not crouched over his plate like an animal at a feeding trough.










死によって人間の限りある人生は終わる。Death ends man's finite existence.









あの会社の社長は切り札を隠し持っています。The president of that company has an ace up her sleeve.

この点に関しては、私が英語学習を志した２０数年前とは隔世の感があります。On this point it is poles apart from when I set myself on learning English 20 years ago.
刑事はその男が有罪だという確たる証拠を握った。The detective found absolute proof of the man's guilt.
















彼は湖のところまで駆け下った。He ran down to the lake.




陰で他の人の悪口を言ってはならない。We must not speak ill of others behind their backs.

































君が私に電話をくれるなんてどうした風の吹き回しかね。What's the reason that made you call me?

君は僕に風邪をうつした。You've given me your cold.





その論争は完全に片が付いた。That dispute has been settled once and for all.























彼にかつを入れなければならない。We've got to shake him up.















もっとお金を貯めたかったのだけれど。I had hoped to save more money.

彼女は私にその金を調えてくれた。She fitted me out with the money.








劇場の壁にかかっている写真にそっくりでした。He looked just like his picture on the wall of the theater.







細かい所は省いて構わない。You may leave out the details.





前髪が、おでこにかからないように髪を上げることをおすすめします。I recommend putting up your hair so your fringe doesn't get on your forehead.




髪をとかさなくちゃ。I have to comb my hair.
















牧童たちは牛の群れを駆り集めた。The cowboys rounded up the herd of cattle.













河童の川流れ。The best swimmers are oftenest drowned.






間髪を入れず、迅速かつ的確な応対、畏れ入ります。Such an accurate, lightning-quick reply. What can I say?



自分の考えを伝えることは時にはたいへんむずかしい。It is sometimes very hard to put your idea across.
彼女は感極まって声もたえだえになった。Her voice broke with emotion.
















































































おまじないって言うのはね、女の子が好きな人と結ばれるように願をかけたりすることだよ。What you call a 'charm', you know, is what girls wish upon that they may get together with the person they love and such like.





水夫たちは海のもくずと消え去った。The sailors perished in the sea.















上司を侮辱するような危険をおかすな。Don't risk insulting your boss.


彼は帰国の途についている。He is homeward bound.













ぼくたちはいつも規則を守らなくてはいけない。We always have to obey the rules.
だから今は降参ね。他にもまだ調べてはみるけど・・・期待薄だと思う。Therefore I'm giving up for now. I'll still try to check out other possibilities but ... I think hopes are slim.





切手集めには興味を失った。I lost interest in collecting stamps.






彼はウイスキーを生で飲んだ。He took a drink of whiskey neat.



事実は小説よりも奇なり。Fact is stranger than fiction.






















今朝は気分が良いです。I'm feeling good this morning.

彼の忠告を肝に銘じて忘れるな。Bear his advice in mind.
彼はびっくりして肝を冷やした。It scared the daylights out of him.


九死に一生を得たことがありますか。Have you ever had a narrow escape?























アンタ本当に器用ねっ。主夫とか向いてるんじゃない？You're really handy, aren't you? Don't you think you'd make a good house-husband?




彼が新しく教授陣に加わった人です。He is a new addition to the teaching staff.

















何事でも極端に走るのはよくない。You must not go to extremes in anything.
局地的な大雨だったらしいけど、行かなくて正解だったよ。I'm glad we didn't go there because there were some localized heavy rain showers.














































他の文化では、ボールには土、穀物、細々とした植物が、またときには金属片さえもがいっぱいに詰め込まれていたのです。In other cultures, the balls were filled with earth, grain, bits and pieces of plants, and sometimes even pieces of metal.



































彼らは議論を戦わしていた。They were engaged in a heated argument.












実際はそんなことあるわけないが、釘を刺すにはちょうどよさそうだ。There's no way something like that would really happen, but it seemed just right to drive the point home.














日本にあるインドカレー屋のカレーって、やっぱり日本人の口に合わせて本場よりマイルドに作られてるよね。The curry they serve in Japan is milder than real Indian curry. They adapt it to Japanese tastes.
誰かが口笛を吹くのが聞こえた。I heard someone whistle.


彼はふいに私たちの話に口をはさんだ。He interrupted us abruptly.






































男の人が車に撥ねられて、運転手が車で走り去った。I saw the man knocked down and the driver driving away.

車酔いするほうだっけ？Don't you tend to get carsick?





















そのチームはすぐに計画を進めるだろう。The team will go ahead with the plan soon.
私は息子に計画を立てさせてみます。I'll get my son to make the plan.




彼らの費用の見積もりは大幅な計算違いだった。Their estimate of the cost was wide of the mark.









その警備員は一晩中勤務だった。The guard was on duty all night.


















医師の警告で禁酒の決意が固くなった。The doctor's warning stiffened my resolve to stop drinking.





えっと、じゃ、決を取りたいと思います。今の小川君の提案に賛成の人、手を上げてください。Er, well, I'd like to take a vote. Would people in favour of Mr Ogawa's proposition please raise their hands.





私たちは険しい山を登った。We climbed up the steep mountain.




只見町は福島県南会津地方にあり、急峻な山を隔てて新潟との県境に位置しています。Tadami is in Minamiaizu in Fukushima; cut off by steep mountains and located on the prefecture border with Niigata.












その橋は建築中です。The bridge is under construction.





































アメリカ人が貿易赤字を累積したのは、限度を超えたぜいたくをしたからですよ。Americans accumulated their trade deficits by living far beyond their means.
















そのうち、小さな村落の真上を高架線が行ったり来たりするようになりました。Pretty soon, there was an elevated train going back and forth just above the small village.





































都心では高層ビルが雨後のたけのこのように増えている。High rises are mushrooming in the heart of the city.


























































聴衆はどっと声をあげて笑った。The audience roared with laughter.不正に対して反対の声を上げろ。Cry out against injustice!
























どこへ行っても、親切で心の広い人々に出会いますよ。Wherever you go, you will meet people who are kind and generous.

その知らせに彼女はたいへん心を痛めた。The news caused her much pain.
彼女の親切な行為に私は強く心を動かされた。Her kind action strongly impressed me.

招かれた人は皆、彼女のもてなしに心を打たれた。All the guests were touched by her hospitality.
ほとんどすべての親が子供の教育に心を配る。Almost all parents see to the education of their children.







彼は公園のベンチに腰をかけた。He sat on the bench in the park.
彼はその仕事に腰を据えている。He has settled down to the job.



彼はブーツの泥をこすり落とした。He scraped the mud off his boots.


















すぐ人の言葉尻を捕らえて非難するよな。Quick to pounce on what people say and pick on them.
その光景は言葉に表せないほど素晴らしかった。The sight was splendid beyond words.





ジョンは誰にも断らずに、パイを数切れ勝手に取って食べた。John helped himself to several pieces of pie without asking.


慌てて事を運ぶとミスをしますよ。You make mistakes if you do things in a hurry.



銅像が粉々になった。The bronze statue was broken into pieces.

これは使いやすい小箱です。This is a handy little box.

神が愛する人には飼い犬から子豚が生まれる。Whom God loves, his bitch brings forth pigs.







その政治家はその込み入った問題に何とか対処した。The statesman barely coped with the intricate issue.







このような仕事で怖い顔をしたら、お客さんはいらっしゃらないでしょう。In this line of work, if you make a grim face the customers won't come.



ニンジンやカブは食用根菜です。Carrots and turnips are edible roots.




あまり根を詰めるのは体に良くないよ。If you push yourself too hard, you'll make yourself ill.
















しかし、イエスは、御自身を彼らにお任せにならなかった。But Jesus would not entrust himself to them.



御成功をお祝いします。I congratulate you on your success.







初詣、ご利益があるのはどこの神社？New Year shrine visit; which shrines are potent?

あなたは御両親の期待に応えるべきだ。You ought to live up to your parents' hopes.











どの先生も最善を尽くす。Every teacher does their best.
適切な話題の最たるものは天気です。Top among suitable topics is the weather.





































その殺人犯はまだ逮捕されていない。The murderer is still at large.
































川沿いにきれいな散歩道がある。There's a beautiful walk along the river.








財を成すため、彼は地位を利用した。He exploited his position to build up his fortune.




この本は我々英学生にとっては正に座右の書である。This book is a must for every student studying English.






























仕事にかかる前に考えをよくまとめなさい。Collect your thoughts before you begin your work.




仕事を辞めるつもりですか。Are you going to quit your job?




















食卓の上に身をかがめないで、姿勢を正しなさい。Don't bend over the table. Sit up straight.








汗が彼の顔からしたたり落ちてくる。Sweat is dripping from his face.
















記者団は大臣を質問攻めにした。The press besieged the minister with questions.

私は彼を師と仰いでいる。I look up to him as my teacher.

かわいそうにその少女は死にかかっていた。The poor girl was on the point of death.
その男は死にかけていた。The man was on the brink of death.







もしも、すでにお支払い済みでしたら、どうぞこのメールは無視してください。Should you have settled the account since this mail was written, please ignore our reminder.

急に芝居がかった態度をとるな。Don't take that dramatic attitude all of a sudden.






うちの課長は私が何かを頼むといつも渋い顔をするんだ。Our section chief always makes a face at me when I ask him for something.










締め切り日に関してはあなたの申し出には同意できません。I cannot agree to your proposal as regards the deadline.















私は家族の写真を撮った。I took a picture of my family.














































宇宙科学はまだその緒に就いたばかりである。Space science is still in its infancy.





























































我がチームは大勝利を収めて帰国した。Our team came home in triumph.



省エネルギーの全国運動が展開中だ。A national campaign for energy saving is underway.


職業別電話帳を調べて。Look through the yellow pages.
フレッドは１日中職探しをした。Fred spent all day looking for a job.
食事時に日本に特有なのは、人々が茶碗からご飯を食べることである。What is peculiar to Japan at mealtimes is that people eat rice out of little bowls.


私はフライトアテンダントの職につきたいです。I long for a job as a flight attendant.




































彼の報告の真偽のほどは疑わしい。I doubt the truth of his report.











すみません紳士靴売り場はどこでしょう。Excuse me, but where is the men's shoe department?











家主に家賃を払えば、食物を買う金がなくなる。進退きわまったというところだ。If we pay the rent to the landlady, we won't have any money for food; we are between the devil and the deep blue sea.










まさかの時の友こそ真の友。A friend in need is a friend indeed.


警察が追っていたのは替え玉で、その間に真犯人を逃してしまった。The police followed a red herring while they let the true criminal escape.
その少年は母親にとても心配をかけた。The boy caused his mother great anxiety.










私がここの生活に慣れるのに時間がかかりそうです。It seems like it will take me a while to get accustomed to life here.


彼は自分の研究に時間を惜しまなかった。He didn't spare time on his studies.
姉は身支度に時間をかけすぎる。My sister spends too much time dressing.

ちょっと時間をさいてくださいますか。Can you spare me a few minutes?











絶望した彼は自殺を図った。Despair drove him to attempt suicide.
























あの本を自分のためにとっておこう。I'll keep that book for myself.































苔は、倒れた丸太や岩の上の繊細な緑の柔毛だと私は心の中で思う。The moss is a delicate green fur on fallen logs and rocks, I say to myself.


静かに、授業中にしゃべってはいけません。Be quiet. Don't talk in class.

父は熟練した外科医です。My father is an expert surgeon.

















彼は柱に寄りかかって自由の女神像をじっと見つめた。He leaned against the pillar and gazed at the Statue of Liberty.私は自由の女神像を見たいです。I'd like to see the Statue of Liberty.











なるほど彼には学識があるが、常識に欠ける。It is true he is a learned man, but he lacks common sense.












自分よりも下品な相手は『下品』と思い、自分よりも上品な相手は『上品ぶっている』と思いますね。You think someone coarser than you is "crude", and someone higher class than you to be "putting on airs".





彼らは錠を下ろすのを忘れた。They forgot to lock the door.





クラスの女生徒の男生徒に対する割合は３対２だ。The proportion of girls to boys in our class is three to two.























この前の嵐で数軒の家屋が被害を受けた。Several houses were damaged in the last storm.


この数年間に彼は不朽の名詩を書いた。During these years he wrote immortal poems.

客人たちはその幸せな夫婦が末永く裕福な人生を送る事を祈った。The guests wished the happy couple a long and prosperous life.

早晩彼女は姿を現すだろう。Sooner or later, she will appear.




彼には少なからぬ経験がある。He has not a little experience.



君の計画が筋の通ったものであることは認めるけれど、それを実行するのはやはりとても難しいと思うよ。Admittedly your plan makes sense, but I still think it will be very hard to carry out.




すねにきずもつ者は他人の批評などしないほうがよい。People who live in glass houses shouldn't throw stones.

私はその町の隅から隅まで知っている。I know every inch of the town.


コロンブスがアメリカ大陸を発見したとき、バイソン（アメリカ野牛）は、広大な地域に棲んでいた。When Columbus discovered America, bison (American buffalo) inhabited a wide-ranging area.











彼は生活に困っている。He is in great want.










歌を歌って生計を立てている。He makes his living by singing.






















長い晴天続きでした。We had a long spell of fine weather.

この大学はかなり生徒数が少ない。There is a fairly small number of students at this university.




















彼女はせっせと編み物に精を出していた。She was busy with her knitting.









進んで責任を取るということは成熟の印である。Willingness to take responsibility is a sign of maturity.
我々は、日常生活の中に多くの義務や責任を担っている。In everyday life we have many obligations and responsibilities.
政治家達は責任を逃れようとしている。The politicians try to pass the buck.
彼は石油王として有名だ。He is famous as an oil king.




あのお年を召した人に席を譲ってあげてはどうですか。Why don't you give your seat to that old gentleman?















あんたは世話の焼けるひとだね。You're a troublesome person!

彼は古い伝統に背を向けた。He turned his back on the old tradition.

















この部屋は先生方に使われています。This room is used by teachers.







先着順に並んでください。Please line up in order of arrival.





前の会社では何でも屋に終始したので今度は専門職に就きたい。I wore several hats at my last office so I'd like to specialize this time.
私は今日自分の申込書を上司に提出するつもりだったが、彼に先を越されてしまった。I was going to hand in my application form to the boss today, but he beat me to the punch.






































このソーダはあれほど甘くない。This soda is less sweet than that.








































私は鳥が１羽空を飛ぶのを見た。I saw a bird fly across the sky.

一家そろって散歩に出かけている。The whole family is out for a walk.

















天才がその存命中に名をなすことはめったにないということは周知の事実である。It is a matter of common knowledge that a man of genius is seldom successful in his own lifetime.























太陽光の浴びすぎは、皮膚に有害だ。Too many sun's rays are harmful to your skin.



後方の敵は現状あくまで退路を断つだけの存在。The enemy behind us presently exists solely to cut off our retreat.



妙なる調べに目ざめると。I wake up to the sound of music.














そのことは確かな筋から聞いた。I heard it on good authority.


















部外者の立ち入りを禁ず。No outsiders are allowed to enter.
















単位を落としてしまうかもしれません。I might flunk the course.
学校生活は楽しい思い出のひとつになるだろう。My time in school will be one of my happiest memories.

たばこを吸ってもよろしいでしょうか。Do you mind if I smoke?
たばこをやめたらどうなの？Why don't you give up smoking?








誰彼かまわず良い顔ばかりしていると、そのうち八方美人としか思われなくなるよ。If you buddy up to everybody and anybody, pretty soon people will think you're just a people-pleaser.


















あなたがいつ来ても、大歓迎です。Whenever you come, you will be our guest.








幸い、火事は大事に至らぬ内に消し止められた。Fortunately, the fire was put out before it became too serious.






突然の地震でパーティーはだいなしになりました。A sudden earthquake made a mess of the party.


さて、頭の中に大ブリテンの地図を描いていただきたいと思います。Now, I would like you to imagine a map of Great Britain.


あの子はいつもだだをこねている。That child is always throwing tantrums.




あいつまた待ち合わせの時間に遅れてくるかもしれないから、集合は７時だって駄目を押しておいてよ。He's likely to be late so you'd better tell him again that the meeting time is seven to make double sure.






















キング牧師が献身的に力を尽くしたものすべてが水泡に帰したかのように思われた。Everything Rev. Martin Luther King had worked so hard for seemed lost.





























私は歴史の小さな事柄に注意を注いだ。I concentrated my attention on the little things of history.
相手の注意をそらすため、我々は本題とは関係のない話をもちだした。In order to distract the others, we brought up this irrelevant issue as a red herring.
彼は私の忠告に全く注意を払わなかった。He paid no attention to my advice.



誰の忠告に従うべきかわたしに教えて下さい。Tell me whose advice to follow.



彼は昼食時に家にいないでしょう。He won't be home at lunch time.








私は中二で学校を退学した。I dropped out of school when I was in the 7th grade.





























その植物は直射日光に当ててはいけない。Don't expose the plant to direct sunlight.








僕、ついてるね。Somebody up there loves me.

これらのティーカップは対になっている。These teacups make a pair.







何でもかんでもメモをしますがあとで使い物になりません。I note down absolutely everything, but they're no good to me afterwards.







彼の息子達のどちらとも彼の家業を継ぎたがらない。Neither of his sons wants to succeed to his family business.










日照り続きでその池は干上がった。The pond dried up in hot weather.


















あなたは私に罪をきせるというのか。Do you mean to charge me with the crime?



つめをかむ癖を止めなければいけない。You must get rid of the habit of biting your nails.



彼は強い心の持ち主だ。He has a strong mind.


釣り師は釣り糸を水中へ投げ入れた。The fisherman cast the fishing line into the water.




その島には定期便はない。There is no regular boat service to the island.


















私は手紙を出したことを覚えている。I remember mailing the letter.



敵側の人数は味方の３倍になった。The enemy had triple our numbers.



















もし手に余るようなことがあれば、私に助けを求めなさい。If you have any difficulty, ask me for help.
ジョンが品物をいちいち手に取って見た。John picked up the articles one by one and examined them.


私は自分の辞書をすぐ手の届くところに置いておきたい。I like to have my dictionary within easy reach.






あなたは膝に手を組んで静かに座っていさえすればよい。You have only to sit quietly with your hands folded in your lap.
そのわかい男が手を差し伸べたのでわたしはそれを握った。The young man put out his hand and I shook it.

そのプロジェクトの責任者であったジェイソンが、汚職に手を染めた理由で解任された。Jason, who was in charge of the project, was dismissed for corruption.

窓から手を出さないで。Don't stick your hand out of the window.あらゆる職業に手を出す者は何の熟練工にもなれない。Jack of all trades is master of none.だが、組み手で手を出さないのは優しさではない！！However not attacking your partner in sparring is not a kindness!

ジョンとメアリーはいつも手をつないで歩く。John and Mary always walk hand in hand.

会社はそのプロジェクトから手をひいた。The company withdrew from the project.母親は子供の手を引いている。The mother is leading her child by the hand.
１人の男が私に手を振っていた。A man stood waving his hand to me.
２つの派閥が手をむすんだ。The two factions gang up with each other.



彼は怠け者に対して点が辛い。He is very hard on lazy people.









神は天と地を創造した。God created the heaven and the earth.





彼は貴族の出である。He springs from a noble family.














誰から電話がかかってきても、電話番号をひかえておいて。Whoever calls, take their number.
昨日彼に電話をかけましたか。Did you call him up yesterday?
電話を引きたいのです。I want to have a telephone installed.


話は遠い昔に始まる。The story begins far in the past.



いろいろな味の糖菓を送ってくれた。He sent me sweets with different flavor.
１週間後に、その家は倒壊した。Down fell the house a week later.

































君の行動はまったく当をえていない。Your behavior is quite out of place.












徳川家の系図を列挙しなさい。Recite the names of the members of the Tokugawa clan.

どんな風も誰かの得になる。It's an ill wind that blows no good.







聞いたところでは、彼は生物を勉強するために渡米したそうだ。According to what I heard, he went over to America to study biology.














ライオンが獲物に一撃でとどめを刺した。The lion put an end to his prey with one stroke.





彼はいとこのところへ泊まりに行きました。He went to stay with his cousin.


































その森の動物達は絶滅した。The animals in the forest died off.



あなたの意見が道理に適っていれば彼らは譲歩するだろう。They will give way to you if your opinion is reasonable.








上級者が英語力（特に読解力）をつけたければ、語彙を増やすのが王道ですね。If the more advanced want to improve English ability (especially reading comprehension) increasing vocabulary is the way to go.













彼は親切で優しく、なおよいことに正直である。He is kind and gentle, and what is better still, honest.











彼女は一日中泣き通しだった。She did nothing but cry all day.
この絵を見ると必ず亡き母を思い出す。I cannot look at this picture without thinking of my dead mother.
彼女は国のために命をなげうった。She laid down her life for her country.







何がなんだか分からない。頭がパニックに陥って整理がつかない。I didn't know what was what. The inside of my head had gone to panic mode and I couldn't get things straight.







情にほだされて思わず涙を流した。I was moved to tears in spite of myself.













あの男鳴り物入りで入社したけど、実力のほど看板に偽りなしだったね。He came on board this company with a lot of fanfare and he turns out to have the skill and talent to live up to it.
今まで慣れ親しんできた生活習慣を捨てると言うのは、本当に大変なことだ。It's really hard to turn your back on your way of life.




彼はコンテストで名を挙げた。He distinguished himself in the contest.


この組織は幹部ばかりが名を連ね、果たして決断を下せるのか怪しいものだ。Since in this organization they're all managers, it's a wonder any decisions get made.









せきがひどかったので、苦い薬を飲んだ。I had a bad cough, so I took the bitter medicine.
若者は自分の苦い経験から学ばねばならない。Young people must profit from their bitter experiences.





























我々は流感の広がる速度を鈍らすことができるだろうか。Can we check the rapid spread of the 'flu?












私の参謀としてついたからには、危機感を持って任にあたって貰わねば困ります。If you're with me as a staff officer, then I need you to bring a sense of danger with you to your work.






実も結ぶが、挿し木でも根付くらしい？It bears fruit, but it seems it may even set root from cuttings?西洋の多くの習慣が日本に根付いてきた。Many western customs have taken root in Japan.



夫がカナダ人に熱を上げて、離婚を迫られています。My husband got the hots for a Canadian and is threatening me with divorce.




そろそろ寝る時間だぞ。It's time you went to bed.







イタリアでは、すべての村が年に一度のお祭りをする。In Italy, each village holds a festival once a year.


彼らは年齢順に座った。They sat according to age.

彼は妻に自分を午前７時に起こしてくれるように念を押した。He reminded his wife to wake him up at 7:00 a.m.











この野の花はいい匂いがする。These wild flowers give off a nice smell.

党首は今後の方針を一瀉千里に述べ立てた。The party leader rattled on at great length about future policies.


ジョンは近頃のみ過ぎだ。These days John drinks too much.































彼女にははげましの言葉をかけてあげたらどうですか。Why don't you see if you can't give her a pep talk?




サツにハジキを持っているのをみつかるなよ。Don't let the cops find a heater on you.



実はわたしの猫は恥ずかしがり屋なのです。The fact is that my cat is shy.





















話をさえぎらないでください。Please don't cut me off like that.
話をつけようじゃないか。Let's talk it out.






「双子のトラの子が離れ離れになって・・・」というストーリーでちょっとありふれたような感じでした。The "twin tiger cubs get separated ..." story felt a bit trite.






彼に花を持たせてやった。I let him get the credit.




母鳥が雛に虫を持ってきた。The mother bird brought worms for her young ones.








彼女はごみを払い落とすためにここに集まった。She shook the rug to get dust out of it.

旅行にかかった経費は払い戻しを請求できます。You can claim back your traveling expenses.






腹を空かした赤ちゃんはただ泣くばかりでした。The hungry baby did nothing but cry.
トムはその子供たちに腹を立てた。Tom got angry at the children.

私はのりで二枚の紙を貼り合わせた。I stuck two sheets of paper together with paste.

富んでいるものが神の国に入るよりは、らくだが針の穴を通る方がもっと易しい。It is easier for a camel to pass through the eye of a needle than for a rich man to enter the kingdom of God.
































この駐車券に判を押していただけますか。Can you validate this parking ticket?






















書斎の隣に控えの間がある。There is an anteroom adjoining the library.









ひげを生やしているせいなのか、一見怖そうなのに、実はやさしい人だ。Possibly because he's got a beard, he looks scary at first glance but he's really a kind man.









左耳から耳だれが出ます。I have a discharge from my left ear.











その光景は筆舌に尽くしがたいほど美しかった。The scenery was beautiful beyond description.










夏の終わりに、その店は人手に渡った。The store changed hands at the end of last summer.






その国は侵略者の手に落ちた。The country fell into the invader's hand.







彼はいつも私に対してひどい仕打ちをした。He always behaved badly to me.


そのようなことをするのは彼の品位を落とす。It is beneath him to do something like that.








旅行をする暇がない。I can't afford the time to travel.



上手い外交官は、人に秘密を漏らさせる手をいつも使う人である。A good diplomat is a person who practices the technique of letting someone else let the cat out of the bag.















私たちがその家に着いたとき、チンとチラが広々とした階段の一番上に座っていた。When we arrived at the house, Chin and Chilla were sitting at the top of a broad flight of stairs.










田島くん・・・。君はもう少し品のいい話はできないのか？Tajima ... can't you talk a little bit more genteelly?








うちの息子は病気がちだ。My son is subject to ill health.
彼女は重い病気にかかっている。She's suffering from a serious disease.

その男の子は心配して病気になった。The boy got sick from anxiety.







不意を討たれて私は何も言う事を思い付かなかった。Taken by surprise, I couldn't think of anything to say.







私は彼女に深い愛情を持っている。I have a deep affection for her.
政治は国民生活に深い関係がある。Politics has much to do with me.
私達はロンドンで深い霧を体験した。We had a heavy fog in London.


























彼は不治の病にかかってしまった。He contracted an incurable disease.



















































円安は物価高のもとになりますか。Does depreciation of the yen give rise to inflation?







































弟は部屋をちらかしっぱなしにしている。My brother leaves his room in a mess.




その学生に、学校へはきちんと通っているのかと聞いたら、返答に詰まってしまった。When I asked the college student if he regularly attended his school, he was at a loss for an answer.







旅行者の便宜をはかって高速道路沿いに多くの休憩場所がある。There are many rest stops along the freeway for the convenience of travelers.

















美しい包装紙に包んでもらえますか。Could you gift wrap it?



「私の事は放っておいてよ」と彼女は怒って言った。"Leave me alone," she said angrily.




















これに保険をかけたいのですが。I'd like to insure this, please.











メアリーは子供たちをほったらかしにしていることでジャックを非難した。Mary blamed Jack for leaving their children unattended.



私はこの国に骨を埋めるつもりです。I wish to be buried in this country.
君のためにできるだけ骨を折ろう。I will do all I can for you.彼は事故に遭って骨を折った。He met with an accident and broke some bones.


俺は慌てて探し物に本腰を入れ始めた。I hurriedly started searching in earnest.



私はほんの少しのところで飛行機に乗り遅れてしまった。I missed the airplane by a minute.
彼は、いわば、本の虫だ。He is, so to speak, a bookworm.


彼はコインの歴史に関する本を出した。He published the book about the history of coins.







彼は、帽子を取った。He took off his hat.








決して暴力に訴えてはいけない。You must never resort to violence.




















曲がりなりにも彼は原稿を書き終えた。Though imperfectly, he finished writing his manuscript.


薪割りを好む人が多いのは理解できる。I know why there are so many people who love chopping wood.
記念式典は閉会の辞で幕を閉じた。The commemorative ceremony ended with the closing address.










さらに十年がまたたく間に過ぎて行った。Another ten years went by quickly.

あなたのボーイフレンドは待ちくたびれて、今帰ったところよ。Your boyfriend got tired of waiting for you and left just now.











丸くおさまってよかった。I am glad that the matter was settled amicably.

正解をまるで囲みなさい。Please circle the right answer.




回りくどい言い方はしないでくれ。Don't say it in a roundabout way.


あなたの話は全然満足のいかない物だ。Your speech was far from satisfactory.





いざ踊るとなるとマイケルジャクソンの右にでるものはいない。When it comes to dancing, nobody can move like Michael Jackson.

私は彼を右寄りだと言ったが、それは彼は頭が古いという意味で言ったのだ。When I called him right-wing, I mean that his thinking is old-fashioned.







その少年は、私達が彼の顔に水をかけると、意識を取り戻した。The boy came around when we threw water on his face.


私はそのバケツに水を満たした。I filled the bucket with water.


パーティーにいた人は誰もかも彼女の優雅さに魅せられた。Everybody at the party was charmed with her grace.










そのような境遇であったにもかかわらず、彼は自分一人で道を切り開いた。Although he was in such circumstances, he made his way by himself.








ジョーは自分の身のあかしを立てた。Joe purged himself of the suspicion.
実のある勉強をしたので、彼の平均点は驚くほど上がりました。After doing quality work, his average has gone up marvellously.

















その女優は自分の役に身を入れていなかったようだ。The actress seems to have walked through her part.



身を捨ててこそ浮かぶ瀬もあれ。Risk all and gain all.
私は弁護士として身を立てるつもりです。I will establish myself as a lawyer.


君の研究は実を結ぶだろう。Your study will bear fruit.





民主党は選挙運動のために民放テレビの放送枠を買いました。The Democrats bought space on commercial television for the campaign.



























このような名詞句を隠れ疑問文（concealed　question）といいます。This type of noun phrase is called a "concealed question".



ホームズさんはパイプの大の愛用者で、名探偵です。Holmes is a great pipe man as well as a great detective.








彼は私たちにかなり多くの迷惑をかけた。He gave us quite a lot of trouble.




彼は宝石の鑑定には目がきく。He has a sharp eye for jewels.


めがねをかけたあの紳士はどなたですか。Who is that gentleman in spectacles?

この明かりで字を読もうとすれば目が悪くなるよ。You'll strain your eyes trying to read in this light.











そのどぎつい光は目に悪い。The glaring light is hurtful to the eyes.



目の届く限り、麦畑以外は何も見えなかった。As far as the eye could reach, nothing was to be seen but a field of wheat.
彼は私の目をくらまそうとしたが無駄であった。He tried in vain to pull the wool over my eyes.
ぼんやりとして目をそらすな、自分のしていることに注意を払いなさい。Don't look away idly; just pay attention to what you're doing.
若葉がいっせいに芽を出した。Trees put forth young shoots all at once.



こんなにご面倒をかけてすみません。I'm sorry to trouble you so much.
















アンディは、猛練習したにちがいない。Andy must have practiced very hard.


今回の模試も志望校合格範囲内か。Was your mock exam score this time within the pass range for your preferred school?





自爆テロ犯はベナジル・ブット元首相に向けて発砲したが、弾はそれた。The suicide bomber fired towards former Prime Minister Benazir Bhutto, but missed.

元はと言えば、健ちゃんが鈍ちんなのがいけないんだからね〜っ。When you think about it, it's all Kenny's fault for being so obtuse.



そのおてんば娘は危険をものともせずにその木に登った。The reckless girl climbed the tree regardless of danger.















鉄は熱してから急に冷却して焼きを入れる。Iron is tempered by heating and sudden cooling.


彼の意見はいつも役に立たない。His opinion is always of no use.










彼女は子供たちに優しい声で話しかけた。She spoke to the children in a gentle voice.





思ったより安くあがった。It wasn't as expensive as I expected.
できるだけ安くあげようとした。I tried to make it as cheap as possible.
一番よいものを買うのが結局は安くつく。It's always cheaper in the end to buy the best.

安月給でどうにか暮らしています。I'm managing scraping along on a small salary.






























勇気を奮い起こして本当のことを言いなさい。Summon up your courage and tell the truth.





















彼女は誘惑に負けてその宝石を買ってしまった。She gave way to the temptation to buy the jewel.












彼は水も滴るいい男だ。He is tremendously handsome.我々は皆彼女がなぜあんな感じのいい男を捨てたのか不思議に思った。We all wondered why she had dumped such a nice man.
良い天気になりました。It turned out to be a lovely day.

























要は母親たちが忙し過ぎるということだ。The point is that the mothers are too busy.






とにかくメシ・・・といきたいところだが、その前に用を足すことにした。Anyhow, lunch ... is where I wanted to go but I decided to go to the toilet first.







車が１台横から割り込んできた。A car cut in.横から口を差しはさむな。Don't cut in with your remarks.











この本は1,000ページ以上の大冊ですが、来週の今日までには読み終わります。Though this is a bulky book of more than a thousand pages, I'll have read it all by this time next week.
急いで書かれたので、彼の手紙は読みづらかった。Having been written in haste, his letter was hard to read.







買い物の割に遅かったな。どこぞでよろしくやっていたのか？You're pretty late to have just gone shopping. Have you been making out someplace?



こんな会議をしてもらちがあかないんじゃないかな。Having this meeting isn't going to do the trick, is it?




















私たちは暴力に頼るのではなく、理性に訴えるべきだ。We should appeal to reason instead of resorting to violence.


























私はその両方とも大好きだ。I like both of them very much.


































そのことについてもう少し例をあげてくれませんか。Could you please give me some more examples of that?

















私は彼と連絡を取る事ができない。I cannot get in touch with him.























「広辞苑にこう書いてあります」と言って、広辞苑を唯一の拠り所に論陣を張る人がよくいる。There are a lot of people who say, "it says this in Koujien," and use that dictionary as the only grounds for their argument.





その若夫婦はいっしょに仲良くやっている。The young couple is getting along together.







その混ぜ物をかき混ぜて、泡立ったら脇に置いておきましょう。Stir the mixture until it foams, then set it aside.
私はわきによって彼らを通した。I stood aside to let them pass.




どんなスポーツでも彼にはわけなく出来る。Sports always come naturally to him.




子どもを甘やかして育てたことで、ステラは後に自ら災いを招くことになってしまった。In spoiling her child, Stella made a rod for her own back in the years that were to follow.







彼らはいっせいにわめき声をあげた。They cried out together.








我々はこの湾内で漁獲する特権を与えられた。We were granted the privilege of fishing in this bay.




由紀子ちゃんは、明日以降、火木金のシフトで出勤してくれればいいから。It's OK if Yukiko can do the Tuesday, Thursday and Friday shifts from tomorrow.










































脆弱で力の無い、ただの人間なんだ。She's weak, powerless. A mere human.

















子供部屋は散らかっている。The children's room is in bad order.








彼に何をアドバイスしても糠に釘。もう止めた止めた。Forget it. There's no sense giving him advice.
警察官が私にとまれの合図を出した。The policeman gave me a sign stop.


























































ディスプレイはモニタともいい、コンピュータなどの機器から出力される静止画または動画の映像信号を表示する機器である。A display, aka monitor, is an appliance that displays video signal of still images and moving pictures produced by a computer or similar device.








ジムは期末試験のため猛勉強をしている。Jim is studying hard for his finals.

証書貸付は連帯保証人が必要でした。Loan on deeds needed the joint surety.




すっぴんは恥ずかしいのであまり見ないで下さい。It's embarrassing to be seen without make-up so please don't stare.




考えただけで虫唾が走るわ。That makes me disgusted just to think of it.


１月３日から３泊、お願いします。For three nights starting January 3rd, please.
海をバックに記念写真撮ろうよ。Let's get a picture of us with the sea in the background.
電話をかけたいのですが、いまこまかいお金がありません。I want to make a phone call, but I don't have any change now.
彼は１０年級に在学中だ。He is in the tenth grade.彼はまだヘビー級の選手権を保持している。He still holds the heavyweight title.


顧客に対する勧誘の電話が、テレマーケティング部の主要業務である。Cold calls are the primary function of the telemarketing department.

芝居小屋跡地に学校が建てられたのが1905年4月でした。It was April 1905 when a school was built on the site of the theatre.

























見わたす限りラベンダーが咲いていた。There was lavender as far as the eye could see.


例えばジャック・パインの松かさは、高温により影響を受けるまでは自ら開いて種子を放出しない。The cones of the jack pine, for example, do not readily open to release their seeds until they have been subjected to great heat.























あなたはどの学科が好きですか。What subject do you like best?
何の目的で彼はここに来たのか。For what purpose did he come here?その噂はなんの根拠もなかった。The rumor was without foundation.彼女、美しいのなんのって・・・！She is beautiful and how!





























多くのアジア人の共通言語は英語だ。The common language of many Asians is English.











言語能力は後天的ではなく、生まれつきです。Linguistic competence is inborn, not acquired.






































インターネットは情報量が多いので、使えない情報も沢山あります。The Internet has a lot of information and thus also a lot of useless information.






先行詞がthis,that,these,thoseの場合はwhichを用いるのが普通です。When the antecedent is this, that, these or those it is usual to use 'which'.

























































彼が英語を話すのを聞けば、母語話者だと思うだろう。To hear him speak English, you would take him for a native speaker.












ボスには玉石混交のグループとは言われたけれど、俺は玉かな、それとも石なのかな。The boss said this group is a real mixed bag. I wonder if he places me with the wheat or the chaff.王手をかけられたほうは、玉を逃げるなどの方法で王手を防がねばなりません。The checked player must find a way for the king to escape and block the check.








その少年は盗みをしかねない。The boy is capable of robbery.












「ソフトウェア開発」は「モノ作り」ではない。"Software development" isn't "manufacture".

正直どいつもこいつもパッとしない。Frankly, no one really stands out.

















ほらっ！ジャガイモが全部転がり出てるわよ。ほんっと、あんたってトロいわねぇ・・・。Just look! The potatoes are all rolling out! You're a real dullard aren't you?

















たまにまる一日ぼけっとしていても別に悪い事じゃない。It's no crime to just idle the whole day once in a while.
吹雪はまる一週間荒れ狂った。The snowstorm raged for a full week.


この券はまる一年有効です。This ticket is available for a whole year.



＆という記号は、ａｎｄを指す。The sign '&' stands for 'and'.
この教室には三十人の学生しか入れない。This classroom can accommodate only thirty students.







彼は利害関係者の１人と考えられている。He is considered to be one of the interested parties.















アポを取ろうとしたが、彼は時間をくれなかった。I asked for an appointment, but he wouldn't spare me the time.




















エステサロンで優雅な至福のひとときを過ごしてみませんか？How about spending an elegant and blissful time at a beauty salon?




















ＯＫが出たので、思わずグラスランナーのシーフ・バードというベタなキャラを作っちゃいましたよ。I got the OK so I unthinkingly created the clichéd 'grass runner thief/bard' character.

























モールの中に、比較的大きなシネコンがある。There's a comparatively large cinema complex inside the mall.



シャネルのコレクションを趣味にしている人を「シャネラー」という。They call women who make a hobby out of collecting Chanel goods "Chanellers".


























先輩は、嫌味なくらいの完璧超人でしたからね。だから逆にその「癖」は先輩の可愛げ・・・というか、チャームポイントでしたよ。You were always a perfect 'superhuman' to an infuriating extent, and so that 'habit' was actually one of your cute, or rather charming, attributes.






ドタキャンくらったの。来週に持ち越しだって。Got cancelled at the last minute. 'Deferred to next week'.

ドルペッグの意味は、強い国につけということです。The meaning of the 'dollar peg' is "stick with the strong countries."















































学食に飽きたときは、ベルファで買うもよし、ファミレスで食べるもよし。When you're fed up with the school cafe you can buy something at Bellfa or eat at a family restaurant.



















緊急なら、ポケベルで呼び出せますけど・・・。If it's urgent I can page her ...?

















彼は先生の講義をメモった。He made notes of the teacher's lecture.

俺は小学校の時見たんだ、人魚。でもそんなメルヘンチックな話じゃなくて。I saw one, a mermaid, when I was a primary schooler. But it wasn't that sort of fairy-tale atmosphere of a story.












































むしろロン毛のほうが禿げやすいって聞いたぞ。In fact, I've heard that long hair is more likely to go bald!






彼は意見書を提出した。He submitted his written opinion.
商業用旅客機の場合は、企業が自社製品を売ろうと競争する。In the case of commercial airplanes, private companies compete to sell their product.
彼女はアイススケートをしていてしりもちをついた。While skating at the ice rink she fell on her rear.






































お父さんとキャッチボールをしたよ。I played catch with my father.


















赤と黒のマジックかサインペン持ってない？I need red and black markers or felt-tip pens. Do you have any?




















ほかの者はみな、スモークサーモンでしたから。The rest of us all had the smoked salmon.








































少年は恥ずかしがってテレビカメラを嫌がった。The little boy shied away from the TV camera.









だいたいあんた、この寒いのにノースリーブで何いってんのよ。Anyway what are you on about? Going around sleeveless in this cold.













私は彼にそのビッグニュースを知らせた。I told him the big news.
塔の写真はピンぼけだった。The picture of the tower was out of focus.












住宅計画はぽしゃってしまった。The housing project has fallen flat.































彼はサラダとロールパンと一緒に鶏肉を食べた。He ate chicken, along with salad and rolls.

どちらかと言えば、彼はロマンチストだ。He, if anything, is the romantic type.





体育祭も終わったし、次は中間テストかあ。Well sports day is over too, next the midterms ...








日本の米市場は輸入に対し閉ざされている。Japan's rice market is closed to imports.
私は和英辞書が必要だ。I need a Japanese-English dictionary.





普通の看護師は、ちんこに溲瓶も添えるし手術の時は剃毛もするぞ。A typical nurse will do such things as helping with a urinal bottle, and shaving in preparation for surgery!
















































無実だという彼の主張は誰も信じないだろう。Nobody will believe his assertion that he is innocent.「くれるの？」「いやあ、ホテルで呑むんですよ」「だろうね」"Can I have it?" "Sorry, I drank it at the hotel!" "Thought so."

ちなみに私は英語がからきし駄目なんです。By the way, my English is absolutely hopeless.








彼はどさくさにまぎれて行方をくらました。He disappeared, taking advantage of the confusion.
あいつでかいことばかり言ってるけど、そのうちぼろを出すよ。He's always talking like a big shot, but it won't be long before all his faults are exposed.
彼もついに馬脚を露わした。He has finally shown his true colors.















私はいつの日かアフリカに行きたい。I want to go to Africa someday.





彼らは愛校心が足りない。They don't love their school enough.




ホームズさんはパイプの大の愛用者で、名探偵です。Holmes is a great pipe man as well as a great detective.





















闇夜に鉄砲じゃあるまいし、そんな場当たり的なやり方でうまくいくとは思えないよ。That's just a shot in the dark. How do you think you'll succeed by just acting on the spur of the moment like that?






























目の細かい織りのカーペットが一般的には価値が高い。Tightly-knit carpets are generally more valuable.


タッソーろう人形館へ行く道を教えて頂けませんか。Could you tell me the way to Madame Tussaud's?





日本国民は戦争を放棄している。The Japanese people have renounced war.
この詩は誰が書いたのですか。By whom was this poem written?






ご注文を下記の通り確認します。We will confirm your order as follows.


私は彼の秘密をばらすと脅しをかけた。I threatened to reveal his secret.

彼女の夫はひどい麻薬依存症だ。Her husband is heavily dependent on drugs.

当店では品物の委託販売をしています。We sell goods on commission.




会社の慰安旅行で箱根に行きます。My company is sending us all to Hakone this year.

ここ何年か異常気象がつづいている。We've been having strange weather the past few years.








改良された医療技術は、宇宙開発計画の副産物として派生したものの一つである。Improved medical technology has been one of the spin-offs of the space program.
医療費・年金給付の抑制策の決め手はないといえよう。We can say that there's not a clear winner in terms of a policy to curtail medical expenses and benefits.

浴室付きの一人部屋ですね。Single with bath, right?
私たちはだれでも、他者との一体感を切望する何かをうちに秘めている。Each of us has something in us that longs for a sense of oneness with others.




あの歌手は、一般大衆に人気がある。That singer is very popular with people in general.






改良された医療技術は、宇宙開発計画の副産物として派生したものの一つである。Improved medical technology has been one of the spin-offs of the space program.



ここで迷わず迂回路を取ることにする。Here I decide, without hesitating, to take the alternative route.






営業活動を強化するために再編成する必要があります。We need to reorganize it in order to strengthen our business activities.



あの劇場では外国映画祭を１ヶ月おきに実地している。That theater has a foreign film festival every other month.
その映画俳優にはファンが多い。That movie star has many fans.


日本では英語教育が盛んである。English education flourishes in Japan.






難民キャンプの衛生状態はひどいものだった。Sanitary conditions in the refugee camps were terrible.




私はその演奏家にフルートで何かもの悲しい曲を吹いて欲しいとおもった。I wanted the musician to play some sad tune on his flute.
その演奏者はドラムを強くたたいた。The musician beat his drums loudly.

男の子が縁石の方へカートをゆっくり押しやっている。A boy is taking his sweet time pushing the cart toward the curb.

この現象は、いずれの汚染物質とも無関係であると結論づけることができる。We can conclude that this phenomenon is not related to either pollutant.




ビックリしたよ、温泉宿がお魚の養殖場になってたんだね。What a surprise! The onsen lodge had turned into a fish breeding farm.












それは毒性のある化学物質が含まれていた。It contained harmful chemicals.




人種差別問題に関する重要な点は、それぞれのグループの価値体系を明らかにすることである。The significant point as regards the segregation problem is to clarify the value system of each group.


夏期休暇が楽しみだな。I look forward to the summer vacation.
私たちの家計費は先月赤字になった。Our household expense got into the red last month.





子供には幸福な家庭環境が必要だ。Children need a happy home environment.
我が家の裏には家庭菜園があります。There is a kitchen garden behind my house.
テレビは家庭生活をダメにしている。Television is ruining family life.




その科学者は、最新の科学知識に照らしてその奇妙な現象を説明した。The scientist explained the strange phenomena in the light of recent scientific knowledge.


火災報知器が鳴った。The fire alarm sounded.


山火事の後なので今年の花火大会は自主的に中止を決定しました。After the bushfires, we have independently decided to call off this year's fireworks display.








この航空会社は貨物輸送だけを取り扱っています。This aircraft company deals with freight only.

たいていの発展途上国は過剰人口で苦しんでいる。Most developing countries are suffering from overpopulation.


過当競争という言葉は日本の産業界でよく使われるが、その正確な定義はない。The word 'excessive competition' is frequently used in Japanese industry, but there is not a precise definition of the practice.
料金は会計係へ払って下さい。Pay your dues to the treasurer.
ポールは会計報告の裏面操作について知識があったので、その隠れた才能を発揮して必要なものを全て手に入れていた。Paul's knowledge of creative bookkeeping has been the secret of his ability to get all the staffing he needs.
この問題の解決法を思いつかない。I can't think of any solution to this problem.












貴社の製品の海外市場の割合はどのくらいですか。What is the percentage of overseas markets for your products?

















たくさんの人が新しい橋の開通式に参列した。Quite a few people attended the opening ceremony of the new bridge.






彼は来年外国旅行をする。He will travel abroad next year.
それは拡大解釈だね。That's stretching the point.
米国の核廃棄物、テロ攻撃の標的になりうる。America's radioactive waste may be targeted in terrorist attacks.

その店は革製品を使っていた。The shop carried leather goods.






その少年は学業成績がいい。The boy has a good school record.


その村は学校給食を廃止しようとした。The village tried to do away with school meals.

彼は学校生活を楽しんでいる。He is enjoying his school life.








あなたの学生生活も間もなく終わりになる。Your college years will soon come to an end.
成績を確認したい学生は誰でも学生部長と面会の予約を取ることが出来ます。Any student who wishes to review his grades may make an appointment with the college dean.
学生は学年末にレポートを提出することになっている。Students are supposed to turn in reports at the end of the school year.

何か割引切符はありますか。Are there any discount tickets for me?

仕事と遊びは両方とも健康に必要である。後者は我々に休息を与え、前者は活動力を与えてくれる。Work and play are both necessary to health; this gives us rest, and that gives us energy.










たくさんのヨーロッパの人達は環境問題に目覚めています。Many European people are aware of environmental problems.








政府観光局から資料をもらおう。Let's get some brochures from the travel bureau.
彼らは観光旅行に出かけた。They set out on a sightseeing tour.






関係書類の山をしらべていくうちに、彼らは真実をつかんだ。They found out truth while examining a pile of relevant documents.






彼は企画課で働いている。He works in the planning section.





奇術師の手品に驚いた。The magician's tricks surprised us.


既成概念を壊そう！Let's break stereotypes!








先週には、大きな力を持つ経団連が、規制解除のため中央政府を訪問した。Last week the powerful Keidanren called on Tokyo to lift the ban.
その実現もユーザーニーズを考えたアプリケーションの開発と行政による規制緩和が大きなポイントとなると考えられる。The success of newly-developed applications and government-forced deregulation may hold the key to achieving this economic implementation.
規則違反をする者は罰せられるだろう。Those who violate the rules will be punished.

彼は記憶喪失で悩んでいる。He is suffering from loss of memory.











喫煙所はありますか？Is there a place I can smoke?
その客室乗務員はお世辞が上手い。The cabin attendant is good at flattery.
その脚本家は自分が子供の頃の鮮やかな思い出を大事にしている。The playwright cherishes the vivid memories of his childhood.


この紙は吸収力が高い。This paper has very good absorption.



その急行列車は次第に速度を上げた。The express train picked up speed gradually.









マグロの漁獲量は減ってきている。The tuna catch is declining.














キャロルはよく恐怖映画を見る。Carol often watches horror movies.



教育制度は過渡期にある。The educational system is in transition.









勤務時間中に煙草を吸ってはいけない。Don't smoke while you are on duty.

禁煙席はありますか。Do you have a non-smoking section?











初期のジェット旅客機の墜落事故は、機体とエンジンの金属疲労のような、技術的欠陥が原因で起こることが多かった。Crashes in the early days of commercial jets tended to be caused by technical faults, such as metal fatigue in the airframe or engines.

あなたの銀行口座を教えていただけますか。May we know your bank account?









その訓練生は仕事の重荷にほとんど耐えられなかった。The trainee could hardly bear the burden of the task.





契約者と話すまでは最終的な予算を計算することはできません。I cannot calculate the final cost until I talk with our contractors.




稽古場の真ん中の踊り子は今にも踊り始めようとしています。The dancer in the middle of the room is ready to begin.



彼らはその計画の経済面について話し合った。They discussed the economics of the project.
日本は厳しい経済問題に直面している。Japan is confronted with severe economic problems.



警備隊が皇居に２４時間配置されている。Guards are stationed 'round the clock at the Imperial Palace in Tokyo.



これを私たちは芸術品と呼ぶ。This we can call a work of art.




彼らの結婚費用は相当なものだった。Their expenses for the wedding were considerable.


子供たちに適した健康管理をしてやるだけの医者がいない。There are not enough doctors to give proper care to the children.
彼の健康状態はよくない。He is in a poor state of health.


建設工事の第一段階は終わった。The first phase of construction has been completed.

彼は長年建築業を営んできた。He has carried on his business as a builder for many years.








あなたは研究課題を二つ落とした、すぐにやり直さなければならない。You missed two assignments; you will have to make them up at once.





彼らは研究費に十分金をとっておいた。They earmarked enough money for research work.

報告者は自分の研究方法について詳しく述べた。The reporter elaborated on the method of his investigation.




我々は今や原子力時代にある。We are in the era of atomic energy.
その原子力船はかなりの費用をかけて建造された。The nuclear ship was built at a considerable expense.





母さんは、女だてらに男だらけの中、建設会社で現場監督をしている。Mum, a mere woman surrounded by men, works in a construction company as a site foreman.

これは現代英語の慣用法についての本です。This is a book on modern English usage.
私は現代劇を見にその劇場へ行った。I went to the theater to see a modern drama.



開拓者達は現地人たちから毛皮を物々交換で手に入れた。The colonists bartered with the natives for fur.









個体発生は系統発生を繰り返す。Ontogeny recapitulates phylogeny.








企業の顧問弁護士団は合併手続きを完了するために、２４時間通しで働いています。Company attorneys are working around the clock to complete the merger.

この市にはたくさんの娯楽施設がある。There are many amusements in the city.

たばこをお吸いの方は後部座席にお坐り下さい。Smokers are asked to occupy the rear seats.



全ての大都会は交通問題を抱えている。All big cities have traffic problems.











自動車は工業製品であり、食料は農作物である。Cars are factory products, while foods are farm products.
多くの人々が工業都市で働いている。Many people work in industrial towns.



彼の心は幸福感に満たされた。His mind was filled with happy thoughts.
ゲイツ会長、広告収入をユーザーに還元する意向表明。Bill Gates announces intent to return advertising revenue to the users.



所得税は控除額を上回るいかなる所得にもかかる。An income tax is levied on any income that exceeds deductions.
校長室で会議が開かれた。The meeting was held at the principal's office.









行商人は大きな包みを背負って運んだ。The peddler carried a big bundle on his back.


結果次第では、両社に対して2月以来の行政指導が行われる。Depending on the results both companies may be put under administrative guidance from February.



この前の講和会議で完全に失敗してから、彼は斬新な権謀術策で十分に武装すべきことを学んだ。His utter failure at the last peace conference has taught him to arm himself to the teeth with new tricks and tactics.






ビバリーヒルズのような高級住宅地で見栄を張り合うのは高くつく。Keeping up with the Joneses is expensive in rich town like Beverly Hills.





努力すれば、先生は彼に合格点を与えるつもりです。The teacher will give him a passing grade if he shows effort.
その学生たちの大学合格率はどのくらいですか。What percentage of the students are admitted to colleges?







国際情勢は重大になりつつある。The international situation is becoming grave.


彼には国際政治に関する情報の蓄積がある。He has fund of information about world politics.


国際紛争解決のために武力に訴えてはならない。We should not resort to arms to settle international disputes.


喫煙は今では、全ての国内線のフライトで禁止されている。Smoking is now banned on all domestic plane flights.

ストライキは国民経済に影響を与えた。The strike affected the nation's economy.





会社は合併によってすべてがかわり、混乱状態が続いています。The office has been topsy-turvy since the merger upset everything.



薄い砂糖水を作った。I prepared a weak solution of sugar and water.





１月の輸出は１００億ドルと、同月としては最高記録になった。Exports in January totalled $10 billion, a record for the month.

最終案は原案と大きく異なる。The final plan differs greatly from the original one.

使節団は空路を利用して国境までの最短距離を行った。The mission took the direct route by air to the boundary.

その町は日本の最北端に位置する。The town is located in the extreme north of Japan.








作業員が岩を爆破しているのを見た。We saw laborers blasting rocks.






今月は殺人事件が２件あった。There were two murders this month.

彼女の父は雑貨店をしている。Her father has a general store.

サミット参加国は、自由貿易問題を協議事項のトップにおいています。The summit nations put free trade at the top of the agenda.





産業廃棄物が地球を汚染する。Industrial wastes pollute the earth.



ここでの賃金はこなした仕事量に応じて支払われる。Here the wages are paid in proportion to the amount of work done.



私は始発駅で電車に乗る。I board the train at the terminal.
彼らの学校と私たちの学校は姉妹校です。Their school and ours are sister schools.
彼は小説の姉妹編を執筆中だ。He is now writing a sister volume to his novel.
ＧＮＰは一定期間に国によって生産されたすべての商品とサービスの市場価値の総額として計算される。GNP is measured as the total market value of all the goods and service produced by a nation during a specified period.
「市長選挙をどう思いますか」「わかりません」"What do you think of the election for mayor?" "I don't know."
市内観光ツアーはありますか。Are there any tours of the city?




志望校に合格するように努力した。I worked hard to get into my preferred school.


その新米のセールスマンが、トップの販売実績をあげたやり方は指導員の目を見はらせた。The manner in which the new salesman made top sales level was an eye-opener to his supervisor.
彼は指導力のある人だ。He has a capacity for leadership.

２１２ー８３６ー１７２５に指名通話をかけたいんだけど。I want to make a person-to person call to 212-836-1725.
健康であれば、当然医療費を抑制できる。健康であれば働くことが出来、年金支給開始年齢の引き上げと支給額の抑制に役立つ。Working, healthy people contribute to the reduction of medical expenses, the rise of the eligible age for benefits, and the curtailment of their costs.














視力検査をします。I'll check your vision.





教授は試験問題が注意深くチェックされたことを確かめた。The professor made sure the test was checked carefully.








アントレの書物の事実誤認の数は、アベルが示唆した数よりも相当に少ない。The number of errors of fact in Arendt's book are considerably fewer than Abel implies.
新しい事務用品を購入しなければならない、我々の持っているものは古くさい。We ought to buy some new office equipment: the stuff we've got is out of date.
ある気前の良い男性が、およそ二十億円を慈善団体に寄付した。A generous man contributed some two billion yen to charity.
先生は学生に時事問題に興味を持たせようとした。The teacher tried to interest the students in current events.



凍死しそうな乞食が手当てのため、病院に運び込まれた。だが、その乞食は治療費を清算するような金は一文も、もってなかった。A freezing beggar was brought into the hospital for treatment. However, he didn't have even one cent with which to settle the bill.


君はもっと自己主張を試みたほうがよい。You'd better try to assert yourself more.







私達は自然環境を重視すべきだ。We should place much value on the environment.



その少年は北海道から九州まで自転車旅行をしたそうです。I hear he traveled by bicycle from Hokkaido to Kyushu.


そちらはセントラル自動車学校ではないんですか。Isn't this Central Driving School?
その男の人は自動車事故で死んだ。The man died in a car accident.



自由市場システムが危機にひんしている。The free market system is endangered.
いくらか自由時間があるときは、いつもクラシック音楽を聴くのが楽しみだ。I always enjoy listening to classical music when I have some free time.


執行部の交替で彼は失職した。Owing to a change of administrations, he lost his job.
彼女のお金への執着心には際限がない。Her love of money is without bounds.
大統領自ら我々を執務室に案内してくれた。The president conducted us personally to his office.


学校を出るとすぐ、彼は実業界へ入った。On leaving school, he went into business.




それはまだ実験段階にあります。It is still in the testing stage.



まぁ実際問題、そんな噂が渦巻く中でよく部活が存続してると思うぜ。Well, for the practical problem, in the midst of those rumours flying around I'm surprised they've been able to keep that club running.










スポーツは社会生活の中で重要な役割を果たす。Sports play an important role in social life.


その社会奉仕家はスチブンソン家に関する情報をあくまでも追跡するよう求められた。The social worker was asked to follow up the information about the Stevenson family.













日本では助産師国家試験の受験資格は女性のみとなっている。In Japan, only women are entitled to take the national obstetrics exam.






ちょっとお待ちください、受領書をお書きします。Please wait a moment while I write out your receipt.





彼はちょっとした切手収集家だ。He is something of a stamp collector.
公立学校では宗教教育が禁止されている。Religious education is prohibited at a public school.

就職活動の時期は早まる傾向にあり、マスコミ各社の面接がその先頭にたっている。The job-seeking season is starting earlier each year and it's the mass media that are causing that trend by moving up their job interview schedule.





トムが自動車修理工場で働いているなんて想像できますか。Can you envisage Tom working in a garage?

おおみそかには電車は終夜運転します。On New Year's Eve, the trains will run all night.



集合場所はどこですか？Where will we meet?

集団生活を営む動物は全て、情報を交換したり秩序ある集団を維持するため何らかの伝達方法を持っている。All social animals use some methods of communication to exchange information and to maintain an orderly community.


集中力がありません。I have difficulty concentrating.

警官は、彼らの住所氏名を詰問した。The policeman demanded their names and addresses.


政府は住宅問題を解決するために何の手段も取らなかった。The government made no move to solve the housing problem.




重要事項は彼らが決定するのではない。They don't decide important matters.
彼は会社の重要人物だ。He is a big man in the company.









そろそろ出発時間だ。It's about time to start.






準備運動からバタ足の練習まで滞りなく進み、レッスンは至って順調。Proceeding from warm-up exercises to leg kick practice without a hitch, the lesson went completely smoothly.






助手席に置いていた鞄がない！The bag I left on the passenger seat is missing!
ボブのお父さんは女子校で教えています。Bob's father teaches at a girls' school.
エリオットさんの姪は女子大学に通っている。Mr Eliot's niece goes to a women's college.
校門のところで、女子寮の方から登校してきた美留と鉢合わせした。I bumped into Miru at the school gates, just as she was arriving from the girls' dormitory.


私の女友達は今頃もうここに来ているはずだ。My girl friend ought to be here by this time.





少数意見も尊重しなければならない。You must also respect the opinions of the minority.
当社はアンケート入力、アンケート集計のお手伝いをする少数精鋭のベンチャーです。Our company is a small but elect venture business that assists in entry and totalling of questionnaires.
フォークを使う人々は、歴史的にみて、ずっと少数派であった。Fork-users have historically been in the minority.
私がこの退院承諾書にサインしたら、もう帰ってもいいですか。After I sign these release papers, you'll be on your way.







照会先を３件ください。Please give us three references.


自ら志願した人たちが障害者の為に寄付を集めた。Volunteers collected donations for the benefit of the handicapped.



物価は上昇傾向にある。Prices are on the upward trend.













ジムは職権乱用で免職になった。Jim got dismissed for his misconduct in office.


インドは地域色豊かな食文化があります。India has a cuisine rich in regional flavour.


それはまさに侵略行為だ。It is nothing less than an invasion.


あの人心臓発作を起こすわよ。He's going to have a heart attack.








その新刊書のことは雑誌の広告で知った。I learned about the new book by the advertisement in the magazine.


新進作家の登場でその老作家は影の薄い存在となった。With the appearance of a promising new writer, the aging novelist fell from prominence.
この新人歌手は本当にすばらしい。This new singer is really great.



「Kanji list」という機能に新聞記事頻度を追加しました。I added newspaper article frequency data to the 'Kanji list' function.
新聞配達の少年はどんな天気でも新聞を配達する。The newspaper boy delivers papers in any kind of weather.


シップ・アイランドのあたりは、相も変わらぬ森林地帯で、相変わらず住む人とてなかった。The Ship Island region was as woody and tenantless as ever.




関税申告書が必要になります。A customs declaration is required.



彼の話にはいくらか真実味がある。His story has some color of truth in it.







親切心は礼儀の本質である。Kindness is the essence of politeness.





この国ではイデオロギーや宗教が人としての人格形成に役立つ例があまりに少ない。In this country there are only few examples that ideology and religion are helpful in character building for people.
私は昨年あの人気作家にあったことを決して忘れないだろう。I will never forget meeting that popular writer last year.


新しい出生政策は人口増加ゼロをめざしています。The new birth policy is aimed at achieving zero population growth.
人口爆発は重大な問題である。The population explosion is a serious problem.



履歴書はこの封筒に入れて人事部に提出して下さい。Enclose your resume in this envelope and submit it to the personnel department.






この橋の上流に水車小屋がある。There is a water mill above the bridge.


水道料金を滞納すると給水を停止されるということをお聞きしましたが本当ですか？I've heard that if you default on the water rates your water supply will be suspended, is that true?
機は急角度で上昇し、それから海岸を離れるにつれて水平飛行に移った。The plane rose sharply before leveling off as it left the coast.


睡眠時間が十分あればいいのに。I wish I had enough time to sleep.





彼女は世界一周旅行をしている。She is traveling around the world.
水泳で世界記録に挑戦するつもりだ。I am going to establish a new world record for swimming.
世界経済はすぐには回復できないだろう。The world economy will not recover anytime soon.
この雑誌のおかげで私は世界情勢に遅れずにいられる。This magazine helps me to keep up with what's happening in the world.
「スーパーソニック」は世界制覇すると思うかい。Do you think the Supersonics will go all the way to the world championships?
彼は世界選手権で４連覇を成し遂げた。He won four successive world championships.
我々は世界平和を熱望している。We are anxious for world peace.



クモがクモの巣を張るところを見たことがありますか。Have you ever seen a spider spinning its web?


我々は背の高いポプラ並木を歩いた。We walked along an avenue of tall poplars.



実は、大きな声で言えませんが、ここ最近このビーチで若い女性が盗撮されたうわさがあるんです。Actually, and I need to keep this quiet, but recently here there's a rumour that young women on this beach are having photos taken in secret of them.

売春宿から出てきたところを友人に見られてばつが悪かった。As I left the brothel, I was embarrassed to be seen by my friends.

「性差別」という言葉が今、流行っている。Terms like "sexism" are now in vogue.




フォード氏はいわゆる自力の成功者だ。Mr Ford is what is called a self-made man.



成長期の子供が１時間もじっとしていることは不可能だ。It is impossible for a growing child to keep still for an hour.








彼女は政府機関に勤めているのでしょう？She's with a government bureau, isn't she?





その整髪料は強いにおいを発した。The hair-dressing liquid gave off a strong smell.


星印は重要な参照文献を示す。The asterisks mark important references.






アメリカの平均的な生活空間は日本の二倍広い。The average American living space is twice as large as the living space in Japan.




このトラックは青森から東京まで生鮮食料品を運ぶ。This truck transports fresh food from Aomori to Tokyo.
北極熊は極地の氷原に住んでいるのだが、生息地を失い、絶滅するであろう。The polar bear, which lives on the polar ice-cap, will lose its home and die out.








頑張れさえすれば体力や知力がなくても何でもできるという一種の精神主義もある。There is also one type of idealism that says even without strength or intelligence you can do anything if you can merely persist.
デネットの著作の中心的主張は、端的に言えば、内的精神状態の存在を否定するということである。The main point of Dennett's book, in short, is to deny the existence of inner mental states.



ある伝説によればそれはある聖職者の名からきている。According to one legend, it gets its name from a priest.





製造年月日はふたに表示されています。The date of manufacture is shown on the lid.



西欧諸国はこの問題に対する日本の姿勢を激しく非難しています。Western countries are jumping on Japan for its stance on the issue.

西側諸国はドルを強めるために、協議し合わなければなりません。Western nations have to put their heads together to strengthen the dollar.




多くの運動選手は青年時代に盛りを極める。Most athletes are at their best during their early manhood.

税関申告書に記入してください。Please fill out the Customs Declaration Form.





















政治における宣伝活動の重要性を認識する。Appreciate the importance of propaganda in politics.




彼の専門的知識の欠陥が昇進を妨げた。His lack of technical knowledge precluded him from promotion.

専用線で見ると、すごく早いんだけど。It's really fast with a dedicated line.




土砂降りが長く続くと、洗濯屋さんは、仕事がはかどらず苦労する。When it continues raining cats and dogs for a long while, laundrymen have a hard time doing their work.



誰しも自分に潜在能力があることを信じてもよい。Everyone believes in their own potential.



選挙民は増税にがまんできません。The voters won't put up for a tax hike.
しかし、ノーベル賞選考委員会は、貧困は世界平和を脅かすものであり、マザー・テレサは貧困と戦っているのだと述べた。But the Nobel Committee said that poverty was a threat to world peace, and Mother Teresa worked against poverty.


その選手は選手権大会で連続して３度優勝した。The player won the championship three times in a row.






組合員たちは反旗をひるがえした。The union members were up in arms.












彼女は死んだ夫の財産の相続権をもっている。She has a claim on her deceased husband's estate.






一戸建より共同住宅に住む世帯の増加率の方が高い。The rate of increase in households is higher for apartment houses than for individual houses.




それからまもなく幾人かの測量士と自称する変な服装をした人たちが集落にやってきて、祖母の小屋の前を測っていきました。Pretty soon along came to the village some strangely dressed people who called themselves surveyors; and they surveyed a line in front of my grandmother's little house.
彼は速度違反で有罪となった。He was charged with speeding.












やっと妥協点を見出した。Finally, we found a point of compromise.

体育祭が延期になると発表された。It was announced that the athletic meet would be put off.





山田君との対戦成績は５分５分だ。The win-loss record between Yamada and me is fifty-fifty.



政治犯たちは待遇改善を求めてハンストをしています。Political prisoners are on a hunger strike for better conditions.


滞在期間はどのくらいですか。How long are you going to stay?
私の叔父はベトナム戦争の退役軍人だ。My uncle is a veteran of the Vietnam War.

今日の若者の中には、大学教育を受けながら少しも賢くないものがいる。Some young people today are none the wiser for their university education.
この記事はある大学教授によって書かれました。This article was written by a college professor.
ここは大型車の通行は禁止されている。There is no passage for big vehicles here.



























男子学生たちはひっきりなしにふざけあっていた。The schoolboys teased each other endlessly.





しかし、多くの点で珍しい鳥である。というのは彼は、かつて科学者達が人間にしかないと思っていた種の知的能力を示しているのである。But in many ways, the bird called Alex is unusual, for it has shown the kind of mental abilities that scientists once thought only humans had.

地球人の一人として、私は文化の壁を越える方法を知っています。As a citizen of the world, I know ways of overcoming cultural barriers.

江戸時代に、各藩の奨励策によって、全国各地に地場産業が興った。Local industry flourished throughout the land in the Edo period thanks to the promotional efforts by each clan.














今週は中間試験が３つ。This week I had three midterms.



彼はロンドンの中心部に住んでいた。He lived in the center of London.







「―osity」は語尾が「―ous」の形容詞から作られる抽象名詞の語尾。'-osity' is an abstract noun word ending created from the ending of an '-ous' adjective.
壁の注意書を見なさい。Look at the notice on the wall.
別紙の注文書の通り注文いたします。I have enclosed your order form.




貯蔵庫のドアのそばの刈り残した伸びた芝はどうなんだい。What about the tall grass you left over by the cellar door?





調査団は墜落の原因について綿密な調査を行っています。Investigators are running a probe into what caused the crash.

この調理法は中国独特のものだ。This style of cooking is peculiar to China.


どうすれば長距離電話がかけられますか。How can I make a long-distance call?




この飛行機は東京までの直行便です。This plane flies nonstop to Tokyo.


ほかに何か追加注文がありますか。Do you have anything else to order?




通勤列車に乗ると、鞄が棚にきちんと並べられていることが見える。When you get into a commuter train, you see the briefcases neatly stacked on the racks.



電話はひとつの通信手段である。The telephone is a means of communication.





運転者は停止信号を無視した。The driver ignored the stoplight.



半年に１回定期検診に来てください。You must come every six months for a check-up.
定期試験を受けるほかに、長いエッセーも提出しなければならない。In addition to taking the regular tests, we have to hand in a long essay.








宿題の提出期限は来週の月曜日です。The homework is due next Monday.





その鉄道事故で死者三名、重軽傷者１０名が出た。Three persons were killed and ten were severely or slightly injured in the railway accident.
鉄道線路と道路は平行している。The railroad is parallel to the road.

会議場内で自社の製品の展示場を設けたいとお考えでしたら、早急にご連絡下さい。Please let me know immediately if you would like to set up an area of the conference room for your products.

展示品に手を触れないでください。Please don't touch the exhibits.











主婦が余暇を十分持てるようになったのも電化製品の賜物である。Thanks to electric goods, housewives have plenty of free time.
電気系統に欠点があります。There is a fault in the electrical system.

彼女は電気料金の請求書を今日受け取った。She received the electricity bill today.




父は電力会社に勤めています。My father works for a power company.









登山道に空き缶やゴミを捨てるのはやめてほしい。I wish people would stop throwing away empty cans and other trash along the path up the mountain.






大部分の人々は都市部に住んでいる。Most people live in urban areas.









２回以降、相手チームの投手も立ち直って、投手戦となった。After the second innings, the opposing pitcher recovered too, and it turned into a pitching duel.


彼らは投票数を合計した。They summed up the voting.

搭乗者達は押し分けながら後ろの出口に進んだ。The people on board thrust their way toward the rear exit.




国連は紛争の当事国に対し、対話による平和的解決を求めた。The United Nations called on the parties to the conflict to seek a peaceful resolution through dialogue.



ロサンゼルス到着時刻は何時ですか。What's the arrival time in Los Angeles?
討論者はエネルギー問題について論じた。The panelists discussed energy problems.













それは道徳上の問題だ。It is a moral question.

我々は彼の新道路建設計画に反対した。We opposed his plan to build a new road.

私たちはパリ周辺地方の道路地図を調べた。We studied the road map of the country around Paris.





彼は得票数で彼女と激しく競いあっている。He is seriously competing with her in the polling score.
私は特殊効果がすばらしいので「ターミネーター」が好きです。I like the Terminator films because the special effects are fantastic.









特別扱いしますが、なるべく短めにしてくださいね。I'll make this a special case, but try to keep it short.




特別席を二枚買いたい。I want to buy two S-grade seats.


子供のいる家族はみな特別料金です。All families with children get special rates.

ビルは先週結婚して、ついに独身生活にピリオドを打った。Bill was single until he tied the knot last week.

その本の主題はアメリカ独立戦争である。The principal theme of the book is the American Revolution.

グレースは階上の内線電話のところへ行く。Grace goes to phone extension upstairs.
交換手です。内線番号をどうぞ。Operator. Which extension would you like?


















その日本庭園には石が見事に配置されている。Rocks are beautifully arranged in the Japanese-style garden.














最近熱帯植物の貴重な化石が見つかった。A unique fossil of a tropical plant was found recently.

新しい年金制度が実施されることになっている日より前に、彼は退職する。He retires before the new pension scheme is due to come into effect.



















彼は彼らと家具の売買契約をした。He made a bargain with them about the furniture.













彼はその発明者とされている。He is accredited with the invention.







あたしも賛成だから、三対一ね。というわけで、ハルカの反対意見は却下されました。I'm also in favour so it's three to one. And thus your objection is overruled.
厳密に言うと、彼の意見は反対派のそれとはいくらか異なる。Strictly speaking, his view differs somewhat from that of his opponents.


刑事が犯行現場に到着した。A detective arrived upon the scene of the crime.
２、３ヶ月後、彼らは北極にある繁殖地へと戻っていきます。A few months later they return to their breeding grounds in the Arctic.



彼が販売部の責任者だ。He's in charge of the sales department.



常に疲労感があります。I always have a tired feeling.




秘密兵器の知識がある人は、我が身を危険な立場に置いている。A man who has knowledge of a secret weapon has placed himself behind the eight ball.
被害額は相当なものになるだろう。The damage will cost us a lot of money.
このビルは非常階段を備えている。The building is equipped with emergency stairs.






美術商はその絵を本物だと保証した。The art dealer guaranteed the picture genuine.
その美術展は今京都で開かれています。The art exhibition is now being held in Kyoto.





顧みられぬ無数の漂流者が家を求めてる。A hundred billion castaways are looking for a home.
彼女の歌声はとても表現力豊かだ。She has an extremely expressive singing voice.









今朝こんなの無かったけど・・・誰かが不法投棄したみたい。This wasn't here this morning ... looks like somebody's been fly tipping.

この不良少女をどうしよう。What shall we do with this delinquent girl?



夫の会社人間からの脱却を始め、新しい夫婦関係を再構築し、ゆとりある家庭生活を形成することが理想であろう。It is high time we reconstructed new family relationships and formed a comfortable life.














彼はやっと復讐心を抑えた。He managed to forbear his revenge.

姉は会社福祉事業に従事している。My sister is engaged in social work.














その博物館にはケルト時代の文化遺産のすばらしいコレクションがある。The museum has a fascinating collection of Celtic artifacts.





彼はその文法書から多くの用例を引用している。He has extracted a great many examples from the grammar book.


彼は閉会式には沢山の客を招待することを計画するでしょう。He is planning on inviting a lot of guests to the closing ceremony.



私の勉強時間は午後８時から１１時までです。My hours of study are from 8 to 11 p.m.




君は保健室に行った方がいいぞ。You had better go to the infirmary.



けがを治療してもらったトラは、村人たちの手で無事、保護区に帰された。The tiger, having had its wounds treated, was returned by the villagers to the animal sanctuary without incident.
選挙では、保守派と革新派がせめぎ合った。In the election, conservatives and progressives were fighting each other.モントリオールで報道陣と会見したワレサ氏は、東ドイツ指導部の交代は、旧体制の保守派指導者らが歴史の流れに取り残されたために起きた、と述べました。Speaking with reporters in Montreal, Canada, Walesa says the change of leadership in East Germany came about because the old guard leaders missed the train of history.














彼女は宝石箱を手放さなければならなかった。She had to part with her jewelry box.

ストロンチウム９０：ストロンチウムの放射性同位体の一つ；放射性降下物に含まれ人体に有害。Strontium 90: One of the radioisotopes of strontium; part of radioactive fallout, harmful to human health.



今晩はどんな放送番組があるのですか。What's on the air this evening?




そういう行為は法律違反だ。Such a deed is an offense against the law.
彼は司法試験に合格し、法律事務所を創設した。He passed the law examination and set up a law office.


「被告人」という言葉は法律用語である。"The accused" is a legal term.

私たちは訪問客で忙殺された。We were swamped with visitors.





彼女は根っからの冒険家だ。She has an innate love of adventure.
ビルには冒険心がまったくない。Bill has no sense of adventure.
日本の貿易黒字は史上最高を記録しました。Japan's trade surplus soared to a record high.
貿易障壁は戦争終結後解除されました。Trade barriers were lifted after the war ended.
アメリカの対日貿易赤字は解決の見通しがありません。There is no end in sight to the U.S. trade deficit with Japan.






その仕事をしても彼はほとんど満足感が得られなかった。That job gave him little gratification.
彼は漫画雑誌に熱中している。He is absorbed in his manga magazine.
子供達は漫画本を喜ぶ。Children delight in comic books.

























こんな歌を残している明治天皇の一面を知っている日本人は少ないのではないだろうか。I think there are probably few Japanese who know this side of the Emperor Meiji, the side that left a song like this.



彼は模型飛行機を作るのが好きだ。He likes to build model planes.



その町には大きな古い木造家屋が数軒あった。There were a few large old wooden houses in the town.
木造建築物は火がつきやすい。Wooden buildings catch fire easily.

餅屋は餅屋。A specialist has his own strength.


猫は夜行性の動物だ。Cats are active at night.
私は野球選手になりたい。I want to be a baseball player.






公共の交通輸送機関は正確に動いています。The public transportation system runs like clockwork.




各部門の優勝候補が集まった。The top favorites of each section were gathered together.

我々の最優先事項はこの論争にきっぱりと決着を付ける事だ。そのためには相手側との妥協も覚悟している。Our top priority is to settle this dispute once and for all, so we are ready to meet them halfway.


我々は日米間の友好関係を維持しなければならない。We must maintain the amicable relations between Japan and the U.S.

一酸化炭素とは炭素化合物の不完全燃焼で発生する有害物質です。Carbon monoxide is a poisonous substance formed by the incomplete combustion of carbon compounds.



免許証の有効期間が切れてしまった場合は、次の方法で新たな免許証の交付を受けることができる。If your licence has expired, you can be issued with a new one in the following way.

まだ誰もその犯罪で有罪判決を受けていない。No one has been convicted of the crime yet.







誰かが幼児誘拐事件をおこしたと聞くたびに僕は腹がたつんだ。Hearing about people kidnapping little children just makes my blood boil.





１０ドルを郵便振替にしていただきたいのですが。I'd like a money order for ten dollars.


営業マンだって、リストラ予備軍に配属されないように必死な訳です。After all, even salesmen are desperate to avoid being targeted for downsizing.

予約係をお願いします。The reservation desk, please.

予約席はありますか。Are there reserved seats on the train?



ビックリしたよ、温泉宿がお魚の養殖場になってたんだね。What a surprise! The onsen lodge had turned into a fish breeding farm.










離婚率は上昇すると予想されている。The divorce rate is expected to rise.

その立候補者は選挙の結果に落胆した。The candidate was disappointed at the outcome of the election.
いく層もの卸業者の存在が特色である日本の流通機構は、複雑でコストもかかる。The Japanese distribution system, characterized by layers of wholesale, is complex and costly.

上海で二つの旅客列車が衝突した。Two passenger trains crashed in Shanghai.
この随筆は一個の旅行かばんについてのものです。This essay is about a piece of luggage.




両替所はどこですか。Where is the money exchange counter?
車を買いたいのですが、料金表を見せて下さい。I want to rent a car, please show me a price list.
去年の春、料理教室に通って、パンの焼き方を覚えました。I took a cooking class last spring and learned to bake bread.








彼らは隣町まで鉄道を延長することを計画している。They are planning to extend the railroad to the next town.









雨が降ったら、練習試合は延期にするつもりだ。If it rains, we will put off our practice match.



英作文の練習問題をしなさい。Do a composition exercise, please.



連邦政府の予算削減は社会保障の給付に影響が及ぶでしょう。Federal budget cuts will take a bite out of Social Security benefits.




警察はたいてい路上駐車の車に目をつむる。The police usually close their eyes to cars parked on the street.



労使紛争はいまだに困った問題だ。Industrial disputes are still a problem.
平成１６年１月１日から、改正労働基準法が施行されます。The reformed Labour Standards Act will be in force from Jan 1st 2004.






疫病管理局の報告では、罹患率は１０パーセントだった。The office for disease control reported a 10 percent spread.











私の先生の指導はいつも要を得ている。My teacher's instructions are always to the point.


売れ行きは目標に達しなかった。Sales fell short of their goal.





安いホテルに泊まって旅費を浮かした。I saved on travelling expenses by staying at a cheap hotel.





今から彼女があなたのお世話をします。She will care for you from now on.
私にはうれしくはなかったが、ほかのあらゆるものと同じ様にトニーの価格も上がるのは無理はないと思い、同意した。I wasn't happy, but it seemed reasonable that his prices should go up like everything else, so I agreed.
あなたにお願い事をしてもよいでしょうか。Can I ask you a favor?



















警官は殺人犯から拳銃をもぎ取った。The policeman wrested a gun from the murderer.
新しい仕事がんばってください。Every success in your new job.

あなたはキョクアジサシという鳥のことを聞いたことがありますか。Have you heard of a bird called the Arctic Tern?



６人のメンバーの３分の１は女性だった。One-third of the six members were women.
シンジってうざくねぇ？うぜーよね。Isn't Shinji a pain? He is, isn't he?

















ハイヒールのかかとが折れたとき、ストッキングがほつれた。She got a run in her stocking when she broke the heel of her shoe.





彼の話はでっち上げだ。His story was made up.
とろ火で時間をかけて豆を炊いてください。Please simmer the beans for a while over a low heat.







彼女は彼に一編の詩を読んでやった。She read one poem to him.
引き伸ばしをしてほしかった写真は、いつできるのですか。When will they have that picture ready that I wanted to get blown up?




ある団体が雨林を保護する運動を起こした。A group started a campaign to preserve rain forests.









先輩は、嫌味なくらいの完璧超人でしたからね。だから逆にその「癖」は先輩の可愛げ・・・というか、チャームポイントでしたよ。You were always a perfect 'superhuman' to an infuriating extent, and so that 'habit' was actually one of your cute, or rather charming, attributes.













窓は壊されてよろいどははずれてななめに下がっていました。Her windows were broken and her shutters hung crookedly.



















先週あたりも誘ってくれていたが、夜が遅いので、泣く泣く断った。I was invited last week as well, but it was late so I regretfully turned them down.



















地方の党員たちは自党に有利な形の選挙区割りをもくろんでいます。Local party members are trying to gerrymander the district.





スミスは日曜日にはきまってやってくる。Mr. Smith is sure to come on Sunday.
















海軍のジェット機はとんでもない方向に飛行して、味方の軍隊を誤爆した模様だ。It seems the navy jets had a major screw-up in navigation and they bombed their own troops by mistake.



彼女は好んで新鮮な生野菜を食べます。She likes to eat fresh raw vegetables.








その国は鉱産物が豊富です。That country is rich in mineral resources.
おいおい、一枚看板のお前が来れないんじゃ、今日の合コン盛り上がらないよ。We're counting on you to be the life of the party. It'll bomb if you don't come.























これで朝ご飯の残り香などを一掃して空気をきれいにできる。With this you can make a clean sweep of leftover breakfast smells and such to make the air clean.

彼は今ハーバード大学の四年生だ。He is now a senior at Harvard.


























通りで二人が取っ組み合いのけんかをしていた。They were fighting on the street.





腫れが引くまで何日くらいかかりますか。How many days will it take until the swelling goes down?






私の叔父はパリに十年住んでいる。My uncle has lived in Paris for ten years.

豆腐は軽く重しをして、２０分ほどおいて水切りする。Lightly weigh the tofu down, leave it for about 20 minutes then drain.


先生は彼にエッセイの書き直しを命じた。The teacher told him to rewrite his essay.






















よくもまあ、そんな振舞いができるもんだ。How dare you behave like that!
新生活にすぐに慣れますよ。You will soon accustom yourself to the new life.

うちのボスは新入りの女の子に夢中だ。Our boss is very sweet on the new girl.












酔いを覚ますために散歩に出かけた。I went for a walk to try to sober up.







２人は今はれて夫婦だ。They are now man and wife duly married.

彼女は好んで新鮮な生野菜を食べます。She likes to eat fresh raw vegetables.



市長は税収入の落ち込みについて調査すべきだと思った。The mayor thought that he should investigate the decline in tax revenues.




あなたがすぐに私たちのもとへやって来てくれることを切に願います。I do hope you will come and visit us soon.











私は全問に答えることができた。I was able to answer all the questions.
まずいよ。また遅刻だ！！はやくも遅刻魔の異名をとってしまう。Oh no! I'm late again!! I'm going to get the nickname 'King of Late arrival'.








「コーヒーのお替わりいる？」「うん、ぼくのは少なめ、弟のには多めについでね」"Do you want another cup of coffee?" "Sure, make mine on the small side but be generous with my brother's."




彼の怠けぐせは、もう手に負えない。I'm at a loss for what to do with him. He's so lazy.
怒った先生はジョニー君を教室から退室させました。The teacher was really upset and threw Johnny out of class.

その人は私たちの半値の大安売りの申し出にとびついた。The man jumped at our offer of a half-price bargain sale.
街は大軍によって守られた。The town was defended by a large army.
そんな大仕事が私にできるかどうか心配だ。I'm concerned whether or not I can handle a big job like that.





チャブ台を囲んで一家団欒している。The family is sitting in a happy circle around the dining table.


清水の舞台から飛び降りたつもりで脱サラした。Quitting my office job was a leap in the dark.


こちらの飲み物は単品となります。These drinks are a la carte.

コートを探してます。背が低いので、丈は短めで、なるべくすっきりしたデザインのものを。I'm looking for a coat. I'm short so the length should be on the short side, and as refined a design as possible.
シャツのほころびも直した。I mended my torn shirt, too.









































Ａ市からＢ市までのチケット、片道２まいください。I'd like two one-way tickets from A to B.
これでこの一画は少なくとも２０匹ニジマスがいるわけだ。So now there are at least 20 rainbow trout in this area.









この問題は５０点の配点です。This question counts for 50 points.





彼の髪型は時代遅れだ。His hair style is behind the time.











その会社は確たる理由もなく、彼を不採用にしました。The company turned him down for no apparent reason.

ううん、由美ちゃんが魔法瓶に入れて、部室に持って来てくれたの。No, Yumi put it in a thermos flask and brought it into the club room.




家並みを分断する運河が流れていた。A canal flowed between two rows of houses.






先生が来るよ。歩き方がとてもゆっくりだね。There comes our teacher. He is walking very slowly.










毎食後歯をみがきなさい。Brush your teeth after each meal.
この方がまだしもあれよりよい。This would be better than that.




羽子板で突く羽の玉は「むくろじ」という大木の種です。The feathered balls you hit with a battledore are the seeds of a large tree called 'soapberry'.

フェアにやろうとは申しませんけど、無思慮な行動はおやめ頂きたいですわ。I will not say play fair but I would wish that you refrain from indiscreet acts.

そんな小さなことに目くじら立てなくてもいいじゃないの。You don't have to go getting so hairy about such a small thing.
彼は人々を無知から目覚めさせようとした。He tried to awake people from their ignorance.








彼はその絵を油絵具で描いた。He painted the picture in oils.







君がやったことは利敵行為だ。What you've done is profitable only to the enemy.


















もしあなたが試験でカンニングをやってもそれで何の咎めも受けずに済むと思っているなら、とんでもない話だ。If you think you can get away with cheating on the exam, you've got another thing coming.


怪我をした人のうめき声が聞こえてきた。We could hear the groans of the injured man.



























馬に乗る前に人は普通馬に鞍をつける。Before getting on a horse, you usually put a saddle on its back.

井の中の蛙、大海を知らず。He who stays in the valley shall never get over the hill.
まず、私の活動範囲は、おもに養老川下流域です。First off, my area of work is mainly in the lower reaches of the Yourou River.


ずば抜けた着想というのは、往々にして天啓のごとくヒラメクようだ。Sometimes the most inspired ideas seem to just come from out of the blue.



学のある人はとかく無知な人を軽蔑する。The learned are apt to despise the ignorant.



この全集の５巻目が見当たらない。The fifth volume of this set is missing.
私はしばしば絶望感に襲われた。I was often seized by despair.











この磁場の線が２極で北の磁力と南の磁力の間に走っています。The lines of this field run between magnetic north and magnetic south at the two poles.
彼は一年近くもアルコール類を断っていたが、お正月の頃に禁を破ってまた元に戻ってしまった。He had been dry for almost a year, but he fell off the wagon around New Year's Day.





門前の小僧習わぬ経を読む。A saint's maid quotes Latin.

猿はたくさん芸を覚える。Monkeys can learn a lot of tricks.



彼の言に従って行動するのは利口ではない。It is not wise to go by his word.
要素ＣとＤは弧の生成には無関係なので排除することができる。We can eliminate C and D since they are irrelevant to the generation of the arcs.

もちろん、実際に「はやぶさ」が太陽に近づいているわけではなく、図のように地球から見て太陽の反対側に位置するだけですが、このような現象を「合」と呼びます。Of course "Hayabusa" is not actually closing in on the Sun, it is just positioned as in the figure so that, seen from the Earth, it is on the opposite side of the Sun; this is called 'conjunction'.

全般的に見てもこの学校は最優秀校のひとつだ。By and large, this school is one of the best.
パンダはささをえさにする。Pandas feed on bamboo grass.


彼は彼らの師と仰がれた。He was respected as their teacher.
最近、以前からある痔が痛みます。Recently my haemorrhoids, which I've had from before, are painful.





競馬で稼ぐ！ありえないほど儲かる競馬ノウハウ集！Earn money on the races! Know-how collection on horse racing will have you raking it in!


将を射んと欲すれば先ず馬を射よ。He who would the daughter win, with the mother must begin.
我々は雨が小降りになったとき出発した。We set out when the rain had eased.


あのレストランは毎日二千食準備している。That restaurant prepares two thousand meals every day.


私達はひどい水不足だ。We are badly in want of water.
民生用・産業用を含めて、ゴミのかさをコンパクト化する機器の今後の市場成長性が法制度の動向と関連して注目される。Attention is focussed on the potential for growth of the personal and industrial use garbage compactor market in relation to trends in law.
寸を与えれば尺を望む。Give him an inch and he will take a yard.

シャンパンの栓がぽんと音を立ててとんだ。The champagne cork popped out.


早熟れの早腐り。Soon ripe, soon rotten.
賊が彼の家に押し入った。Burglars broke into his house.

彼はエベレスト登頂の遠征隊の一員であった。He was a member of the expedition which climbed Mount Everest.


企業の顧問弁護士団は合併手続きを完了するために、２４時間通しで働いています。Company attorneys are working around the clock to complete the merger.
暖かい日には手足を伸ばしたり、仰向けになって足を宙に上げたまま寝ることもある。On warm days, bears stretch out or lie on their backs with their feet in the air.

階層問題に対する、消費社会論の著である。It is a literary work confronting the class problem of a consumer society.




















彼は掲示板にそのビラをびょうで留めた。He stuck the notice on the board with tacks.

ダンサーの優美な舞は観衆を魅了した。The dancer's graceful action charmed the audience.

彼は女性に扮装した。He disguised himself as a woman.

無から有は生じない。Nothing comes from nothing.





馬の背にまたがり野山を走り回った。I rode all over the countryside on horseback.


わたしはこの図書館のありとあらゆる本を読んだ。I've read any and every book in this library.
彼の言葉は理にかなっているようだ。His words sound reasonable.
トマトの作柄は良だ。The tomato crop is of good quality.今学期は良が２つあった。I got two Bs this semester.


その老医師は自分の仕事に誇りを持っている。The old doctor takes pride in his work.
この問題に対して可否の論が色々とあった。There were a lot of opinions, pro and con, on this question.階層問題に対する、消費社会論の著である。It is a literary work confronting the class problem of a consumer society.






肉にはウジがわいていた。The meat was crawling with maggots.



ツグミは歌を２度続けて歌う。The thrush sings each song twice over.


第一次志望の大学に入れなかったからといって、自暴自棄になるなよ。Don't give in to despair just because you didn't get into the college that was at the top of your wish-list.


ワールドカップで優勝した全日本チームは、意気揚々と帰国してきた。The Japanese World Cup champion team came back home flushed with victory.
セクシャルハラスメントはいまや社会問題となった。Sexual harassment has now become a social issue.










政治家が、インサイダー取引を包み隠そうとした。The politician tried to cover up the insider trading.












































ファイアーウォールがインターネットの安全性を保証する。A firewall will guarantee Internet security.





メニュー・バーの「返事」から、「フォローアップ記事の作成」を選ぶ。フォローする記事が引用される。From the menu-bar's "Reply" select "create follow-up message". The message you reply to is quoted.
























































家内はアップルパイが大好きなんだ。My wife loves apple pie.




アフリカ大陸のどこかへ行くとしたらどこが一番衛生的で安全ですか？If I was going to the African continent where would be the safest and most sanitary place?








アメリカ大陸は１４９２年にコロンブスによって発見された。America was discovered by Columbus in 1492.


彼女はアルコール中毒だ。She is addicted to alcohol.












アンケート用紙が無作為に配布された。The questionnaires were distributed at random.









その起源ゆえに、カナダ英語にはアメリカ英語とイギリス英語の両方の特徴がある。Because of its origins, Canadian English has features of both American and British English.
「いいえ」とイギリス人は繰り返しました。"No," repeated the Englishman.








彼女はインスタントコーヒーをかき回しミルクを注いだ。She stirred the instant coffee and poured in milk.
夜食にインスタントラーメンを食べた。I had instant noodles as a midnight snack.

















そらバスが来た。Here's the bus.
いつだって読書の時間は見つけられる。We can always find time for reading.



民生用・産業用を含めて、ゴミのかさをコンパクト化する機器の今後の市場成長性が法制度の動向と関連して注目される。Attention is focussed on the potential for growth of the personal and industrial use garbage compactor market in relation to trends in law.















その囚人は刑期に服した後赦免された。The convict was pardoned after serving his sentence.



彼はチームでダントツの好選手だ。He is by far the best player on the team.








貴殿宅の水道水は硬水過ぎます。軟水を使用しましょう。Your tap water is too hard. Get a water softener.


『心配しないで。私、元気だから　(^-^)v』「あ・・・顔文字？」'Don't worry. I'm doing fine. :-) ' "Eh ... smiley-face?"


































最近、赤ちゃんのアトピー性皮膚炎が増えています。Atopic dermatitis has been increasing on babies recently.















アポロ計画は宇宙に関する我々の知識を大いに増した。The Apollo program greatly advanced our knowledge of space.










コロンブスがアメリカ大陸を発見したとき、バイソン（アメリカ野牛）は、広大な地域に棲んでいた。When Columbus discovered America, bison (American buffalo) inhabited a wide-ranging area.









彼女はアラビア語が少しわかる。She speaks a little Arabic.


















































イタリア語で歌われる歌を聞いた。I heard the song sung in Italian.


































エネルギー資源の確保について少し意見を述べるように頼まれた。I was asked to make a few remarks on energy conservation.

















今日はオームの法則に関する実験を行います。Today we will carry out an experiment about Ohm's Law.












馬術競技は男女混合で行われる唯一のオリンピック競技です。Equestrian is the only mixed-gender Olympic event.






























私は初心者なので「ガーター編みのマフラー」か「一目ゴム編みのマフラー」から始めようと思います。I'm a beginner, so I think I'll start from a 'garter stitch' muffler or a 'knit-one-purl-one stitch' one.











































この語はギリシャ語から出ている。This word is derived from Greek.








あなたはクラシック音楽がすきですか。Do you care for classical music?






































































































アスピリン、ペニシリン、サルファ剤にアレルギーです。I am allergic to aspirin, penicillin, and sulfa drugs.


















君にはシャッポを脱ぐよ。I take my hat off to you!






錠そのものは普通のシリンダー錠ですから、ドアを閉めたらオートロックするということはありません。The lock itself is a normal cylinder lock so it doesn't automatically lock when you shut the door.





























スエズ運河とパナマ運河は国際管理化におくべきでしょうか。Should the Suez and Panama Canals be internationalized?





























































































貴殿はテニス肘と診断されました。温かいお湯に腕をつけてください。You have tennis elbow. Soak your arm in warm water.








父は誕生日のお祝いに、デジタル時計を買ってくれました。My father bought me a digital watch for birthday present.






































ドル安は輸出にはずみをつけています。The cheap dollar is charging up exports.




彼は会社のドル箱だ。He is the cash-box for his company.




























ハレー彗星は、２０６１年に戻ってくる。Halley's Comet will come back in 2061.






















































貧乏にもピンからキリまである。You say "poor", but there are many degrees of poverty.













































急にブレーキをかけるな。Don't brake suddenly.























これに加えて彼は、ヘブライ語を読むことが出来る。Above and beyond this, he can read Hebrew.













ねずみはペスト菌を運ぶ。Rats carry the plague.


ペルシャ猫がテーブルの下で眠っていた。A Persian cat was sleeping under the table.
























私はポピュラー音楽を聞きたい。I'd like to listen to pop music.











ニュージーランド全体の人口は３４１万人で、その７分の１はマオリ族です。The whole population of New Zealand is 3,410,000, and one seventh of it are the Maori people.









































































































キューバリブレはラム酒をベースにしたカクテルです。A Cuba Libre is a cocktail with a rum base.




































レジャー産業は新たなリゾート地にさらなる投資をしています。The leisure industry is sinking more money into new resorts.


REM睡眠中の脳波は起きている時と同じ脳波であり、夢を見るステージです。The brain waves during REM sleep are the same as when awake, and it's the stage when you have dreams.







４７５年はローマ帝国の「衰退」を示す年ではあっても、「滅亡」を意味する年ではありません。Although 475AD is the year that shows the 'decline' of the Roman Empire, it is not the year of its 'fall'.

































悪事千里を走るって言うからね。Well, they say bad news travels fast.

















































その老人は見かけほど意地悪くなかった。The old man was not as mean as he looked.































何人も空の胃の腑では愛国者たり得ない。No man can be a patriot on an empty stomach.














































































あの絵画は印象派美術の傑作である。That painting is a masterpiece of impressionist art.































長年の努力が烏有に帰した。Years of effort came to nothing.



































地球の表面の５分の１は永久凍土層に覆われている。One fifth of the earth's surface is covered by permafrost.



















































































心停止の患者を応急処置で生かした。We used emergency measures to revive the cardiac arrest patient.応急処置のできる人はいませんか。Is there anybody who knows first aid?
































物質が化学的に変化する時には、化学エネルギーが放出される。When matter is changed chemically, chemical energy is given off.














この化学薬品は細菌の繁殖を防ぐだろう。This chemical will prevent germs from breeding.




























個人消費の水準にとって大きな意味を持つのは可処分所得である。Disposable income is what counts for the level of personal consumption.































科学哲学を勉強したことがないのでカヴァイエスについても読んだことがない。I've never studied scientific philosophy, so I haven't read about Caveilles either.





















































聴衆は足を踏みならしていらだちを示した。The audience showed their impatience by stamping of feet.















ユダヤ人の過越の祭りが近づき、イエスはエルサレムに上がられた。When it was almost time for the Jewish Passover, Jesus went up to Jerusalem.











































































それは快刀乱麻を断つような解答でした。That was a 'cutting the Gordian knot' type of solution.



























































































日本の企業は階級性を重要視する。Japanese companies emphasize hierarchy.















外国為替レートってどのように表すの？外国為替市場では、米ドルを中心に表示されます。How should foreign exchange rates be shown? In the foreign exchange market they are displayed centered on the American dollar.





































まさに蛙の面に水とはこのことだろう。That's a clear case of "water off a duck's back".



世界的な全面核戦争が起これば、地球規模でこの「核の冬」が数カ月間も続くと言われています。If there's a world-wide all-out nuclear war it's said that there will be a "nuclear winter" all over the planet for several months.


それは核ミサイルをボタン一つで操作し合う戦争になるだろう。It will be a push-button war of nuclear missiles.












































４月には学校行事がたくさんある。In April we have a lot of school events.



岳人が頂上を目指しました。The mountaineer set out for the summit.























株価指数は過去最高に上昇した。The stock price index soared to an all-time high.
















このガラクタは火に燃やしなさい。Burn this rubbish on the fire.












































































お互い相性がいい。The chemistry is right for us.



















あの二人、元に戻すつもりなんて更々ないみたいだし・・・。It seems they don't have the slightest intention of restoring it.わたしたちはどうにか彼女に知られずそれを元に戻した。We managed to get it back without her knowing about it.





社会保険庁や厚生労働省への不信感は募る一方である。Distrust of the Social Insurance Agency and the Ministry of Health, Labour and Welfare just keeps getting stronger.
























彼らは賄賂を使って証人の口を封じた。They bribed the witness into silence.







残念なことにカンニングする学生が多いらしい。To my regret there are many students who cheat.

式に余分の変数を加えたことによって、この実験結果は不明瞭なものになっている。The result of this experiment is obscured by the extra variables added in the formula.


「日本の経営陣は米国の労働者の扱い方を身につけなければいけない」と彼は言った。Japanese management must learn how to deal with American workers, he said.ダイヤの指輪なんて身につけていないけど、私は幸せだ。I'm not wearing a diamond ring, but I'm happy.

弱り目に祟り目。Misfortunes never come singly.

真昼の太陽がテニスコートを目も眩むほどに照らしあげた。The noonday sun beat down with dazzling brightness on the tennis court.
トムの話し方は私の癇にさわる。Tom's way of speaking gets on my nerves.

彼はわきの下に本を抱えている。He is holding his books under his arm.
気苦労で彼女は１０歳もふけこんだ。Worry has made her look ten years older.
猫は生きたネズミをもて遊んでいた。The cat was playing with a live mouse.あなたは彼の気持ちを弄んではいけない。You should not trifle with his feelings.私は数奇な運命にもてあそばれてきた。I have lived a life of a puppet of fortune.


昔は長電話して、よく怒られたものだ。I used to get yelled at for hogging the phone.
いとこは私を町中案内してくれた。My cousin took me around the town.



私は電話を切って、もう一度彼女にかけなおした。I hung up and called her again.
彼は行儀には気を配っている。He is careful about his manners.
ライトビールはありますか。Do you have any light beer?


ウチは俗に言うシングルマザーの家庭だ。父親の顔を僕は知らない。We're what they colloquially call a single mother family. I haven't seen my father's face.





















彼は当校の名を汚した。He blotted the good reputation of our school.










明日、大事なプレゼンがあるって言うのに、余裕綽々だね。You're pretty calm, cool and collected for somebody who has a major presentation tomorrow.










あれだけのコインを収集するのにどれだけの年月がかかりましたか。How long did it take you to collect so many coins?
あんなに怒るなんて彼らしくない。It's unlike him to get so angry.











新たな入植者達がその広大な荒野を開拓した。The newcomers cultivated the immense wilderness.
新来者が１等賞をさらった。The newcomer carried off the first prize.
英国民は無口な国民だ。The English are a taciturn people.

今から２５年後には、就業者２人につき退職者１人の割合になるだろう。Twenty-five years from now there will be one retired person for each two working.
この本にはある程度の価値はあります。This book has a certain value.
彼女は飛行機墜落事故で息子が一命をとりとめたことを聞いてうれし泣きした。She cried for joy when she heard that her son had survived the plane crash.

道は急斜面をジグザグにのぼっていた。The path zigzagged up the steep slope.
鶏口となるも牛後となるなかれ。Better be the head of a dog than the tail of a lion.



彼はあの手この手を使って彼女に接近しようとした。He tried to approach her by every possible means.
オウエンといがみ合っているんですって？I hear you're on bad terms with Owen.
うつ伏せになってください。Please lie on your stomach.

ぜひまたお越しください。I do hope you'll come again.
彼女の愛くるしい笑顔を見るとほっとする。Seeing her lovely face relaxes me.
ジョンとメアリーはお互いに愛し合っていました。John and Mary loved each other.







そのキルトは本当によく技巧が凝らされていていいものですね。That quilt is really quite a piece of work with all its fine craftsmanship.

しゃべるのもいい加減にしたら。Quit talking, will you?

今日の豆知識コーナー！ 今日は「カルピス」の由来について。Today's trivia corner! Today it's about the origin of Calpis.


私たちは座ってあれやこれやの話をした。We sat talking about this and that.
ああ言えば、こう言う。まったく、口が減らない奴だ。Whatever I say, he has a comeback ready. You can't get a word in edgewise.


僕はこれっきりで禁煙する。I'm off cigarettes for good.




そういえば、確かに太郎を見かけました。Come to think of it, I did see Taro.




彼はどこからともなく現れた。He appeared from nowhere.

仕事はどうにかこうにか仕上がった。The work got finished somehow.

こんなどうしようもない愚息ですが、どうかご贔屓ください。I may be a hopeless fool, but please be kind to me.
聴衆はコンサートが始まるのをどうにも待ちきれなかった。The audience could hardly wait for the concert to begin.











労働集約・資本集約を超えて、時代はナレッジ・インテンシブへと大きくシフトしている。Surpassing labour intensive, capital intensive, the age has shifted greatly to knowledge intensive.











なんかそれ、ブヨブヨしていて気持ち悪いね。Oooh, gross! What is that stuff? It's all spongy.
私はインターネットに関するよい入門書を探しています。I'm on the lookout for a good introductory book about the Internet.











顧客を惹きつけるようなサイトを作りたいと思っています。I want to build my corporate site to attract customers.



うちの会社は、いればいるだけ残業代がもらえるからね。The longer you stay, the more overtime pay you'll get.あの会社との取り引きは父の代から糸を引くように切れない。Our transactions with that firm have continued unbroken since my father's generation.２０代の若い女性の中には、夏休みに海外旅行にでたいと思う人も多い。Many young women in their 20s plan to go abroad during their summer holidays.
実際、馬車馬のように働いたもの。In reality, I used to work like a dog.
人の尻馬などに乗るな。Don't follow anybody blindly.
アメリカの尻馬に乗るなというセリフに正面から反論するのが、どれほどしんどいことだったことか。Just how tiresome was it to argue straight against the phrase "Don't blindly follow America's lead!"自民党が小泉人気の尻馬に乗った。The LDP rode on the wave of Koizumi's popularity.










森林火災の防止はすべての人が負う義務です。The prevention of forest fires is everyone's responsibility.





















私は彼の話しぶりが好きではない。I don't like the way he talks.
その若い男優はジェームス・ディーン張りの役者だ。That young actor is a James Dean.
















海外への航空運賃は燃料のコストとともに上昇した。The cost of flying overseas has risen with the cost of fuel.
来る途中、お店に寄って食材を買って来たんです。備えあれば憂いなし、です。On the way we dropped in at the shops and bought foodstuffs. They say well prepared means no worries.
少女は悲しみにうちひしがれた。The girl was overcome with grief.

















報道担当官が条約の内容を報道陣に説明した。The spokesman explained the contents of the treaty to the press.


この辺で茶色い財布を見ませんでしたか。Did you see a brown wallet around here?
すべての道はローマに通ず。All roads lead to Rome.これは古今東西に通ずる真理である。This is a universal truth that transcends time.
ベスはスカーフを破いたと言って妹のサリーを責めました。Beth accused her sister, Sally, of tearing her scarf.
診察室を出る間際、先生が「バイバイ」と手を振ってくださいました。Just as we were leaving the exam room the doctor waved his hand saying, 'bye-bye'.






英語を学ぼうとする学生は一冊良い英英辞典を手元に置いておくべきだ。All students of English should have a good English-English dictionary at hand.


噂話のお相手をしている暇はない。I have no time to engage in gossip.




あお向けに寝ると、舌やノドチンコがノドの奥に下がるため、上気道が塞がりやすくなります。If you sleep on your back it's easier for your upper airway to be obstructed because your tongue, uvula, etc. slip towards the back of your throat.




何の思想が中世英人に一番影響したと思うか。What thought do you think had the biggest impact on the English in the Middle Ages?






お手数かけてどうもすいません。I'm sorry to bother you.

先回は安産でした。I had an easy delivery last time.
通販で理想的な枕が買えます。An ideal pillow is available from a mail-order house.













わが目を疑っちゃうなあ。I can't believe my eyes.


すさんだ生活を送るのは、命を縮めるようなものだ。Living life in the fast lane is like burning the candle at both ends.


誰でも大なり小なり自惚れはある。Everyone is more or less conceited.





ジャーン。それじゃ春田くん、もう見てもいいわよ。みんなの浴衣、お披露目ねぇ〜。Ta-dah! Well then, Haruta, it's OK to look now! It's everybody's yukata debut.シンバルがジャーンと鳴った。The cymbals clashed.






悪質な迷惑電話、ワンギリにご注意！！Beware of 'One Ring' malicious nuisance calls!!



























その犬が噛みつこうとしたときに、首を押えつけてとことん叱りつけた。When the dog tried to bite me, I held him down by the neck and thoroughly scolded him.




眦が裂けるほど目を見張る。He opens his eyes so widely they tear at the corners.
あの人は私には口うるさかった。He was critical of me.



私は自分と同姓同名の女性を知っている。I know a woman whose first and last names are the same as mine.
彼は株の大暴落をうまくかわしていました。He made his timely escape from the stock market crash.
そのリストから、今回の旅行に必要な物をピックアップしておいて。Choose from this list the things you'll need on your trip.
今回、まだ両替していなかったので、日本円を人民元に替える必要があった。This time I hadn't converted my money yet, so I needed to change Yen into Yuan.
私たちは彼をよき先輩として尊敬している。We respect him as a good senior.
神は創造者です。天も地も人も、神以外は全て被造物です。God is the creator. Heaven and Earth and people and everything apart from God are created.





自分がよく言われていないという事実にお気付きですか。Are you aware of the fact that you are not spoken well of?
彼はスペイン語が話せる、ましてや英語はお手のものだ。He can speak some Spanish, much more English.
王様は明日の晩自らお出ましになる。The king will appear in person tomorrow evening.

アメリカへはいつお立ちですか。When are you leaving for America?
悪い男たちとはかかわり合わないように。Don't get involved with bad men.

彼女はがさつな甥たちにこれ以上我慢しようとは思わなかった。She refused to put up with her boisterous nephews anymore.
お巡りがやってきたぞ。Here comes a copper!
この国の経済は近年とんとん拍子に成長しています。This nation's economy is growing by leaps and bounds in recent years.
イギリス人は我慢強い国民だ。The English are a hardy people.
四つんばいになれば柵はくぐり抜けられるよ。You can slip through the fence on all fours.
現在のバージョンは、アップグレード版で置き換えます。We will replace the current version with the upgrade.
カールがドイツに移り住むと聞いた時には驚いた。It took me by surprise to hear that Carl was moving to Germany.
私はやむなく薬をのまされた。I was forced to take medicine.

棚からぼた餅とはこのことだ。This is what they call a lucky break.


輸入割り当て量についての多国間貿易交渉は暗礁に乗り上げてしまいました。Multilateral trade negotiations ran aground over import quotas.




ケンは4人のうちで一番年下です。Ken is the youngest of the four.







あいつらはなんとばかなやつらだ。What fools they are!

出る杭が打たれる会社じゃ、大きな成長は望めないね。A company that stifles innovation can't hope to grow very much.





ジェーンは勝つためにこの上ない努力をする。Jane makes the utmost effort to win.
私はそれを聞いてこの上なくうれしい。I am supremely glad to hear it.


お邪魔だったらすいません。I am sorry if I disturbed you.



















アレルギー性鼻炎です。I have allergic rhinitis.




















現地企業でのインターンシップを体験する。I'm going to do an internship at a local company.


ウェブ・サーバーがクッキーを利用している場合はどうなるのでしょうか。I wonder how it is when the web server uses cookies?

私どものウェブサイトhttp://www.example.comは、あなたに必要な情報を全てお伝えします。Our Web site, http://www.example.com will tell you all you need to know.











今日オゾン層は希薄になりつつある。Today the ozone layer is thinning.



Microsoftがβ版をランチするのは「NetShow streaming server」で動画や音声をオンデマンドで提供する。What Microsoft is launching is a beta version of its "NetShow streaming server"; it supplies video and audio on demand.






現在私どもは、カスタマーサービスの経験者を探しています。We are currently looking for individuals who have experience in customer service.















ケアプランの作成等の居宅介護支援事業については、介護保険により負担されます。Nursing insurance covers drawing up the care plan and other work supporting home nursing.

コーポレートガバナンスや説明責任を強化している。Corporate governance and accountability are being strengthened.
























まさか花子さんをストーキングするなんて・・・！最近、おとなしいから油断したわ！That you should be stalking Hanako! You'd been quiet recently so I'd let my guard down.





松葉杖ってけっこうムズいな・・・。「すみません、ストレッチャー通ります！」Crutches are pretty tricky ... "Excuse me, stretcher coming through!"


























チャットルームで知り合った人をパブで探したが、それっぽい人はいなかった。I searched at the pub for the person I had met online, but there was nobody who looked like that.




そのテレビコマーシャルの受けがよい。The TV commercial is drawing well.
















































ヒートアイランド現象の実体解析と対策のあり方について。An analysis of the nature of the heat island phenomenon and countermeasures.

























唇にヘルペスができています。I have a cold sore on my lip.





















時間があったらあなたのメールボックスをチェックしてみてください。If you have a chance, please check your mailbox.


































今日の朝飯は鯵のひらきと味噌汁だった。Today's breakfast was dried mackerel and miso soup.










































汚職政治家を追放せよ。Down with corrupt politicians.


















ケアプランの作成等の居宅介護支援事業については、介護保険により負担されます。Nursing insurance covers drawing up the care plan and other work supporting home nursing.







日本の昨年の海外直接投資は１００億ドルに達した。Japan's foreign direct investment reached $10 billion last year.







政府は外交政策を変更せざるをえなかった。The government had to alter its foreign policy.

深刻な就職難のしわ寄せが、そういった不法就労の外国人労働者にまで及んでいる。The serious job shortage is also affecting those illegal foreign workers.

















株式投資は必ずしも利益を生むとは限らない。Stock investments do not always yield profit.









































企業業績の改善は株式市場の回復が背景にある。Improving corporate performances are behind the stock market recovery.



企業収益は第１四半期に大きく改善した。Corporate earnings in the first quarter improved sharply.

企業倒産は先月も高水準に推移した。Corporate bankruptcies continued at a high level last month.





看護婦は、患者が危篤状態なので、病室に入らないようにと私たちに言った。The nurse told us not to enter the room because the patient was in a critical condition.

彼らは敵に奇襲攻撃をかけた。They ambushed the enemy.



落ち込みは季節調整すればそれほど大きくない。The decline isn't so sharp after seasonal adjustment.










事故があるとすぐに救急医療隊が到着する。Medical help arrives promptly after an accident.





































ちなみに、ウチのクリニックから数百メートルの近場に「ランプ」が建設中です。Incidentally a motorway ramp is being constructed in the neighbourhood, a few hundred metres away, of my clinic.





マンハッタンの金融街にある証券取引所の中には、火災と停電のため、営業を早めに切り上げてしまったところもあります。The fire and power outage resulted in a shortened workday at some exchanges in Manhattan's financial district.

景気を支えるために金融緩和が必要と考えられている。Credit relaxation is considered necessary to shore up business.
物価の上がり下がりが金融危機を引き起こした。The rise and fall of prices caused a financial crisis.












銀行融資を受けたいのだけど手続きはどうしたらいいの？I'd like to get a bank loan; how do I go about that?
給料を使い果たしてしまったが、私にはいざというときに頼る銀行預金がある。I've used up my wages, but I have my bank account to fall back on.






























景気の減退が始まると、短期契約社員達は次々に一時解雇を言い渡された。As the recession set in, temporary employees were laid off one after another.



間近に迫った景気回復は、急速で力強いものだろう。Business recovery, which looks to be just around the corner, will be rapid and strong.




経済は景気後退期に入った。The economy has entered a recession.






私は経営コンサルタントです。I'm a management consultant.






日本の財政当局は経済運営に対する国民の信頼を回復するため手段を考慮中である。The Japanese fiscal authorities are weighing measures to restore public confidence in their economic management.

今年の終わりに経済危機がくるだろう。There will be an economic crisis at the end of this year.


最近ドル先安感が強まっているなかで、為替相場は米経済指標に対する反応はかなり限定的である。As expectation increases that the dollar will weaken, the foreign exchange market's reaction to US economic indicators has been fairly muted.
経済情勢は流動的である。Economic conditions are in a state of flux.



































朝鮮は国際原子力委員会の査察を受け入れた。Korea allowed an inspection by the IAEA.

原油価格の値下がりが続いている。The crude oil price is falling further.
言うまでもないが、ノルウェーは世界第二の原油供給国となっている。Needless to say, Norway has become the world's second largest oil supplier.



良い新聞記者は、どんなニュース源からも、つまり、出所不明型のニュース源からも、学びとれるものはなんでも利用する。A good newspaper reporter takes advantage of what he learns from any source, even the "little bird told him so" type of source.





この国では言論の自由が制限されていた。Freedom of speech was restricted in this country.









複数の呼吸器疾患による衰弱のため、彼は先週、指揮者としての仕事を断念する旨の発表を余儀なくされたばかりでした。Weakness brought on by a number of respiratory ailments had forced him just last week to announce that he was giving up his conducting career.











光ファイバーケーブルは人間の髪の毛ほどの細さの小さなガラスでできている。Fiber-optic cables are made up of tiny glass fibers which are as thin as human hairs.

























































国債発行が高水準なので、それらの元利支払コストが増加するだろう。Given a high level of bond issues, the cost to service them will increase.




このままではわが国の国際競争力はさらに低下する恐れが大きい。At this rate, the risk is high that our country's competitive position will drop even further.





























財政赤字の埋め合わせの一般的方法は債券発行です。A common way to finance a budget deficit is to issue bonds.




























財政状態は週ごとに悪化している。The financial situation is getting worse week by week.
巨大な連邦財政赤字がアメリカ経済を長年に渡って苦しめている。A huge federal budget deficit has been plaguing the American economy for many years.





その殺人現場は表現することができないほどのものだった。The scene of the murder was too terrible to describe.

























支払能力は全く気質の問題であって、収入の問題ではない。Solvency is entirely a matter of temperament and not of income.


死刑制度は廃止されるべきだ。The death penalty should be abolished.
被告は死刑判決を受けた。The defendant was sentenced to death.



私服警官が終始大統領の身辺を固めていた。The private detectives accompanied the President everywhere.

























いずれの会社にも確固たる事業計画がある。Every company has a firm business plan.



















先回は自然分娩でした。Last time it was a natural childbirth.
































その会社の収益性が改善した。The company's profitability improved.





会社によって労働者は終身雇用を保証しているところもある。Some companies guarantee their workers a job for life.





社会の授業で銃規制について話し合った。We discussed gun control in social studies class.







最新の３ヶ月で純利益が過去最高記録となっています！Net profit for the last three months is a new record high!













新型は小売価格３万円で販売される。The new model will retail for 30,000 yen.




















「情報スーパーハイウェイ」の真のインパクトは、情報インフラの構築により経済が従来のハードやモノづくり中心の実体経済から知識、情報、ソフトを主体とした経済に移行し、そこから生まれる新しい産業や経済活動にある。Forming an information infrastructure, the real impact of the information highway is an expectation of new economic development due to a shift from a tangible hardware-industry to brain-oriented software-industry.


旅は情報収集が重要。Gathering information is one of the essentials of travel.










































その湖は水質汚染で悪名高い。The lake is notorious for its contamination.
水道水で年1回、井戸水なら年2回の水質検査をお勧めします。We recommend that mains water have a water-quality test carried out once a year, well water twice a year.










製品やサービスを世界市場に販売しようとする企業にとっては複数外国語によるコミュニケーションのノウハウが必須である。The command of communication skills in multiple languages is essential to any company providing goods and services on the world market.




























ある意味でそのような政治活動は一つの革命と言える。In a sense, such a political movement may be called a revolution.


英国の通貨危機は、政府がポンドの急落をくい止められなかったことをめぐる政治危機へと発展しました。Britain's currency crisis has turned into a political one over government failure to stop the pound from going into free-fall.








共産主義はソビエト社会主義共和国の政治体制だったが、１９９３年に崩壊した。Communism was the political system in the Union of Soviet Socialist Republics, but that stopped in 1993.

新しい共和国の指導者は政治的圧力につぶされそうです。The leader of the new republic is buckling under political pressures.

この問題は両国間で政治的解決を見た。The two countries came to a political settlement over this dispute.


























この工場は週に２５０台の車の生産能力がある。This factory's productive capacity is 250 cars a week.






























































世界的な全面核戦争が起これば、地球規模でこの「核の冬」が数カ月間も続くと言われています。If there's a world-wide all-out nuclear war it's said that there will be a "nuclear winter" all over the planet for several months.

新しい法律は組織犯罪を減少させるでしょう。The new law should take a bite out of organized crime.












騒音公害は、人々が環境にもっと敏感でありさえすれば避けることができるのに。Noise pollution could be avoided if only people were more sensitive to the environment.










太陽エネルギーについて話そう。Let's talk about solar energy.問題は、太陽エネルギーにはコストがかかりすぎるということだ。The problem is that solar energy costs too much.







その争いの根源は二国間の対立関係にある。The quarrel originated in rivalry between the two countries.









アメリカ大恐慌の際には多くの人が失業してた。A lot of people were out of work during the Great Depression in America.




社会党が大統領候補として立つ準備を彼にさせた。The Socialist Party groomed him as a presidential candidate.

私の夢は大統領夫人になることです。My dream is to be the First Lady.






脱水症状には、塩をひと舐め。For dehydration, take a lick of salt.







今日は暖房器具を使っていません。I'm not using my home heater today.





そして第三が地球環境の保全であり、省エネルギー、省資源型の生活を送る仕組みが必要となる。The third is the preservation of environment. In this case, the conservation of energy and resources is needed.
















超音波検査をしましょう。I'd like you to have an ultrasound.









中国への海外からの直接投資は昨年３０億ドルに達した。Foreign direct investments in China amounted to $3 billion last year.

組合は経営者側と賃金交渉をした。The union bargained with the management.



































法律の変更で、電子商取引におけるオンライン販売が脅かされている。Legal changes threaten online sales in digital commerce.






一番近くの電話ボックスはどこですか。Where is the nearest telephone box?









高い貯蓄率は日本の高い経済成長の一つの要因にあげられる。それが豊富な投資資金が存在することを意味するからだ。A high savings rate is cited as one factor for Japan's strong economic growth because it means the availability of abundant investment capital.







彼はその銀行で当座預金口座を開いた。He opened a checking account with the bank.


















独裁政権は人権侵害の前科について非難を受けました。The dictatorship came under fire for its human rights record.
グリーン夫人は、私の子供たちが歌を習っている方ですが、今度の日曜に独唱会を開く予定です。Mrs. Green, from whom my children have lessons in singing, is to have a recital next Sunday.














彼は日雇い労働者から知事になりあがった。He rose from day laborer to governor.

アメリカの企業は、日本経済の中に活動の場を見いだそうとしています。U.S. companies are working to find a niche in the Japanese economy.

















せっかく採用した派遣社員がすぐに辞めてしまった。The temporary workers that we managed to employ left work right away.
















爆破予告以来、空港の警備体制は強化された。Security at the airport has been stepped up since the bomb scare.


動議は発声投票で可決した。The motion was carried by acclamation.










犯罪率は着実に増加している。The crime rate is rising steadily.

















































飲む分だけ豆をローストして、ミルで挽くんです。We roast just enough beans for the amount we're going to drink, and grind them in the coffee mill.















































「けんじが病院に？」「そうや、ほんまけったくそ悪い......」"Kenji's in the hospital?" "That's a real pisser..."










民主主義国家に住む利点の一つは、自分が考えていることを何でもいうことが許されることである。One of the advantages of living in a democracy is that one is permitted to say whatever he thinks.






被告は無罪放免になった。The accused was absolved from the crime.
その国は当時無政府状態だった。The country was in a state of anarchy at that time.









夕べの新聞にはめぼしい記事があまりなかった。There wasn't much news in last night's newspaper.






















連邦政府の予算削減は社会保障の給付に影響が及ぶでしょう。Federal budget cuts will take a bite out of Social Security benefits.





































ニュースによれば、午後５時現在で連立与党が７２議席を確保している。According to the news report, the ruling coalition has secured 72 seats as of 5 p.m.





労働交渉では組合の指導者が重要な役割を果たす。In labor negotiation union leaders play an important role.




彼女たちの口から職場の労働問題が出てくることはほとんどなかった。They rarely spoke of the labour problem at their workplace.




そのこそ泥は窓をこじ開けている現場を捕まった。The burglar was caught in the act of prying open the window.





うちの体操服って普通の短パンだったのに今日から急にスパッツになっちゃったのね。Our P.E. kit was just shorts but now it's spats from today.



彼に１時間待たされた。He kept me waiting for an hour.




彼はこの世で一番の金持ちだ。He is the richest man on earth.
彼女の目から涙がこぼれおちていた。Tears were dropping from her eyes.
この素材は決してすり減ったりしない。This material never wears out.
川べりには工場の煙突が林のようにそそり立っている。The riverside bristles with factory chimneys.
そのとき彼らはたんぽぽをつみとって、彼らの耳につけました。Then they picked dandelions and put them in their ears.
彼はその道の大家です。He is a recognized authority on the subject.
結局その日は天気になった。The day turned out fine after all.
その塔は青い空を背景にしてそびえ立っていた。The tower rose up against the blue sky.

派手にすっ転んだので膝に青痣ができてしまいました。I fell down really hard and got a black bruise on my knee.



ウーン、どっちの道に行っても迷いそうな気がする。Hmm. I have a feeling I'm going to get lost whichever road I take.うーん、いいなあ。そこへ行こう。Hmm, that's a good idea. Let's go there.ううん、由美ちゃんが魔法瓶に入れて、部室に持って来てくれたの。No, Yumi put it in a thermos flask and brought it into the club room.
彼のつなぎ服はペンキのしみだらけだった。His overall was covered with paint-stains.
踊り手はつま先立ってぐるぐると回った。The dancer spun on his toes.

私は食事のとり方を変えるべきですか。Do I have to change my diet?
血はどす黒かったです。The blood was a dark color.
観光客は町中飲み歩いてどんちゃん騒ぎをした。The tourists painted the whole town red.
人柄がにじみ出ている。His true character is starting to show through.

その野心家は自分の成功にのぼせあがった。The ambitious man became intoxicated with his own success.
カレンは、蚤の市でたくさんものを買った。Karen bought a lot of things at the flea market.
彼の電話番号はよく知らない。番号帳でしらべてくれるより仕方ない。I'm not sure what his number is. You'll have to look it up in the telephone directory.










すぐに出発した方がいいですよ。You had better depart at once.アメリカへ行くつもりなら、英会話を勉強した方がよい。If you are to go to America, you had better learn English conversation.









ウッ、嘘をついているのを見透かされて、答えに困った。Uh-oh. He knew I was lying - saw right through me. I didn't know what to say.
「うんうん」彼は言った。"Oh, yes," he answered.
地上２２階、地下２階のオフィスビルが建設中です。An office building, with 22 stories above ground and 2 below, is under construction.
長期にわたる病気のあとでジェーンはカウチ・ポテトになった。After being ill for a long time, Jane turned into a couch potato.

昨日洗濯物を外に干しっぱなしにしたら、朝にはカチンカチンに凍っていた。I hung the laundry out to dry last night and by morning it had frozen hard as a rock.

ガスタンクが突然爆発した。The gas tank suddenly blew up.




８ギガバイトのハードディスクがあれば十分だと思います。I suppose then an 8-Gigabyte hard drive will be adequate.




彼はクラリネットを調整してもらった。He had his clarinet tuned.
クロケットの選手は試合中白いウェアを着なければならない。Croquet players must wear white clothing during play.


タイでは人々は料理、飲み物、おもちゃにココナッツを使う。In Thailand, people use coconuts for food, drinks and toys.
ココナッツミルクを得るためにはまずココナッツを割らなければならない。In order to get the coconut milk, you must first crack the coconut open.
ゴムバンドがプツンと大きな音を立てて切れた。The rubber band broke with a vicious snap.
最初のパラグラフでは、いわゆるサプライサイドの経済戦略というものの妥当性について疑問を呈する。In the opening paragraphs I query the validity of so-called supply-side economic strategies.






赤坂あたりのホテルにステイして、おいしい食事ができれば、さぞかしお姫様気分だろうな。What a princess I'd feel like if I were able to go to Akasaka, have a wonderful meal and stay at a hotel.


見る人がすぐにそれだと気がつくように、私はオレンジ色のスカーフと白いスモックを非常に明るく描きました。I made my orange scarf and white smock very bright, so people would notice them right away.


ボクサーはタイトルマッチに備えて減量しなければならなかった。The boxer had to lose weight for the title match.
メキシコと言えば、やっぱタコスでしょ。Mention Mexico, and tacos come to mind.
タランチュラはそのいけにえを素早く捕まえた。The tarantula seized its victim very quickly.

エメットが建築デザインのプロセスを容易にするために「ダイアド」スタイルを考案したことは確実である。It is certain that Emmet contrived his 'dyad' style to facilitate the process of architectural design.

機械故障によるダウンタイム。The downtime is caused by a mechanical problem.

私のダッフルバッグがみつからないのです。I can't find my duffel bag.

僕はダブルスのトーナメントでブレンドンと組んだ。I teamed up with Brendon for the doubles tournament.
こういうチェックポイントを注意すると、いいですね。You'd better check these points.

ツベルクリン反応は陽性でした。The result of the tuberculin test was positive.
ツンドラ地帯の気候は厳しい。The tundra has a harsh climate.

私はテニスクラブの一員です。I'm a member of the tennis club.
今日君のテニスラケットを借りてもいいかい。Can I borrow your tennis racket today?
テレビアンテナが昨夜のあらしでとれた。The TV antenna broke away in last night's storm.
そのテレビドラマは大変人気が高かったので、その時代に対する人々の関心が高まった。The drama on TV was so popular that it stirred up people's interest in the period.
ディスコダンスに関しては、私はスーザンの足元にも及ばない。When it comes to disco dance, I can't hold a candle to Susan.
彼は大きな本をドスンと机の上に置いた。He banged a big book on the desk.
船は改装のため目下ドック入りしている。The ship is now in dock for a refit.


人々はハンググライディングは危険だと考えがちである。There is a tendency for people to think that hang gliding is dangerous.
スパゲッティのソースにバジルを加えるのが好きです。I like to add basil to season my spaghetti sauce.
私達は買い物に行きたいとバスガイドに言った。We told our bus guide that we preferred to go shopping.


バンドエイドと薬をください。Could you send up a Band-Aid and some medicine?

２パイントは１クオートと等しい。Two pints are equal to a quart.


ファイルキャビネットの引き出しが開いている。The file cabinet drawers are open.
彼女はフィットネスクラブで毎日訓練する。She exercises every day at a fitness club.
これをフェデラル・エクスプレスで送ってください。Please send this by Federal Express.
フォックスは、映画スターになる機会を逃した。Fox missed a chance to be a movie star.
このフライドエッグは、ゴムのような味がする。This fried egg tastes like a sheet of rubber.
フロントデスクで鍵を求めてから、私は自分の階までエレベーターに乗った。After asking for my key at the front desk, I took the elevator to my floor.

彼女はヘアピンで車のドアを開けた。She unlocked the car door by means of a hairpin.

ダイヤモンドは女の子のベストフレンドです。Diamonds are a girl's best friends.
今の二人、見た？あのペアルックはちょっとセンスないよね。Did you see that couple in matching outfits just now? How tasteless!
ペソを両替して欲しいんですけど。I'd like to change these pesos, please.
その人達は二人ともペットショップで働いている。They are both working at the pet store.
そのオレンジは１個７ペンスでした。The oranges cost 7 pence each.


情報は新聞社にぽつりぽつりと洩れているよ。The information is leaking piecemeal to the press.
夏は冷たいポテトサラダがいいな。I like cold potato salad in the summertime.
ポリオワクチンは済んでいます。She was vaccinated against polio.
彼の古い車はポンコツ寸前。His old car is on its last legs.
そのマウンテン・バイクはいくらですか。How much is that mountain bike?
ミロのヴィーナスは美の極致だ。The Venus de Milo is the perfection of beauty.

メインディッシュを魚にしましたよ。We are having fish for our main course.
我々のヨットクラブは１０人のメンバーで構成されている。Our yacht club has ten members.

兄は、うまい、安定したレイアップができます。My brother can do a nice, steady lay-up.
私はレシピからナッツをはずした。デリアはナッツアレルギーだから。I've left out the nuts in this recipe because Delia's allergic to them.
彼は夏のロックフェスティバルを組織した。He organized a summer rock festival.
ロビンは眠っているときはかわいい。Robin looks very cute when he's sleeping.

彼女はピアノでワルツを弾いた。She played a waltz on the piano.












戦艦ビスマルク号を海のもくずとするには、何発もの魚雷を命中させなければならなかった。It took many torpedo hits to send the battleship Bismarck to Davy Jones's locker.







ばた足をして進もう。Kick with your legs straight to go forward.
何千人もの人々が広場にひしめき合っていた。Thousands of people were milling around in the square.





彼のいう事は要領を得ている。What he says is brief and to the point.



法のもとではすべての人は平等だ。All men are equal under the law.
騙されやすい人はたえず生れてくるといった人があるが、詐欺師は、いずれも、このことを承知している。It has been said that "a sucker's born every minute" and every 'confidence man' knows it.





彼は畳の上に大の字になった。He lay on the mat at full length.
家のスペアキーは外に隠してあります。I have a spare key to my house hidden outside.
多分、君は冗談だと思うだろうけど、若い頃、僕はパンクロッカーだったんだ。You're probably going to think this is a joke, but I was a punk rocker when I was a kid.
ボリュームディスカウントは可能ですか。詳細をお知らせください。Do you offer a volume discount? If so, please send details.


「寝てた？」「爆睡」「そ、そうか？」「なんかうなされてたよ。怖い夢でも見てた？」"I fell asleep?" "Totally." "Really?" "You were very restless, did you have a scary dream?"




















くそー、渚のやつ、本当に先生にチクりやがった。Dammit, that pest Nagisa, she really went and snitched on me to the teachers.
この教科書って再生紙でできてんだ。You know this textbook is made of recycled paper.


アイルランドとイギリスは海によって隔てられている。Ireland and England are separated by the sea.
ソ連軍はアフガニスタンからの撤退を開始した。The Soviet troops started to withdraw from Afghanistan.







ウガンダ人は国に収入をもたらすのにコーヒーの収穫に頼っている。The Ugandans depend on their coffee crop to bring money into the country.





グアム島へ行ったことがありますか。Have you ever been to Guam?



この船はジブラルタル海峡を通過します。This boat sails through the Strait of Gibraltar.





ニューギニア島には、大型の肉食獣がいなかったためです。That's because there weren't any large carnivores in New Guinea.


















タイのガイドブックは他にないんですか。Do you have any other guidebooks about Thailand?


彼は友だちの親切にむくいたいと思った。He wanted to repay the kindness of his friends.


別にブルマに特別な関心があるわけじゃない。そういうフェティシズムはない、と思う。It's not like I've got any special interest in gym shorts - I've not got that fetish, I think.



犬は四本足である。A dog has four legs.
ここに五本の鉛筆がある。There are five pencils here.

２本も飲めなかったから、１本はあなたに残しておきました。I couldn't drink both bottles, so I left one for you.



彼は小節を利かして歌っています。He is singing with a lot of ornamentation.
彼は小節を利かして歌っています。He is singing with a lot of ornamentation.
もうちょっと塩味をきかせてみたら？How about adding a little bit more salt?彼女は機転を大いにきかせてきわどい質問をかわした。She showed a great deal of wit in handling the delicate question.



「それよりそのカッコ・・・水着！？」「そうよ。イケてるでしょー！？ムラムラする〜？」"Never mind that, what's with that get up ... a swimming suit!?" "That's right. Sexy isn't it? Feeling horny?"


そこのブロッコリーは高価であるか品質が悪いかのどちらかだ。The broccoli is either costly or of poor quality.




ＵＳＳＲはソビエト社会主義共和国連邦を表しています。U.S.S.R. stands for the Union of Soviet Socialist Republics.








恐喝のその犠牲者は、ここ何年間というもの口止め料を払ってきた。だが、今では、それは愚かなことだと悟り、もうびた一文払わないことに決めた。The victim of blackmail has been paying hush money for years, but now he realizes it is foolish, and has decided not to pay a red cent more.
彼は５時間以上もぶっ続けで働いた。He worked more than five hours on end.
１０月になっても暑さがぶり返してくることがありますよ。Indian summers run into October.
そういえば、電車の中で隣に座ったほろ酔いのおっさんに、自分の俳句を見て欲しいと言われたことがある。Now that I think of it, I've been asked to look at a haiku he'd written by the tipsy bloke sitting next to me on the train.
この番号にもう一度かけてみていただけますか。Can you try this number again?
もう少しケーキを召し上がりませんか。Will you have some more cake?
うまくいくとは思いもしなかったが、どういうわけかなんとかうまくやってのけられた。I didn't expect to succeed, but somehow I managed to carry it off.
私にはガッツとやる気があります。I'm a person with guts and a strong will.
わが校はあす南高校と対戦する。We will play Minami High School tomorrow.わが校は１９００年に設立されました。Our school was founded in 1990.
馬鹿の一つ覚え。He that knows little often repeats it.
一括払いでテレビを買った。I paid in a lump sum when I bought a television set.
お金はほとんど一銭も残っていない。I have hardly any money left.
彼はうちの社員の中でも一頭地を抜く存在として一目置かれている。Among our employees he's recognized as a towering figure.
文明人も一皮むけば野蛮人。Scratch a Russian and find a Tartar.
その組織の運営上の責任が問題視されている。The accountability of the management of the organization is held in question.
恥を忍んで生き永らえるよりむしろ死にたい。I would die before I live on in shame.
私の両親は決して私を一人では海で泳がせなかった。My parents never allowed me to swim alone in the sea.
君に泳ぎ方を教えよう。I'll tell you how to swim.

いく層もの卸業者の存在が特色である日本の流通機構は、複雑でコストもかかる。The Japanese distribution system, characterized by layers of wholesale, is complex and costly.




快食快眠快便は健康のしるし。A good appetite, sound sleep, and regular motions are the three signs of good health.
初犯者には、ときに助けが必要だ。Sometimes first offenders are in need of help.


あの映画を見ると何かしらインドへ行ったような気がします。Seeing that movie is something like taking a trip to India.子供はいつもなにかしらいたずらをしている。Children are always doing some mischief or other.

何びとも奴隷の状態に留め置かれてはならない。No one shall be held in slavery.
何人様ですか。How many people in your party?
君の妹さんは何年生なの？What grade is your sister in?
その夫婦は家具調度に金をたくさん使った。The couple spent a lot of money on furnishing their house.

最近いろいろあって歌えなかったから、今日は歌いまくった！Recently, what with this and that, I haven't been able to sing so today I sang like there's no tomorrow!
彼はどんな忠告も意に介さない。He doesn't heed any advice.
海の秘密を解きほぐすことは誰にできるだろうか。Who shall ever unravel the mysteries of the sea?
喜びの波は解き放たれた私の心を漂う。Waves of joy drift through my opened heart.
ユーモアを解する心は、国民性と密接に結びついているが、その結びつき方は不思議である。The sense of humor is mysteriously bound up with national characteristics.私は彼の言葉を脅迫と解した。I interpreted his remark as a threat.
彼はがけっぷちに立っていた。He stood on the edge of the cliff.







彼女の頬はウッスラ赤くなっていた。Her cheeks were faintly flushed.実はビートを食べると、尿がうっすらピンク色をすることがあります。Actually if you eat beets your urine may turn a light pink colour.

















育ち盛りの子供にはもっと多くの食物が必要だ。A growing child requires more food.
あの人は影が薄い。He is always in the background.


１つ１つの出願を１件ずつ考慮しなければならないだろう。We will have to consider each application on a case-by-case basis.その一節を一語ずつ訳しなさい。Translate the passage word for word.

その女性は悲しげで、その上疲れているようだった。The lady looked sad, also tired.
良い新聞記者は、どんなニュース源からも、つまり、出所不明型のニュース源からも、学びとれるものはなんでも利用する。A good newspaper reporter takes advantage of what he learns from any source, even the "little bird told him so" type of source.
渇した者に水を、飢えたる者には糧を与えよ。Give water to the thirsty and food to the hungry.
アリスは長い滑り台を滑り降りた。Alice slid down the long slide.
私達はみんな夜遅くまで働くのに慣れっこになっている。We are all accustomed to working late at night.
この列車に間違いないですか。Are you sure this is the right train?



健康上の理由で仕事を辞めます。I'll quit my job for the sake of my health.
チューリップは、私たちの県の県花です。Tulips are our prefecture's official flower.
天気はテスト飛行にとって好条件のように思えた。The weather seemed favorable for the test flight.
高金利で金を借りた。We borrowed money at high interest.

国際連盟は平和に寄与しなかった。The League of Nations did not make for peace.
国民党は、簡潔に言うと、政治が崩壊する前に政府を離脱する必要があった。The People's party, to put it briefly, needed to leave the government before the government fell.
左肩の関節が痛みます。The joint of my left shoulder aches.

最上階にレストランがある。There is a restaurant on the top floor.
世界最速の走者でさえ、空腹だったら走れない。Even the fastest runner in the world cannot run if he is hungry.
３人のうちで最年少の少年が一番魅力的だ。Of the three boys, the youngest is the most attractive.
私はクラスの中で最年長である。I am older than any other student in my class is.
彼女は昨週、旅にでた。She set out on a trip last week.
彼の最新の作品が市庁舎で展示されているの。言葉に出来ないほど素敵よ。His latest works are on display at the city hall. They are fabulous beyond description.


彼は彼女と遠い親戚関係にある。He is distantly related to her.

ネパールを旅行中、ちょっとした事故にあった。I had a slight accident while trekking in Nepal.




マリはハンガリーにいたことがある。Mari has been in Hungary.








パプアニューギニアに住むメラネシア人の多くは、かなり強い天然パーマですね。Most of the Melanesians living in Papua New Guinea have very curly hair, don't they?






彼は誰に対してもあけっぴろげだ。He is free and open with everybody.
禍福は糾える縄の如し。When an ill wind blows it does good to no one.
こんなあしらいをされたら誰だって承知しないでしょう。Such treatment would make anybody rebel.
彼があのように年若くして死んだのは、本当に惜しいと思う。I think it's a great pity that he died so young.
子供の顔に喜びの色がありありと現れていた。Joy was manifest on the child's face.

あんなふうに話すとは彼はばかに違いない。He must be a fool to talk like that.
車がいかれるかと思ったころ終点に着きました。We reached our destination just as I thought the car was going to give up the ghost.なあ、この運転士、いかれてるよ。Oh, the driver is a maniac.
彼女は英語のスピーチコンテストでいかんなくその才能を発揮した。She really showed her stuff in the English speech contest.
自分と気があわない、いけ好かない、人がいるとします。Suppose there's some jerk you just can't get on with.
適材適所。あいつはコンピューターをいじくっていた方が生き生きしているよな。He's definitely the right guy for the job. Let him fiddle with a computer and he perks right up.
彼女にはいたずらっぽいところがあってますます好きだ。I like her all the better for her naughtiness.
例のお客さん、またいちゃもんつけてきたわよ。That customer came back to complain again.

我々の新しい計画には誰も文句を付けられない。No one can find fault with our new plan.
なんでも自分で手がけると、いとおしくなるものです。Whatever it is, you become fonder of it if you work on it yourself.
いとも容易なことだ。There is nothing to it.
彼はそうする事に後ろめたさを感じなかった。He had no qualms in doing so.

この草地には蛙がうようよいる。This meadow abounds in frogs.
もしおまえがひとりで来たらうんとおこってやらなきゃならないかもしれない。I might have to be very angry with you if you were to come alone.私は今学期ほとんど勉強をしなかったので、来学期はうんと勉強をするつもりです。I have hardly studied this term, so I'm going to study hard next term.
おいそれと金はできるものじゃない。Money cannot be got at bidding.
そして、おしんとは違って、彼らは確かに不平を言う。間違いなく勤務中には言わないだろうし。おおっぴらには普通言わないだろうが。And unlike Oshin, they do complain although certainly not at work and generally not in public.

このひどい学校にはおさらばだ。I'll bid farewell to this stinking school.
私のおじいちゃんは大工です。My grandfather is a carpenter.
いよいよという時になって彼は怖じ気付いた。His nerve failed him at the last moment.
御粗末なものですが私の自転車をお使いください。You may use my bicycle such as it is.
クリスは理科の授業で落ちこぼれそうです。Chris risks falling behind in the science class.
その物語はおなじみである。The tale is familiar to us.
銭厘を大切にすれば大金はおのずとたまる。Take care of the pence, and the pounds will take care of themselves.
チーズはしばしばネズミを罠におびきよせる。Cheese often lures a mouse into a trap.


私の車はおんぼろになってしまいました。My car is on its last legs.


君はすぐにかかりつけの医者にみてもらったほうがいい。You'd better go to see your family doctor at once.
かくして、彼らに脅威を与えるほかの動物に発見されないですむ。Thus, they cannot be detected by other animals that threaten them.
水ぶくれがかさぶたになってきました。The blisters have formed scabs.

正直言って私はクラシック音楽が好きじゃない。かたや、モリーの方が完全にはまっている。To tell the truth, I don't like classical music. On the other hand, Molly is really into it.
お顔はかねてから知っております。Your face is familiar to me.
スポーツにかまけて学業を怠る学生もいる。Some students neglect their studies in favor of sports.
局部にかゆみがあります。I have an itchy crotch.
ドアにかんぬきをし、錠をかけた。We barred the door and locked it.
サダムが脅威でないなどと言うのは、赤がかった反戦運動の人達くらい。It's only the anti-war pinkos who say things like Saddam isn't a threat.
逆立ちをした時に首がガクンとなりました。My neck snapped when I did a headstand.
このテーブルはがたつく。しっかり固定させてくれ。This table is shaky. Make it stay firm.
リンゴをがぶりと齧った。She bit into the apple.

宗教がらみの裁判で、野心的な弁護士は教団の指導者の代理をする。In the religious-cult trial, the ambitious lawyer will represent the cult leader.
本当に、がらりと変わってくれましたね。It's such a nice change.
彼女は驚いてきょとんとした顔をした。She looked stupefied in amazement.
ぎゃあぎゃあ言うのはやめてください。Stop making a fuss.
歯をくいしばってください。Bite together, please.


もう少し火にまきをくべなさい。Put some more wood on the fire.
彼が謝ろうとしていたちょうどそのとき、その人は彼の顔にパンチをくらわせた。He was about to apologize when the man punched him in the face.
あのレストランはひどいものを食わせる。They serve terrible food at that restaurant.彼はポールがまちぼうけをくわせたのだと悟った。He realized Paul had stood him up.彼は敵に不意打ちを食わせた。He surprised his opponent.
ジムは映画に行く約束をしたガールフレンドに待ちぼうけをくわされ、雨の中を一時間も待たされて頭にきている。Jim's angry because his date for the movie stood him up and he wasted an hour waiting for her in the rain.
彼女はそのロープをぐいっと引っ張った。She gave a big pull on the rope.
君は非常にぐうたらだ。You are idle to the bone.
矢はぐさりと刺さった。The arrow went home.

スープがなべでぐつぐつ煮えている。The soup is bubbling in the pot.
ぐでんぐでんに酔っぱらっている。He is dead drunk.
市内をぐるっとご案内しましょう。I'll show you around the city.

苛酷な価格競争の中で、Ａ社は我々をけしかけてＢ社と戦わせて漁夫の利を得ようとしている。Company A is trying to play us off against Company B in a severe price-war.
けばけばしい奇妙な服を着ていた彼女は人込みの中でも一際目立った。Dressed in a loud and peculiar outfit, she stood out in the crowd.

彼はけんもほろろな返事をした。He gave me a curt answer.
あなたの欠点でさえも私のあなたに対する尊敬の気持ちを減じはしないし、友情においてはこれが大切なことです。Even your faults do not lessen my respect for you, and in friendship this is what counts.
こうした熊独特の特徴が、熊が動かずに狩猟すること（アザラシの呼吸孔の脇でじっと動かず、アザラシが海面に上がってくるのを待つ）を好む説明になっている。These special characteristics explain its preference for still-hunting (lying motionless beside a seal's breathing hole, waiting for one to surface).
こうして私はいつも魚を料理する。This is how I usually cook fish.
彼女はいつもこざっぱりした服を着ている。She is always neatly dressed.
彼は病気をこじらせてしまった。He is suffering from an aggravated disease.

あなたはお仕事しながらこっくりしてますよ。You are nodding over your work.
さっきの授業で、お前コックリコックリしてただろ。You kept nodding off during that lecture, didn't you?

こってり化粧した顔は異様である。A face with too much make up looks strange.
スズメバチにこっぴどく刺された。I got a nasty sting from a wasp.
彼の芸はこなれていない。His talent is green.
それはこのようにして起きた。This is how it all came about.

同じ虹を、これだけたくさんの人が撮影したものを見たことがありません。I've never seen as many people as this photograph the same rainbow.
今日は、これまでになく寒い。Today's the coldest day we've ever had.
この夏はこんがり焼こうと思います。I am going to try to get a good tan.
事件は、こんなふうに起きた。The event came about like this.
こんもりと茂った木々の葉を通して日光が差し込んだ。The sunshine penetrated the thick leaves of the trees.
来週までごきげんよう。Until next week.
彼女は台所の床をブラシでごしごし洗った。She scrubbed the kitchen floor with a brush.
難民がごみごみした裏町に住んでいました。The refugees were living in a narrow, squalid backstreet.
小鳥の囀りが聞こえます。We can hear the bird sing.
さしあたって、ここで待つべきです。We should wait here for the moment.
こんなにすばらしい本を書くとは、著者はさぞかしりっぱな学者だろう。What a good scholar the author must be to write such a splendid book!
さてはまた帰ってきたね。So you are back again.
急ぎなさい、さもなければ遅れますよ。Make haste, or you will be late.
なあに、しがないサラリーマンですよ。Me? I'm a plain old salaryman.
本をしこたま持っている。He has books galore.
全員、死者にしばし黙とうを捧げた。The whole company stood in silence for a few moments, as a tribute to the dead.
彼女はしまいには入院するはめになった。She ended up in the hospital.

彼女は門のところにしゃがみこんだ。She crouched down by the gate.
その男は終身刑に処せられた。The man was given a life sentence.

彼女は冷たくじろりとこちらをにらんだ。She gave me the fish eye.
この子はすくすくとよく育ちました。This child has grown up normally.
彼は我々からすたこら逃げた。He showed his heels to us.
株ですってんてんになっちまった。I lost my shirt on the stock market.
子たる者すべからく親の命に従うべし。Children should obey their parents.
このスカーフは手触りが柔らかくてすべすべしている。This scarf feels soft and smooth.
叔父はすらっとしているが、叔母は太っている。My uncle is slender, but my aunt is stout.
彼女は学習参考書を読みながらぐっすり寝入ってしまった。She fell fast asleep over a study aid.

あやはホットピンクや電子ブルーや深紫といった激しい色が好きだ。Aya likes intense colors, such as hot pink, electric blue and deep purple.
いちど電子機器になれると、もうそれなしではすませられなくなります。Once you get used to electronic media, you can no longer do without them.
彼女らの妬みは彼女の美しさに向けられた。Their envy was directed toward her beauty.
働きすぎで彼は病気になってしまった。As a consequence of overwork, he became ill.ジョン君は働きすぎだよ。座ってしばらくはのん気にかまえなさい。John, you're working too hard. Sit down and take it easy for a while.お疲れのようですね。きっと働き過ぎですよ。You look very tired. You must have been working too hard.
そんなにカッカするなよ。短気は損気って言うだろ。Don't be such a hothead. A short temper will cost you.
赤尽くめの人は銃を構えていた。The man all in red was holding a gun.
思ったことをズバズバ言うタイプだよ。She's an outspoken person.

ずらりと並んだアルミのポットやなべ。A battery of aluminum pots and pans.
夕飯をせかせる。Hurry in for supper.
彼女はせっせと編み物に精を出していた。She was busy with her knitting.
彼女は台所でせわしなく働いている。She is bustling about in the kitchen.
あなたがスポットを世話するって言ったとき、そういった責任が生じるのは分かっていたはずでしょ。When you said you'd look after Spot, you knew there'd be responsibilities.
私はそうしたのを恥じている。I am ashamed of having done so.
「もしや、あなたは小川さんではありませんか？」「そうですが、何か？」"Might you happen to be Mr. Ogawa?" "Well, yes ... can I help you?"
そうですね。毎日練習する事が必要ですよ。Yes, you need to practice every day.
「ええ、そうね」とスーザンが言葉をさしはさむ。「私が電話したのは・・・」"Ah, that's true," Susan puts in, "I just wanted to call to ..."
君の服装は場所にそぐわない。Your dress is unsuitable for the occasion.
私の声を聞きつけて、私の犬は耳をそばだてた。At the sound of my voice, my dog pricked up his ears.
木の葉が風にそよいだ。The leaves trembled in the wind.
それにしても、幼稚園というところは、季節の行事にとても敏感です。Even so, kindergartens are sensitive to seasonal events.
そんなにたくさん食べるのは異常だ。It is abnormal to eat so much.
彼はいつもそんなふうに私をあしらうのです。That is how he always treats me.
ベスはクリスにぞっこんなので、喜んでそれを引き受けました。Beth was committed to Chris and eagerly accepted.
たおやかな花が咲いている。The delicate, graceful flowers are in bloom.
彼は約束をたがえない。He is as good as his word.ビルは時間を違えないことはめったにない。Bill is seldom ever on time.


宴会はたけなわだった。The banquet was in full swing.
彼は時々ワインをたしなむが、たいていはウイスキーを飲む。He enjoys wine sometimes, but mostly he drinks whisky.
その枝はたわんだが、折れなかった。The branch bent but did not break.
その木には実がたわわになっていた。The tree was heavy with fruit.
たんまり千ドル儲ける。Make a handsome profit of one thousand dollars.
そして、だからこそ、ほぼ百年にわたって、従業員はだれでも雇用者のところに行って、現金による賃金支給を要求できるようになったのです。And that's why for almost a hundred years, any employee has been able to go to his employer and insist on being paid in cash.

衣料品がだぶついている。We have an oversupply of clothing.
あれはさる年に因んだ猿の絵です。That's a picture of a monkey associated with the Year of the Monkey.
トムはちょっとした音楽家だ。Tom is something of a musician.
自分の顔に仕返しをするために鼻をちょん切るな。Don't cut off your nose to spite your face.
博物館の参観者の中にちらほら外人が見えた。There was a sprinkling of foreigners among the visitors in the museum.
彼は書類をちらりと見た。He took a glance at the papers.
君の論理にはついて行けないよ。I cannot follow your logic.
彼が友人の期待を裏切るかもしれないとはついぞ思わなかった。It never occurred to me that he might fail his friend.
鳥が穀物をついばんだ。The birds pecked grains.
そんなに突っけんどんにしてなんの得があるのか。How can you benefit by being so unpleasant?
私はトーストとコーヒーと卵一個というつつましい朝食をとった。I ate a modest breakfast of toast, coffee, and one egg.
彼は親指と人差し指で蝶をつまみあげた。He picked up a butterfly between his thumb and forefinger.

彼女が物事をてきぱきできないのを驚いた。I was surprised at her inability to do things promptly.
会社は心配の問い合わせでてんやわんやだった。The office was besieged by anxious inquiries.
外へでなさい、でないと後悔しますよ。Get out, or you will be sorry.
彼女はここ２ヶ月間ダイエットをしている。というのも、冬の間体重がかなり増えすぎたからだ。She has been on a diet for the past two months because she put on too much weight during the winter.

そのことをとくと考えてみたまえ。Ponder deeply over it.
君は僕にないものねだりをしているね。You ask me to do the impossible.
ヘビがとぐろを巻く。The snake coils itself up.
もう一つお願いがある。とっとと消え失せろ。I have just one more thing to ask of you - get lost.
知らぬ間に日はとっぷりと暮れていた。Night had completely fallen before we knew.

政府はともすればマスメディアを統制したがる。The government tends to control the media.
外国製品がどかっと市場に出回った。Foreign products arrived on the market in large quantities.
自販機でコーヒーを買おうと１００円入れてボタンを押したら、一気に４本も、どかどかと落ちてきた！When I put 100 yen in and pressed the button to buy a coffee at the vending machine, four cans dropped down all at once!彼らは夜遅くどかどかと私の家に上がり込んできた。They crowded into my house late at night.
そのどぎつい光は目に悪い。The glaring light is hurtful to the eyes.
その内気な少年は、彼女の前ですっかりどぎまぎしていた。The shy boy was utterly embarrassed in her presence.
やむどころか、嵐はいっそう激しくなった。Far from stopping, the storm became much more intense.彼はウイスキーどころかビールさえ飲まない。He doesn't even drink beer, not to mention whiskey.
彼はいすにどっかと座りこんだ。He settled himself in a chair.
食卓には果物がどっさりのせてあった。The table was loaded with fruit.
どっちみち、関係ないよ。Either way, it's not important.
地域参加を呼びかけてもしょせんは美辞麗句、どのみち市役所はやりたいことを勝手にやるに決まっている。The claim of community involvement is just window dressing; City Hall will do what it wants to anyhow.
外はどんよりしている。It's very gray outside.
私は夢の中でも踊っていたと思います。I think I was dancing in my sleep.
このナイフはなまくらで切れない。This knife is so dull that it can't cut.
私はぬかるんだ斜面をずるずると滑り下りた。I slithered down the muddy slope.

アルコール抜きの飲物がありますか。Do you have any soft drinks?彼の４人抜きの活躍でうちの高校のチームが優勝しました。His beating four competitors in a row won our high school team the championship.
鹿は木の葉のねぐらで眠った。The deer slept on a bed of leaves.
おねんねの時間よ。Time to go beddy-byes, dear.
田舎でのほほんと暮らしたい。I want to live a carefree life in the country.
先生は私達にのらくらして時間をむだにしないようにしばしば言ってきた。Our teacher has often told us not to idle away our time.
あいつはのらりくらりの仕事にお忙しい事だ。He is busy loafing on the job.
何か飄々とはぐらかされてる気がするわ。I get the feeling I'm being given the runaround.

帆が風にはためいた。The sails fluttered in the wind.
彼らは私たちを一日中働かした。They made us work all day long.
課長は私を奴隷のように働かせた。The section chief made me work like a slave.想像力を働かせた。I used my imagination.
男の子はたらいの中でジャブジャブ水をはねかしていた。The boy splashed about in the tub.
あの人たちは私のことをおばあちゃんだと言う。They say that I'm an old woman.

その考えは最初のうちはばかげているように思えた。The idea seemed absurd at first.
時折雨がぱらつくでしょう。We are expecting an occasional rainfall.



ひだるい時にまずい物なし。Hunger is the best sauce.
ひもじい時にまずいものなし。A good appetite is a good sauce.
彼の予言は、ひょっとしたら的中するかもしれない。His prediction might come true.
鍋がふきこぼれているよ。The pot is boiling over.
ふとしたことでその新しい島の発見となった。Chance led to the discovery of the new island.
酒を飲みすぎて足もとがふらついた。I drank too much and was unsteady on my feet.
いつまでもぶつくさ言っているのは君の勝手だけどね、それじゃあ事態は何一つ変わらないよ。You can complain 'til the cows come home, but it's not going to make a bit of difference.
ぶらりと一人旅でもしてくるかな。Maybe I'll just wander off on my own.
蜂が１ぴきぶんぶんいっている。A bee is buzzing.
彼女はすぐぷんとなる。She easily flames up.
彼はへっぽこ詩人だ。He is a poet of a sort.
空腹でおなかがぺしゃんこだ。My stomach is clenched with hunger.

審判の方をちらりと睨むが、審判は涼しい顔して鼻クソをほじっていやがった。「ちくしょう、八百長かよ・・・」I shot a look in the referee's direction, but he was putting on a calm face while picking his nose. "Dammit, the fight's a fixup!?"
情にほだされて思わず涙を流した。I was moved to tears in spite of myself.
彼女は背が高く、ほっそりとした金髪の女性だった。She was a tall, slender blonde.
私は１日中街をほっつき歩いた。I wandered about the streets all day.
お手伝いさんは毎日の家事にはほとほとうんざりしていた。The maid was dead tired of her household chores.
雲が空にぽっかりと浮かんでいた。A cloud floated across the sky.
彼は僕の肩をぽつんとたたいた。He patted me on the shoulder.

まさかの時の友こそ真の友。A friend in need is a friend indeed.まさかのときに備えて貯蓄せよ。Keep something for a rainy day.
私はギターを弾くことはできない。ましてやバイオリンは弾けない。I can't play the guitar, much less the violin.
母は私に真っ白いドレスを作ってくれた。Mother made me a pure white dress.
凍結した道路が日光を浴びてまばゆく光った。The icy road sparkled in the sunlight.
私の妻は料理がまるきりへたです。My wife is anything but a good cook.
涙にむせんで何も言えなかった。She was choked with tears and was unable to speak.
彼女は新しいドレスを着てめかしこんだ。She got herself up in a new dress.
多くの障害にもめげず前進した。He went forward in the face of many obstacles.
よき妻をめとる人は幸せです。Happy is a man who marries a good wife.
火がめらめらと隣家に燃え移っていった。The fire spread and licked the neighboring house.
煙突から煙がもくもくと出ていた。The smoke poured out of the chimney.
もごもご言うのはやめてください。Please don't mumble.
運転手は運転台からもんどり打って投げ出された。The driver was thrown from his seat head over heels.



ダンというのは全くハズれた奴だ。次に何をやらかすか見当もつかない。Dan's completely off the wall; you can't predict what he's going to do next.
この世の心配事は忘れて気をゆったり持て。Forget the anxieties of life and learn to relax.男性用の衣類はゆったりしている。Men's clothing is loose fitting.
彼らは腹の皮がよじれるほど笑った。They split their sides laughing.
その老人は足がもつれてよろけた。The old man tripped over his own feet.
新聞に書かれていることはれっきとした事実である。What is reported in the paper is an obvious fact.
彼のわざとらしい話し方が嫌いだ。I don't like his affected manner of speaking.








簡易ベッドの組み立て方を教えてもらえますか。Will you show me how to set up a cot?










その子は、カエルが、動いたのを見て後ずさりをした。The kid drew back from the frog when it moved.
彼はぱっと後ずさりした。He backed abruptly away.


























今日は魚の食いが悪い。The fish aren't biting today.


私たちはまず、あなたの義理のお兄さんに手紙を書いて、もてなしていただいたお礼を言うべきでしょう。The first thing we should do is write and thank your brother-in-law for his hospitality.

義理の姉は五年間で四人の子供を生んだ。My sister-in-law had four children in five years.


この儀式は幾世代にもわたって伝わってきた。This ceremony has been handed down from generation to generation.
急いては事をし損ずる。Hurrying leads to mistakes being made.
ちょっとした景気づけですよ。It's a shot in the arm.
実地は理論と同様に大切であるが、われわれは理論を重んじ、実地を軽んずる傾向がある。Practice is as important as theory, but we are apt to value the latter and despise the former.
その男は自分の脳を撃ち抜いた。The man blew out his own brains.
こんな結び方ではほどけちゃうよ。This knot will not hold.
この現象は、いずれの汚染物質とも無関係であると結論づけることができる。We can conclude that this phenomenon is not related to either pollutant.
このあたりは私がここにきて以来建て込んできた。The area has been built up since I came here.
彼は肩越しに振り返った。He looked back over his shoulder.
あの女性は見栄っ張りと言うよりもむしろ自尊心が強い。That woman is proud rather than vain.
彼は帰宅するやいなや、誇らしげに衝撃の発表をした。No sooner had he come home than he proudly made an earth-shattering announcement.
日本は世界の経済大国に伍している。Japan ranks among the economic powers of the world.
大統領はテレビで国民に語りかけた。The President spoke to the nation on TV.
怒りを込めて告発人の方に向き直った。He turned angrily on his accusers.

あの悲劇は私の心に刻みこまれた。That tragedy was etched in my mind.
その植物を根こそぎ引き抜きなさい。Pull the plant up by the roots.麻薬の密売は根こそぎ絶やさなければならない。We must eradicate the drug traffic, root and branch.
１．とりむね肉を細切りにする。1. Finely chop the chicken breast meat.




その報告は販売に関しては思わしくない。The report is not encouraging sales wise.
人はすべて死すべきものと承知している。We know that all men are mortal.
時計には針が２本ある。時針と分針がそれだ。The clock has two hands, an hour hand and a minute hand.
将軍は難局に敢然と立ち向かい、自軍を破滅から救った。The general took the bull by the horns and saved his army from disaster.
私はその職を辞するよう彼を説得した。I persuaded him to resign the post.

どうかあなたの実体験のことを書いて下さい。Please write about your real experience.
光が絵の中には描かれていない大きな窓から射し込んでいます。Light shines through the large windows outside the picture frame.
彼はとても若くして頭がはげ始めた。He started going bald quite young.
もう一度政治家を殺ってみたかったが出来なかった。We tried again to bump off the politician, but couldn't do it.
警官はその泥棒を取り押さえた。The policeman caught the thief.
天候が悪いために、ガーデンパーティーは取りやめになった。Owing to the bad weather, the garden party was called off.
しかし手ぶらで帰ることもしばしばだった。But more often than not, we came back empty-handed.
頭のよい設備が手作業に取って代わりました。Intelligent equipment has replaced manual labor.
もうすっかり秋めいてきました。It looks as if autumn is really here.
私は２、３秒のきわどいところで終バスに間に合った。I made the last bus by a few seconds.
その本の最終章は省略してよい。You can omit the last chapter of the book.
エコロジーのために堪え忍ぶのではなく、自然と調和した住環境の快適性が必要である。Not just for the sake of the ecology, a natural living environment is necessary.
その鉄道事故で死者三名、重軽傷者１０名が出た。Three persons were killed and ten were severely or slightly injured in the railway accident.
長寿とご幸福を祝して、乾杯。Here's to a long and happy life!
研究の初年度に、彼は自分がＡＬＳにかかっていることを知った。During the first year of his research, he learned he had ALS.
こんな所出よう！I wanna get out of here!
芸は身を助く。Accomplishments are a friend in need.


彼女は小うるさい女だ。She is like a hen with one chicken.
雨が小やみになった。The rains entered a lull.
小型車は低燃費で経済的だ。Small cars are very economical because of their low fuel consumption.
ヘビは小動物や小鳥をにらんですくませるといわれている。Snakes are said to mesmerize small animals and birds.
水曜日までに小論文を提出しなくてはなりません。We have to submit an essay by Wednesday.
「コーヒーのお替わりいる？」「うん、ぼくのは少なめ、弟のには多めについでね」"Do you want another cup of coffee?" "Sure, make mine on the small side but be generous with my brother's."
少子化と人口の老齢化を見越して業務内容を大幅に変更したあの会社は先見の明があったわけだ。It was very far-sighted for that company to change its policy to accommodate the decrease in numbers of children and the aging of society.
日本人が英語をしゃべる場合、パーティーとか少人数の気さくな集まりなどでの形式張らない会話に対応するのが困難であることがよくある。Japanese speakers of English often have difficulty in dealing with informal conversation, such as at parties or in small informal groups.
彼は仕事仲間を歓迎して家に招き入れた。He welcomed his fellow worker into his home.
太陽が照り輝いている。The sun is shining brightly.
アメリカでは信仰の自由は権利章典で保証されていることの一つである。In the U.S., freedom of religion is one of the guarantees of the Bill of Rights.
彼女は鏡に映った自分に笑いかけた。She smiled at herself in the mirror.
アトランタ行きの乗り継ぎ便はありますか。Can I get a connecting flight to Atlanta?
自分が集めた事実をもとにして、科学者は、その事実に意味と秩序と価値を与える論理の模様すなわち理論を織りあげるのである。Around his facts the scientist weaves a logical pattern or theory which gives the facts meaning, order, and significance.
私は成人の日に人々の色とりどりの着物を見るのが好きです。I love looking at everyone's colorful kimonos on Coming of Age Day.
豚の気持ちがよく解る、食いっぱぐれはないが飢えている。I know how Piggy feels. He starves without missing a meal.
いやぁ、昨日は入れ食いでねえ。They were biting like crazy yesterday.
人類は太古の昔から指を用いて食べ物を食してきたのである。People have eaten with their fingers from the beginning of history.

世論調査は政府の信用度の指標だ。Public opinion polls are barometers of confidence in the government.

その知らせは全く寝耳に水だった。The news hit me like a bolt from the blue.
彼は芝生の上に寝転がっている。He is lying on the grass.
ついに私は心ならずも彼の提案を受け入れた。At last I accepted his proposal against my will.
私って新しいもの好きで、店で新製品をみるとすぐ買ってしまう。でも、そのうち半分は失敗するね。I love trying out new things, so I always buy products as soon as they hit the store shelves. Of course, half the time I end up wishing I hadn't.

ボート競技に参加する為に新チームが結成された。A new team was formed in order to take part in the boat race.
その煙突は真っ黒い煙を噴出している。The chimney is belching black smoke.

その猫は飛びかかろうとして低く身構えた。The cat crouched down ready to jump.
彼は仕事の進め方について明確な考えを持っていない。He has no distinct idea of how to proceed.
あなたには、もっと人間らしく生きてほしいの。I want you to live more like a human being.
モントゴメリーのバスは人種隔離が行われていた。The buses in Montgomery were segregated.
金沢では吹雪くことがある。There are sometimes blizzards in Kanazawa.
波は岩に水しぶきをかけた。The waves sprayed the rocks with water.
苦労したのに全て水の泡だった。All my troubles came to nothing.
加盟国中数カ国は、Ｇ７の協定に従うことにあいまいな態度を見せています。Some member countries have been lax in abiding by G-7 agreements.
あなたが間違っている点が数カ所ある。There are a few points where you are mistaken.
溺死事件が数件あった。There were several deaths from drowning.
数行、手紙を書き送ります。I'll drop you a few lines.
あと数社の企業が同国の利益の高いペットフード市場に参入をねらっている。Several more companies are moving to enter the lucrative pet food market of the country.
交通渋滞で、車が数珠つなぎでした。The traffic was very heavy. The cars were lined up bumper to bumper.
わたしたちはみな、人生において成功を収めようとするが、成功するのは、きわめて数少ない人たちである。We all try hard to make the grade in life, but only a few succeed.
その話を信じるものは数多い。Many a man believes the story.
彼は世にもまれな大政治家である。He is as great a statesman as any.
あの家には清爽で行かねばならないですか。Do I have to fix up to go to their house?
君は生まれながらの詩人だ。You are made to be a poet.

彼はいつも惜しげもなく金を使う。He always spends his money freely.
彼に話しかけるのは石壁に話しかけるようなものだ。You may as well talk to a stone wall as to him.

白ワインと赤ワイン、どちらになさいますか。Would you like white wine or red?
白ワインと赤ワイン、どちらになさいますか。Would you like white wine or red?


川べりには工場の煙突が林のようにそそり立っている。The riverside bristles with factory chimneys.

服の選び方は保守的になってきている。The choice of clothes has become conservative.
指標は前月比４％上昇した。The index rose 4% from the preceding month.
この彼の小説は、前作より劣っています。This novel of his is inferior to the previous one.
あなたの都合のいい日時にミーティングを組み直してくださいませんか。Could you please re-schedule the meeting at your convenience?
アリには非常に組織だった社会がある。Ants have a well-organized society.
ますます多くの人が、その媒体の双方向的な性質を利用しようと躍起になっている。More and more people are rushing to make use of the interactive nature of the medium.
あんなに朝早くから来なくてもよかったのに。You needn't have come so early in the morning.
窓側の席をお願いします。I'd like a window seat, please.
意味のある変革がなされるならば、私は政治改革に総じて賛成だ。In the main, I am in favor of political reform if meaningful changes are made.
授業が終わるとすぐに彼らは教室から走り出た。As soon as the lesson was over, they rushed out of the room.
君は私の知っている中で憎たらしいほど機知に富んだ人だよ。You are the wickedest witty person I know.

このコーヒー店には芸術家を志すものが足しげく通う。This coffee shop is frequented by aspiring artists.
あの政治家に会うつもりなら、袖の下を使わない限り駄目だね。That politician won't meet you unless you grease his palm.
お名前はよく存じあげています。I am familiar with your name.
トムによって、メアリー様は利益を約束する略奪の尊師の一つしかありません。According to Tom, Mary is just a predatory guru who promises gain.
もっと運動しなさい、さもないと太り過ぎになりますよ。Do more exercise, or you'll get too fat.
定期雑誌類は閲覧室より帯出禁止。Periodicals may not be removed from the reading room.
転石苔むさず。A rolling stone gathers no moss.
ブローカーは円高のおかげで大もうけしました。Brokers made a killing because of the high yen.
監督は彼を大リーグに復帰させた。The manager has put him back in the major league.
私が大金持ちだと思ってくれては困る。Don't think I'm made of money.
その少年は大人びて見えた。The boy looked like a grown-up.
あの学者は、科学的な大発見をした。That scholar made a great scientific discovery.
放課後は練習で大忙しです。I am very busy practicing after school.
彼女の無事を知らされて、彼は安堵のため息をついた。Informed of her safety, he breathed a sigh of relief.
ここの地ビールは美味しい。The local brew is excellent.
その雑誌は彼の恥ずべき秘密を暴露しましたね。The magazine revealed all his dirty secrets.
その先生は私たちの学校で一番の着こなし上手とみなされている。The teacher is counted the best dresser in our school.
着の身着のままで火事から逃げた。I escaped from the fire with nothing but the clothes on my back.

駐禁で切符を切られた直後にＵターン禁止でつかまった。運が悪いというか、弱り目に祟り目というか。It wasn't my lucky day. First, I got a parking ticket and then things went from bad to worse when I got pulled over for making a U-turn.

彼は文句無しの巨人だ。He is altogether a giant.
あの美しいシーンが目に浮かぶ。The beautiful scene comes to my mind.
あの男に頼みごとをしても無駄だ。It is no use asking a favor of that man.
この小説は読むたびごとに実におもしろいと思う。Every time I read this novel, I find it very interesting.
もっと繊維質を取りなさい。You need to eat more fiber.
調査官がその場を去る時、そこはまったく目茶苦茶だった。When he left the place, it was in an utter mess.
講演は長たらしくて私はつまらなくなった。The lengthy lecture palled on me.
長期間の練習が彼が流暢な英語を話すことを可能にした。Long practice enabled him to speak fluent English.
長年の夢がやっと実現した。My long cherished dream finally came true.
この代用貨幣では、会社の直営店に行き、その店で食料品や衣料を買うことしかできませんでした。With the token they could only go to the company shop and buy food or clothing from that shop.
賃料が手頃なら、どんなマンションでも構いません。Any apartment will do as long as the rent is reasonable.


アイドルのコンサート会場に、追っかけのファンがウジャウジャ集まっていた。At the pop star's concert the fans were swarming around the foot of the stage.
一言苦言を呈したい。Let me give you a piece of advice.その界隈は行事で活気を呈している。The neighborhood is alive with activities.
私はちゃんとした庭付きの家が欲しい。I want to have a proper house and garden.
乗組員の何人かは溺れ死んだ。Some of the crew were drowned.
彼はドア一面緑色で塗りたくった。He painted the door green all over.
家に着くやいなや、彼は床に倒れ込んだ。On arriving home, he laid himself on the floor.

農夫たちは干天のため冬作の穀物は不作だろうとなげいた。The farmers complained that because of the dry weather there would be a poor harvest of winter grain.
同社は東証に上場している。The company is listed on the Tokyo Stock Exchange.
当会の大会は毎年１２月に開かれる。The general meeting of our society is held in December every year.
つり革につかまりなさい。電車がすぐ動き出すだろうから。Hold on to the strap. The train will start to move soon.
私と同年代の人は皆これについて同じ考え方をする。People of my generation all think the same way about this.
私達は道すがらずっと低速で運転しなければならなかった。We had to drive slowly all the way.
私は読みかけていて所がわからなくなった。I have lost my place.
トムはメアリーを口説きおとすことができなかった。メアリーはトムのデートの要求を突っぱねたから。Tom couldn't make the grade with Mary; she refused him when he asked her for a date.






感情によって理性が曇らされているままにしておくならば、我々は、常に見当違いのことをしてしまうだろう。If we let our reasoning power be overshadowed by our emotions, we would be barking up the wrong tree all the time.
下手な職人はいつも道具に難くせをつける。A bad workman always blames his tools.
２日間、雨が降り続いている。It has been raining for two days.


彼女は入退院を繰り返している。She is constantly in and out of hospital.
今晩は少し熱っぽいのです。I feel a bit feverish tonight.
自動車の売れ行きは年度末に後退しました。Automobile sales suffered a setback at the end of the financial year.
どうぞ、皆様も最後の一瞬まで粘り抜いてください。Will everyone please stick with it to the last moment.
馬の背にまたがり野山を走り回った。I rode all over the countryside on horseback.
彼は困難を排して進んでいった。He made his way through difficulties.
車の排ガスは有毒である。Exhaust gases of a car are noxious.
背もたれもっと倒せるよ。That seat reclines further.
もう電子レンジは買い換えてもいい頃です。It is about time we bought a new microwave oven.
彼らはこの品物を海外で安く買い付け、国内で高い値段をつけて売る。They buy these goods cheaply overseas and then mark them up to resell at home.

おじいさんが彼に、その高いおもちゃを買い与えた。His grandfather bought him the expensive toy.
商人は商品を売り買いする人だ。A merchant is a person who buys and sells goods.
マルさんはテーブルの下から這い出した。Maru crawled out from under the table.


トルストイは世界的名声を博した。Tolstoy achieved worldwide fame.
肌あれがひどいのです。I have a serious skin problem.
非の打ち所がない計画は、窮屈だなあ。A faultless plan is stifling, isn't it?

彼は筆まめだ。He is a good correspondent.
その女の子はひどく不美人というほどではなかった。The girl was not downright homely.
封切られたばかりの映画はなんですか。What movies just opened?
彼は風の音に耳を澄ましながら、長い間座っていた。He sat for a long time, listening to the sound of the wind.

その市は一週間後に平穏に復した。The city was restored to tranquility after a week.
奴は腹の中で笑っているに違いない。I know he's laughing up his sleeve.


ほとんどの物書きは批評に敏感である。Most writers are sensitive to criticism.

彼は、隣の人が飼い犬が彼の庭に走り込んでくるのを放りっぱなししているのに腹を立てた。He was furious at his neighbor for allowing their dog to run into his yard.
リプレーする度に彼女の反応にいちいち萌えてしまいます。I find myself being enthralled by her reaction each time I replay it.
私はおばあさんの顔をもう忘れかけている。I am already forgetting my grandmother's face.
太陽は地平線下に没した。The sun went below the horizon.
本状には微妙な情報が含まれており、気分を害することがあるかもしれない。This letter contains sensitive information that may offend some people.
私は急いで運転することで時間がないのを埋め合わさなければならない。I must make up for lost time by driving fast.

最近まではわれわれは石油を当然視していた。Until recently we took oil for granted.

血を見て彼は胸が悪くなった。The sight of blood turned his stomach.





彼は親離れしている。He is independent of his parents.








私には未処理の仕事がまだたくさんある。I have a lot of work still outstanding.

彼の名演技に観客はやんやの喝采を送った。His great performance drew thundering applause from the audience.
明かり窓に届かない。I can't reach the transom.
１マイル歩くか歩かないうちに雷が鳴りだした。I had hardly walked a mile when it began to thunder.
肉体は滅んでいく。The flesh is mortal.

あの野暮ったい服を幾らで買ったのかと聞いただけで、彼女は逆上して私にくってかかってきた。I only asked her what she paid for that dull-looking dress and she flew off the handle at me.

彼は友愛会の会員だ。He is a member of the fraternity.
子供たちは遊び回っていた。The children were playing about.
夕空に映えて塔が美しく見える。The tower looks beautiful against the evening sky.
今日は私達の記念日なので、夕御飯もスペシャルでいこう。Today is our anniversary so let's make this a special dinner.
彼は私に悪態を浴びせかけた。He flung a stream of abuse at me.

国の財政は税収の落ち込みできわめて逼迫している。The government finances are severely constrained because of falling tax revenues.

私たちはお互い理解し合えた。We could understand each other.

２粒の涙が彼女のほおを流れ落ちた。Two tears fell down her cheeks.
彼らは定期旅客船に乗り込んだ。They went on board a liner.
両社の合併の知らせがきのう突然伝わった。The news of the merger of the two companies broke yesterday.
貿易は商品の両方向の流れ、すなわち輸出と輸入からなる。Foreign trade consists of a two-way flow of commodities: export and import.
彼女はその話に感動して涙した。She was moved to tears by the story.
彼は突然本当の事を話し出した。He suddenly came out with the truth.
帯に短し、襷に長し。Too much spoils, too little is nothing.
雨には降られるわ、デートに遅刻するわ、財布を落とすわ、今日は踏んだり蹴ったりだよ。I get caught in the rain, I'm late for my date, and I lose my pocketbook. It's just one thing after another today.










富士山に登るのに丸一晩かかった。It took all night to climb Mt Fuji.


彼女にばっちりキスされちゃったよ。She kissed me full on the lips.
いくら器だけを日本一にしても、中身が三流やったらな〜んの意味もないんちゃうの？The container may be the best in Japan, but if the contents are third class, then isn't it completely meaningless?


突然彼女は甲高い声で叫び出した。All at once she began to shout in a shrill voice.
ばかなまねをするのはよしなさい。皆さんに笑われますよ。Stop making a fool of yourself. Everyone is laughing at you.
彼女は怒りっぽい。She has a hot temper.



急いては事をし損ずる。Hurrying leads to mistakes being made.
信号機が赤の間は道路を渡るな。Don't cross the road when the signal is red.サダムが脅威でないなどと言うのは、赤がかった反戦運動の人達くらい。It's only the anti-war pinkos who say things like Saddam isn't a threat.
そして、だからこそ、ほぼ百年にわたって、従業員はだれでも雇用者のところに行って、現金による賃金支給を要求できるようになったのです。And that's why for almost a hundred years, any employee has been able to go to his employer and insist on being paid in cash.
あ、そうだったわね。じゃあ、みみっちいのはあんたの買い方ってことね。Oh yes, you're right. Well, it's the way you shop that's tight-fisted then.






中高年の人たちの大部分が将来に対して不安を感じていた。The majority of the middle-aged people felt anxiety for their future.































からだ全体が密に毛でおおわれている。The entire body is densely covered with hair.





オリーブオイルを１８ＭＴ注文します。We'd like to order 18 tonnes of olive oil.























































この宇宙には知的生命体が存在するのはまず間違いないと思うが、その生命体が地球に来る可能性は殆ど無し。I think it is certain that there is intelligent life in this universe, but the likelihood of that life coming to Earth is practically nil.



艱難汝を玉にす。Adversity makes a man wise, not rich.

彼は背水の陣で闘った。He fought a last-ditch battle.






先生に怒られたってへっちゃらだい。I couldn't care less if the teacher is mad at me.












儂の目もガタがきたかの。Have my eyes also started to fail?


消息筋によると、○○社は東証一部への上場を準備している。According to informed sources, ____ Ltd. is preparing for the move up to the first section of the Tokyo Stock exchange.




鳥類の発声において真に驚異的な点は、鳴管の２つの側面が独立して動くことができるということである。The truly remarkable feature of sound production by birds is that the two sides of the syrinx can act independently.
その小さな地方は州と呼ばれており、それぞれの州に州議会があります。ウェストハンプトン州議会もそのひとつです。These smaller parts are called counties, and each county has a county council, like Westhamptonshire County Council.





彼は偽小切手をつかまされた。He was cheated into accepting the forged check.
私は給与の５分の１を税金で取られてしまう。One-fifth of my wages go to taxes.


もうすぐ雨が降りそうだ。It is going to rain very soon.
課長が我々に対して、あれこれとうるさく言うのを止めた途端に、何もかもがスムーズに行き始めた。As soon as our manager got off our backs, everything started to go off without a hitch.
おやまあ、なんて大きな箱なの。My heavens, what an enormous box!


そうやってしつこく彼女を困らせると、彼女も怒り出すぞ。If you persist in bothering her like that, she'll lose her temper.
その音を聞くと犬は吠え出した。The noise set the dog barking.
ますます多くの医者がその新薬を使い出した。More and more doctors have begun to use the new medicine.
みんな２人ずつの組になって踊り出した。Everyone formed couples and began dancing.
ゆうべこの町に火事があったが、燃え出した正確な時刻はわからない。There was a fire in this city last night. We can't tell exactly what time it broke out.
ゆっくりと彼は状況が分かりだした。Only slowly did he begin to understand the situation.
私が父にもっとお金をくれと言ったら父はすごくかっとなって私に向かって怒鳴りだした。When I asked Dad for more money, he really blew up and started to yell at me.
私達は湖へ着くとすぐに泳ぎ出しました。As soon as we got to the lake, we started swimming.
車輪が回りだした。The wheel began to turn.
彼の妻は必要から働き出した。His wife has started to work out of necessity.
その火山は溶岩を流し出した。The volcano poured molten rock.
足掻きがとれない。She is struggling helplessly.


この歌は私に古き良き時代を思い出させる。This song reminds me of the good old days.
カール・ランジの記録破りの幅跳びに、観衆は息を呑んだ。Karl Lange's record breaking long jump took the crowd's breath away.




彼は美術館巡りでつかれていた。He was tired from walking round museums.

和平交渉がすでに秘密裡に開始されたとのことです。It is rumored that secret peace talks have already begun.
和平会談はしばらく延期された。The peace talks have been suspended for a while.
船内には混乱のあとは少しもなかった。There were no signs of disorder in the ship.



シップ・アイランドのあたりは、相も変わらぬ森林地帯で、相変わらず住む人とてなかった。The Ship Island region was as woody and tenantless as ever.
何か甘いものがほしい。I want something sweet to eat.





ミツバチは、においのサンプルを巣に持ち帰ることによって食糧のありかを伝える。Bees communicate the location of food by carrying odor samples back to the hive.







マックで軽く昼食をとって、スタバでコーヒーを飲んで、しゃぶしゃぶをしながら飲み会という流れだ。A light lunch at MacD's, coffee at Starbucks, then a few drinks with shabu-shabu - that's the way it went.






その旅人は空腹のために気を失ったが、すぐに正気づいた。The traveler fainted from hunger, but soon he came to.
今日では、アメリカで世界中のどこへ電報を打つにも電話で通信文を告げるだけでよい。Today, to send a telegram in the States to anywhere in the world, all you have to do is to give the message over the telephone.
下宿生たちは今休暇で不在です。The boarders are now away on vacation.
最上級生は週末にも図書館への入場許可がある。Senior students have access to the library at weekends.
飛行機は早割でとれば安いよ。The sooner you get your ticket, the cheaper the fare.
速度が遅いと熱発生は少なくなると考えられている。It is thought that the lower speed reduces heat generation.
猫に九生あり。A cat has nine lives.
彼女は何にでも首を突っ込みたがる。She is curious about anything.
ボブは兄より太りぎみだった。Bob was somewhat chubbier than his brother.
私は恐怖で気も狂わんばかりだった。I almost went crazy with fear.





どうやら食べ過ぎたみたいだ。I'm afraid I've eaten too much.
新期にスタートしたテレビ番組だが、あいも変わらず新味がないな。The new season's T.V. programs are as much old hat as ever.
すみませんが、お願いをきいてくださいませんか。Excuse me, but could you do me a favor?
人のことをじろじろ眺めるのは失礼だ。It isn't polite to stare at people.
滞英中、私は旅行の詳細を調べるためによくそのガイドブックを参照した。While in England, I often referred to the guidebook for details of my journey.
あなたはフランス語で用が足せますか。Can you make yourself understood in French?
学生は時間を浪費しがちである。Students are apt to waste time.





彼は、英語だけでなくタイ語も話せます。He can speak Thai as well as English.
彼は人が良さそうに見えるが本当は底意地が悪い。He seems nice, but he's wicked at heart.
「うへへ」おっかさんは首を振りながらクスクス笑った。"Hee hee," his mother chuckled, shaking her head.
外国へ行って１ヶ月も経たぬうちに、彼は病気になった。He had not been abroad for one month before he was taken ill.
























やったと思った。I felt I had hit the jackpot.
「もうおいとまします」と彼は出し抜けに言った。"Now I must say good-bye," he said suddenly.
トムは今日給料をもらったのでふところがあったかい。Tom is flush with money since he got paid today.
レジャー産業は新たなリゾート地にさらなる投資をしています。The leisure industry is sinking more money into new resorts.




いくどとなくおのを埋めては、きまって、また、ほりかえす。永遠の平和がやってくる気配もない。After countless burials of the hatchet, we always dig it up again. There doesn't seem to be any sign of an ever-lasting peace.
何か言うことがあれば、今言ってくれ。さもなくば黙っていてくれ。If you have something to say, say it now or pipe down.

気楽に行こうぜ。大丈夫、形勢は君に有利なのだから。Take it easy. I can assure you that chances are in your favor.
とにかく、言いづらい事を打ち明けてくれてうれしいよ。Anyway, I'm glad you were able to broach this difficult subject.
質問がとても分かりづらく、彼らは皆混乱してしまいました。The question was so complicated that they were all mixed up.


宮殿は物々しい警戒ぶりだった。The palace was heavily guarded.
彼らは次から次へとここへやってきた。They came here one after another.
木片は１本の留め木で留めてある。The wooden pieces are fastened with a peg.
私はその事件ではもう匙を投げた。I have given up on that case.
ここ数年南ア連邦は人種問題をかかえてきた。The Union of South Africa has had racial problems in recent years.

泥だらけの足で居間をどたどたあるいてはいけない。Don't tramp in the living room with muddy feet.

彼は上司の受けが悪い。He gets along badly with his boss.

熱が出るとひきつけを起こすことがあります。Convulsions can occur when they run a fever.
彼が天才であるというのは言い過ぎではない。It is not too much to say that he is a genius.
劇のこっけいな場面はやり過ぎであった。The comic scenes in the play were overdone.
お間違えではないでしょうか。I'm afraid you have the wrong number.







そうさなんでも好きなものでいいんだ。Yes, you can celebrate anything you want.

お礼の申しようもありません。I can't thank you enough.












ワイルダー氏よりあなたのメールアドレスを伺いました。Mr Wilder gave me your e-mail address.


すぐに医者が呼びにやられた。A doctor was sent for at once.
彼女の髪は白髪まじりだ。Her hair is streaked with gray.

彼の袖が油まみれのなべに触れた。His sleeve touched the greasy pan.
岩は丘の斜面を転がり落ちた。The rock rolled down the hillside.
修学旅行では、よく枕投げをした。I had a lot of pillow fights during my school trip.
私たちは皆がやれるように順番にボール投げをした。We threw the ball in turn so that everyone could have a try.
見切り売りでたくさんもうけた。The rummage sale netted me a profit.
彼女はその申し出に見向きもしない。She won't even look at the offer.
彼女は３時間テレビを見続けている。She has been watching television for three hours.
あんな物を投げ下ろせば、運悪く当たった人は、ケガをする。If you throw something like that down, if someone's unlucky enough to be hit they'll be injured.
祖父は９０歳代である。My grandfather is in his nineties.
私は彼女を知らないしまた知りたいとも思わない。I don't know her and I don't think I want to.









空の旅ほどよいものはない。There is nothing like air travel.
グライダーは空高く舞い上がった。The glider soared high into the air.








ケンさん、君は本気かい。Are you on the level, Ken?
私たちは木の実をゆり落とした。We shook nuts from the tree.
柄にもないことを言うな。Don't speak out of line.




そこにいる間、生活の糧はどうするのだ。What will you live on while you are there?渇した者に水を、飢えたる者には糧を与えよ。Give water to the thirsty and food to the hungry.もしも、音楽が愛の糧であるならば、奏で続けよ。If music be the food of love, play on.

そんなんじゃいつまで経っても奨励賞止まりだぞ？With that sort of attitude you'll never get past the honourable-mention prizes.






「状況報告を」「現在目標は目視４。最大７か。小口径火器を所有」"Situation report." "At present 4 in sight. At most probably 7. Holding small calibre arms."
何故か鷹派と目される人たちが、ことごとく苦手。For some reason, I don't cope well with those recognized as hardliners.

使用許諾契約書の条項に同意されない場合は、未開封のメディアパッケージを速やかにABC社に返送していただければ、商品代金を全額払い戻し致します。In the case of not agreeing to the conditions of the usage consent contract, promptly return the unopened media package to ABC for a full refund.



この鍋物はえぐいよ。This stew tastes acrid.
どこもかしこも人が混んでいるようだ。Everywhere seems to be crowded.






私はその記事を旅行専門誌に採用してもらった。I had the article accepted by a travel magazine.

山の麓に日が昇るが早いかただ一人山を登り始めた。The sun had barely risen at the foot of the mountain when she set out alone up the slope.
そこに出かけるやいなや彼女は病気になった。No sooner had she gone there than she was taken ill.

そうだ、どうせなら散歩がてらに、林道に行ってプチ森林浴でも・・・。Right, while we're taking a walk anyway, we could like go along the woodland path and enjoy a little stroll through the forest...




実際にこれらの目標を実現するのに欠くべからざる役割を果たしてきた。These bodies have actually played indispensable roles in attaining these goals.
降伏するくらいなら死んだほうが増しだ。I would rather die than yield.
パン半分でもないよりはまし。Half a loaf is better than none.


どうぞお体を大切に。Please take good care of yourself.

首相のスキャンダル釈明は国民にとって見え見えだった。The Prime Minister's explanation of the scandal just wouldn't wash with the public.

われわれは英検２級に受かるために勉強しているのです。We are studying in order to pass the STEP 2nd grade test.
「どんなことでも直ぐに分かります、・・・ググれば」「ググれば？」"You can know anything instantly ... if you Google it." "Google?"








アーケード天井にたくさんの張りぼてが飾られてた。The shopping arcade was covered with lots of paper decorations.




どの官庁もお役所主義にはまり込まないで、仕事のスピードアップをはかるという点において問題があるようだ。Every government office seems to have problems in expediting matters without entanglement in its red tape system.







部長カンカンになって怒ってたぞ。お前何をしたんだよ。The section chief was really livid. What did you do?





カラオケ、ゲーム、ビデオに冷蔵庫・・・今のラブホってなんでもあるのねー。Karaoke, TV games, videos and a fridge ... love hotels nowadays really have everything.










彼はより良い生活を求めてブラジルに移住した。He immigrated to Brazil in search of a better life.
彼は夜遅くまでギターの練習をする。He practices playing the guitar far into the night.その夜遅くに彼女に会った。I met her late in the evening.




彼の声明文は次の通りだ。His statement runs as follows.











あいつは馬鹿だから、怖いもの知らずだ。He is too dumb to fear danger.
























だれもかれも何が起こったのかしりたがっていた。Everybody was anxious to know what had happened.パーティーにいた人は誰もかも彼女の優雅さに魅せられた。Everybody at the party was charmed with her grace.




君の忠誠を当てにしてもいいかい。Can I count on your loyalty?





オレ、教室で屁をこいちゃったんっすよ。んでもって先生に追い出されちゃって。I farted in class, and the teacher threw me out.










へえ、きっとスポーツが得意なんだろうね。Oh, you must be good at sports.




アメリカでは杯やコーヒーメーカーを結婚式で花嫁にプレゼントすることがよくあります。In the U.S., it is common to give a present, such as glasses or a coffee-maker, to the bride at weddings.何杯か飲むと、その男は酔って気持ちよくなった。After a couple of drinks, the guy was feeling no pain.




彼のビジネスプランは立派だけど、勘定あって銭足らず、という気もするけどね。His business plan looks good on paper but I get the feeling it would never work in practice.








気にすんなって。Don't worry about it!

















めったに乗らないヨットなんてただの金食い虫だ。It's just throwing money away to have a yacht you rarely use.


彼はあつかましくも私にききもしないで私の車をもっていった。He had the nerve to take my car without asking.








一時間したら行ってきます。I'm going out in an hour.

アドレス帳がバグってしまい、あなたのを含むたくさんのアドレスが消えてしまいました。There was a bug in my Address Book and many addresses including yours were deleted.














彼女は気を失ったが、数分後に意識を取り戻した。She fainted but came to after a few minutes.






遠距離恋愛をしたことはありますか。Have you ever been in a long distance relationship?










私は彼と学校に行くのが常でした。I used to go to school with him.
その結果、５月下旬に不安神経症や不眠症と診断された。As a result, he was diagnosed with insomnia and anxiety neurosis near the end of May.
日本は一見天下泰平だが、実はいろいろな根深い問題を抱えている。Japan may appear to be peaceful and tranquil on the surface but the fact is that there are a lot of deep-rooted problems.

その若い娘はわっと泣き出した。The young girl burst into tears.









私は１０時ごろ寝ついた。I went to sleep about 10 o'clock.
通路側の席をお願いします。I'd like an aisle seat, please.
私のことはほっといて。Let me alone.
彼は「俺のことはほっといてくれ」と言ったんだ。He said: "Leave me alone."



彼女は目立ちたがり屋だ。She is very fond of standing out.















この本を読んでしまったら遊びに行っていい？May I go out to play when I have read this book?
彼が宝石箱を開けると彼女は目を見張った。She was all eyes as he opened the jewelry box.






花子はオットリしているようで、やるときはやる人間だ。Hanako seems quiet, but she gets things done when it's necessary.


軽い昼食をとりました。I had a light lunch.


何か、全部、こじつけって感じがするんだけど・・・。Somehow, all those reasons sound rather far fetched.

物心ついて以来はこんな美しい夜を見たことがない。It's the most beautiful night I've seen since I can remember.
多民族国家で言語を統一することは難しい。It's difficult to standardize language for a multi-ethnic nation.
アジアには多民族が住んでいる。Many peoples live in Asia.
陳列品に手を出すな。Do not touch the exhibits.














「そっかぁ、アルクさんはワーウルフなんですね」「俺は混血だから変身したりはしねーよ」"Oh, right, you're a werewolf, aren't you?" "I'm mixed blood, so I don't transform or anything."





彼は問題提起した。He raised a problem.















とてもお腹がすいていた。I was very hungry.

時に鈴木の件について聞いたか。By the way, have you heard about Suzuki?犯罪は時に法律を知らないために引き起こされる。Crimes sometimes result from ignorance of the law.
おんどりに時を告げさせるのは、めんどりである。It is the hen that makes the rooster crow.







最近は、年下のくせにため口を聞く奴が多すぎる。These days more and more young people talk to their elders on even terms.









会社に戻らず直帰することを上司に電話で伝えた。I told my boss over the phone that I would be going straight home without returning to the company.


































































その選手はこの大会で三回連続優勝した。That athlete won three times in a row in this tournament.















私の自宅の電話番号は市外局番が２０１で１２３ー４５６７番です。My home phone number is, area code two-oh-one, one-two-three, four-five-six-seven.６時からずっと待っているのだが、僕の番がまだ来ない。I've been waiting since six o'clock and still my turn hasn't come.























































































































































































あの男を一目見るだけで気分が悪くなると彼女が言った。She said that the mere sight of him made her sick.




























旅館は、上げ膳据え膳がうれしいね。At a Japanese-style inn, they take care of your every need, so you don't have to lift a finger.


























論争にやっとけりが付いた。The dispute was finally settled.
共通の利害をもった両当事者がけんか腰でいたとき、彼が間に入って、いさかいにけりをつけた。Two different parties with common interests were on the warpath when he cut in to settle the dispute.



その男が、自分は百万長者だとあのきれいな女の子にいったことはまるっきり眉唾だった。The man's statement to the pretty girl that he was a millionaire was all eye-wash.


セフレが足りないっていうの？You mean you're short on fuck-buddies?





「お前に付き合うほど暇じゃない」「なんかしょぼんだよぉ」"I haven't got the time to keep up with you." "That's rather depressing."












何かが私の腕をはい上がってくるのを感じた。I felt something crawling up my arm.





ちょっとそこまでコーヒーを飲みに行く。Come round the corner for coffee.






コンピューターのマニュアルを読むだけでは所詮畳の上の水練だ。Just reading a computer manual is like practicing swimming on dry land.


























その場しのぎの対策では麻薬中毒問題に切り込むことはできないでしょう。Stopgap measures won't make a dent in drug addiction.
























ネタバレは禁止です。No spoilers, please!






























「それよりそのカッコ・・・水着！？」「そうよ。イケてるでしょー！？ムラムラする〜？」"Never mind that, what's with that get up ... a swimming suit!?" "That's right. Sexy isn't it? Feeling horny?"
ツベルクリン反応は疑陽性でした。The tuberculin reaction was pseudopositive.





「愛と哀しみの果て」は俗受けしたけど何といっても映像のきれいな映画だった。Although it was a popular movie, Out of Africa was more of a coffee-table movie than anything else.
いつもの列車に乗り遅れたものですから。It's because I missed my usual train.
私の参謀としてついたからには、危機感を持って任にあたって貰わねば困ります。If you're with me as a staff officer, then I need you to bring a sense of danger with you to your work.


私が彼にテニスで勝つのは不可能ではないにしても、難しい。It is difficult, if not impossible, for me to beat him at tennis.あなたのおっしゃることは認めるにしても、私はやはりあなたが悪いと思います。Even given what you say, I still think you are to blame.彼はいつも何をするにしてもゆっくりやる。He always takes his time in everything he does.
何事にせよ最善を尽くしなさい。You should do your best in everything.

うちのかみさんは元プロレスラーで、だからもし私が浮気をしているところを見つかりでもしようものなら、それこそコテンパンにやられてしまうよ。My wife used to be a pro-wrestler, so if she ever catches me two-timing her, I'd be beaten to a pulp.


ぎょうざの具のあまりは？餃子を家で作りましたが、皮が少なかったせいか、具が少し余ってしまいました。Gyoza stuffing? I made some gyoza at home but, possibly because I didn't have enough dough, I had some of the filling left over.



父が寝たきりなので私たちが交代で面倒をみています。Since our father is bedridden, we take turns looking after him.
翌朝まで待つしかなかった。There was nothing to do but wait until the next morning.金は少ししかない。I have little money.バスは２時間に一本しかないのよ。There is only one bus every two hours.


「盲人」を「目の不自由な人」とする言い換えが提案された。It was proposed that the term "blind person" be replaced with the term "visually impaired person".
その釣り人は釣り糸に強い引きを感じた。The angler felt a strong tug on the line.

いいえ、今すぐに行く必要はありません。No, you needn't go right now.


数歩先で小さな子がつまずいて転ぶのを見た。I saw a little boy fall over a few steps ahead.
インターネットのテクノロジーは日進月歩、いや、秒進分歩で進歩している。Day by day and month by month, Internet technology is growing. Actually, make that second by second and minute by minute.




その映画はお涙頂戴ものだ。The movie is a stereotyped sob story.


浅学非才の私ではありますが、何とぞ皆様のお力を賜りたく、ここにお願い申し上げる次第です。I may not have much to offer in the way of learning or ability, but I want to do whatever I can for us all and humbly ask for your favor.




それは今でも男女を問わず愛読されている本です。It is, even now, a book loved by men and women alike.
いやでもその仕事をしなければならない。You must do the work even if you don't like it.


我々は決定にあたって偏見に左右されるべきではない。We should not be influenced in our decisions by our prejudices.

仕事はあとどれだけ残っていますか。How much more work do you have?













俺が日本の総理大臣ならクリントンにガツンと言ってやるのになあ。If I were prime minister, I'd give Clinton a good talking to.




旅行会社は旅行の詳細を全て私たちに教えてくれた。The travel company furnished us with all the details of the tour.








雨天中止になりそうな計画だな。That's a plan that sounds likely to be cancelled by rain.


オランダ語はドイツ語と密接なつながりがある。Dutch is closely related to German.

「ウィキペディアを引用するな」という主張が昨日だか一昨日だかの朝日新聞に載っていた。The exhortation "Don't quote Wikipedia" was included in the Asahi newspaper of yesterday or the day before.








粘液便がでます。I have mucous in my stool.

杳として行方が知れない。Nothing whatever is known of him.

いずれにせよ、その隔たりは現実のものであり、実際に役に立つものではあるのだが、同時にそれは誤解を招くおそれのあるものでもある。In either case, the division is real and useful; but it can also be misleading.









お言葉に甘えてお借りいたします。I will borrow it then, if you insist.









顧問は学長を推戴し、本会の重要事項に関し諮問に応じる。The consultant, who is under the authority of the Chancellor, gives the committee advice on important questions.

ご希望に沿うように努力します。I'll try to meet your wishes.


日が経つにつれて、天気は次第に悪化しつつあった。The weather was getting worse and worse as the day went on.
その風習はすたれつつある。That custom is on the decrease.
１日ではたべきれないほどのリンゴがある。We have more apples than we could eat in a day.


男でも女でも腹が据わっているってのはカッコいいですよね。People are cool when they're gutsy, doesn't matter if they're men or women.




登録の必要のない試用版は配ってもかまいません。It is OK to redistribute the unregistered trial version.
















canは助動詞ですので、疑問文では文頭に持ってきます。'can' is an auxiliary verb, so in question sentences it is brought to the start of the phrase.






疑いの余地はほとんどない。There is little room for doubt.
みんなの話からすると、それは真実だろう。By all accounts, it's the truth.
君が僕の立場だったら、どうするかね。What would you do if you were in my place?










彼には娘は目にいれても痛くない。His daughter is very dear to him.
動詞は述語動詞のことです。述語動詞は、主語や表す時によって形を変えます。'Verb' refers to the predicate verb. Predicate verbs change their form depending on the subject and the time expressed.


彼らはみんな腹を抱えて笑った。They were all in convulsions of laughter.

彼はこのあたりの店では顔がきくんだ。He's a regular at the bars and pubs around here.

このようなものを修飾語と呼ばずに、付加語(A)と呼んでいる文法書もあります。There are grammar books that call these sorts of things, not modifiers, but adjuncts (A).








明夜は、成田空港に行く。Tomorrow night, I am going to Narita airport.





彼には手を焼いた。I didn't get anywhere with him.
この30年間、広告会社は大手たばこ会社のお客をのどから手が出るほど欲しがった。For the last 30 years, ad agencies would kill for a major tobacco account.この時計、喉から手が出るほど欲しかったんだ。I wanted this watch so badly I could taste it.
そのテーマパークは先月閉園になった。The theme park was closed down last month.







人に足下を見られるなよ。Don't let anyone take advantage of you.






名詞を修飾するものは、形容詞または形容詞相当語句です。Things that modify nouns are adjectives or equivalent to adjectives.




あの犬はしっぽが短い。That dog has a short tail.かぜには大食、熱には小食。Feed a cold and starve a fever.母はぜったいに早起きはしない。My mother never gets up early.
「あの音で考え事ができないわ」と、彼女はタイプライターを見つめながら言った。"I can't think with that noise," she said, staring at the typewriter.言うまでもないことだがローマは１日にしては成らず。It goes without saying that Rome was not built in a day.
アンデルセンも犬を恐がった。Andersen was afraid of dogs, too.４０％もの生徒が大学に進学する。No less than 40 percent of students go on to university.
金持ちが必ずしも幸福とは限らない。The rich are not always happy.
あなたはすぐにそこの食べ物や飲み物の楽しみ方がわかってくるでしょう。You'll soon come to enjoy the food and drink here.僕は水泳が下手やねん。I'm not very good at swimming.これじゃあ、僕は一生結婚なんて出来やしないや。I guess I'm never going to get married.
数分間、時間をさいてくれませんか。助けていただきたいのですが。Can you spare me a few minutes? I need your help.キャシーがパーティーで何を着ていたか覚えていますか。Do you remember what Kathy had on at the party?お茶かコーヒーでもいかがですか。Would you like tea or coffee?
キャシーがパーティーで何を着ていたか覚えていますか。Do you remember what Kathy had on at the party?彼らは次の日曜日で二ヶ月当地に滞在していることになる。They will have been staying here for two months next Sunday.賭け率２対１でレッズが勝つだろう。The odds are two-to-one that the Reds win.
彼は日曜日に部屋を掃除した。He cleaned his room on Sunday.彼は東京に住んでいます。He lives in Tokyo.彼は東京を離れて京都に向かった。He left Tokyo for Kyoto.
あれらはあちこちへと移動していきます。They move from place to place.
父は私の楽観を乱さないことにした。My father chose not to disturb my optimism.私は教室で自分の声を届かせることができなかった。I couldn't make myself heard in the classroom.私たちは小さなボートで川を下った。We went down the river in a small boat.
パーティーに行くことにしたものの、気が進まない。Though I have decided to go to the party, I'm not looking forward to it.

やってみたら簡単でした。I found it easy when I gave it a try.あの男がもう１つでも間違いを犯したらクビにする。If that man makes one more mistake, I'll fire him.うちの父ったら、夜私を一人で外へ出してくれないの。My father doesn't let me go out alone at night.
何人も空の胃の腑では愛国者たり得ない。No man can be a patriot on an empty stomach.
あらゆる国の歴史は男なり女なりの心の中に始まる。The history of every country begins in the heart of a man or a woman.しかし城にたどりつくなり、近衛兵を率いた人によって、わたしはこの牢獄に勾引されてしまった。However, when I finally reached the castle I was thrown into this prison by the commander of the imperial guard.彼は一週間前に家を出たなり帰ってこない。He hasn't come home since he left last week.
いいお天気ですね。It's a beautiful day, isn't it?彼ね、学校を退学になったの。He ended up expelled.
１０００円かそこらで買えますよ。You can buy it for a thousand yen or so.恋人よ、我に帰れ。Lover, come back to me.
あなたの髪は長いわね。What long hair you've got!
本末を転倒するな。Don't put the cart before the horse.あっちへ行きな、ぼうや。Out of my way, boy.なあ、トム、悩みごとなんか忘れちゃって。Hey, Tom, forget about your worries.
そして、どうすることも出来ない物憂さに、ふっとため息をつく。And then I breathe a sigh from melancholy in being unable to do anything about it.ベストをつくしたら後はくよくよ考えないことさ。Do your best and don't worry.事故で車は全損って嘆いているけどさ、怪我がなくてなにより、命あっての物種だよ。I know you're upset about your car being totaled, but you weren't injured and you should be thankful to be alive.
そろそろ寝る時間だぞ。It's time you went to bed.







可算名詞か不可算名詞かどちらかを従えている表現を2つ書け。Write two expressions that are followed by either count or non-count nouns in conversation.



そのような教師は仕事から身を引いたほうがいい。Such a teacher may as well retire from his work.




輸入量の急激な増加に我々は驚いた。The rapid increase of imports surprised us.
場合によりけりだと思います。I think it depends.


えっへんと大いばりでアリスは胸を張った。"A-hem!" Alice boasted, puffing up with pride.





前髪は短く切りすぎないでください。Don't cut it too short in the front.
明日になればきっと天候もよくなるだろう。The weather is bound to get better tomorrow.







































意思疎通がうまくいかない所では、活動もうまくいかない。Where communications fail, so do activities.




君がそれを知らないのは遺憾千万だ。It is a great pity that you don't know it.








なんで俺だけが文句言われるのかな。一罰百戒のつもりでスケープゴートにされたんじゃかなわないよ。Why am I the only one they complain about? They're just making an example out of me and using me as a scapegoat.

































ボスの経費チェックは厳しいね。まさに、眼光紙背に徹す、だよ。When the boss checks our expenses it can be pretty dicey. He knows how to read between the lines.











































































たまに彼女の自由奔放な態度は無礼に見えることがある。Sometimes her free manner seems rude.さすが、お嬢様。自由奔放な生活をしていたわけじゃないんだ。Just what you'd expect of a young lady, you certainly weren't left to live as you pleased.



















































資金難で我々は前途多難だ。Our future will be full of difficulties because of lack of funds.



マイホームは一生の買い物だからね、そんな即断即決はできないよ。A home is a once-in-a-lifetime purchase so you don't want to make any snap decisions.



大山鳴動してねずみ一匹。The mountains have brought forth a mouse.

































































































また、お説教が始まった。一言居士の面目躍如というところだね。Uh-oh, here comes another lecture. This guy likes to show he has something to say about everything.
孟母三遷の教えなど持ち出して、子供のお受験での引っ越しを正当化しないでよ。Don't drag out Chinese sayings about the importance of an environment conducive to learning just to justify moving for a child's entrance exams!



















































はがき大のボール紙を５枚用意してください。Prepare five postcard sized pieces of cardboard.
























英語を声を出して読むべきだ。You ought to read English aloud.
その少年は両親の言うことを聞く。The boy is obedient to his parents.
もうすぐ夜があけるよ。The day is breaking soon.







































市場は全面安ですね。The market prices have fallen across the board.









彼は頼り甲斐のある上司だ。He is a dependable boss.
この車は直しても甲斐が無い。This car isn't worth repairing.
このため、今夜から明日にかけて全般に曇りや雨の天気でしょう。Because of this it will probably be generally cloudy and rainy weather over tonight and tomorrow.神にかけて真実を語る事を誓う。I swear by God that I will speak the truth.
あまりそれを鼻にかけるな。Don't boast too much about that.
ただし、安全日だからって、中出ししても妊娠しないというわけではないらしいです。However, it seems that just because it's a 'low risk day' doesn't mean that you won't get pregnant from intravaginal ejaculation.









彼はその仕事にかけては老練な人だ。He is an old hand at that work.
彼女が我が子に手をかけた。She laid hands on her own child.


毎日一生懸命に英語を勉強したが、あまり身につかなかった。I studied English very hard every day, but I didn't learn a lot.

自分の力で宿題をやりなさい。Do your homework for yourself.
その店は休日の買い物客で混み合っていた。The store was crowded with holiday shoppers.
先生でさえその問題は解けなかった。Even the teacher could not solve the problem.
国立公園によって、シャワーや託児施設まで提供してくれるところもある。Some national parks offer showers and even baby-sitting services.





















うちの会社は頭でっかちだ。Our company is too top-heavy.彼は頭でっかちだ。He is an armchair theorist.











危なく車にひかれるところだった。I was nearly run over by a car.




錦あやなす木々で山が染まっていた。The mountainside was ablaze with the autumn colors of the trees.
君はただ皿を洗いさえすればいい。All you have to do is wash the dishes.


農夫は荒くれ馬にじっと我慢した。The farmer was patient with the unruly horse.









教師にあるまじき行為だ。Such conduct is unworthy of a teacher.
スロットを打っているうちに、あれよあれよと今の時間です。I was hitting the slots, and before I knew it, it's this time already.



選挙で小泉氏はすでに安全圏に入った。Mr Koizumi is now sure of election.








言いつけどおりにしなければならない。You must do as you are told.





行き当たりばったりの仕事をするな。Don't leave everything to chance.
















お母さんがとても痛がっているのが分かった。I could see that my mother was in a lot of pain.







なんて可愛い子なの。いないいないばー。What a cute baby! Peek-a-boo!

ダイレクト・マーケティングは人々が家に居ながらにして買い物が出来る方法である。Direct marketing is a means of allowing people to shop from home.






何か飲み物をいれましょうか。Can I get you something to drink?













彼はいつもよからぬ事を企んでいる。He is always up to no good.





彼は薄暗がりと戦いながら、彼等の名前を数えていった。Fighting the fading light he continued to count their names.















留学中に鬱になったときはどうすれば？What should I do if I become depressed while studying abroad?



競馬で万馬券を当ててウハウハなんだ。I'm tickled pink about winning 10,000 yen at the horse races.
暴力や脅しによって金品を奪い去る事件も多発している。Also many incidents of robbery by threats and violence are occurring.
彼女はうふふと照れながらコンドームを差し出した。Giggling with embarrassment, she held out the condom.
そのうぶな男は彼女を前にしてすっかりどぎまぎしていた。The naive man was utterly embarrassed in her presence.
















電車の中を子供がウロチョロしていて不愉快だった。I felt uncomfortable with those kids loitering around in the train.


彼は２度と彼女に会えないよう運命づけられていた。He was destined never to meet her again.




当然ですが先生は英仏語とも理解できますけれど。Obviously the teacher can understand both English and French.


喉がいがらっぽい感じがします。My throat feels dry and raw and scratchy.
上司にやれと言われた仕事をエッチラオッチラやっています。My supervisor is making me do this so I'm in no hurry to finish.




えへへへ、私は運痴だから、ちょっと走ると、すぐに脇腹が痛くなっちゃうの。He-heh-heh, I'm terrible at sports so if I run a while my sides hurt right away.
えっへんと大いばりでアリスは胸を張った。"A-hem!" Alice boasted, puffing up with pride.

初対面の時、彼は偉そうな態度を取っていると思った。When I first met him, I thought he was putting on airs.












スピードの出しすぎだよ。You're driving too fast.






そのアパートはビクトリア朝風の家具を揃えてあった。The apartment was furnished in the Victorian style.






「スミスさんをお願いしたいのですが」「スミスですが」"I'd like to talk to Mr Smith." "This is Smith speaking."頼みたいことがあります。ちょっとお願いしてもよろしいでしょうか？I need a favor.






うわっ？これ、勉強に運動神経、全てのパラメータがMAXじゃないか！おまけにお金もカンストするまで貯まってる・・・すげえ。Wha? Study, reflexes, all the parameters are MAX! You've even saved money up to the limit ... Amazing.






暴風雨があらん限りの猛威を振るった。The storm raged in all its fury.その仕事に彼は才をふるった。The job drew out his talent.









その農場主は新しい５人の従業員を雇った。The farmer employed five new workers.
水がなければ、何者もこの地球上には生きられないだろう。Without water, nothing could live on this earth.急がなければ、学校に遅刻しますよ。Unless you hurry, you will be late for school.急がなければ、急行に乗り遅れるぞ。You must hurry up, or you will miss the express.
会社をクビにならなきゃいいけどね。I hope I can hold on to my job.スケジュールがバッティングしなきゃ大丈夫です。The schedule's fine as long as nothing clashes.彼の手紙に返事をださなきゃ。I have to answer his letter.





恋は盲目。憎しみもまたしかり。Love is blind. Hatred is also blind.


神は言った。「私に勝てるわけがないだろう。有名選手は皆天国にいるのだ」"How can you win, Satan?" asked God. "All the famous ballplayers are up here."
彼はうれしさで我を忘れていた。He was beside himself with joy.

六時頃車で迎えにきます。I will pick you up around six.
予め断りますが、今日のブログは面白くないよ〜。Just to warn you in advance, today's blog is no fun.


「あ、は、はい・・・ごめん、玲姉」「コラ。幾ら親戚とはいえ、私は先輩医師よ？院内ではちゃんとケジメをつけなさい」"Ah, y-yes ... Sorry, Coz." "Hey! You might be my relative but here I'm your senior and a doctor. Keep things straight while you're in the hospital!"





我々はノルマを果たそうと一生懸命にがんばって四苦八苦した。We almost broke our necks trying to meet the quota.

















私たちはその機を最大限に利用した。We made the most of the opportunity.セールスマンはひき肉機の使い方を操作して説明した。The salesman demonstrated how to use the mincer.機は急角度で上昇し、それから海岸を離れるにつれて水平飛行に移った。The plane rose sharply before leveling off as it left the coast.
なんの苦もなくその場所を見つけた。He had no difficulty in finding the place.




彼はその娼婦に目もくれない様子で歩いていった。He walked on appearing to disregard the prostitute.








この問題は多くの経済学者によって論じられてきた。This problem has been debated by many economists.
彼女を悪く言う奴がいたらただじゃおかないぞ。I'd take anybody apart who dared to say a word against her.
聖霊がある方の上に下って、その上にとどまられるのが見えたなら、その方こそ聖霊によってバプテスマを授ける方である。The man on whom you see the Spirit come down and remain is he who will baptize with the Holy Spirit.
私たち、うまくやっていけると思うの。I think we can get along well.
お前ならもっとうまくやれるよ。I know you can make it better.




世界的に過大に評価された中国書といえば、『孫子』ですかね。When it comes to Chinese books that are overvalued worldwide I suppose it's Sun Tzu, isn't it?

きのうここで結婚式が２組あった。There were two marriages here yesterday.
ほとんどの日本の大会社は、輸出に頼っている。Most big Japanese companies depend on exports.









建築家は芸術家ぶってはならない。An architect should not pretend to be an artist.

私達が生きていくためには衣食住が必要です。We need food, clothes and a home in order to live.自分ができそこないであると気が付いたまま生きていくのは辛いことだ。It's hard to live with the knowledge that you are a failure.


音楽は野蛮人の胸をなだめすかす魅力がある。Music has a charm that soothes even the savage's breast.
彼はどの学生にも劣らずよく勉強する。He works as hard as any student.
それは秘密です。誰にももらすことがあってはいけません。It's a secret; don't give it away to anyone.ホームズは誰にも気付かれずに部屋から出ていった。Holmes went out of the room without being noticed by anyone.誰にも知的な願いがある。Everyone has his intellectual desire.






タケオは彼なりに良いやつだ。Takeo is quite a good fellow in his way.


あの大名は十万石を領している。That daimyo holds a fief yielding 100,000 koku of rice.

この新たな投資が利益増につながるだろう。This new investment will multiply our profit.
船上の人々はその島に５人の人影を見てびっくりしました。The men on board were surprised to see five men on the island.
二隻の船が同時に沈んだ。The two ships went down at once.



昨日あまり寝る時間がなかったので、会社に来てから一日中うつらうつらしていた。I didn't get much sleep last night so I was nodding off all day at work.










私はその映画をずっと前に見たことがある。I have seen that film long ago.








それらは枚挙にいとまがない。They are too numerous to enumerate.


















あの事故には何かなぞめいたものがつきまとっている。There is something mysterious about the accident.









一食くらい食事を抜いてもたいしたことないよ。It won't hurt you to skip one meal.





そして、入国審査官の審査を受けて上陸許可を受けなければなりません。They must then go through a landing examination conducted by inspection officers before they can obtain landing permission.

そのパーティーが何から何まで楽しかったわけではない。The party was not altogether pleasant.



















世界地図を見てごらん。Have a look at the world map.













バスは五分後に発車します。The bus leaves in five minutes.






最新のバイオ技術によって、芋の臭みを最小限に抑え、非常に飲みやすい「芋焼酎」です。It's very easy to drink potato shochu now that the potato-like smell has been reduced to a low level through use of the latest biotechnology.

空気は数種の気体の混合物である。Air is a mixture of several gases.







おかしいな、スピーカーがガーガーいってるよ。That's funny. The speaker is crackling.




















オリーブの枝は平和を象徴している。An olive branch symbolizes peace.


水は華氏３２度で凍る。Water freezes at 32 degrees Fahrenheit.









大あくびをして。Yawn a big long yawn.
その巨木の枝が池に覆いかぶさっていた。The boughs of the large tree overhung the pond.
新聞紙を広げて亡子に覆いかぶせた。He opened a newspaper and covered the dead child.

お母さんは目を大きく開いた。His mother opened her eyes wide.

街に住むのと田舎に住むのとは大違い。Living in the town is quite different from living in the country.






つきが、ずっと廻ってこないと、あきらめない賭博師は危機をおかして、大金を狙わざるをえなくなる。After a streak of bad luck, a persistent gambler will be forced to play for high stakes.
投機師のエドワードは石油事業で大金をえた。Edward, the venture capitalist, hit the jackpot in the oil business.
宝石細工師はそのブローチに大きな真珠をはめ込んだ。The jeweler mounted a big pearl in the brooch.
















そのニュースに彼はびっくり仰天した。The news took him by surprise.





































強盗は白昼堂々と郵便局を襲った。The burglar broke into the post office in broad daylight.






































































一日一善。良いことをした後は、気持ちがいいね。I always feel good after I do my good deed for the day.













































首相がスキャンダルの隠蔽工作を図った結果、新聞が事件をつきとめたときには、事態をますます悪化させてしまった。The Prime Minister tried to cover up the scandal, but that just made it worse when the newspapers discovered the truth.

























































































かわいそうにその猫は餓死寸前だった。The poor cat was on the verge of starvation.











彼は勝手気ままに自分の考えを口に出した。He voiced his opinion with reckless abandon.






























交通事故のニュースに彼女は顔面蒼白となった。The colour drained from her face at the news of the traffic accident.
needless to sayは不定詞の慣用表現として紹介されることが多いです。'Needless to say' is often used as an idiomatic expression in the infinitive.






















どーお？童貞卒業した翌朝は気分爽快？So? Feeling refreshed, the morning after graduating from virginity?
























































































南諸島のコミュニティの中にはまったくの正反対の血縁関係のパターンが観察されるであろう。A diametrically opposed kinship pattern is to be observed among certain South Sea Island communities.









彼らはエアロビクスで元気はつらつとしている。They keep up their spirits by doing aerobics.




地球側の圧政に苦しむコロニーの人々の中で、テロによる現状打破を目論む勢力が誕生。Among the people of the colonies suffering under Earth's tyranny a force emerges intending to overthrow the status quo through terrorism.










この恋人同士は情熱的な文通を続けた。This pair of lovers were carrying on an ardent correspondence.











































































彼は一時的に精神が錯乱状態になった。He became temporarily deranged.














































































君の態度は失礼千万じゃないか。Aren't you being very rude?







彼の性格には根本的に自分本位のところがある。Selfishness is an essential part of his character.











あいつって自由気ままに暮らしてるよな。ちょっとは落ち着いた方がいいんじゃないかな。He lives a freewheeling life. I think he ought to settle down a little.






















準備万端整えてから、彼は東京に出発した。Having made all the preparations, he set out for Tokyo.


















経済の先行きが明るくなっているので、日本の大企業が今年予定している設備投資は上方修正された。Capital investments planned by major Japanese businesses for this year have been revised upward in view of an improving economic outlook.



































































容姿端麗、頭脳明晰、運動神経抜群、家は金持ちで、ついでに学生会の副会長をしてたりもする、いわゆるパーフェクトな奴だ。Looks, brains, reflexes, rich family and, for good measure, vice president of the student committee - in other words he's 'perfect'.






















































バス通学と積極的差別是正措置などが論争の多い話題だった。School busing and taking a proactive stance against discrimination were hotly debated topics.







絶対安静が必要です。You should have absolute rest.



















文の前後関係から単語の意味を知る。Get the meaning of a word from its context.











































なるべく姉ちゃんにも周りにも迷惑をかけずに、事態の早期解決をなんとか頼むぞ。I want you to somehow resolve the situation as soon as possible, causing the least amount of trouble for my sister and those around us.


両国間の文化交流が進むにしたがって、相互理解も一段と深まっていった。As cultural exchange continued between the two countries, their mutual understanding became even deeper.






ブラウンさんは我々の財政上の相談相手です。Mr Brown is our financial adviser.






































































「めがねなくても大丈夫なの？」「あ、これ伊達めがねだから、頭よくなるかなと思って」"You're OK without your glasses?" "Ah, these are fake you see, I thought it might make me brainier..."



























































くれぐれも浄水器の悪質訪問販売業者や無料点検商法にはご注意ください。Please exercise every caution against cowboy salesmen of water purifiers and fraudulent-test sales.
























































突貫作業だったから、サイズが合わないかもしれません。It was a rush job, so it might not be a good fit.












































































































































この本はアメリカの風俗習慣についての本です。This book is on the manners and customs of America.































彼は二言三言述べると行ってしまった。He said two or three words and left.




それができない人はトップには不適任者なのである。People who can't do that aren't suited for the top.













































チャルズは若い時に放蕩生活に耽溺していました。Charles lived a life of debauchery when he was young.



食糧不足のため市の至る所で暴力沙汰が突発した。Violence erupted all over the city because of the food shortages.
























彼は身分相応な生活をしている。He lives within his means.


















































この手続きにはお役所仕事がだいぶからんでいます。There's a lot of red tape involved in this procedure.






















ジム・ウォラーが営業部長のポストの有力候補です。Jim Waller is a strong candidate for the post of sales manager.








































































彼はよく近所の腕白小僧たちをののしったものだ。He would swear at the naughty boys in the neighborhood.












あなたに手紙を書くつもりだったのだが。I meant to have written to you.







彼は金持ちだがたしなみがない。He has more money than taste.大部分ではないにしても多くの人々が文学的趣味を優美なたしなみと見なしている。Many people, if not most, look on literary taste as an elegant accomplishment.

ののしりの言葉が彼の口をついて出てきた。Words of abuse poured from his lips.

さいさき良ければ半ば成功。Well begun is half done.




ころんでこえだめに落ち、頭からどっぷりと浸かってしまった。He fell into the cesspool and got covered from head to toe.
おやじは合間合間に庭いじりをする。Father does gardening whenever he gets a chance.


ハーツ社とエイビィス社はカーレンタルの業界でしのぎを削っている。Hertz and Avis are head to head competitors in the car rental business.











文法なんかくそくらえだ。Grammar be hanged.


祖父は祖母がぽっくり逝ってから急に老け込みました。After Grandma's sudden death, Grandpa began to age rapidly.











その島の飛行場は、今では草がぼうぼうだ。The airfield on the island is now covered with weeds.


ポップアップ広告をブロックする「Ｇｏｏｇｌｅ　ツールバー」Pop-up ad blocking "Google Toolbar"


搭乗券と荷物の引き換え証です。Here are your boarding pass and your baggage claim.























お祖母さんの昔話は耳にたこができるほど聞かされた。I've heard my grandma's stories so often that I'm heartily sick of them.



彼女のドレスのへりはほころびていた。The border of her dress was torn.








彼は恥ずかしさのあまり首を垂れた。He hung his head in shame.
麿は雅びな家の生まれでおじゃる。I am descended from a graceful family.







彼に会う機会さえあればなあ。If only I get a chance to see him.

父の急死の知らせを聞いて、私は気が転倒してしまった。I was beside myself when I heard the news of my father's sudden death.


彼はまったく気が若い。He is quite young in spirit.
ジョンは気がいい。John is easy to please.
ジョージ、気が向いたらいつでも訪ねて来て下さい。Just come to see me any time you feel like it, George.
あの人に頼むのはちょっと気が進まない。I'm rather hesitant about asking him a favor.

気が散るからテレビを消してくれ。Turn off the television. I can't concentrate.
最終電車に遅れはしないかと気が気でなっかった。I was impatient with fear of missing last train.
彼女の恐怖は非常なものだったので気が遠くなるところだった。She was on the verge of fainting out of sheer terror.それは気が遠くなるような計画だ。It is a stupendous project.





その条件は空文化している。The treaty is now a dead letter.







その運河は150,000重量トンの大きさの船を収容できる。The canal can accommodate ships as large as 150,000 dead weight tons.
先日、パソコンショップでＳＩＭＭの掴み取りをやっていた。いくらなんでもマニアックすぎる。I grabbed as much SIMM as possible in the computer shop the other day. Say what you like, it was more than just enthusiasm.



基本はアスカがシンジをいじめる。で、たまにキレたシンジがアスカを襲う。その時のアスカはやけにしおらしい。The key is that Asuka abuses Shinji. So, rarely, Shinji flips and assaults Asuka. Then Asuka is surprisingly meek.

性交の最中彼女はつまらなそうな顔をしていた。She looked bored while we were making love.








あなたの訳を彼の訳と比べてみなさい。Compare your translation with his.




彼は彼女の気を引こうとした。He tried to attract her attention.





彼は潮の流れに逆らって泳ごうとした。He tried to swim against the tide.
彼は世の風潮に逆らう。He is swimming against the tide.








ひさしから雨水が滴り落ちている。The eaves are dripping.





















すべての人間が平等に創られているわけではない。Not all men are created equal.
今、すべてをお話しするわけにはいきませんが、要するに、私の両親は、今年の夏、当地には来ないのです。I can't tell you the whole story now, but in brief, my parents aren't coming here this summer.
もうこれ以上延ばすわけにはいかない。I can't put it off any longer.
君の成功は主に好機をいかにして上手に利用するかにかかっている。Your success will largely depend upon how you will make good use of your opportunity.問題はいかにして資金を集めるかである。The problem is how to raise the funds.





















「あなたは先生ですか」「その通りです」"Are you a teacher?" "So I am."その通りは１０時を過ぎると閑散としていた。The street was deserted after ten.
午後の暑い盛りに２時間歩いた。I walked for two hours in the afternoon heat.





約１年半で約２２億通の迷惑メールを送りました。He sent about 2.2 billion spam emails over a period of around one and a half years.




































そんなことを言うなんて彼はつれない。It is heartless of him to say so.
我々ACME Ltd.としては、全力を持って敵対的買収に対抗するものと、明言しておこう。We, ACME Ltd., hereby announce that we will resist with all our strength this hostile takeover.





















オレンジカードは車掌が販売している。"Orange Cards" are available from the conductor.















あ、もうテレカがなくなる・・。じゃあ、３０分後に。Ah, the phone card's already running out.. See you in half an hour.























私の収入は彼のには及びもつかない。My income is a far cry from his.

選ぶべき道はただ１つ成功か死かのいずれか。The only alternatives are success and death.














自分でもそれをやってみなさい。Do it by yourself.自分でも信じられない。Even I can't believe that.
とにかくやってみる価値がある。It's worth trying at all events.

時々、自分のけつを思いきり蹴りあげてやりたくなる。Sometimes I feel like kicking my own rump.
さいさき良ければ半ば成功。Well begun is half done.














あなたのは初めて耳にする妙なお話です。Yours is a very strange story.
ぼくはゴキブリが大の苦手だ。I'm a coward when it comes to cockroaches.
熱いダックスフント・ソーセージはいかが。Get your hot dachshund sausages!

貴職らにとっては重要なことです。This is an important thing for all of you.



犬が家までついて来た。A dog followed me to my house.成功は努力と忍耐のすぐ後についてくる。Success treads upon the heels of effort and perseverance.
通りは大混乱だった。The street was in utter chaos.











いつでも私の車を貸してあげますよ。You can borrow my car anytime.











私は彼の話す言葉をすべて聞こうと身を乗り出した。I leaned forward, eager to catch every word he spoke.

日本は先願主義を採用している。Japan follows the principle of first-to-file.

早ければ早い程よい。The sooner, the better.








その後彼のうわさを聞かない。I have never heard of him since.
この種の経験は誰にも馴染み深い。This kind of experience is familiar to everyone.









起こるべくして起こった事故だった。It was an accident that was waiting to happen.





大人への一回分の最大の投薬量はどのくらいですか。What is the maximum dosage for an adult?




















彼の冗談が私をおかしがらせた。His jokes amused me.















・・・・おいおいおい、奢りとわかったらリミッター解除ですか二人とも。... Hey-hey you two, is it no holds barred as soon as you know it's my treat?


お寒い教育政策は日本のガンだ。The poor educational policy is a detriment to Japan.






御坊ちゃんに幸あれ。All our best to that little boy.






大変ご不自由をおかけして申し訳ございません。I'm sorry to have caused you such inconvenience.







外交術とは、この上ない美しいやり方で、最も汚らしいことを行ったり、言ったりすることである。Diplomacy is to do and say the nastiest thing in the nicest way.




私は本当のことを言わざるを得なかった。I couldn't but speak the truth.
連中がこのことに気づかぬうち機先を制したほうがいいでしょう。We'd probably be best off beating them to the punch before they notice that fact.




一両日中にも決まりそうだ。It should be decided in the next day or two.



近所に行きつけの店があるから、今日はそこでランチを食べよう。I'm a regular at a restaurant in this neighborhood. Let's have lunch there today.



お墓には供花が供えられていた。An offering of flowers had been placed at the grave.
彼女は姑の気にさわるようなことを言わなければよかったと臍を噛んだ。She bitterly regretted having said something that displeased her mother-in-law.
彼は臍を固めて一世一代の大事業に乗り出した。He resolved to embark on a once-in-a-lifetime enterprise.
彼は臍を固めて一世一代の大事業に乗り出した。He resolved to embark on a once-in-a-lifetime enterprise.








彼方任せにしないで、自分で責任をもってやってください。Instead of leaving it to others, take responsibility yourself.
うわぁ、観光客だらけ。Wow, it's swarming with tourists!
流言飛語に惑わされるべからず、とはいうものの、言うは易く行うは難し、と思わない？They say you shouldn't take rumors seriously, but that's easier said than done.



優紀子は年端も行かない無邪気な少女です。Yukiko is an innocent girl of tender years.




















リラックスできる癒し系の音楽をよく聞いている。I often listen to soothing music in order to relax.
ぶっちゃけた話、これっていくらぐらいしたの？Sorry to be so direct, but how much did you pay for this?









１年前に比べれば価格は大きく落ち込んでいる。Compared with the level of a year ago, the price is sharply lower.





この数字は原油輸入減を反映している。This figure is a mirror of the decrease in imports of crude oil.



私の見た限りでは、なかなか良い製品だ。From what I've seen of the product so far, it's pretty good.
クラッチペダルを数回踏むと、なんとかクラッチが切れたので、騙し騙し運転しました。Repeatedly slamming the clutch pedal, I somehow managed to get the clutch disengaged so I could just about drive for the time being.













かえでは秋に赤くなります。Maples turn red in fall.



















悪い風邪をひいていて、さらに悪いことには、雪が降ってきました。I had a bad cold, and to make matters worse, it began snowing.

























彼は小包を右脇に抱えている。He is carrying a parcel under his right arm.

































コーポレートガバナンスや説明責任を強化している。Corporate governance and accountability are being strengthened.




















彼は農夫に身をやつして城下町に潜入した。Disguising himself as a peasant, he crept into the castle town.
そんな奇妙なことってあるものかありはしない。Can such a strange thing be real?

彼女はあまりしゃべらないが、いったん口を開くと弁が立つ。She doesn't talk much, but once she does speak she is eloquent.



後生だから泣くのはやめてくれ。In the name of mercy, stop crying.
ポールは手で髪を梳きました。Paul ran his hand through his hair.
























現在の税制度のもとでは正直にやっていると割に合わない。Honesty doesn't pay under the current tax system.






















































彼ならいざ知らず、私ではその試験には合格できっこない。For him it may be possible, but I'd never pass the test.
彼ならいざ知らず、私ではその試験には合格できっこない。For him it may be possible, but I'd never pass the test.
すっかり春奈のお天気モードのおかげで香の気勢が殺げているな。Thanks to Haruna's "weather mode" Kaori's fervour was greatly dampened.

そんなことは言わずもがなだ。That goes without saying.
私は清水の舞台から飛び降りる気持ちで南米に渡ります。I am going to take a big chance by migrating to South America.

彼は商才にたけている。He is able in business.
シェフが腕によりをかけて作った料理というわりにはたいしたことない味だね。It doesn't taste all that great for all the effort and technique the chef put into it.
あいつはいつも親に金を無心している。That guy is always asking his parents for money.
言外の意味を読み取るならば、この手紙はお金の無心です。If you read between the lines, this letter is a request for money.
玲子のオススメという本を、その場で軽く流し読みしてみる。I'll try giving the book "Reiko's Recommended" a quick skim read on the spot.












多数の申込者の中から彼が選ばれた。He was chosen out of a number of applicants.


































そんな事件はざらにある。Such incidents are quite common.



私の娘は人形を集め始めた。My daughter has taken up doll collecting.









明日は英語のテストだろう、だったら今晩は数学の宿題にかかずらわっちゃだめだ。You have an English test tomorrow, so don't get bogged down in your math homework tonight.



「ちゃちなおもちゃみたいな」と言うのは、ちゃちなおもちゃに対して失礼です。To say that it gives the impression of a cheap toy is unfair to cheap toys.
肌がヒリつくどころか、使う前より肌が安定してるんです。Far from irritating my skin it was better than before I used it.



最近、私、だれてるの。I've been sluggish recently.









かくかくしかじかで、と事情を説明したのだが、あんまり興味なさそうな相槌しか返ってこなかった。I explained the situation, as this, that and such and such, but they just nodded along without showing much interest.













彼女は向こうでごちそうをぱくついているようだ。She seems to be having a good feed over there.


これ以上ここでもたついてると、後ろの第二関門からも増援が来て、挟撃されるかも知れねーんだぜ。If we hang around here any longer, there could be reinforcements coming from the second gate to take us in a pincer movement!


目から鱗が落ちた。I can see the light.
みんなが私をのけ者にしたの。I was left out in the cold by everyone.












彼はロック音楽に夢中だが、彼女のほうはそれに輪をかけて夢中だ。He is keen on rock music, but she is even more so.











１３人？たったそんだけかよ。Just 13 people? That's all?



けい子と一朗が納得ずくで別れた。Keiko and Ichiro parted with mutual consent.
















































警察は彼に目をつけている。The cops are keeping tabs on him.




















彼はしきりと一財産作りたがっている。He is burning to make a fortune.


ここだけの話だが、彼はいささか間が抜けている。Between you and me, he is rather stupid.



































あっさり断られると思いきや、彼女は承諾してくれました。I had expected an outright refusal, but to my surprise she agreed.




これはスミレの一種です。This is a variety of violet.


厳しいトレーニングに、彼は音を上げた。He gave up under the severe training he faced.



何人かが私の腕をつかんだ。Somebody caught me by the arm.
貧しいといえども彼女は幸せだ。Though she is poor, she is happy.






































































ツタウルシにかぶれました。I got a rash from poison ivy.





ぜいぜい言いながらも、気合をいれて走り続ける。Puffing and panting we continued to run with renewed vigor.





もっと単刀直入に言ってくれないかな。隔靴掻痒の感なきにしもあらずだよ。You don't have to leave me hanging like this. Why don't you just come out and tell it to me straight?
革命政府は、民衆から兵をつのって防戦するとともに、共和政治を確立して、捕らえていたルイ１６世を処刑しました。The revolutionary government, while raising troops from the masses and fighting a defensive battle, established a republic and executed Louis XVI.軍はその町から兵を引いて敵に明け渡した。The army abandoned the town to the enemy.

休みの前などは少し羽目を外して飲むのだが、杜仲茶割りで飲むと二日酔いが全くない。I usually cut loose a bit and drink plenty before a day off work, but if my drinks are cut with tochu tea, then I get absolutely no hangover.



彼は国境警備兵の姿を見て命からがら逃げた。He ran for his life at the sight of the border guard.
負傷兵達は戦場に取り残された。The wounded soldiers were left in the field.












諸君らのたゆまぬ努力と労働によって、ついに我らがアジトが完成した！！Ladies and Gentlemen, thanks to your untiring efforts our hideout is finally complete!!


花子はカツカツと音を立てながら廊下を歩いてきた。Hanako walked through the hallway making a clicking sound.

あなたは昼食代を払わなくてもいいですよ。You need not pay for your lunch.

しかめ面は怒りとか不快感を表現するものである。A frown may express anger or displeasure.


トップのリーダーは犬の行動学では「アルファ」と呼ばれ、以下「ベータ」「ガンマ」と続きます。In dog ethology the leader is called 'alpha'; after that it continues with 'beta' and 'gamma'.

その芝居は６ヶ月間上演された。The play ran for six months.男女間に不均等が存在することは許されるべきではない。No inequality should be allowed to exist between men and women.



彼女は英語はいうまでもなく、ドイツ語を話す。Not only does she speak English, but also German.

ペットロスとは、ペットを失った飼い主に起きるショックや怒りなどの反応をいう。"Pet loss" refers to the reactions of shock and anger that occur in owners who have been bereaved of their pets.




チューリッヒはロンドンに次ぐ世界第二位の金市場である。Zurich is the second largest gold market in the world after London.
ここではＤＳを「ダイアド」スタイルの省略形として使う。We use DS as an abbreviation of 'dyad' style.
いくつかの種は基本の歌に対する何十、いや何百もの変化形をもつ洗練されたレパートリーを次第に発展させていく。Some species gradually develop elaborate repertoires of dozens or even hundreds of variants of a basic song.
このことの理由は、それらの形態素に変異形がまったく見出されなかったからである。The reason for this is that we found no variation of those morphemes.

この車はあの車と同じくらい大きい。This car is as big as that car.
給料をかたに私に５００ドルが、前払いされた。I received a five hundred dollar advance on my pay.
この都市の面積はどれくらいか。What is the area of this city?


酸性土を灰で中和する。Acid soil is neutralised by ash.

あんまりご無沙汰してしまって、どうも敷居が高くなってしまいました。I have neglected you so long that I feel a bit shy in visiting you.




ロンドンのアンダーソン骨董店の情報を探しています。I'm looking for information on the Anderson Antique Shop in London.
嫉妬心くらい強く人間の心情に巣食う情熱はない。There is not a passion so strongly rooted in the human heart as envy.
彼女は生まれつきの心の優しい人だ。She is kindhearted by nature.
そのオーストラリアのラグビーチームの闘争心はすばらしかった。Wonderful was the fighting spirit of the Australian rugby team.

ふいごは故障している。The bellows are not working.






相次ぐ不祥事にも関わらず、警察はオメオメ違反切符を切っている。Despite their own scandals, the police continue to make arrests as though nothing had happened at all.












彼らが最終契約について協議している際、ある裏工作が進んでいた。賄賂が渡されたのだ。There was some monkey business going on when they were negotiating that last contract; money passed under the table.


がまんするのが難しいのは彼の度を超した丁重さである。What is hard to put up with is his over-politeness.












だいたい何でこんな真夜中にジュース買う為にパシらされなきゃなんないんだか・・・。Anyhow, just why is it that I have to be sent out in the middle of the night to buy a canned drink?



彼女の悩ましげな姿を見て、彼はすっかり夢中になってしまいました。After seeing her provocative body, he became obsessed with her.


冗談も大概にしろ！You mustn't carry your jokes too far!

人のいない部屋の照明をこまめに消す。Take care to turn off lights in rooms when nobody's in them.




母さんは、女だてらに男だらけの中、建設会社で現場監督をしている。Mum, a mere woman surrounded by men, works in a construction company as a site foreman.



友理子はたまの逢瀬を心行くまで楽しんでしまいました。Yuriko thoroughly enjoyed her occasional secret meetings with her lover.


ウチだって閑古鳥が鳴くようなカツカツの状態だから、バイトを雇う余裕なんてない。We're in a slump, barely scraping by, so we certainly don't have the margin to take on a part-time worker.


失業問題もさることながら、環境問題も大切だ。Although the unemployment problem can't be ignored, the environment problem is also very important.




１円たりとも無駄使いはできない。I can't afford to waste a single yen.






私はいつも通り手を洗った。I washed my hands as usual.
そのとき彼らはひなぎくを飛んだり、クローバーを通り抜けたりしてあそんだ。Then they played Jump The Daisies and Run Through The Clover.
遅い！まったくちんたらちんたらと・・・。You're late! Sheesh, dilly-dally dilly-dally ...



母はため息をつきながら、高校一年生にもなった息子の頭をがしがしと撫でた。Mom sighed, and tousled the hair of her first-year high school son's head.












どうやら、さっきのは演技ではなく、素だったらしい。It seems like that she wasn't acting back then; they were her real feelings.


関わり合いになったら、ドスどころかチャカが出てきそうだ。Mess with them, and they won't just pull shivs on you; they're probably packing heat.











だから何だってんだ。So fuckin' what.
薄暮れが迫った。The twilight came on.
転校生は先生の鉛筆を削って機嫌をとった。The new boy made up to his teacher by sharpening her pencils.

このバターは国産品だが、外国産とくらべて少しも劣らない。This butter is domestic, but it is in no way inferior to foreign butter.

「けんじが病院に？」「そうや、ほんまけったくそ悪い......」"Kenji's in the hospital?" "That's a real pisser..."



お前は首だ、と彼は藪から棒に私に告げた。He told me point-blank that I was fired.



あらまあ、ホント、全く知らなんだ。Oh my, you're right, I didn't know that at all.
あの頃親の言うことに耳を傾けていたらなあ。If only I had listened to my parents!
あらまあ、馬子にも衣装とはこのことだねぇ。スーツ着ると結構格好いいじゃん。Well, it's just like the proverb "fine feathers make a fine bird". You look really good when you wear a suit.


ちなみにホイールマウスのホイールにも対応しているんだ。By the way, it also works with the wheel of a wheel mouse.
・・・はぁ、どう状況を受け止めればいいのかしら。... Aaah, just how am I supposed to cope with this I wonder?

アンタ本当に器用ねっ。主夫とか向いてるんじゃない？You're really handy, aren't you? Don't you think you'd make a good house-husband?

日本シンクロ界の悲願である金には、あと一歩で届かなかった。The 'gold' yearned for by the Japanese synchronized swimming world was not quite reached.
シャーペンの芯２・３本もらえるかな。Could you lend me a few mechanical pencil leads?


パンがふんわり焼けた。The bread was baked light and fluffy.

監督はチームをトーナメント優勝に今一歩という所までもっていったのに悔しいことだった。It was annoying, as the manager took his team to a near-miss in the tournament.
































五輪旗の右端の輪っかって何色だったっけか？What color is the far right ring on the Olympic flag?













まずやって来たのはケルト族で、紀元前６００年のことでした。First came the Celts in 600 B.C.




「あれ、タンジェントってサインでコサインを割るんだっけ？」「逆、逆」"Eh? Is the tangent cosine divided by sine?" "Other way round!"














医者と看護婦はなんとしても生命を守らなければならない。Doctors and nurses must preserve life at all costs.
概していえば、この種の問題では直接人々と関わる人が好きだ。As a rule, I prefer people who deal with matters of this kind directly with those involved.


隣人が塀の上からちょこっと顔を覗かせた。The neighbor popped his head up over the wall for a moment.








偉人が必ずしも賢いとは限らない。Great men are not always wise.
今日このホームページを見てこんな人があほなら私はかならずどアホだと解った。Today, looking at this web page, I realized that if these people are idiots then I must be a complete moron.

儂の目もガタがきたかの。Have my eyes also started to fail?
歯を食い縛る、喉元までせりあがった感情を強引に飲み込む。He grits his teeth and forces back his growing fear.
あ、とりあえず包帯しているけど、もし煩わしかったら、家に帰ってからカットバンに代えても大丈夫よ。Ah, well I've bandaged it for the meantime but if that's awkward then it's fine to replace it with a plaster when you get home.
私の部屋のドアは開ける時にガタピシいうが、壊れているのかな？The door to my room screeches when I open it. I wonder if there's something wrong with it.




私たちはスピーキングテストがあった。We had an oral exam.


家の仕上げをした後で、大工はペンキ屋に仕事を始めてくれと言った。After tying up loose ends on the house, the carpenter gave the painter approval to begin work.


たまには理性のタガを外してみませんか。Why not just let fly once in a while?

夕食はどこでも構いません。お任せします。I don't care where we eat dinner. It's entirely up to you.
もうひとつ必要なものは辞書である。Another thing that is required is a dictionary.




































リーダーたちの不和が不健全なセクショナリズムをもたらした。The conflicts among leaders resulted in unhealthy sectionalism.













































歴史的論点は、ダーウィニズムが３つの進展段階を得ているということで要約できよう。The historical thesis can be summarized by saying that Darwinism has undergone three stages of evolution.
あのダークホースは予備選挙の前は、劣勢でした。The dark horse candidate was losing in the polls before the primary.




ダイバー達は海底に難破船を見つけた。The divers found a wreck on the sea-bed.











チータは他のどの動物にも劣らず速く走る。A cheetah runs as fast as any animal.






















チンパンジーは簡単な問題なら解く事ができる知的な動物である。The chimpanzee is an intelligent creature, capable of solving simple problems.









このクラブはライブバンドですか、ＤＪですか。Is there a live band or a DJ in this club?














ドップラー効果はまた、一般に光と放射エネルギーにおいても見られる。The Doppler effect is also observed with light and with radiant energy in general.

















ノルマン人は１０６６年にイングランドを征服した。The Normans conquered England in 1066.





バッターのイチローは、目の覚めるような２塁打を打った。Ichiro hit an eye-popping double.








きみの意見は私にとって取るに足りない。Your opinion means nothing to me.


ほふく前進はもっと素早くゴキブリのように這え！Crawl forward is done much more agilely - scuttle like a cockroach!

そのあたりは、一面に割れたガラスで埋もれているんですって。The place is deep in broken glass.

そこらへんは、男子と女子とでは違うんだってば。Obviously that's different for men and women.




彼とはツーと言えばカーの仲だよ。以心伝心の仲とでも言っておこう。He and I have a near-telepathic understanding of each other. No sooner does one of us say something than the other is already responding.




現物がこっちから行っちゃえば、雪花ちゃんも四の五の言わないって。I'm saying that if the real thing comes to her, Sekka won't have anything to grumble about.


レンジャーが道を拓く。The Rangers lead the way.























































予想以上に多くの観客が来ていました。There were more spectators than I had expected.










このワイン口当たりが良くて飲みやすいわ。This is a smooth wine which goes down easy.


今は焦らずに時を待つべきだ。We should not be rash now; we should wait for a good chance.
本気で似合うと思っていたらしいシャツは辞退し、淡いブルーのポロシャツをいただくことにした。The shirt she apparently seriously thought suited me I turned down and decided to accept a light blue polo shirt.
いくら壁が高いといっても、私も最初はおっかなびっくりでしたよ。You're right when you say how high the wall is; I was nervous at first, too.

邦彦は最初の一発で的を撃ち当てた。Kunihiko hit the target with his first shot.
ただし、安全日だからって、中出ししても妊娠しないというわけではないらしいです。However, it seems that just because it's a 'low risk day' doesn't mean that you won't get pregnant from intravaginal ejaculation.


そうやって俺のことを気にしつつ、しかし素直になりきれない、そのツンデレさが今若い男の間で大ブーム！That way you keep thinking about me but are unable to admit to your feelings, that hot and cold feel is a real boom among young men!























彼はピューマを慣らすのに大いに骨を折った。He took great pains in taming a puma.


彼女は国内でフィギュアスケートの第一人者だと認められている。She is recognized as the best figure-skater in the country.






彼はその角をフルスピードで曲がった。He went round the corner at top speed.





















その子は猫をボール箱の中へ閉じ込めた。That child shut up a cat in the carton.





今日、朝一でポートレートの予約が入っているんだが・・・どうだ？試しにやってみるか？First thing today there's an appointment for a portrait ... what do you say? Will you try doing it as a test?


私はポップコーンを２袋買った。I bought two bags of popcorn.







警棒で空をなぐりつけ、よろめいて体勢をたてなおしたガードマンは、自分に向かって突進してくる金網づくりのクズカゴを見た。The guard's truncheon hit air. Off balance, he regained his posture to see a metal-mesh rubbish bin flying towards him.










マリーゴールドは太陽とともに起きる。The marigold rises with the sun.













彼はモナリザを見るためにはるばる九州から来た。He came all the way from Kyushu to see the Mona Lisa.




























そのレスラーはおそろしいほどの握力がある。The wrestler has a formidable grip.










貴女に大怪我をさせられたせいで、この子の夏休みの予定は全部おじゃんになってしまったんですよ？Thanks to you getting him badly injured, all of that kid's summer plans came to nothing!















彼にはそんなことはお手の物だ。It is right up his alley.

あの女性の男癖の悪さにはあきれて物が言えない。The way that woman goes on with men shocks me.

お手柔らかにお願いします。Don't be too hard on me, please.

あの女性の男癖の悪さにはあきれて物が言えない。The way that woman goes on with men shocks me.





特定の企業を賞賛する書き込みや、逆にライバル企業を貶める書き込みが多い2ch。2ch, where there are many posts praising specific companies, or, conversely, denigrating their rivals.敵対企業を貶めたり、秘密情報を入手したりと、大企業に欠かせない存在であるため、ハイリスクながらハイリターンが望める仕事だ。Causing competitors to fail, obtaining confidential information, something that big business just can't do without - high risk but at the same time high return work.






















ヒントの ***** の数と語の中の字数とは関係がありません。The number of *****s in the hint has no relation to the number of characters in the word.
学ぶのに年は関係ない。One is never too old to learn.
妙な話だが、私は何の痛みも感じなかった。Strange to say, I didn't feel any pain.






彼はおじいさんを背中におぶって行った。He carried his grandfather on his back.



あなたは充分可愛い女の子の範疇に入ると思います。部長のおめがねには余裕でかなってしまうでしょう。I think you fall well within 'cute girl'. You'd easily go and pass in his judgement.


彼は勉強不足のせいで試験に落ちました。He failed the exam because he had not studied enough.







模擬試験に何回も失敗して、実際に受けてみたら思わぬ結果が出た。Having failed my mock examinations any number of times, when I actually tried taking it the result was nothing I'd imagined.

それなら明日までに用意できるよ。おやすい御用だ。We can have that for you by tomorrow; no sweat.












以下の方程式の解を求めよ。Find the solution to the following equation.








最近この仕事にかかりきりです。I'm tied up with this job recently.









先生に急に当てられて、シドロモドロになってしまった。When the teacher called on me all of a sudden I got confused and kept stumbling as I spoke.




ご要望により地図を送ります。A map is available upon request.



君の考えは当たらずとも遠からずだ。Your guess is almost right.










てめぇら、死にやがれ！Fuck you all to hell!



選挙区の見直しの試みは、反対の壁にぶちあたりました。Attempts to redraw voting districts have hit a wall of opposition.
基本的に、不器用な人だから・・・それが崇っているんだろう。She's basically clumsy so ... I guess she looks up to that sort of thing.







スカートを脱ぐだけで、彼のズボンはもう我慢汁でビショビショだった。I only had to take off my skirt and his pants were soaked with precum.
これが噂のナタ・デ・ココですか。So, this is the nata-de-coco that everyone is talking about.



先生は何かと言うと人のことに口出しする。The teacher pokes his nose into everything.


ソレノイドへの突入電流でノイズが発生します。Noise is produced by the sudden flow of current into a solenoid.

これらの人々が３艘の船で彼の国へやってきました。These men had come to his country in three ships.
一子ちゃんは同じ穴のムジナか、同輩の親しみを込めた笑みを俺に向ける。I guess Ichiko is a fellow rule-breaker, she's sending me a smile filled with affection for a comrade.



この梱包材が断熱機能を担っている。This packaging material provides heat insulation.







その際ホムペURLは添付するべきなんでしょうか？Do you suppose I should attach the web page's URL on those occasions?







ロビンは口が肥えて贅沢になったのかしら。Perhaps Robin's got a taste for the finer things in life and has become extravagant.





ワインがお気に召すといいのですが。I hope the wine is to your taste.
そうですね。下手にでてばかりもなんだし。かつ、倫理的ですね。That's right. It's written in an unassuming fashion, and it's an ethical standpoint as well.


大学院生のケンは去年アメリカに行った。Ken, who is a graduate student, went to the United States last year.
何しろ朝から夕方まで、校舎の中で軟禁状態だからな。釈放されれば元気にもなるってもんだ。Anyhow, having been held in school from morning to evening ... anybody'd be happy on getting released.
たまにまる一日ぼけっとしていても別に悪い事じゃない。It's no crime to just idle the whole day once in a while.


居酒屋で飲んで、カラオケか。俺達もワンパターンだな。We're doing the same old routine: going bar hopping and then to karaoke.


チアリーダーの選抜テストを受けたいのです。I hope to try out for cheerleader.




その服役囚は２ヶ月間刑務所にいた。The prisoner was behind bars for two months.




スレタイ間違ってるぞ。The thread title's wrong.




幸せで実りある新年を迎えられますように。Best wishes for a happy and prosperous New Year.







可算名詞か不可算名詞かどちらかを従えている表現を2つ書け。Write two expressions that are followed by either count or non-count nouns in conversation.
カメラのシャッターはカシャッという音がするまで押さえてください。Hold the button down until you hear the shutter make a clicking sound.





鋭い舌は絶えず用いることによって、ますます鋭利になる片刃の道具である。A sharp tongue is the only edged tool that grows keener with constant use.





子供がおもちゃをカチャカチャいじっている。The kid is clanging away with his toy.
ドアがカチリと音をたてて閉まった。The door clicked shut.
距離で１００メートルといったらかっきり１００メートルである。For distances, if 100 meters is said it's exactly 100 meters.１１時カッキリに駅に来てください。Be at the station at eleven on the dot.

死中に活を求める。Your gift was like discovery of an oasis in the midst of a desert.



党の主な方針を守らない政治家は、だれしも反逆分子として、烙印を押されるだろう。Any politician who does not toe the main party line would be branded a renegade.


























橋のたもとに着いてから橋を渡れ。Don't cross your bridges before you come to them.
















非暴力というのは私の信仰の第１条だ。Non-violence is the first article of my faith.



１０軒の家がその火事で焼失した。The fire burned down ten houses.

何だ、貴様は。庇い立てする気か。What now, you wretch? You thinking of protecting her?


料理長においしかったとお伝え下さい。Please tell the chef it was delicious.
一芸に長じることが大切だ。It is important to be accomplished in some art.
諺にある通り「嘘も方便」だ。As the proverb goes, "The end justifies the means."
盛大な溜息をつきながら、テーブルの上にどさどさとパンを置き、椅子にどっかりと腰掛ける。Heaving a great sigh I plunk my bread on the table and flump onto the chair.
盛大な溜息をつきながら、テーブルの上にどさどさとパンを置き、椅子にどっかりと腰掛ける。Heaving a great sigh I plunk my bread on the table and flump onto the chair.
苦虫を噛みつぶしたような顔で、綾乃ちゃんは舌打ちした。Ayano tutted, making a sour face.

それは朝食込みの値段ですか。Does that price include breakfast?
コーヒーでも飲みながら話をするのはどうですか。Why don't we talk over coffee?
その夜我々は大エビに舌鼓を打った。We banqueted on lobster that night.
インドは大英帝国の支配下にあった。India was subject to the British Empire.

すぐに大阪に行ってもらいたい。I want you to go to Osaka right away.


おじいちゃんが階段から落ちて大怪我をしたんだ。Grandpa fell down the stairs and got a serious injury.
野球が大好きで大試合はまず見逃したことはない。I love baseball, and have hardly missed seeing any big games.
早めの返事をお待ちしております。I look forward to hearing from you soon.

ローマは訪れる価値のある都市だ。Rome is a city worth visiting.
私はおもちゃ屋の隣に住んでいます。I live next door to the toy shop.
土曜日のカラオケ屋は特に混んでいる。The karaoke shop is especially crowded on Saturdays.
これは、どんながんばり屋でもやる気をなくすほど忍耐のいることだ。This is so enduring as to make even the most diligent worker give up.

だがすでに、賽は投げられた。However, the die had already been cast.
あいつが俺に向かって啖呵を切った。He hurled defiance at me.


まさかオレがごねずにすっきり起きると思っていなかったに違いない。Certainly she wouldn't have dreamt that I would get up promptly without grumbling.
「わはははは、心配するなっ！」オレはあえて虚勢を張った。"Ha-ha-ha-hah! Don't worry!" I brazenly bluffed.
それじゃあ元も子もないじゃないか。Then that means I lost everything.
みんな忙しくしているのに、そんなところでノウノウと休憩してるんじゃないよ。You can't just lounge around like that while everybody else is so busy.

擬声語的表現については、ホピ語に興味深い例がある。As to onomatopoetic expressions, we find interesting examples in Hopi.
ちょっと大きいけど、この封筒でいいや。大は小を兼ねるって言うし。It might be a bit big but this envelope will do just fine. It's better to be too big than too small.
われわれの世界は宇宙の小部分にすぎない。Our world is only a small part of the universe.
小企業は大会社にしばしば吸収される。Small business are often absorbed by a major company.
私はコートを広間の小部屋にかけた。I hung my coat in the hall closet.
最近は小家族化の傾向がある。There's a trend these days towards small families.
母親の象は川の中で小象の体をあらってやります。The mother elephant bathes her baby in the river.




彼は側転をしました。He did a cartwheel.





彼はあの堂々たる大邸宅に住んでいる。He lives in that stately mansion.


安全で美味しいとのことでオーガニック野菜は人気がある。Organic vegetables are popular because they're safe and tasty.



昨日、ひょんなことで父親の戸籍抄本のコピーを見てしまいました。Yesterday I stumbled across a copy of my father's family register.


研究の初年度に、彼は自分がＡＬＳにかかっていることを知った。During the first year of his research, he learned he had ALS.
そのチーズケーキは甘すぎた。The cheesecake tasted too sweet.
ニューススタンドで聞いて下さい。You'll have to ask at the newsstand.
「まあ、それでも君よりは、はるかに僕の方が点数高いけどね」「なんですって！私が本気を出せば、あなたなんて、目じゃないわ！」"Well, even so my score is far above yours isn't it?" "What did you say!? If I was to go all out you'd be as nothing to me!"
皮は乾くにつれて堅くなった。The skin tightened as it dried.
机の上にファンレターが山と積まれていた。Fan letters lay in a heap on the desk.








信じようと信じまいと、それは真実だ。Believe it or not, that is true.
私たちは竹かごの作り方を教わった。We received instructions on how to make a bamboo basket.
いつも妙ちくりんなことばっかり書いてるもんだから、きっとコメントしにくいんだわ！I'm always writing weird and hoopy stuff so I'm sure it's difficult to comment on.


自由は優れて根源的なものだから重要性は幾ら強調してもし過ぎない。Freedom is so fundamental that its importance cannot be overemphasized.


世界中のモンスターと戦えるのかぁ・・・。腕がなるなぁー。Fighting with monsters all over the world ... I just can't wait.

一般に利用できる英日2言語コーパスを作成した。We created a freely available English-Japanese bilingual corpus.




コンサートをドロンするなよ。Don't sneak out of the concert!

「遅刻したらだめよ？」「でも先生も遅刻したらノーカンですよね？」"You mustn't be late, OK?" "But if the teacher's late too it doesn't count, right?"
















あたし、低脂肪乳ね。Low-fat milk for me.






その節はいろいろありがとうございました。Thank you for all you did for me that time.












先週の今日彼を訪ねました。I visited him this day last week.
ブラウンさんは女優であるらしい。Ms. Brown seems to be an actress.

電話の発明は我々の生活に大変革をもたらした。The invention of the telephone caused a revolution in our way of living.





もう１人分の空きはありますか。Is there any space for one more person?




ママ〜！あのお姉ちゃんとお兄ちゃん、お手手繋いで、すっごく仲良しさんだね〜！Mama! That lady and man are holding hands, they're great friends aren't they!
「『ゆうき』って、やっぱ自分の名前入れるんだ」「そうだよ、これがロープレの基本じゃん」"'Yuki', so you do put your own name in." "Yup, isn't that roleplaying's essence?"

グロリアは断然その晩のピカ一の歌手であった。Gloria was easily the best singer of that evening.




アポロ１１号が月面着陸に成功したというニュースが入った。A report came in that Apollo 11 succeeded in landing on the moon.
アマゾン川は延々と北ブラジルを流れている。The Amazon River meanders through northern Brazil.
サラダのドレッシングはイタリアンがいいです。I want Italian dressing on my salad.
まずはオシロでタイミングを確認してみて下さい。First, try to confirm the timing by oscilloscope.
オラ気分が良くなったで。でもよ、おとうさんに滅茶苦茶怒られちまうと思うべさ。I feel a lot better now, but I know Dad's going to be real upset.
彼の目は怒りでギラっと光った。His eyes flashed with anger.
急に立ち上がったら、クラッとめまいがした。I suddenly stood up and felt faint and light-headed.
明日のパーティーにはケータリングを手配しました。I arranged catering for tomorrow's party.
列車がゴーっと音を立ててトンネルを通りすぎた。The train roared through the tunnel.
すぐにゴーの合図をしてください。Give us the sign to go soon.
なんでも人のやることをコピっている人は、何も考えていないんだろうな。People who are constantly copying others do it because they can't think for themselves.
サー・ハロルドは立派な英国紳士です。Sir Harold is a fine English gentleman.
ハワイにはサーフ狂がいっぱいいる。There are a lot of beach bums in Hawaii.


高校になってからは、クロスカントリースキー、ノルディック複合競技の大阪大会および近畿大会で幾度となく優勝。In high school, I won the Osaka and Kinki championships in cross-country skiing and Nordic combined skiing on countless occasions.
そのスキャンダルで彼の評判ががた落ちだ。That scandal cost him his reputation.
ノルディックコンバインドは、スキージャンプとクロスカントリースキーの2つの競技を組み合わせて行われる。Nordic Combined is held as a combination of two events, ski-jump and cross-country ski.
蛍光灯がチカチカしてるな。新しいのと交換しないとダメかな。This fluorescent lamp is starting to flicker. We'll have to replace it.目がチカチカします。My eyes feel irritated.
グーがチョキに、チョキがパーに、パーはグーに勝つ。Rock breaks scissors. Scissors cut paper. Paper smothers rock.
彼女は、ティーンを知った。She knew the teen.
うちの母はノーと言うに決まっている。My mother is certain to say no.
これが、いわゆるノルマン征服である。This is what is called the Norman Conquest.
彼女は新聞でハエをピシャっとたたいた。She flapped at the fly with a newspaper.
このチーズはピリッとした味がする。This cheese has a sharp taste.
長い間歩いたのでハラペコでしょう。You must be starving now after your long walk.
ベロベロに酔っぱらっちゃった。We got dead drunk.
我々はボロ勝ちした。何せ相手の選手ときたら弱いのなんの。We won hands down, because the other players were weak.
マオリ文化は私たちの間にますます広がり、彼らの言語は公用語の１つになっています。Maori culture is now spreading more and more among us and their language has become an official language.
少子化からの脱却には、非婚マザーの増大が必須なのに、日本の世論はなぜかこの議論を避けている。Although an increase of unmarried mothers is needed in order to escape the declining birth rate for some reason public opinion in Japan is avoiding this argument.マザー・テレサはインドと世界各地で貧しい人々を助けるためにその賞金を使った。Mother Teresa used the prize money for her work in India and around the world.
石油を２、３リッターばかり融通してもらえますか。Can you spare me a few liters of petrol?
リプレーする度に彼女の反応にいちいち萌えてしまいます。I find myself being enthralled by her reaction each time I replay it.
２つのキャブレターを装備したことで、そのレーシング狂はエンジンをすこぶる強力にした。By installing two carburetors that racing-car enthusiast souped up his motor considerably.
彼は木から一枝をきりとった。He cut off a branch from the tree.
両地域は宗教と文化が違っている。The two regions differ in religion and culture.この列車は七両編成です。This train is made up of seven cars.
読売ジャイアンツ・中日ドラゴンズ戦のナイターの券が２枚あるんだけど見に行かない？I have two tickets to the Yomiuri Giants - Chunichi Dragons night game. Want to go?
２は１６の４乗根です。Two is the fourth root of sixteen.
３の３乗は２７である。3 to the third power is 27.
二兎を追う者は一兎をも得ず。He who runs after two hares will catch neither.
二兎を追う者は一兎をも得ず。He who runs after two hares will catch neither.
小型車は低燃費で経済的だ。Small cars are very economical because of their low fuel consumption.
向こうではセレブという言葉を「金持ち」の意味では使わない。という事で日本人と判明しました。They don't use 'celeb' to mean 'rich man' over there. By which I determine that you are Japanese.

次の停車駅はどこですか。What is the next stop?

その小説の初刷は１００００部だった。The novel had an initial print run of 10,000 copies.

なるほど彼は剛速球投手だが、よく荒れる。It is true he has a good fast ball, but he is often wild.
柔よく剛を制す。Soft words win hard hearts.
レーガン大統領の税政策はまだ功を奏していない。President Reagan's tax program has not worked.
占星学は科学的な根拠もないのに、とても人気があって、占星学は信じている人が多いようです。Although astrology has no scientific basis, it's very popular and it seems that many people believe in it.

彼は、フランス史の学者だ。He is a scholar of French history.
彼は名ばかりの会長だ。He is the president in name only.
クリスは家のペンキ塗りとして雇われ、お金を貯める事が出来ました。Chris was hired to paint houses and was able to raise the money.
彼の努力にもかかわらず、すべては以前と変りなかった。Though he tried hard, nothing changed.
彼女は彫りの深い顔立ちの女の子でした。She was a girl with finely chiseled features.

彼は徳のある人だ。He is a man of virtue.
ボートは大綱で岸につながれていた。The boat was tied to the shore by a cable.

企業の好業績発表を受けて株価は活発な取引の中で値を上げた。Stock prices soared in active trading as corporations announced good financial results.

できちゃった婚のため身内と大学の友人2人しかよばない地味婚にするそうです。It seems as it was a shot-gun wedding so they're having a quiet wedding with only family and a couple of friends from university invited.
神は私の身内に存するが、そうでなければ全然存在しない。God is in me or else is not at all.
審判は打者にアウトを宣した。The umpire called the batter out.
そして、宮の中に、牛や羊や鳩を売るもの達と両替人達が座っているのをご覧になった。In the temple courts he found men selling cattle, sheep and doves, and others sitting at tables.

彼は保守寄りだ。He is conservative to a degree.
我々はついに富士山頂に達した。We gained the top of Mt. Fuji at last.
「私は森の中に小熊を探しに行くつもりはない」と兄がいった。"I am not going into the forest after bear cubs," said the elder brother.
特別展をやってますか。Do you have any special exhibits?
私とあなたは差し向かって座った。I sat face to face with you.
これからの星勘定を考えると、一敗もしたくない！When I think of our standing in the series from now I don't want us to lose even once!
もう一日延泊できますか。I'd like to stay another night if I can.
私の家は2階建てです。My house is a two-story affair.
みんなソックスを引っ張り上げて。Everybody pulled their socks up, yeah.
当ホテルでの御宿泊をごゆっくり御楽しみください。Please enjoy your stay at this hotel.
あなたのご親切に対し深く感謝の意を表します。I wish to express my deep appreciation for your kindness.私は彼らの沈黙を承諾の意にとった。I interpreted their silence as consent.

人生はビールと九柱戯ばかりではない。Life is not all beer and skittles.
講演者は自分の論題がわかっていなかったし、話もうまくなかった、手短に言うと、彼にはがっかりさせられた。The speaker didn't know his subject, nor did he speak well; in short, he was disappointing.
シンガポールでは罪人を鞭打ちで処罰する。In Singapore, one way to punish criminals is to whip them.
尾羽打ち枯らした彼の姿を見るのは忍びないね。It's really unbearable to see him looking so down-and-out.
僕の願いはとっても強い麻雀打ちになることです。My dream is to become a very strong mahjong player.
このままでは熾烈な情報戦に勝てない。ＣＩＯの首を挿げ替えよう。This is a bruising information war. At this rate we'll never come out on top. We've got to replace our CIO.
過ちを改むるにはばかることなかれ。It's never too late to make amends.

去年の冬は暖かだった。We had a mild winter last year.
私は鉛筆書きの手紙を受け取った。I got a letter written with a pencil.
先生、ペン書きにするのでしょうか。Sir, do we have to write in ink?
私は招待状の封筒の宛名書きをしました。I addressed the envelope containing the invitation.
本学に入学したい理由は何ですか。What is the reason you want to enter this college?
このテーブルは良質のオーク材でできている。This table is made of good oak.
水から上がり、入江のほとりの砂の上を、よちよち歩き出しました。She pulled herself out of the water and waddled along the sand at the edge of the creek.
この歴史書は高校生を対象に書かれている。This history book is written for high school students.

残尿感があります。Following urination I feel as though I still have to go more.
あやはホットピンクや電子ブルーや深紫といった激しい色が好きだ。Aya likes intense colors, such as hot pink, electric blue and deep purple.
彼は希望に満ち溢れていた。He was brimming over with hope.
その火は東風にあおられて市の中心部を焼き尽くした。The fire, driven by an east wind, destroyed the center of the city.
君はこの問題にどう片をつける気かね。How will you dispose of this problem?
ハイジャック犯達は飛行機の後部に移った。The hijackers moved to the rear of the plane.
彼はまったくのゴルフ狂だ。He's quite crazy about golfing.
車が猛スピードで通り過ぎていった。A car went by at terrific speed.
猛台風が財産に被害を与えた。A severe typhoon has done much damage to property.
彼女はきっと東京のファッション界に旋風を巻き起こすことでしょう。I'm sure she'll cause a stir in the Tokyo fashion world.
生理痛がひどいんです。I have bad cramps when I have my period.
慢性の皮膚炎があります。I have chronic dermatitis.
渇しても盗泉の水は飲まず。The eagle does not catch flies.
その省は内政問題の行政をつかさどる。The ministry administers the internal affairs.
富は一生の宝、知は万代の宝。Wisdom is better than gold or silver.
その会社は確たる理由もなく、彼を不採用にしました。The company turned him down for no apparent reason.
タバコにかけられている税は高い。There is a heavy tax on tobacco.
タイヤの空気圧を調べてもらえますか。Could you check the tire pressure?

机の上に寝かせて置くと転がって落ちることがあるので、試験管立てに立てておく。If you leave them lying on the desk they may roll off, so stand them in the test-tube rack.
彼はその時大学を卒業したてであった。He was then fresh from college.
彼はその会計簿に金額を記入した。He entered up the sum in his account book.
彼は粗衣をまとっていた。He is content with the simple life.
細縄で鞭を作った。They made a whip out of cords.

私は彼に運転を習わそうとした。I tried to get him to learn to drive.
全員が無事で救助艇にいると聞いて、私は非常にうれしい。I am only too glad to hear that all of them are safe and sound in the rescue boat.








ＳＴＬ＃３４５６の見積価格を５％値引きしていただけませんか。We would like to ask you to reduce the prices quoted for STL#3456 by 5%.
その組織の運営上の責任が問題視されている。The accountability of the management of the organization is held in question.
政治的な懸念から多くの人がその予測を疑問視した。Political concerns have caused many people to doubt the prediction.

うまく、あの学校に入れたものの全部が全部、詰め込み勉強だけで入れたわけではなかったろう。All those who made the grade in entering that school could not have done so only by cramming.


この時計は絶対に狂わないこと請け合いだ。I guarantee this watch to keep perfect time.



バス賃はいくらですか。What's the bus fare?
東の空が赤みを帯びている。There is a tinge of red in the eastern sky.
何人社員が転部を申し込んできましたか。How many staff members filed to change departments?
転石苔むさず。A rolling stone gathers no moss.

あなたは健康のために早ね早起きをしたほうがよい。You had better keep early hours so you will be in good health.
お好み焼き屋に行ったので、なんか服が油臭い！My clothes have an oily smell because I ate at an okonomiyaki place.
私はのんびり屋さんです。I do things at my own pace.
古本屋と古着屋をあさるのが好きです。I like shopping in used-book stores and in used-clothing shops.
船長は無線通信士に遭難信号を打つように命令した。The ship's captain ordered the radio operator to send a distress signal.

彼はご機嫌取りに懸命だった。He was very anxious to please.



昨夜大火事があった。There was a big fire last night.
大口叩きは何もできない。Great talkers are little doers.

日本にあるインドカレー屋のカレーって、やっぱり日本人の口に合わせて本場よりマイルドに作られてるよね。The curry they serve in Japan is milder than real Indian curry. They adapt it to Japanese tastes.
時間つぶしに雑誌を読んだ。I read a magazine to kill time.

明日数学の小テストがある。We will have a math quiz tomorrow.


私は市場の骨董品屋でこの古時計を買った。I bought this old clock at an antique stall in the market.
資金の貸し手は高利益の時期を享受している。Money lenders are enjoying a profitable period.
彼は骨の髄まで腐りきっている。He is rotten to the core.
彼らは餓えに苦しんでいる。They are suffering from hunger.
この島は１９世紀にはフランス領であった。This island belonged to France in the 19th century.
彼の成功は天才よりも努力に帰する。His success is attributed more to hard work than to genius.
彼女はアシスタントたちに証拠集めに取り掛かってもらった。She put her assistants to work assembling evidence.
重役会議で、彼は勇気を奮って口火を切った。He got up enough guts to break the ice at the board meeting.

英語を逐語的に日本語訳してはいけない。Don't translate English into Japanese word for word.











この決定はあなたの提案に負うところ大であった。Your suggestion weighed heavily in this decision.嵐は作物に大損害を与えた。The storm did great harm to the crop.瞬くうちにテニスボール大の団子が消え去った。In the blink of an eye, the tennis-ball-sized dumpling had disappeared.







二人の卑劣な男が私から宝飾品を奪って逃走した。Two nasty guys robbed me of my jewels and ran away.


あなたの犬はいつも私に向かってほえつく。Your dog always barks at me.



カラオケでの彼の歌、玄人はだしだね。His karaoke voice would put a professional to shame.
この本がなくてはやっていけない。I cannot do without this book.







手八丁口八丁の彼だけど、誠がないのが玉に瑕だね。He works fast and is very articulate but his insincerity is his biggest defect.


あのドラマ、最後にいつも意味深な言葉を言って終わるよね。Each episode of that TV drama ends with somebody delivering a profound line.



わたし達は皆、この方の満ち満ちた豊かさの中から、恵みの上に更に恵みを受けたのである。From the fullness of his grace we have all received one blessing after another.



アメリカ人の父親とフランス人の母親を持つので、彼女は２カ国語を話せる。With an American father and a French mother, she is bilingual.




こびへつらうウェイターは最上のテーブルをあてがわれる。なぜなら、そうしたウェイターは、いつもマネージャーや上役のきげんをとるから。The obsequious waiter is usually assigned the best table because he always curries favor with his manager and superiors.
ご請求分の商品は欠陥品でしたので、私どもとしてはお支払いいたしかねます。As your goods for which you are charging us were imperfect, we will not pay this account.

ヨハネの証言はこうである。ユダヤ人達が祭司とレビ人をエルサレムからヨハネのもとに遣わして、あなたは誰ですかと尋ねさせた。Now, this is John's testimony: Jews of Jerusalem sent priests and Levites to ask him who he was.
国民総生産と国民純生産とは同じでない。Gross National Product is not the same as Net National Product.




あ、ちょっとタンマ。クツのヒモがほどけちゃった。Ah, hold a mo. My shoelace's come undone.



息子の学校へ提出する健康診断書を書いていただきたいのですが。Could you fill out the medical certificate for my son's school?

しかとは知りません。I don't know for certain.
土日月の午前１０時半から午後４時まで開館。Open from 10:30am to 4pm on Sat, Sun, and Mon.１３日の金曜日は不吉な日だと言われている。It is said that Friday the 13th is an unlucky day.その知らせが届いたのは２・３日たってからだった。It was not until a few days later that the news arrived.



君が来るかどうかは私にとってはどうでもよいことだ。It does not matter to me whether you come or not.
忍を行じてのみ、よく怨みを解くことを得る。By love alone is enmity allayed.









ウォシュレット自体が日本以外の国ではほとんど普及していません。The bidet-toilet itself has not spread much outside of Japan.

その列車はみな、発車１０分前に満員で立錐の余地もなかった。All the coaches of the train were packed to capacity ten minutes before it started.








この本は我々英学生にとっては正に座右の書である。This book is a must for every student studying English.
責任逃れをするな。Don't try to pass the buck.
そういえば。やばい、秀樹に毒されてるわ。Now that you mention it. Yeek, Hideki's habits are rubbing off on me!
彼はとにかくコンピューター漬けだからね。He eats, breathes and sleeps computers.



そのズボンは大きすぎます。Those pants are too big.
瓜のつるに茄子はならぬ。You don't get eggplants from a gourd vine.


諺にもある通り「虎穴に入らずんば虎子を得ず」だ。As the saying goes, "Nothing ventured, nothing gained."
フランス人は芸術を愛好すると言われている。The French are said to love art.
文は武に勝る。The pen is mightier than the sword.
忍を行じてのみ、よく怨みを解くことを得る。By love alone is enmity allayed.
我々はこの町を小京都と呼ぶ。We refer to this city as Little Kyoto.
大か、小か。Large or small?
スキージャンプで２０２メートルを出せる飛び方を発見した！I've found a way of jumping so you can get 202m in the ski-jump!
彼女はトルコ人の彼がいる。She's got a Turkish boyfriend.
彼は夏中ずっと長野にいた。He stayed in Nagano throughout the summer.最終提案は来週中に発表されます。The final proposal will be announced sometime next week.その知らせは村中に不安をまき起こした。The news caused alarm throughout the village.



ＯＫが出たので、思わずグラスランナーのシーフ・バードというベタなキャラを作っちゃいましたよ。I got the OK so I unthinkingly created the clichéd 'grass runner thief/bard' character.
ついうっかりしてバスを乗り間違えた。I wasn't being mindful and got on a wrong bus by mistake.
彼らは宝物を探しに行った。They went in search of treasure.
彼は気を失いあお向けに倒れた。He fainted and fell on his back.






彼の子供っぽい笑い方が素敵よね。His childlike laugh is charming.
ビールは麦芽の含有量によって課税されるから、発泡酒の方が安いんだよ。Beer is taxed according to its malt content, so low-malt beer is cheaper.















彼自身がそこへ行った。He himself went there.
部屋の中には１脚の机といすがあった。There were a desk and a chair in the room.



気になってならない俺は思わず、目の前の学生に聞いてしまった。It was on my mind so much that I unthinkingly asked the pupil in front of me.ここで煙草を吸ってはなりません。You are not to smoke here.
多くの木は冬になると葉がなくなる。Many trees are bare in winter.
一生懸命勉強しなさい、そうすれば成功します。Study hard, and you'll succeed.
１０分もすれば彼がやってきます。He'll be along in ten minutes.
シロオニタケは毒菌だけど、存在感があって好きだなあ。Shiroonitake is a poisonous mushroom but it has real presence, and I like it.



















「こんな朝早くから開館してるんですか？」「私は顔パスよ」"Will they be open this early in the morning?" "They'll let me in on sight."



モーツァルトがこの世を去ってから２００年になる。It has been 200 years since Mozart died.













政府はスーダンの人権状況への関心を高めるために尽力してきた団体を黙らせることに懸命になっているようだ。The Government seems intent upon silencing an organization which has done so much to raise awareness of the human rights situation in Sudan.


急激にかりかりした鳥皮が食べたくなった。I suddenly got a craving to eat some crisp roast chicken skin.何をかりかりしてるの。What's biting you?
１日おきに買い物に行く。I go shopping every other day.
おっと、僕のペンのインクがきれちゃったよ。Oops, my pen has run out of ink.

ウィンドウズは、拡張子を付けないとファイルを読んでくれない。With Windows, you have to have extensions or it won't read your files.
ジョニーは４６年間りんごの種子を蒔き付けた。Johnny kept planting apple seeds for 46 years.




この仕事は私には手に負えない。This job is beyond my ability.



そうするのが彼のためだった。It was to his profit to do so.

「私おなかすいた」小さい白いウサギがいいました、そして彼らは止まっておおきなひなゆりの花の部分をたべました。"I'm hungry," said the small white rabbit, so they stopped and ate the flower from a large hyacinth.
そうでないという証拠はない。I have no proof to the contrary.

おい、いい加減パンツネタはやめとけよな、読者が退く、ドンビキ。Hey, it's about time you quit it with the panty jokes. You'll put off the readers, you creeper!



彼は彼女をあがめたてています。He has her on a pedestal.

「おんどりゃー馬鹿言ってんじゃねー」農家は言った。"Don't say such rubbish!" said the farmer.

カレンダーの日付は１９６４年９月２３日でした。The date on the calendar was September 23, 1964.彼は四年刑期のところを二年で釈放された。He was let out after serving just two years of his four-year prison sentence.


撮影隊は、まずロケ地を求めてその国中を旅した。To start with, the film crew travelled around the country looking for locations.
彼は彼女から多額の金をゆすり取った。He extorted a large amount of money from her.

あいみつ取るべきだね。We should put out a call for bids.












どういう風にしてそこへ行くか説明して下さい。Please explain how to get there.あなたはどういう風にしてここへ来ましたか。How did you come here?
１ペニーの節約は１ペニーの儲け。A penny saved is a penny earned.
ハミングバードには３４０種類がある。There are 340 species of hummingbirds.

ある人はこうだと言い、またある人はああだと言う。One man says this, another that.
でも、男性はああいうのは気に入らないようね。But maybe guys don't like them.
ああした美しいものは決してその価値を失うことはない。A beautiful object like that never loses its value.
ベイスギを材料に巨大でグロテスクな、しかし美しい円柱を作った。They made huge, grotesque, yet beautiful poles of red cedar.
インフォーマントはアメリカ人２０人、イギリス人２１人という構成である。The informants we used consisted of twenty Americans and twenty-one British.

彼女はああでもないこうでもないと悩んだ。She was at a loss for what to do.
あの喜劇役者のジョークときたら、どれもこれも古くて、以前に聞いたことのあるものばかりだ。That comic's jokes are all old hat and we've heard them before.













彼は邪悪な行為のかどで罰せられた。He was punished for his evil acts.

















市バスの混雑振りは大変なものです。Passengers are packed in like sardines on city buses.


療養病床が減ればそれができず、一般病床の医療にも支障をきたします。If long-term beds are reduced, then it won't be possible to do that and normal sickbeds will also be adversely affected.














中国のＧＤＰ統計はオオカミ少年か。Are the Chinese GDP figures a case of the boy crying wolf?

あの高い山は筑波山です。That tall mountain is Mt. Tsukuba.
このダンスクラブはだんだんよくなっていくね。This dance club is really going places.
彼がインタビューで言ったことは理にかなっている。What he said in his interview makes sense.
地震はリヒター・スケールで３．０を記録しましたが、大きな被害、負傷者が出た報告はありません。No major damage or injuries are known to have resulted from the quake measuring 3.0 on the Richter scale.
その知らせを聞いて身の毛がよだった。The news made my hair stand on end.
ジャンボ機は轟音を立てて着陸した。The jumbo jet touched down thundering.
定期船は、火曜日に神戸港に寄港するでしょう。The liner will call at Kobe on Tuesday.
ナポレオンはセントヘレナ島へ流された。Napoleon was exiled to St. Helena.
２人っきりでデート・・もとい、ＯＦＦ会だと思ったけど、そこまで甘くもないよな。So I thought my date, er rather, offline-meeting was going to be just me and her but things aren't that easy.

真夜中の太陽は幻想的な自然現象の一つだ。The midnight sun is a fantastic natural phenomenon.








世界的に過大に評価された中国書といえば、『孫子』ですかね。When it comes to Chinese books that are overvalued worldwide I suppose it's Sun Tzu, isn't it?























彼は寒い朝に故郷を後にした。He left his hometown on a cold morning.今ちょっと立て込んでいるので、後にしてもらえませんか。I'm tied up now. Could you make it later?

彼女とは数年前から口をきく間柄ではない。I have not been on speaking terms with her for a few years.彼は私のために口をきいてくれた。He put in a good word for me.

















旅行で使ったお金、全部説明がつきますか。Can you account for all the money you spent on your trip?


靴の裏にガムがこびりついちゃった。There's gum stuck to the bottom of my shoe.



真理の発見はいつまでたっても科学の唯一の目的であらねばならない。The discovery of truth should remain the single aim of science.そんなんじゃいつまで経っても奨励賞止まりだぞ？With that sort of attitude you'll never get past the honourable-mention prizes.


近所の人々が彼とともに、交替で夜を明かした。The neighbors took turns sitting up with him.














しもネタは禁止だよ〜。No dirty jokes!

ベッドメーキングは毎日しますか。Should I make my bed every day?
トムも来なかったしジェーンも来なかった。Tom didn't come, nor did Jane.


妻は魚のオードブルが好きだからね、釣りに出掛けるときはお許しが出やすいんだよね。My wife loves fish hors d'oeuvre, so it's easier for me to get a kitchen pass for my fishing.



明るい色が私たちの目を引いた。The bright colors arrested our eyes.
彼女はピンクのイブニングドレスを着て人目をひいた。She really cut a dash in her pink evening gown.
刺激的な新刊書が注目をひく。A stimulating new book attracts attention.

何ヶ国の言葉を話せますか。How many languages can you speak?
このページはリンクフリーです。You may link to this webpage freely.
イギリス人がみなフィッシュ・アンド・チップスが好きだというわけではない。Not all English people like fish and chips.
自分のことを棚にあげて他人を非難することはできない。The pot can't call the kettle black.
私はマックを使っていてウィンドウズ９５のファイルは読めません。I'm using a Mac and I can't read a Windows 95 file.
















あいつが僕のことを「ばかなやつ」っていったんだよ。He called me a stupid boy.スペイン料理ってパエリアの他に何があるの？What Spanish food is there apart from paella?


あいつ、絶対ペーパータオル使わないんだぜ。地球に優しいやつってことだよな。She never uses paper towels. She is such a tree hugger, you know.
あいつ、絶対ペーパータオル使わないんだぜ。地球に優しいやつってことだよな。She never uses paper towels. She is such a tree hugger, you know.
みんな大声を出して声をからした。They were all hoarse from shouting.



















彼は自粛の波に乗らなかった。He refused to exercise self-restraint.



さりげなく聡いこの子にはうかつな事はとても言えない。You just can't let things slip around this nonchalantly smart girl.
あなたは何カ国語を話しますか。How many languages do you speak?
その政治家は平然と賄賂を受け取り、全ての契約の５％が濡れ手に粟で彼の懐に入った。The politician had sticky fingers, and 5% of every contract ended in his pocket.
昨夜、彼があなたがお元気かどうかたずねてましたよ。He asked after you last night.











私は先週しばらくぶりに彼に会った。I met him last week for the first time in ages.











霊長類の毛づくろいは集団の結合を強める。Grooming in primates increases group cohesion.




「調子はどう？」「絶好調だよ。着実に増収増益を続けているよ」"How are things going?" "Terrific. Income and profit are continuing to rise steadily."



計量する前にすりきりしなさい。Level off the sugar when measuring out.

嬉しさのあまりとび上がった。I was too glad not to jump up.


ガスストーブは料理するのに最も均等な熱を供給する。A gas stove provides the most even heat for cooking.
クリームチーズ取ってくれる？Would you pass me the cream cheese, please?

普通、アマチュアでは250ヤード飛べばすごい飛距離だと言われます。Normally you'd call 250 yards a great distance for an amateur.


世界中の銀のティースプーンのコレクションがある。I have a collection of silver tea spoons from all over the world.
イングランドはデーン人の侵略をうけた。England was invaded by the Danes.
あの映画で一番覚えているのはラストシーンだ。What I remember most about that movie is the last scene.
お借りした車の調子が悪いのですが。The car I rented from you has a problem.６時までは出発できないのです。I cannot start till six o'clock.




・・・さあ、今日も勉学に勤しもうか。Well, shall we devote ourselves to study today as well?

ら抜き言葉って知っている？けっこう間違った言葉を使う生徒が多いみたい。You know about 'ra-skipped words'? It looks like quite a lot of students are using mistaken words.





わぁ、たまねぎ味のベーグルだ。Oh, onion bagels.わあ、いい天気だなー。It's a beautiful day!わあわあ泣きながら、小さな女の子は戸口へ走って行った。Crying loudly, the little girl hurried to the door.


だれか身に覚えのある人がいるんじゃないか。There's somebody here who did it, isn't there?
この川はオンタリオ湖に流れ込む。This river runs into Lake Ontario.
神戸は港市として有名だ。Kobe is famous as a port city.
私たちは明日大阪城に遠足に行きます。We are going on a school trip to Osaka Castle tomorrow.






落下物に注意！Watch out for falling objects!
彼らはどうも性が合わない。They are not suited to each other.






口数が多いぞと彼は言った。"You talk too much," he said.
幼稚園児たちは手をつないで公園の中を歩いていた。The kindergarten children were walking hand in hand in the park.
プレインイングリッシュは語学習得の近道です。Plain English is a shortcut to the goal of language learning.





死は生の正反対である。Death is the antithesis of life.
先ごろあなたの人事記録に誤りを発見しました。We recently discovered an error in your personnel record.
このバスは街の中心街へ行きますか。Does this bus go to the center of town?
犯罪が増加していることは紛れもない事実だ。It cannot be denied that crime is on the increase.
チームのための万歳三唱！Three cheers for the team.
ライオンは餌を求めて相争った。The lions fought with each other to get food.
彼女は日本初の宇宙飛行士となるだろう。She will be the first Japanese woman astronaut.
駐仏日本大使は誰だか知っていますか。Do you know who the Japanese ambassador to France is?
この国では、貸金業は儲かるビジネスだ。Money lending is a profitable business in this country.
この大分類には、金融業又は保険業を営む事業所が分類される。Into this broad category fall companies that run money lending and insurance businesses.
さらに、人類の最善の努力が神々の宇宙的御業を補助するのに必要であった。The best efforts of the human race, in addition, were necessary to assist the gods in their cosmic task.
第二が周辺環境との親和性であり、最小の廃棄物、自然エネルギーの利用等、周辺の生態と調和した住空間を形成することである。The second is the affinity with environment. By utilizing natural energy and reducing wastes, we have to make houses which harmonize with ecology.



風土病に対する予防接種を受けていたのは１００人中１人にも満たないということが見出された。It was discovered that less than one child in a hundred had been inoculated against endemic disease.






とにかくよさげな事は試してみようと思っているとこです。In any case, now I'm considering trying out some likely things.
剣歯虎が絶滅したのは氷河時代であった。It was during the ice age that the saber-toothed tiger became extinct.
神を信じ、敢然と敵に向かった、そのクリスチャンの剣闘士は、たくさんの敵を倒した。Putting his trust in God and taking the bull by the horns, the Christian gladiator defeated many adversaries.
列車は満員だった。そこで彼女は２等車で旅行せねばならなかったし、ずっと立っていなければならなかった。The train was full, so she was obliged to travel second-class, and had to stand all the way.
私は写真画を使って彼の伝記を話した。I illustrated his biography with some pictures.



老犬に新しい芸は教えられない。You can't teach an old dog new tricks.

下手に独自の方向性を出すと、攻撃されてしまうから、安全パイの報道しかしない。They'll be attacked if they carelessly express an original viewpoint, so they only report on the safe options.









お友達ブロガーさんがブログ閉鎖を決心されて凹み気味です。I'm a bit down because a blogger friend of mine has decided to stop blogging.

この新人のアナウンサー、さっきからとちってばかりいる。This new announcer keeps stumbling.


そう、いいわよ。いってらっしゃい。でも運転には気を付けてね。Oh, OK. See you. But drive carefully.
彼のあだ名は言い得て妙だよね。That nickname fits him perfectly.


「そっか。暇なら掃除しといて」「なんだそれ。兄貴をアゴで使うなよ」"Oh? If you're free get the cleaning done." "What's up with that? Don't order your brother around!"彼女は顎で人を使う。She has him at her beck and call.
今までこんなに恥をかかされたことは一度もなかった。I was never so humiliated in my life.













トラックは砂を地面にどさっと落した。The truck dumped the sand on the ground.
一部の住民が様子見の態度を取る一方で他の者は大洪水に備えた。Some residents took a wait-and-see attitude while others prepared for heavy flooding.
家が数軒その大洪水で流された。Several houses were carried away by the great flood.

夜の間に屋根に積もった雪がガサッと落ちてきた。The snow that had piled up on the roof at night came down with a thud.





ある研究の報告によれば、間接喫煙の結果、53,000人のアメリカ人が毎年死亡しているそうだ。A study reports that 53,000 Americans die each year as a result of secondhand smoke.
彼、ボスの逆鱗に触れ、地方支店に追いやられたよ。He recently had the bad luck to incur his boss' wrath and got sent out to work in the boondocks.
１週間でそのレポートを仕上げるなんて不可能だ。It is impossible to finish the report in a week.









船は暗礁に乗り上げて難破した。The ship was wrecked on a sunken reef.国会はその法案をめぐって暗礁に乗り上げてしまいました。The Diet was totally deadlocked over the bill.




彼は君のために一芝居打っているんだよ。He is putting on an act for you.





彼は人を手玉に取ったような扱い方をする。He leads you by the nose if you let him.

そのようにして彼は危機を脱したのです。That is how he got out of danger.

この提案は、２７の企業から４０人が参加した１２月１７日のＤＣＡの電話会議の結果によるものです。This initiative follows the DCA phone conference on Dec 17 attended by 40 people from 27 firms.

大恋愛の末に結ばれるわけではないから、アバタもエクボということはありえなかった。Since they didn't tie the knot following a grand love affair, it wasn't a matter of blind love.
来月の歌舞伎座の出し物はなんですか。What is the program of the Kabuki for next month?











「どうかしたの？」と小さな白いウサギが聞きました。"What's the matter?" asked the little white rabbit.
「やあ」とトムはにこにこしながら言った。"Hello," said Tom, smiling.

そればかりの年金では老後の生活が不安です。With only that much pension I'm concerned about life in retirement.

日本語がお上手ですね。Your Japanese is good.「ついお宅のバラに見とれてしまってまして。本当に華やかですこと」「まあ、お上手ねえ。それはどうも」"I was just admiring your roses. They're absolutely gorgeous." "Oh, I'm flattered. Thank you."


一子相伝の技と言うわりには、彼の蹴りは大した事はないね。For a guy who was chosen by his father as the only son to be taught the secrets of this martial art, he doesn't have that much of a kick.
彼女は僕の右足を思い切り蹴りつけた。She gave me a hard kick on my right leg.
彼はボールをゴールに蹴り入れた。He kicked the ball into the goal.



それはさておき、他に必要なものはないか。Aside from that, is there anything else you want?


この田舎者めが。You clown you.
彼らは立ち去る以外どうしようもなかった。They had no choice but to leave.


お、タエ、このチーズいけるよ。Oh, Tae, this cheese is a winner!

あの子は手がかかる。That boy is a handful.
正面のドアは鍵がかかったままだった。The front door remained locked.
我々の食料は底を突いた。Our supply of food is exhausted.
そばはそば粉から、うどんやきしめんは普通の小麦粉からできてるの。Soba is made of buckwheat flour, and udon and kishimen are made of plain wheat flour.

「見た目は悪くないがちょっと軽薄そう」な外見とは裏腹に、彼女はいないし、女性に手が早いワケでもない。In contrast to his "not bad looks but seems a bit of a dandy" appearance, he didn't have a girlfriend and he wasn't particularly fast with the ladies.















































































































































































































































嘘ばっかりついてるから、皆に総すかんを食うんだ。自業自得だよ。You're always lying- that's why people don't take you seriously. You get what you deserve.
アメリカ人たる私は、リンカーンがすばらしい人だと思う。I, as an American, admire Lincoln.
私たちは自動車で村々を次から次へと通り抜け、ついに目的地についた。We drove through village after village, until we got to our destination.

天才にもかかわらず、彼は相変わらずうだつがあがらない。For all his genius he is as obscure as ever.



彼はこの手のダーティーな手法にはすっかり麻痺していてなんの罪の意識も無かった。He was so used to that kind of back-room wheeling and dealing that he didn't feel guilty.



理由はこうこうであるとちゃんと説明しなさい。Explain exactly what the reasons are.







彼はまだ親のすねをかじっている。He's still sponging off his parents.







すぐ戻ってきます。I'll be back in a few minutes.
２、３ヶ月後、彼らは北極にある繁殖地へと戻っていきます。A few months later they return to their breeding grounds in the Arctic.


別に制服着込んだ外宇宙の使者が、伴侶を求めて徘徊してるわけでもなかろうに。It's not as if an emissary from outer space will have slipped into uniform and be loitering around seeking a partner.


「寝てた？」「爆睡」「そ、そうか？」「なんかうなされてたよ。怖い夢でも見てた？」"I fell asleep?" "Totally." "Really?" "You were very restless, did you have a scary dream?"


あの頃、私達は憎み合っていた。There was hatred between us then.

あと１０分で手が空く。I will be free in ten minutes.
都心では高層ビルが雨後のたけのこのように増えている。High rises are mushrooming in the heart of the city.
６種の道具がひとまとまりになっている。A half-dozen tools make up the tool collection.
















あいつ、上司に胡麻を擂ってやがる。He is buttering up to his boss.
自然な状態の髪の毛には、油分が含まれています。There is oil in hair in its natural state.
釈迦に説法とは存じますが、医者も禁煙されたほうがよろしいのではないでしょうか。I'm sure you don't need me to tell you this, but wouldn't it be a good idea to stop smoking?




妹にブラウスのアイロン掛けをさせた。She had her blouse ironed by her sister.


アメフトでタッチダウンは６点になる。In American football, a touchdown scores six points.
オプションとして４速自動変速機も選べる。4-speed automatic transmission is available as an option.
オプションとして４速自動変速機も選べる。4-speed automatic transmission is available as an option.







その土壌は腐植に富んでいます。That soil is rich in humus.
虎は肉食動物です。A tiger is a beast of prey.












彼はわが社の代表として会議に参加しました。He attended the meeting as our company representative.

































































盲ヘビに怖じず。Fools rush in where angels fear to tread.



























彼女は新聞に家事手伝いの求人広告を出した。She put an advertisement for a domestic help in the paper.
この地域では、工場労働者がどんどんいなくなっていますね。Factory jobs are drying up in the local economy.











































彼の行為はまさしく狂気の沙汰だった。His conduct was nothing short of madness.そんなことを言うのは狂気のさただ。It's the height of madness to say so.


















































信用のある建設業者に家を建ててもらったほうがよいですよ。You should have your house built by a trustworthy builder.


















副作用としては、視力障害があります。This has visual impairment as a side effect.















タロー君、歯を磨いていらっしゃい。Taro, go and brush your teeth.



試合にさきだち代々木競技場で開会式が行われた。Before the match, an opening ceremony was held in the Yoyogi stadium.
彼の名前をひょっとして知っていませんか。Do you happen to know his name?









男の子はたらいの中でジャブジャブ水をはねかしていた。The boy splashed about in the tub.

対岸の火事で良かった。I am glad it was someone else who got it.



そんなものは未だかつて見たことがない。Never have I seen such a thing.





虫の音がきこえます。I can hear the chirping of insects.












ちょっと座が白けている。There is a slight chill on the party.
濡れ衣を着せられた。I was falsely accused.




これらの気の毒な人々は非情な独裁者のなすがままになっていた。These poor people were at the mercy of the cruel dictator.












この板状の固い岩石の層をプレートと呼ぶ。We call these slabs of the solid-rock layer 'plates'.



















私は今にも出かけようとしているところへあなたが入ってきたのだ。I was about to leave when you came in.











この椅子はとても座り心地が良い。This chair is very comfortable.









困ったことがおきるのではないかと気をもむことがある。I sometimes apprehend that there will be some difficulty.
浪士は本懐を遂げた。The rōnin attained their long-cherished ambition.
























その竹はしなったが折れなかった。The bamboo gave but did not break.

雨がひどく降ったのでグラウンドはぐしゃぐしゃだ。It rained heavily, so the playground is muddy.ダンプカーと正面衝突したタクシーはぐしゃぐしゃになった。The taxi collided head-on with a dump truck and was badly crushed.






ただし、学生の本分は学業ですから、期末テストをおろそかにしたらメッ！ですよ？However, the duty of a student is to study. So if you neglect the end of term test, that's a "no!".
その仕事に応募したらどうだい。Why not apply for that job?








あのデパートでは今週メンズスーツが売り出し中だ。Men's suits are on sale this week at that department store.
あのブロンドの女と一緒にいる現場を妻におさえられたのでは、彼ももう運のつきだ。His wife caught him out with that blonde and then he was really up shit creek without a paddle.









彼はそれきり再び故国をみることはなかった。He was never to see his native land again.

その事故は誰のせいでもない。Nobody was to blame for the accident.




１発目のローキックはこの布石か！？The first low kick was the set-up for this!?




己の欲せざる所は人に施す勿れ。Do to others as you would have others do to you.

縁起でもないこと言うなよ。It's bad luck to say that.
その解釈は学者を待つまでもない。It doesn't require a scholar to interpret.





まず第一に、私たちはそれを始める資本金がなくてはならない。In the first place, we must have capital to begin it with.ほとんど空なのでガソリンを入れなくてはなりません。I need to put some gas in the car, as it's almost empty.
試験勉強をしなくちゃ。I have to prepare for the test.




ブラックリストに載っていれば編集を拒否するてなこと考えてました。I considered doing something like blocking edits based on a blacklist.
彼は結婚して身をかためた。He was married and settled down.いずれどこかに落ち着いて身を固めるつもりだが、まだまだだ。Eventually I'd like to settle down and have a family, but not yet.
Ｄ．Ｈ．ロレンスは小説家でもあり詩人でもある。D.H. Lawrence is a novelist and poet.何か悪いことでもあったの？What is the matter with you?
その氷河はゆっくりではあるが動いている。The glacier moves but by inches.
家の犬は私が行くところにはどこにでもついていく。My dog follows me wherever I go.
１度や２度の失敗はだれにでもある。Everybody fails once or twice.


収入内で生活をするようにしなさい。Try to live within your income.





いつでも好きな時にいらしてください。Please come whenever you like.



昭和天皇が靖国神社で７５年までに戦後計８回参拝した。In the post-War period, up until 1975, Emperor Showa prayed at the Yasukuni Shrine a total of 8 times.

町が一面すっぽり雪をかぶった。Snow completely covered the town.鋳物が金型からすっぽりとれた。The casting came cleanly out of its mold.





本を選ぶときは、まず過去の偉大な作家たちの作品に目を向けるべきだ。In one's reading, great writers of the past must be given the most attention.







この事実を心に留めておいて下さい。Please bear this fact in mind.
韓流ドラマブームに便乗して、韓国の製品を売る業者が増えた。Taking advantage of the popular boom in Korean drama, workers selling Korean goods have increased.


彼は息をひきとった。He breathed his last.

仕事探しを先延ばしにするのはやめなさい。Stop putting off finding a job.












今回、まだ両替していなかったので、日本円を人民元に替える必要があった。This time I hadn't converted my money yet, so I needed to change Yen into Yuan.
















































なぜ、ムスリムの人たちは、土葬にこだわるのか。Why do Muslims place such importance on burial?










イベントが成功したのは貴殿のたゆみ無い努力と献身のおかげです。It was your tireless efforts and devotion that made the event successful.
禁酒法のしかれていた時代に、酒類密輸入の悪どい商売を腕ずくで自分の支配下におくために、てき屋たちは、おたがいに殺しあっていた。During prohibition days, racketeers used to rub each other out to get control of the rum-running racket.





私の隣人はいわゆる詮索好きなのです。My neighbor is what we call a nosy person.

その光景を見て血の凍る思いがした。My blood curdled at that sight.



仕事探しを先延ばしにするのはやめなさい。Stop putting off finding a job.

エンジンを空回りさせちゃいかん。長持ちさせたいからね。Don't race the car. We want to make it go as far as possible.

彼女は彼に思いを寄せた。She fell in love with him.


まず、バリを剥がしてください。First, remove the burrs.









１モルの氷を水にするときと、１モルの水を水蒸気にするとき、より多くのエネルギーが必要なのは？When converting 1 mole of ice into water, and 1 mole of water into steam, which requires more energy?
社長の挨拶が長くて式の後半が押せ押せになってしまった。The company president's welcome was so long that we were squeezed for time in the second half of the ceremony.
前半彼らは押せ押せムードとなった。They went on the offensive in the first half.
商売の取引を日を追って記録している。I keep a daily record of my business dealings.









































彼は不注意な過ちをおかす、しかも頻繁にだ。He makes careless mistakes, and does so frequently.











今週末は何も予定がない。I have nothing on this weekend.
そして彼らはその文学、映画、音楽などの感動を通して世界に影響を与えつづけるだろう。And they will continue to influence the world through the excitement of their literature, movies and music.

理想を絵に描いたような男性だった。He was a man who was the very picture of her ideals.




その男がつけてくることに気づいて彼女は恐くなった。She became scared when she noticed the man following her.





人は自分の約束を守らなければならない。One should keep one's promise.
彼は私が約束を破ったことを許してくれた。He forgave me breaking my promise.
約束やぶったら、絶交ですからね？If you break your promise, we're through, you hear?
秘密をばらすかもしれん。She may spill the beans.
商売敵は仲が悪い。Two of a trade seldom agree.

仮に核戦争が起こったとすれば、人類は滅亡するだろう。If a nuclear war were to break out, mankind would perish.
あなたが援助しなかったとしたら彼は失敗するだろう。Without your help, he would fail.
その計画が実行できないとなれば、どうしなければなりませんか。What must be done if the plan proves unworkable?
彼女はいよいよとなったら，あっけなく降参した。When it came to the crunch she just gave in.








トムと飲みに行くんだったら、突拍子もないホラを吹くだろうから、覚悟した方がいいよ。If you go drinking with Tom, be prepared to listen to some pretty outlandish cock and bull stories.
ケビンが言うことはほら話ばかりなので、誰も彼のことを信じなかった。Nobody believed Kevin because all he ever told were tall stories.
「お前みてえなおかちめんこは初めて見た」と言ったら、「セクハラだ」と言われた。When I told her I'd never seen such a homely girl, she accused me of sexual harassment.
すべては燃えて灰となった。Everything was burnt to ashes.




夫との間に波風が立つのが恐くて、愛人の存在は知らない振りをしています。I'm afraid of discord arising with my husband so I'm turning a blind eye to his mistress.
おじはいつも家族に波風を立てるようなことをする。My uncle constantly causes his family trouble.



ある意味で、人生は夢にすぎない。In a sense, life is but a dream.
ある意味では、きみが間違っている。In a sense, you are wrong.





現在、韓国と日本の政府との間で、教科書問題が両国間にかかわる重要な問題へと発展しています。At present the text book issue between the Korean and Japanese governments is developing into a significant problem affecting both countries.


１９９５年、安藤氏は建築におけるもっとも権威ある賞を受賞した。In 1995, Andou received architecture's most prestigious award.それらの事実から判断すれば、森氏は金持ちにちがいない。Judging from those facts, Mr Mori must be a wealthy person.
彼は全財産を失うような危険を犯した。He risked losing all his fortune.






















どうかそんなに悲しまずに元気を出してください。Please don't be so sad. Cheer up!
マイクを除いてみんなパーティーに顔を出した。All but Mike were present at the party.
その会社では高い専門性が要求される。A high degree of specialization is required in that company.




お金を貸せといわれても無いそでは振れないよ。I can't lend you money, because I don't have any myself.


























彼らは国家間の紛争を解決しなければならない。They have to solve conflicts among nations.



ガラスのコップを流しにおこうとしたら手が滑って、ガシャッと割れた。When I tried to set the glass down in the sink my hand slipped and it shattered to pieces.




彼女はがっぽり稼いでいるよ。She's making money hand over fist.

洗面所の栓を抜くと、水がガバガバ流れ出した。When I unplugged the bathroom sink, the water gushed down the drain.
がばっと気合を入れて身を起こした。I sprang out of bed.







郵便局に何度も足を運ばなくてもいいように、切手を沢山手元においてある。I keep a good supply of stamps to save trips to the post office.


その探偵はずいぶん危ない橋を渡ってきた。The detective has a lot of adventures.
彼は生き馬の目を抜くようなやつだ。He is a sharp-shooter.
あいつの息の根を止めてやる。I'll kill him.


彼はよく一攫千金を夢見ている。He often tries to get rich at a single bound.



もし電話がかかってきたら、居留守を使っておいて。I'm not here if anybody calls.


今年の米の収穫は、去年よりも上を行く可能性が十分ある。There's a good chance that this year's rice crop will be up on last year's.
市街戦のために市中は上を下への大騒ぎだ。Because of the street fighting, the city is in utter confusion.
今朝は浮かぬ顔をしているね。何かあったのかい。You seem to be depressed this morning. What's the matter?






ロンドン滞在中に彼は英語の腕を磨いた。He brushed up his English during his stay in London.





































私は飼い犬に手をかまれた。I was stabbed in the back by my subordinate.





ちょっと顔を貸してくれませんか。Can I have a few words with you?





他人の陰口をたたくな。Don't speak ill of others behind their back.






あなたに片棒をかついでもらいたい。I'd like you to be my partner.





金に糸目を付けないから、いい人材を紹介してよ。Send me the best employees that money can buy. Money is no object.



ボクが憧れたのは翔太部長の『力』じゃない。体を張ってでも信念を貫こうとする雄々しい勇気だったはず。What I looked up to in Shota was not his 'strength'. It was his heroic courage to put his life on the line to carry out his convictions.



彼はかんしゃくをおこして私をののしり始めた。He lost his temper and began calling me names.

がばっと気合を入れて身を起こした。I sprang out of bed.気合いを入れて頑張れ。Roll up your sleeves and get busy.






私はそれを見て肝をつぶした。I was frightened at the sight.

どうやら、１年ブランクを取り戻し、旧交を温めることができたみたいだな。It looks like we've been able to fill in that one year gap and renew our old friendship.


「そんなに舐められた相手じゃないけどなぁ・・・」「そうだよ、窮鼠猫を噛むって言うじゃないか」"I don't think she's an opponent you can ignore like that ..." "That's right, they say a cornered rat bites back, don't they?"

いけすかないボスだけど、仕事の悩みを相談したら案外、窮鳥懐に入れば猟師も殺さず、てなことになるかもね。The boss is hard to get along with. But if I try to talk to him about problems I have at work he might have a little heart. Even a hunter can't kill a bird who flies to him for protection.

彼は偉そうにすましこんでいる。He's putting on airs.

私の知っている限りでは、彼はなまけ者ではない。So far as I know, he is not lazy.



この問題は両国間で政治的解決を見た。The two countries came to a political settlement over this dispute.



道路がほこりっぽい。昨日雨が降ったはずがない。The road is dusty. It cannot have rained yesterday.








啓子さんの問題はうわさで聞き知った。I learned about Keiko's problem from gossip.
彼らはしきりにそのニュースを聞きたがっていた。They were all agog for the news.





小さな花々が川の土手一面に咲いた。Tiny blossoms have come out all over the river bank.
演奏会の切符は当事務所で販売しています。Concert tickets are on sale at this office.

彼は昼食後また読書を始めた。He resumed reading after lunch.
朝食後、出発しましょう。Let's depart after breakfast.
私は退職後のために８エーカーの農場を買った。I bought an eight-acre farm for my retirement.
時間通りには着けないよ。You won't get there on time.
あなたの言う通りだと思うわ、ジェーン。I guess you're right, Jane.
あの警備員は何でも規則通りにする傾向がある。That guard tends to do everything by the book.
この新車は他車をしのぐだろう。This new car will put other cars to shame.
その本はいちばん上の棚に置いてください。Put the book on the top shelf.
















ジムは交換留学生として日本にいたとき、私たちの家に滞在した。Jim stayed with us while he was in Japan as an exchange student.











彼は日本で有名な流行歌手です。He's a famous popular singer in Japan.
われわれの宇宙はまだ生まれて間もないが、理論家たちはその最後の姿を究明することにやっきになっている。Although our universe is still young, theorists are busy exploring its ultimate fate.

スキーシーズンも終わりに近づいて、ウエアとかのバーゲンやっているけど、余り物しかなくて丁度いいサイズのモノがない。Since ski season is almost over, the ski wear that's on sale is all leftovers, so there's nothing that's just my size.
コーヒーポットが沸騰している。The coffeepot is boiling.



勤勉さが彼の素晴らしい昇進の主要因だった。Diligence was the principal factor in his remarkable promotion.
お子さんに少し、発破をかけた方がいいですよ。You should build a fire under the kid.
毎度お手数をおかけして申し訳ありません。I'm sorry to trouble you so often.
ずいぶんお手間をかけさせまして、すみませんでした。It was nice of you to go to so much trouble.
お前はわしが手塩にかけた人間だ。I brought you up under my personal care.
平均台の上にまたがりなさい。Get yourself astride the balance beam.
商品はすべて陳列台に並べてあります。All the goods for sale are set out on the tables.
あいつは悪党面をしている。He has an evil countenance.
記録面に手を触れないで下さい。Please do not touch the record side.
チューリッヒはロンドンに次ぐ世界第二位の金市場である。Zurich is the second largest gold market in the world after London.




クラスの女生徒の男生徒に対する割合は３対２だ。The proportion of girls to boys in our class is three to two.

太陰月はカレンダーのひと月より短い。A lunar month is shorter than a calendar month.
授業料は本月２５日限り納付の事。Tuition fees must be paid not later than the 25th of this month.

あなたの行為の責任をもってもらおう。We ask you to account for your conduct.








日朝間にはまだ外交関係が樹立されていない。Diplomatic relations have not yet been established between Japan and North Korea.
警察が医療事故の立件に消極的だ。The police are reluctant to pursue criminal charges in medical cases.
自分の為になるような本を読まなければならない。We must read such books as will benefit us.この法律は貧しい人々のためになるであろう。This law will benefit the poor.


ん〜、イマイチなんだよねえ。この脚のあたりの線とかさぁ。なんとかなんないの？This drawing is less than great. He needs to do something with the line here at the back of the leg.







ウーッ、今日の練習はいつになくハードで辛い。Whoo! Today's practice is tough - much harder than usual.










どこの医者にかかっていますか。Which doctor is attending you?
ウラウラとした日差しに誘われて、眠りに落ちた。The soft, gentle sunlight beckoned me to sleep.
掘っ建て小屋でもいいから自分の家が欲しい。I want my own house, even if it's a shack.


















この車の維持は高くつく。It is expensive running this car.

チャットルームで知り合った人をパブで探したが、それっぽい人はいなかった。I searched at the pub for the person I had met online, but there was nobody who looked like that.




誰に白羽の矢を立てようかな。Who shall I choose?
私が留守の間あなたのうちに犬の世話をしてほしい。I'd like you to look after my dog.











うわっ？これ、勉強に運動神経、全てのパラメータがMAXじゃないか！おまけにお金もカンストするまで貯まってる・・・すげえ。Wha? Study, reflexes, all the parameters are MAX! You've even saved money up to the limit ... Amazing.
暴動が起こったとき、当直の監視員はたった１人だった。There was only one warden on duty when the riot started.















昨日、閑静な住宅街にある猫のひたいほどの売り地を見つかって、すぐ買うことに決めた。Yesterday, I found a tiny piece of land for sale in a quiet residential area and I immediately decided to buy it.










猫もしゃくしも外国へ行きたがる。Anybody and everybody wants to go abroad.




そう言いながら、俺は真逆の行動に出た。Saying which, I did the opposite.








たまには酒にでも酔ってはじけて日頃の鬱憤晴らしたほうがいいんじゃないか。Isn't it better to get drunk and cut loose once in a while and blow off the tension of daily frustration?


弁償代きっちり耳そろえて払わんかい。Aren't you paying for the damages in full?



この辺りには本当にホームレスの人たちがいっぱいね。This neighborhood has more homeless people than you can shake a stick at.


第１３週：絶対運動と相対運動について学習する。Week 13: Learn about absolute, and relative, motion.
第１３週：絶対運動と相対運動について学習する。Week 13: Learn about absolute, and relative, motion.


農夫は春になると種をまく。Farmers sow seeds in the spring.


案内人は私たちにホテルの場所を間違えて教えた。Our guide misinformed us about the location of the hotel.

６月にしては寒い朝だ。It is a cold morning for June.
またのお越しを楽しみに待っています。I look forward to your next visit.







好きにしろよ。Suit yourself.
ジムは日本が好きになった。Jim has learned to like Japan.







あぁ……、若かったとはいえ、しょうもない凡ミスだ。Ahh ... well I was young but what a stupid mistake.


彼は経理部で働いている。He is an accountant at the company.


彼は自分なりの理論を発展させた。He developed his own theory.




そういう言葉は不信感を生むことになるだろう。Such words will give rise to suspicion.







ボーイング社はＣＦＩＴを引き起こす一連の乗務員のミスの可能性を推定した。Boeing has calculated the chances of a series of crew errors leading to CFIT.
静岡産のお茶と宇治産のお茶では何が違いますか。Is there any difference between the tea from Shizuoka and that from Uzi?


私たちは前の校長先生よりも今度の校長先生のほうが好きです。We like the present headmaster better than his predecessor.









彼は地下活動の疑いをかけられた。He was suspected of underground action.




あの女の子はお金に縁がなく育ったが、結婚してからは浪費家になった。The girl had grown up without any money and when she married she became a spendthrift.




その大チェーンストアは新しく支店を作った。The large chain store created a new branch.
テルミン：一九二〇年、ロシアの物理学者レフ・セルゲイヴィッチ・テルミンが作った世界初の電子楽器。Theremin: The world's first electronic musical instrument, made by Russian physicist Lev Sergeivitch Termen in 1920.












強い風を受けて帆がぴんと張った。The sail tightened in the strong wind.
「聞いたよ、光一」「まあ皆までいうなって。分かってる。神社の夏祭りの一件でしょ？」"I've heard about it, Koichi." "You don't need to say anything more, I know. It's the summer festival incident at the shrine, right?"


今日はビシッと決めちゃって、デートでもあるのかい。What are you doing dressed so well? Do you have a date or something?



「それは糖分を供給してもっと働けと暗に……？」「はい？」「いや、ちょとやさぐれてるだけ。ごめん」"Is that implying that I go get some sugar in me and then work more?" "Er?" "No, sorry. I'm just sulking a bit."
詳らかに教えてください。Please explain in detail.
不安の影が彼女の顔をさっとよぎった。A shadow of anxiety swept across her face.









そのような行ないはいかにもメグらしい。Such behavior is just like Meg.

この先通行禁止。No passage this way.


穂木を台木に差し込む際、形成層を重ね合わせるようにします。When inserting the budwood into the root stock, make the cambium layers overlap.








フランクス陸軍大将がナイト爵位の名誉称号を授かりました。General Franks received an honorary knighthood.





















私、そのサイトにブックマークをつけてるよ。I have a bookmark on that page.









































この建物は彼の名前にちなんで名付けられました。This building was named after him.

今週は、訳あって、憂鬱な一週間になりそうだ。For some reason it looks to be turning out to be a depressing week.






















家では赤味がかった髪とそばかすのせいで、母が侮蔑を込めて「にんじん」と名付け、皆にもそう呼ばせています。At home, because of his reddish hair and freckles, his mother scornfully named him "carrot" and had everybody else call him that.
だが定期的な服用が必須であり、一日でも服用しなければたちまち死に至る。However he has to take it at fixed intervals, just one day without taking it is swiftly fatal.


表計算ソフトは、覚えておくと何かと便利よ。Once you get the hang of it, spreadsheet software is really useful.
バドミントン部はまともな部員が極端に少ないため、ほとんど廃部ないし休部状態だった。There were so few proper members in the badminton club that it was half-way between dead and 'on break'.
バドミントン部はまともな部員が極端に少ないため、ほとんど廃部ないし休部状態だった。There were so few proper members in the badminton club that it was half-way between dead and 'on break'.







そんな難しい質問をするなよ。Don't ask such hard questions.


あの男はよくつまらぬことで誰にでも因縁をつける。He often uses the slightest thing as a pretext for a fight with anybody.




そこそこ腕が立つようになるにはどれくらいの時間がかかるものでしょうか？How long does it take to get reasonably skilled?
奥さんの尻にしかれている。His wife leads him by the nose.








政府が自衛隊に沖縄への災害派遣を要請した。The government asked the SDF for a disaster relief deployment to Okinawa.
皆留守だというのに、不思議なことに家中の電灯がついていた。Strange to say, all the lights in the house were on, though no one was at home.
あの男は言うなれば大きくなった子供だ。That man is, so to speak, a grown-up boy.



もっと経費を抑えろよ。入るを量りて出ずるを為す、ということを知らんのかね。We have to cut business expenses here. Haven't you ever heard of looking at how much you're getting before you start spending?

虎は死して皮を留め、人は死して名を残す。A great man will be remembered for his achievements.
満開をチョイ過ぎた感はありましたが、それでも、美しい桜を満喫してきました。They seem a little past their peak, but even so we enjoyed the beautiful cherry blossoms.











窓が閉まっているか確かめとけ。See that the window is closed.

ほんのちょいやくで人気があるのはすごい！It's impressive that he's popular with just a bit part!




信じていたかどうかはともかく、超常的な話題に拒絶反応があるということはないようだ。I don't know whether she believed me or not but in any case it seems she doesn't automatically dismiss talk of the supernatural.
その実現もユーザーニーズを考えたアプリケーションの開発と行政による規制緩和が大きなポイントとなると考えられる。The success of newly-developed applications and government-forced deregulation may hold the key to achieving this economic implementation.
パトロールカーはその地区の全体を警備する。The patrol cars cover the whole of the area.
マーケティング分科会では、１９９８年の目標と方向を決めるためにフォンコンファレンスを行うことをお知らせします。For your information, the marketing subcommittee is scheduling a phone conference to establish objectives and directions for 1998.














試験結果発表もつつがなく終わって、当面の視点が自然と夏休みに集まってくるでしょ？The publication of the exam results over without incident, for the time being attention is naturally going to focus on the summer break, right?



あの人はそつの無い人だ。He's a man who doesn't make mistakes.









ロングドレスが流行した。Long dresses stayed in fashion.


エリックは私たちのサッカーチームにいる。Eric is on our soccer team.















熱帯雨林は残されるべきだ。Rainforests should be preserved.







な、なにか笑うところありました？あすか、ギャグってました？Did I say something funny? Did I make a joke?
運んできてくれたランチは噂に違わず旨かった。The lunch she brought me was as delicious as everyone had been saying.

彼はうまくそのトラブルを逆手に取った。He skillfully turned the trouble to his advantage.





その頃、ロングスカートが流行していた。Long skirts were in fashion in those days.







彼の完ぺきに秩序正しい人生は麻薬中毒の兄弟が現れた時に崩壊した。His flawlessly ordered life collapsed when his drug-addict brothers appeared.











それは決してありえない。That'll be a cold day in hell.
いよいよという時になって彼は怖じ気付いた。His nerve failed him at the last moment.





私はビニール袋にワインを注ぎ、それからそれを氷水に付けた。I poured the wine in a plastic bag and then dipped it in ice water.ビニール袋に入れてください。Could I have a plastic bag for those?
超軽量新素材の採用により、従来の約半分（当社比）という圧倒的な軽さを実現！As a result of new ultra-light materials, our product now only weighs about half as much as before!














よかれと思ってしたことがあだとなった。It backfired on me despite my good intentions.
シングルルームを予約したいのですが。I'd like to reserve a single room.



















うちの体操服って普通の短パンだったのに今日から急にスパッツになっちゃったのね。Our P.E. kit was just shorts but now it's spats from today.



彼女のフェチが緊縛と支配でしょう。I guess she's into bondage and domination.


































魔術師サラ。人は彼女を『大魔導師』とか呼ぶらしい。The magician Sarah. Apparently people call her "The Great Mage" or some such.
キーンコーン・・・カーンコーン・・・「うわ、まずい。本鈴だ！」Bing-bong ... bing-bong ... "Oh-oh. The class bell!"

















彼は試験に失敗して気を落としている。He is discouraged by his failure in the examination.








ヒンギスが一回戦敗退の大番狂わせ。It was a big upset when Hingis was eliminated in the first round.

２度と学校に遅れてはいけません。Don't be late for school again.




















今のうちにそれをしなさい。Do it when you have time.










先の時間に居眠りした分も合わせて、今度の試験はどうも一筋縄ではいかない感じが漂っている。Taking into account the time I'd just spent napping, I'm really picking up the sense that this time's exam really won't be straight forward.

彼らはどんな体勢で捕っても地肩が強いからいい返球ができる。Their shoulders are strong no matter what stance they are in so they can throw back to the pitcher well.



「冬のソナタ」を例に挙げるまでもなく、いまや時ならぬ韓流ブームである。You don't need to bring up "A Winter Sonata" to show that South Korean culture is having an unexpected boom in Japan.





























彼は良心の呵責を感じた。He felt the pricks of conscience.






最近思いもよらない事件が多いね。事実は小説より奇なり、とはよく言ったもんだよ。You hear about a lot of incidents these days that would be hard to dream up. It really backs up the old saying that fact is stranger than fiction.

























あの人、何でも人の頭越しにやっちゃうのよね。That guy always goes over people's heads to get what he wants.





















ノリもさる事ながら、会場と一体化したような快感が忘れられない。I got really into it, and I just can't forget the exhilaration of becoming one with the audience.







目が口よりものを言う時がある。Eyes sometimes talk louder than words.課長からもらった推薦状が物を言った。The recommendation from my boss made all the difference.









壊滅的な被害を防ぐために世界的な警戒を強化していく重要性を確認した。They confirmed the importance of strengthening global precautions in order to prevent devastating losses.




























うちのかみさんは元プロレスラーで、だからもし私が浮気をしているところを見つかりでもしようものなら、それこそコテンパンにやられてしまうよ。My wife used to be a pro-wrestler, so if she ever catches me two-timing her, I'd be beaten to a pulp.
うちのかみさんは元プロレスラーで、だからもし私が浮気をしているところを見つかりでもしようものなら、それこそコテンパンにやられてしまうよ。My wife used to be a pro-wrestler, so if she ever catches me two-timing her, I'd be beaten to a pulp.
わぁ、たまねぎ味のベーグルだ。Oh, onion bagels.


















戦後の日本はいくつかの力強い長期繁栄を経験し、その中には神武景気や岩戸景気がある。The postwar has experienced several long periods of continuous strong prosperity, among which are the Jinmu Boom and the Iwato boom.















リハの回数増えたから仕事キチキチだよ。With the extra rehearsals, work is really tight.


























































ね、ね、あの店、ニューオープンだって！よってみない？Look! That shop's just opened! Why not take a look?


















































「あれ？恵子は？」「今日は三者面談だから遅れるって」"Eh? Where's Keiko?" "Said she's got a parent and child meeting so she'll be late."








出来るだけ早く参ります。I'll come as soon as I can.


ある種の鳥は飛べない。Some kinds of birds can't fly.









彼はその光景にはっと息をのんだ。He lost his breath at the sight.





















防衛庁が防衛省に格上げされたのはなぜですか？Why was the Japan Defense Agency upgraded to the Japanese Ministry of Defense?

朝は洗顔はもちろん身だしなみを整えてからここに集まるんだ。Obviously wash your face, but you must also take care of your appearance before assembling here.

















とても現実味のあるプランとは言えなかったな。You couldn't say that was a plan with any sense of reality to it.






結果はかなり期待外れだった。The result was rather disappointing.






僕は夜型なんだ。I'm a night owl.
























圭はその問いにギクリとさせられたが、頭を何でもないといいたそうに横に振る。Kei is startled by that question, but shakes her head as it to say that it's nothing.













泳ぎに行ってはどうかな。How about going for a swim?




















クニ子は生まれて初めて、そんなにたくさんお酒を飲んだ。Kuniko has never drunk so much before in her life.









やり残すことがないように頑張るぞ。I'll do my best to have nothing left to do!
やり残しがもしあるなら、やってしまいなさい。Do what you have left undone, if anything.











親切なおもてなしありがとうございます。Thank you for your kind hospitality.








「きれいな宝石ですね」、適当な話題かどうかわからないが、とりあえずそう水を向けてみた。"Pretty gem, isn't it?" Not knowing if it was a suitable subject or not, but anyway I tried to get her interest that way.


































その取り決めは、予告なしに変わることがある。The arrangements are subject to change without notice.
利用条件を予告なしに変更することがあります。Terms of use may be changed without notice.







今日の授業は連立不等式の続きです。昨日と同じくｘとｙにする領域で表してみましょう。Today's class continues with inequalities. Like yesterday try to display the domains in x and y.







1/4カットの白菜を太めの千切りにザクザク切る。Cut the quartered pak-choi into, slightly wide, strips.

あ、今度ケー番交換しませんか？Er, could we swap mobile numbers next time?















これはなんだ。キャッチセールスじゃないのなら、新手の逆ナンだろうか。Then what is this, I wonder? If it isn't dodgy door-to-door sales, then could it be a new kind of pickup technique for the ladies?
























君は何事にも気を回しすぎだよ。You're too suspicious about everything.

そんなに気を持たせないで。Don't raise my hopes like that.

彼は数学では誰にも引けをとらない。He is second to none in mathematics.











































三菱さんが飲み代を浮かすために家飲みしています。Mr. Mitsubishi is drinking at home to save his drinking money.

















彼はその気になれば秘密を守る事が出来る。He is capable of keeping a secret when he wants to.


「昨日の今日だし・・・その・・・性器が痛かったりは？」「まだ、少しヒリヒリしますけど」"It's right after yesterday so ... that is ... do your genitals hurt or ...?" "It still smarts a little but..."



私たちはオーストラリア人です。We are Australians.

察が来た、ずらかれ！The pigs are coming! Let's beat it!
静かに！みんなその場を動かないで。これから持ち物検査をはじめます。Quiet! Everybody stay where they are, there will now be a possessions check.



















「有志連合」とは、イラク戦争でイラクを相手に協力して戦った国々のことを指す言葉である。The "Coalition of the Willing" is a phrase that refers to the countries that fought together against Iraq in the Iraq War.




君も将来のことを考えていい頃だ。It's time you looked ahead.















いつ寝首を掻かれるかわかったものではありません。There's no telling when she'll stab you in the back.

何はともあれ、大事にいたらなかったのは、不幸中の幸いであった。At any rate, that it had ended without serious incident was a small mercy.

市民はなんぴとたりとも権利を奪われてはいけない。No citizen should be deprived of his rights.















おやおや、食事の途中に席を立つとはマナーに反しますね。Oh my, leaving the table in the middle of a meal is bad manners, you know.


なにげに話を聞いていたのね。You were just listening to the talk, without thinking.













最近青少年の自殺があとをたたない。There seems to be no end to the number of young people committing suicide these days.




うむ。これだけのことをされて、ブチキレないほうがおかしい。So. Having had all that done to him it would be stranger if he wasn't enraged.






ついに年貢の納め時が来たか。I guess the time of reckoning has arrived at last.
























学校がきれいに保たれており、生徒がそれに誇りを持っていることも、印象深いものでした。I was also impressed with the school's cleanliness and the students' pride in it.
















彼はぼやーっとした顔つきをしていた。He had an absent look on his face.


超軽量新素材の採用により、従来の約半分（当社比）という圧倒的な軽さを実現！As a result of new ultra-light materials, our product now only weighs about half as much as before!オーストラリアには美人が多いと思う（当社比）。I think there are a lot of beautiful women in Australia (YMMV).


「ここ、覚えてる？」「集団登校の待ちあわせ場所だな」"Remember here?" "It's where we gathered for going to school in groups."
これで肩の荷がおりました。It's like a weight has been lifted from my shoulders.
彼は平均的な背丈だ。He was a man of average height.
その精力的な男は様々な活動に加わっている。The vigorous man is engaged in diverse activities.
我々は熱狂的な阪神タイガースファンである。We are enthusiastic Hanshin Tigers fans.
人間はあまりにも野心的になりすぎると、自分を滅ぼしてしまうことになる。Man may well, in his attempt to be too ambitious, destroy himself.
彼の次の制作は非常に意欲的なミュージカルだった。His next production was a very ambitious musical.
イギリス人と比べてみると、我々は近視眼的すぎる。Compared with the English, we are too near-sighted.
心情的には賛成、けれど現実的に反対します。I agree on an emotional level, but on the pragmatic level I disagree.
ほとんどの人には前衛的すぎるって聞いたわ。I'd heard she was too far out for most people.
もっと大局的に見て判断すべきだ。We should judge matters on a broader basis.

製品販売には天才的手腕が必要なときもある。Selling products sometimes requires having a stroke of genius.
そのショーは電撃的ヒットだった。The show was an electrifying hit.
住民達は彼らの都会的な文化に誇りを持っている。The inhabitants are proud of their urban culture.
最も野性的な子馬が最高の駿馬になる。The wildest colt makes the best horse.


客の足が遠のいた。Customers stopped coming to our shop.












何だって私の本がこんなところにあるんだろう。What's my book doing here?そんな席からコンサートが聴けたら、人は、何だってするさ。People would sell their souls to hear the concert from those seats.
「そっか。暇なら掃除しといて」「なんだそれ。兄貴をアゴで使うなよ」"Oh? If you're free get the cleaning done." "What's up with that? Don't order your brother around!"

ダンスパーティーで楽しんで下さい。Please enjoy yourself at the dance.


他人の足を引っ張るような真似はやめろ。Don't stand in other people's way.

マニュアルシフトで運転できますか。Can you operate a manual transmission?

静かに、子供たちが眠っています。Be quiet. The kids are asleep.静かに、授業中にしゃべってはいけません。Be quiet. Don't talk in class.

正直がわりに合わない場合もある。There are cases where honesty doesn't pay.


彼には美しい奥さんがあるにもかかわらず、その割りには喜んでいない。He is none the happier for his beautiful wife.

彼にはある政治家の息がかかっている。He has the backing of a certain politician.

現在はＴＥＴＲＡの操作的な意味を 「すべての消費可能なリソースを消費する」と与えている。At present "consume all consumable resources" is assigned as the operational meaning of TETRA.








因果を含めてあきらめさせた。I persuaded him to give up the idea.






松葉杖ってけっこうムズいな・・・。「すみません、ストレッチャー通ります！」Crutches are pretty tricky ... "Excuse me, stretcher coming through!"







「・・・つまり、セックス！？」「うわあ、健二ったら・・・みもふたもない」"... in other words, sex!?" "Geez, you don't beat around the bush!"









この問題はｋについての恒等式なので、まず与式を、ｋについて、解きます。This problem is an equality of k so we first solve the assigned equation for k.













あのさ〜俺らいま遊ぶお金ないんだけどね。まあ、ぶっちゃけ恵んでよな。Y'know we're short of money to have fun and ... Well to be blunt, gimme!
































実はこれで４度目の質問になります。Actually this will be my fourth question.
















倍付けで払いますよ。I'll pay double the price.



私は、あんないい子ぶった人たちには耐えられません。I can't stand those goody-goody types.

ダニに「さん」づけするのか。面白いコだな。"Mister"ing a tick? You're a funny kid.









同期の人間の売上があがってきたから、俺もウカウカしてられないな。When one of my coworkers starts racking up good sales figures I can't let down my guard.






ここがしくしく痛みます。I have a gripping pain here.






過去問がもしあるならば一応目を通すほうがいいと思います。If there are past exam questions then I think it would be best to give them a quick look over.




さすがは、王子様ですわね。きっとただならない傑物の素質をお持ちなのですわ。Isn't that just what you'd expect from the prince? He certainly has the character of a truly great man.
























ぱたぱたと足跡を立てて、エントランスへと駆けてゆく。With a pitter-patter of footsteps she runs off to the entrance.
彼は私の鼻先でドアをぱたんとしめた。He slammed the door right in my face.








ちなみに、この部屋には冷房設備なんて物は何も無い。あるのはうちわだけ。Incidentally, this room doesn't have anything like an air conditioner. All it has is a hand-held paper fan.
彼の家は１万ドルで売られた。His house was sold for $10,000.

革命政府は、民衆から兵をつのって防戦するとともに、共和政治を確立して、捕らえていたルイ１６世を処刑しました。The revolutionary government, while raising troops from the masses and fighting a defensive battle, established a republic and executed Louis XVI.
帽子を掛け釘に掛けた。I hung my hat on the peg.
回収対象のソニー製充電池は累計で７６５万９０００個となった。The amount of Sony rechargeable batteries supposed to be collected totalled 7,659,000 units.
宿代をケチって野宿しました。We skimped on the hotel fees and slept outside.
それは五千人の兵員を擁する大部隊なのです。That is a large force with 5,000 soldiers.

インキ補充瓶のキャップを外し、スポイトでインキを吸い上げ、マーカーの吸収体へ適量、滴下してください。Remove the cap from the ink refill bottle, fill the dropper with ink, and drip an appropriate amount onto the marker's core.
「道」という漢字の総画数は何画ですか。How many strokes does the kanji for "michi" have?


株価上昇を契機に新工場建設の話が持ち上がった。They took advantage of the stock price increase to raise the idea of building a new factory.
農園主は大きな農場を持っている。The farm owner has a large farm.
バターは乳脂から作られる。Butter is made from cream.

金衡１ポンドは１２オンスである。One pound troy weighs 12 oz.
メキシコ政府は１９９８年型の中古車以外の中古車の輸入を禁止すると発表した。The Mexican government announced the banning of all imports of second-hand cars, except for 1998 models.
おやじは合間合間に庭いじりをする。Father does gardening whenever he gets a chance.
ユーモラスな話から気持ちの悪い話まで、前巻同様にいろいろなタイプの話が楽しめます。From humorous to creepy stories, like the last volume, you can enjoy various types of stories.
だからまあ、学生会としても苦渋の決断てやつなんだ。わかってやってくれ。So, well, it's a bitter decision for the student council to make as well. Give 'em a break.

何があっても海に行く！タオルに、海パン。虫除けスプレー！No matter what I'm going to the beach! Towel and trunks. Insect repellant!



その真実が明るみに出た。The fact was brought to light.


ちょいとここらで河岸をかえましょうや。Let's get out of here.




（注）画像がリンク切れになっている場合があります。NB: Pictures may have become dead links.










えっ、結納品にン十万円？Eh? Hundreds of thousands of Yen plus betrothal gifts?





え、出かける前に、しっかりかぎをかけたんですね。Really? I had locked it up before I went out.え、そうですとも。Yes, that is most certainly so.


おはよう。ご飯をよそっても良いかしら？Morning. Shall I dish up?
ってゆーか、こうやってぐじぐじ考えるのが情けないんじゃないのか？Or rather, is it not just pathetic that I think such whiny thoughts like this?
刺激を受け続けると肌の保護作用により角質が肥厚して、ゴワゴワしたり硬くなって、毛穴が目立ってきます。If it continues to be stimulated the skin's protective function causes thickening and it becomes stiff and hard with pores that stand out.
もうひとがんばりすれば成功するだろう。One more effort, and you will succeed.
私の愛犬に対する愛情は浅からぬものがあった。My love for my dog was very deep.


主人公は、子供の頃、親にほったらかしにされて苦しんだ。The hero, as a child, suffered from parental neglect.
あの本を自分のためにとっておこう。I'll keep that book for myself.













私はその計画を実現するためにあらゆる努力をしたが、結局それは徒労に終わった。I made every effort to realize the plan but after all it turned out to be in vain.

ったくケイコちゃんって可愛いんだか小憎らしいんだか・・・。Sheesh, that Keiko - she's cute or she's hateful, just can't make her out.
「っていうか、あなたは誰なの！？」床に転がっている俺は無視して、伊織はその少女を問いただしていた。Rather - who the heck are you?! Iori enquired of the girl, ignoring my form rolling around on the floor.

昨日、ジャイアンツぼろ負け！！The Giants got clobbered yesterday.














お父さまがお亡くなりになったそうで。I'm sorry to hear that your father passed away.
母が私におせちの作り方を教えてくれた。My mother taught me how to make osechi.
お粥も作ってきました。チンして温めるだけですから。I also brought some gruel I made. It just needs warming up.
その一行の中には５人のロシア人がいる。There are five Russians among the party.
イースターエッグに色を塗ってるの。I'm painting Easter eggs.
そんなはっきり言われたら、ぐうの音も出なかった。When it was put that clearly, I was at a loss for a response.






今日は雲行きが怪しいです。お花見が中止にならないか心配です。I don't like the look of the weather today. I'm worried the hanami party might be cancelled.
あぁ……、若かったとはいえ、しょうもない凡ミスだ。Ahh ... well I was young but what a stupid mistake.進化という科学的真理が反対しようもないほど確証されるもので、実質的に論駁できない。The scientific truth of evolution is so overwhelmingly established, that it is virtually impossible to refute.
湾にはセーリングボートよりヨットがたくさんある。The bay has more yachts than sailboats.
トムはしきりに新車を買いたがっている。Tom is eager to buy a new car.彼女はとてもヨーロッパへ行きたがっている。She is anxious to visit Europe.


















恵子さんが良くてもみんなが納得しないんです。後で俺がドヤされるんだから。Even if that's alright with you nobody else will accept it. I'll get shouted at afterwards so...
ここのネットカフェは学生相手の店で、料金は１時間約１００円からとなります。The net-cafes here cater to students; fees start at around a pound an hour.
どうせ、時間に関わらず、俺が先に来てなかったら、さっさとネカフェへ行く腹積もりだったんだろう。No doubt, regardless of the time, she was planning to go to the net café without me if I hadn't arrived first.




けど、一晩加湿器つけっぱなしで朝になると窓が結露してドボドボ・・・。But because the humidifier is on all night, in the morning the condensation pours off the windows.

外国為替レートってどのように表すの？外国為替市場では、米ドルを中心に表示されます。How should foreign exchange rates be shown? In the foreign exchange market they are displayed centered on the American dollar.
僕ってあがり性だから、人の前で話すの苦手なんだよ。I'm the type who gets nervous in front of people, so I'm bad at speech making.
ハムレットをもう１回読めば、私は３回読んだことになります。I will have read Hamlet three times if I read it again.





仕事をそつなくこなすことを会社は求めていることはわかります。I know companies are looking for work carried out flawlessly.




私の家の前にサクラの木がある。There is a cherry tree in front of my house.

歩こうとするとここがズキンとします。When I try to walk, I get an awful pain here.
白タクには乗らないように。Keep away from the unlicensed taxis.
私はうかつにもあなたのアドレスを消してしまって、ニュージーランドのラッセルに教えてもらうハメになった。I carelessly deleted your e-mail address and had to ask Russell in New Zealand for it.
あいつは口ばかりで、誠意がないね。巧言令色少なし仁とはよくいったもんだ。They say fine words are no virtue if they're insincere and that's him in a nutshell. He's all talk but doesn't mean a word of it.


















こうやって私はその機械を作った。This is how I made the machine.
「あっそ」と流すのもよし、本気にするのもよし。You can let it slide with a "oh?" or you can take it seriously.

建築のシンメトリーで、エメットは美的統一性をもった幾何学的な対称性を意味している。By architectural symmetry, Emmet means geometric symmetry combined with aesthetic uniformity.

ある種の行動はその少年に特徴的だ。That kind of behavior is characteristic of the boy.
彼ほどの確立した科学者がそのような初歩的な誤りを犯すとは実際上考えられないことである。It is practically unthinkable that a scientist of his stature would have made such an elementary mistake.
その火山は周期的に噴火を繰り返す。The volcano erupts at regular intervals.
彼は財政的に困っている。He is badly situated financially.
























そのため、要介護認定の結果は介護サービスの量と関係している必要があります。For that reason the outcome of the primary nursing care requirement authorization has to relate to the amount of nursing care required.








































下痢止めです。Here's some medicine for diarrhea.
彼はちょうど今、帰ってきたところだ。He came home just now.




































彼の音楽が全国で大流行している。His music is sweeping the whole country.














階層問題に対する、消費社会論の著である。It is a literary work confronting the class problem of a consumer society.



彼は何の造作もなくその問題を解くことができた。He found no difficulty in solving the problem.

こうして武田の悲鳴で通りすがりの船に気付いてもらえ、事なきをえました。In this way a passing boat noticed them, thanks to Takeda's scream, and they survived without incident.






気色悪い奴だ。He gives me the creeps.


甘い話にだまされる人もいる。Some are deceived by fair words.
ｉＭａｃは、家電製品みたいな感覚で買われてるんだろうね。People are buying iMacs the same way they buy household appliances.
被告人が審理中に保安係りのピストルを掴み判事を撃った。The defendant was about to stand trial when he grabbed the deputy's gun and shot the judge.
英雄相知る。Like knows like.
ボブは装飾された額にその肖像画を収めたけれど、上下さかさまだった。Bob mounted the portrait in a fancy frame, but it was upside down.

大魚は小魚を食う。The great fish eat the small.
何か新年の抱負があるの？Did you make any New Year's resolutions?





そのとき彼は我に返った。Then he came to his senses.
その脱出は全く奇跡に他ならなかった。The escape was nothing less than a miracle.
その老婦人はまゆをひそめた。The old woman knitted her brows.
大口叩きは何もできない。Great talkers are little doers.



非配偶者間人工授精を受けました。I had an artificial insemination by donor.
配偶者間人工授精を受けました。I had an artificial insemination with sperm from my husband.













ロイは秘密主義だがテッドはざっくばらんだ。Roy is secretive and Ted is candid.
その病気の初期症状は高熱とのどの痛みです。The initial symptoms of the disease are fever and sore throat.












「しまった！傘を電車に忘れた」「あわてん坊ね」"Oh no! I left my umbrella on the train." "You are a scatterbrain!"
地上２２階、地下２階のオフィスビルが建設中です。An office building, with 22 stories above ground and 2 below, is under construction.


もうよろしくてよ。実のない会話にはうんざりですわ。That is enough. I have had it with fruitless conversation.
あのデパートはブランド品のバーゲン中です。A sale of quality-brand goods is being held at that department store.















今仕事から手が離せない。I can't get away from work now.

京都に滞在中、彼は案内役をしてくれた。He acted as a guide while I was staying in Kyoto.



























何か手伝うことがあるかと思って来てみたけど、私の出る幕はなさそうだね。I came here to see if there was something I could do to help, but there doesn't seem to be anything for me to do.










彼女の態度は少々腹にすえかねる。I find her manner a little hard to take.







私達は脳損傷の原因について研究を行う。We carry out some research into the causes of brain damage.











モッツァレラ・チーズをかけたピザには、真っ先に飛びついてしまいます。A pizza topped with mozzarella is my first choice.
ミートローフが食べたいです。I'd like meatloaf.







ボディーボードとサーフィンどっちが得意？Which are you better at, boogie-boarding or surfing?
ボールボーイとボールガールはみな地元の学校の生徒だ。The ballboys and ballgirls all come from local schools.
ボーラは、手に握らないほうの端に２つの石の球と長いひもから成り立っている。Bolas are made up of a long cord with two stone balls at the free ends.
ペルシャ絨毯を買う場合にしたがうべき最高のアドバイスは、カーペットについてよく知っておけ、ということである。The best advice to follow when buying a Persian carpet is to have a good knowledge of carpets!
ベーコンエッグは彼が注文したものだ。Bacon and eggs is his order.
カップケーキ型に、ペーパーカップを並べます。Set up paper cups in the cupcake baking tray.
フルーツドリンクは夏の間大成功を収めると思うな。I think that a new fruit drink will go over big during the summer.
ブラッディーマリーをください。I'd like a Bloody Mary.
ひとかけらのパンでは彼の飢えを満たすには足りなかった。A piece of bread was not enough to satisfy his hunger.

ひと騒動起こしてやります。I'm going to rock the boat.
ビーフストロガノフの作り方を知っています。I know how to make beef stroganoff.
ビーフシチューはいかがですか。How do you like your beef stew?
バスターミナルはどこですか。Where is the bus terminal?





















その少女は年の割に小さい。The girl is small for her age.


この事件に手を貸してください。Give me a hand with this case.










マッチ棒の頭にそれらは５個のせることができるくらいです。You can put five of them across the head of a match.





























パウダースノー・スキーは好きですか。Do you like powder-snow skiing?
バースデーケーキのろうそくを一度に吹き消しなさい。Blow out all the candles on the birthday cake at once.
ネービーブルーのレインコートを探しているんですよ、サイズは３６なんだけど。I'm looking for a navy blue raincoat, size 36.
にやりと笑って賛成の意思を示した。She grinned her approval.







今日は登校日だ。遅刻しないようにしないと・・・。Today's a school day. I'd better make sure not to be late.


だ、ダメかな？下の名前で呼んじゃ。I-Is that OK? Calling you by your first name...











君の指摘、中らずといえども遠からずだね。Your point may be a little off target, but it certainly is close.

























ストレスでやけ食いをされる方も多いと思います。I think there are many who binge eat from stress.



尼僧はお祈りをして十字を切った。The nun prayed and crossed herself.





彼女は涙ながらに友達と別れた。She parted from her friend in tears.


こんなになるとは思ってもみなかった。I had no idea it'd be this beautiful.





将軍は結局のところ敗北を認めたが、予想だにしなかったことである。The general had 20/20 hindsight about the defeat, but no foresight at all.












我が国の若年層は政治に無関心だ。The youth of our country is apathetic about politics.














この町は西も東も分かりません。I'm quite a stranger in this town.

おまえはどうして、百匹のねこ、千匹のねこ、百万匹、一億、一兆匹のねこといっしょに、食べられてしまわなかったのだね。？How does it happen that you were not eaten up with all those hundreds and trillions of cats?
１９世紀末になって初めて植物の品種改良は科学の一分野となった。Not until the end of the nineteenth century, did plant breeding become a scientific discipline.
ＡＢＣニュースによれば、もう一機のジェット旅客機が、中近東でハイジャックされたそうだ。According to the ABC news, another jet-liner was hi-jacked in the Middle East.
これらの袋はとても重いから一度に一袋づつ運べ。These bags are very heavy, so carry one bag at a time.
これらは一家族あるいは一族を表すものである。These figures are signs of a family or clan.
彼の贈り物はぶどう酒一瓶である。His present is a bottle of wine.

ジェレミは彼の会計士の一次試験のためノートを熱心に勉強していたよ。I left Jeremy poring over his notes for his first accountancy exam tomorrow.
タバコ一箱は二十本入りです。Each package contains a score of cigarettes.
彼は中１の時に学校に来なくなった。He dropped out when he was in the 7th grade.


彼は口に出すことは必ずする。He never fails to do what he says.








彼女はショック死した。She died of shock.



厳格な父親は、徹底したしつけによって子供たちに決まりごとを守らせる。A strict father makes his children toe the line by thorough training.





























































そのダイヤの指輪は目が飛び出るほど高価な物だった。That diamond ring cost an arm and a leg.
彼女が欲しいって言ってたコート、目の玉が飛び出るほど高かったんだ。The coat she wanted was eye-poppingly expensive.















アポロ１１号が月面着陸に成功したというニュースが入った。A report came in that Apollo 11 succeeded in landing on the moon.
裁判官は彼に五年の懲役刑を宣告した。The judge sentenced him to a jail term of five years.




















とある映画を文庫化した―いや、映画の為に書かれたシナリオを小説として加筆修正し、日本語にローカライズしたものだ。A certain movie was novelized - rather it was a scenario written for a movie that was expanded as a novel and localized to Japanese.




彼にもしものことがあったら教えて下さい。If anything happens to him, let me know.




たとえ火の中水の中あなたにならば、どこまでもついていきます。I'll follow you, come hell or high water.













































書籍が学問に従うべく、学問が書籍に従うべからず。Books must follow sciences, and not sciences books.




あっ、赤くなった。陸くんてば可愛いっ！！ふふふっ。Ah-you've gone all red. Riku - that's so cute!! Ha-haha.しーっ、聞こえちゃうってば。Shhh, she'll hear you!
私の新しいムスタングを見せてなかったっけ？Didn't I show you my new Mustang?
ムーリエルが貼ったリンクはもう二度とクリックするもんか。I shall never follow links posted by Muiriel again.


おしるしが出ました。I've had a show.









ライオンは死んだきりんの肉を食いちぎった。The lion ripped the flesh from the dead giraffe.












今度は彼はくだけた服装をした。美々しいスーツは場違いである事に気がついたからだ。This time he dressed down, having realized that the smart suit would be out of place.



バッグの中に入っていた飴が暑さでクニャクニャになっていた。The candy I had in my bag went mushy in the heat.

日本車は右ハンドルです。Japanese cars are right-hand drive.
















両天びんにかけようたってそうはいきませんよ。You can't have it both ways.
その運転手は、まるっきり違う街の間違った球場にチームを運んで行ってしまうという大ドジを踏んでしまった。The driver really screwed up the team when he drove them to the wrong playing field in a different town.










おもい出したくない。怒りで気がちがいそうになる。I don't want to remember. I feel I'll go mad through rage.
先日三日ばしかにかかりました。He had three-day measles the other day.



目に見える星の数は無数です。The number of visible stars is very great.ジャイアンツの負けるのは目に見えていましたからね。The Giants were well on the way to defeat.
運命の赤い糸でつながってるんだよ。We're joined by the red string of fate!
たいしたことではないのに必要以上に物々しい言い方です。It's much too pompous for such a trivial thing.



水の中で小さな魚が泳ぎ回っているのが見えます。I can see some small fish swimming about in the water.


車酔いするほうだっけ？Don't you tend to get carsick?この前、僕が君にあったのはいつだっけ。Do you remember when I saw you last?








このテレビドラマを見れば江戸時代の庶民の暮らしぶりがよくわかります。If you watch this TV drama, you will understand the lives of ordinary people in the Edo Age very well.












さっきの手は大失敗だった。That move was a big mistake.

近年では人間心理の謎を扱うサイコホラーも人気である。Psycho-horror films dealing with the mysteries of human psychology are popular these days.














このレストラン、評判通りのおいしさだね。This restaurant lives up to all the rave reviews it got.







困っている子供たちのために、私たちは募金活動に協力した。For the sake of children in need, we cooperated to collect donations.







なんとかそこで支えよ。入市を許すな。Hold them there! Don't let them into the city!






彼は事業の失敗を悔しがった。He was mortified at his failure in business.









彼は倒れた木の下敷きになってうごけなかった。He was pinned down by a fallen tree.
お願いですから犬猫扱いするのやめて貰えますか。I'm begging you, could you stop treating me like a pet?






しかし彼らは道に迷いません。But they never lose their way.

彼に金を貸したらダメだってことを分かっていようものを。You should have known better than to lend him money.
もちろんいいとも。Of course, you may.




















泥棒を見て縄をなう。To braid the rope only after the thief is caught.


























































街中でイチャイチャするカップル見たら腹立ちませんか？Doesn't it irritate you to see couples making out around town?
勤務中なのに職員の目を盗んでインターネットに耽溺する。Even during work, I secretly indulge my Internet addiction.












この仕事は私には荷が重すぎる。This work is enough to break my back.









要するに彼は何にでも飽きるのだ。In a word, he tires of everything.

ビザカードは使えますか。Do you accept Visa card?
ホットレモンジュースを飲むと気分が良くなる。I feel better when I drink hot lemon juice.

日本語用のワープロソフトには、Ｍｉｃｒｏｓｏｆｔ社の「Ｗｏｒｄ」や、ＪＵＳＴＳＹＳＴＥＭ社の「一太郎」などがあります。Word processors for use with Japanese include Microsoft Word and JustSystem's Ichitaro.
もしかこの方面に来るようなことがあったらお寄りください。If you come this way by any chance, drop in to see me.

その授業は週一回あります。The class meets once a week.

結婚生活がうまく行っていない方は結婚式の時におごそかに神の前に誓った、夫婦の誓約を思い出してみましょう。And to the people whose married life is not going well, let's remember the marriage covenant sworn solemnly before God at the wedding ceremony.
彼は星を見上げて、幾晩も幾晩も過ごした。Many nights did he spend, looking up at the stars.

まるで腫れ物に触るように扱った。He treated it with utmost care.












１３人？たったそんだけかよ。Just 13 people? That's all?




若いが彼は経験豊富です。Young as he is, he has much experience.





















現状の打開策を暗中模索している。We are groping for a way out of the present situation.


今後ともご支援いただけますよう、よろしくお願いします。I hope that you will continue to favor us with your support.
今後ともよろしくお願いいたします。Please continue your favors towards us.



一方では君は間違っている。かといって、私はそのことであなたを責めることはできない。On the one hand, you are wrong, but on the other hand, I can't blame you for that.
今後ともよろしくお願いいたします。Please continue your favors towards us.

犯罪捜査への協力を要請された。I was asked to cooperate with them for the criminal investigation.

意味不明の微笑が日本人に特有である、としばしば指摘される。It is often pointed out that a vague smile is typical of the Japanese.









































泳者の呼吸機能の特性について。Concerning the characteristics of respiratory function in swimmers.



ナイアガラの滝は世界有数の観光地として名高い。The Niagara Falls are famous as a world leading tourist resort.



彼女は販売員としての仕事に応募した。She applied for a job as a saleswoman.


あなたは子供の面倒をみなければならない。You must look after the child.

ロシア：人質事件の犠牲となった方々に哀悼の意を表す。Russia expresses regret for those lost in the hostage incident.
影でこそこそせず面と向かって彼にそれを言いたまえ。Say it to his face, not behind his back.


結婚するつもりなんかこれっぽっちもありません。Marriage is the last thing on my mind.
もう一つの面白いエネルギー源は、放射能の廃棄物質から取り出せる熱である。Another interesting source of energy is the heat that can be recovered from radioactive waste material.
恋は盲目。憎しみもまたしかり。Love is blind. Hatred is also blind.

元はと言えば、健ちゃんが鈍ちんなのがいけないんだからね〜っ。When you think about it, it's all Kenny's fault for being so obtuse.


彼は困っているときにはいつも力になってくれた。He stood by me whenever I was in trouble.
彼は情報通だ。He's a well-informed person.
彼は口が堅い。He is a tight-lipped man.












彼女と友達になれた時は、それはうれしかったですよ。I was overjoyed when I was able to make friends with her!そりゃ便利だね。That comes in handy.

この辞書なしには済まされない。I can't do without this dictionary.













状況は彼らではどうにもならなくなった。The situation got out of their control.今さら騒いでもどうにもならないよ。後の祭りだよ。Yelling about it won't help now. You should have done that when it counted.
このセラピーにおいて心理学的準備が重要だということは正しい。It is correct to say that psychological readiness is important in this therapy.



これは空前の大事件として歴史に残るでしょう。This will go down in history as the greatest event that has ever taken place.























この手紙を朝一番で出すの忘れないでね。Don't forget to mail this letter first thing in the morning.

ガンの克服には資金不足が重大な障害となっている。Lack of money is a serious hindrance in their fight to conquer cancer.





すごいじゃん。Brilliant!

ドライビングスクールに行っています。I go to a driving school.














どうやったら彼と縁を切ることが出来るだろうか。How can I get rid of him?
私達の時代に戻るにはどうやったらいいの？In order to return to our era, what should we do?

ではまた明日。See you again tomorrow.


女ながらも彼女は勇敢だった。Woman as she was, she was brave.
彼のことはほとんど心配するほどのことは無い。It's hardly worthwhile worrying about him.
それでいて自分は船乗りだという。And he calls himself a sailor.









テレビガイドを見せて下さい。Please show me the TV Guide.





































住宅事情はと言うと、日本はとても貧しい状態だ。As far housing goes, it is very poor in Japan.ダーウィンというと「種の起源」を連想する。We associate the name of Darwin with The Origin of Species.

話が進むにつれ彼の弁舌はますますさえた。His speech had more and more power as it went along.







いざというときのためにお金をためておきなさい。Put aside money for a rainy day.
私の好みはどちらかというと牛肉ですね。I have a predilection for beef.
今日はどちらかといえば、気分が良い。Today he is better, if anything.
その犬は小さな男の子に向かって唸った。The dog growled at a little boy.
彼女は歌手といってもお粗末なものだ。She is a poor excuse for a singer.

彼は非常にきちんとした人なので、すべての鍋類はあるべき場所に整理されている。He is such a tidy person. Every pot and pan is in its place.




ぜひにとあれば仕方がない。If you must, you must.



美人薄命とはいうけれど。ということは、内のかみさんは長生きだな。Beautiful women die young - or so the saying goes. If so then my wife is going to live a long life.





















私はもう少しで優勝するところだった。I was within an ace of winning.
彼はもう少しの所でトップの部にはいるところだった。He ranked close to the top.
結果はさておき、あなたの意図はよかった。Apart from the result, your intention was good.





その大臣は内閣からの辞職を余儀なくされた。The minister was obliged to resign from the cabinet.
ジムは多才な人といってもいいだろう。Jim can be said to be a man of many talents.
命あっての物種。While there is life, there is hope.
健康はあらゆる富にまさると言っても過言ではない。It is not too much to say that health is above wealth.
詩人が言葉に対していだく愛情にも似た感情を、科学者は事実（たとえばらばらの事実であれ）に対していだく。The scientist has a love of facts, even isolated facts, similar to the poet's love of words.何をするのであれ、必ずやり遂げなさい。Whatever you do, carry it through.偶然であれ故意であれ、彼がそれをしたのは本当だ。It is true that he did it, whether by accident or by design.
お忙しいところをご来社いただきありがとうございました。Thank you for taking the time out to pay a visit to our company.
彼は子供ながらにお母さんを助けるために一生懸命働いた。Child as he was, he worked hard to help his mother.
この食べ物は、それなくしては我々の身体が正しく機能しないすべてのミネラルを含んでいます。This food contains all the minerals without which our bodies would not function.

この問題は、アイドルのエゴとヲタのエゴの衝突だ。This problem is the clash of the idol's and obsessive fan's egos.
アイディアが足りないということはない。There is no shortage of ideas.




彼は親譲りの財産をもとにして富を作った。He built on his father's fortune.



穀物生産の落ち込みによって、中国は急速に日本を上回る世界有数の穀物輸入国となることが予想される。It is foreseen that, due to the decline in grain production, China will quickly become a world leading grain importing country, overtaking Japan.
社長は話の分かるタイプの人だ。The president is a down-to-earth kind of man.

神様の名前はやっぱりＮＧだと思うよ〜。もう名づけた時点で名前負けなわけじゃん。I think a god's name has got to be out. From the moment the kid's named you know he's not going to be able to live up to it!
どうであろうと、君はそれをしなくてはいけない。You'll have to do it, whether you like it or not.
これらのティーカップは対になっている。These teacups make a pair.
貴社の小型コピー機を東京オフィス・エキスポ９７でしりました。I learned about your portable copier at the Tokyo-Office '97 Expo.


ディックは私たちを喜んで助けようとする様子を見せた。Dick showed a willingness to help us.世界で、鹿やムースやキジといった野性獣を狩ることは違法とする国が多い。In many parts of the world it is illegal to shoot wild game such as deer, moose or pheasant.このヒーターはガスを燃料とする。This heater burns gas.

ローマは、一日にして建設されたものではない。Rome was not built in a day.

つきが回ってきた。Fortune has turned in my favor.









彼女にとって息子の成長は何にも勝る喜びだった。Nothing gave her greater pleasure than to watch her son growing up.







彼らはどこからともなく突然現れた。They suddenly appeared from nowhere.






















暗闇から強盗が突如として現れた。The robber emerged from the darkness.
火ばさみで人差し指をやけどした。I burned my forefinger on fire tongs.




２つの組は合併されて大人数のクラスになった。The two classes were brought together into a larger class.
チキンスープがかぜを治すというのは本当ですか。Is it true that chicken soup will cure a cold?



















ダブルルームをおねがいします。I'd like a double room.
日記をつけるのはよい習慣です。Keeping a diary is a good habit.
ここに絶え間ない痛みがあります。I have a continuous pain here.
セーフティーボックスに預かってくれないか。Would you put this in the safety deposit box?
石にかじりついても成功してみせる。I will succeed at any cost.
もう私は大人だから、そうは考えない。Now that I'm a grownup, I think otherwise.おまえも馬鹿なら彼もそうだ。You are stupid, and so is he.「腰は痛む？」「いや、別に」「そう、それは不幸中の幸いね」"Does your back hurt?" "No, not really." "Oh, that's something then, isn't it?"
スーパーヒーローたちは、私たちが持っていない才能を持っていると思いますか。Do you think that those superheroes are endowed with talents we don't possess?




シベリアトラは絶滅の危機に瀕している。The Siberian tiger is on the verge of extinction.
「実を言うと、俺、高所恐怖症なんだ」「臆病者っ！」"To tell you the truth, I am scared of heights." "You are a coward!"

サマーキャンプでは、彼女が私の班の責任者になった。At the summer camp, she was in charge of the group I belonged to.

サポートセンターに電話するまえにＦＡＱを読んで下さい。Take a look at the FAQ before you call tech support.

サイバースペースへようこそ。Welcome to Cyberspace!




ゴミ置き場はどこですか？Where is the garbage area?


一度話し合いをすれば、お互いに満足のいく解決方法を見つけられると思います。I know that if we discuss it, we can find a solution that will satisfy both of us.



まだ、完了と言うところまで行っていないが、そこそこ成果が出始めてきた。It's not yet what you'd call finished but we're starting to get pretty good results.広島に口和というところがあります。There's a place called Kuchiwa in Hiroshima.家主に家賃を払えば、食物を買う金がなくなる。進退きわまったというところだ。If we pay the rent to the landlady, we won't have any money for food; we are between the devil and the deep blue sea.














グーがチョキに、チョキがパーに、パーはグーに勝つ。Rock breaks scissors. Scissors cut paper. Paper smothers rock.痛い！由紀子！痛いよ。グーで殴るのはよせよ！Ow! Yukiko! That hurts! Quit hitting me with your fists!





ちまたではインターネットなるものがはやっています。People are talking about this Internet phenomenon.いかにも敬虔なるクリスチャンが送る、礼節重き言葉です。So characteristic of what a pious Christian would say, this courteous phrase.






虚心坦懐に申し上げる。今から言うことは、言葉どおりに受け取ってほしい。I'm going to speak to you with utmost candor so I want you to take everything I'm about to say at face value.







みんな口を極めて彼女を褒めちぎった。Everybody praised her to the skies.

この端午の節句と関係の深いしょうぶは、花は美しくありません。The iris deeply associated with the Boys' Festival does not have a beautiful flower.
道なりに進んで、三つ目の交差点を左に曲がって下さい。Walk along the street and turn left at the third intersection.
君なりのやり方で仕事しなさい。Do your work in your own way.
貧困は家庭を破壊するよりはむしろ団結せしめる。Poverty keeps together more homes than it breaks up.
勤勉が彼に成功することを可能ならしめた。Hard work enabled him to succeed.



メアリーは彼に考えうる限りの悪態をついた。Mary called him every name she could think of.




この遣り場なき怒りをどこにぶつければいいのか。Where can I find an outlet for all my anger?

それは１万円ぐらいするだろう。It will cost around 10,000 yen.
















その兵士は自分の傷をものともしなかった。The soldier carried on as if his wound was nothing.






彼女は肩で息をしていた。She was breathing hard.































































彼ら二人はよく肌が合う。They are very compatible.
















とりわけ子供たちは愛情を必要とする。Above all, children need love.
彼女の言葉にかっときた。Her words made me mad.

あなたがだれであれ、またどこの生まれであれ、１つだけは確かである。No matter who you are or where you are from, one thing is certain.
なんであれ物事の本体を捕らえる事が肝心だ。No matter what the problem is, it's essential to get at the heart of the matter.
たとえ天候がどうであれ、私は行きます。I will go, be the weather what it may.
どこであれ道路を横切る時に右左を見るというのはいいことだ。It's a good rule to look both ways before you cross the street anywhere.



力を貸すことは、ほとんど出来ないと思ってください。You can hardly expect me to help you.




あなたにとって頼りになるような友達を選びなさい。Choose friends you can rely on.
困ったときは、私はいつも彼を頼りにしている。I always rely on him in times of trouble.
私たちは金銭面で彼を頼りにできる。We can count on him for financial help.



















彼にはものの道理がわかっていない。He doesn't understand the principle of the thing.






部外者の立ち入りを禁ず。No outsiders are allowed to enter.
さすがに偉大な学者だけあって、彼はその問いに容易に答えた。Like the great scholar that he was, he answered the question easily.


今こそ一気に取引をまとめるときだ。Now is the time to clinch the deal.








明日は朝イチで大事なミッションがあるのだ。こんなことしてる場合じゃない。Tomorrow, I've got an important mission first thing in the morning. I shouldn't be wasting my time with this.


社員旅行の予定、あまりぱっとしないよ。The plans for the company outing don't sound too exciting.






時は金なりとは至言である。It is truly said that time is money.

グラスをいじくりまわすのはやめろ。Don't play around with the glass.



これは一押しのレストランなんだ。This is a highly recommended restaurant.


君はみんなの意表をついたね。You surprised everybody.


つまらないものですがご笑納ください。Please accept this little gift.




彼女は、私がそこへ行くようにと言って聞かなかった。She insisted on my going there.










かつてのアイドルも４０過ぎるとただのおばさんか。Former pop stars are just plain old women by the time they're 40.







このワタクシをさらりと無視するとは良い度胸ですわね。You must have some nerve to ignore _me_.










つまみ食いと言うか、完食していたように見えたが。You say you had a nibble, it looked to me like you'd polished it off.
























今日雨は降りそうにない。There is no chance of rain today.



















石橋をたたいて渡れ。Look before you leap.


彼らはまるで犬と猿だ。They get along like a cat and a dog.














君が英語ができれば鬼に金棒なんだが。If you could only speak English, you would be perfect.





どうしたらあなたに連絡がつきますか。How can I get in touch with you?

そんな事は、彼にとっては赤子の手を捻るようなものだ。For him, that will be like taking candy from a baby.

何よりも走ることが好きです。I love to jog more than anything else in the world.


これはメイン・ストリートまでしか行かないんですが、そこから３１番に乗れますから。It only goes as far as Main Street, but you can get the Number 31 there.
自爆テロ犯はベナジル・ブット元首相に向けて発砲したが、弾はそれた。The suicide bomber fired towards former Prime Minister Benazir Bhutto, but missed.

歯を左右にすり合わせてください。Please grind your teeth from left to right.



















何よりもまず自分に忠実でありなさい。Above all, be true to yourself.











一般に利用できる英日2言語コーパスを作成した。We created a freely available English-Japanese bilingual corpus.
スペイン語翻訳（日西+西日）お見積もり無料。Free estimate for Spanish translations (Jp to S and S to Jp).
スペイン語翻訳（日西+西日）お見積もり無料。Free estimate for Spanish translations (Jp to S and S to Jp).










何よりもまず健康でなければならない。Above all, we must be healthy.
このコーヒーはジャワとブラジルのブレンドだ。This coffee is a blend of Java and Brazil.









そのシェパードは、びっこをひきながら道を歩いていた。The German Shepherd was limping down the street.
彼女のいいわけは全く意味をなさない。Her excuse resulted in nothing.
この文章は意味を成さない。This sentence doesn't make sense.
















偏光板の時は、まず偏光板をつけ上に保護板（透明アクリル板）をつけセットします。When attaching a polarizing plate, set it first and then attach a protective plate (a clear acrylic plate).





















牛乳の流れを素早く止め、牛乳が固まるまで約３０分間静置する。Quickly stop the flow of milk, leave to stand for approximately 30 minutes for the milk to solidify.

演説者はこぶしでテーブルをどんとたたいた。The speaker banged the table with his fist.



















管理人体調不良、モチの低下等により継続は不可能と判断しました。Due to ill-health of the web-manager, loss of motivation and other circumstances I have decided that it is not possible to continue.





ニューヨークにはたくさんの日本料理店がある。There are many Japanese restaurants in New York.








寝が足りないので、今日は早めに寝ます。Because of my lack of sleep I'm going to bed early tonight.



私は夜中に３度目が覚めた。I awoke three times in the night.












デザインも、アーチ型のロゴデザインにより現代的で「登場感」「躍動感」のあるものに仕上げました。The design was also given the finishing touch to have launch impact and dynamism provided by the novelty of the arch shaped logo design.









まだ肉眼じゃ無理だよ。双眼鏡だと、ちょびっとだけ見えるかも・・・。It's still impossible with the naked eye. With binoculars you might be able to glimpse it....









日本の一定しない経済政策は労働力不足と深く関わっています。Japan's changing economic policy is tied up with the labor shortage.


偏光板の時は、まず偏光板をつけ上に保護板（透明アクリル板）をつけセットします。When attaching a polarizing plate, set it first and then attach a protective plate (a clear acrylic plate).
偏光板の時は、まず偏光板をつけ上に保護板（透明アクリル板）をつけセットします。When attaching a polarizing plate, set it first and then attach a protective plate (a clear acrylic plate).
オープンソースは技術革新をドライブするエンジンである。Open source is the engine that drives technological innovation.
普通の看護師は、ちんこに溲瓶も添えるし手術の時は剃毛もするぞ。A typical nurse will do such things as helping with a urinal bottle, and shaving in preparation for surgery!

時計がおくれていたので、私は特急にのりそこねた。As my watch was slow, I missed the special express.
ろうそくは立ち消えた。The candle has gone out.








コンビニが女子であふれかえってて、押し分けて中にはいる気もせず、そのまま帰った。The convenience store was overflowing with girls, I didn't have the urge to push my way through them and went home as I was.


















お隣さんは北海道まで家族旅行だって。My neighbors say they're going on a family trip to Hokkaido.


この特急列車は仙台行きである。This limited express is bound for Sendai.


しーっ、聞こえちゃうってば。Shhh, she'll hear you!












新政府は数多くの行政改革をもたらすものと期待されている。The new government is expected to bring about a good number of administrative reforms.

彼女の条件が結婚相手を選ぶ際の優先事項だ。Her conditions for choosing a marriage partner took priority.
















アンは根気よく編み物をしている。Anne is patiently knitting.


ニューヨークはビッグアップルと呼ばれている。New York is called the Big Apple.



名前はすべてアルファベット順で載っています。All the names are listed in alphabetical order.
こんな料理を食べるくらいならドッグフードを食べた方がましだ。We might as well eat dog food as eat such a dish.
あと数社の企業が同国の利益の高いペットフード市場に参入をねらっている。Several more companies are moving to enter the lucrative pet food market of the country.





彼は衣料品業界で本当にうまく成功した。He made out really well in the clothing business.
子供たちのお世話を手伝ってくれない？Can you help look after the kids?





壊れたラジオを修理していて、回路の動作原理を理解できていないことに改めて気がつきます。Repairing a broken radio I realise over again that I don't have an understanding of the operating principles of circuitry.
VISUACTは、お客様の多様な環境やニーズにも柔軟に対応し、さまざまな運用方法をご提供します。VISUACT supports flexibly the varied environments and needs of our customers and offers a variety of operational procedures.
技師がその高性能なシステムの操作方法を実演してくれた。The engineer demonstrated how to operate the sophisticated system.
詳しいことが全部わかるまでは、あわててその場にふみこむな。見当がつくまでは、慎重にかまえておれ。Don't rush into the situation until you have all the details; hold your horses until you know where you are going.

お米屋さんは、言わずと知れた斜陽産業。Needless to say, dealing in rice is a declining industry.

その鋭いかぎ爪を開いては閉じ、開いては閉じ始めた。Its sharp claws began to open and close, open and close.

すべてを白紙に返そう。Let's scrap everything and start over again with a clean slate.

事の意外な成り行きに目を白黒させた。I blinked in amazement at the unexpected development.
白黒テレビは、時代遅れになった。Black and white television sets have gone out of date.






ケンはスピード違反で７千円の罰金を科された。Ken was fined 7,000 yen for speeding.



ゆうべのピアノリサイタルには大勢の聴衆がいた。There was a large audience at the piano recital last night.














よく似たケースで責任は会社にあるとされた。In a similar situation, the company was held liable.



















派手にすっ転んだので膝に青痣ができてしまいました。I fell down really hard and got a black bruise on my knee.
















火に油を注ぐだけだ。It only adds fuel to the fire.
「コーヒーのお替わりいる？」「うん、ぼくのは少なめ、弟のには多めについでね」"Do you want another cup of coffee?" "Sure, make mine on the small side but be generous with my brother's."
ここで使われている文法形式は現在進行形である。The grammatical form employed here is the present progressive.公式問題集には"受け身の現在進行形"と説明されています。In the official question collection it is explained as being "passive voice of the present continuous tense".


ケンは話すのをやめて食べ始めた。Ken stopped talking and began to eat.






強面の変なセールスだったらすぐアタシを呼びなさいね、追い返してやるから。If it's an aggressive strange salesman, then call me right away. I'll chase him off.




























その点はまちがいっこない。There's no mistaking about that.
牛が野原で草をはんでいた。Cattle were grazing in the field.
分かってますわ。ちゃんとペース配分は考えてありますもの。I know. I've thought about how to pace myself.
マイクロファイバークロスは、髪の毛の１００分の１という細さの繊維で編みあげられたクロスです。Microfibre cloth is cloth woven from fibres as narrow as a hundredth of the width of a hair.





































































この法律は日本において有効とすべし。This law shall have effect in Japan.
「えーっと・・・トマトジュースはありますか」と博が言います。"Let me see .... Do you have tomato juice?" says Hiroshi.




私の父は大の旅行好きです。My father is a great traveler.
彼女は高級車好みだ。She has expensive tastes in cars.

































姉はすごく頭がいい。My sister has a very good brain.
高校になってからは、クロスカントリースキー、ノルディック複合競技の大阪大会および近畿大会で幾度となく優勝。In high school, I won the Osaka and Kinki championships in cross-country skiing and Nordic combined skiing on countless occasions.




ビルは先週結婚して、ついに独身生活にピリオドを打った。Bill was single until he tied the knot last week.
外交的な対話によって、その紛争に終止符を打つことができた。Diplomatic dialogue helped put an end to the conflict.
私はテニスで彼とペアを組んだ。I was partnered with him in tennis.


































おやおや。いかな体育の授業といえど・・・真剣勝負の意気込みで臨まなければ、いざ実戦と言う時に役に立ちませんよ。Well, even if it is just P.E. class, if you don't take it seriously, it won't do you any good in a real match.

われわれは何人といえど、自分が属している社会という組織から自分を切り離すことは出来ない。No one of us can cut himself off from the body of the community to which he belongs.










その犬は郵便配達人に飛びかかった。The dog went for the postman.










うまくいったら連ドラを紹介してあげる。If it goes well, I'll put you forward for a drama serial.

しかし、彼は違った大きさや色の木製の留めくぎを見たことはあるかもしれない。He might, however, have seen a wooden peg of a different size or color.




あなたがいなくなれば寂しくなります。I'll miss you very much if you go.
１週間後に、その家は倒壊した。Down fell the house a week later.
コメディアンは無惨な死や大事故といった悲劇的状況を冗談のネタにしている。Comedians base their jokes on tragic situations like violent death or serious accidents.



その建物は老朽化の兆しを見せている。The building exhibits signs of dilapidation.



















ショーンはコナーに激似なんだぜ。The resemblance between Sean and Conner is striking!
心ここにあらず、ですね。Your mind is not occupied with your own affairs.



首や背に太陽が暑く照りつけた。The sun beat down on our necks and backs.彼はいすの背にもたれている。He is leaning on the back of the chair.彼らは絶景を背にして立った。They stood against the picturesque scenery.






































最悪・・・入場制限を設けるしかないでしょう。整理券の配布とかで。What a mess... I suppose there's nothing for it but restricting admissions. Handing out numbered tickets or something.


私はこのラケットを２０％引きで買った。I bought this racket at a 20 percent discount.

悪銭身につかず、というじゃない。結局は地道に稼ぐしかないと思うよ。Ill-gotten gains are short-lived. The only way to make real money is to earn every penny.




例文や、文章の仕組みをディクテーションでマスターしましょう。Let's master example sentences and the make-up of text by dictation.



休憩はこれくらいにして、ボチボチ仕事を始めますか。Pretty soon we'd better wrap up this break and get back to work.
このくらいの収穫量では、そこの経済を支えるのに十分ではありません。That amount of crops isn't enough to support their economy.



その沼にはサギがたくさん住んでいる。Lots of herons live in the marsh.




汚れに強い合成皮革を使用した２人掛けのソファです。This is a two-seater sofa using stain-resistant artificial leather.



先程のはＰ波でした。Ｓ波が来ます。That was the P-wave just now. The S-wave is coming.
先程のはＰ波でした。Ｓ波が来ます。That was the P-wave just now. The S-wave is coming.

























産科医が減り続け、産科医療が危機に陥っている。Obstetric care in crisis as the number of obstetricians continues to fall.
日本では助産師国家試験の受験資格は女性のみとなっている。In Japan, only women are entitled to take the national obstetrics exam.
死亡事例が19件と全体の20％を超えており、過労死の深刻な実態が浮き彫りになった。With 19 cases of death forming over 20% of the whole, the grave reality of overwork-deaths has been thrown into relief.










「調子はどう？」「絶好調だよ。着実に増収増益を続けているよ」"How are things going?" "Terrific. Income and profit are continuing to rise steadily."

「じゃんけんね」「ぐー」「ちょ・・パー」「後出しかよ！」"Rock-paper-scissors, OK?" "Rock." "Sciss... paper." "You cheated!"












どうにかしてわたしを助けてくれませんか。Can you possibly help me?



























趣味は議論にならない。There is no disputing about tastes.
ついにフルコンプしたぞ！I've finally got the whole set!




長いことお待たせしましたか。Have I kept you waiting long?






私は彼が来たるべき入試に合格することを確信している。I am sure of his passing the coming entrance examination.
気分が悪くて入院したが結果的にはたいしたことはなかった。I felt ill and was admitted to the hospital, but in the event, it was nothing serious.






ネイティブ・アメリカンは弓と矢でたたかった。Native Americans fought with bow and arrow.








２００人の人が昨年コレラで死んだ。Two hundred people died of cholera last year.
2000年に日本の医療制度が世界一だが、2003年に研修医制度が始まって目に見えて悪くなった。In 2000 Japan's health care system was the best in the world, but since clinical internship was introduced in 2003 it has clearly deteriorated.

















この点に関しては、私が英語学習を志した２０数年前とは隔世の感があります。On this point it is poles apart from when I set myself on learning English 20 years ago.






私的には問題ない。There is no objection on my part.
壁に耳あり障子に目あり。Walls have ears, shouji have eyes.










































米消費者団体がRealPlayerを「バッドウェア」と認定。American consumer group identifies RealPlayer as 'badware'.











それをざっくりと各工程に割り振ったものです。I just roughly allocated it to each function.
給紙トレーに紙が入ってないよ。The printer needs paper.






ＯＫが出たので、思わずグラスランナーのシーフ・バードというベタなキャラを作っちゃいましたよ。I got the OK so I unthinkingly created the clichéd 'grass runner thief/bard' character.
ダイナマイトがドカンと爆発した。The dynamite went off with a bang.

１年次開講の『大学生のための表現法』と２年次開講の『食品化学』の２科目を担当しています。I'm teaching two courses, year one's "Self-expression for University Students" and year two's "Food Chemistry".
















今や大統領はレイム・ダックにすぎません。Now the President is nothing but a lame duck.
戦闘ロボＪＡは暴走した。The battle robot JA went berserk.

























仕事場の管理者は、正確さ、効率性、献身を期待する。Office managers expect accuracy, efficiency, and dedication.

児童心理学者の中には、親はもっと子供と遊んでやり、考えさせる問題を与えてやるべきだ、と考える人が多い。Many child psychologists think that parents should play with their children more often and give them problems to think about.

そのろうそくがテーブル掛けを燃やした。Those candles burned the table.




あう〜、あたしったらまたドジっちゃいました。Ahh, silly me, I've messed up again.




















彼は誰にでも愛きょうをふりまく。He's nice to everybody.
彼はしょっちゅうガキ仲間と街でたむろしている。He hangs out a lot with the kids down the street.








「店のばーさんは、すげー愛想悪いんだけどさー」「大輝、聞こえとるぞ」「げっ・・・」"The old lady of this shop is very unsociable but ..." "Taiki, I can hear you!" "Ack!"



開発者は集合体として以下の権限を持つ。３：１の賛成多数をもって、この憲章を修正できる。Together, the developers may amend this constitution, provided a 3:1 majority is in agreement.

開発者は集合体として以下の権限を持つ。３：１の賛成多数をもって、この憲章を修正できる。Together, the developers may amend this constitution, provided a 3:1 majority is in agreement.


女房の手は店員さんより一回り小さい。My wife's hands are slightly smaller than the shop assistant's.














私どもは、私どもの製品の市場開拓のため、貴社に最大の努力を払っていただいていることを理解しております。We understand that you always do your best to develop a market for our products.



「警察だ。ちょっと署まで来てもらおうか」「な、なんで？」「こんな街中でドンパチやって罪にならないわけないだろうが！！」"This is the police. Would you mind coming down to the station?" "W-why?" "You can't think it's not a crime to go shooting guns off in the middle of town?!"






彼女の髪は美しい巻き髪になっていた。Her hair hung in neat coils.

どんな理由があろうと、せっかく軌道に乗せた貿易を失墜させたのは大失態だ。Whatever the reason, forfeiting the trade that we finally got on track is a fiasco.
君の仕事が軌道に乗ったら、値上げの話をしましょう。When your business gets rolling we'll talk about an increase.

僕、カルパスが大好きなんだ。I really like calpas sausage.

合計額を調べてはどうですか。Why don't you go over your sums?

ドルは現地通貨に交換しなければなりません。You must convert dollars into the local currency.
緊急時の飲料水の確保は、大丈夫ですか？Are you OK for drinking water in an emergency?
格安航空券を利用しよう。Let's get discount tickets.












彼は総理のたっての要請を固辞した。He firmly refused the Premier's earnest request.


アブミ骨は内耳の前庭窓に接している。The stirrup rests on the oval window of the inner ear.











意を決して海の中に飛び込んだ。I boldly jumped into the sea.



２００２年：国土安全保障省設立法にブッシュ大統領がサインし正式な省となる。2002: President Bush signs the Homeland Security Act and it becomes an official Cabinet agency.

顧客に対する勧誘の電話が、テレマーケティング部の主要業務である。Cold calls are the primary function of the telemarketing department.

君が背の高い男の子といるのを見たよ。I saw you with a tall boy.
彼はその二人の少年のうちの背の低い方だ。He is the shorter of the two boys.



取締役会は業務執行に関する意思決定を目的としたものだ。The Board of Directors aim is to make decisions regarding business affairs of the company.


彼女は禁煙区域を広げたいと思っている。She wants to extend the no-smoking area.












欲に目がくらんで判断力が無くなったらしい。Greed seems to have blinded his good judgement.




病は気からとはうまく言ったものですね。It is aptly said that illness starts from the mind.








アメリカでは杯やコーヒーメーカーを結婚式で花嫁にプレゼントすることがよくあります。In the U.S., it is common to give a present, such as glasses or a coffee-maker, to the bride at weddings.



彼女は例の金のインチキ証券商法に引っかかり持ち金のほとんどを失ってしまった。She was taken in by that fake gold certificate scandal and lost most of her money.

経済が発展すると、労働集約産業は資本集約産業に取って代わられる。As economy develops, labor-intensive industries give way to capital-intensive industries.
資本集約産業は必ずしも知識集約産業ではない。Capital-intensive industries are not necessarily knowledge-intensive industries.労働集約・資本集約を超えて、時代はナレッジ・インテンシブへと大きくシフトしている。Surpassing labour intensive, capital intensive, the age has shifted greatly to knowledge intensive.
労働集約・資本集約を超えて、時代はナレッジ・インテンシブへと大きくシフトしている。Surpassing labour intensive, capital intensive, the age has shifted greatly to knowledge intensive.



すべて元の鞘におさまった。Everything went back in place.トムとメアリーは２年前に別れたが、最近また元のさやに収まった。Two years ago Tom and Mary split up, but recently they got together again.


















彼の論旨は筋が通っていた。His argument was logical.

アメリカでは、過去２０年間で２０００万の新規雇用が創出されたが、そのほとんどはサービス部門におけるものである。In the United States, 20 million new jobs have been created during the past two decades, most of them in the service sector.
彼は自分の関与をぬけぬけと否定した。He had the impudence to deny his involvement.





その釣り人は釣り糸に強い引きを感じた。The angler felt a strong tug on the line.

休みの前などは少し羽目を外して飲むのだが、杜仲茶割りで飲むと二日酔いが全くない。I usually cut loose a bit and drink plenty before a day off work, but if my drinks are cut with tochu tea, then I get absolutely no hangover.





しかし、天才であるが故に一般ピーポーから理解され難いというのは宿命とも言えるわ。However you could say that being found hard to understand by the common folk for one's genius is fate.


















教科書問題や歴史認識、靖国神社への首相の参拝などで、日中関係に波風が立っている。Such things as the textbook controversy, lack of recognition of historical events, and the prime minister's worshipping at the Yasukuni Shrine have caused discord with China.

よく聞いたら、ネタじゃなくてマジボケだったみたいです。When I asked afterwards it seems he hadn't said that as a joke.




世界的に過大に評価された中国書といえば、『孫子』ですかね。When it comes to Chinese books that are overvalued worldwide I suppose it's Sun Tzu, isn't it?
大学を卒業したら、輸出業に従事したいと思っています。I hope to be engaged in the export business after graduating from college.
私は、月・水・金と一日おきに仕事をします。I work every other day: Monday, Wednesday, and Friday.
彼は二重人格者だ。He has a dual personality.
彼はその強盗事件の従犯者として逮捕された。He was arrested as an accessory to the robbery.

私は、月・水・金と一日おきに仕事をします。I work every other day: Monday, Wednesday, and Friday.
その事故の犠牲者数は死者５名、負傷者１００名であった。The toll from the accident was 5 persons dead and 100 persons injured.君のせっかくの名講義は猫に小判だったね。Your wonderful lecture was pearls before swine.
彼はメキシコ人なので英語の発音はスペイン風になる。He pronounces English words in Spanish fashion because he is a Mexican.
携帯番号を教えて頂けませんか。Can you give me your cell number?
今じゃ、ボクのお料理レベルは、１００点中４５点くらい。スゴイだろ、赤点じゃないのさ！Right now my score in Cooking is about 45 out of 100. Great isn't it? That's not a fail!


彼は酒気を帯びて運転していた。He was driving under the influence of alcohol.







夜寝れない時に限って、時計のカチカチいう音が気になるものだ。It's only when I can't sleep at night that the ticking of the clock becomes loud enough to bother me.
ご読了ありがとございました〜。Thank you for reading to the end.


































































２００人の人が昨年コレラで死んだ。Two hundred people died of cholera last year.






そんな場面を見るに忍びなかった。I couldn't bear to see such a scene.


















































































































































































候補者たちは減税法案をめぐって応酬しました。Candidates traded blows over the proposed tax cut.








アメリカ人の4分の3が超常現象を信じている。Three out of four Americans believe in the existence of paranormal phenomena.



































口をすっぱくして言ったのに。I told you again and again.
もしも、このコンピューターを使いたいのでしたら、大至急ご連絡下さい。Please let me know immediately if you would like to use this computer.


警察は彼の生活に立ち入って調べ上げた。The police raked through his life.





























































































その老婦人はまゆをひそめた。The old woman knitted her brows.











あなたがおいでになることを公にするのは賢明ではないかもしれない。It may be unwise of you to advertise your presence.

彼は故郷に錦を飾って帰ってくる。A successful local boy is coming home.







我が社は均一料金にすることに決定した。Our company decided on flat rate pricing.




























健康をおろそかにしたことを私は悔やんでいる。I regret having neglected my health.



バグだか何だか分かんないけど、このソフトはちゃんと動かない。I dunno if it's a bug or what, but this software doesn't work right.


彼のいいところを引き出すようにしなさい。Try to bring out the best in him.彼の母親は可哀相だ。あいつときたら母親泣かせもいいところだ。I feel sorry for his mom; he really puts her through the wringer.彼はいいとこ三位だろう。At best he may take third place.
恋はゲームじゃないから、いいとこ取りはできないんだよ。Love isn't a game, so you can't just cherry pick the best bits!
















経営陣は収益の短期的改善に気を取られすぎて、長期的な将来計画に気が回らない傾向があった。The management tended to be too concerned about short-term improvement of the bottom line to have any long-term design for the future.








私のウェブページに来て私のことをもっと知ってください。Visit my webpage and find out more about me.








職場でOutlookのスケジュールを使用していますが、ＰＤＡを購入しシンクロさせたいと考えています。I use Outlook's scheduler at work and I think I'd like to buy a PDA and synchronize them.


Windows系ＯＳではアドミニストレーターアカウントがルートに相当する。With Windows OS systems 'administrator account' corresponds to 'root'.




















一つのミスで荒らしと間違えられて、叩かれてしまう。Just one slip and you'll be mistaken for a troll and flamed.




















ファイルへの直リンだけはやめた方がいいです。 URLの最初だけ全角ｈｔｔｐにするとか、ちょっと工夫しよう。It's a good idea to stop using direct links to files. Use a trick like starting the URL with double-width "h t t p" or something.








このテレビ番組がいま人気を集めています。This TV show is catching on now.

















二人の刀がガチッと切りあった。Their swords clashed.





















































薬箱は子供の手の届かない所に置いとく方がいいよ。You should keep the medicine box away from your child.ここにはいない方がよい。We had better not remain here.
毛先をそろえますか。Do you want a trim?


























あなたがたの学校祭はいつですか。When is your school festival?






























































































































「時代はＢＬだよ」「びーえる？」「そう。ボーイズラブ。男の子同士の恋愛を扱った本とかのことだ」"It's the age of BL!" "Bee el?" "Yup, Boys' Love. Books and such dealing with romance between boys."




















































































































































































後指を指すのはやめたまえ。Don't talk about people behind their backs.

彼はその日暮らしをしている。He's living from hand to mouth.


本当の所を読みとらなきゃ。Read between the lines.




彼はなんでも金本位に考える。He thinks of everything in terms of money.
































あなたはどのくらいの間、神戸に住んでいますか。How long have you lived in Kobe?
私の妹は横浜の近くに住んでいる。My sister lives near Yokohama.
小学５年の息子が静岡から名古屋の小学校に転入しました。My fifth-year junior school son has transferred into a school in Nagoya from Shizuoka.

私は１０年前に福岡に訪れた。I visited Fukuoka ten years ago.

７月１０日より札幌支店を開設いたします。On July 10, we will open our Sapporo branch.




静岡で地震があったそうだ。I hear there was an earthquake in Shizuoka.
その列車は新潟行きです。The train is bound for Niigata.


















私はただの名無しの権兵衛です。I am just a nobody.

























































































































































貧乏暇なしですよ。Poor men have no leisure.











お祖母さんが座布団の上にちんまりとすわっていました。The old woman was snugly sitting on a cushion.














































































お姉さんのことはたいへんお気の毒に思います。I feel very sorry for your sister.











































二人の間がしっくり行かない。They don't get along together.








この商品管理伝票をこのタイムスタンプに差し込むと日付と時刻が打刻されます。Place this merchandise slip into the time stamp, and the date and time will be impressed.

























テルミン：一九二〇年、ロシアの物理学者レフ・セルゲイヴィッチ・テルミンが作った世界初の電子楽器。Theremin: The world's first electronic musical instrument, made by Russian physicist Lev Sergeivitch Termen in 1920.


あいつの多芸は無芸のたぐいだ。He is a jack-of-all-trades.


この気持ちが冷めないうちにがんばります！！「鉄は熱いうちに打て」といいますから。I'm going to get going before this feeling goes!! Well they do say "Strike while the iron is hot."










































きのう交差点でお釜を掘られちゃったよ。Someone ploughed into me from behind at an intersection yesterday.




















































































































































あの絵を壁に掛けなさい。Hang that picture on the wall.










































彼は事故に遭って骨を折った。He met with an accident and broke some bones.
指輪はどこにも見つからなかった。The ring was not to be found anywhere.ここでも、このアプローチがマシュー・アーノルドの「どこにも連結がある」という考えに由来していることを見て取ることができる。Again, we can see this approach as deriving from Matthew Arnold's idea that everywhere there is connection.
私は日曜日にはどこへも行きません。I am not going anywhere on Sunday.








その辞書を引くべきである。You should consult the dictionary.













紙飛行機はゆっくり地上に落ちた。The paper plane fell slowly to earth.















筋肉組織は無数の細胞からなっている。Muscle tissue consists of innumerable cells.


パーティーを欠席した言い訳に作り話をこねあげた。I concocted an excuse for missing the party.





















































































ひろみは怖かったけれどもバンジージャンプをやってみることに決心した。Hiromi decided to risk bungee-jumping, even though he was scared.
でも、ジェンの家のベランダにいたヴィンスは上半身裸。いやー、もしかしたらすっぽんぽんだったかもッ！However, Vince, on Jen's house's veranda, was naked from the waist up. He might even have been starkers!
ボクに任せたんだ。君たちは大船に乗ったつもりでいるといい。I'm taking care of it. You can relax. You can rely on me.





















































ちょっと郵便局へいってくる。I'm just going to drop by the post office.



























あなたの人間関係における最も大きな危険の一つは自己中心的になることです。One of the greatest dangers in your human relations is self-centeredness.彼女は他人のことを気にしない。言いかえれば、自己中心的だ。She doesn't pay attention to others; in other words, she is selfish.










































いい考えが頭に浮かんだ。A good idea came into my head.

求めよ、さらば与えられん。Ask, and it shall be given you.










































買い物の割に遅かったな。どこぞでよろしくやっていたのか？You're pretty late to have just gone shopping. Have you been making out someplace?




























彼女がどこに住んでいるのか、もしやご存知ですか。Do you happen to know where she lives?

あるがままに物事を見るようにしなさい。Try to see things as they are.










































































































撥ね付けられるほどに増すわが思い。The more she spurns my love, the more it grows.












































銭厘を大切にすれば大金はおのずとたまる。Take care of the pence, and the pounds will take care of themselves.彼のビジネスプランは立派だけど、勘定あって銭足らず、という気もするけどね。His business plan looks good on paper but I get the feeling it would never work in practice.













すぐに医者に診てもらった方がいいぞ。You had better see a doctor at once.

























これは犬です。This is a dog.








私は特にこれといってすることがない。I have nothing particular to do.


春ごとに恋は例のいたずらを始める。Love begins playing his old tricks every spring.もう例の手紙の返事を書いたかい。Have you answered that letter yet?



































































諸神は悪を雷で打つという。They say the gods smite evil with thunderbolts.
彼女は美しいばかりか、心も優しく、しかも、聡明である。Besides being beautiful, she is kind and intellectual.























































































ジョンとキャシーは興味も性格も違う。その二人を一緒にさせようとするのは丸穴に角釘を打つようなものだ。John and Cathy have different tastes and different characters. Trying to get them together is like putting a square peg in a round hole.
ヘレブラント博士はそのすぐれた大学の准教授である。Dr. Hellebrandt is an associate professor in that excellent university.








































バスの路線図を貸してください。May I have a bus route map?













































ちなみにここ一週間は、例えばフラグが立っていようとも、Ｈシーンが無い事は確定事項だからな。暫くの間、辛抱な！By the way, this week - no matter what flags are set - it's a certainty that there will be no ecchi scenes. You'll just have to bear with it a while.















その作品は先月ついに日の目を見た。The work finally saw the light last month.その法案は結局日の目を見なかった。The bill was finally shelved.



彼女は自分の不幸な運命にため息をついた。She sighed over her unhappy fate.










トムは何事も楽しんでやるんだ。Tom enjoys himself at everything he does.この古い村では何事も起こらない。Nothing ever happens in this old village.







いやいや、結構結構。下の名前で呼び合うのは親近感がわいてよろしいことだ。Not at all, that's perfectly fine. Calling each other by one's given name is a good thing; it produces a feeling of fellowship.



















ベティはベッドに横になった。Betty laid herself on the bed.

























すっごくいいものを見つけたよ！I've found something amazing!








私の邪魔をするものは何もない。There is nothing to hinder me.










































彼女はそのチャイナドレスに魅了された。She was fascinated by that Chinese dress.


















下記の指示に従いさえすれば、すぐに白票と同様に容易かつ迅速にフルカラーの書類を印刷することができる。Simply follow the instructions below, and in no time you will be printing full color documents just as easily and quickly as black and white.









「ふむ」 武田先生は口ひげを捻りながらうなった。"Hrmm," mumbled Professor Takeda as he twisted his moustache.
































































これは首まわりがすこしきつすぎる。This is a bit too tight around my neck.
カーペットには埃を吸収するダストポケット効果があり、埃の飛散を防ぐ特長があるのだが、それが仇になった結果といえる。Carpets have the effect of a dust pocket, with merit of sucking up dust and stopping it flying around, but you can say that effect backfires.
その後も週三回のペースで酔っ払い、そのつど違う男を連れてくる。And after that she, at a pace of three times a week, gets drunk and at those times brings back a different man.














































彼女は姉に劣らず美しい。She is no less beautiful than her sister.


あえて休暇を取りやめるには及ばない。You don't have to cancel your vacation.


















みつなは綺麗好きだから、よく自ら進んで掃除をしています。Mitsuna is very tidy so she often cleans up without being asked.

似てくると言うよりは類友みたいな感じですね。Rather than coming to resemble each other, it feels like they are birds of a feather.










































あなたにはとても頭が上がりません。I have a great esteem for you.
あなたがどんな理由をつけようと、私はあなたの言う事を信じる事が出来ません。I cannot believe you, whatever reasons you may give.
いくら借りているか記録をつけておきなさい。Keep a tally of what you owe.
一体全体なぜ、彼にそんな名前をつけたんですか。Why on earth did you give him such a name?

各国の政治家がホワイトハウス詣でをした。Politicians from many countries made pilgrimages to the White House.


試験で山が当たった。I made a good shot at the exam.


彼は水も滴るいい男だ。He is tremendously handsome.
決して身分不相応な生活をしないようにとあなたに勧めます。I advise you never to live beyond your income.
私はあなたを笑わずにはいられない。I cannot help laughing at you.
私は彼の正直さを疑わないではいられない。I can't help doubting his honesty.



彼らは数時間働きつづけた。They went on working for hours.
アキラは数分の間外出した。Akira went out for a few minutes.

彼は言葉数が少ない。He is brief of speech.
この新聞は最も人気のある筆者をはずしてから、読者数を減らし始めた。The newspaper began to lose readers when it dispensed with one of its most popular writers.

しばらくの間待つのは構わない。I don't mind waiting for a while.





















彼らは我々の和解の試みを鼻の先で笑ってはねつけた。They scorned our attempts at reconciliation.
その店は私の家の目と鼻の先にある。The store is close to my house.





















高関税が自由貿易への最大の障害になっている。High tariffs are the chief obstacles to free trade.
彼は金に目がくらんで結婚した。He married for money.



彼女はその豪華な部屋に目のくらむ思いがした。She was dazzled by the gorgeous room.ヘッドライトがまぶしくて一瞬目がくらんだ。The glaring headlights dazzled us for a moment.




















その返事には開いた口が塞がらなかった。I was taken aback at the answer.

その光景に注意を引かれた。The sight arrested my attention.
貧乏くじを引きたくない。I don't want to be left holding the bag.
この事件はだれかが糸を引いているに違いない。Somebody must be at the bottom of this affair.あの会社との取り引きは父の代から糸を引くように切れない。Our transactions with that firm have continued unbroken since my father's generation.
くじを引いて誰が最初か決めよう。Let's draw lots to decide who goes first.
風邪引かないようにコートを着た。I wore a coat lest I catch a cold.
このポテトチップおいしくて後を引くね。These potato chips are good enough to make you want more.父の死のショックが後を引いていて、彼女は外出する気力がなかった。The shock of her father's death lingered on and she didn't feel like going out at all.




















そのとき、彼らは、ブラックベリーの林の周りをつかれて、のどがかわくまで競争して遊んでいました。Then they played "ring-a-ring-a-rosy" until they were tired and thirsty.
























バッターのカウントはツーストライクツーボール。The batter has two balls and two strikes on him.

















































我々は出来る限り手を尽くすと信じて下さい。You may rest assured that we shall do all we can.
八方手をつくした。I tried all possible means.

「結婚したんじゃなかったのかよ？」「あぁ、別れちゃった。婚約破棄」"Didn't you get married!?" "Oh, we split up. We broke our engagement."




ホワイトバランスをオートにした場合と白いコピー用紙でプリセットした場合の比較です。It's a comparison of setting the white balance to "auto" versus presetting it with white copy paper.
家へ着くとすぐに彼はコンピューターゲームをはじめた。As soon as he got home, he began to play a computer game.
ガーデニングの本を見てたら、ドクロマークのついたのがいっぱいあって驚きました。When I looked in a gardening book I was surprised by how many were marked poisonous.

ふくれっ面してないで、機嫌を直して笑ってごらんよ。Quit pouting. Smile and cheer up.







私たちの手紙は行き違いになった。Our letters crossed each other.
みつなは綺麗好きだから、よく自ら進んで掃除をしています。Mitsuna is very tidy so she often cleans up without being asked.


彼女のブラコンっぷりにも困ったものね。Bit of a worry with the way she dotes on her brother, isn't it?


半角カタカナをインターネット上の色んな所で使えば、いつか顰蹙をかいまくる事になるよ。If you go around the Internet, using half-width katakana in various places, eventually you're going to end up pissing off a lot of people.
あれこれ考え合わせると。I have taken everything into consideration.
私には合わせる顔がない。I have no face to turn to.
このコンピューターは品質ではどれにも劣らない。This computer is second to none in quality.












これらの絵でどれか気になるものはありますか。Do you like any of these pictures?
私は店の品物を全部試着したのですが、どれ一つ似合わないの。I must have tried on everything in the shop, but nothing looked right on me.







全角文字を含むファイル名の場合、一部のＯＳでは文字化けが生じることがありますので、ダウンロードの際に適宜ファイル名を変更してください。On some OS's you get gibberish for filenames with full-width characters so when downloading please change to a suitable filename.



















俺は家族全員に見送られながら、旅支度を整えたザックを担ぐ。Being seen off by my whole family I shouldered a rucksack, stocked with my trip supplies.
その専門家は国際緊張が高まっていくと予測している。The specialist predicts international tension will build up.
あなたが言うのは「右に同じ」だけ、それは「愛してる」とは違う。You say "ditto", and that's not the same as "I love you".










スーザンは父親の靴を磨いた。Susan shined her father's shoes.



カーペットには埃を吸収するダストポケット効果があり、埃の飛散を防ぐ特長があるのだが、それが仇になった結果といえる。Carpets have the effect of a dust pocket, with merit of sucking up dust and stopping it flying around, but you can say that effect backfires.





あの学生たちのことを考えると本当に頭痛の種だ。Those college students give me a bad headache.

彼らはその車が残していった跡を追った。They followed the tracks the car had left.
彼は誰に対しても腰が低い。He is humble towards everyone.
































スペイン料理ってパエリアの他に何があるの？What Spanish food is there apart from paella?


























































「腰は痛む？」「いや、別に」「そう、それは不幸中の幸いね」"Does your back hurt?" "No, not really." "Oh, that's something then, isn't it?"













現場には彼に不利な証拠品は何もなかった。There was no evidence against him found at the scene.
先週米国からのみやげ品を彼に郵送した。Last week, I mailed him some souvenirs from the U.S.












明後日ティーパーティーを開きましょう。Let's have a tea party the day after tomorrow.

私は古い真鍮のティーポットが好きです。I like my old brass tea pot.












もー、弥生のナビが判りにくいから、同じトコぐるぐる回ったじゃない。Hmph, Yayoi's navigation was difficult to follow so we ended up going round and round the same places.





















順を追って基本的なタグを覚えていこう。Let's learn the basic tags in order.






その古い置き時計はまだ使われている。The old clock is still in use.

























投函完了、と。後は頼んだぞ、ポストマンよ。Mailing complete. I leave the rest to you, postman!





























ファーストキスは、もっとロマンチックなの想像してたのに。I imagined my first kiss would be more romantic.

































仕事を片付けようと全力を挙げた。We went all out to get the job done.
走行中の箱乗りはご遠慮下さい！Please don't lean out of the window when we're moving.









彼は仕事で成功をおさめられなかった。He couldn't make it in business.
















コレステロール値が上がってきています。My cholesterol levels are high.











一体何が今晩表であんなひどい音をたてているのか見当もつきません。I don't know what kind of creature is making such a terrible noise outside tonight.


そのニュースは彼の不意をついた。The news took him by surprise.
どうも彼はその件に一枚かんでいるようだ。It sounds to me as if he has something to do with the matter.





























































その仕事に応募したらどうだい。Why not apply for that job?

















なお、会社説明会後でも、会社見学は随時受け付けております。Furthermore, even after the company information session, we sometimes hold company tours.
すべての学生が担任の先生を尊敬している。All the students respect their home room teacher.



























































































































なるべく姉ちゃんにも周りにも迷惑をかけずに、事態の早期解決をなんとか頼むぞ。I want you to somehow resolve the situation as soon as possible, causing the least amount of trouble for my sister and those around us.





















































女性ホルモン分泌の乱れが不妊症の大きな原因です。Female hormone imbalance is a major cause of infertility.




ディスコダンスに関しては、私はスーザンの足元にも及ばない。When it comes to disco dance, I can't hold a candle to Susan.

魚の骨がつかえて息が詰まりそうだった。I nearly choked on a fishbone.


















このショッピングセンターは何時から何時までやっていますか。What hours is the shopping center open?















船乗りになろうかと考えている。He is thinking of going to sea.













私はあなたから責任を問われることは何も無い。I am not answerable to you for anything.

あなたの切手帳を見せてください。Please show me your stamp album.
これは私の出納帳です。This is my account book.
どんな相談にも、私で良ければ親身になって答えましょう。Whatever you need to talk about, if I will do, I'll answer with loving care.



























私は彼女がスペイン人であるということを知っている。I know that she is Spanish.
インカ人はヨーロッパ人よりも多く風呂へ入った。The Inca took baths more often than Europeans.
１人は日本人で、もう１人はイタリア人です。One is Japanese and the other is Italian.



ランキング参加中です。面白ければ、ポチッと♪This site is in a toplist. If you found it interesting, please click!


グラスの周りにソルトをつけたマルガリータをすするのが好き。I enjoy sipping on a margarita with salt around the rim.










彼はミートボールにフォークを突き刺した。He stuck a meatball with his fork.







恐れ入りますが、窓を開けていただけませんでしょうか。Would you mind opening the window?





電子メールで連絡を取り合いましょう。Let's keep in touch by e-mail.











彼はドアベルを鳴らした。He rang the doorbell.


















消しゴムでこれらの語を消しなさい。Rub out these words with your eraser.これを戒めとしなさい。Let this be an example to you.
好きなように遊んでよろしい。You may play at your pleasure.


























その細っこい体のどこに入るんだ？In that slender body, where does it all go?










ちなみにここ一週間は、例えばフラグが立っていようとも、Ｈシーンが無い事は確定事項だからな。暫くの間、辛抱な！By the way, this week - no matter what flags are set - it's a certainty that there will be no ecchi scenes. You'll just have to bear with it a while.













「エグゼンプション」の議論を機に働き方を見直そう。Let's take advantage of the 'exemption' controversy to reconsider the way we work.




















彼女は会社の床掃除よりましな仕事を望んだ。She wanted a better job than cleaning office floors.






















はい、お兄ちゃん、半分こ。Here, bro, halfsies.









えっ嘘でしょ。Oh my God, I can't believe this.















おかげでほぼ完徹だ。Thanks to which I was up nearly all night.





















お腹がグーグー鳴っている。My stomach is growling.




































今年のスーパーボールは、どこが優勝すると思いますか。Who do you think will win this year's Super Bowl?




話は多岐にわたった。We talked about various topics.

ＯＤＳスーパーアロイは粉末冶金技術を伴うメカニカルアロイ法により製造されます。ODS super alloy is produced by the mechanical alloy method following powder metallurgy.







プレステ２発売後、ゲームソフト売り場は百花撩乱状態だ。Since the release of the PlayStation 2, game store shelves have blossomed with a variety of new titles.
ＯＤＳスーパーアロイは粉末冶金技術を伴うメカニカルアロイ法により製造されます。ODS super alloy is produced by the mechanical alloy method following powder metallurgy.
お手紙どうもありがとうございます。Thank you very much for your letter.
戦争の際には歩兵は取るに足らないものだ。The infantry soldier is only a pawn in the game of war.








大容量のＲＡＭが搭載されていると、メモリ不足を示すエラーメッセージが表示される。If a very large amount of memory is installed, an 'insufficient memory' error message is displayed.























































メニュー・バーの「返事」から、「フォローアップ記事の作成」を選ぶ。フォローする記事が引用される。From the menu-bar's "Reply" select "create follow-up message". The message you reply to is quoted.

本書の欠点は、既婚者である著者が非婚をすすめても、説得力を欠く事である。The weak point of this book is that it's less than persuasive when the married author recommends not being married.
Windows系ＯＳではアドミニストレーターアカウントがルートに相当する。With Windows OS systems 'administrator account' corresponds to 'root'.
不運にも案内者が道をまちがえた。Unfortunately the guide went wrong.









警戒するに越したことはない。You can't be too vigilant.
小屋の屋根は雪の重みでミシミシと音を立てた。The roof of the hut groaned under the weight of the snow.
おい、いい加減パンツネタはやめとけよな、読者が退く、ドンビキ。Hey, it's about time you quit it with the panty jokes. You'll put off the readers, you creeper!




















































そしてまもなくショベルカーがやってきて、ひなぎくの花でいっぱいの丘を掘って道路をつくりはじめました。Pretty soon along came a steam shovel and dug a road through the hill covered with daisies.





あらやだ、このお煎餅もう湿気ってる。Yecch. This rice cracker is soggy.

「今日お父さんに会いに行く。進路相談だ」「いいですよ、そんなの」"I'm going to see your father today, about career counselling." "You don't need to bother with that."













































「おさきにしつれいします」「おつかれさまでした」"I'm finished for the day." "Much appreciated."
























「そのうちに、あなたのところにお邪魔してもいいですか」「どうぞ、どうぞ」"Do you mind if I call on you sometime?" "No, not at all."






























































佐藤さんは息子の尻をたたいて勉強させた。Mrs. Sato pushed her son to study hard.

演説者はこぶしでテーブルをどんとたたいた。The speaker banged the table with his fist.












「おはよう。今日は早いね」「アナタこそ、まだぐうすか寝てると思ってたのに」"Morning. You're early today." "You too. I thought you'd still be dead to the world."
































































鍵のいらない暗証タイプには、お好きな番号を設定できるフリーダイヤル式と、あらかじめ番号が設定済みの固定式とがあります。For code-type locks that don't need a key, there are 'free dial' systems where you can set any number you like, and fixed types where the number is set in advance.
その問題はすべて解決済みだ。The matter is all settled.
指数は季節調整済みで１２０．５に上昇した。The index rose to a seasonally adjusted 120.5.
明日会合があるということは了解済みだ。It is accepted that we'll have a meeting tomorrow.
明日会合があるということは了承済みだ。It is accepted that we'll have a meeting tomorrow.

Microsoftがβ版をランチするのは「NetShow streaming server」で動画や音声をオンデマンドで提供する。What Microsoft is launching is a beta version of its "NetShow streaming server"; it supplies video and audio on demand.




















ドタキャンくらったの。来週に持ち越しだって。Got cancelled at the last minute. 'Deferred to next week'.




































ネギをベランダに起きっぱなしにしていたら、カスカスになった。I left some scallions out on the veranda for too long and they dried out.

































地方の道路整備のための財源確保が必要です。It is necessary to secure financing for local road maintenance.














彼の好きな野球チームジャイアンツですが、ライオンズも好きです。His favorite baseball team is the Giants, but he likes the Lions as well.






「みろ、お前のお陰でフラれまくりだぞ」「そう？日頃の行いのせいじゃない？」"Look! Thanks to you I'm getting dumped all the time." "Oh? Isn't it just because of your everyday behaviour?"

ある種の鳥においては、周りの鳥たちやつがいに存在を知られていることが有利であると推測することができる。We can conjecture that it may be advantageous for a particular bird to be known to its neighbors or its mate.
彼の行為は始めから終わりまで正しかった。His action throughout was correct.







地元住民と政府調査官の間に折衝がありました。There was a flare-up between local residents and state regulators.





彼は絵を書くことをこよなく愛した。Painting was the great love of his life.

















頭韻の例を収集するために、シェークスピア・コンコーダンスを調べた。We studied the Concordance to Shakespeare to accumulate examples of alliteration.



彼は私に出てけと合図した。He made a sign to me to go out.












あたりは水を打ったように静かだった。There was complete silence. You could hear a pin drop.
この問題は早急に手を打つ必要がある。Something must be done immediately to deal with this problem.ケーキ一個で手を打ってあげるよ。I'll do it for a cake.私はぽんと手を打った。I clapped my hands.












次の２０年が私たち皆にとってさらに実り多いものになりますように。We hope the next 20 years will be even more successful for all of us.

「似てないわよね」「二卵性だからね」"Don't look alike do you?" "That's because we're fraternal twins."








最近、周りでも離婚が多いようだけど、子は鎹って事は、今は昔となったのかね。Lately I see a lot of parents getting divorced. I wonder if the idea of kids being a bond between their parents is just a thing of the past.

もし要求事をする場合、ここではちゃんと筋を通さないと決して出世はしない。You'll never get ahead in this place unless you go through the proper channels.
儲けようとする投機筋に操られているのです。It's being manipulated by investors trying to make it rich.
彼がそんな筋の通らないことを言ったはずはない。He cannot have said such an unreasonable thing.





















これは現代英語の慣用法についての本です。This is a book on modern English usage.
あなたの寄附は小児病院を建設する補助として、大いに役立つでしょう。Your gift will go far towards helping to build the children's hospital.







これは世界の常識であり、資源管理の大原則だ。This is international common sense, the great principle of resource management.




その会社は市場を拡大するために最近の製品の多角化を図った。The firm has recently diversified its products so as to extend its market.






なぜ一種の植物が一年生の草本になったり、多年生の木本になったりするのでしょうか。I wonder why it is that some plants become annuals and others perennials?






この本のすべての登場人物は想像上のものです。All the characters in this book are imaginary.





私は彼に殴られたのでこちらも数発殴り返した。I answered his blows with several of my own.




敵の防衛線を突破した。We broke through the enemy lines.
細かいことにこだわるな。Don't split hairs.
「あなたはたしか・・・えーと、えーと・・・も」「頭文字から間違っとるわい！！」"Let's see, you're ... er, um ... M-" "You're wrong from the first letter!!"


馬鹿たれ！頼まなかったらよかったよ。You boob! I should not have asked you.
















自然食は人間の消化に合っている。A natural diet is suitable for human digestion.
第二が周辺環境との親和性であり、最小の廃棄物、自然エネルギーの利用等、周辺の生態と調和した住空間を形成することである。The second is the affinity with environment. By utilizing natural energy and reducing wastes, we have to make houses which harmonize with ecology.
彼らの顔つきからして、まあ失敗したのでしょう。From the way they look, I would say that they failed.
「親しき仲にも礼儀あり」という言葉を知らないのか？Don't you know the saying "good manners even between friends?"




労働者は事前通知なしに解雇されることはない。No workers can be dismissed without previous notice.
彼女はつつましやかに伏し目になって彼の言葉に耳を傾けた。She listened to him with her eyes modestly cast down.
急激にかりかりした鳥皮が食べたくなった。I suddenly got a craving to eat some crisp roast chicken skin.
世界からは【麻疹輸出国】と嫌味とも本音ともとれることをいわれている始末。Ending up with being called a "measles exporting country" by the rest of the world, something that you could take as insult or truth.
コミックマーケット６７にてコピー本販売。無事完売したので製本しました。They were sold as photocopy books in Comic Market 67. We had no problem selling all of them, so we had bound copies made.















彼は自信ありげに見えたが、内心は全然違っていた。He looked confident but his inner feelings were quite different.















どうせ、妙子さんが怖がって、有利さんも道連れにしようとしたんでしょ。I'm sure Taeko was scared and tried to get Yuri to go along with her.



「少女の部屋へ行く」というのは「トイレへ行く」ということの婉曲表現です。"Going to the little girl's room" is an euphemistic expression for "going to the toilet."






ケンがろうそくに火をつけた。Ken lighted the candles.警官による暴行事件はあやうく暴動に火をつけるところでした。The police brutality incidents nearly set off a riot.
残念ながら昨日はご覧の通りの結果となりました。Unfortunately, the results yesterday were as you see.

「あっ。あたし生卵！」「一個でいいですか？」「うん。足りなくなったらまた注ぎ足すから」"Ah, a raw egg for me!" "Is one enough?" "Yep, if I need more I'll top it up."







クリック：マウスの「左側」のボタンを素早く「一回」プチッと押す事です。Click: Quickly pushing the mouse's left hand side button once.お金がないので、プチッと旅行。As I don't have the money, it'll just be a short trip.





フラフラと歩き回る様は、あまりにデンジャラスだ。The way she dizzily moves around is far too dangerous.


ネット上のマナーやら常識の無さやうんちゃらかんちゃらにうんざりしっぱなしです。I'm aghast at the lack of manners, common sense and so on and so forth on the net.






むしろ彼の思うがままにさせてやりたい。I would rather let him have his own way.
首相が政敵の挑戦と真っ向から対決しました。The prime minister directly confronted the challenges of his political opponents.







ご子息のご結婚を心よりお祝い申し上げます。Please accept our heartiest congratulations on the marriage of your son.
今、ようやくツケがまわってきたのだろう。So it's finally time to pay the piper.

バッターのイチローは、目の覚めるような２塁打を打った。Ichiro hit an eye-popping double.









誰しも礼儀正しい人が好きだ。Everybody likes polite people.人間は誰しも死を避けられない。No one can avert death.




この国の王は人ではなく、はるか天空に居られるという三対の翼を持つ神獣なんだ。The king of this country isn't a person, but a divine beast with three pairs of wings said to be in far away in the sky.



留守中どなたか見えましたか。Was anybody here while I was out?

私はこういった種類のことは苦手です。I'm not good at this sort of thing.
その制服、前カノになんちゃって女子高生プレイさせるために買ってたもんなんてバレたら・・・。If she finds out that that uniform was one I bought to get my former girlfriend to be a pretend 'high school girl' ...










何日も続けて雨が降った。It rained for several days on end.
いく日もいく日も、彼女は彼のセーターを編むのに費やした。Many a day did she spend knitting a sweater for him.
「外でデートの待ち合わせをしましょう」「そんなヒマがあったら荷ほどき手伝いに来い！」"Let's meet up outside for a date." "If you've got that much free time come and help unpack!"
どうも仕事が手に付かない。Somehow I cannot settle down to work.
私は事故の責任を彼のせいにした。I blamed him for the accident.
彼女のブラコンっぷりにも困ったものね。Bit of a worry with the way she dotes on her brother, isn't it?







クッキーは寝返りを打った。Cookie turned over in his sleep.
彼の約束はあてにならない。His promise cannot be relied on.




あお向けに寝ると、舌やノドチンコがノドの奥に下がるため、上気道が塞がりやすくなります。If you sleep on your back it's easier for your upper airway to be obstructed because your tongue, uvula, etc. slip towards the back of your throat.
































公正証書遺言の作成や秘密証書遺言には公証人が関与します。Notaries are involved in the drawing up of notarial deeds and sealed envelope deeds.
一つ間違えると君は失敗者になる。A single mistake, and you are a failure.
君は次の昇任予定者です。You are the next in line for promotion.
景気後退は賃金生活者を苦境に追い込みました。The recession has put the crunch on wage laborers.
博物館には参観者はほとんどいなかった。Visitors were few at the museum.
さらにまた、ＲＶ車に乗ってアメリカ中をひたすら旅して、それまで忙しすぎてみることのできなかった地域を見て回る者もいる。Still others simply travel around America in recreational vehicles, seeing parts of the country they had been too busy to see before.





波に足をすくわれた。The waves carried me off my feet.
わびをいれるなら早い方がいいだろう。If you're going to apologise, sooner is better.







「百八といえば煩悩の数だ」「お兄ちゃんはどんな煩悩があるの？」「言ってもいいが、検閲削除になるぞ」"Talking about 108, that's the number of worldly passions." "What worldly passions have you got then?" "I could say, but it'll get censored out."


















トム・ジョーンズ氏が、この新しい作業アイテムのプロジェクトリーダーになることになりました。Mr Tom Jones has agreed to serve as the project leader for this new work item.



















サタンのこうした行いを神がなぜ許しているのか、その理由は聖書のヨブ記で説明されている。Why God allows these sorts of actions by Satan is explained in the Book of Job in the Bible.
テクトロニクスの新ソフトウェアは、ロジック・アナライザを使う顧客のニーズにまさしく応えるものです。Tektronix's new software perfectly responds to the needs of customers using logic analysers.































































あのリムジンバスに乗れば、東京国際空港に行けるよ。The airport shuttle will take you to Tokyo International Airport.
外国人が日本に上陸する時は、到着した空港等で上陸許可の申請を行わなければなりません。When foreign citizens land in Japan, they must apply for landing permission at the air or seaports where they arrive.
さて、パリサイ人の中にニコデモという人がいた。Now there was a man of the Pharisees named Nicodemus.

























ダンサーたちはラテン音楽の曲目の間、実に活気づいた。The dancers really came to life during the Latin numbers.


















普通の人は、３Ｄだとか高速でうんたらだとか必要としないですからね。Because an average person doesn't need 3D, or high whatchacallit speeds.


彼の演説はその場にふさわしいものだった。His speech was suitable for the occasion.私はその場ですぐに賃金を払った。I paid his wages on the spot.

あーあ、トーストが真っ黒に焦げてしまっているよ。Oh, the toast is burned black.

















































ジョージ３世は歴史家によって不当に悪し様に言われてきた。George III has been unfairly maligned by historians.





































よんどころない事情で、今年の夏は別荘で過ごせないんだ。Due to unavoidable circumstances this summer I can't stay in my holiday cottage.






先輩は、嫌味なくらいの完璧超人でしたからね。だから逆にその「癖」は先輩の可愛げ・・・というか、チャームポイントでしたよ。You were always a perfect 'superhuman' to an infuriating extent, and so that 'habit' was actually one of your cute, or rather charming, attributes.



ホワイトニングなどの治療を行います。ヤニ取りなどのクリーニングも行っています。We carry out treatments like whitening. We also do tobacco stain removal and other cleaning procedures.
別荘にもどって、三時のおやつ。Returned to the villa, afternoon snack.
ホワイトニングなどの治療を行います。ヤニ取りなどのクリーニングも行っています。We carry out treatments like whitening. We also do tobacco stain removal and other cleaning procedures.
それは出来ない相談だな。油物してる時に、火の傍から離れるのは言語道断だ。I'm afraid I can't do that. Leaving the cooker while frying is completely out of the question.




オレ、教室で屁をこいちゃったんっすよ。んでもって先生に追い出されちゃって。I farted in class, and the teacher threw me out.
カウンターの値が指定の「キリ番」になったら記念メッセージを表示させます。When the counter value reaches the assigned 'lucky-number' it displays a congratulatory message.

６００００キリリクイラスト：キリ番を踏んだBeikyuさんのサイト「小さなカエデの木のそばで」のイメージイラストを描いてほしいというリクエストを頂きました。60,000 lucky number request: I got a request to draw an illustration for the site of Beikyu, who hit the lucky number, "Standing By A Little Maple Tree".












君か彼のどちらかがまちがっている。Either you or he is wrong.




その制服、前カノになんちゃって女子高生プレイさせるために買ってたもんなんてバレたら・・・。If she finds out that that uniform was one I bought to get my former girlfriend to be a pretend 'high school girl' ...





















TOEICの学習に限らず、英語を学ぶのであれば英和辞典は必携の書の一つでしょう。An English-Japanese dictionary is surely a must have book, not just for those taking TOEIC, but for all studying English.









おっと！火種が残りすくないぞ！薪割りしてくれ！Whoops! There aren't many live coals left! Go make some kindling would you?







食堂はロビーの真隣だが・・・てゆーか、恵子の場所から、あと３歩しかないぞ？The dining hall is directly adjacent to the lobby, or rather, from where you are, it's just three steps away?






かつてはロードローラーは馬が曳いていたが、蒸気機関の発明により、スチームローラーが現れた。Horses used to pull road-rollers, but the steamroller arrived with the invention of the steam engine.
アメリカの大学に応募する際に、トフルの成績は一つの要因でしかない。When applying to American universities, your TOEFL score is only one factor.




ランチボックスからは、色んなオカズの匂いが、立ちのぼっている。The smell of various foodstuffs drifted up from the lunch box.
ガイドブックによれば、ここがここいらで一番美味しい店なんだって。According to the guidebook, this is the best restaurant around here.

この話をすると彼は間違った印象を与えるんじゃないかな。I'm afraid the story will give him a wrong impression.
私は彼女をまるで嫌っているかのようにそっぽを向いた。I turned away as if I didn't like her.







禅坊主じゃあるまいし、毎日毎日、一汁一菜のダイエットメニューは勘弁してよ。What? A little soup and celery is all I get? I'm not a Zen monk. I can't survive on an austerity diet like this.
天におわす神のお力添えがあった。God above helped us.




火がぼんぼん燃えている。The fire is burning furiously.
このポンコツ車はえんこばかりしている。This old car breaks down all the time.
大統領のボディーガードは入り口に配置されている。The President's guards are stationed in front of the entrance.

良いボールボーイやボールガールは精神を集中することができ、また、速く走ることができなければならない。A good ballboy or ballgirl must be able to concentrate hard and run fast.











このペーズリー柄のネクタイ、あなたに似合うんじゃない？Don't you think this paisley tie would look good on you?
新しいシャツにフルーツジュースを少しこぼしてしまった。I spilled some fruit juice on my new shirt.




こいつがそんな玉じゃないことなんてとうの昔に解っていたからさ。That's because, you see, I've known he isn't that sort of person from a long time back.
付き人も連れずどこほっつき歩いてんですか。Just where have you been loitering around without your attendants?




私は日本でフリーライターをしています。I'm a free-lance writer in Japan.

この昇進は、あなたの熱心で質の高い仕事ぶりを反映したものでしょう。This promotion properly reflects the quality and diligence of your work.
ローマ人は古代ブリトン人の文明化を試みた。The Romans tried to civilize the ancient Britons.


















絶え間ない騒音で耳ががーんとなった。The continual noise deafened us.
※誤字直しました。ご指摘サンクスです。NOTE: Typo corrected. Thanks for pointing it out.

私はフライトアテンダントの職につきたいです。I long for a job as a flight attendant.

消防士たちはドアをぶち破った。The firemen battered down the door.
彼は善悪の区別がない。He cannot tell right from wrong.

彼はびくっとして目が覚めた。He awoke with a start.




彼女は昔羽振りが良かったに違いない。She must have been well-off in the past.



夜のバスツアーに参加したいのですが。I'd like to join a night bus tour.

彼はハードワークによってとても疲れている。He was very tired by hard work.
この湖にネッシーが住んでいると信じている人もいる。Some believe Nessie lives in this lake.
彼はいつもなんやかんやと不平を言っている。He complains about one thing or another all the time.
私は「ばら戦争」に非常に興味がある。I have a great interest in the Wars of the Roses.
この話は何十ぺんとなく聞いた。I have heard this story scores of times.
この話は何十ぺんとなく聞いた。I have heard this story scores of times.


この話はどうも私にはありそうもないように聞こえる。This story sounds very unlikely to me.
お邪魔してすみませんが、あなたに電話がかかっています。I'm sorry to disturb you, but there's a phone call for you.
尿瓶でおしっこするのを手伝ってあげることを専門用語でなんと言いますか？What's the technical terminology for assisting someone to go to the toilet with a urine bottle?
ジョンは息子に期待をかけた。John hung his hopes on his son.


その子は新しいサッカーボールを切望している。The boy is anxious for a new soccer ball.
タイポみると答える気なくす。When I see typos I lose interest in answering.
急に芝居がかった態度をとるな。Don't take that dramatic attitude all of a sudden.











「キツネの嫁入りですね」「はぁ？」「今日は81パーセントの確率で晴れますが、ところによっては天気雨です」"It'll be a 'fox's wedding'." "Huh?" "There's an eighty-one percent chance of sun today with sun showers in a few places."


「ボクは寝てないさ。いつもサボッてるだけ」「そっちのほうが質悪い！」"I'm not sleeping. I'm always just skiving off." "That way's even worse!"


恵子、バタートーストあるか。Keiko, any buttered toast?



興奮の連続に、あっというまもなく３０分のショウタイムが過ぎてしまいました。In all the excitement the 30 minute show-time passed in a flash.















































姉は私のズボンにアイロンをかけてくれる。My sister presses my trousers.
ジェーンは背を木にもたれかけて待っていた。Jane was waiting with her back against the tree.
ケンは、英語に磨きをかけたいと思っている。Ken wishes to brush up his English.




















私たちが環境面の問題を耳にしないで過ぎる日は１日とてない。Not a day goes by without our hearing of an environmental problem.
















この道具は多くの目的にかなう。This tool lends itself to many purposes.








他の女にとられるよりは、諦めつくもん！I'd just be able to give up better than if you were taken by some other woman.



いいからさっき盗ったモノを、カバンの中から出しなさい。Never mind that, just take out what you've just nicked from your bag.いいから社長の言うことなどほっとけよ。Don't pay any attention to the boss.











適合率とは取り出した記事のうち、どの程度の記事が検索条件に合っているかを示す指標です。The precision ratio is an index that indicates how many articles meet the search criteria out of all of the articles retrieved.
情報検索の効率を測る尺度として、再現率と適合率というものがある。As yardsticks to measure the effectiveness of information retrieval there exist those called 'recall ratio' and 'precision ratio'.
全て料理書通りにしなさい。Do everything according to the cookbook.
特に、調和平均の実際の使用例としては、「平均速度」が主に取り上げられ、説明がそこで終わってしまうのが通例である。In particular, it is customary for actual examples of use of the harmonic mean to generally cover "average speed," and explain no further than that.

ああ、男に二言はない。でも手伝うだけだからな。美咲もやれよ。Yes, a man is as good as his word. But I'll just be helping, you understand. You'll have to work too.
右手には、いかにも、「魔法少女アイテムです」と言わんばかりの怪しげなロッドが握られていた。In her right hand was gripped a suspicious looking rod that practically radiated "I'm a magical girl item".









そこでお会いしたかったのですが。I had hoped to meet you there.







一人のクルーカットの学生がバスの前方の座席に座っていた。A student with a crew cut was sitting in the front seat.



カウンターではテニスシューズを販売している。Tennis shoes are sold behind the counter.
彼は最高のテニスプレーヤーだといわれている。They say he is the best tennis player.
適合率とは取り出した記事のうち、どの程度の記事が検索条件に合っているかを示す指標です。The precision ratio is an index that indicates how many articles meet the search criteria out of all of the articles retrieved.

来る途中、お店に寄って食材を買って来たんです。備えあれば憂いなし、です。On the way we dropped in at the shops and bought foodstuffs. They say well prepared means no worries.










私は淋しがり屋です。I am a man who can't stand being alone.
その年の流行語はデジタルで、例えばデジタル時計、デジタルマイクロウエーブオーブンとか、デジタルペンであった。That year's buzzword was digital: digital clocks, digital microwave ovens, even digital pens.

そのことですぐに何か手を打たねばなるまい。Something must be done about it in no time.
君が同意しようとしまいと、ぼくはやる。I am going to do it whether you agree or not.
そんなうわさは誰も信じまい。Nobody will believe that rumor.もう言うまい。I'll say no more.彼は怒りを見せまいとした。He tried to hold back his anger.





店はたたまれ、それっきりだった。The store closed down for good.

悪いけど、どうしたって無理だわ。I'm sorry, but it's just not possible.
彼女は見かけによらず頑張りやだ。She is persistent though she doesn't look so.


















彼に金をやるくらいならむしろどぶに捨てた方がましだ。You had as well throw your money into the ditch as give it to him.
春機が発動して、ソレをナニしたい盛りなのは理解するけど、・・・まあ、そこにお座りなさい。I know you're at an age where sexual desire flourishes and you want to do 'you-know-what' with 'that' but... well, sit down there.





私の飲んだスープは、熱くて飲めやしなかった。The soup I had was so hot I couldn't drink it.






生徒はあまり手を挙げません。Students don't raise their hands much.












コンピューターの勉強をすればするほど面白くなってきた。The more I studied computers, the more interesting I came to find it.
株ですってんてんになっちまった。I lost my shirt on the stock market.
まだ肉眼じゃ無理だよ。双眼鏡だと、ちょびっとだけ見えるかも・・・。It's still impossible with the naked eye. With binoculars you might be able to glimpse it....







このネクタイにしましょう、一番よさそうだから。I will take this tie, as it seems to be the best.

ジムが行儀よくしてくれたならなあ。I wish Jim would behave himself.






シンと静まった部室。響くのは、クロッキー帳に擦れる鉛筆の音だけ。The club room returned to quiet. All that could be heard was the sound of pencil on sketchpad.


彼にとても勝ち目はない。He won't get a look-in.
軽くひと泳ぎした僕は、水から上がってプールサイドに腰を下ろす。After a light swim, I came up from the water and sat down on the poolside.
『ねえ』って、僕を見ながら言われても・・・もしかして、またダブルブッキングですか？It's no good saying 'Isn't it?' to me ... have you double-booked again?
私たちはもうじき幸福になるのですね。We'll soon be happy, won't we?
彼女はチョコレートケーキに目がない。She is partial to chocolate cake.
私は大変気分が悪い。ゲロをはきたいです。I feel very sick. I want to throw up.

運よく薬が効くとき１時過ぎに寝れるけど、薬を飲まないと４時ぐらいまで眠れない。If I'm lucky enough for the medicine to work I can get to sleep after 1am but if I don't take it then I can't sleep until about 4am.
振り向くなよ、なにが見えるかは見当つくんだから。Don't look back cause you know what you might see.
どうしたらあなたに連絡がつきますか。How can I get in touch with you?
風邪は万病の元。A cold often leads to all kinds of disease.
「学園の廊下で、濃厚なキスシーン・・・聞いたぞ聞いたぞ」「濃厚じゃなーい！話に尾ひれ付いてるって・・・」"A passionate kiss scene in a school corridor ... I've heard all about it!" "It wasn't passionate! That's an exaggeration..."
両親にこれ以上負担をかけたくない。I don't want to be any more burden to my parents.
そんなに欲をかいていると、虻蜂取らずになっちゃうよ。Don't be so greedy or you'll wind up with nothing.
準備運動からバタ足の練習まで滞りなく進み、レッスンは至って順調。Proceeding from warm-up exercises to leg kick practice without a hitch, the lesson went completely smoothly.
















思いもかけずあなたに会えてとてもうれしい。I'm really happy I ran into you.




その男は来週裁判にかけられるでしょう。That man is going on trial next week.
彼女にははげましの言葉をかけてあげたらどうですか。Why don't you see if you can't give her a pep talk?












あれ？この曲・・・。プレイリストが一周してるな。Eh? This tune ... The playlist has looped.





車が凍てついた路面を滑った時は「ひやっ」とした。It was frightful when my car skidded on the ice.
その光景で気分が悪くなった。The scene made my stomach turn.
毎週、月火はピアノ、水金はダンスを習ってるの。Every week I study piano on Monday and Tuesday, and dancing on Wednesday and Friday.
他人任せはダメ。ライフセーバーではないが、俺自身が介抱してあげないと。I can't leave this to others. I'm no lifesaver but if I don't help her myself....
ポットとティーセットが乗った、小さなカートを押して、セイカちゃんが部屋に入ってきた。Seika came into the room pushing a small cart with a pot and a tea set resting on it.
啓介さんは、このお屋敷で、ずっとお勉強しているんです。いわゆるホームスクーリングという形ですね。Keisuke has always studied in this mansion. That style known as 'home schooling', right?
「ここまでは表向きの話なんです。キリカさんも知っていることですね」「ってことは、裏向きもあるんですか？」"Up to this point has been the official story, which Kirika also knows." "By which you mean there is also an unofficial?"







『いい人』とは、女の子が恋愛対象にならない男を表す時に使う言葉だ。"Nice person" is the term girls use to refer to men to indicate that they aren't possible objects of romantic interest.
私は彼女に謎かけをしてみた。I tried to ask her a riddle.
肉に塩をかけよう。I'll put some salt on the meat.
この商店街は地元では唯一のショッピング街で、日用品から勉強に必要なものまで一通り揃ってしまう。This shopping district is the only high street in the local area; it stocks the whole line-up from products for daily life to school study equipment.
この商店街は地元では唯一のショッピング街で、日用品から勉強に必要なものまで一通り揃ってしまう。This shopping district is the only high street in the local area; it stocks the whole line-up from products for daily life to school study equipment.
これは絶対、情けは人のためならず！いいことしたからご褒美なんだよ！This is definitely, 'The good you do for others is good you do yourself'! It's a reward because I was helpful!

後先考えず、とりあえずやってみるか。後は野となれ山となれ、だよ。Let's just try it. Who cares what happens afterward? There's no sense thinking too much about that.




たばこはご遠慮下さい。You are requested not to smoke.
この石けんには天然香料が入っている。This soap is infused with natural fragrances.







なぜかうまくいかず、目下全戦全敗、「彼女いない歴＝自分の年齢」という寂しい生活を送っていました。For some reason it didn't go well, shot down at every attempt, and he led a sad "History of no girlfriend = Age" life.
なぜかうまくいかず、目下全戦全敗、「彼女いない歴＝自分の年齢」という寂しい生活を送っていました。For some reason it didn't go well, shot down at every attempt, and he led a sad "History of no girlfriend = Age" life.
この一週間息つく暇もないほど忙しかった。I've been so busy this past week that I've hardly had time to relax.
私は鳩たちがその箱の上によじ登ったご褒美に餌を与えた。I rewarded my pigeons with food for climbing onto the box.






ベティは良いことと悪いことの見分けがつかない。Betty can't tell right from wrong.
犬は白と黒との区別がつく。The dog knows black from white.
このシート、本革ですね。間違って汚すと大変なことになりそうです。This seat, it's real leather, isn't it? It would be a disaster if some slip-up gets it dirtied.
オニユリはユリ科に属する１つの種である。Tiger lilies are one species of the lily family.


そのやり方もいいけど、ここは因数定理を使って・・・。That method's OK but if you use the factor theorem here ...










休み中に置き勉してると没収されるんだよな。If you leave your textbooks at school during the break, they'll get confiscated.












冬来たりなば、春遠からじ。If winter comes, can spring be far behind?



卵のからむきを手伝って。Help me with shelling these eggs!


ステーキに卵にハッシュブラウンにトースト、コーヒーよ。I have steak, eggs, hash browns, toast, and coffee.



彼には事実と虚構の区別がつかない。He can't tell fact from fiction.












































子供にお金を残そうなんて考えずにパーッと派手に遊んで使い切って下さいね。Don't think about leaving money for your kids, use it all up and enjoy yourself with flair.









何百万の人が実際に自分で見に出かけるとき以上の数のゲームを見ることが出来る。Millions of people can see more games than when they have to attend each one in person.
キャシーが今夜、私達の赤ちゃんを見に来る。Cathy is coming to see our baby tonight.
映画を見に行きませんか。How about going to the movies?















私達は多少の遅れを考慮に入れなければいけません。We must allow for some delays.
小さいおうちは野原の草が緑に変わるのをみました。She watched the grass turn green.
近所の人々はみな彼の死をいたみ悲しんだ。The whole neighborhood mourned his death.
現在は、イタリアルネッサンスに興味を持っています。Now I am very interested in the Italian Renaissance.




そうだ、どうせなら散歩がてらに、林道に行ってプチ森林浴でも・・・。Right, while we're taking a walk anyway, we could like go along the woodland path and enjoy a little stroll through the forest...

「うん、ビスクドールの様なエリカさん」「そ、その表現は少し気恥ずかしいから止めてくれない？」"Yes, the bisque-doll-like Erika" "Th-that expression is a little embarrassing, could you stop using it?"





「とすると石造り？」「一般的なＲＣ造よ」"So it's built from stone?" "It's ordinary reinforced concrete."
彼女はアイススケートをしていてしりもちをついた。While skating at the ice rink she fell on her rear.
ここ数ヶ月間、アメリカの金融政策は信用の引き締めで特徴づけられている。Monetary policy in United States has been characterized by tight credit over the months.
マラソン競技に初めには、何十人もの選手が出発するが、ゴールまでくるのはごく一部の選手であり、優勝するのはたった一人である。At the beginning of a marathon race, scores of runners start, but only a few finish and just one takes the cake.
ホラー映画を観ると私は鳥肌がたってしまう。I get goose bumps when I see a horror movie.
そして、つい先日迄、暗い感じだったのに、どこにもかしこにも花、花、花。Then, although it was dreary up to the other day, everywhere were flowers, flowers, flowers.
自宅を改築する際に、この部屋にだけ防音設備と内鍵を付けたんだ。When my home had an extension built I only had this room fitted with soundproofing and an internal lock.
オラ気分が良くなったで。でもよ、おとうさんに滅茶苦茶怒られちまうと思うべさ。I feel a lot better now, but I know Dad's going to be real upset.
数字を足したり引いたりという面倒臭い仕事も一旦始めてしまえば、それはそれで面白さがあるものだよ。Once you go ahead and start, even the tiresome work of adding and subtracting figures is interesting in its way.

とある映画を文庫化した―いや、映画の為に書かれたシナリオを小説として加筆修正し、日本語にローカライズしたものだ。A certain movie was novelized - rather it was a scenario written for a movie that was expanded as a novel and localized to Japanese.
柔らかいウールの方が粗いウールより高価で、そのどちらともナイロン製の人工繊維より上等である。Soft wool is more expensive than coarse wool and both are superior to synthetics made of nylon.







先日、パソコンショップでＳＩＭＭの掴み取りをやっていた。いくらなんでもマニアックすぎる。I grabbed as much SIMM as possible in the computer shop the other day. Say what you like, it was more than just enthusiasm.
防音設備が施されプライベートを重視したゲストルームです。It's a guest room equipped with soundproofing with an emphasis on privacy.
二つ折りにしたクッションを枕代わりに、僕はフローリングの上にカーペットを敷いただけの固い床へと横になる。Using a doubled-up cushion in place of a pillow I lie down on the hard wooden floor with nothing but a carpet spread over it.



防音設備が施されプライベートを重視したゲストルームです。It's a guest room equipped with soundproofing with an emphasis on privacy.


誰がカラオケ・バーを発明したのですか。Who invented karaoke bars?

















もし困った事があればユーザーズガイドにあたってください。Refer to the Users' Guide if you have any problems.
ただ相手の立場にたって考え感じることができる能力を養いさえすればよいのです。All you have to do is to cultivate the ability to put yourself in the other fellow's place.















































































国境なき医師団を設立したベルナール・クシュネルはイラク戦争に反対しなかった。Bernard Kouchner, who established Medecins Sans Frontieres, did not oppose the Iraq war.













俺、早食いなんだ。I'm a fast eater.





何とも言いようがないなあ。I just don't know what to say.


あの少年たちは若さがあふれんばかりだ。Those boys are in the first flush of youth.








賽は投げられた。The die is cast.


























僕高卒だからそのぶん高校の問題とか出来る。I'm a high school graduate so I am that much able to answer high school problems and such.

わざわざ彼を訪ねて行かなくてもよい。Don't bother to call on him.あなたは明日、車がなくてもいいかしら。私、車が必要なの。Can you do without the car tomorrow? I need it.
私たちは暗くならないうちにテントを張った。We set up our tents before dark.

私は６時に起床することにしている。I make a practice of getting up at six.
明日彼とその事を話し合うことになっている。I am to talk over the matter with him tomorrow.
私たちはそこへ行くよりほかなかった。We had no choice but to go there.コーヒーは、熱すぎて少しずつ飲むほかなかった。I had to sip the coffee because it was too hot.
彼女がパーティーで私を見かけたはずがない。She cannot have seen me at the party.

笑いすぎて、顎がはずれそうになった。I was laughing so hard I nearly dislocated my jaw.
己をもって他人を律するな。Don't judge others by yourself.
推理小説には全く関心がありません。I have not the least interest in detective stories.人は健康には気をつけねばならない。One should take care of oneself.数学は私には難しい。Mathematics is difficult for me.
















































私、もうアッタマにきたので、大声で叫びたいし、あらゆるものをぶっこわしたいわ！I'm so mad I want to scream and break everything!


水を加え、練り粉がどろどろしない程度に混ぜなさい。Add water and mix to a firm dough.































体温上昇、脈拍上昇・・・酸素欠乏状態です。Body temperature rising, pulse rising ... he's in a state of oxygen deficiency.
さて。その言葉に信を置いてよいものやら。Well now. Are those words to be trusted I wonder?





















私はステーキはミディアムウェルが好きです。I like my steak cooked medium well.




































私がこの前なくした時計は新品だった。The watch I lost the other day was new.この前京都を訪れたのはいつでしたか。When did you visit Kyoto last?


私たちは映画に行くんですよ。一緒においでなさい。We are going to the movies. Come with us.

通い妻とは名前の通り、妻が夫の元に通う結婚形態の事である。A 'commuting wife' is just what the name says, it's a form of marriage where the wife travels to her husband's side.








そして、宮の中に、牛や羊や鳩を売るもの達と両替人達が座っているのをご覧になった。In the temple courts he found men selling cattle, sheep and doves, and others sitting at tables.









食べなさい、おなかがへっているのでしょう。Eat, for you are hungry.
































ザ・ベストテンにランクインした曲を全て紹介します！We introduce you to the entire line up of songs that made it into The Best Ten.

上司との会話やレポートは超訳した普通の言葉で綴るのです。Conversations with the management, reports and such should be very freely interpreted into normal language.












































ジョンの両親は彼の乗った飛行機が定刻どおりだと聞いてほっとしているようだった。John's parents seemed relieved to hear that his plane was on time.




がばっと気合を入れて身を起こした。I sprang out of bed.
人はパンのみにて生きるにあらず、と聖書に書いてある。It says in the Bible, "Man shall not live on bread alone."
最も効果の高いサンスクリーンはどれですか。What's your strongest type of sunscreen?


その会社はニューモデルの発表会を明日行う。The company will hold a presentation of the new model tomorrow.


部長が、すごいハイスペック・マシン買ったそうよ。The supervisor bought a really fast machine.


よかれと思ってしたことがあだとなった。It backfired on me despite my good intentions.


奴ら仕事が何ととろくさいんだ！They're doing their work at a snail's pace!







































厳密に言うと、あなたは間違ってるね。Strictly speaking, you are wrong.



彼らは男を逮捕すべく追いかけた。They chased the man to arrest him.


ニクソンはウォーターゲート事件に関し、黙秘権を行使して無視しようとしたが、結局明るみにでた。Nixon tried to stonewall through Watergate by ignoring it, but it didn't work.
組合の指導者たちは賃上げ要求をあおりたてた。The leaders of the Union agitated for higher wages.

スープがとろっとするまで煮つめてください。Boil the soup down until it becomes thick.
サムは学校のバスケットチームに入ることができた。Sam made the school basketball team.
このテレビショーは子供向けだ。This TV show is aimed at children.












「マナカの絵、見して」「えーー、恥ずかしいですよー」"Lemme see your painting, Manaka." "Must you? It's embarrassing!"


私は、その泥棒をほんのちらっと見ただけです。I only got a glimpse of the thief.
ちょっとした幸運が予期せぬ成功につながるときもある。A little bit of luck sometimes leads to an unexpected success.








だってお隣さんだし。ちょくちょくお邪魔するから。Well, we're neighbours. I'll be popping over all the time.

ただ会釈をするだけなのに、妙にしゃちほこ張ってしまった。It was just a simple greeting, but somehow I got strangely tense.

整えられた長机、いくつかのパイプ椅子、壁の掲示板にはカレンダーとプリント数枚が張られている。There were long desks lined up, several pipe chairs, and stuck on the bulletin board were a calendar and several printouts.
「おい。走ると危ないぞ」「え？・・・わっ、わ、うわわ〜〜〜っ」「あーあー、言わんこっちゃない」"Hey! It's dangerous to run here." "Eh? ... A-a-Aaah!!" "Oh dear, what did I tell you?"


私はホットコーヒーに氷を入れるのが好きです。大抵熱すぎるので。I like to put an ice cube into my coffee, because it's usually too hot.


彼は迫害者を懲らしめて人民たちのあだを討つだろう。He will avenge the people on their oppressor.彼は死んだ父のかたきを討った。He avenged his dead father.
笑いで誤魔化すと、亜美さんはさも不機嫌そうに眉を寄せた。Ami frowned in a very un-amused way as I brushed her off with a laugh.
特に、調和平均の実際の使用例としては、「平均速度」が主に取り上げられ、説明がそこで終わってしまうのが通例である。In particular, it is customary for actual examples of use of the harmonic mean to generally cover "average speed," and explain no further than that.
彼はいつも噂をかぎ回っていますよ。He's always anxious to pick up gossip.






彼は近所の人々より社会的に一段上だ。He is a cut above his neighbors.
バスは２分早かった。The bus was two minutes early.













会ったばかりの患者の下の世話をするのは大変なお仕事だ。Taking care of the excretory needs of a patient you've just met is a very demanding job.




















うちのかみさんは元プロレスラーで、だからもし私が浮気をしているところを見つかりでもしようものなら、それこそコテンパンにやられてしまうよ。My wife used to be a pro-wrestler, so if she ever catches me two-timing her, I'd be beaten to a pulp.



車の速度を落とす装置（ハンプや狭さく）について、意見があったら書いてください。If you have any opinions concerning traffic calming devices (humps, curb extensions, etc.) please write them.
そのオスざるは生まれつき頭が良い。The male ape is intelligent by nature.





彼らはああいった原始的な道具を使っていた。They used those primitive tools.

私は場末のジャズクラブに行って、ライブミュージックを楽しみます。I like to go to a local jazz club where I can enjoy live music.






















では、CGを作る場合はどのように光源を使用すればよいのであろうか。Then, when you're making CG, how should you use light sources?

ジョーンズ先生はコンピューターサイエンスを教えています。Mrs. Jones is teaching computer science.












自慢じゃないが僕は通知表の家庭科で３以上を取ったことがない。１０段階評価で。I don't want to boast, but I've never gotten better than a 3 on my report card for home economics. Out of 10 that is.






そうじゃない。性差別やら女性蔑視やら、そういうものとは関係なく、男と女は違うんだ。That's not what I mean. Sex discrimination, female discrimination, whatever, men and women are just different.






だが実際は、すべての大発見家は夢想家とみなされてきた。As a matter of fact, all great discoverers have been regarded as dreamers.


この頃私は退屈しのぎに庭造りをしています。I am gardening these days just to kill time.
彼女は３カ国語も話すことができる。She can speak three languages.

あははは、ほんっと、隠し事するのが苦手なんだね〜。A-hahaha, you really are bad at keeping secrets.
「ここ、覚えてる？」「集団登校の待ちあわせ場所だな」"Remember here?" "It's where we gathered for going to school in groups."
整えられた長机、いくつかのパイプ椅子、壁の掲示板にはカレンダーとプリント数枚が張られている。There were long desks lined up, several pipe chairs, and stuck on the bulletin board were a calendar and several printouts.











二度寝しないのっ！Don't go back to sleep!
午後ひと泳ぎしよう。Let's have a swim in the afternoon.
比較的難しいジグソーだと感じました。I felt it was a relatively difficult jigsaw puzzle.
私は大阪までのオープンチケットを持っています。I have an open ticket to Osaka.
最新の報告書には、全世界で密輸されているコカインの９０％が海路で運ばれており、そのほとんどがスピードボートによるものだと記されている。In the latest report, it is written that 90% of all the cocaine smuggled in the world is transported by sea, and most of that by speedboat.
フロントローラーのスラスト角は２度、多分レース時にはもう少し角度を強める予定です。The front-roller thrust angle is 2 degrees, probably there were plans to strengthen that angle a little when racing.

「状況報告を」「現在目標は目視４。最大７か。小口径火器を所有」"Situation report." "At present 4 in sight. At most probably 7. Holding small calibre arms."
「状況報告を」「現在目標は目視４。最大７か。小口径火器を所有」"Situation report." "At present 4 in sight. At most probably 7. Holding small calibre arms."

彼女の仕事は高収入である。Her job brings in a high income.
私はほとんど毎日お風呂に入ります。I take a bath almost every day.










彼、一気呵成に書き上げたと言ってたけど、この提案書、少し雑だね。He said he dashed this proposal off in one sitting. It's pretty sloppy.



あいつは口ばかりで、誠意がないね。巧言令色少なし仁とはよくいったもんだ。They say fine words are no virtue if they're insincere and that's him in a nutshell. He's all talk but doesn't mean a word of it.














３０年ぶりにクラス会があった。There was a class reunion after 30 years.




それは高レベルの集中力を必要とする種類の仕事だ。It's the sort of work that calls for a high level of concentration.
この高湿度のせいで、私は疲れた感じがする。This high humidity makes me feel tired.



「まあ、それでも君よりは、はるかに僕の方が点数高いけどね」「なんですって！私が本気を出せば、あなたなんて、目じゃないわ！」"Well, even so my score is far above yours isn't it?" "What did you say!? If I was to go all out you'd be as nothing to me!"

十字キーを上へ！するとＢＧＭが変わり、背景は魔王の居城へ・・・。Hit up on the D-pad, and the background music will change as the background itself becomes the Demon King's castle....
十字キーを上へ！するとＢＧＭが変わり、背景は魔王の居城へ・・・。Hit up on the D-pad, and the background music will change as the background itself becomes the Demon King's castle....





うるさいなっ！少しの頭痛くらい我慢しろ。余は魔力がすっからかんだ。それもこれも姫のせいだぞ。Shurrup! Don't make such a fuss over a little headache. I'm flat out of magical power - this is all your fault!
彼女が白目をむいています。Her eyes are rolled back.













ウェブサイトのタグラインは、その企業が何を行っていて、競合他社とどこが違うのかがわかるようなものでなくてはならない。The website's tagline has to let people know what that business does and how it differs from the competition.














ウェブサイトのタグラインは、その企業が何を行っていて、競合他社とどこが違うのかがわかるようなものでなくてはならない。The website's tagline has to let people know what that business does and how it differs from the competition.






















コスト高で商売を続けていくことが難しくなった。High costs made it hard to carry on his business.





講師は一息入れてから、また話し続けた。The speaker paused and then went on talking again.

窓をしめるようおねがいできますか。May I ask you to close the window?
そのちっちゃな女の子は手に人形を持っている。The little girl has a doll in her hands.
できればやりたいんだけどね。今週はセイリングのレッスンがあるんだ。I would if I could, but I'm taking sailing lessons this week.

明日から５連休だから、みんなルンルン気分だね。Everybody is in a good mood looking forward to the five-day holiday that starts tomorrow.






二人は幸せに暮らしました。めでたしめでたし。They lived happily ever after.






「なにかのユニフォーム？」「そ！あたし、フィールドホッケーやってるから」"Is that some sort of uniform?" "Oh right, it's because I play field hockey."








私にとって子供たちは目の中に入れてもいたくないほどかわいいのです。My children are very precious to me.


iTunesのＭＰ３エンコーダは音質が悪いって本当？Is it true that the iTunes' MP3 encoder has poor sound quality?
ＭＰ３プレーヤーがほしい！I want an MP3 player!






椅子に横たわる私に、歯科衛生士の女性が「はい、お口を開けてください」と言ったのです。The woman dental hygienist said to me, lying down in the chair, "Right, please open your mouth."
いずれは手をつけなければならないだろう。I suppose I've got to get my feet wet sometime.手を付けずダラダラしているくせに、「うへー、今度こそ間に合わないかも！？」と心はビクビクしている。Despite having lazed around without having touched my work I'm frightened at heart that "Ooh-er, this time I might really not get done in time!?"州知事は黒い金に手をつけました。The governor took the money out of a slush fund.




宿の主人は召使い達にがなりたてた。The landlord barked at his servants.


















「いやー、今日も暑いね」「また当たり障りのない話を振ってきたわね」"Well, it's hot again today, isn't it?" "That's one more time you've started with a bland topic."















社会の窓、開いてますよ。Your fly's open.
私はお姉ちゃんの夕飯をラップに包んでしまわないと。I have to wrap my sister's dinner in cling film.ママ〜！あのお姉ちゃんとお兄ちゃん、お手手繋いで、すっごく仲良しさんだね〜！Mama! That lady and man are holding hands, they're great friends aren't they!
彼はかっとなりやすい。He is subject to fits of anger.

秀、食べすぎだよ。デブるぞ。Shu, you're eating too much. You'll get fat!

悪質な迷惑電話、ワンギリにご注意！！Beware of 'One Ring' malicious nuisance calls!!
兄が急逝したのは２年前、義姉は一人兄の遺した小さな宝飾店を健気に守ってきた。Since my brother died suddenly two years ago, my sister-in-law has valiantly kept going the small jewellery store he left her.

彼はすました顔をしていますね。He's keeping a straight face.







小学校のときから、酸性・アルカリ性という性質をリトマス紙で調べたりしてきていますね。Since primary school we've been checking for the qualities known as acidity and alkalinity with litmus paper.
調節レバーを上に上げると座面の高さを調節できます。You can adjust the seat height by moving the adjustment lever up.














マイクロファイバークロスは、髪の毛の１００分の１という細さの繊維で編みあげられたクロスです。Microfibre cloth is cloth woven from fibres as narrow as a hundredth of the width of a hair.
マイクロファイバークロスは、髪の毛の１００分の１という細さの繊維で編みあげられたクロスです。Microfibre cloth is cloth woven from fibres as narrow as a hundredth of the width of a hair.








彼女は彼が精一杯のおめかしをしてきたのを見て、ウフッと笑った。When she saw the lengths he'd gone to to get all dressed up, she couldn't help letting a brief chuckle escape.

彼は眠っている間大きないびきをかいていた。While sleeping, he snored loudly.トムが授業中にいびきを掻いているのが聞こえました。I heard Tom snoring during the class.
この石けんはすばらしく泡だちがいい。This soap makes a lot bubbles.















それを聞いてはらわたが煮えくり返った。It made my blood boil to hear that.


























これは浜辺で撮った妻のスナップ写真です。This is a snapshot of my wife on the beach.
カキコ苦手なんです。I'm not good at posting stuff online.

皆さんネチケットはしっかり。Everyone, please keep to netiquette.


















その先生は生徒にぜんぜんにらみがきかない。The teacher has no authority with his students.
「そろそろ、人物写真でもやってみたらどうだ？」「え？スナップ・・・ですか？それは・・・」"Isn't it about time you tried photographing people or something?" "Eh? Snapshots? I don't know ..."
彼の提案は話にならない。His proposal is not worth talking about.

これは英国製のコーヒーカップです。This is a coffee cup made in England.























そのコップにはひびが入っている。There is a crack in the glass.















































そんなんじゃいつまで経っても奨励賞止まりだぞ？With that sort of attitude you'll never get past the honourable-mention prizes.


やってしまったことは取り返しがつかない。What is done cannot be undone.
あんな人種差別の発言をするなんて、あの政治家も取り返しのつかないことを口にしたものだ。That politician put his foot in his mouth when he made those racist comments.




















ボストンへの乗り継ぎ便に乗りたいんです。I want to get a connecting flight to Boston.










じゃあ２人乗りを許してやるからお前漕げ、俺が荷台に乗るから。Well then I'll allow two on a bike, but you pedal, because I'll ride on the rack.




















７月１日から仕事を始めます。I will start working on July the first.


家具の中には、にかわづけで組み立てられているものもある。Some furniture is put together with glue.
義男は新しいバスケットシューズに１万５千円も払うといったが、私はそれは高すぎると思いました。Yoshio said he would pay as much as 15,000 yen for a new pair of basketball shoes, but I thought that was quite expensive.



「宝くじでも買う？」「俺、ギャンブル運とか無さそうだしなぁ」"Buy a lottery ticket or something?" "Well, I don't think I've got much luck with gambling."
要するにタイマン勝負なんだけど、その試合内容は常人では考えられないほどの高レベル。Essentially it's a one-to-one match, but the content of that match is a level so high as to be unthinkable to an ordinary person.









ポール、8冊までなら借りられるからね。Paul, we can borrow up to 8 books.
























車で後ろから追突された時首がガクッとなりました。My neck snapped when my car was hit from behind.










































































足を棒にして探しても、気に入るものがありませんでした。Even walking till my legs turned to lead I couldn't find one that I liked.





キーンコーン・・・カーンコーン・・・「うわ、まずい。本鈴だ！」Bing-bong ... bing-bong ... "Oh-oh. The class bell!"
早足でついていく２匹の犬をすぐ後に従えて、彼は急いで歩き去った。He walked quickly away with two dogs trotting at his heels.
私の大好きな音楽はポップミュージックだ。My favorite music is pop music.
クラブ活動は毎日ありますか。Is there practice every day?



































































勤務中なのに職員の目を盗んでインターネットに耽溺する。Even during work, I secretly indulge my Internet addiction.




















ダウ平均は３５ポイント下がって底をつきました。The Dow plunged 35 points and then bottomed out.





















最新の３ヶ月で純利益が過去最高記録となっています！Net profit for the last three months is a new record high!







我々は抵抗か隷属かの二者択一を迫られている。We are faced with the alternatives of resistance or slavery.

霜は農作物に悪影響を及ぼしました。The frost had a bad effect on the crops.

























財界では、法案提出断念に反発を強めているそうだ。In the financial world opposition is apparently increasing against the withdrawal of the proposed bill.
インドは地域色豊かな食文化があります。India has a cuisine rich in regional flavour.

スージーは物事を水に流すことができない性分だ。Susie is so constituted that she cannot forgive and forget things.
その問題は私の専門外だ。The problem is outside my field.
それは私の研究外のことです。It is outside my area of study.
死んだフリして難をのがれたそうです。He says he avoided the danger by playing dead.




























スペインはオレンジがたくさん採れる。Spain is abundant in oranges.
この川で捕れる魚はみんなおいしい。The fish caught in this river are all nice.








経由地はどこですか。Where does it stop over?



























これは正真正銘の九谷焼です。私が保証いたします。This is genuine Kutani-ware. I guarantee it.
















母が昼食に私達にチーズサンドを作ってくれた。Mother made us cheese sandwiches for lunch.


















でも、仲間たちは志はあっても、資金調達やマネジメントには無知でした。However, although our companions were willing, they knew nothing about management or getting money.


朝起きて、挨拶を交わす相手がいる――久しぶりの感覚だ。To get up in the morning, and there be someone to say good morning to - I haven't had this feeling for a long time.
ファイルへの直リンだけはやめた方がいいです。 URLの最初だけ全角ｈｔｔｐにするとか、ちょっと工夫しよう。It's a good idea to stop using direct links to files. Use a trick like starting the URL with double-width "h t t p" or something.
彼は名目上では首相だが、実際はそうではない。He is prime minister in name, but not in reality.
いいのよ。それより、早く行かないとタイムセール終わっちゃう。Never mind that. More importantly, if we don't go soon the time-limited sales will finish.
ホームズさんはパイプの大の愛用者で、名探偵です。Holmes is a great pipe man as well as a great detective.







このワタクシをさらりと無視するとは良い度胸ですわね。You must have some nerve to ignore _me_.
はがき大のボール紙を５枚用意してください。Prepare five postcard sized pieces of cardboard.
彼女は大の犬嫌いだ。She has great hate for dogs.


ファイルへの直リンだけはやめた方がいいです。 URLの最初だけ全角ｈｔｔｐにするとか、ちょっと工夫しよう。It's a good idea to stop using direct links to files. Use a trick like starting the URL with double-width "h t t p" or something.


全員を敵に回して彼の味方をすることにした。I decided to take his side against the others.






















あんなにおろおろしちゃって恥ずかしいったらありゃしない。馬鹿みたいだったわよ。Shame on you for getting so flustered. You looked ridiculous.

























誰がその電話に出たか知っていますか。Do you know who took the call?





























































行けども行けども、やはり同じ場所をグルグル回っている気がしてならない。The further I went the more irresistible became the feeling that I was going round and round in circles.


秘密はもうすっかり知れ渡っているよ。The cat is well out of the bag.




















































正直じいさんは、金持ちになった。The honest old man became rich.






その男は彼女の顔に煙をぷっと吹きかけた。The man puffed smoke into her face.








ジョンとメアリーはお互いに愛し合っていました。John and Mary loved each other.




ヤンマがすいすいと水の上を進んでいた。The dragonfly was skimming across the water.
































ピアニストのバッハ弾きが減っているのではないか。Haven't Bach-playing pianists become less common of late?








































































政府に方針を変えさせるのは出来ない相談だ。It's like pulling teeth to ask the government to change their policy.
消費者の米離れや国際市場解放が原因とされる米価の下落が原因だ。It is the drop in the rice pricing (blamed on consumers' loss of interest in rice and the freeing up of the international market) that is the cause.


























































ここへお電話くだされば、連絡がとれます。You can reach me at this number.







この内大事なのは第二目の観点である。Among these views, the second one is of importance.


彼の絵は二科展に入選した。His picture was accepted for the Nika Exhibition.






隠れキャラも登場予定？開発元に聞く。Are there to be hidden characters as well? We ask the developers.


















我々は太陽エネルギーや原子エネルギーのような新しい資源を開発しつつある。We are exploring new sources, such as solar and atomic energy.






山道で迷って、ヘロヘロに疲れて家にたどり着いた。I arrived home, thoroughly worn out, after getting lost in the mountain paths.










売春宿から出てきたところを友人に見られてばつが悪かった。As I left the brothel, I was embarrassed to be seen by my friends.
熱力学の背後には、第１巻で学んだ力学の法則にしたがう原子や分子の運動があります。Behind thermodynamics lie the movements of atoms and molecules following the laws of motion learned in the first volume.
























自分の責任を認めて自腹をきりなさい。You have to dig down and pay for it.
「お先に失礼しま〜す」「お、なんだ、また定時上がりかよ」"Bye, see you tomorrow." "Oh, what's this? Leaving on the dot again?"

ハッキリ言って、この「陰謀説」はナンセンスだと思う。To be frank, I think this 'conspiracy theory' is nonsense.

投稿一覧の下の凡例を見て原因が分かりました。When I looked at the explanatory notes under the posts list I realized what was causing it.




天文学者が局部超銀河団の存在を推定しました。Astronomers inferred the existence of a local supercluster.

十八禁なので要注意！WARNING - 18+ ONLY.

お待たせしました。お子様セットとクリームソーダです。Thank you for waiting. One kid's meal and an ice cream soda.









彼は今までに９体の人型ロボットを製造していたが、その全てはデモンストレーションモデルだった。Up to now he had made nine humanoid robots but they were all demonstration models.









彼は自分のお金に関しては非常にけちだ。He is very mean with his money.
































その物音で読書の気をそらされた。That sound distracted my attention from reading.
話をそらすなよ。Don't change the subject.



在留届に変更があったり、未だに変更届を提出されていない方は、至急提出頂きますようお願いします。We ask that those who have had a change to their residence report and have not yet submitted a change report please do so as quickly as possible.

在留届に変更があったり、未だに変更届を提出されていない方は、至急提出頂きますようお願いします。We ask that those who have had a change to their residence report and have not yet submitted a change report please do so as quickly as possible.

構いませんよ。いつもの夜酒です。たまにはパートナーがいるのもいいものでしょう。I'm not bothered. It's just my usual nightcap. Having someone to drink with on occasion might be nice.





















別にブルマに特別な関心があるわけじゃない。そういうフェティシズムはない、と思う。It's not like I've got any special interest in gym shorts - I've not got that fetish, I think.























































あなたは別として、我々は皆貧しい。Apart from you, we are all poor.
後ろ指を指されるようなことなど、決してしていないよ。I've never done the kind of thing people would talk about behind my back.
国家を挙げて貧困との闘いに取り組んでいる。The whole nation is waging a war against poverty.









夫との間に波風が立つのが恐くて、愛人の存在は知らない振りをしています。I'm afraid of discord arising with my husband so I'm turning a blind eye to his mistress.
彼女は彼がほかの女の子と歩いているのを見て焼きもちをやいた。It made her jealous to see him walking with another girl.


「なに、アンタ疑ってんの」「だ、だってそんな、いきなり魔界とか魔族とか、信じろという方がおかしいよ」"What? Are you doubting us?" "B-but, that is, suddenly 'spirit world', 'magical beings' - it's strange to ask me to believe."
















私のガーメントバッグはみつからないのです。I can't find my garment bag.

私は時々機嫌が悪くなる。I'm sometimes in a bad temper.
うちの社長は今日とても機嫌がいい。My boss is very cheerful today.
三郎はテーブルの上に出されたおやつをガッと取った。Saburo snatched up all the snacks that were sitting on the table.
彼はボディビルが趣味というだけあって体がガシッとしている。Bodybuilding is his hobby so he has a very firm tight body with lots of muscle definition.
彼女の言い方は私の神経を尖らせる。Her manner of speaking gets on my nerves.



そこはとても深くて、私には背がたたなかった。The water there was so deep that I could not touch bottom.


彼女はロングブーツを履いている。She was wearing long boots.

自分の目耳で見聞きしていないものは、本当かもしれないが、本当ではないかもしれない。What you don't see and hear with your own ears and eyes might be true, but it might also not be true.
車は草地に飛び込み、しばらくガクンガクンと走って止まったのです。The car dove into the field and, after bumping along for a time, came to a halt.






君はできる限り早く家に帰った方がいい。You'd better go home as soon as possible.

「じゃ留年しなかったら付き合ってくれんの？」「タラレバ話って好きじゃないの」"So, you'll go out with me if I don't have to repeat a year?" "I don't care for 'what if' stories."


「お見事、よくやった」と小川選手を褒め称える報道が多かった。There were many journalists who praised Ogawa with, "bravo, good show!"






















イースト菌がパン生地を膨らます。Yeast makes dough rise.




その中毒者は麻薬の過剰摂取で死んだ。The addict died from a drug overdose.




その中毒者は麻薬の過剰摂取で死んだ。The addict died from a drug overdose.













彼は自分のやった誤りを気にやんだ。He brooded over the mistake he made.










彼女はちょっと首をかしげて、黙然と立っていた。She stood silently, her head tilted slightly to one side.
















































個体発生は系統発生を繰り返す。Ontogeny recapitulates phylogeny.






















































































































彼は自分の失敗を運の悪さのせいにしている。He ascribes his failure to bad luck.
新進作家の登場でその老作家は影の薄い存在となった。With the appearance of a promising new writer, the aging novelist fell from prominence.














あいつは我の強いやつだ。He is a self-willed fellow.












それはずいぶん気の長い話だ。It's a very slow business.









あいつは口のうまいやつだ。He has a smooth tongue.
あいつは口の悪いやつだ。He has a sharp tongue.











世界が一丸となって気候変動の問題に取り組む必要がある。The whole world needs to tackle the problem of climate change together.





























護教論には興味ないんだ。I'm not interested in apologetics.












アフィ狙いの釣り記事ですね。英語関係のコミュのあちこちにマルチポストしています。It's a troll trying for click-throughs. It's being multiposted in English-related communities all over the place.
















うそをついたことで気がとがめている。I feel guilty about having told a lie.



































































































サミットって、主要国首脳会議のことなんですか？By summit, do you mean the Group of Seven?

























英語話者に通じなきゃ意味ないぞ。That means nothing if English speakers don't understand it.













「くだらねえ都市伝説だろう」「でも、火のないところに煙は立たないというけどね」"Probably just a stupid urban legend." "But they do say 'there's no smoke without fire', don't they?"
















































































どっちに主眼をおくかでどちらでもいいでしょ。Depending on which you think of as the main point, either is OK.


















































「背が伸びて入らないわよね」「そう、断じて太ったわけではない！」「成長したという便利な言葉は我々の切り札」"We've got taller so they don't fit." "Right, it's certainly not that we've got fat!" "The useful phrase 'grown up' is our trump card."

























































新しい遺跡で未発掘はいくつだったのですか。How many new sites were uncovered?







彼女は取り入れやりんごつみをみました。She watched the harvest gathered and the apples picked.
























































































































そして粘土を指の間で滑らせるの。Now, just let the clay slide between your fingers.
三番目の、そしてもっとも重要な考えは、再入ということである。The third and most important idea is that of reentry.














何ならジョージの職場に電話をして、すぐ帰宅してお前を手伝うようにと伝えようかい。In fact, I'll even call George at the office and tell him he ought to come home and help out.























































































































































マウスとキーボードを行ったりきたりするのが煩雑なので、キーボードのみで操作できるようショートカットキーはないのでしょうか？It's a fiddle going to and fro between the keyboard and mouse so are there shortcuts to allow operation using only the keyboard?
風はそよとも吹かなかった。There was not a breath of air.








あなたはもう推薦図書を読み終えましたか。Have you finished the suggested reading?



































進行形の文では、動詞のing形、つまり現在分詞となります。In a progressive tense sentence it becomes the -ing form verb, that is the present participle.






「宝くじでも買う？」「俺、ギャンブル運とか無さそうだしなぁ」"Buy a lottery ticket or something?" "Well, I don't think I've got much luck with gambling."
それは抜け目のないやり方だった。That was a nifty way of doing it.
トムは誠実というより抜け目がない。Tom is more clever than honest.














トムはもう３時間もの間、眠りにつこうと悪戦苦闘しています。Poor Tom's been trying to get to sleep for three hours now.
床につくとすぐに彼は眠りにおちた。On going to bed, he fell asleep.





このカーペットは足ざわりが良い。This carpet feels nice.
彼は書類に署名せざるを得なかった。He was forced to sign the document.
彼は妹に素敵なペン皿を作ってあげた。He made his sister a nice pen tray.





護教論には興味ないんだ。I'm not interested in apologetics.






その土地はローンダリングした政治資金で購入されました。The property was purchased with laundered political money.
彼女の声は私の神経にさわった。Her voice set my nerves on edge.
彼の当てこすりはかんにさわる。His sarcasm galls me.
フレッドには忍耐心というものがまるでないから、彼のカンシャク玉を破裂させるのはわけもない。Fred has very little patience, and it doesn't take much to make him fly off the handle.














お腹を空かせたその男は、食物をむさぼり食った。The starving man devoured the food.
彼とは一度腹を割って話したいと思っています。I want to talk frankly with him.私たちはお互いに腹を割った話し合いをした。We had a heart-to-heart talk with each other.
彼女は戸口と窓をさし錠で締めた。She bolted the doors and windows.
この自転車に油をさしなさい。Oil this bicycle.




























































































































入国カードの記入の仕方を教えてください。Please tell me how to fill out the disembarkation card.


















土日月の午前１０時半から午後４時まで開館。Open from 10:30am to 4pm on Sat, Sun, and Mon.





辞任劇は来るべき徴兵事務にはさして影響はないであろう。The resignations would have little or no effect on upcoming indications.

結局のところ、物価は上がるものだ。In the long run, prices will rise.















































ああでも安心してくれ。オレ、ノンケのコには手を出さないから。Oh, but don't worry. I don't put the moves on straight guys.








彼女がどうしてその犯罪に及んだかという動機については、いまだによくわかりません。They still haven't been able to work out quite what her motive was for resorting to crime.


超高圧水の噴射により、ほとんどの詰まりが排除される。By means of a super high-pressure water spray practically all the sediment is removed.
その機嫌の悪い男は自分の娘にがみがみいった。The bad-tempered man snapped at his daughter.










それは残酷な運命の極めつけの例である。It's a perfect example of cruel fate.











この仕事は私の期待にかなうものだ。This job fulfils my expectations.
この新しいバス便は住民の要求にかなうでしょう。This new bus service will meet the residents' needs.
彼女は私の意にかなった女性です。She is the woman of my desires.













私達は彼女の家にいって、そこでクリスマスパーティーをしました。We visited her house, where we had a Christmas party.


仮定法過去の場合ｂｅ動詞はすべてｗｅｒｅになるんだよ？With the subjunctive past all the 'be' verbs become 'were', OK?
彼は３０歳になってから絵をかき始めた。He didn't start to paint until he was thirty.
このカーワックスは大雨にも長持ちする保護となります。This car wax gives permanent protection against heavy rain.
私はカードゲームがしたい。I want to play cards.
ジョージは私にバースデイカードを送ってくれた。George sent me a birthday card.
なるほど、言われてみれば確かに、田中さんは模擬戦で一度も被弾していませんでしたね。Of course. Now that you say that, certainly Ms Tanaka wasn't shot even once in the mock battles.

































彼女は人がいい。She is good-natured.
その習慣はアメリカンインディアンによってはじめられた。That custom originated with the American Indians.

どうあってもあなたをお助けできません。I cannot possibly help you.
ふふふ、ごめんあそばせ。気になさらないで下さいな！Ha-ha-ha, pray forgive me. Please don't worry yourself about that!



















彼は、しばしば、無駄骨を折る。He often goes off on wild goose chases.


























もしそれをするつもりならば、よいスタートをきらなければならない。If you are to do it, you must make a good start.
私はまだビジネスレターを書く事に慣れていない。I'm not used to writing a business letter, yet.
貴族に列せられた。He was created a peer.
フライトのリコンファームをお願いします。I'd like to reconfirm my flight.







彼らはプロサッカー選手になった。They became professional soccer players.

彼は私のところへひょいひょい訪ねてきた。He often dropped in on me.
私の妻はひどく猫嫌いです。My wife really hates cats.










有料会員専用のコミュに入会出来る特典があります。There's the perk of letting you join communities for paying members.



あなたは私が信用できるたった一人の人です。You're the only person that I can trust.

薬缶がシュンシュンいうまで待ちなさい。Wait till the kettle begins to sing.









多くの言語で辞書形の語尾が決まっており、日本語ではう段の文字で終わる。In many languages the way dictionary-form words end is fixed; in Japanese they end in a 'u row' character.


多くの言語で辞書形の語尾が決まっており、日本語ではう段の文字で終わる。In many languages the way dictionary-form words end is fixed; in Japanese they end in a 'u row' character.




彼のめがねにかなう女性はいなかった。No woman could measure up to his standard.




我々はその夜、ロードサイドパークで寝た。We bedded down at the roadside park for the night.
彼は先月、スピーチコンテストで優勝したそうだ。He is said to have won the speech contest last month.
その会社は新しいコンピューターシステムを購入した。The company has purchased a new computer system.





























「刀の投擲の練習？」「すっぽ抜けただけです」"Practising sword throwing?" "It just slipped out of my hands."
彼女は大変気前がいい。She is very free with her money.
ついさっき夕立に遭った。I was caught in a shower just now.




貴君に、この統合軍の指揮をとってもらいたい。We want you to take command of this unified force.




















小中学生なんて、まだまだ善悪の見分けも、現実と仮想の見分けもつかない。Elementary and primary school children don't yet know good from evil or reality from fiction.





























天才はなすべきことをなし、芸能者は出来ることをする。Genius does what it must, and talent does what it can.
彼は敵対者にさえ新しい経済計画に同意させた。He got even his opponents to agree to the new economic plan.
父は私を男や女としてではなく、演技者として訓練しました。My father trained me not as a man or a woman, but as a performer.

道という道は川から溢れだした水で覆われていた。Anything like a road was covered with water that had flooded out of the river.
１９世紀末になって初めて植物の品種改良は科学の一分野となった。Not until the end of the nineteenth century, did plant breeding become a scientific discipline.
















日本は火山列島だ。Japan is made up of volcanic islands.


聖者は爪先立ちでガンジスを渡った。The holy man tiptoed his way across the Ganges.



人は見掛けによらぬもの。Men are not always what they seem to be.



テレビはスポーツファンに一層大きな便宜を与える、という長所を持っている。Television has the advantage of providing sports fans with greater convenience.
彼女はそのパーティードレスを試着した。She tried on the party dress.
この近くにゴルフコースはありますか。Is there a golf course near here?
相手チームのベースラインの向こう側にボールを持って行こうとするためには、選手から選手へとボールを投げなければならなかったのです。The players had to throw the ball from one to another to try to get the ball over the other team's baseline.
使用人がしらは声を上げて「スミスご夫妻がおいでになりました」と告げた。The butler announced Mr. and Mrs. Smith.



「すべき」というのは、現在形で書かれている論文も散見されるからです。I say "should", because theses written in the present tense are still seen around and about.


帰り道で道草を食うんじゃないよ。Don't fool around on your way home.






１０分間、休憩をとりましょう。Let's have a ten-minute break.
私たちが避けて通れない問題がたくさんあります。There are a lot of problems we can't avoid.
彼は両手をこすりあわせた。He rubbed his hands together.

明日、友達の誕生会を開きます。I'm going to give a birthday party for my friend tomorrow.
正直どいつもこいつもパッとしない。Frankly, no one really stands out.
どいつもこいつも不平ばかり言いやがって。All those bastards do is complain.

サーバーがダウンしてて、メールチェックできない。I can't check my mail. The server is down.
フライポテトのラージサイズをください。Large fries, please.
会社は７月に製造されたすべてのベビーフードを回収した。The company recalled all the baby food made in July.
近くの教会からカーンカーンという鐘の音がしてきた。We could hear the donnnng ... donnnng of the church bells nearby.
世の中は俺に何かするべきだファックユー。The world owes me, so fuck you!
全てのホームゲームのためのシーズンパスを買った。I got a season's pass to all the home games.
彼と僕はツーカーの仲だ。We can just about read each other's minds.
彼の批評はまるでローブローだ。His comment hit below the belt.
フランクス陸軍大将がナイト爵位の名誉称号を授かりました。General Franks received an honorary knighthood.
彼の発言が舌戦の火蓋をきったことになった。He opened up the verbal battle.
三つ子の魂百までとは本当によく言ったものだ。'The child is father to the man' is certainly well said.
その老人は子ギツネをわなから放してやった。The old man freed the little fox from the trap.
ロッジはひぎめでかりられる。The lodge rents by the day.




一日中合体しっぱなしだったのでくたくたでごんす。We are worn out, because we have been uniting all day.
これについては「まことに仰る通りでございます」と答えるしかないのです。In connection with this I can only reply, "it is just as you say."


私はその数学の難問に首をひねった。I puzzled over the difficult math problem.
as may be の文法解釈を教えてください。Please explain the grammar of 'as may be'.
このような場合は“現在時制”を使います。We use the present tense for this kind of case.

またアフィ狙いの記事か。Another spam article hoping for click-throughs?
例文は過去進行形の文です。皆さんは進行形を学習するとき、どのように教わりましたか？The example is a past progressive tense sentence. How was everybody taught when they were learning about progressive tense?
時の副詞節(ここではwhen)は、未来のことがらを現在時制で表します。Adverbial time clauses (here 'when') write about the future in the present tense.

これらはどちらも“意志未来”と呼ばれるもので、主語の意図が含まれています。These are both called "future volitional" and include the intent of the subject.
省略は立派な表現技法の一つであり、多くの文法書でも紹介されています。Omission is a perfectly good example of an expression technique, and is brought up in many grammar books.
私はひとりきりで暮らすのはいやだ。I don't want to live all by myself.
彼は一人っきりである。He is alone.
その家で彼女は赤ん坊と二人きりだった。She was alone with her baby in the house.
２人っきりでデート・・もとい、ＯＦＦ会だと思ったけど、そこまで甘くもないよな。So I thought my date, er rather, offline-meeting was going to be just me and her but things aren't that easy.




社会保証がきいてあきれるよ。Social security? Who do they think they're kidding.













トピずれです。すみません。This is off-topic. Sorry.




私はハリウッド映画の商業主義に懸念を抱かずにはいられない。I cannot help but be concerned about the commercialism of Hollywood movies.

お誕生日おめでとう相葉ちゃん！Happy birthday, Miss Aiba!
このクラブはライブバンドですか、ＤＪですか。Is there a live band or a DJ in this club?
今まで人前で泣いたことのなかった二郎が、オンオンと泣き出した。Jiro, who had never cried in front of anyone before, started bawling.

この文は現在完了形です。haveは動詞ではなく、助動詞。This sentence is in the present perfect. 'have' is not a verb, but an auxiliary verb.



昨日彼がぶらっと立ち寄った。He dropped in on me yesterday.
ケリーはぶっ倒れるまで働いた。Kelly worked until he dropped.
今、基本的な分詞構文を教えているのですが、皆さんは以下の分詞構文の訳については、どのように異なる訳し方をされますか？I'm teaching basic participial constructions now, but, with regard to those below, what different ways of translating them would everybody use?











日本では老いも若きも正月を祝います。Young and old in Japan celebrate New Year's Day.
従姉妹にはね、もの凄いボインボインな子がいるんだよ？Among my cousins, you know, there's a girl with the most enormous breasts.


次に私達に犬の世話をする時間があるか今一度考えてみましょう。Next, let us think about whether we have the time to look after a dog.
完全自動詞は補語も目的語もとらない。A complete intransitive verb takes neither complement nor object.



私たちは毎朝散歩することを習慣づけている。We make it a practice to take a walk every morning.
バスには空席がなかったので、私はずっと立ち続けだった。There being no vacant seat in the bus, I kept on standing.






金曜日の銀行は遅じまいだ。The bank shuts late on Fridays.


彼は先生にむかって舌をべろっと出した。He stuck out his tongue at his teacher.
彼は「いやだ」といいたげに首を振った。He shook his head as if to say No.


進行形の文では、動詞のing形、つまり現在分詞となります。In a progressive tense sentence it becomes the -ing form verb, that is the present participle.






































彼は彼女にべたぼれだ。He's deeply attached to her.
シロオニタケは毒菌だけど、存在感があって好きだなあ。Shiroonitake is a poisonous mushroom but it has real presence, and I like it.



























私は彼の口のききかたが嫌いだ。I do not like the way he talks.



風邪を引いて声がかれてしまった。My voice is hoarse from a cold.
このメロン、スカスカじゃないの。だから安かったのか。This melon sounds hollow. Maybe that's why it was so cheap.








ゴキブリは昼間は身をひそめている。Cockroaches hide themselves during the day.
店から家まで、重い荷物をエッサッサと運んだ。I carried the heavy bags back from the store chanting yo-hee-ho all the way home.
この証拠で彼が横領者だということが分かった。This evidence revealed him to be an embezzler.
これらの古雑誌を処分して下さい。Dispose of the old magazines.
いつどこであの古時計を買ったのですか。When and where did you buy that old clock?
勇者にあらずんば美女を得ず。None but the brave deserve the fair.
この本を読んで益するところがあった。I profited from reading this book.


彼女ににらみつけられてぞくっとした。She froze me in her stare.
















肥沃な土壌は豊かな作物を産する。Rich soil yields good crops.

水たまりに足を突っ込んだので、靴がグチョグチョになった。I stepped in a puddle and now my shoes are completely soaked going squish squish squish.

彼女はやむえず一人で行った。She reluctantly went by herself.


見渡す限り人っ子一人見えなかった。As far as the eye could reach, there was no sign of life.

彼女は人気スターとしては無器量で肉付きがよい。She is plain and stout as popular stars go.
その家はペンキの塗り直しが必要だ。That house needs repainting.

彼女は母親の事を話するときはいつもむせび泣きする。She can't talk about her mother without choking up.
君のラジオを僕の自転車と取り替えっこしないか。Will you give me your radio for my bicycle?
ふたをあけた瞬間、ツーンと悪臭が鼻をつく。The instant I open the lid an offensive smell greets my nose.離陸の時って耳がツンとする。Your ears pop when the plane takes off.
その女優はつまらぬ芝居を活気づけた。The actress brought the whole silly play to life.

彼は手を上げてにこっと笑った。He raised his hand and smiled.


君はもう大人なんだから、もっと分別がなくてはいけない。Now that you are grown-up, you ought to know better.
レースに入賞した馬はジョンソン氏のもち馬であった。The horse that won the race was owned by Mr Johnson.








この冬は例年になく雪が多かった。We have had more snow than usual this winter.
ティムの社長はあてにならないもうけ話をティムに約束した。Tim's employer promised him pie-in-the-sky benefits.

水夫は仲間の水夫が力尽きて沈むのを目撃した。A sailor saw his fellow sailor sink from exhaustion.
彼は生粋のパリっ子です。He is a Parisian born and bred.
偽善とは悪徳が徳に対して払う忠順の誓いである。Hypocrisy is the homage that vice pays to virtue.
男の子たちが、私の柿の木になっている熟した実を全部持ち去ってしまった。Some boys made away with all the ripe fruits on my persimmon tree.

彼はある偉大な作家に紹介される栄光に浴した。He had the honor of being presented to a great writer.
このスープはポテポテしてますね。The soup is thick.





きっと合格しなけりゃダメよ。Be sure to pass the exams.
あなたがたの日々が幸せで、そしてホワイトクリスマスでありますように。May your days be happy, and may all your Christmas be white.
麿は雅びな家の生まれでおじゃる。I am descended from a graceful family.


彼女は私のほっぺにちゅっとキスをしてくれた。She gave me a peck on the cheek.
1.5V乾電池を直接触っただけでは感電死することはないでしょう。You're not going to get electrocuted just by directly touching a 1.5V battery.

船は島々の間を見えつ隠れつして縫うように進んで行った。The steamer wound in and out among the islands.

私はほほのこけた女性にあった。I saw a woman with hollow cheeks.







無気味な静けさが彼らの心胆を寒からしめた。The eerie silence struck terror into their hearts.
彼は１日中何も食べてなく、おなかをすかしていた。He hadn't eaten all day long and was very hungry.
うん。前の先生に紹介してもらって、転院したの。Yes. She got an introduction from her old doctor and transferred.


政治の話となると、彼は誰にも増して雄弁になる。When it comes to politics, he is as eloquent as anyone.
彼は満面に笑みをたたえていた。He was all smiles.





この表現は日本語にはない英語の比喩表現として、私は大変気に入っています。This expression has really caught my fancy, as a type of English metaphorical expression not in Japanese.






大量の文書を入力しなきゃならない。I have to type in a really big document.
何か食べるものをください。私はとても腹がすいている。Please give me something to eat. I am so hungry.
水泳中に足がつった。I got a cramp in my leg while swimming.




このハンカチで鼻をかみなさい。Blow your nose with this handkerchief.


ミスタイプです。すみません。It's a typo. Sorry.
















「これを見て」「え？」「バンパーの右側に衝突痕があるわ」"Take a look at this." "Eh?" "There's an impact mark on the right-hand side of the bumper."








その食品の中からコレラ菌が検出された。Cholera germs were found in the food.






これは１日の仕事としては多すぎます。This is too much for a day's work.
相手が悪かったな。He chose the wrong man to pick a fight with.
教育のメルマガを発行したい方はこちら！People who want to put out an ezine on education, come this way!











いやあ面目ない。穴があったら入りたい心境だよ。I'm so sorry about what I did. I wish I could just crawl into a hole and die.
こうした熊独特の特徴が、熊が動かずに狩猟すること（アザラシの呼吸孔の脇でじっと動かず、アザラシが海面に上がってくるのを待つ）を好む説明になっている。These special characteristics explain its preference for still-hunting (lying motionless beside a seal's breathing hole, waiting for one to surface).


己をもって他人を律するな。Don't judge others by yourself.

以前は私の家の裏に、大きな桜の木がありました。There used to be a big cherry tree at the back of my house.




ありがとうございました。またのご来店、お待ちしております！Thank you for your business. Please come again!
久しぶりに会ったんだから、酒でも飲みながら、昔話にでも花を咲かせるとするか。It's been so long since we last met up. Let's have a drink or two and talk about the good old days.

あなたは朝型？Would you say you're a morning person?


















































ご家族の皆様おかわりありませんか。How's your family?


















今日のお弁当もだけど、五木さんと田中さんの作るメニューは緑黄色野菜が少ないんじゃない？About today's packed-lunch, the menus prepared by Itsuki and Tanaka are low in beta-carotene-rich vegetables again aren't they?




「服汚れるでしょ」「それはノープロブレム。もともとあんまり綺麗じゃないし」"You'll get your clothes dirty." "No worries. They weren't very clean in the first place."
ノートパソコンの電源を入れ、ブラウザを立ち上げて、もう覚えてしまったアドレスを打ち込む。I switch on my laptop, start up the browser, and type in the address I've already learnt by heart.

なお、危険防止の為、サブアド利用をお奨めします。Moreover, for your safety, we advise use of a substitute email address.









仕事をよりよくする方法について考えるよりも金もうけする方法を考える方が先なのである。Figuring a way to make a dollar comes ahead of thinking about how to do the job better.これは学生がよくする間違いだ。This is a mistake students are apt to make.母は植木の世話をよくする人だ。My mother looks after the plants well.

なお、危険防止の為、サブアド利用をお奨めします。Moreover, for your safety, we advise use of a substitute email address.
彼女がピアノを弾くのが聞こえることがよくあります。I often hear her play the piano.
私はこの部屋を居心地よくしよう。I'll make the room comfortable.






























４年ほど前にアキレス腱が痛くなりアキレス腱炎といわれました。About four years ago my Achilles tendon started to hurt and I was told it was Achilles tendonitis.















こういう野菜の無人販売所は、都会では見かけないよね。You don't see this kind of vegetable vending machine in the city.
爆発はガス漏れが原因だったのかもしれない。The explosion may have been caused by a gas leak.
さあ、駆けつけ三杯、威勢よくぱっといきましょう。Anybody who shows up late has to chug!



リスクマネーとは、ハイリスクながらハイリターンを求める投資に投入される資金のことをいう。"Risk money" refers to funds placed in investments that seek high-return, although high-risk, investments.
リスクマネーとは、ハイリスクながらハイリターンを求める投資に投入される資金のことをいう。"Risk money" refers to funds placed in investments that seek high-return, although high-risk, investments.

ロバート・ハンセンが、旧ソ連に秘密情報を売りさばいた容疑で逮捕された。Robert Hansen was arrested on suspicion of having sold off secret information to the former Soviet Union.


































猛り狂う海の嵐のように一族が激しく走る。Clans run wild like a storm in a raging sea.


彼は自分をひとかどの人間だと思っている。He thinks himself better than other people.
鳶に油揚げをさらわれたようなものだ。I was robbed of my rightful share.
彼はジャケットを洋服掛けにかけた。He hung his jacket on a hook.








本当は土曜日からの予定が、いろいろあって週明けからってことになった。It was going to be from Saturday, but, with one thing and another, it ended up being from the new week.

不定詞の形容詞的用法には２種類あり、（１）限定用法、（２）叙述用法。（２）はもちろん主格補語です。There are two ways of using the infinitive as an adjective, 1. attributive, 2. predicative. Naturally 2. is a subject complement.
不定詞の形容詞的用法には２種類あり、（１）限定用法、（２）叙述用法。（２）はもちろん主格補語です。There are two ways of using the infinitive as an adjective, 1. attributive, 2. predicative. Naturally 2. is a subject complement.



心からお悔やみ申し上げます。Please accept my sincerest condolences.
家の家族は五人からなる。Our family consists of five members.
その大箱は幅が３フィートある。The chest is three feet wide.







目からうろこの落ちる思いです。The scales have fallen from my eyes.


雷雲が谷一面にたれこめていた。The storm-clouds brooded over the valley.















ここでは１０分を切った選手のみを集めたのですが、見ての通り平山の記録は５人の中で最も遅い記録です。Here we have assembled only athletes who have broken 10 minutes but, as you can see, Hirayama's record is the slowest of the five people.




「今週からプール開きね」「そっかー。じゃあ、水着買いに行かなきゃ」"It's pool-season from this week, isn't it?" "Oh yes. I've gotta go and buy a swimming suit, then."
彼らは私に現物支給でくれたよ。They paid me in kind.

公式問題集には"受け身の現在進行形"と説明されています。In the official question collection it is explained as being "passive voice of the present continuous tense".














「じつは自由研究で相談したいことがあって・・・」「どれ・・・。ふーん、被子植物について調べてるのね」"Well, there's something I'd like your advice on about my research project ..." "Let's see... Hmm, you're investigating flowering plants then."

そのことは、各研究分担者とこのテーマとの関係を瞥見すれば、おのずから明らかとなる。That fact becomes self evident if you take a look at the relation between this theme and those leading research on it.


自国通貨建てで海外に投資することがいつも利益を生むとは限らない。Investing abroad on your national currency basis will not always be profitable.
















私はたちの悪い風邪にかかっている。I am suffering from a bad cold.





その学校は、中・高一貫校だということを頭の片隅にでも入れておいて下さい。Bear in mind that that school is an integrated junior high and high school.


未来進行形は、未来の時点で進行中の動作や出来事を表現するときに用いられますが、例文は進行中の動作とは考えられません。The future progressive tense is used when expressing events and action in progress at some future point, however the example sentence cannot be understood in that way.
結婚してくれと言われたとき、私は言葉に窮した。Asked to marry him, I was at a loss for words.
私は返答に窮した。I was at a loss for an answer.
嵐の後すぐ、そのラジオ局は放送を再開した。The radio station came back on the air shortly after the storm.
彼は芸術に関しては目が肥えている。He has a good eye for art.









病院に歩み入ることを考えると不安になる人がいるのも無理はない。It is no wonder that some people feel anxiety at the thought of walking into a hospital.
彼女に望むのは、歯に衣着せないで本音を言って欲しいということだ。I wish she wouldn't pussyfoot about it and just say what she means.




幼馴染ってこわ・・・。'Childhood friends' are scary.


いま聞こえたんですが、ネット犯罪を扱う警察官の方だとか？I couldn't help overhearing, but you're police officers who handle cyber-crime or some such?








キング牧師が献身的に力を尽くしたものすべてが水泡に帰したかのように思われた。Everything Rev. Martin Luther King had worked so hard for seemed lost.
我々は夜陰に乗じて進んだ。We advanced under cover of darkness.













「危ないですから、俺が拾いますよ」「大丈夫だから・・・いたっ！」「ほら、いわんこっちゃない」"That's dangerous, I'll clear it up." "It's OK ... Ouch!" "Look, didn't I tell you so?"

窓の外を見たとき、戸口の上り段のところに見知らぬ人がみえた。Looking out of the window, I saw a stranger at the doorstep.





これは工場渡しの価格です。These prices are ex works.

もう神も仏もない。Now there is neither God nor Buddha.
熱帯の太陽は容赦なくぎらぎら照り付けた。The tropical sun glared down relentlessly.
彼の作品はいくつかのアイデアの統合体である。His work is a synthesis of several ideas.
その国は、民主国家への途上にある。The country is on the way to becoming a democratic nation.
合衆国の国民は自分たちが支えている民主社会に対し一般的には責任感を抱いている。Citizens of the United States generally feel a responsibility for the democratic society supported by them.
代議民主制は１つの政治形態である。Representative democracy is one form of government.
この教訓は記憶に留めておくべきだ。This lesson should be kept in mind.


次の動詞はｔｏ不定詞だけを目的語にとります。The following verbs only take the to-infinitive as their object.
toのつかない不定詞を原形不定詞と言う。An infinitive without a 'to' attached is called a bare infinitive.
ジムは、腕をくんで、１人で座っていた。Jim sat alone with his arms folded.彼らは腕をくんで歩いてきた。They came walking arm in arm.
あなたの定期購読予約は六月号で切れます。Your subscription expires with the June issue.
背筋を伸ばして歩きなさい。Carry your head high.


































瓢箪から駒って言うのかな、知人の紹介で就職決まっちゃったんだよ。I just got a great job because of an introduction from a friend. Sometimes things happen when you least expect it.
僕は首をひねる。このポーンではなくて、こっちのナイトを・・・。I tilt my head. Not the pawn, but the knight?
隣じゃまた犬も食わない夫婦喧嘩をしているよ。The couple next door are fighting again.




図書館の本のページを破り取ってはいけない。You must not tear pages out of library books.
良い食習慣を持つことが不可欠なことである。Good eating habits are essential.
暑中お見舞い申し上げます。How are you getting along in this hot weather?
州知事は囚人達を自由の身にした。The governor set the prisoners free.
申し訳ございません、その本は在庫切れになっております。Sorry, the book is out of stock.
その車は町につく前に燃料切れになってしまった。The car ran out of gas before reaching the city.

ぬかるみに足を取られた。I lost my balance on the muddy road.


政治的に活発な人より、政治意識にちゃんと目覚めている人のほうがずっと少ない。It's much less usual for a person to be politically aware than to be politically active.















血筋は争えない。Blood is thicker than water.
彼は飛ぶ鳥を落とす勢いである。He nods and shakes the spheres.



うがい薬でたびたびうがいをしてください。Please rinse often with mouthwash.

その問題についての彼の意見はずばり的を射ている。His remarks on the subject are much to the point.


「あいたたたー」「ケガないか？」"Ow-ow-ouch." "Are you alright?"

俺は大学生ではないが大学生より頭いい。I'm not a university student, but I'm brighter than them.

あんなに騒がしくては何事にも身が入らない。I can't apply my mind to anything with all that noise!






お年寄りには親切にするべきだ。We should be kind to the aged.



顔色が悪いですね。医者を呼びましょうか。You look pale. Shall I call the doctor?
ああそうそう、コメント欄のバグは文字間を調節するletter-spacingタグを使うと起こるものだったみたい。Oh, while I remember, it seems that that was a bug that occurs when you use the comment field's 'letter-spacing' tag which adjusts the tracking.




「委員長、後は何を運ぶんだっけ？」「得点板と大玉もう一個、綱引きの綱」"Mr Chairman, what needs moving next, again?" "Scoreboard, giant ball and the tug-of-war rope."









叔母さんを訪ねた時はすごいごちそうだったね。What a feast we had when we visited my aunt!

「委員長、後は何を運ぶんだっけ？」「得点板と大玉もう一個、綱引きの綱」"Mr Chairman, what needs moving next, again?" "Scoreboard, giant ball and the tug-of-war rope."
























初期の自覚症状としては、排尿障害がありますが、多くの場合、はっきりとした症状がありません。One of the early noticeable symptoms is trouble with urination, but often there are no clear symptoms.















トロール漁船は沿岸の魚をとりつくしました。Fishing trawlers have fished out all the local waters.




カナダでは何語を話しますか。What languages do they speak in Canada?




私は、毎秋りんご園へ行くのが楽しみだ。I delight in going to the apple orchard each fall.

約１年半で約２２億通の迷惑メールを送りました。He sent about 2.2 billion spam emails over a period of around one and a half years.
そんなことが本当でたまるか。I'll be damned if it's true.









いらっしゃいませ、何名様ですか。Good evening. How many are in your party?


彼女は店を見てまわって１時間つぶした。She killed an hour looking around the stores.

彼女が僕を狂わせる。She drives me mad.



成功は努力いかんによる。Success depends on your efforts.
















何回か当たりはあったが針にはかからなかった。I got several bites, but could not hook a fish.



無鉛レギュラーを満タンにしてください。I'd like a full tank of regular unleaded.
このカセットレコーダーを修理してもらいたい。I want to have this cassette recorder fixed.
明日レントゲン撮影を受けに行かなければならない。I have to go and have an X-ray tomorrow.








































































便利な隠しコマンド教えてあげようか。Want me to show you a really useful hidden command?



































彼らは敵の上に天罰が下ることを祈った。They called down the wrath of God upon the heads of their enemies.
われにもなく、彼はちょっと身震いした。He shivered a little in spite of himself.






















































もしよろしければお手伝いしましょう。If you are busy, I will help you.
さらに、即戦力となる政策関連の科学的成果や手段の提供が必要であると強調した。Moreover, they underscored the need for providing policy relevant ready-to-use scientific results and methodology.



惰性に身を任せているがために今のような現在があるんですね。I've ended up in my present state from having indulged myself.

母ちゃんも同じ事いってたな。だからどうしたってんだよ。オレにゃ関係ない。Mum said the same thing. But, so what? It's got nothing to do with me.






彼女は毒舌家だ。She has a sharp tongue.
結果は可もなく不可もなしと言ったところです。The result is neither good nor bad.





ガットの新決議案はかなりの衝撃を与える可能性があります。New GATT resolutions could create a real shake-up.
管理区域 ― 許可なくして立ち入りを禁ず。Controlled Access Zone: No entry without permission.
労なくして益なし。No pain, no gain.






この古い建物は修理する値打ちがない。引き倒す方がよろしい。This old building isn't worth fixing up. It would be better to tear it down.
オンラインでお話しした方がよろしければそうします。If you need to go off-line, that is fine.

何らかの理由で彼女は首を横に振った。For some reason or another she shook her head.
いつご都合がよろしいですか。When would it be convenient for you?
古代のオーバーテクノロジーの武器は必ず制御ができなくなる。Super technology weapons from the ancients always end up out of control.













しかし回収時間が早すぎるため、ゴミの日に出すことが難しいです。Moreover it's difficult to get rubbish out for garbage day because the collection time is too early.
彼はライバル会社に引き抜かれました。He was poached by a rival company.


ご都合のよいときにおいでください。Please come when it is convenient.
何時がご都合がいいですか。When is it convenient for you?私に関して言えば、土曜日が都合がよい。As for myself, Saturday will be convenient.
あなたからご都合が悪いというお知らせがなければ水曜の夕方に参ります。I will come on Wednesday evening unless I hear from you to the contrary.
都合の悪いこと、そうそう隠しとおせるもんじゃないよ。悪事千里を行く、っていうだろう。You can't hide the fact that you're having a hard time. Bad news travels fast you know.











































学食には飽きた。I am tired of eating at the school cafeteria.









私の妹は神戸女学院の３回生です。My sister is a junior at Kobe College.
私は兵庫大学の４回生です。I am a senior at Hyogo University.

































その会社は１００％地元政府が保有している。The company is wholly owned by the local government.






米国車のハンドルは左側にある。Steering wheels of American cars are on the left side.


































悲しみのあまり気が動転していた。She was beside herself with grief.

どこに行けば、小さなカウボーイブーツが手にはいるかご存じですか。Do you know where I might find small cowboy boots?
小さな橋が流れの上にアーチ型にかかっていた。A small bridge arched over the stream.
彼の通信簿はオールＡだよ。He has a straight-A report card.




どの辞書を参考にしたんですか。Which dictionary did you refer to?



先を争って人が出口に殺到した。There was a mad rush toward the exit.























私はどうかと言うと、その計画に異存はない。So far as I am concerned, I have no objection to the plan.



２台のバスは一見したところお互いに似ている。The two buses resemble each other at first glance.
私自身はユーフォーを一度も見たことがない。I myself have never seen a UFO.
私の妹は神戸女学院の３回生です。My sister is a junior at Kobe College.




今日は少し気がめいっている。I'm feeling a little blue today.




あんな二股かける女なんか忘れたわ、ボケ。Idiot, I've forgotten that two-timing bitch.






彼はいつ私たちと顔合わせても、あいさつさえしなかった。He didn't so much as greet us whenever he met us.

私が手にしてるのは貝の化石です。What I have in my hand is a fossil seashell.あなたはどれくらいのお金を手にしましたか。How much money have you obtained?





お前が大声出すから、せっかくのシャッターチャンスを逃しちゃったよ。You just made me miss the perfect shot when you hollered.
クリスはプレゼントを持ってきて、勇気を出して彼女に渡しました。Chris brought her a present and bravely gave it to her.


ちょっと足をのばして、次の町まで行ってみようよ。Let's keep going and see the next town.






「あ、は、はい・・・ごめん、玲姉」「コラ。幾ら親戚とはいえ、私は先輩医師よ？院内ではちゃんとケジメをつけなさい」"Ah, y-yes ... Sorry, Coz." "Hey! You might be my relative but here I'm your senior and a doctor. Keep things straight while you're in the hospital!"
公私のけじめをつけなければいけません。We should draw the line between public and private affairs.


瞬くうちにテニスボール大の団子が消え去った。In the blink of an eye, the tennis-ball-sized dumpling had disappeared.






彼女は働きづめだ。She's always on the go.



Ａ社のアニュアルレポートは参考になる。A Ltd.'s annual report is worth having a look at.
あの黒ずくめの紳士は誰ですか。Who is the gentleman all dressed in black?













それではまるで話がちがう。That's quite another thing to what you promised.

私はもうひとり中国の友達を持っている。I have another friend in China.







脱水症状には、塩をひと舐め。For dehydration, take a lick of salt.
彼はなにもしないで手をこまねいているだけだった。He did nothing but fold his arms.




彼女は恋の炎に身を焼いた。She gave herself to flames of love.









ビタミンＥを豊富に含む食物には、濃い緑色をした菜っ葉類・豆類・ナッツ類・全粒穀類がある。Foods rich in vitamin E include dark-green, leafy vegetables, beans, nuts and whole-grain cereals.

















あかりを消してもかまいませんか。Do you mind if I turn off the light?












すべての兵士を一騎当千のつわものに育てるカギは訓練を強化することである。The key to raising every soldier into a great warrior is in strengthening training.
あのシロウト歌手は文句なくタレントショーで一位となった。The amateur singer won first in the talent show hands down.

彼はボート作りの過程を説明した。He explained the process of building a boat.その家はレンガ作りだ。The house was built of bricks.
直筆サイン入りボールを手に入れることができた。I was able to obtain a personally signed ball.





偽造カードと暗証番号が揃えば、口座にある限りの現金が引き出されてしまう。If they can get both a forged card and its PIN then all the cash in the bank account will be withdrawn.









少年にとって母の手紙は心の支えだった。His mother's letters were an anchor to the boy.













どの学校であっても、体操着は、スパッツやハーフパンツばかりだ。In schools everywhere sports-wear is all spats and shorts.





















どの学校であっても、体操着は、スパッツやハーフパンツばかりだ。In schools everywhere sports-wear is all spats and shorts.





















































気苦労で彼は急にふけた。Care aged him quickly.彼は急に居直った。He changed his attitude suddenly.
































ご成功をお祈りします。I wish you every success.






































それが高1の時だから17年が経ちました。That was when I was in the first year at high school, so 17 years have passed since then.




あなたはいつでも歓迎されています。You will be welcome at any time.

ジャスティン班長、亜空間レーダーに反応出ました！Squad Leader Justin, a blip's appeared on the hyperspace radar!





この火事は全村を灰にしてしまった。The fire reduced the whole village to ashes.










補足情報には、副詞や副詞のはたらきをするものが入ります。Supplementary information includes adverbs and things that function as adverbs.

そのボルトに嵌合するナットが必要です。We need a nut that will fit that bolt.


























都合のよろしいときにいらして下さい。Please come and see me whenever it is convenient for you.





























あなたのパーティーに喜んで出席させていただきます。I will be happy to attend your party.



















私なんぞには野牛と鹿と馬とを描き分けることなど到底出来ない。Me? I can't even begin to draw buffalo, deer and horses so you can tell them apart.








































先週そのお寺を訪問するつもりだったんです。I had intended to visit the temple last week.































































































彼は器械運動が得意だ。He is good at gymnastics.


















一を聞いて十を知る、とまではいかないまでも、もうちょっと物分りがよくなってほしいよ。A really perceptive person can figure out a whole situation with just a few clues. That's the kind of person I want you to become.






「おぅーい、どうした丹治」「前の学校で習ってない単元があって困っている」"Oy, what's up, Tanji?" "I'm having trouble because there's a unit I didn't take at my last school."













彼は私の提案を鼻であしらった。He turned up his nose at my suggestion.













こんにちは、お元気ですか、みなさん。Hi, how are you, everyone?
彼女は気の利く女の子である印象を強く受けた。She struck me as a tactful girl.



「スーはあなたのことすごく怒っているわよ」そのウェイトレスは言うのであった。"Sue's very angry with you," my new waitress said.














煙が風に吹き流された。The smoke blew away.










私は開会の辞を言った。I gave an opening address.

記念式典は閉会の辞で幕を閉じた。The commemorative ceremony ended with the closing address.



そのため、派遣労働者は劣悪な労働条件の下で働いている。For that reason, temporary workers are working under inferior conditions.


雲が晴れて陽が差し始めた。The clouds cleared up and let the sun shine.
一生懸命指でまぶたを広げて目薬を差しました。With great effort I held his eyelids open with my fingers and dropped in the eye medicine.


















朱に交われば赤くなる。He who touches pitch shall be defiled therewith.
時間をおかないと追加・削除が反映されない。Additions and deletions are not shown immediately.ＯＥのツールバーにボタンを追加・削除する。Add and delete buttons from the OE toolbar.


















少女は親切に博物館へ行く行き道を教えてくれた。The girl kindly told me the way to the museum.



ウィッチヘーゼルは、乾燥させずに毛穴を引き締めます。Witch hazel tightens pores without drying skin.












小鍋はすぐ熱くなる。A little pot is soon hot.














新車時３００万円した車も今では３０万円位だそうですから、もう少し乗ろうと思います。Cars that, when new, cost 3,000,000 yen are apparently now worth 300,000, so I think I'll use mine a little longer.



こういう風に合体すれば、１４ポートのＵＳＢハブになります。If you combine them in this way, you get a 14 port USB hub.
ボートの操作者は禁煙の表示にも関わらず、堂々といつも吸っていた。Despite "No Smoking" signs, the boat operator was brazenly smoking all the time.
田中くんは省内きっての馬鹿者だよ。Young Tanaka is the stupidest person in the department.

























ある人を天才にし、別の人を愚か者にするのは何なのか。What makes one person a genius and another person a fool?

ドジャースは破竹の勢いで勝ち進んだ。The Dodgers went on winning with irresistible force.
彼、今のところは飛ぶ鳥も落とす勢いだけれど、あの威勢いつまでもつのか、疑問だね。He's unstoppable right now but the question is how long he can remain at the pinnacle of his career.
彼の出世は怒濤の勢いだ。His career is progressing in leaps and bounds.
一世一代の晴れの舞台という言い回しがあるが、これはまさにそれである。There's a saying, "once in a life-time event," and that's just what this is.


















私達は彼の大胆な企てに舌を巻いた。We marveled at his bold attempt.



早く帰った方がいい、暑いから。サバは、生き腐れとも言われるくらい足が早い。It's hot, so you'd better head back quickly. Mackerel goes off so fast that they coined 'fresh-looking rotten fish'.



英語は３時間目だ。We have English third period.













こともあろうに、なぜ彼は誕生日に帽子なんかくれたんだろう。私は帽子をかぶらないのに。Of all things, why did he give me a hat for my birthday? I don't wear a hat.


杖は彼に何の役にも立たなかった。The stick didn't help him any.



























梅雨時でもないんだから、傘は要らないんじゃない。Since it's not the rainy season, there's no need for an umbrella.
誰かがペンとかクリップのことで神経質になってきたら、それは気が触れ出したという立派な前触れである。When someone becomes neurotic about pens and paper clips, it's a sure sign they're cracking up.



吹雪でえらい目に遭った。We had a terrible time in the blizzard.








非通知は恐いから出ない方がいいよ。'Number-withheld' calls are scary, it's best not to answer them.






トピ主さんが親思いの娘さんであることはわかります。OP, I can tell that you're a daughter who cares a lot for her parents.


よくもまあ、そんな振舞いができるもんだ。How dare you behave like that!
































猫をかぶっている。He is hiding his claws.
















全角文字を含むファイル名の場合、一部のＯＳでは文字化けが生じることがありますので、ダウンロードの際に適宜ファイル名を変更してください。On some OS's you get gibberish for filenames with full-width characters so when downloading please change to a suitable filename.


兄ちゃん、こっち生中二つー。Kiddo! Two medium-size drafts here.「どいてください」「やんのか？あんちゃん」"Please move aside." "Ya wanna make something of it, sonny?"








全市に夜間外出禁止令が布かれた。A curfew was imposed on the city.


大学生の時、有理子が愛欲に身を委ねた。When she was at university, Yuriko abandoned herself to sexual passion.







あなたはちょうどよい折に来た。You have come at an opportune time.































女は悪魔の宴へと向かう。She rides to the black sabbath.















満面朱をそそいで怒った。He went red in the face with rage.















今手が塞がっているんです。I'm tied up now.




鳥は巣作りをする。Birds build nests.






































































わたしが食べさせますから・・・はい、アーンして。I'll feed it to you so ... here, open wide.

















私もそうだが、ＩＴ業界には宵っ張りの人が多いに違いない。I'm one too, and I'm sure there are lots of night-owls in the IT world.


























































































































































































































































アンインストール方法：フォルダごとごみ箱にぽいっ。Uninstall method: Chuck the whole folder into the recycle bin.




















































このモジュールを使用すると、エンターキーでイベントを生成することができます。With this module you can make the Enter key generate an event.



















































































































































































































































































このモジュールを使用すると、エンターキーでイベントを生成することができます。With this module you can make the Enter key generate an event.










































































































































このオンボードというのは平たく言えば「グラフィックカードがついていない」ものだ。Frankly speaking, this 'on board' means "doesn't have a graphics card".

































































































































































































































































































































































































このオンボードというのは平たく言えば「グラフィックカードがついていない」ものだ。Frankly speaking, this 'on board' means "doesn't have a graphics card".












































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































普通の人は、３Ｄだとか高速でうんたらだとか必要としないですからね。Because an average person doesn't need 3D, or high whatchacallit speeds.




















































































































「ソフトウェア開発」は「モノ作り」ではない。"Software development" isn't "manufacture".








































































ダイアログボックスを閉じるには、ウィンドウの右上にある Ｘ ボタンをクリックする必要があります。To dismiss the dialog box you need to click the X at the top right of the window.




































































ジョンテル社はチップ・セットの発売を８月まで延期する見込みだ。John Tel is expected to delay the release of its chip set until August.
























































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































後輩にノートＰＣをかりた。I borrowed the notebook PC from the junior staff member.

今やノート型コンピューターは弁当箱と同じくらいが一般的だ。Now notebook computers are as common as lunch boxes.

































































































































































































































パララックスよりバンプマッピングの方が負荷かかるんですか？Does bump mapping generate more graphics load than parallax?





































































































































































































PC内部のタイマー用ボタン電池が切れた。The button battery in the PC's internal timer has gone flat.



































































































添付ファイルに適応したソフトウエアを持っていないので、ファイルを開けません。別のファイル形式で再送して下さい。As I don't have the software that matches the attachment, I cannot open the file. Please resend it in another format.





















































































































































































































































































































皆さんはどんなプログラミング言語が好きですか？What programming language does everybody like?

































































































































































































































ホワイトバランスをオートにした場合と白いコピー用紙でプリセットした場合の比較です。It's a comparison of setting the white balance to "auto" versus presetting it with white copy paper.



















































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































リナックスをサポートしているベンダーもいます。There are also vendors who support Linux.


















































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































Gif画像ファイル形式しか読み込めません。I can only import GIF files.




























































あなたがどこにいようとも快適な作業環境を提供してくれるのだ。Wherever you are, we'll provide a comfortable work environment.

















































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































そうです、異常音は空冷ファンの最後の断末魔だったのです。That's right, that strange sound was the final death scream of the cooling fan.






















































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































Mozilla Foundationは5月1日、メール/ニュースクライアントソフトの最新版「Thunderbird 2.0.0.14」をリリースした。The Mozilla Foundation released the latest version of its email/news-client software, "Thunderbird 2.0.0.14" on May 1st.












































































































































物を視覚的に覚える器官は視床下部の下にある。The sight memory organ is below the hypothalamus.


























これは世界の常識であり、資源管理の大原則だ。This is international common sense, the great principle of resource management.







































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































大容量のＲＡＭが搭載されていると、メモリ不足を示すエラーメッセージが表示される。If a very large amount of memory is installed, an 'insufficient memory' error message is displayed.








































































































































































彼女は挑戦的な態度で両手を腰に当てて立っていた。She stood defiantly with arms akimbo.















































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































１０分間、休憩をとりましょう。Let's have a ten-minute break.










































































































































































































































































研究者が癌を治療するための有望な方向性を指し示した。The researcher suggested promising directions for treating the cancer.























































































































































































私は４年前からその雑誌を予約購読している。I've been subscribing to that magazine for four years.


飛行機は外国旅行を容易にした。Airplanes have made it easy to travel abroad.










































































































































































































チャールズウォルコットはハトの方位磁石を探した。Charles Walcot investigated the magnetic compass bearing sense in pigeons.
彼は度胸を据えて外人に話し掛けた。He mustered up his courage to talk to a foreigner.
何事があろうとも私は覚悟を決めている。Whatever may happen, I am prepared for it.

























疲れて足が重かった。My legs were leaden from fatigue.彼の所に行くのは足が重い。I'm reluctant to visit him.


いい加減にしろっつの。恵子さん、嫌がってるだろ。I said 'Quit it'. Can't you see Keiko hates that?


























彼は木から木へロープを張り渡した。He strung a rope between the two trees.

私たちはそれらを売る独占権がある。We have the exclusive right to sell them.










ジブの裏帆とラダーを使って、バックしながら船首を進みたい方向に向けました。Using the rudder and the jib with the wind behind it we backed up, turning the bow to the direction we wanted to go.
彼は秘めていた感情をあらわにした。He laid bare his secret feelings.

彼はあえぎあえぎ階段を駆け上がった。He ran up the stairs breathing very hard.
あっ、いけない！忘れるところだった！Oh, no! I almost forgot!あ！まずい！ガソリンが切れてきた。Oh, no! We're running out of gas.


大容量のＲＡＭが搭載されていると、メモリ不足を示すエラーメッセージが表示される。If a very large amount of memory is installed, an 'insufficient memory' error message is displayed.





あきらめたら、そこで試合終了ですよ。If you give up, that's the end of the match.
彼は何でも意のままにしたがる。He wants everything his own way.










イギリス式の朝食はイギリス帝国の建設者たちによって流行らせたものだ。The English breakfast was made popular by the architects of the British Empire.




あなたはすぐ出発しないといけない。You must start soon.




もう行かないと。Got to go now.
近医で処方を希望したら露骨に嫌な顔をされた。I was given a nasty look when I asked for my prescription at the local doctor's.










いくつになっても子供は子供なのである。No matter the age, a child is a child.



こいつの性根が悪いから非モテなんだろ。I expect it's his lousy personality that drives off the ladies.
他の惑星に知的生命体はいるか？Is there intelligent life on other planets?
こ、こら！ナニやっとるかぁぁ！！H-Hey! What're you up to!!





できることは抵抗か逃亡か二つに一つだった。The alternative possibilities were resistance and flight.










すべての将兵が力を合わせて反撃した。All the officers and men joined their efforts against the attack.




日本人は一体に礼儀正しいです。Japanese people in general are polite.













彼は熟練した脳外科医として名声が高い。He enjoys a good reputation as a specialist in brain surgery.




かつてはロードローラーは馬が曳いていたが、蒸気機関の発明により、スチームローラーが現れた。Horses used to pull road-rollers, but the steamroller arrived with the invention of the steam engine.











佐渡さんは魅力的な個性の持ち主なのに、その価値が分からず、自分を好まない。Even though Sato has a nice personality, he doesn't know its value and doesn't like himself.






ＮＡＴＯはそのときにボスニアのセルビア人の基地などを空爆した。At that time, NATO bombed the bases of the Bosnian Serbs.











サブマリンのペリスコープが水中からにょっきり突き出ていた。The submarine's periscope was sticking right out of the water.








コールタールを蒸留して得られる成分名は下表の通りである。The components obtained by distillation of coal tar are as shown below.
日本文化に造詣深いことはいいことです。Being knowledgeable about Japanese culture is a good thing.



















ご迷惑をおかけしますが、急を要することが起こったものですから。Sorry to bother you, but I'm afraid something urgent has come up.
彼を待ち伏せる一計を案じた。He has a plan to ambush him.
隠れキャラも登場予定？開発元に聞く。Are there to be hidden characters as well? We ask the developers.








ケアプランの作成等の居宅介護支援事業については、介護保険により負担されます。Nursing insurance covers drawing up the care plan and other work supporting home nursing.
革張りのソファにするか？布張りのソファにするか？Shall we go for a leather-covered sofa? A cloth-covered sofa?

安価な簡易住宅を提供します。We offer low-cost prefabricated houses.


彼はその家に入った時、二つのものが目に入った。As he entered the house, two things caught his eye.
ジャンスキーが観測したのは銀河系の中心核からの波長14.6mの電波であった。What Jansky had observed was the 14.6m wavelength radio wave from the Milky Way's core.
それと俺がホモだとしたら、罪になるわけ？And if I were gay, would that be a crime?









ひどくなると、亀裂が生じたり、断裂することもあります。In severe cases, cracks can form or it can snap apart.


彼はビールの大ジョッキを飲み干した。He drank that large beer mug dry.
このジョッキは１パイント入る。This beer mug holds one pint.
兄ちゃん、こっち生中二つー。Kiddo! Two medium-size drafts here.
余談だが、この念発火能力のことをパイロキネシスというらしい。By the by, this ability to will fire into existence is apparently called pyrokinesis.
余談だが、この念発火能力のことをパイロキネシスというらしい。By the by, this ability to will fire into existence is apparently called pyrokinesis.



予知能力とは霊力を使って、未来に起こることがらについて知ること。Precognition is the act of using spiritual-power to know things that will occur in the future.
予知能力とは霊力を使って、未来に起こることがらについて知ること。Precognition is the act of using spiritual-power to know things that will occur in the future.

危険物を飲み込んだ場合、飲み込んだものによって対処法が違います。When you swallow a dangerous substance, what you need to do depends on what you swallowed.
これらの溶剤は、揮発性のため、使用時に蒸発し大気に放出されている。These solvents, due to their volatility, evaporate into the atmosphere when used.


クリスは素早く身をかわした！Chris nimbly dodged the attack!










子宮内膜炎は、細菌が子宮内に入り、内膜に炎症を起す病気である。Endometritis is a disease where bacteria enter the uterus and cause inflammation of the inner membrane.
指導部の交代は、国際政治経済に重要な影響を与える。Changes of leadership have a great effect on the international political economy.
子宮後屈があると、排卵痛が痛くなりやすいですか？Are you more likely to get worse ovulation pains if you have a tipped uterus?









消息筋によると、○○社は東証一部への上場を準備している。According to informed sources, ____ Ltd. is preparing for the move up to the first section of the Tokyo Stock exchange.


１００円玉か５００円玉しか使えないので私は小銭を探したが見当たらない。It would only take 100 or 500 yen coins, so I search for change but don't find any.
１００円玉か５００円玉しか使えないので私は小銭を探したが見当たらない。It would only take 100 or 500 yen coins, so I search for change but don't find any.

そこらじゅう蚊に刺されてかゆくてしょうがない。I got bit by mosquitoes all over this area, and it itches so badly I can't stand it.





色気より食い気からはそろそろ卒業してもいいお年頃だと思うけどね。I think it's about time you stopped putting your belly before your looks.















学生が英文論文誌に論文を投稿して、「条件付採録」になっています。The student submitted a paper to an English-language journal, and the result was "conditional acceptance".
学生が英文論文誌に論文を投稿して、「条件付採録」になっています。The student submitted a paper to an English-language journal, and the result was "conditional acceptance".



１．とりむね肉を細切りにする。1. Finely chop the chicken breast meat.
５．反応が終わったら、濡れ雑巾の上に試験管をおく。5. When the reaction is over, place the test-tube on a damp cloth.

手始めは、三大宗教の聖地、エルサレムを訪れることだった。For a start, I visited Jerusalem - a sacred place for three major religions.






米消費者団体がRealPlayerを「バッドウェア」と認定。American consumer group identifies RealPlayer as 'badware'.

ウエイターは私たちのグラスになみなみと注いだ。The waiter filled our glasses to the brim.



世界のだれひとりとして戦争を望んでいない。Nobody in the world wants war.




除草剤耐性品種でなぜ収量が増えるのか？Why do yields increase with herbicide-resistant varieties?
ＯＫ！！ブラザー！！それ以上聞きたくないぜ！OK!! Bro!! I don't want to hear any more!



祖母の遺灰は寺院に置かれた骨壷に入っている。Grandmother's ashes are in an urn at the temple.



















グーがチョキに、チョキがパーに、パーはグーに勝つ。Rock breaks scissors. Scissors cut paper. Paper smothers rock.
人工乳を受け付けません。He refuses formula.

批判する者の中には、欧州中央銀行に課せられた目標が不適切であると考える者がいます。Among the critics are those who think that the objective set for the European Central Bank is not appropriate.
「オーストラリアからですか」とフィリピン人はたずねました。"Are you from Australia?" asked the Filipino.





遅延便については、オリジナルの出発日に基づくシーズナリティを適用するため、マイル差額の払い戻しはいたしません。For delayed flights, seasonal adjustments are made on the basis of the original flight date and so refunds of air-mile difference will not be made.
研究者は頭脳の新しい受容器の複合体を識別する。Researchers Identify New Receptor Complex in Brain
研究者は頭脳の新しい受容器の複合体を識別する。Researchers Identify New Receptor Complex in Brain
この切符の出発日を変更できますか。Could you change the departure date for this ticket?
このブログは情報インフラを中心としたトピックを取り上げています。This blog covers topics that centre on information infrastructure.





この大分類には、金融業又は保険業を営む事業所が分類される。Into this broad category fall companies that run money lending and insurance businesses.

シロオニタケは毒菌だけど、存在感があって好きだなあ。Shiroonitake is a poisonous mushroom but it has real presence, and I like it.


パプアニューギニアに住むメラネシア人の多くは、かなり強い天然パーマですね。Most of the Melanesians living in Papua New Guinea have very curly hair, don't they?

よって流通するマネーが減り、物価上昇は鎮静化する。Thus money in circulation drops, and price escalation quietens down.
野球人でこれほど神格化された男もいない。No baseball player has been as deified as this man.
日本ではリング状のものが早くから普及したため「避妊リング」と呼ばれることも多い。In Japan the ring shaped ones came into use first so they're also often called "contraceptive rings".
リスクマネーとは、ハイリスクながらハイリターンを求める投資に投入される資金のことをいう。"Risk money" refers to funds placed in investments that seek high-return, although high-risk, investments.
思い立ったが吉日、さっそくプロジェクトの企画案を書き始めよう。Quick, let's get started on the project proposal while the idea is still fresh in our minds. There's no time like the present.

再使用型有翼ハイブリッドロケットシステムの基本設計と飛行性能予測。Baseline design and flight capability predictions for reusable winged hybrid rocket system.
実施設計とは基本設計で決まった計画を、工事ができる図面に書く作業です。Detailed design is the work of drawing up a diagram that is capable of being manufactured from the plan set in the baseline design.
彼の秘書は、機密情報は一切漏らしていないと明言した。His secretary flatly denied leaking any confidential information.






知らないうちに、飛行機は着陸していた。Before I knew it, the plane had landed.
再使用型有翼ハイブリッドロケットシステムの基本設計と飛行性能予測。Baseline design and flight capability predictions for reusable winged hybrid rocket system.
再使用型有翼ハイブリッドロケットシステムの基本設計と飛行性能予測。Baseline design and flight capability predictions for reusable winged hybrid rocket system.



ＵＮというのは何を表わしていますか。What does UN stand for?







ガーデニングの本を見てたら、ドクロマークのついたのがいっぱいあって驚きました。When I looked in a gardening book I was surprised by how many were marked poisonous.










できちゃった婚のため身内と大学の友人2人しかよばない地味婚にするそうです。It seems as it was a shot-gun wedding so they're having a quiet wedding with only family and a couple of friends from university invited.
ジャガイモの皮をこそげ取ってください。Please scrape the skin off the potatoes.
椎間板ヘルニアは背骨の間にある椎間板という軟骨が飛び出すものです。Disk herniation is when cartilage, called 'intervertebral disk' and found between each vertebra, slips out.

２回目の人工内耳移植への低所得者医療扶助制度の適用不許可を取り下げる。Decision to disallow Medicaid for second cochlea implant withdrawn.
ここで使われている文法形式は現在進行形である。The grammatical form employed here is the present progressive.




教育産業に関する情報を掲載したインターネットサイトには以下のようなものがあります。Among the Internet sites that publish information on education related businesses are those given below.









彼は心してかからないとマリガンの格好の餌食となるに違いない。He'd better watch out, or Mulligan is going to wipe the floor with him.







シンと静まった部室。響くのは、クロッキー帳に擦れる鉛筆の音だけ。The club room returned to quiet. All that could be heard was the sound of pencil on sketchpad.






そんなことを考えながら『我輩はカモである』を再見しました。Thinking about those sorts of things, I watched "Duck Soup" again.

日本ではリング状のものが早くから普及したため「避妊リング」と呼ばれることも多い。In Japan the ring shaped ones came into use first so they're also often called "contraceptive rings".





彼女は待っている間雑誌を読んでひまをつぶした。She killed time reading a magazine while she waited.
あのジャンボジェット機は４００人乗れる。That jumbo jet accommodates 400 passengers.


共同事業の始め方について彼らは互いに話し合いがついた。They came to terms with each other on how to start a joint venture.





この新しい清涼飲料水は、この夏の一押しです。This new soft drink is the best thing to drink this summer.




貧困者が乞食をしていた。The pauper was begging for a living.












顔をべろべろ舐めるな。わはは。止めろよ。Don't slobber over my face! A-ha-ha-ha. Stop it!


良い薬になるだろう。It will be a good lesson to him.

契約を交わした以上、決定を守らなければならなかった。We were tied to our decision because we signed the contract.
州警察のジャネット・ウェルプ広報官によれば、そのトラックは州間高速道路３０号線沿いの橋の欄干に激突して止まったとのことです。State police spokeswoman Janet Welp says the truck wound up crashing into a bridge railing along Interstate 30.




アメリカの修正論主義者は日本との関係について強硬な態度をとっています。U.S. revisionists take a hard-line approach to Japanese relations.



母ちゃんも同じ事いってたな。だからどうしたってんだよ。オレにゃ関係ない。Mum said the same thing. But, so what? It's got nothing to do with me.



この春休みには、海外費用の足しにするため、レストランでアルバイトをした。During my last spring vacation I took a job in a restaurant to help pay the costs of my trip abroad.




いつまでも意地張ってないで、こっちに来なよ。Stop being such a hard-ass. Come on over.


美術館の東の陳列棟は清掃のため閉鎖されていた。The museum's eastern gallery was closed for cleaning.
水は生命に必要不可欠です。Water is indispensable to life.


ああ言えば、こう言う。まったく、口が減らない奴だ。Whatever I say, he has a comeback ready. You can't get a word in edgewise.

男はトムを見てから、楽屋口を通って、暗いロンドンの街路へと消えていった。The man looked at Tom, then vanished through the stage door out into the dark London street.



お手を煩わせて申し訳ありません。I'm sorry to trouble you.

手がすべって皿を床におとしてしまった。The plate slipped from my hands and fell to the floor.

誰も自分が目にしたことを信じられなかった。Nobody could believe what he saw.
たいていの鳥は昼間しか目が見えない。Most birds can see only by day.









黒魔法の話を聞きたいです。学院ではさわりしか聞いたことがないんですが興味があります。I'd like to hear about black magic. I was only told the highlights in the academy, and it interests me.






進んで学ぼうとする気の無い者には教える甲斐がない。One who is not willing to learn is not worth teaching.
この製品は飛ぶように売れています。These products are selling like hot cakes.









来週の日曜日に遊びに来てください。Come and see me on Sunday next week.




ファッションモデルは身のこなしがよくなければならない。A fashion model must have a good carriage.

そこの売りは、手ぶらで行けるバーベキュー場です。The best thing about that place is the barbecue area where they supply you with everything you need.
怠惰は弱気精神の避難場にすぎない。Idleness is only the refuge of weak minds.


地質学者が私たちの農場で石油の実地調査を行った。The geologists explored for oil on our farm.




スキー板と靴を貸して下さい。I'd like to rent skis and ski boots.

通信業界はいとも簡単に手中におさめることができます。The telecommunications market is totally up for grabs.
パティは背が低くてその枝に手が届かなかった。Patty was so short that she couldn't get at the branch.
この薬は子供たちの手の届かないところに置いておきなさい。Keep this medicine out of the children's reach.
その新製品は従来の流通チャンネルでは販売されない。The new product will not be distributed through conventional channels.




１００万人の人々がその戦争で命を落とした。One million people lost their lives in the war.






































































































そんなに気品のあるダンサーはめったに見たことがない。Rarely have I met such a graceful dancer.
彼女には生まれつきの気品がある。She has inherent dignity.




その件は成り行きに任せるしかないな。You can only let the matter take its own course.




まず、板のかんながけをしてください。Try the board surface first.


私の娘は尻が重いので困る。My daughter's slowness to take action is a pain.
我々を見てにたりと笑った。He grinned broadly at us.
この時計会社の優れた技巧は群を抜いている。The quality of craftsmanship in this clock company is unsurpassed.




Mozilla Foundationは5月1日、メール/ニュースクライアントソフトの最新版「Thunderbird 2.0.0.14」をリリースした。The Mozilla Foundation released the latest version of its email/news-client software, "Thunderbird 2.0.0.14" on May 1st.
あの歌手も先が見えている。The singer no longer has a future.



木工芸では、木を、硬木、軟木と、唐木に分類します。In woodworking, we classify wood as hardwood, softwood or exotic wood.
木工芸では、木を、硬木、軟木と、唐木に分類します。In woodworking, we classify wood as hardwood, softwood or exotic wood.
木工芸では、木を、硬木、軟木と、唐木に分類します。In woodworking, we classify wood as hardwood, softwood or exotic wood.


２回目の人工内耳移植への低所得者医療扶助制度の適用不許可を取り下げる。Decision to disallow Medicaid for second cochlea implant withdrawn.
人工内耳は技術的に巧妙な機器です。The cochlea implant is a technically ingenious device.
木工芸では、木を、硬木、軟木と、唐木に分類します。In woodworking, we classify wood as hardwood, softwood or exotic wood.



そして、この遊具には滑り台のデッキに上がる方法がもう一つあります。And there is one more method of climbing up to the slide deck.

満ち潮で水没する砂浜でキャンプを張るのは、実に愚かな行為です。Pitching camp on sand banks that go under at high tide is a truly stupid thing to do.

噂をすれば影、キャシーが来たわ。Speak of the devil, here comes Kathy.
月が湖に影を落としていた。The moonlight reflected on the lake.

幸せな家庭を持つことほど、真の喜びを人に与えてくれるものはない。Nothing in the world gives people so much real pleasure as having a happy family.
行間を読むべきなんだよ。You should read between the lines.
時を移さず救急車がやってきた。An ambulance arrived immediately.
自分の手を汚すようなことだけはごめんだ。I don't want to get my hands dirty.
彼の感情を害しないかと心配した。We were afraid that we might hurt him.
乙女たちは彼に胸をときめかす。He makes young girls' hearts flutter.
あの人は私たちの社長だから、それ相応に敬意を払わなければならない。He is our boss, and must be treated as such.
彼らはその問題に最終的な決着をつけた。They have solved the problem once and for all.
女性は彼と少し言葉を交わすと、自然に彼への興味を失ってしまうのです。Women automatically lose interest in him after exchanging a couple of words.
彼の顔は情熱の光を放っていた。His face radiated enthusiasm.
私は口を開くとすぐに彼女が私をさえぎった。I had hardly opened my mouth, when she interrupted me.
このオンボードというのは平たく言えば「グラフィックカードがついていない」ものだ。Frankly speaking, this 'on board' means "doesn't have a graphics card".

互いに心を許しあうといえるほどの仲となった。We became cordial with one another.
外は身を切るような寒さだった。It was piercingly cold outside.

彼は決して身銭を切るような人ではない。He is the last person to pay out of his own pocket.
彼は人を見る目がある。He has an eye for people.
テニスのことになると彼女は水を得た魚のようだ。She is in her element when it comes to tennis.
正直者が馬鹿を見ることもある。それが世の中だ。Honesty does not always pay. Such is the way of the world.







彼女は声を限りに叫んだ。She shouted at the top of her voice.
同じ頃、事務員・有村夏恵は、今月を限りに退職する旨を五鬼上に申し入れた。At the same time, the clerk Natsue Arimura told Gokijo of her intent to resign after this month.

いい年してそんな馬鹿なまねはよせ。At your age you should know better.
ビルが損害に対し責めを負った。Bill took the blame for the loss.
飛田課長が、太鼓判を押した企画書ならクライアントも一発ＯＫだろう。When Tobita gives a plan his seal of approval, the client accepts it at first glance.
きつい仕事で彼は体を壊しました。Hard work injured his health.
女性に彼氏がいるかいないかの探りを入れるベストな方法が有れば教えてください。If there's a good way to sound out whether a woman has a boyfriend or not please tell me.
恥を知れ！Shame on you!
彼はほとんどだれとでも調子を合わせることができた。He could make himself agreeable to almost anyone.
その知らせは彼の誠実さに泥を塗る事になろう。That news will besmirch his reputation for honesty.
上手な弁護士はひとつの鍵となる証拠に的を絞る。A good lawyer will always zero in on a key piece of evidence.

その謎を解きましたか。Have you worked the puzzle out?
目下に対して上役風を吹かす。Pull one's rank on one's inferiors.
窓を開けて風を入れてくれ。Open the window and let some fresh air into the room, please.
人が何かを率直に言うと、アメリカ人たちは、聞き耳を立てる。Americans are all ears when people say something.
彼は作家として名を残そうという野心を持っている。He has an ambition to make a name for himself as a writer.
すさんだ生活を送るのは、命を縮めるようなものだ。Living life in the fast lane is like burning the candle at both ends.
面目を失うより死んだほうがましだ。We might as well die as disgrace ourselves.

１８５３年、ペリーは、日本にアメリカへの門戸を開くように要求した。In 1853, Perry asked Japan to open the door to America.

党の主な方針を守らない政治家は、だれしも反逆分子として、烙印を押されるだろう。Any politician who does not toe the main party line would be branded a renegade.
その気体は強い異臭を放つ。The gas gives off a strong, unpleasant smell.
人の陰で悪口を言うな。Don't speak ill of others behind their back.








彼の推薦のおかげで、私は東京の大学で教鞭をとることが出来た。Thanks to his recommendation, I was able to get a teaching job at a college in Tokyo.

彼女の心臓は恐怖で早鐘を打った。Her heart beat quickly out of fear.
交通事故の防止対策を講じなければならない。We must take measures to prevent traffic accidents.
少年少女と呼ぶべき年齢の者から、近く大往生を遂げるのではないかという老齢の者の姿まである。There were figures there from those of an age best called girls and boys to those who looked to be old enough to be about to live out their life span.
彼は議会で延々と長広舌を振るうことで有名だ。He was famous for his marathon speeches in parliament.

この場所を野菜を作るのに使っていいですか。Can I use this area to raise vegetables?
彼は軸のような重要な役割を演じた。He played an important part like an axis.

あの問題も、紆余曲折を経て解決した。There were a lot of twists and turns to the story, but we finally solved the problem.


自分に「できそこない」のレッテルを貼って生きていくのは辛いことだ。It's hard to live with the knowledge that you are a failure.
ポールは顔を赤らめて横を向いた。Paul blushed and turned away.
ふたりでまじめな話をしているんだから、君、無責任な横槍を入れないでほしいんだけど。Hey, we're trying to have a serious discussion here so I'd appreciate it if you wouldn't butt in so irresponsibly.
絶対トイレの蓋を開けたままにするなよ。Whatever you do don't leave the lid up on the toilet!

知らせを聞いて彼は顔を曇らせた。His face fell when he heard the news.

みんな旗を振り始めた。Everybody started waving his flag.
音楽を聞いて気を晴らした。I cheered myself up by listening to music.
彼女は泣くまいと気を張った。She steeled herself not to cry.
気を利かせて外へ出た。I had enough sense to get out of there.
私はいつも宿題をやるのを延ばしては泣きを見ています。I always put off doing my homework and get into trouble.
彼は彼女の聡明さに恐れをなした。He was cowed by her intelligence.



係長が急に辞めてしまったので、私がその穴を埋めなければならなくなった。I had to fill the gap left when our head clerk quit on short notice.
彼等は独立の為に血を流した。They shed their blood for their independence.
その知らせを聞いて彼はがっくりと肩を落とした。His shoulders sagged when he heard the news.
２人の警官は夜盗を逮捕した。２人は夜盗がミラー夫人宅にしのび込もうとした現場を押さえたのだ。Two policemen arrested a burglar. They caught him sneaking into Mrs. Miller's.
国防総省関係者は、異常がいつ発生したかについては口を閉ざしており、飛行の詳細についても論評をさけました。Pentagon officials won't say when the problem turned up and refused to discuss details about the flight.
しばらくこの町に腰を落ちつけようと思うんだ。I think I'll stay put in this town for a while.もうそろそろ腰を落ち着けてもいいんじゃないの。It's about time you settled down for good.
君が死んだら骨を拾ってあげる。I'll look after your affairs when you are dead.






我が家では女房が財布の紐を握っている。My wife holds the purse strings in our family.
彼は完全に死線を越えた。He is quite clearly out of danger.
川岸で数人の男が糸を垂れている。Several men are fishing from the riverbank.


彼の時を得た救助がなかったら、私は溺れていただろう。But for his timely rescue, I would have drowned.
私はそのニュースを聞いて耳を疑った。I could hardly believe my ears when I heard the news.
要するに、借金を踏み倒して逃げちまった。In short, he's run off without paying off his debt.
私は手を取って彼を案内した。I led him by the hand.

子供が手を離れたのだから、自由な時間がたくさんあるでしょう。With your children away, you must have a lot of free time.愚か者の金はすぐにその手を離れる。A fool and his money are soon parted.
暖かい日には手足を伸ばしたり、仰向けになって足を宙に上げたまま寝ることもある。On warm days, bears stretch out or lie on their backs with their feet in the air.
神聖ローマ帝国は１８０６年に終わりを告げた。The Holy Roman Empire came to an end in the year 1806.

先生は出欠を取った。The teacher called the roll.
私の兄は、未婚なので、所帯を持たず、奉公人と一緒によその家で食事をしていた。My brother, being yet unmarried, did not keep house, but boarded with his apprentices at the home of another family.
彼等は暗がりに身を隠した。They hid themselves in the shadows.
彼女は橋から身を投げて自殺した。She committed suicide by jumping off the bridge.
みんなは声を張り上げて歌った。Everybody sang at the top of their lungs.
たくさんの階段を昇った後だったので彼女は完全に息を切らしていた。After running up so many flights of steps, she was completely out of breath.
講義の途中で彼女は吐き気を催した。Halfway through the lecture, she began to feel sick.
彼は幅を利かせて何でも自分の思うようにさせる。He gets his way by throwing his weight around.
彼が帰国の腹を決めたのは病気だったからだ。It was because he was ill that he decided to return home.
お前のふるまいはわが家の名を汚した。Your behavior brought disgrace on our family.

この記念碑は祖国に命を捧げた兵士を祭っている。This monument is dedicated to the soldiers who gave their lives to their country.
そろそろお開きにしよかー。Well, shall we call it a day?



その老婦人はやっとの事で階段を上った。The old lady climbed the stairs with difficulty.









トムはいつかよいサッカー選手になるでしょう。Tom will become a good soccer player some day.


彼はすごいスポーツ選手だったらしい。He seems to have been a great athlete.
我々は、新聞、雑誌、ニュース番組で世の中の出来事を知る。Newspapers, magazines, and newscasts tell what is going on in the world.













結果は彼の意に満たないものだった。The result was unsatisfactory to him.
一難去ってまた一難、またまた難題が社長からトップダウンで降りてきたよ。No sooner had we finished working on one tough problem than the president sent us yet another straight from the top.





鵜の目鷹の目で探していたよ。He was looking for it like a hunting dog.
運転免許試験に合格して彼はみんなをびっくりさせた。He amazed everyone by passing his driving test.
外国人旅行者には免税の特権がある。We give foreign tourists the privilege of tax exemption.
その都市には数カ所の核シェルターがある。There are a few nuclear bomb shelters in the city.


その大臣は気心の知れた仲間を重要な地位につけました。The minister appointed one of his cronies to a key position.
鬼が出るか蛇が出るか。この提案書の結果が見物だね。There's no telling what kind of trouble this proposal might stir up. The result is certainly going to be something to see.
科学者の通弊は、あらゆる問題に技術的解決策があると誤認すること。A fault common to scientists is mistakenly believing that every problem has a technical solution.
激論の後、喫煙者に喫煙コーナーでの喫煙を許す妥協案が生まれた。The compromise which permits a smoker to smoke in the smoking corner was born after heated discussion.
泣いても笑ってもあと一日。There is only one day left, whether we like it or not.
１ます空けて書き出しなさい。Begin to write, leaving one space blank.
腹立ちまぎれに彼は言いたい放題のことを言って、帰って行った。In a fit of anger he said everything he wanted to say and went home.

私は君に自分の父親のことをそんなふうに言わせておくわけにはいかない。I can't let you talk about your own father that way.

口先のうまい人にはだまされやすい。People are likely to be deceived by a smooth talker.


自慢じゃないがこのクラブでは私が一番ゴルフがうまいと思う。I flatter myself that I'm the best golfer in the club.





他人の弱みに付け込むな。Don't take advantage of others' weakness.





私はまるで招かれざる客のような気がした。I felt as if I were an uninvited guest.
冗談じゃないよ。あの人は私同様医者なんかじゃないよ。You can't be serious! He's no more a doctor than I am.
寝ても覚めても、私はいつもあなたのことばかり考えています。Whether I'm sleeping or awake, I think of you all the time.
私は暴力を憎むことでは人後に落ちない。I yield to no one in abhorrence of violence.



彼は一度ならず試みたが、失敗に終わった。He tried more than once, only to fail.


























それは私の知ったことではない。That's not my concern.



届け出なしに路上に出店してはならない。You may not set up a roadside stall without prior notice.
オペラ歌手は自発的にチャリティーコンサートを開いた。The opera singer held a charity concert of his own accord.
私たちはパリ・オペラ座の踊りのレッスンを見ています。We are watching a class at the Paris Opera.


このコンピューターは、長い目で見れば高くつく。This computer will prove costly in the long run.








アジア諸国からの輸入品は近年増大している。The imports from Asian countries have expanded recently.






水不足の時、水のありがたさを骨身にしみて感じた。During the water shortage, the value of water really came home to me.




















ネコはエジプト人によって飼い慣らされたものである。Cats were domesticated by the Egyptians.
アメリカは小麦・オート麦・ライ麦や他の穀物を食べる。Americans eat lots of wheat, rye, and other grains.

今後とも、お付き合いのほどよろしくお願いします。We look forward to working more closely with you in the future.
ガソリン代が高くなってきたので、車を手放さなければならなかった。Gasoline became so expensive that we had to let our car go.
クイズ番組は７時のニュースのあとだ。The quiz show follows the 7 o'clock news.
ケーキ作りに失敗した。I failed to make a cake.

翌朝早くサーカス団は次の町へ出発した。Early the next morning, the circus left for the next town.
食事代はサービス料も込みになっています。The price of the meal includes a service charge.
彼の声は小さくなってささやき声になった。His voice dropped to a whisper.









テレビ中継された大阪での追跡劇の末、彼は逮捕された。He was arrested by police after a TV chase in Osaka.
パジャマ姿のブライアンが、午前中家で読書している。Brian, in his pajamas, is engaged in reading in the house in the morning.
少年たちはひそひそ話していた。何かをたくらんでいるのがわかった。The boys were whispering; I knew they were up to something.
このビニール製のゴミ袋は有害な科学物質を含んでいません。This plastic garbage bag is free of hazardous chemicals.


彼女は日焼けしてブロンズ色になった。The sun has bronzed her skin.
彼女は壁をベージュ色にした。She stained the wall beige.
水を加えてペースト状になるまでかき回しなさい。Add water and stir to a paste.
今まで使っていたものを今朝部屋でボール遊びをしていて、わってしまったのです。I broke the one I've been using till now this morning while playing with a ball in the room.
そのホラー映画は二度と見る気にならなかった。I couldn't bring myself to see the horror movie again.







レジャー産業は新たなリゾート地にさらなる投資をしています。The leisure industry is sinking more money into new resorts.
彼は背の高い人を呼びとめてレコード店への道を尋ねました。He stopped a tall man and asked him the way to the record shop.
図書館で一緒になりましょう。I'll join you in the library.
すぐに一人住まいに慣れますよ。Soon you'll get used to living by yourself.

雨があがったら散歩に行こう。When the rain stops, we'll go for a walk.
私たちは運命共同体だ。We're in the same boat.
ジョン・ウェインは今世紀の最も人気のある映画スターの１人であった。John Wayne was one of the most popular movie stars of this century.



当大学では外国人留学生の受け入れ施設が十分でない。Our school facilities are inadequate for foreign students.
万一第三次世界大戦が起こるようなことがあれば、勝者はあり得ないだろう。Should World War III come about, there would be no winners at all.
彼は取引先に照会状を書いた。He wrote a letter of inquiry to his business contact.
どちらの王子が正統な王位継承者か。Which prince is the legitimate heir to the throne?
科学者がつねに主張しているように、いかなる科学的発見もそれ自体は善でも悪でもない。As scientists keep insisting, there is neither good nor bad in any scientific discovery.
この本は学校図書館のものだ。This book belongs to the school library.
仕事を間に合わすため彼は徹夜で働いた。He worked all night so that he could get the job done in time.
あんな人たちと関わり合いになるな。Don't get involved with those people.

テレビにいくつかのマイナス面があるのも事実である。It is true that television also has some disadvantages.


国際貿易禁止令がその国の経済にとって最後の頼みでしょう。An international trade ban could be the last straw for that country's economy.


この新聞はロハだ。This newspaper is free.


























0.3のシャー芯って何であんなに高いのですか？Why are '0.3' pencil leads so expensive?







その教授は、私のいわんとすることが理解できなかった。The professor was unable to comprehend what I meant.







息の長い仕事になりそうだ。This is going to require a long steady effort.











その扇動家は些細なことを大袈裟に表現する傾向がある。The agitator is inclined to exaggerate trivial matters.







我々は知り合ってからまだ日が浅い。We haven't known each other long.


この空港は新千歳空港ほど便数が多くないので、送迎デッキから見ても最初は飛行機がいませんでした。This airport doesn't have as many flights as New Chitose Airport and even looking from the observation deck at first there were no planes.





あいつにはまいったよ。どんなに厳しく怒っても、柳に風と受け流すだけだよ。I don't know what to do with that guy. No matter how mad I get at him he just takes it in stride and pays no attention.












馬鹿が移るまえにそのような宗教に関わらんほうがいい。You should stay away from cults like that before you turn into a moron.


それは命にかかわる問題だ。It is a matter of life or death.
そちら様のお電話番号をいただけますか。May I please have your telephone number?
コンピューターがこの会社に導入されつつあります。Computers are being introduced into this company.
















「騙された」と言ってしまえばそれまでですが、「うまい話」に乗った当人であることは間違いありません。If you say "I was tricked," well that's certainly so but there's no mistaking that you were the one who signed up on a "sweet deal".
PC内部のタイマー用ボタン電池が切れた。The button battery in the PC's internal timer has gone flat.




新期にスタートしたテレビ番組だが、あいも変わらず新味がないな。The new season's T.V. programs are as much old hat as ever.
彼氏が留置所に入って10日経ちました。It's been 10 days since my boyfriend went to jail.



















































































ここでお買い上げの品は無料で配達します。Articles bought here will be delivered free of charge.
彼女はついに最もカリスマ性のある女優として国民から認められました。She has finally been regarded by the nation as the most charismatic actress.
この分では予定を変更せざるをえないだろう。At this rate, we'll have to change the schedule.


スミスさんはとてもお金持ちだったのにしみったれだった。Even though Mr Smith was very wealthy, he was a tightwad.
自分が利口だと思ってもさしつかえないが、それだからと言って私をあざ笑うことはできないよ。You may think you are clever, but you cannot laugh at me because of that.


















良酒は看板を要せず。Good wine needs no bush.






































率直に言って、君のヘアースタイルは好きじゃないよ。Frankly speaking, I don't like your haircut.




































人は教授という人たちが英語を話せるのは当然の事と思いがちだ。People are apt to take it for granted that the professor can speak English.















































人生は旅のようなものだ。Life is like a journey.
この車はどこか具合が悪いようだ。It seems that something is wrong with this car.遠くから見れば、その丘は象のようだ。Seen from a distance, the hill looks like an elephant.
喉が渇いているようでしたら、ご自由に飲み物を取ってお飲みください。Feel free to get yourself a drink if you are thirsty.


























































人生をよくも悪くもうけいれなくてはならない。We must accept life, for good or for evil.


























































彼はその役職を辞した。He resigned from the post.











ようするに私たちの努力はすべて無に帰した。In short, all our efforts resulted in nothing.日本の高い家計貯蓄率にはいくつかの理由があるが、中でも家を買うために貯金しようとする人々の欲求に帰せられる。A high household savings rate in Japan is attributed, among other things, to people's desire to save money to buy a home.































































３０階建の超高層ビルが突然爆発炎上した。All of a sudden, the thirty-story skyscraper went up in flames.


























































































その靴下工場では一日６０万足の靴下が製造されている。The hosiery factory produces 600,000 pairs of socks a day.






























雨に降られてぬれちゃったよ。I was caught in the rain and got wet.





















大きなステーキをぺろりと平らげた。I made very short work of the big steak.


































和子が胸をはだけて赤ん坊に乳をふくませた。Kazuko bared her breast and fed the baby.










































これより先通行禁止。No passage this way.







































資金難で我々は前途多難だ。Our future will be full of difficulties because of lack of funds.







間違えがもしあれば、直しなさい。Correct the errors if there are any.



























その庭園は荒れ地に変わりつつある。The garden is turning into a wilderness.






































































































































産科・婦人科の計６１床も満床で、受け入れは不可能と答えたという。They replied that because all 61 beds in the obstetrics/gynaecology department were full, no admissions were possible.






































































クレオパトラの鼻がもう少し低かったなら世界の歴史は変わっていたであろう。If Cleopatra's nose had been a little lower, the history of the world might have been different.





















「くだらねえ都市伝説だろう」「でも、火のないところに煙は立たないというけどね」"Probably just a stupid urban legend." "But they do say 'there's no smoke without fire', don't they?"






















































好機逸すべからず。この機に一気に仕事を仕上げてしまおう。This is a golden opportunity we'd be stupid to pass up. Let's get to work and finish it all in one fell swoop.








































































そんな失敗なんて気にするな。人の噂も七十五日。みんなすぐに忘れるさ。I wouldn't let a goof-up like that get to you. People have short memories and the one good thing about gossip is that it's short-lived.















































































































































事故で車は全損って嘆いているけどさ、怪我がなくてなにより、命あっての物種だよ。I know you're upset about your car being totaled, but you weren't injured and you should be thankful to be alive.




彼は、結婚するためにイランに帰るかもしれないと言いながらも、日本から帰った後の彼の計画は依然としてめどが立っていない。Although he says he might return to Iran to marry, his plans after Japan are up in the air.

































































































僕は若い頃は気短かだった。I was quick tempered when I was young.


ケーキ職人は小さい頃からの夢でした。From childhood I dreamed of being a pastry cook.


























































































































ビタミンＥを豊富に含む食物には、濃い緑色をした菜っ葉類・豆類・ナッツ類・全粒穀類がある。Foods rich in vitamin E include dark-green, leafy vegetables, beans, nuts and whole-grain cereals.
人参はビタミンＡをたくさん含んでいる。Carrots contain a lot of vitamin A.





風邪を引かないようにビタミンＣをたっぷりとりなさい。Take lots of vitamin C to avoid catching cold.



















































探検家が山中の道なき道を行った。The explorer pushed his way through the trackless mountain region.










































規則もへったくれもあるものか。To hell with conventions!




雨降って地固まる。Adversity strengthens the foundations.この種の洋服地は持ちがよくないだろう。The suit materials of this sort will not stand up well.彼女のドレスは青い地に白の水玉模様がある。Her dress has white spots on a blue background.
















































































































ああ、ああいうふうにやるんだな。Oh, so that's how you do it.








「情報スーパーハイウェイ」の真のインパクトは、情報インフラの構築により経済が従来のハードやモノづくり中心の実体経済から知識、情報、ソフトを主体とした経済に移行し、そこから生まれる新しい産業や経済活動にある。Forming an information infrastructure, the real impact of the information highway is an expectation of new economic development due to a shift from a tangible hardware-industry to brain-oriented software-industry.



































































































望遠鏡を通してみると、惑星はまったく新たな様相を呈する。Seen through a telescope, the planets take on a completely new appearance.














母は私がアルバイトをすることに反対なの。My mother objected to my working part time.

もちを食べている時にのどに詰まらせて窒息死する老人がたくさんいる。Many old people choke to death while eating mochi.




















































































実のところ、彼女はやけになって、有り金をみんな人にやってしまったのだ。To tell the truth, she gave away all her money to others in desperation.





私をどなり散らす人は気にならないわ。The ones who shout at me don't bother me.





























































この家のあるじは私だ。It is I who am head of this family.

















その俳優の死は各紙で大見出しで報じられた。The actor's death made big headlines in all the papers.



驚いたよ、あの男の大頭には。It's astonishing, the size of his head.
大汗をかいた。They sweated gallons.

船は大しけの中でも性能よく運航した。The ship performed well in the heavy storm.
年をとった馬鹿ほど大馬鹿はいない。There's no fool like an old fool.















































整備士さんのとこに持ってって、修理してもらいなよ。Take it to a mechanic, and get it fixed.





















































さすがは、王子様ですわね。きっとただならない傑物の素質をお持ちなのですわ。Isn't that just what you'd expect from the prince? He certainly has the character of a truly great man.









































叔母は非常なお金持ちだからといって、それだけ幸せというわけではない。My aunt is none the happier for her great wealth.
















アブミ骨は内耳の前庭窓に接している。The stirrup rests on the oval window of the inner ear.


















































































今年その地方は厳しいかんばつに見舞われた。This year the region has been hit by a severe drought.




































多くの場合、音楽を聴く時に心に浮かぶ映像はＣＤのアートワークです。In many cases, the image that comes to mind when you listen to music is that of the CD's artwork.


ボクシング・デイは、郵便屋さんや牛乳屋さんなどに贈り物をする日ですが、クリスマス後の最初の週日です。Boxing Day, when presents are given to the postman, the milkman, etc., is the first week-day after Christmas.



















































































































































































































































































そうなんです。私は忙しい仕事を忘れてくつろぐことができるでしょう。Yes, I will be able to forget my busy work and relax.






















































































































































メアリーは自分のピアノを売りに出した。Mary put her piano up for sale.














その絵はピカソが描いたものと思われる。The picture is presumed to have been painted by Picasso.











































なぜかうまくいかず、目下全戦全敗、「彼女いない歴＝自分の年齢」という寂しい生活を送っていました。For some reason it didn't go well, shot down at every attempt, and he led a sad "History of no girlfriend = Age" life.




































































































このため、会談の席の配置では米国と相対して座る場所を求めた。So they sought a place such that the conference seating would have them facing the Americans.





















































































































しかし王女は部屋に立てこもって出てこなかった。However, the princess had barricaded herself in her room and wouldn't come out.



































それは身の毛のよだつ思いだよ。That's a hair-raising thought.









































































































































































































トムはウェブカメラを買った。Tom bought a webcam.



フランス語とウェブ・デザインを勉強しています。I'm studying French and web design.




































無理もないわ、はじめのうちは、そんな風に感じるものよね。It's reasonable that you feel that way at first.

























































































































































































































































































































































この齧歯動物は冬に木の実を貯える。These small rodents store up nuts in the winter.


































































































































































































































































































































































スージーは私の何倍もの速さでタイプが打てる。Susie can type many times as fast as I can.






















































































話すことが多すぎて、どこから話し始めたらいいか分からない。There are so many things to tell you that I don't know where to start.




サラリーマンが罪ほろぼしに僻地でひっそりと暮らしはじめた。The salaryman went to live quietly in a remote area in order to atone for his sins.



























































倫理委員会では, クローン実験の一時停止が決定した。At the ethics committee, a temporary halt to cloning experiments was decided.
































































































彼が海外に行くなんて、想像がつかない。I can hardly imagine him going abroad.































































































































































































































ベルボーイがお部屋にご案内します。The bellboy will show you to your room.

彼はいつも時間を守る。He is always punctual.

































病気なのでご一緒できません。As I am ill, I will not join you.







彼らの離婚がしきりと近所のうわさに上がっている。Their divorce is much talked about in their neighborhood.彼はしきりと一財産作りたがっている。He is burning to make a fortune.











私は疲れていたが、それにもかかわらず眠れなかった。I was very tired, but I was nevertheless unable to sleep.
お金それ自体は何の意味もないものだ。Money, as such, has no meaning.





その少女はいつも母親のあとをついて回っていた。The girl was always following her mother.

















































































番号を奇麗さっぱり忘れてしまった。I completely forgot the number.























































































































































































































































































あなたはどこの国の出身ですか。Which country are you from?
最近、タチの悪い詐欺事件が多いわね。Recently there have been a lot of nasty incidents with fraud.






















僕は母のことを知らない。物心がつく前に、母が家を出て行ったからだ。I don't know anything about my mother. Before I was old enough to remember, she left our home.








































































































































































































































































































































































































町はその時以来ずいぶん変わった。The town has changed a great deal since then.











迷路の中で、道を間違えて、回り込んでしまった。I took the wrong path in the maze and ended up going round.



















私は彼に言い聞かせているが、彼はそもそも聞く耳を持たない。I've tried reasoning with him but he just won't listen.
























































































































彼女は汚れの無い心の持ち主です。She has a clean heart.









































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































すみませんがここではその処方薬は調合できません。Sorry, we can't fill this prescription here.















































































































































































































































































































































































































































チューダー朝は１６０３年に崩壊した。The Tudor Dynasty fell in the year 1603.






















































































































































































コロンブスがアメリカ大陸を発見したとき、バイソン（アメリカ野牛）は、広大な地域に棲んでいた。When Columbus discovered America, bison (American buffalo) inhabited a wide-ranging area.














なさけないの・・・ボディスラムくらいで、そんな死にそうな声、ださないでよ。That's pitiful ... don't put on such a death-bed voice from just a body slam.











































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































見た目には優しそうだけど、彼って皆から外柔内剛の結構なタフネゴシエータと言われているよ。He seems like a softy on the surface, but at the core he's got an iron will that makes him an extremely tough negotiator.



































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































一人はみんなの為に、みんなは一人の為に。それがチームプレイだ。All for one, and one for all. That's team play.
























































































































































































































































































































霧を通して、わずかに陸地をみわけることができた。The land could just be discerned through the mist.彼はわずかに１００冊の本しか持っていない。He has no more than one hundred books.
その絵は口で言い表せないほど美しい。The picture of beauty beyond description.











































































































































































捜査員らは暗殺計画を摘発しました。Investigators uncovered an assassination plot.

















































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































彼は価格変更のビラをはり出した。He put up a notice about the change in price.






































































































































































































































































































































































その子は遊び友達を欲しがっている。He wants a playmate.











































お会計はレジでお願いします。Please pay the cashier.












































二人は面と向かった。They confronted each other.





































私はバレーの踊りよりも人間が体を動かす方法に魅せられているのです。I am fascinated not so much by ballet itself as by the way the human body moves.











鳥は本能的に飛ぶことを覚える。Birds learn to fly by instinct.
















私は脇目もふらず道をまっすぐに歩いていった。I walked straight ahead without looking to the side.


















































































































































彼と一緒だと気が楽だ。I feel comfortable in his company.















こんな嵐の天候に出かけていくとは彼は気が変になっているにちがいない。He must be crazy to go out in this stormy weather.







































先生は、生徒の間違った答えを聞いて、ケタケタ笑った。The teacher laughed loudly when he heard the student's wrong answer.
































































おまえ、変わってるな。You're weird.














































































































































































































約束の時間に遅れた。I was late for the appointment.










































































彼の言葉は正論だったが、僕は心のどこかで引っかかりを感じていた。Even though what he said was sound, I still wasn't completely convinced.











































そのラジオはマッチ箱の大きさしかない。That radio is no bigger than a matchbox.



















































































































泥棒は真夜中にうろつき回る。Robbers prowl around at midnight.





















































































































































大学の門の前に真っ赤なフェラーリが停めてあるのを見て、アングリした。I saw a bright red Ferrari parked at the campus gates and my jaw just dropped.




























なあ、トム、悩みごとなんか忘れちゃって。Hey, Tom, forget about your worries.














































































































































































































































昨日の株価下落に伴い、今日の取引は低迷だった。Trading was slow today after yesterday's market decline.移転にともない５月３０日、３１日は休業いたします。Due to our office moving, we will be closed from May 30 to 31.





























彼って手の掛かる人だね。You really have to manage him carefully.













































息子は早くから政治に興味を持った。My son took an early interest in politics.























































その子供は、つまずいて転んで膝を突いた。The kid stumbled and fell to his knees.

























































































































ここ何日かの内に必ず私のところへ会いに来て下さい。Don't fail to come and see me one of these days.








































































































かつてサルタンが今日のトルコを統治していた。Once the Sultan ruled over what today is Turkey.









































































































































世間一般のホテルなみにいえば良い昼食会だった。It was a good luncheon, as hotels go.




















「広辞苑にこう書いてあります」と言って、広辞苑を唯一の拠り所に論陣を張る人がよくいる。There are a lot of people who say, "it says this in Koujien," and use that dictionary as the only grounds for their argument.

選挙では、保守派と革新派がせめぎ合った。In the election, conservatives and progressives were fighting each other.




































職業柄彼は数人の外国人と近づきになっている。His job has brought him in contact with some foreigners.












































読書をする時間さえもない。I don't even have time to read.



戦勝国は敗戦国に講和条件を指令した。The victorious country dictated the terms of peace to the defeated country.









































































私の仕事はいつも多すぎるか少なすぎるかのどちらかである。My work is always feast or famine.














賢明な経営者はコストをぎりぎりまでさげる方法を知っていますよ。A wise businessman knows how to clamp down on costs.



















彼女は多額の金を失うかもしれないと承知の上で一か八かやってみた。She took the risk, knowing that she might lose a lot of money.
その事故の報せは私には大ショックだった。The news of the accident was a great shock to me.











腹を割って話そう。Let's put all the cards on the table.































































































































君が彼女を好きであろうとなかろうと、彼女とは結婚できない。Whether you like her or not, you can't marry her.






























彼はためらわずに分け前を取った。He did not hesitate in taking his share of the money.
















































































































１時間かそこらで帰ってきます。I'll be back in an hour or so.
リンダは何でも自分の思いどおりにしようとする。Linda will try to have her own way in everything.









「時代はＢＬだよ」「びーえる？」「そう。ボーイズラブ。男の子同士の恋愛を扱った本とかのことだ」"It's the age of BL!" "Bee el?" "Yup, Boys' Love. Books and such dealing with romance between boys."















































二つ折り厳禁。Do not fold!
















恥の上塗りはよせ。Don't bring on any more shame.






























「ごきげんいかがですか」「おかげさまで元気です」"How are you?" "I am fine, thank you."



























































































































バッテリーは別料金になっております。The batteries are extra.








まず、私の活動範囲は、おもに養老川下流域です。First off, my area of work is mainly in the lower reaches of the Yourou River.



私は自分で行く代わりに、使いの者を送った。Instead of going myself, I sent a messenger.











彼は計画どおり仕事をやりとげた。He accomplished the work as planned.





























とても驚いたことには、ドアが音もなく開いた。Much to my surprise, the door opened noiselessly.














労働力不足の発生は経済の過熱兆候と見られている。The emerging labor shortage is viewed as a sign of economic overheating.













危険を避けて安全に生きるのが生存本能でしょうか。I wonder if keeping your head down and living safely is a survival instinct.












































何か偉大なことを達成するためにはたゆまず努力しなければならない。You must persevere before you can accomplish anything great.







































































































よーし！覚えてろ。後で悔やむなよ。All right! You will be sorry for this.













その水泳プールは近所の子供達みんなが共同で使っている。The swimming pool is used in common by all the children in the neighborhood.




















幸運の女神は冒険好きの人の味方だ。Lady Luck favors the adventuresome.

森林地はいくつかの農場に分けられた。The woodland was parceled into farms.
新しい学校の建設地については論争があった。There was a controversy about the location of the new school.






彼女は女子高校に通っている。She goes to a girls' high school.




















鮎漁が解禁になった。The ayu season has opened.




彼が彼女におわびをするのは理の当然である。It stands to reason that he should apologize to her.

























彼女は紅茶道具一式を買った。She bought a tea set.




































彼はESS(英語研究部)に入っています。He belongs to the ESS (English Speaking Society).



















































































その名にどこか聞き覚えがあった。That name struck a chord.


























































彼は若くて未経験だがやる気満々だ。He is young and inexperienced, but quite enterprising.


















































御家族はいかがお過ごしですか。How is it going with your family?
夜のとばりが下りつつある。Darkness is falling.



この犬は山岳地で人を救助するよう訓練されています。This dog is trained to save people in the mountains.








































































































































































そのころ彼はいつも飲んでばかりいた。He was always drinking in those days.



























































































































































民主党はまだ候補者を決めていないが、どっちにしても負けるに決まっている。The Democrats haven't decided on their candidates yet, but in any case they're sure to lose.

乞食は選択者にはなれない。Beggars cannot be choosers.
















































石綿金網を発見された場合飛散防止のため石綿の部分を水に濡らしてビニール袋に包み安全を確保して下さい。In the event that asbestos-covered mesh is found, ensure its safety by damping the asbestos portion to prevent dust release and wrapping in a plastic bag.








































































































































その革製の上着の両肘の部分が擦り減って穴があいた。The leather jacket has worn out at the elbow.



骨と皮ばかりにやせこけたねこでした。It was a cat starved to skin and bones.


翌月にはＮＨＬ初シャットアウトゲームを記録しＮＨＬスーパーゴーリーとしての才能を見せた。The next month he achieved his first NHL shutout and showed the talent of an NHL super goalie.












































バケツによる消火活動は、すぐに失敗と分かった。Attempts to fight the fire with buckets soon proved fruitless.








保険のテレアポでアポイントを取るコツです。It is the art of getting insurance appointments when telemarketing.





















































アンインストール方法：フォルダごとごみ箱にぽいっ。Uninstall method: Chuck the whole folder into the recycle bin.







































































私は冷凍野菜は買わずに、いつも生野菜を買います。I always buy fresh vegetables instead of frozen ones.




































もう少し諸規則の弾力的運用はできないか。Can't you apply the rules a little more elastically?
























































メモ用紙か何か貸してくれ。Lend me a memo pad or something.





彼の提案は問題にならない。His proposal is out of the question.彼らの意見はほとんど問題にならない。Their opinion matters little.





























オバマ候補の経済政策チームはどうやら錚々たる新自由主義者たちのようだ。Presidential candidate Obama's economics team seems to be made up of distinguished neoliberals.



























私たちがほかの事をするには遅すぎた。It was too late for us to do anything else.






一旦風呂＆飯落ち、４０分ぐらいして帰還！Break for bath & food, back in about 40 minutes!



いいか、よく聞いてくれ！Alright! Listen up and listen well!

















どう思うって・・・それじゃあ忌憚のない意見を言わせてもらうけどね。What do I think, you say ... well then, I'll give you my candid opinion.










彼らは抑揚のない声で５０まで数えた。They counted on monotonously to fifty.




非常に残念なことに地球は一秒で1900平方メートルが砂漠化している。Very regrettably, 1,900 square meters of land become desert every second.







































































その女は出てきたジンライムを一口で飲み干した。The woman downed the gin and lime that was served in one swallow.








当期純利益は５０億円の見込みで、前期とほとんど変わりません。Net profit for the period is estimated at 5 billion yen, largely unchanged from the previous one.





















イソップ童話に『すっぱい葡萄』という話があります。In Aesop's Fables is a story called "Sour Grapes".


















キューバリブレはラム酒をベースにしたカクテルです。A Cuba Libre is a cocktail with a rum base.





『何だこりゃ？』って思わず言いたくなるような変な車でした。It was the sort of weird car that made me want to blurt out, "what the heck is that?"







感情にはしるな。冷静になれ！Don't let your emotions rule you. Be calm!
感情にはしるな。冷静になれ！Don't let your emotions rule you. Be calm!























ふっ、禁断の魔術とやらは、俺には通用しないぜ！Hah, your 'forbidden magics' aren't going to work with me!
アラン君は運良く税理士試験に合格しました。Allan was lucky and passed the tax accountant examination.






























「陸に上がった河童」とは環境が変わったために能力を発揮できずにいることのたとえです。"A fish out of water" is a metaphor for being unable to use your talents due to a change of environment.

ふっ、禁断の魔術とやらは、俺には通用しないぜ！Hah, your 'forbidden magics' aren't going to work with me!







ウォータースライダーで水しぶきを上げて遊ぶ子供たち。Children enjoying making a splash in water as they come off a waterslide.




























第３四半期のＧＮＰ成長は前期比１％だった。The third quarter GNP growth was 1% over the preceding quarter.


ケリーは報道部を取り仕切っている。Kelly carries the news department.










あらごめんなさい。どうやら間違え電話をしてしまったようだね。Oh, I'm sorry. I guess I have the wrong number.






















































































私はただ、当てずっぽうを言ったまでだ。I said so only by guess.







妹は布を５ヤール買った。My sister bought five yards of cloth.













この口が裂けても言えません！I will never tell!
彼は口が裂けても「イエス」とは言わない。The word yes never escapes his lips.











































あんまお腹空いてないんだ。I'm not really hungry.






靜子が季節の移ろいを詩に綴りました。Shizuko composed a poem about the change of the seasons.















































































































このゲームは基本的にキーボードとゲームパッドで動くようになっていますがコンフィグだけはマウスしか操作できません。This game is basically designed for use with keyboard and gamepad but configuration can only be done by mouse.
このゲームは基本的にキーボードとゲームパッドで動くようになっていますがコンフィグだけはマウスしか操作できません。This game is basically designed for use with keyboard and gamepad but configuration can only be done by mouse.

ボスでもラスボスでも『にげる』は必ず成功しますのでピンチになったらにげましょう♪'Run away' will always work even with bosses and the last boss, so when you're in trouble let's run away.

















































































































































































おまえさんのおかげで私達はひどい目にあわされた。That is a fine fix you have got us into.
日本は唯一の被爆国である。Japan is the only nation to have been hit by nuclear bombs.















何が起こっても僕は気にしない。I don't care what happens.

さらに、即戦力となる政策関連の科学的成果や手段の提供が必要であると強調した。Moreover, they underscored the need for providing policy relevant ready-to-use scientific results and methodology.




























































































「あっ、後続のパーティが来たみたいだな」「あちゃー。休んでる間に追いつかれちゃったわね」"Ah, the trailing group has arrived." "Oh no. They caught up with us while we were resting."
































このソフトウエアはギブスサンプリングのアルゴリズムによりマルコフ連鎖モンテカルロ法の計算を行います。This software carries out Markov Chain Monte Carlo calculations by the use of Gibbs Sampling.
このソフトウエアはギブスサンプリングのアルゴリズムによりマルコフ連鎖モンテカルロ法の計算を行います。This software carries out Markov Chain Monte Carlo calculations by the use of Gibbs Sampling.



























































これらは一個売りします。These are sold in one's.













































イエスは、ガリラヤ湖のほとりを歩いておられたとき、シモンとシモンの兄弟アンデレが湖で網を打っているのをご覧になった。As Jesus passed along the Sea of Galilee, he saw Simon and his brother Andrew casting a net into the lake.
やがて起こる事件はその前に影を投げる。Coming events cast their shadows before.

アメリカは奴隷制を廃止した。America did away with slavery.


私は初心者なので「ガーター編みのマフラー」か「一目ゴム編みのマフラー」から始めようと思います。I'm a beginner, so I think I'll start from a 'garter stitch' muffler or a 'knit-one-purl-one stitch' one.
















































































魔王はついに気を失ってどうと倒れた。The demon lord finally lost consciousness and fell to the floor with a thud.

でかい顔してるじゃないか。You're being bossy, aren't you?













日本の米市場は輸入に対し閉ざされている。Japan's rice market is closed to imports.





































候補者たちは街頭に出て、せっせと愛想を振りまいています。The candidates are out kissing babies and pumping hands.
















































皿洗いを命じられて彼女は口をとがらせた。She pouted when she was told to wash the dishes.




















































国際監視団は投票の集計をしました。International observers counted up the ballot.





















































































契約の内容について弁護士が交渉団に助言を与えた。The lawyer counseled the negotiation team on the contents of the contract.
強盗団は今日、白昼堂々、もうひとつの銀行を襲った。The thieves knocked off another bank today in a daytime robbery.





人間楽ばかりしてるとダメになる。たまには、自分で自分の首をしめるくらい窮地に追い込むのもありだと思う。Comfort can spoil you. Once in a while, it can do you good to corner yourself.



真綿で首を絞めるような言い方をしないで、お願いだから、もっとはっきり言ってくれない。Stop trying to make us follow all these subtle clues. I wish you would say what you want to say more clearly.
雪が塀に吹き寄せて積み上がった。The snow banked up against the wall.

















































































彼は優れた調整役で、ずっとそのように見られていた。He is an excellent fixer, and has always been regarded as such.






見境なくセックスしまくる人はエイズなどの性病が怖くないのですか？Aren't people who have promiscuous sex afraid of VDs like AIDS?











































































ブレーキペダルを押して、ブレーキライトをつけてみてください。Press the brake pedal to turn on your brake lights.














































































ついに戦いの幕が切って落とされた。The war finally broke out.














彼はチョット口をつぐんだ。He closed his mouth for a moment.
































































裏から手を回してくれるよ。He can pull strings for you.
外科医に説得されて、彼は臓器移植手術を受けることにした。The surgeon persuaded him to undergo an organ transplant.









































その他にポケットに何を持っていますか。What else do you have in your pocket?






ゲームカセット一つ一つにかなりのお金を払う。I pay quite a sum of money for each game-cassette.









































































































































彼は満身の力を込めてそれを持ち上げた。He lifted it up with all his might.


















































私はきまりが悪くて彼女の目をまともに見ることができなかった。I was too embarrassed to look her in the eye.


















美しいバラもいつかは萎れる。The fairest rose is at last withered.





































































日本の農村風景は大きく変わったといわれています。It's said that Japan's rural landscape has changed greatly.








































彼の助けがなかったら、私は失敗したろう。Had it not been for his help, I should have failed.





















大草原には木が生えない。Trees do not grow on prairies.ローラ・インガルスは、大草原で育った。Laura Ingalls grew up on the prairie.





その答はピントがずれている。The answer misses the point.





























無農薬栽培とは、農薬を使わずに穀物、野菜、果物などの植物を栽培する方法です。Organic cultivation is a method of growing plants (grains, vegetables, fruit, etc.) without using agricultural chemicals.



アメリカ軍はイラクでの戦闘任務を完了することを発表した。American forces announced the completion of their mission in Iraq.
アメリカ軍はイラクでの戦闘任務を完了することを発表した。American forces announced the completion of their mission in Iraq.
英語の単語を何語知っていますか。How many English words do you know?








































































































































































































































































知っていることしかお話しできません。I can only tell you what I know.

























































彼女の美しさはたとえようもない。Her beauty is incomparable.













警察は空砲を撃った。The police officer fired a blank.



























































































































私は母なる自然を愛しています。I love mother nature.
















































































































アフリカ人は英語を自分の大陸の言語の１つと考えても不思議でない。It isn't surprising that Africans may think of English as one of their continent's languages.
日本円をアメリカドルに両替してください。Please change this Japanese yen to U.S. dollars.

























君がひどい目にあうことはないよ。No harm will come to you.それは決して消えることはない。That will never disappear.

























































































































































































































































































































































































































































その日その日で天気は変わる。The weather varies from day to day.










































































































































切れはずたずたに切り裂かれた。The cloth was torn to shreds.












































































































































好奇心は身を誤る。Curiosity killed the cat.




























































































































































彼女は恋に身を焦がしている。She's giving herself up to love.










































































このことは彼等が他の諸国民と何も共通点がないことを意味するものではない。This does not mean that they have nothing in common with other peoples.
















































































































それはどうかと思いますね。I wouldn't be so sure about that.



















悪政に苦しむ国民を無視するわけにはいけません。We must not ignore populations suffering under misgovernment.



























































































































































































このテレビドラマの警官は職権を乱用する汚職警官みたいです。It seems that the policeman in this TV series is a dirty cop who abuses his authority.






彼女は会う人すべてに自分の不幸な身の上話をする。She tells her tale of misery to everyone she meets.


















































































辰雄は航空機の着陸装置を見るのが好きです。Tatsuo likes looking at aircraft landing gears.
































私にご用でしたらどこかその辺にいます。If you need me, I'll be somewhere around.

































































































大抵の学芸は、最初に基礎をしっかりやっておかないと、その先スムーズに身に付けることができません。With most of the arts, if you don't get the basics down properly then it is difficult to acquire further skills.















































































































































































































高くてとても手が出ないよ。I can't afford to buy it.















































































































































































































































































































































































彼は最終電車に乗り遅れた。He missed the last train.











彼女を見てぽっとした。He saw her and blushed.




もう少し右の方へ―ようし！A little more to the right, just like so!「キャッチボールしようか」「よし、是非やろう」"How about playing catch?" "Sure, why not?"



















































































































































































































































































カール・ランジの記録破りの幅跳びに、観衆は息を呑んだ。Karl Lange's record breaking long jump took the crowd's breath away.




彼女は中年の都会派プロフェッショナルでした。She was a middle-aged urban professional.











僕たちは大学へ行くべきか否かを決めかねている。We cannot decide whether to go to college or not.



























私のためにご心配はご無用に願います。Please don't take any trouble on my account.































驚いて彼女は目を丸くした。Her eyes become round in surprise.











その消防夫は勇敢にも燃え盛る家から赤ん坊を救った。The brave fireman rescued a boy from the burning house.






































































































上司は私が提案した企画をいきなりボツにしてしまった。こうなるといつまでここで働いていたものかどうか確信がもてない。After the hatchet job my boss did on my proposal, I'm not sure how long I want to keep on working here.








ボブとルーシーは交際をやめたということだ。I hear that Bob and Lucy have broken up.
私たちには内緒ごとは何もない。We have no secrets from each other.





いっそのこと初めから家にいたほうがよかった。With all that we might have been better off just to have stayed home.


それは実際にあった事だ。That is an actual fact.



























私たちは週ぎめでアパートを借りた。We rented the apartment by the week.













































































彼らはお互いに身振りで意思を伝え合った。They communicated with each other by gesture.

























































彼は美術工芸を学校で教えている。He teaches arts and crafts in a school.
















































専門ガッコのタメだよ。They're buddies from my technical school.

両者の間には、あったとしても、相違はごくわずかである。There is little, if any, difference between the two.



あなたは理科系の大学に進んだほうがいいよ。You should go on to a technical college.


















































































































































































































































































































































































































彼がその長距離走に優勝しようと心に決めていたことなど、私達はだれも知らなかった。None of us knew his decision to win the long-distance race.



























お金が足りなくて、私の旅行計画は中止になった。Lack of money brought my travel plans to an end.

女ってどうして連れションしたがるの？物凄く理解不能。Women - why do they want to go to toilet in groups? I don't get it at all.





















深刻な就職難のしわ寄せが、そういった不法就労の外国人労働者にまで及んでいる。The serious job shortage is also affecting those illegal foreign workers.



彼女が結婚したということを風の便りに聞いた。I heard from someone that she got married.








































子供の使いじゃあるまいし、もうちょいとまともな交渉してくれんかね。What are you, just an errand boy? Start thinking for yourself and give me something serious to work with.
自由の女神はアメリカの象徴である。The Statue of Liberty is a symbol of America.







この計算機は調子が良くない。Something is wrong with this calculator.今朝は体の調子がよい。I feel good this morning.


















































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































見かけ通り彼女は行動力がある。She is as active as she looks.































































































































































今日は魚の食いつきがいい。The fish are striking well today.













































































彼はざぶんと水に飛び込んだ。He jumped into the water with a splash.



























































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































敵はもう袋のネズミだ。The enemy is caught like a mouse in a trap.
























選手達の平均身長はどのくらいですか。What is the average height of the players?


彼のいう事は簡にして要を得た。What he said was brief and to the point.



















































































































































もっとのちにそのことを説明します。I'll explain the matter to you later on.





























































アメリカでは、犯罪人を収容する刑務所のための場所以上に犯罪人がいるのでいつも刑務所は定員オーバーの状態である。In the U.S., there are more prisoners than there is jail space for them. So the prisons are overcrowded.



























このまま行くと、５年後日本が衰退しているのは、火を見るより明らかである。If we continue like this, it's as clear as day that the Japan of five years on will be in decline.












彼のことを仕事の虫だと言うけれど、仕事をしているときが一番楽しいという人間もいるんだよ。You say he is a workaholic, but you know there are some people who feel happiest when they're working.







リンダはぺろりと舌を出した。Linda stuck her tongue out.




















































































私に割り当てられた部屋は、義理にも居心地がよいとは言えなかった。In all honesty, I could not say the room allotted to me was comfortable.

































































































チームきっての名選手がけがしなかったら、うちのチームが簡単に勝っていただろう。Our team could easily have brought home the bacon, if it weren't for the team's best man being injured.






















彼らはその間ずっとしゃべり通しだった。They kept talking all the time.




































子供にだってそんな事は分かるよ。Even children can understand it.今日この番組でハッカーの問題をクローズアップするんだって。This program is going to focus on computer hacking issues today.明君って毎週金曜日に弓道をするんだって。I hear Akira practices archery every Friday.
いまそれを直そうったって無駄だ。It's no use trying to fix it now.















































































































少年はその贈り物に目を輝かして喜んだ。The boy was bright-eyed with delight at the present.
















































































































































































































































































































































彼は品がない。He is a common sort of man.

























毎週、月火はピアノ、水金はダンスを習ってるの。Every week I study piano on Monday and Tuesday, and dancing on Wednesday and Friday.
























































どの新聞にも彼の詳しい人相書きが載った。A full description of him has been circulated in every newspaper.朝日新聞にはそのニュースは載っていない。The Asahi Shimbun did not carry that news.











































































































































メアリーはトムの高校時代の片想いの相手だった。Mary was Tom's high school crush.
私はその点で彼と意見が一致した。I agreed with him on that point.














































彼は片膝をついて身をかがめた。He ducked down on one knee.














































誰一人、自分が間違っていることを認めようとしなかったので、議論は延々と続いた。The argument lasted a long time because nobody would admit to being in the wrong.








ニューヨークはアメリカの株取引の中心だ。New York is the center of America's stock exchange.





















































































































彼は我々の決定に圧力をかけた。He brought pressure to bear on our decision.













彼はその犯罪の凶悪性に気づいていなかった。He was unaware of the enormity of the offense.






















































３人にはこの食事で十分だ。This meal is adequate for three.
私たちの市の動物園は大きくて新しい。The zoo in our city is large and new.その部屋は広くて明るい。The room is spacious and light.彼は帽子を取って、丁寧にお辞儀した。He took off his hat and made a polite bow.
































































私は数年前に彼女に会ったことを忘れていた。I had forgotten that I had met her several years ago.父は数年前に仕事から退職した。My father retired from his job several years ago.







































その小説を読むことはそれだけの価値がある。It is worthwhile reading the novel.

































この弓は張りが強いです。This bow has a strong draw.

















ここが思案のしどころだ。This is the point we need to think about.

































































































男性の方が女性より肌が脂っぽいって本当ですか？Is it true that men have oilier skin than women?









ここにとどまっていても何の得もない。There is no advantage in staying here.















































































































































製造業に比べて大きく遅れをとっている非製造業における生産性向上、それも設備投資の活性化により内外価格差の是正と成長力を確保するというのがベストシナリオだ。The best way for adjusting the gap between the internal and the external price and securing economic growth is to promote the non-manufacturing industry's productivity by aggressive investing in facilities.






































































１９９０年代は湾岸紛争で始まった。The 1990s began with the Gulf incident.



























彼は戦争が早々と終わるとあてこんでいた。He gambled on the war coming to an early end.































































豊かさの配分は大問題だね。How to distribute abundance is a great problem.








































魚の骨がつかえて息が詰まりそうだった。I nearly choked on a fishbone.






























































































































そうとも言えるね。I suppose you could say that.


























































































老後を安心して暮らしたかったら今から貯蓄を始めなさい。If you want security in your old age, begin saving now.






























































最も多くを制する者は、なるべくなりをひそめる。They that govern the most make the least noise.











そのサッカーの試合は大観衆を引き付けた。The soccer game attracted a large crowd.


























































































































































































































































































































彼は稀に見る勤勉な男だ。He is as diligent a man as ever lived.
あなたは泳げますよね。You can swim, can't you?













































































































































































































































脳手術の最中は、医者も看護婦も慎重に、しかもできるだけ迅速に患者を扱わなければならない。While a brain operation is being performed, both doctors and nurses must handle the patient with kid gloves and yet with all speed practical.







































その製造業者はその新しい機械を５年間保証した。The manufacturer guaranteed the new machine for 5 years.






































































































この川の幅が１マイルある。This river is one mile across.


































混戦模様となったレースだが、四宮は集団をラップしたこともあり、終盤、確実にタイミングよくポイントを重ね優勝した。The race developed into a free-for-all but Shinomiya lapped the group and in the final stage steadily piled on points with good timing to achieve victory.























































































































































































































エアコンをつけっぱなしにしないで。Don't leave the air conditioner on.











































































































ペールエールはアルコール含有量の少ないビールだ。Pale ale is a low-alcohol beer.














































































































































































































ある程度までその噂は本当だ。The rumor is true to some extent.





































































































































コーヒーを一杯飲むと頭が冴える。I feel more alert after drinking a cup of coffee.




































































営業員をこの新しい取引先に派遣してください。Please send your sales reps to this new account.


























































君は車を運転するときにどんなに注意深くしてもし過ぎることはない。You cannot be too careful when driving.































































































老人は人生がいたずらに過ぎてしまったのはなぜだったのかと考えた。The old man wondered why life had passed him by.

































最後に出て行ったのは背の高い男で、顔は青白く、つややかな黒い髪をしていた。The last to leave was a tall man, with a pale face and smooth, black hair.
















明日のお天気はどうかしら？I wonder what the weather will be tomorrow.































































私が会いたいのは彼女なんです。It is her that I want to meet.海外旅行は私の楽しみの一つなんです。Traveling abroad is one of my favorite things.

















彼女には欠点があるから僕はより一層彼女が好きだ。I love her all the more for her faults.


























































この悪い天気はもうたくさんだ。We've had enough of this bad weather.





































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































彼は最悪の事態を覚悟した。He prepared for the worst.















































































































































































































































































本来は、貧困層の女性や子供に医療保護を提供するために創設された制度である、アメリカ低所得者医療扶助制度が、今日では、その予算の約３分の１を老人に費やしている。Medicaid, a program originally created to provide medical care for poverty-level women and children, today spends almost a third of its budget on elderly people.



















































































































































































































































































































































































関わり合いになったら、ドスどころかチャカが出てきそうだ。Mess with them, and they won't just pull shivs on you; they're probably packing heat.









































今晩そちらにお電話いたします。I'll call you up this evening.

































































































































































































































































治療は苦痛を長引かせた。The treatment prolonged the agony.













































































































電話で良の声を聞いたら胸がいっぱいになった。I got all choked up when I heard the voice of Ryo over the telephone.

























我々は殺人者に対する怒りで胸一杯になった。We were filled with anger against the murderer.私は庭の花の香りを胸一杯に吸い込んだ。I breathed the smell of the flowers in the garden.










































































































私はポップコーンを２袋買った。I bought two bags of popcorn.


































































































































































































ハンプダンプティは塀の上；ハンプダンプティは落っこった；王様の馬と王様の家来を連れてくる；ハンプダンプティを元通りにできなかった。Humpty Dumpty sat on a wall; Humpty Dumpty had a great fall. All the King's horses and all the King's men couldn't put Humpty Dumpty together again.


































































































































































トムはエントリーシートを書いている。Tom is filling out a job application form.






























































































































彼はそのあいだずっとタバコを吸っていた。He kept on smoking all the time.



























































































































































































そんなことをするくらいなら飢え死にしたほうがましだ。I might as well starve as do such a thing.


















































































































































































































































































両天びんにかけようたってそうはいきませんよ。You can't have it both ways.













































ここのところ書籍の価格が上がっている。The price of books is getting higher these days.










































若い時は二度ない、どんとやれ、男なーら、人のやれないことをやれ。You're only young once. Be a man and take on the world.








































































































































































僕は水泳が下手やねん。I'm not very good at swimming.
































































































































































































































































































うわっ？これ、勉強に運動神経、全てのパラメータがMAXじゃないか！おまけにお金もカンストするまで貯まってる・・・すげえ。Wha? Study, reflexes, all the parameters are MAX! You've even saved money up to the limit ... Amazing.


















































































































































































ギプスのせいで左手の自由がきかない。I can't use my left hand because of the plaster cast.










































































































































































































































































































































































健康はお金よりも大切だよ。Health is more important than money.人の幸福は財産よりも人間性で決まる。A man's happiness depends on what he is rather than on what he has.


















仕事をしているというよりかは、ただ会社にいるだけって感じ。Instead of being here to work, you get the sense that he's simply a permanent fixture here.























自分の直感が、いかに確かなものか自慢した手前、当てがはずれた時は首をやらなければならなくなった。Having boasted how sure his hunches were, he was forced to eat his hat when he guessed wrong.











































































































































この学校の３分の２が男子生徒です。Two-thirds of the students of this school are boys.
















































それでは、習慣は人間生活の偉大な道しるべである。Custom, then, is the great guide of human life.



















お母さんの身になってごらんなさい。Try putting yourself in your mother's shoes.








































































































































































































































さしつかえなければ遠慮していただきたいのですが。I'd rather you didn't, if you don't mind.


きゃ〜、データが消えた！Oh, I lost the data!





























ホームズさんにお会いしたいのですが。I would like to see Mr Holmes.




























































































ここら辺には見るべきところがたくさんあります。There are a lot of places to see around here.













































































彼はいいね。打てば響くようにすぐ動いてくれるよ。He's a good kid - very quick on the uptake and he does whatever needs to be done.





































あんな男に金を貸すとは、君はどうかしているよ。You are crazy to lend money to him.













































































































































































































学校での銃乱射事件はこの半年で3回目だ。This was third school shooting incident in six months.





































































































































































































































うなるほど金を持っている。He's in the money.


































それは身に余る光栄でございます。The honor is more than I deserve.


































明日ナンシーのお別れ会を開きます。We'll have a farewell party for Nancy tomorrow.














私は減税に大賛成だ。I'm very much in favor of cutting taxes.




彼はとっつきやすい人だ。He is a friendly person.










彼は自分の子供達の教育の問題を妻に任せきりだった。He always left the problem of his children's education to his wife.






















彼は頭を棚に強くぶつけて大きなこぶを作った。He banged his head against a shelf and got a big lump.私に泥をぶつけて、泥だらけになった。He threw mud at me and made me dirty.選挙民は投票によって不満をぶつけています。Voters are taking out their frustrations at the polls.






























































この物語の女主人公は幼い少女です。The heroine of this story is a little girl.
いざとなったら、傘が武器の代用になる。My umbrella will serve for a weapon, should the occasion arise.



































私語をやめて話を聞け。Stop talking and listen to me.






































































































諸君らのたゆまぬ努力と労働によって、ついに我らがアジトが完成した！！Ladies and Gentlemen, thanks to your untiring efforts our hideout is finally complete!!


































































































私のアパートは日当たりがいいんです。My apartment gets plenty of sunshine.

















































































































































































































































２人とも今日は大活躍だったみたいね。先生も鼻が高いわ。You've both been very impressive today. I'm proud of you.


































あなたはどのようにしてその問題を解いたのですか。How did you solve the problem?



















それは間違いなく空飛ぶ円盤だったのだ。It was a flying saucer all right.

どう見ても彼らの行動は実を結んでいない。To all appearances, their actions haven't borne fruit.















無駄にした時間を取り戻しさえすれば。All you need to do is get back the time you have wasted.



彼らはお隣同士です。They are next door neighbors.







































彼の論文は全体的にみて満足のいくものでした。His paper was, on the whole, satisfactory.





金はいくらも持ってない。I have little money.




































































































まとめて洗濯していいですか。May I wash all my laundry at once?





遺伝子組み換え食品を食べるのは危険だと思いますか？Do you think it's dangerous to eat genetically modified food?





































































































２匹犬を飼っているが、１匹は白でもう１匹は黒だ。I have two dogs. One is white and the other black.






















































































































































































































































彼女がその本を読み始めたと思ったらすぐに、誰かがドアをノックした。She had hardly begun to read the book before someone knocked at the door.もしこれが間違っていると思ったら遠慮なく言いなさい。If you think this is wrong, you must speak out.















































































































































白黒つけろ。Get it settled once and for all.


























彼は、どんなに飲んでも全く素面にみえる。Regardless of how much he drank, he seems as sober as ever.あの時は素面だったのですか。Were you sober at that time?




















































































































































しばらくして彼はわけのわからぬことをしゃべり始めた。He began to talk nonsense after a while.




























彼の名演技に観客はやんやの喝采を送った。His great performance drew thundering applause from the audience.





















































































































































そんなことやっても時間の無駄にすぎない。Trying to do such a thing is a waste of time.




私はこのあたりで少し買い物をしたい。I want to do some shopping around here.




えっ、結納品にン十万円？Eh? Hundreds of thousands of Yen plus betrothal gifts?


どんな犠牲を払っても、それをやりとげるつもりだ。I will accomplish it at all costs.





































控え目に言っても彼は関心事が多すぎる。He has too many interests, to put it mildly.











































































彼女は本当のことを言ったほうが身のためだと悟った。She realized that she had better tell the truth.


































































































彼はヒザの力が抜けた。His knee gave way.











































僕が時間を無駄にしてるって思ってる？Do you think I'm wasting my time?






















なんてことだ！うちが燃えている！Oh, no! My house is on fire!




もう一杯飲もう。そうしたら、家まで送っていくよ。Let's have one more drink, and then I'll take you back home.





















柔よく剛を制す。Soft words win hard hearts.


彼は口下手で、お世辞にも要領がいいとは言えませんが、それだけかえって私は彼が好きなのです。He may be a poor talker and far from shrewd, but I like him all the better for that.








































もうちょっと暖かかったら、庭でお茶を飲むことができるのだが。We could have our tea in the garden, were it a little warmer.













新しい橋の建設が進行中だ。The new bridge is in process of construction.



















































































































































































































































君のジョークはひどすぎた。You went too far in your joke.








































頑固なのは父譲りだ。I've got my stubbornness from my father.


このスープはほんのわずか塩がたりない。This soup needs just a touch of salt.

ホールに入りきれないほど客がきた。More guests have come than the hall can hold.

暴動は手が付けられない状態だった。The riot was completely out of control.











































































彼女のスカートは完全に流行遅れです。Her skirt is totally out of fashion.

















冗談を言う気にはなれない。I don't feel like joking.















真夏日には屋内にひっこんで太陽を避けるしか手がないよ。All I want to do during the dog days is stay indoors and keep out of the sun.



あなたの行為は私の期待にそわない。Your behavior does not come up to my expectations.









































世間知らずにもほどがある。井の中の蛙大海を知らず、ということかね。I can't believe you're so clueless. You're like a babe in the woods.


























ローストビーフにはたいていヨークシャープディングがついている。Roast beef is usually accompanied by Yorkshire pudding.









































































































































スポーツ界はこの際、犯罪組織との癒着を一掃すべきです。The sports world should, at this time, eliminate the collusion with criminal organizations.



















































彼の言葉は正論だったが、僕は心のどこかで引っかかりを感じていた。Even though what he said was sound, I still wasn't completely convinced.






































































私は率直に意見を述べる人を尊敬します。I admire a person who expresses a frank opinion.
























私は何としてでも自分の目的を成し遂げます。I will accomplish my purpose at any cost.
















彼の正位置はサードだ。His normal position is third baseman.














この数年間に彼は不朽の名詩を書いた。During these years he wrote immortal poems.








彼らはトランプをして時間をつぶした。They killed time playing cards.


そうやってしつこく彼女を困らせると、彼女も怒り出すぞ。If you persist in bothering her like that, she'll lose her temper.





















すてきな贈り物をいただきご親切に有り難うございました。It was very kind of you to give me a nice gift.









プラスチックは割れにくい。Plastic does not break easily.



欠点があるけどやはり彼が好きです。I love him despite his faults.「そうか。やはり私のほうが年を食ってる。私は今年で２０うんたら才だ」「いや、わかんねーよ」"Oh? Then, as I expected, I've been around longer than you. This year I'm 20-mumble years old." "What does that tell me?"止むを得ず訪問するのはいやだったが、やはりしないわけにはいかなかった。I disliked the idea of the necessary call, but it had to be done.
メキシコと言えば、やっぱタコスでしょ。Mention Mexico, and tacos come to mind.













学生会館は学生のためにある。The student hall is for benefit of the students.

































ギプスのせいで左手の自由がきかない。I can't use my left hand because of the plaster cast.



大家さんは家賃をあげたいそうだ。The landlord says he wants to raise the rent.




























ことによると、きみにも一緒にきてもらう。Maybe you'd better come with us.





















新しい車の調子がいま一つです。操縦がきかない。I had trouble with the new car. It was difficult to steer.

















































































































































































ごめん！今日夕飯準備してないんだ。疲れて、それどころじゃなかったの。Sorry I haven't fixed dinner tonight. I was so tired there was just no way.




















超軽量新素材の採用により、従来の約半分（当社比）という圧倒的な軽さを実現！As a result of new ultra-light materials, our product now only weighs about half as much as before!








































































彼らは王の敵に回った。They were ranged against the king.












弱気が美人を得たためしがない。Faint heart never won fair lady.








































彼は愛想よく話し掛けてきた。He spoke to me pleasantly.






























































































ねぇ、頼むから信じてくれよ。Oh please, believe me.





















彼の過去の成功は何にもならない。His past successes count for nothing.


































































お願いだから泣かないで。Please don't cry.










































































２月２７日（月曜日）のお約束の確認ですが、午前１０時に貴社にお伺いするということでしたね。This is to confirm the appointment we made to meet at your office at 10:00 am on Monday, February 27th.



















































ねえ蓮、お姉さんが手をつないであげようか？キミは毎年すぐにはぐれちゃうもんね。By the way, Ren. Should I take your hand? Every year you wander off.






























































































































































































































































































































日本にあるインドカレー屋のカレーって、やっぱり日本人の口に合わせて本場よりマイルドに作られてるよね。The curry they serve in Japan is milder than real Indian curry. They adapt it to Japanese tastes.




















































































































これらの製品の新たなる販路を開拓せねばならない。We have to find a new market for these products.

































千代の富士は、向かうところ敵無しだった。Chiyonofuji carried all before him.



















































彼女が胸がすくような啖呵を切りました。She got it off her chest in no uncertain terms.































































































１つが通り過ぎたかと思うと、すぐに次の台風が接近する。No sooner has one typhoon passed than the next one approaches.クリスがどんなにむかつくかと思うと、頭が痛くなりそう。My head starts to hurt when I think about how annoying Chris is.













その新聞の発行部数は競争紙の三分の一に過ぎない。The circulation of the newspaper is only one-third that of its competitor.














































































さて本題に入ろうか。Well, let's get down to business.















どうもコンピューターの調子が悪いようだ。It seems that something is wrong with the computer.






















































私の心臓が止まるような気がした。My heart stopped beating.
























































































トムは礼儀知らずだ。Tom has no manners.














































このご婦人が通れるように道をあけてください。Please move out of the way so this lady can go through.





























































彼は家族に別れを告げた。He said goodbye to the family.

























専務取締役にご就任されるとのこと、おめでとうございます。I was delighted to hear of your promotion to Senior Managing Director.






















月の裏側には秘密基地がある。There is a secret base on the other side of the moon.
テレビではタブー語を言っちゃいけないんだ。You can't say four-letter words on TV.




学ぶことをやめたら、人は死んだも同然である。The man who stops learning is as good as dead.

































彼女は涙まじりに話した。She told her story in tears.
ここは、私たちが初めて出会った忘れられない場所だ。This is the unforgettable place where we met each other for the first time.

私を睨み返した少女は怒っていた。The girl staring back at me was angry.
私の家では母がにらみをきかせている。My family is under the control of my mother.









そのおてんば娘は危険をものともせずにその木に登った。The reckless girl climbed the tree regardless of danger.






















































砂をかむように味気ないね。It's dry as dust.




















































僕は彼女とかかわったために身も心もずたぼろにされてしまった。My involvement with her left me a physical and mental wreck.
警察はそういう暴力と太刀打ち出来なかった。The police were unable to cope with such violence.物は試しにやってはみたけれど、このプログラムつくり、僕が太刀打ちできるような簡単なものじゃなかったね。I gave it a try figuring that anything is worth a try. But putting together a program like this is something I'm no match for.


























妻を亡くして彼は身も世もないほどに悲しんだ。When his wife died he was full of heartrending grief.














































彼女は名演説をした。She made a good speech.
彼の名演技に観客はやんやの喝采を送った。His great performance drew thundering applause from the audience.


















私達はもっと自然を大切にしなければならない。We must treasure nature more.妹は自分のすべての持ち物を大切にする。My sister takes care of everything she possesses.





































見積書には配送料と保険料についての記載がありませんでした。We found that there is no information about freight or insurance in your quote.









彼のあの態度、感じ悪いわね。That attitude of his is quite disgusting.



















測定には寸分の狂いもない精度が要求される。Flawless precision is required in the measurements.




















郵政事業は政府の独占事業です。Postal services are a government monopoly.

僕はもう君がぐちをこぼすのを聞き飽きている。I'm getting sick of hearing you complain.
メアリーは遊園地で一人で泣いている男の子を見つけて、やさしく声をかけた。「ねえ、ぼく、どうしたの？ 迷子になっちゃったの？ お姉ちゃんが迷子センターに連れてってあげようか？」In the amusement park Mary found a boy on his own weeping, and spoke to him gently. "Hey, sonny, what is it? Are you lost? Would you like me to take you to the Lost Children Department?"



















































































極小の虫でも踏まれれば、そりくり返る。Even the smallest worm will turn if trodden on.












食べ物が無駄になるのを見るのはいやだ。I don't like to see food go to waste.











あのフットボール選手はガタイがいい。That football player is gigantic.
高給取りだからずいぶん貯まったでしょう。With that big salary you're getting I guess you've saved up quite a lot.












このビールはアルコール分が５％だ。This beer contains 5% alcohol.








































































水を出しっぱなしにしておくな。Don't leave the water running.


































せきには塩水のうがいが効く。Gargling with salt water helps stop coughing.













































会計係が逮捕されたが、原因は彼の裏帳簿工作だという噂があった。When the accountant was arrested, rumour had it that it was for his creative bookkeeping.





長いこと贅沢三昧に暮らしていた彼らが、今になって何もない質素な生活に耐えるなんてとても無理な話だ。They lived high on the hog for so long, and now they can't adjust to a simple life without luxuries.
























































反抗はいつの世でも金になる。Rebellion it always sells at a profit.
























































































ご覧のように私はまだ生きているし、それがいちばん大事なことだと父も言っている。As you can see, I'm still alive, and that's the main thing. My father, too, says that's what's most important.








































































その町のまわりには高い城壁がある。There are high walls about the town.

























































私は途中で彼とはぐれてしまった。I lost sight of him on the way.




















































































































































１０時前にはホテルを出発しなければなりません。さもなければマイアミ行きの電車を乗り逃がしてしまいます。We must leave the hotel before 10 a.m., otherwise we will miss the train for Miami.























ここだけの話だけれど和夫の妻は妊娠しています。It's just between you and me, but Kazuo's wife is pregnant.





























































































































































































































































































ネット上の不確実な情報を鵜呑みにしてはならない。You mustn't swallow unreliable information that's on the Web.


















毎日大食していると、ブクブク太り過ぎること間違いなし。If you pig out every day, you're sure to gain too much weight.









































































































































































私は地球外の知的生命が地球を見ていると信じている。I believe that an alien intelligence is watching the Earth.























































































































































その事故で両親を亡くした少女に同情せずにはいられなかった。I couldn't but sympathize with the girl who had lost her parents in the accident.


























































驚いたことにそれは一瞬にして姿を消した。To my amazement, it disappeared in an instant.



どこかおかしいと一目で私にはわかりました。I could tell at a glance that something was wrong.























「ハムレット」はこれまでで最もおもしろい戯曲だと言われている。It is said that "Hamlet" is the most interesting play ever written.





今まででお客は５人だけです。Up to now, only five guests have arrived.



































魚に塩とこしょうで味をつけた。I seasoned the fish with salt and pepper.












































































































見渡す限り海だった。There was nothing but the ocean as far as the eye could see.












































ネッドはユタ州の出身。Ned comes from the state of Utah.

































































すぐに起きなさい。そうしないと学校に遅れますよ。Get up at once, or you will be late for school.
































ベストを裏返さなくちゃ。表裏逆ですよ。You need to reverse your vest. It's inside-out!































































































この道具はなんの役にもたたない。This tool is good for nothing.


























































































悲観主義は、向上することを信じないのだ。Pessimism believes in no improvement.



















































































































































































彼は彼女に気づくことなく走り過ぎた。He ran past without noticing her.





























































この前の日曜日に小型トラックで家に帰ったのを覚えている。I remember riding home on a pickup truck last Sunday.































なかなか話が合うじゃないか。We speak the same language, don't we?































































































彼女は病気だったらしい。It seems that she was ill.

あした雨が降るんじゃないかと心配だ。I'm afraid it will rain tomorrow.あらかじめ準備しておこうじゃないか。Let's get things ready beforehand.


















私たちは、赤い糸で結ばれていたのよ。なんてね。We were destined to get married from the time we were born - Not!





































今日までいい天気でした。The weather has been good until today.「今日お父さんに会いに行く。進路相談だ」「いいですよ、そんなの」"I'm going to see your father today, about career counselling." "You don't need to bother with that."ある日、友人から「いい話があるから会わないか」と電話があり、友人の家へ出かけました。One day I had a phone call from a friend. "There's a nice little earner, won't you come round?" so I went to his house.


今日は実によい天気だ。It is truly a nice day today.



























































































































何時くらいまでなら電話してもいいですか。How late can I ring?









































あのチームはつわものぞろいだ。That team has nothing but strong players.

















彼はその船の水先人を勤めた。He served as the pilot of the ship.







これでさらに困ったことになるだろう。This will add to our troubles.




















彼女はさらにもっと美しい。She is even more beautiful.















もうそろそろ髪を切っても良いころだ。It's high time you had a haircut.もうそろそろそんなに怠けていないで少し仕事をしても良い頃だ。It is about time you stopped being so idle and did some work.























この証拠から、彼は犯人ではないということになる。From this evidence, it follows that he is not the criminal.

















































































彼女に金を貸すくらいなら海に捨てるほうがましだ。You might as well throw your money into the sea as lend it to her.















































彼は権力をほしいままにした。He exercised his powers to the full.




































































もう１０年経てばその町は変っているだろう。The town will change in another ten years.

訪ねてきてしばらくしてから、彼は突然立ち上がって別れを告げた。After a short visit he suddenly got up and took his leave.






























新聞に飛行機が消息を絶ったと書いてあった。The newspaper said that contact with the plane had been lost.















































































機械は多くの人手を省く。Machinery dispenses with much labor.人手が多ければ仕事は楽しい。Many hands make light work.




出来れば明日までに帰ります。I'll be back by tomorrow, if possible.















この赤いボタンを押すだけでいいのです。You have only to push this red button.
彼らのうちどちらがうまく歌えるでしょうか？Which of them can sing better?

こんな自分から抜け出せるのか。Will I make it through?いや、自分からやったんです。No, I did it on my own account.
もし彼の住所を知っていれば、手紙を書くだろうに。If I knew his address, I would write to him.
明日雨が降るだろうか。Will it rain tomorrow?



































































































































































































































































































彼の前途には一筋の希望の光もなかった。There was not a ray of hope before him.






































































その会社には誰でも資本参加できる。The company is open for equity participation by anybody.












































彼は居空きとして知られ、日中でも家に忍び込んで貴重品を盗むことで評判となっていた。He was known as a burglar of houses where occupants are present and had a reputation for sneaking in and stealing valuables even during the day.







































































































あいつはのらりくらりの仕事にお忙しい事だ。He is busy loafing on the job.
































































































































世界経済の回復はまだ視野に入ってこない。Recovery of the world economy is not yet in sight.


































あなたの興味を引くような本を読みなさい。Read such books as interest you.















































この花は美しいだけでなく、よい香りがします。These flowers are not only beautiful but also fragrant.









人生は思うようにはいかないものだ。Life doesn't always go the way we want it to.

幽霊でも見たかのように、彼女は茫然と立っていた。She stood transfixed as if she had seen a ghost.




















我々は互いにコミュニケーションをとる必要がある。We need to communicate with each other.











































彼は何事もなかったかのように話し続けた。He went on talking as though nothing had happened.





























あいつの馬鹿さ加減には、もう、あきれちゃうよ。It constantly appalls me how stupid he can be.















あの会社は先行き不安な商売をしています。That outfit is running a fly-by-night operation.




その洗濯機の使い心地はどうですか。How do you find your washing machine?










































































































































































この大学の学生の中には教師に対する口の利き方すら知らないものがいる。Some students in this university don't even know how to talk to teachers.





































彼は肥満体だ。He is overweight.

























































彼は飛行機事故で一命を取り留めた。He survived the plane crash.






























































































もちろん品も、そして郵送料すらも返ってこなかった。Of course, neither goods nor mailing fee returned.
















































































彼女ってまめだね。She doesn't have a lazy bone in her body.
あいつはギャンブラーとして名が通っている。That man is notorious as a gambler.


いずれにしろ、明日は列車に乗りなさい。In any case, catch the train tomorrow.



























ごゆっくりどうぞ。Take your time.
























































日がたつにつれて我々の運動ははずみがついた。As the days passed, our campaign grew in momentum.











彼女が子供の頃のことを言うのをよく耳にする。I often hear her refer to her childhood.







私は意に反して彼と結婚した。I married him against my will.























彼女が書いたことはある意味真実です。What she wrote is true in a sense.







































それは誰にだって同じ事だ。It's the same for everyone.
誰だって人前でからかわれるのは嫌だろ。Nobody likes to be made fun of in public.

































そして更に困ったことは、彼自身交通事故に遭ってしまった。And to make matters worse, he met with a traffic accident.


















この頃、気分が優れないんだ。I'm not feeling well lately.


たとえどんなことがあってもあきらめません。No matter what happens, I won't give up.




























登山隊は身の危険をそれとなく感じていた。The climbers were apprehensive of their danger.
私の主たる関心事はあなたの身の安全なのです。My primary concern is your safety.











































































私は父を大変誇りに思っている。I'm very proud of my father.


























歴史は、古い思想が新しい思想に道を譲りながら進行する。History goes on with old ideas giving way to the new.彼はすごいスピードで走りだした、すると人々は跳び退いて彼に道をゆずり始めた。He started to run very fast, so that people began to jump out of his way.




















ソクラテスは主神ゼウスを信じなかったので無神論の罪に問われた。Socrates was accused of atheism because he did not believe in Zeus.







慌て者なので彼はきっと早とちりをするだろう。Being a hasty person, he is likely to jump to conclusions.










































彼に頼っておけばいい。You can rely on him.
その映画を見ておけばよかったなあ。I wish I had seen the film.

赤白まだらのタオルを一本ください。A red and spotted white towel, please.



















































































































































































































































































































今まであなたが辿った道を見つめなおしてみましょう。Let's look at the path that you've walked so far.





































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































ありったけの貯金をはたいてこれを買った。I spent all the savings I had on this.



































































































































































































































































私は口がきけなかった。My tongue failed me.



































































君は彼の提案に賛成か反対か。Are you for or against his idea?
































































































































































彼は健康がすぐれず、辞職せざるをえなかった。He was compelled to resign on account of ill health.彼は煙草も吸わず、酒も飲まない。He neither smokes nor drinks.

































彼はオーバーに身を包んだ。He wrapped himself in his overcoat.
















それはいかんわい！That's not good.
















































































































まずは公式を暗記しなさい。First of all, learn the formula by heart.




















この本はこの詩人の最高傑作の一つだ。This book is one of the poet's best works.




















※基本的な禁止事項（誹謗・中傷の禁止等）は「はじめにお読み下さい」に記載してあります。必ずお読みください。* The basic prohibitions (No slander, libel, etc.) are noted in the "Read me first." Please be sure to read it.














彼は体の弱い子供だった。He was a weak and delicate child.







































































ウイリアムさんがベトナム戦争を経験しているってこと知りませんでした。I didn't know that Mr. Williams fought in the Vietnam War.











彼はいいね。打てば響くようにすぐ動いてくれるよ。He's a good kid - very quick on the uptake and he does whatever needs to be done.寝る前にテレビを消してよ、いいね。Turn off the TV before you go to bed, OK?
























































































































オー、かわいいかわいい私の娘よ。腰をおろして、肩の力を抜いて、目を閉じていなさい。"Oh, darling," she said, "sit down, relax, and close your eyes."


















































彼は時代の流れに遅れないようにしている。He is trying to keep up with the current of the times.
































































彼が戻ってきた時には、女は歩み去っていた。When he came back, the woman had walked off.



































































僕は興奮していて、何も喉を通らない。I'm too excited to eat anything.






























































はい。これならそらで歌えます。Yes. This one I can sing from memory.



一夏のアバンチュールを求めて南の島へ行きました。I went to the South Pacific for a summer of romantic adventure.













「どう思う？」「いや、賛成だ」"What do you think?" "Well, I'm for it."










実際のところ、このレストランの持主は僕の友人だ。As a matter of fact, the owner of this restaurant is a friend of mine.















































































































































ナンシーは自分では何も決められないんだ。Nancy can't decide anything for herself.





























あいつがガッツポーズするなんて、よっぽど嬉しかったんだろうな。It must have been something really big for him to strike a triumphant pose like that.


宣戦布告に至るまでの時期はこのような状況であったと言える。You can say that the circumstances were thus in the period leading up to the declaration of war.彼らは、カルカッタからニューヨーク市に至るまで、世界中に支部を持っている。They have branches all over the world, from Calcutta to New York City.






















































































































熱があるので身体中が痛みます。I have a fever and I ache all over.











































































その真実は彼をあっと驚かせた。The truth knocked the breath out of him.













































































































































































































































瞬くうちにテニスボール大の団子が消え去った。In the blink of an eye, the tennis-ball-sized dumpling had disappeared.




































彼は私たちの予想に反して落選した。He failed to get elected contrary to our expectation.


































公園の方に足を向けた。I walked toward the park.










このりんごはすっぱい味がする。This apple tastes sour.












自転車はキーと音を立てて止まった。The bike screeched to a stop.





































ボスの顔色に一喜一憂の毎日。こんな仕事やってられないよ。I can't keep this up. It's an emotional roller coaster around here and all we have to do is look at the boss's face to know whether everybody is going to be happy or sad.

























































































喉がいがらっぽい感じがします。My throat feels dry and raw and scratchy.





























彼は借金を踏み倒して姿を暗ました。He did not pay the debt and disappeared.
彼はどさくさにまぎれて行方をくらました。He disappeared, taking advantage of the confusion.






















































































すぐに手紙をかかなきゃいけないよ。You've got to write to him quickly.

今すぐにやらなくてはいけませんか。Do I have to do it right away?











































































































































































































































昨日、会社帰りに昔の彼女にバッタリ会った。Yesterday I was on my way home from work when I ran smack into my old girlfriend.














会社の利用規約を作成する際は、弁護士にご相談ください。Please consult with an attorney when creating your company’s terms of service.
















































































































































マーシャにその話をしたとき、いかめしい顔つきをした。Marcia looked grim when I told her the story.




































































































































































































































































































































































































死んだフリして難をのがれたそうです。He says he avoided the danger by playing dead.




















































































彼はあごを片手にもたせて食卓にひじを突いて座っていた。He sat at the table with his chin cupped in one hand.



























































































































































































































































私の連れは疲れすぎていて走るのはおろか、歩くこともできない、と言った。My companion said that she was too tired to walk, let alone run.

































































































































































































































































































































それは王その人であった。It was none other than the king.





































































































































































































それを思うだけでも気持ちが悪い。The very idea of it is disgusting.あの水を飲むと気持ちが悪い。I don't feel well after drinking that water.
































































































































































































































































































明日お暇ならば、京都のあちこちをご案内できます。If you are free tomorrow, I can show you around Kyoto.セミナーのご案内と共に、この情報を貴社内の担当の管理職にご転送ください。Please forward this message along with the seminar information to the appropriate managers in your firm.








































































































































彼は毎週欠かさず母親に便りをする。He never fails to write to his mother every week.













佳子ががりがり勉強している。Keiko is studying furiously.





































日本は非常に地震の害を受けやすい。Japan is very subject to earthquakes.

川越の山車は、いわゆる鉾山車と呼ばれる形で、車輪が3つ、もしくは4つ付いています。The Kawagoe festival float has the shape of what's called a hoko float. It has three, or four, wheels attached.































































































僕にアイスクリームとっといてよ。Save me some ice cream.













































































一行は苦労して登っていった。The party fought their way up.






















































































































今度の商売は、損して得取れ、という戦略でやろうよ。In our next line of business let's make it our strategy to win by losing.
























































「トムとジョンって一卵性双生児とは聞いてたけど、本当によく似てるよね？」「似てる似てる。親にも時々間違えられるって言ってたよ。あの二人はほんと、已己巳己だよ」"I heard that Tom and John are identical twins. They really do look alike, don't they?" "Yes, they really do look very similar. Even their parents say they get confused sometimes. Those two really are very similar, aren't they?"































勝利によって彼女の努力は報われた。Her efforts were crowned with victory.






























































































これが最近はやりの服ですか。Is this dress the latest fashion?







































私は思いきり働きたい。I will work to the best of my ability.彼女は僕の右足を思い切り蹴りつけた。She gave me a hard kick on my right leg.













1/4カットの白菜を太めの千切りにザクザク切る。Cut the quartered pak-choi into, slightly wide, strips.











































































































































上司は私が提案した企画をいきなりボツにしてしまった。こうなるといつまでここで働いていたものかどうか確信がもてない。After the hatchet job my boss did on my proposal, I'm not sure how long I want to keep on working here.
















































私たちはエレベーターで上がったり下がったりした。We went up and down in the elevator.










































どこをどう考えたら、俺がロボット工学に明るいなどと思うんだろうか。Where did you come up with the idea that I'm familiar with robotics and such I wonder?












俺は犬のフンなんてかたづけたくない。I don't wanna clean up dog shit.




















くそっ、また残業だ。Rats! I've got to work overtime again.






























ウラニウムは原子力製造に用いられる。Uranium is used in the production of nuclear power.
昨日ディズニーランドへ行きました。I went to Disneyland yesterday.































古きよき日々は去って、二度と戻らない。The good old days have gone, never to return.










































招待されたが、彼女はワールドカップを見に行かなかった。Though invited, she didn't go to watch the World cup.



























































１９７２年に、フランシーヌ・パターソン博士はココに手話を教え始めた。In 1972, Dr. Francine Patterson started to teach sign language to Koko.

















































































































































































































































































朝は４脚、昼は２脚、そして夕は３脚で歩くものは何か。What goes on four legs in the morning, two legs at noon, and three legs in the evening?










































当局は地域住民の頑強な抵抗にあった。The authorities met with unyielding opposition from the locals.


































































































































われわれのすべてが生まれつき音楽の才があるわけではない。Not all of us are born with musical talent.










































































































彼にはよくあることだがケアレスミスをする。He made a careless mistake, as is often the case with him.



























































一般常識を持っていますか。Does he have general common sense?



















































































































































うっかり口を滑らせると思わぬ結果を招くことが多い。A slip of the tongue often brings about unexpected results.















































何事かが今にも起こりそうなけはいを感じていた。He felt that something was about to happen.

































































































































































その食品はグルテンフリーです。This food is gluten-free.















































公衆の面前に姿を見せなければならないのが厭だった。He was annoyed at having to show up before the public.




























母は目に涙を浮かべて私を見た。Mother looked at me with tears in her eyes.
彼にはそんな扱いは必要ない。He doesn't need such treatment.





















うれしくて涙が出るよ。I could cry for joy.

彼女は勇気を持って行動した。She behaved with a great courage.






























































ロングスカートは今はやりだ。Long skirts are in fashion.




























息子を亡くした夫婦に誰もが同情した。Everyone sympathized with the parents about their son's death.

















この線はあの線に平行です。This line is parallel to that.











































































彼は息を凝らしてその光景を見つめていた。He was watching the scene with breathless interest.





















彼は自分の将来に思いをめぐらしていた。He was meditating on his future life.














頭が重いのです。My head feels heavy.


































































































































































その不動産屋は銀座で気前よく金を使った。The real estate broker was lavish in his spending in Ginza.






















この家には彼女の足を止め、もう一度振り返らせる何かがあったのです。There was something about that house that made her stop and look again.

































































































彼はその絵にたいへん高い値をつけた。He put the painting at a very high price.







































ジェーンは声を出して泣くのを抑えることができなかった。Jane could not stop herself from crying aloud.









パソコンを始めた頃はノートンの重いソフトに騙され四苦八苦していた。When I started using a computer I was taken in by Norton's CPU-hungry software and had a lot of trouble.










車はフェンスをかすって傷がついた。The car brushed the fence and got scratched.















彼は暴言罪で告発された。He was charged with the crime of abusive language.
我々は教育の方法を時代に呼応させなくてはならない。We have to bring our teaching methods up to date.
































































































目が疲れやすいです。My eyes get tired very easily.
















































彼は怒って雷を落とした。He snarled out his anger.










苦境にあるとき助けになるものだ。It helps us in times of difficulty.










































































事態の収拾がつかなくなったら、昨日渡した番号で私に電話をかけなさい。If things get out of hand, you should call me at the number I gave you yesterday.

























国際アムネスティは、政治囚への支援として一般市民による抗議活動を組織することがしばしばある。Amnesty International often organizes public protests in support of political prisoners.
国際アムネスティは、政治囚への支援として一般市民による抗議活動を組織することがしばしばある。Amnesty International often organizes public protests in support of political prisoners.





































































彼は映画館に行くことはまずない。He seldom, if ever, goes to the cinema.









彼らは労働者に常時雇用を保証した。They guaranteed regular employment to their workers.

































































































































































































一人にしておいて下さい。Leave me alone.


































この仕事、死ぬほどしんどい。This job is killing me.




































































































































































このカーペットはあれよりも質がいい。This carpet is superior to that one in quality.私たちの製品とよそのとを比べたら、私たちのがはるかに質が良いのがお分かりでしょう。If you compare our product with others, you'll see ours is far better in quality.

結局は質の良い物を買う方が得をする。It pays in the long run to buy goods of high quality.




































































君の考えなどはどうだっていいことだ。Your thoughts are of no significance at all.















































































































































































































































































































くれるのではなく、貸与だそうです。Apparently they aren't given, but loaned.新聞によれば、首相がガンで亡くなったそうです。The newspaper reports the prime minister has died of cancer.













































































































































































































































あなたはこの店のランチがえらくお気に入りですね。You are very fond of the lunch menu of this restaurant.





















































なんとか都合をつけて、次のミーティングに出席していただけませんか。If it's at all possible, I'd like you to take part in the next meeting.















































































































































彼の横柄な態度にはもう我慢ならない。His arrogance is no longer tolerable.





































私はその点で彼と意見が一致した。I agreed with him on that point.その点では君に全面的に賛成だ。In that respect, I agree with you completely.






























ほんの挨拶代わりです。Here's a little gift for you.



































何よりもまず、老人に親切にするように努めなさい。Above all, try to be kind to the old.































































































































































人間は己の肉体なり心の病気の餌食であり、死んだ後では地虫の餌食となる。Man, being of flesh, is subject to diseases of the mind and after death, to worms.










彼の声は気の抜けたようで、興奮を感じさせなかった。His voice was flat and lacked enthusiasm.





















































































































































































手紙のＰ．Ｓ．は何を表していますか。What do the letters P.S. stand for?












































































大きくて、のろくて、無口でした。He was big and slow and silent.




































































































































































































































































































彼はさすが大学に行っただけのことはある。He did not go to college for nothing.










































































































女友だちはみんなしてあの娘を引き止めようとしたけれど。All the girls around her say she's got it coming.
選挙に勝つには「見た目」が何割？How much of winning an election is down to looks?




























彼、最近、私に冷たくなったような気がする。I feel like he's grown cold toward me lately.どうも君は未だ胸に一物もっているような気がする。文句があればはっきり言ってよ。I get the feeling you still have an axe to grind. If you've got something to say come on out and say it.







































































































































































私たちは先生のまわりに輪になって集まった。We formed a circle around the teacher.









今年も残りわずかな日しかない。There are only a few days left before the end of the year.














































































































































































































































































































わが国ではコンピューター科学が急速な進歩を遂げた。Computer science has made rapid progress in our country.




















ピアノは調子が狂っていて、ひどい音色だった。The piano was out of tune; it sounded very bad.




































































チューリッヒはロンドンに次ぐ世界第二位の金市場である。Zurich is the second largest gold market in the world after London.





































































私は偶然にも京都で旧友にあった。I met an old friend by chance in Kyoto.































こんな薄暗い部屋では仕事にならない。It's impossible to work in a room this dim.














ＵＭＬのセマンティクスと表記法の詳細については、ＵＭＬドキュメントを参照してください。Please refer to the UML documentation for the detailed information about UML semantics and notation.













何があっても海に行く！タオルに、海パン。虫除けスプレー！No matter what I'm going to the beach! Towel and trunks. Insect repellant!










ぼくは借金で首が回らないよ。I'm up to my ears in debt.




































彼女は人が悪い。She is ill-natured.
















後になって、クリスは自分の行いを恥ずかしく思い、彼女に謝ると、ベスは彼を許してくれました。Later Chris felt ashamed and apologized, and Beth forgave him.





もし彼の住所を知っていれば、すぐにでも連絡するのだが。If I knew his address, I would get in touch with him right away.
彼は今すぐにでも戻るべきだ。He should be back any minute now.

















































彼らは勝利のために祈りを捧げた。They said their prayers for victory.






















彼女は森の中で右も左も分からなくなった。She lost her way in the forest.
































































ゼロという概念はヒンドゥー文化に由来している。The concept of zero sprang from the Hindu culture.




１人少年が両手をポケットにつっこんで歩いていた。A boy was walking with his hands in his pockets.
























心配するな, どうにかなるさ。Don't worry, it will come out all right.
その問題については、私なりの意見があります。I have my own thoughts on that subject.








その工場では新型車を製造しています。The factory is producing a new type of car.



























































友人を選ぶにあたってはいくら注意してもしすぎることはない。You cannot be too careful in choosing your friends.






































































































時間はできるだけ有効に使わなければならない。You must make the most of your time.

私は教会である女性に会いましたが、その人の美しさはいつまでも印象に残っています。I saw a woman at the church, whose beauty made a lasting impression on me.




チラッと目が合っただけで。Our eyes met just fleetingly.















成功を焦ってはいけない。Don't be too eager for success.









空はすっかりもやがかかっていた。The sky misted over.






彼は一年近くもアルコール類を断っていたが、お正月の頃に禁を破ってまた元に戻ってしまった。He had been dry for almost a year, but he fell off the wagon around New Year's Day.























































































































パリで撮った妻の写真を見るにつけ、あの時の楽しかった旅行を思い出す。When I see the photo of my wife I took in Paris, I remember what a great time we had on that trip.











































































































平和部隊にいる頃に彼女は教職の第一歩を踏み出した。She got her feet wet teaching while she was in the Peace Corps.

















































































嬉しいことに娘が試験に合格した。To my joy, my daughter passed the examination.

















































































































































何がなんだか分からない。頭がパニックに陥って整理がつかない。I didn't know what was what. The inside of my head had gone to panic mode and I couldn't get things straight.



























































幸いなことに、息子は新しい学校での生活にすぐに慣れた。Fortunately, my son quickly adjusted to life in his new school.





















































































ボートは定員オーバーでバランスを失った。The boat was off balance because it was overloaded.



















































































































































































どういうわけかメールにアクセスできませんでした。For some reason I couldn't access my e-mail.













それなら話は別だよ。In that case, I'll change my mind.





















私はいつの日かアフリカに行きたい。I want to go to Africa someday.







ねぇ、お願い。Oh, have a heart.


















これに懲りずにまたやれよ。Don't let this discourage you from trying it again.







仕事が終わり、彼は帰途についた。His work finished, he left for home.
















































彼らはなおもこの理論を固守した。They still clung to this doctrine.












忙しくてそんなところまで手が回らないよ。We're too busy to attend to such detail.


うまくいっていたあのふたりも、とうとう秋風が立ち始めたね。Those two used to get along so well together but even with them you can sense a chill coming on.































ラップは屑だ。Rap is crap.
艇長はボートレースの最後のラップで、乗組員をおだてて、レースを勝ち取るため、スパートをかけた。The coxswain egged his crewmen on, and made a winning spurt at the last lap of the regatta.
いくら道に迷ったからって、こんな所で野宿は絶対にイヤですからね。Because, no matter if we have got lost, I'd hate to sleep outside this sort of place.



湖には薄い氷が張っていた。There was thin ice on the lake.






彼女は足音を殺して部屋に入った。She got into the room with hushed steps.



ジョージ３世は歴史家によって不当に悪し様に言われてきた。George III has been unfairly maligned by historians.

















こう見えて、子供の頃はケーキを二ホール平らげた伝説を持っている。You couldn't tell it by looking, but she has the legendary tale of having eaten two whole cakes when a child.
















彼が勇気ある人として知られている。We know him to be a brave man.




















































































私はちゃんとした庭付きの家が欲しい。I want to have a proper house and garden.
僕にはどこにでもいるおっさんとしか見えないけどなあ。To me he's no different from a million other dull middle aged men.





























そんな計画は失敗するに決まっている。Such a plan is bound to fail.









このお金は、もしものときの備えです。This money is for a rainy day.


































































詩人は不幸にも若死にした。Unfortunately the poet died in his youth.








































覚えてろよ。いつか借りを返してやるからな。I will get even with you someday. Remember that.
こっそり教えてくれたら、礼をはずみますよ。If you tip me off about it, I'll make it worth your while.






























































































その会合は早くても来週になるでしょう。The meeting will be held next week at the earliest.












この通りは真北に伸びている。This street runs due north.


























































人前で話すようなことは何によらず彼はいつも敬遠する。He tends to shy away from anything that involves public speaking.
































彼は今までにないほどに勤勉だ。He is as diligent a man as ever lived.












足が遅い彼は、もちろんすでに2m差がついた。He, being slow-footed, was of course already lagging two meters.

































































彼が本当の理由を見つけようとしたって無駄だ。It's no good his trying to find the true reason.



























お時間をとらせて恐縮です。I am sorry to have taken up your valuable time.



































さらに詳しくは１６ページ参照。For further information, see page 16.
彼は食べる必要はない食い意地が張っているだけだ。He does not need to eat, he is just greedy.
















今年、私は２足靴を履きつぶした。I've worn out two pairs of shoes this year.





























このジャケットはこのスカートにどうもしっくり来ない。This jacket somehow doesn't go with this skirt.


















彼はいろいろと時間をとられる用事が多いので、彼と会う約束をするのは難しい。He has so many calls on his time, it is very difficult to make an appointment to see him.







そのめでたいときに当たり彼は祝辞を述べた。He offered his congratulations on the happy occasion.






















テレビでは俳優が台詞を思い出せるようにキューカードが主に使われる。Cue cards are used primarily on television to help the actors remember their lines.









































































この新人のアナウンサー、さっきからとちってばかりいる。This new announcer keeps stumbling.


















彼はとても驚いてしばらく声が出なかった。He was so frightened that he could not speak for a moment.

ウィンブルドンには、センターコートを含めて１８の芝生コートがある。Wimbledon has eighteen grass courts, including the Center Court.




ちなみに、ウチのクリニックから数百メートルの近場に「ランプ」が建設中です。Incidentally a motorway ramp is being constructed in the neighbourhood, a few hundred metres away, of my clinic.









我々はその湖のほとりのホテルに泊まった。We stayed at a hotel by the lake.パリはセーヌ川のほとりにあり、美しい都市です。Paris, which is on the Seine, is a beautiful city.













































外国からの経営陣は製造工場を見学した。The foreign executives visited the manufacturing plant.


























































































































































































































しかめ面は怒りとか不快感を表現するものである。A frown may express anger or displeasure.













































































































































































角を曲がった所にそのお店はありますよ。You'll find the shop around the corner.





























































































































よし、かかってこい！OK! Bring it on!















































アンネはナチスに捕まるのを恐れながら暮らした。Anne lived in terror of being captured by Nazis.
















































さあ、みんなで食べ放題の焼き肉屋さんに行こうよ。Let's all go to an all-you-can-eat Yakiniku restaurant.文法屋に聞きたいんですが、「be+分詞」はV Cなどのように考えることはできないんですか？I'd like to ask a grammarian, isn't it possible to think of 'be + participle' like you do V C and such?


























































『カムイの剣』は、1868年の徳川将軍時代の崩壊と、明治天皇下での日本の復興という変革期を舞台にした、一種の侍/忍者物語だ。Kamui no Ken was a sort of samurai/ninja story set during the transition of the fall of the Tokugawa Shogunate and the re-establishment of Japan under the Emperor Meiji in 1868.






































































































































































































































































































その小説を読んで深く感動した。I was deeply moved by that novel.























私は多くとも１０冊しか英語の本を持っていない。I have no more than ten English books.

















































































その政治家は何年間も、麻薬の密売買をしてきた。That politician has been trafficking in drugs for years.












































































































































ジョンとアンは互いに好意を持っている。John and Ann like each other.







































































金があったらそうしたいのです。ところが実はどうすることもできないのです。If I were rich, I would do so. As it is, I can do nothing.

















































































































































































































スケジュールがバッティングしなきゃ大丈夫です。The schedule's fine as long as nothing clashes.
















































彼はライトにフライを打ち上げた。He hit a fly into right field.


















イエスかノーかはっきりしろ。Just say yes or no.


























































































































































































この企画にぴったりのライターを、草の根分けてでも探しだして欲しい。I want you to search high and low for a writer who's just right for this project. Leave no stone unturned.

















これらの新車は売り出し中です。These new cars are on sale.





































































































































































































































































ジョンは駅の方へと歩いている。John is walking in the direction of the station.



































































またあいつら、キスしてるぜ。見ろよ。お熱いね。いつも。見てられないよ。Not again! Look at those two kissing. They've really got the hots for each other. I can't watch this any more.








フォワードがゴールを決めた。The forward kicked a goal.













































「あれ、タンジェントってサインでコサインを割るんだっけ？」「逆、逆」"Eh? Is the tangent cosine divided by sine?" "Other way round!"





















































































彼はりんごをぽいとなげてよこした。He chucked me the apple.アンインストール方法：フォルダごとごみ箱にぽいっ。Uninstall method: Chuck the whole folder into the recycle bin.





















































































































































































































































































































うちのおじいさんは生まれてから医者にかかったことがない。My grandfather has never consulted a doctor in his life.

























































上野駅は次の次です。Ueno is the station after next.
































































































何もその美しさとは比較にならない。Nothing is to be compared to its beauty.






































































彼女はテーブルの上にクロスを広げた。She spread a cloth over the table.





















この先ネタバレ♪大丈夫な方はドラッグ（反転）して読んでね♪Spoilers ahead! If you don't mind that then read after highlighting (colour inverting).



































































バス付きになさいますか、シャワーだけでよろしいですか。Would you like a room with a bath or a shower?
彼女は、あのベースが好き。She likes that bass.アコギなんか弾いて遊んでる暇があったらベースの練習しろ！If you've got time to play around on an acoustic guitar, practice your bass!

ジョージは、最近３時間の格闘の末に釣った、重さ３０ポンドのバスの話をしていた。George was describing a 30 pound bass he'd caught recently after fighting it for three hours.









彼は実によく働く男だ、だからきっと新しい仕事で成功するだろう。He is a super-hard worker, so I'm sure he'll make good at his new business.























九時以降はテレビを見ないことにしている。I make it a rule not to watch television after nine o'clock.

関税を国ごとではなくブロックでコントロールする方が好都合であることを強調したい。I would like to stress that it is more convenient to control tariffs as a bloc rather than country by country.















ケイトは５時きっかりに来た。Kate came at five sharp.
































可能な限りの手段を講じろ。Take all possible measures.



妻は夫から独立して財産を所有しうる。A wife can have property independent of her husband.










































まず第一にここにお招きいただいてとても嬉しく思っている事を述べます。First of all, let me say how glad I am to be here.











































































































明日、お返事します。You shall have my answer tomorrow.



ベェーだっ！乙女のことを嗤った罰よ！Pfft! That's what you get for laughing at a girl!


























コンタクトを入れるというのはいかがでしょう？How about wearing contact lenses?















為替相場は毎日会計室の前に掲示される。The exchange rates are posted daily outside the cashier's office.



































































































彼の忠告が骨身に染みた。His advice cut me to the quick.











彼の飲酒癖は今に始まったことではない。His drinking habit is an old one.































天は我々の頭上にあると同様に、我々の足下にもある。Heaven is under our feet as well as over our heads.













































彼は遅刻しますと電話を入れた。He called in to say that he'd be late.





















































































彼は生徒にこの有名な言葉を残した。He left his students these famous words.






























彼はその言葉をいい意味で使ったのだ。He used the word in a good sense.





































Windows系ＯＳではアドミニストレーターアカウントがルートに相当する。With Windows OS systems 'administrator account' corresponds to 'root'.



































彼の万引きはどうしたものかわからない。I don't know what to do about his shoplifting.





























被害者の死によって誰が得をするのだろう。Who gains by the victim's death?














「どうしたんだ」「車が故障したんだ」"What happened?" "The car broke down."
























































































































イギリスを例にとって見よう。Take England for example.


エコノミーサイズの車を希望されますか。Do you want an economy-size car?




















































私がいいって言うまでロープを放さないでね。Do not let go of the rope till I tell you.
































































ロックコンサートは歌手の病気のため中止になった。The rock concert was called off because the singer fell ill.ロックでください。On the rocks, please.






























































いったい、いつになったらそのケチは直るの？When will you ever loosen your purse strings?





































久しぶりに故郷に帰ると、懐かしい気持ちが込み上がる。Returning to your hometown after a long time fills you with nostalgia.









































































































































































































































































幼い子どもを優れた音楽に触れさせるべきだ。Young children should be exposed to good music.

























何と言ったら良いか分かりません。I don't know what I should say.ここの家、何匹猫がいるの？How many cats are there in this house?私は何軒もの店でその本を探しました。I inquired about the book in many stores.



































































































































試験のことで頭がいっぱいだ。I'm preoccupied with the exam.





















































































商品のお届けは玄関先までとなっております。The goods will be delivered to the front door.

















































まだその上着には手を通してないんだ。I haven't put on the jacket yet.



























































































































































































彼は病弱というハンデを負わされている。He is handicapped by poor health.


数学にかけては彼はクラスの誰にも引けを取らない。When it comes to mathematics, he is second to none in his class.

























牛乳はバター、チーズ、その他いろいろな物にすることができる。Milk can be made into butter, cheese, and many other things.

その事故で多数の死者が出た。The accident has caused many deaths.




























































































































日本ではゴルフが大変人気があるといわれます。It is said that golf is very popular in Japan.













































彼女は幸いにも奨学金を得た。Luckily she won a scholarship.






































大学の教授ともあろうものが、なぜ殺人事件を起こしたのだろうか。Why would a university lecturer of all people end up responsible for a murder?






















仲の良い友達といると、時間が経つのが早い。In the company of good friends, the time flew by.




助手を求めています。なるべくならば経験のある人を望む。We want an assistant, preferably someone with experience.






















彼らの畜牛はみなよく肥えている。Their cattle are all fat.











彼らにもっと声を落としてくれと頼めると思うかい？Do you think we can ask them to lower their voices?

















何があろうとも私はあきらめない。Nothing can force me to give it up.







彼はすりの襟首を掴んだ。He seized the pickpocket by the collar.













































初めのうちは私は自分の誤りが気になりました。I was worried about my mistakes at first.



あれ、そんなに近いとは知りませんでした。Oh, I didn't know it was that close.















ムクドリのヒナを親鳥に返せますか。Can you return starling chicks to their parents?



























それは偶然だったのか、それとも故意にであったのか。Was it by accident or by design?

























































































































先週には、大きな力を持つ経団連が、規制解除のため中央政府を訪問した。Last week the powerful Keidanren called on Tokyo to lift the ban.































































































名前だけでしか彼を知らない。I only know him by name.



































彼女がこんなに早く来るはずない。She cannot be here so early.































































































































































































































君には御両親の心の痛みが分からないのか。Can't you understand the pain of your parents?






辻さんがドラマのなかで歌っていたフォークの歌は、何ていうのですか？What's the name of the folk song that Mr. Tsugi sang in that TV drama?




私のあまり先を行ってはいけません。Don't go too far ahead of me.










































































トニーは自分の古くなったきたない靴に目を落としました。Tony looked down at his dirty old shoes.






























想像力は、すべての文明の根本である。Imagination is the root of all civilization.挨拶は礼儀作法の根本である。Greetings are the basis of good manners.











ってゆーか、こうやってぐじぐじ考えるのが情けないんじゃないのか？Or rather, is it not just pathetic that I think such whiny thoughts like this?




















































毎年、トムとメアリーはクリスマスカードを送り合っています。Tom and Mary send each other Christmas cards every year.































彼の怒りは見るも恐ろしかった。His anger was terrible to see.















































































メアリーは毎晩レースを編んでいる。Mary crochets lace every night.















































































































































































その地域には狩猟鳥が多く生息している。Game birds abound in the area.
























私的には問題ない。There is no objection on my part.


これを自分一人でやったの？Did you do this on your own?
























































































































































































































どうせ日本文化の粋などは連中には絶対わかるまい。They'll never truly understand the essence of Japanese culture anyway.





































このカツオの塩辛は塩辛すぎる。These salted bonito guts are too salty for me.
















































裸で滝に打たれている男性を見た。I saw a man standing naked under the waterfall.
































































































私は後から行きます。I'll join you later.

虎にぴったりねらいをつけなさい。Take steady aim at the tiger.
僕は的に向けて銃のねらいを定めた。I aimed my gun at the target.







































































完読した？Have you read the whole book?



































































































私は何でも自分のしたい放題にしたかったのに。I wanted to have had everything my own way.















































































































近頃はいかがお過ごしでしょうか。How are you getting along these days?

二台のバンが激突してめり込んだ。The two vans telescoped together.




最近、お腹の周りに肉がついてきたみたい。中年太りかな。I'm getting a spare tire around my waist. I guess it's middle age creeping up on me.




























































































































































































































あの政治家のらりくらりしよってからに。The politician is as slippery as an eel!































































彼女の態度は気取りやわざとらしさがない。Her nature is neither affected nor pretentious.





















































































山田さん、ミス・ロイドを紹介します。Mr Yamada, may I introduce Miss Lloyd?







































土曜日のカラオケ屋は特に混んでいる。The karaoke shop is especially crowded on Saturdays.あのレストランはいつも混んでいる。The restaurant is always packed.
助けを求める叫び声が夜のしじまに響きわたった。A call for help rang through the night.























































我々は生活のかてを得るために働く。We work for our living.






今はそうじゃなくても将来はいい夫になるよ。Even if he isn't now, he'll be a good husband in the future.





















彼女は彼からの手紙を読むとすぐに破りすててしまった。She had no sooner read his letter than she tore it up.



















































































































その自転車をどけて下さい。Get the bicycle out of the way.



























































































競走馬は互角でトラックをまわった。The horses are coming down the track and it's neck and neck.彼女はかつてトラック競技のスターだった。She was a track star once.




































文句が消えないように、消えないインクを使ってくれませんか。Will you please use indelible ink so the phrase won't rub out?








ほんの冗談のつもりで言ったんだ。I just meant it as a joke.








一般大衆は最もよい審判者である。The public is the best judge.













弟は記憶力がいいです。My brother has a good memory.


























この企業はコンピューター・チップを製造している。This company manufactures computer chips.




あんな調子のいいこと言っておいて、ホント口ばっかりなんだから！I like the sound of what he says, but it IS just talk, you know.








神に誓って私はそれを知らなかった。By God, I never knew that.




















遠くに灯火が見えた。I saw a light in the distance.














うまくいけば一日に２、３ピース作れる。I can produce several pieces a day if I'm lucky.






あの男鳴り物入りで入社したけど、実力のほど看板に偽りなしだったね。He came on board this company with a lot of fanfare and he turns out to have the skill and talent to live up to it.























































































































僕はそのゲームを最初から最後まで見ていた。I watched the game from beginning to end.




























それが何かぼくにはわかっている。I have an idea what it is.
















７時近くだ。学校へ行かなくては。It is close to seven o'clock. We have to go to school.
























































































































































































































































残念ですが、あなたの名前をどうしても覚えられない。I'm sorry to say I don't remember your name.












ロサンゼルス到着時刻は何時ですか。What's the arrival time in Los Angeles?



























































































































































































ゴムバンドがプツンと大きな音を立てて切れた。The rubber band broke with a vicious snap.




そんな言葉じゃ言い表せない。Like is hardly the word.

彼は単なる愚か者でしかない。He is nothing but a fool.

































わずかながらお金を貯めている。She has a little money put aside.















































































































デザインも、アーチ型のロゴデザインにより現代的で「登場感」「躍動感」のあるものに仕上げました。The design was also given the finishing touch to have launch impact and dynamism provided by the novelty of the arch shaped logo design.


















































若い女性の間で、前髪をクルクルさせるのは、モードではない。It's not the mode for young girls to curl their bangs.







































































































最も強大な帝国ですら崩壊する。Even the mightiest of empires comes to an end.


































































































































ポップコーンに溶かしバターをかけてください。Pour melted butter over the popcorn.








それに関する私の記憶は今も鮮やかに残っている。My memory of that is still vivid.




















































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































ガンジーの記念像が建てられた。They erected a statue in memory of Gandhi.




































































































































































































































































































































































先生は私の背中をぽんとたたいた。The teacher patted me on the back.シャンパンの栓がぽんと音を立ててとんだ。The champagne cork popped out.





























































































































































































































































































































































































































































































彼は何物にもまして名誉を重んじる。He values honor above anything else.






















































































































































































































































































君のカラーにはしみがついている。Your collar has a stain on it.














大魚は小魚を食う。The great fish eat the small.



















































































彼は私の失敗にご満悦の体でそこに座っていた。He was sitting there, delighted with my failure.





























































































































そのボルトに嵌合するナットが必要です。We need a nut that will fit that bolt.





























































































































































猫は背中を丸める。Cats arch their backs.
彼の身に何かあったのだろうか。I wonder if anything happened to him.















概して、トムはやることほとんど全てにおいてのんびりした人間だ。By and large, Tom is an easygoing person in almost everything he does.

























































































































私はそのテーブルが邪魔にならないように押しのけた。I pushed the table out of the way.




















興奮の連続に、あっというまもなく３０分のショウタイムが過ぎてしまいました。In all the excitement the 30 minute show-time passed in a flash.

























「そっか。暇なら掃除しといて」「なんだそれ。兄貴をアゴで使うなよ」"Oh? If you're free get the cleaning done." "What's up with that? Don't order your brother around!"























































ビュッフェ、またはカフェテリアは９号車にあります。The buffet or the cafeteria is in Car 9.













































































































































































お客様は１時間以内にお越しになるはずです。Our guests should be here within an hour.











































正確に言うと私は大学講師です。Specifically, I'm a university lecturer.
正確に言えば、彼が悪い。To be accurate, he is to blame.







































































































































































































































































太陽がまともに照り付けている。The sun is shining in my face.偏屈な奴とまともに話し合っても無駄だ。It is useless to reason with a bigot.












































































彼らは私の果実園を荒らした。They robbed my orchard.














































































































彼は、とても満足げに見える。He looks like a cat that ate the canary.


















最近のぼくは、「生き恥」「赤恥」をかくことを恐れなくなりました。Recently I've stopped being afraid of "living in shame" and being exposed to "public ridicule".








































彼女はスピーチコンテストで１等賞を獲った。She won first prize in the speech contest.



































































































あなたのページに、私どもの会社のウェブリンクを貼り付けていただけませんか。Would you mind putting a link on your web page to our company's web site?



















































































































































































この自転車は油が切れている。This bicycle needs oiling.













平素からの当店に対するご愛顧に感謝しております。Thank you very much for patronizing our store for a long time.
































パソコンを持ってない人は、このMP3プレーヤー機能をフルに使いこなせません。People who don't have a computer can't make full use of this MP3 player function.


































初心者向けのコースはありますか。Do you have a course for beginners?











































防衛者達は強い抵抗を見せた。The defenders put up a stout resistance.















































































レモンやライムはすっぱい果物である。Lemons and limes are acidic fruits.

























レバーを押しあげて下さい。Please push up the lever.


























いま、日本のたばこ産業界は、大人の男たちのたばこ離れに頭をいためている。The fact that nowadays fewer men smoke is a headache for the Japanese tobacco industry.


あなたが約束を守らないとお父さんの立場がなくなりますよ。Your father will lose face if you don't keep your promise.





















































































































































































































































私たちの会話はいつものように天気に関して始まった。Our conversation opened, as usual, upon the weather.





























彼らは政治上の問題について議論するのが好きだった。They liked to argue about political issues.



あのかわいい少女は私の妹です。That pretty girl is my sister.

































































彼女はどこから見てもりっぱな映画スターの感じだった。She looked every inch the movie star.










































































































ダイヤが乱れていた。The timetable was disrupted.




























































































































その後は、多くの者が老人ホームで暮らすが、そこには子供とか孫が訪ねていくことが出来る。After that, many live in special homes for the aged where their children and grandchildren can come to visit them.


































彼は機械にコードをつないだ。He connected the cord to the machine.













その犬はその音を聞いて耳をピンと立てた。The dog pricked up his ears at the sound.





































万雷の拍手のうちに幕が下りた。The curtain fell amid the wild applause of the audience.










































































































































































彼は時間厳守を誇りにしている。He is proud of his punctuality.欧米では時間厳守は当然の事と考えられている。In Europe and America, people regard punctuality as a matter of course.

































































































































そしたら横転したの手伝ってやっからよ。Then I'll help you overturn the wagon.



























６００００キリリクイラスト：キリ番を踏んだBeikyuさんのサイト「小さなカエデの木のそばで」のイメージイラストを描いてほしいというリクエストを頂きました。60,000 lucky number request: I got a request to draw an illustration for the site of Beikyu, who hit the lucky number, "Standing By A Little Maple Tree".































































あの医者は彼のがんを治してくれるかもしれない。That doctor may cure him of his cancer.
















































おばあさんは必ずおならをする。The old lady is bound to fart.


































































































































オーボエ奏者なんかは自分にあうリードを探すより作った方が速いと、自分で作ってしまう人もいる。Heck, with oboe players there are those who, rather than search for a reed that suits them, find it faster to make their own.
















































































































ベストを裏返さなくちゃ。表裏逆ですよ。You need to reverse your vest. It's inside-out!



























前年の総所得金額はいくらでしょうか。What was the gross income in the previous calendar year?














































ああ、彼女は若くして逝ってしまった。Alas, she died young.



































































主任整備員はテニスコートの敷地のちょうど中央に小さな家を持っている。The head groundsman has a cottage right in the middle of the grounds.























じゃが・・・その１０人目の子供の父親はそれまでの子供らとは別の父親なのか。But ... did that tenth child have a different father to the ones before him?
























その強打者に備えてセンターは守備位置を変えた。The center fielder shifted his position for the slugger.












世界で、鹿やムースやキジといった野性獣を狩ることは違法とする国が多い。In many parts of the world it is illegal to shoot wild game such as deer, moose or pheasant.



































































































上空をジェット機がキーンという音を立てて飛んでいった。The jet made a whining sound as it soared overhead.



































あなたのサロン風のスカートが好きです。I like your sarong style skirt.
















































それよりもこれが好きだ。I like this better than that.それよりも中にいて、テレビを見ているほうが好きなのです。Instead, they prefer to stay in and watch television.













































足に任せて町の中を歩き回った。I walked around town wherever my feet led me.

その人は村中に名を知られている。The man is well-known all over the village.



















































































































































































































発砲音を聞いて、警察がすぐにやって来た。The police came as soon as they heard the gunfire.










よかれあしかれ、この問題は彼に委せるほかはない。For better or worse, there is nothing for it but to leave the matter in his hands.



































「疲れたか」「いいや、ちっとも」"Are you tired?" "No, not at all."
「今日の新聞にいいニュース何かある？」「いや、特にないね」"Any good news in today's paper?" "No, nothing in particular."
彼の答は「否」であった。His answer was in the negative.
















































来週ヨーロッパに発つ予定です。I'm planning to leave for Europe next week.



彼は系統立った調査を行うことにした。He decided to perform systematic research.







私は彼が忍び出ようとするのをつかまえた。I caught him trying to sneak out.
























































部屋探しは苦労することがある。Finding an apartment can be difficult.


























この箱、持ち上げるとズシッと重いね。中に何が入ってるんだ。This box weighs a ton. What's inside?














この手作りのイタリア製チタン自転車は、恐ろしく軽い。This handmade Italian-made titanium bicycle is terribly light.






































































































































































その靴は高すぎる。These shoes are too expensive.あそこは少し高すぎると思います。I'm afraid that place is a little too expensive.




















































































紳士の人からお先にどうぞ。Gentlemen first.










この何ヶ月かはひどい打撃を受けました。I took such a hammering over recent months.


昨日何ヶ月ぶりかに雨が降った。It rained yesterday after it had been dry for many months.

２人は何年ぶりかで会ったように、心をこめて握手していた。The two people were shaking hands heartily as if they had not seen each other for years.






私この歌が好き。ビートがあって踊れるし。I like this song; it's got a strong beat and you can dance to it.


シーザーはゴールを発ち、ルビコン川を渡り、そしてイタリアにはいる。Caesar leaves Gaul, crosses the Rubicon, and enters Italy.
































メーデーは世界の労働者のお祭りの日でもあります。May Day is also a festival day for the workers in the world.







驕れる者は久しからず。Pride goes before a fall.








































































採掘場が爆発した時、中には誰もいなかった。There was no one in the mine when it blew up.
































































ロス育ちかと思いました。I thought you were raised in L.A.




































































私はあなたの第一号の患者になるわ。I'll be your first patient.






















































































「どいてください」「やんのか？あんちゃん」"Please move aside." "Ya wanna make something of it, sonny?"







このテーブルクロスは縦横５フィートと３フィートある。This tablecloth measures 5 feet by 3 feet.










彼はライトにフライを打ち上げた。He hit a fly into right field.





彼は私の腕をねじり上げた。He twisted my arm.











































































































彼女はあまり泣いたので涙が枯れてしまった。She cried till her eyes dried.































































































































































































































それじゃあこのメモを渡してください。緊急です。Then, please give him this note. This is urgent.































































子どもには良い手本を示さなければならない。You should set a good example to your children.









































一生懸命作られたゲームには、一生懸命に取り組むのが礼儀なんだよ？ポーズボタンなんて押したらゲームに失礼だもん。It's only manners to tackle all out a game that they have gone all out in creating. Pressing the pause button is just rude!



輸送中に箱が拉げて中身がとび出した。The box was crushed during transport and the contents flew out.



























































ポールは会計報告の裏面操作について知識があったので、その隠れた才能を発揮して必要なものを全て手に入れていた。Paul's knowledge of creative bookkeeping has been the secret of his ability to get all the staffing he needs.





































































































































彼は居空きとして知られ、日中でも家に忍び込んで貴重品を盗むことで評判となっていた。He was known as a burglar of houses where occupants are present and had a reputation for sneaking in and stealing valuables even during the day.





















































































































彼は一言で言えば夢想家なのだ。He is, in a word, a utopian.
















































































































































































この布地は長持ちしないだろう。This cloth will not last long.





彼女はなかなかどうして馬鹿ではない。She is far from a fool.
























外国人労働者は日本経済のバッファーであってはならない。We should not use foreign workers as a buffer against Japan's economic slowdown.












































































































































































































２度と彼女はその家の敷居をまたがなかった。Never again did she enter the house.








































































































































ホールには空席は一つもなかった。There wasn't a single vacant seat in the hall.























































































































































その政治家は何年間も、麻薬の密売買をしてきた。That politician has been trafficking in drugs for years.












































































殺してやる！ぶっ殺して、踏み潰してやる！くそったれ！死ね！I'll kill you! Knock your block off and grind you underfoot! You shithead! Die!







































































































小事は小人を喜ばす。Little thing please little minds.



















































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































あのプロのスキーヤーは離れ業をしながら山をおりるのが好きだった。The professional skier liked to "hot-dog" down the mountain.








































































































































習慣は第二の天性である。Habit is second nature.








その映画は客入りがとてもいい。The movie is drawing pretty well.





ダンスフロアは、何時頃混んできますか。What time does the dance floor get crowded?
































































































































ローマを訪れたことがおありなら、コロセウムをご覧になったにちがいない。If you have ever visited Rome, you must have seen the Coliseum.










































こんなことを言っても信じないだろうが、驚くなかれ。You might not believe what I'm about to tell you, so don't be surprised.



































みんな忙しくしているのに、そんなところでノウノウと休憩してるんじゃないよ。You can't just lounge around like that while everybody else is so busy.そんなところで彼女と会うなんて、思ってもみなかった。Never did I expect to see her in such a place.














































































あいつは、女の子がいるとかっこつけたがるんだから。He's a big show-off when girls are around.




仮にも為す価値があるものならば何でも良く為す価値がある。Whatever is worth doing at all, is worth doing well.




























































イーストはビールを発酵させる。Yeast makes beer ferment.
















お父さんは煙草の煙でたくさん輪を作れる。Dad can blow many smoke rings.






















ボケッとしないで、さっさとメモ書きなさいよっ。Don't just stand there like a lump, start taking notes!










市民プールの監視の仕事に応募しました。I applied for a job as a lifeguard at the community pool.










































我々はしゃべりづめで夜半まで起きていた。We sat up half the night just talking.






































































































































































































いくつか聞きたい事があるが今はあなたを煩わせたくはない。I have some questions to ask, but I don't want to bother you now.






















ここでは、文字やパスのアウトラインの作成について説明します。Here we explain about creating outlines of characters and paths.
大型と小型の２台の飛行機が、ハンガー内で停止していました。Two airplanes, one large and one small, were at rest in the hangar.




























































日経平均は200ポイント下げ、昨日は18,000で終えた。The Nikkei Stock Average lost nearly 200 points to close yesterday at 18,000.











































テレビのスイッチを入れて下さい。Please turn on the TV.

































































あなたにはいつも私がついている事をお忘れなく。Remember I will always be at your back.






















































































































グラスの周りにソルトをつけたマルガリータをすするのが好き。I enjoy sipping on a margarita with salt around the rim.


















































































私は水泳部の一員だ。I'm a member of the swimming club.












夕食後、いつも眠りそうになるんです。After supper, I always find myself falling asleep.














































期待に胸を膨らませていた。We were filled with joyful expectation.



















































































































この階段を上がっていきなさい。Go up these stairs.

さてと・・・見つかる前にずらかるか。Well now… Shall we scarper before we're found?























人はパンのみにて生きるにあらず、と聖書に書いてある。It says in the Bible, "Man shall not live on bread alone."











































































































































































































親友といえども、その友情を維持する努力が必要である。Even good friends should make an effort to keep up their friendship.






































































彼は正午までここにいるでしょう。He'll be here until noon.











その絵はそれなりによくできている。The picture is good in its way.


















































































































































































ＯＫが出たので、思わずグラスランナーのシーフ・バードというベタなキャラを作っちゃいましたよ。I got the OK so I unthinkingly created the clichéd 'grass runner thief/bard' character.


























































































































神経質な人は頭をかいたりするものだ。Nervous people will scratch their heads.











































































































彼の鋭い目は一つとして誤りを見逃さなかった。His sharp eyes never missed a mistake.


































































































































保憲は脇息に身を預け、目前に出された朝餉に当惑の目を当てていた。Yasunori leaned into the armrest and looked in bemusement at the breakfast laid before him.





























ミミズも時には土壌に有益です。Worms are sometimes beneficial to soil.
























あちこちにヒナギクが群生している。There are clumps of daisies here and there.




















































































































































































































ジブの裏帆とラダーを使って、バックしながら船首を進みたい方向に向けました。Using the rudder and the jib with the wind behind it we backed up, turning the bow to the direction we wanted to go.




























































































加藤氏は、パリに在住していて、家に残した家族を懐かしがっている。Mr. Kato, living in Paris, misses the family he left behind.























カラー・キー・プログラム・システムでは全ての色が「クールパレット」と「ウォームパレット」の２つに分けられる。With the colour key program system, all colours are divided into two palettes, the "cool palette" and the "warm palette".












人の口に戸は立てられぬ。We cannot control other people's tongues.



さらに厄介なことに、彼は近所の人に迷惑をかけていることにさえ気づいていない。To make matters worse, he isn't even conscious of annoying his neighbors.































































































































































































































































だから何なの？So what?


















































ただ一つの方法は、彼女に助けを求めることだった。The only way was to ask her for help.
払えるかどうか分からないざます。I'm not sure I can afford it.
























































































































彼は私たちに試みにフランス語で話しかけてきた。He tried speaking French to us.









































































あの家はまだ買い手がつかない。They still haven't found a buyer for that house.
























































現実の占有は九分の勝ち目。Possession is nine-tenths of the law.
































































その場所は一見の価値がある。The place is certainly worth seeing.










































































ばかな話はよせ。Stop your nonsense!
君の努力はいずれは報われることだろう。Your efforts will be rewarded in the long run.


彼女がすぐに元気になるといいのだが。We hope she will take heart soon.





















































































































































































































































私のアルバムをあなたにお見せします。I'll show my album to you.












































































恵一、天ぷら揚がったから、皿持って来い。Keiichi, the tempura's done, so bring a plate.旗が揚がっている。The flag is up.







































































































































































































































彼女は魚をサラダ油で揚げた。She fried fish in salad oil.この鶏肉はよく揚げられている。This chicken is fried well.彼は息子とたこをあげた。He flew a kite with his son.
彼は実例をあげてその問題を説明した。He illustrated the problem with an example.記者：例を１つあげてくださいますか。Reporter: Can you give me an example?日本にしかない植物の名を幾つか挙げられますか。Can you name any plants peculiar to Japan?









































































































































































































































































































そのロッカーは十代の若者アイドルだ。The rock star is an idol of the teenagers.



















































































































































































































































































































































































最悪・・・入場制限を設けるしかないでしょう。整理券の配布とかで。What a mess... I suppose there's nothing for it but restricting admissions. Handing out numbered tickets or something.




















































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































彼は丸太をのこぎりでひいて板にしている。He is sawing a log into boards.

















































彼女は寒気を防ぐために厚いコートを着ていた。She was wearing a thick coat against the chill.





















































































































































































































































新提案が承認されることはなさそうだ。I doubt the new proposal will be accepted.


































































彼は上手い事を言って母親から余分にお金をせしめた。He coaxed extra money from his mother.




































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































こう見えても意外に人前で話すの苦手で、手なんか震えるし、口ごもちゃって、自分でも何言っているかわからない時がある。I may seem confident, but I get extremely nervous speaking in front of people. My hands tremble, I get all tongue-tied, and sometimes I don't even know what I'm saying myself.






































































































金庫の中の書類が消えてなくなっている。The papers that were in the safe are gone.





















































































































































































































































































































































































その気がなければ、はたからはどうすることもできないとよく言うだろうね。If he doesn't want to learn, we can't make him.












































































































































































ポールはいつも女性の体を弄っている。Paul is always groping women.







































彼のことを知れば知るほどいっそう彼のことが好きになる。The more you know about him, the more you like him.























































































































































































































































宇宙科学はまだその緒に就いたばかりである。Space science is still in its infancy.


















































































どうか私に微笑みかけておくれ。Smile at me, please.




























































































































































































































































































長いわずらいで彼は借金をこさえた。His long sickness ran him into debt.


これは真に最善の方法だ。This is the very best method.















































スミス先生は彼らに英語の発音の反復練習をさせた。Mr Smith drilled them in English pronunciation.


ここで迷わず迂回路を取ることにする。Here I decide, without hesitating, to take the alternative route.












































































































































































































彼は我々の心にかなう人物だ。He is a man after our own hearts.
バレエ音楽の指揮者として彼にかなうものはいない。He stands alone as a conductor of ballet music.


















































































































































































火事で４世帯が焼死した。Four families were killed in the fire.































サメの皮はマグロの皮よりはるかにざらざらしている。The skin of a shark is much rougher than that of a tuna fish.

























































































































































































































彼は平衡を失ってはしごから落ちた。He lost his balance and fell off the ladder.

















































この地域の失業はほぼないに等しい。Unemployment in this part of the country is virtually nonexistent.



























































































彼は種々の方法を試みた。He tried many different methods.














































































































































彼は彼女に気付くと「バル！」と叫んだ。"Val!" he shouted when he recognized her.






















































ガラス製品はペルシャからシルクロードを通ってきました。Glasswork came from Persia by way of the Silk Road.
























































































彼は眠くて瞼が重かった。His eyes were heavy with sleep.


























































































































































































アンゴラはかつてポルトガルの領土だった。Angola was once a Portuguese territory.






















































































































































飲む分だけ豆をローストして、ミルで挽くんです。We roast just enough beans for the amount we're going to drink, and grind them in the coffee mill.








































































































































































































































































































彼の正直さは見上げたものだ。His honesty does him credit.

























































































































































































































































































































































奴等の無遠慮がしゃくなんだ。I'm annoyed by their impudence.















































































































































今やっていることを少し根気強く続けなさい。Have a little patience with what you're doing.


































































































































































































































プラモ作りは家でやってくださいよ。ラッカー液の臭い、充満してるじゃないですか。Please do your model building at home! The room's full of the smell of lacquer.












































































































ここから先には行けません。You cannot go any farther.





















































































































































































最近のカタログを送ってくだされば幸いです。I'd appreciate it if you sent me your latest catalog.このお願いをお認めいただけましたら幸いです。I would be grateful for your approval of this request.











































型はいいですけど、色違いはありますか。The style is nice, but do you have it in a different color?
先月、生け花を学び始めたばかりですので、まだ、初心者です。I just started learning flower arrangement last month, so I'm still a beginner.


























破滅への門は広く、破滅への道は広し。Wide is the gate and broad is the way that leads to destruction.



















































神の恵みのあらんことを！God bless you!





















僕にそんな口の利き方をするなんて、君は何様のつもりだい。Who are you to talk to me like that?































































このブラウスはボタンが背中にある。This blouse buttons at the back.













































































わざわざのお見送り本当にありがとう。How good of you to come all the way to see me off!









彼には悪評が絶えない。He is a constant subject of scandal.

























昨夜花火工場で、爆発事故が起こった。Last night an explosion took place at a fireworks factory.その労働者は爆発事故が原因で死亡した。The workman died from the explosion.


日本のある有名な詩人は俳句におけるどのような固定化した考え方にも反対している。A famous Japanese poet does not approve of any fixed doctrine in haiku.







































































それはとてもよく似合う髪形だ。That's a very becoming hairstyle.






































































































私は彼に面と向かって臆病者といってやった。I called him a coward to his face.











































彼女は私たちの団体では重要な役を務めている。She is playing an important role in our organization.





























































































































「今、行動を起こせ」という、それが伝える実際的な意味に加えて、即座の行動がなぜ重要であるかという多くの理由をも、言外に示唆していたのであった。"Act now!" he said, and in addition to his obvious meaning, he hinted that there were number of other important reasons why immediate action was needed.



















学校は川のこちら側ですか。Is the school on this side of the river?


























































海は穏やかに、そしてなめらかに見える。The sea looks calm and smooth.



























































この薬は飲みにくい。The medicine is hard to swallow.






































































７月２２日付けのお手紙につきまして私共の最新の目録を同封します。With regard to your letter of July 22nd, I enclose our most recent catalogue.















































































































この車は最新型です。This car is the latest model.



























































何かお役に立てることはありますか？Can I be of any assistance to you?








































































































































毎度ごひいきにありがとうございます。Thank you for your patronage.


















































野犬がうちの庭を踏み荒した。Stray dogs tramped about my garden.



























































警察によれば、真夏のうだるような暑さがその暴動に火をつけたということだ。The police blamed the hot dog-days for sparking the riot.





































































この中に、バスで簡単に行けるところがありますか。Are any of these locations easy to get to by bus?







































日曜日に晴れるといいのになあ。I hope the weather will clear up on Sunday.











































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































